
 
 
 
 Produced by Judith Boss, and David Widger
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 WALDEN,
 
 and
 
 ON THE DUTY OF CIVIL DISOBEDIENCE
 
 By Henry David Thoreau
 
 
 
 
 Contents
 
 
 =WALDEN=
 
 Economy
 
 Where I Lived, and What I Lived For
 
 Reading
 
 Sounds
 
 Solitude
 
 Visitors
 
 The Bean-Field
 
 The Village
 
 The Ponds
 
 Baker Farm
 
 Higher Laws
 
 Brute Neighbors
 
 House-Warming
 
 Former Inhabitants and Winter Visitors
 
 Winter Animals
 
 The Pond in Winter
 
 Spring
 
 Conclusion
 
 
 =ON THE DUTY OF CIVIL DISOBEDIENCE=
 
 
 
 
 WALDEN
 
 
 
 
 Economy
 
 
 When I wrote the following pages, or rather the bulk of them, I lived
 alone, in the woods, a mile from any neighbor, in a house which I had
 built myself, on the shore of Walden Pond, in Concord, Massachusetts,
 and earned my living by the labor of my hands only. I lived there two
 years and two months. At present I am a sojourner in civilized life
 again.
 
 I should not obtrude my affairs so much on the notice of my readers if
 very particular inquiries had not been made by my townsmen concerning
 my mode of life, which some would call impertinent, though they do not
 appear to me at all impertinent, but, considering the circumstances,
 very natural and pertinent. Some have asked what I got to eat; if I did
 not feel lonesome; if I was not afraid; and the like. Others have been
 curious to learn what portion of my income I devoted to charitable
 purposes; and some, who have large families, how many poor children
 I maintained. I will therefore ask those of my readers who feel no
 particular interest in me to pardon me if I undertake to answer some of
 these questions in this book. In most books, the _I_, or first person, is
 omitted; in this it will be retained; that, in respect to egotism, is
 the main difference. We commonly do not remember that it is, after all,
 always the first person that is speaking. I should not talk so
 much about myself if there were anybody else whom I knew as well.
 Unfortunately, I am confined to this theme by the narrowness of my
 experience. Moreover, I, on my side, require of every writer, first or
 last, a simple and sincere account of his own life, and not merely what
 he has heard of other men's lives; some such account as he would send to
 his kindred from a distant land; for if he has lived sincerely, it
 must have been in a distant land to me. Perhaps these pages are more
 particularly addressed to poor students. As for the rest of my readers,
 they will accept such portions as apply to them. I trust that none will
 stretch the seams in putting on the coat, for it may do good service to
 him whom it fits.
 
 I would fain say something, not so much concerning the Chinese and
 Sandwich Islanders as you who read these pages, who are said to live
 in New England; something about your condition, especially your outward
 condition or circumstances in this world, in this town, what it is,
 whether it is necessary that it be as bad as it is, whether it cannot
 be improved as well as not. I have travelled a good deal in Concord;
 and everywhere, in shops, and offices, and fields, the inhabitants have
 appeared to me to be doing penance in a thousand remarkable ways. What
 I have heard of Bramins sitting exposed to four fires and looking in the
 face of the sun; or hanging suspended, with their heads downward, over
 flames; or looking at the heavens over their shoulders "until it becomes
 impossible for them to resume their natural position, while from the
 twist of the neck nothing but liquids can pass into the stomach"; or
 dwelling, chained for life, at the foot of a tree; or measuring with
 their bodies, like caterpillars, the breadth of vast empires; or
 standing on one leg on the tops of pillars--even these forms of
 conscious penance are hardly more incredible and astonishing than
 the scenes which I daily witness. The twelve labors of Hercules were
 trifling in comparison with those which my neighbors have undertaken;
 for they were only twelve, and had an end; but I could never see that
 these men slew or captured any monster or finished any labor. They have
 no friend Iolaus to burn with a hot iron the root of the hydra's head,
 but as soon as one head is crushed, two spring up.
 
 I see young men, my townsmen, whose misfortune it is to have inherited
 farms, houses, barns, cattle, and farming tools; for these are more
 easily acquired than got rid of. Better if they had been born in the
 open pasture and suckled by a wolf, that they might have seen with
 clearer eyes what field they were called to labor in. Who made them
 serfs of the soil? Why should they eat their sixty acres, when man is
 condemned to eat only his peck of dirt? Why should they begin digging
 their graves as soon as they are born? They have got to live a man's
 life, pushing all these things before them, and get on as well as they
 can. How many a poor immortal soul have I met well-nigh crushed and
 smothered under its load, creeping down the road of life, pushing before
 it a barn seventy-five feet by forty, its Augean stables never cleansed,
 and one hundred acres of land, tillage, mowing, pasture, and woodlot!
 The portionless, who struggle with no such unnecessary inherited
 encumbrances, find it labor enough to subdue and cultivate a few cubic
 feet of flesh.
 
 But men labor under a mistake. The better part of the man is soon plowed
 into the soil for compost. By a seeming fate, commonly called necessity,
 they are employed, as it says in an old book, laying up treasures which
 moth and rust will corrupt and thieves break through and steal. It is
 a fool's life, as they will find when they get to the end of it, if not
 before. It is said that Deucalion and Pyrrha created men by throwing
 stones over their heads behind them:--
 
            Inde genus durum sumus, experiensque laborum,
            Et documenta damus qua simus origine nati.
 
 Or, as Raleigh rhymes it in his sonorous way,--
 
   "From thence our kind hard-hearted is, enduring pain and care,
    Approving that our bodies of a stony nature are."
 
 So much for a blind obedience to a blundering oracle, throwing the
 stones over their heads behind them, and not seeing where they fell.
 
 Most men, even in this comparatively free country, through mere
 ignorance and mistake, are so occupied with the factitious cares and
 superfluously coarse labors of life that its finer fruits cannot be
 plucked by them. Their fingers, from excessive toil, are too clumsy and
 tremble too much for that. Actually, the laboring man has not leisure
 for a true integrity day by day; he cannot afford to sustain the
 manliest relations to men; his labor would be depreciated in the market.
 He has no time to be anything but a machine. How can he remember well
 his ignorance--which his growth requires--who has so often to use his
 knowledge? We should feed and clothe him gratuitously sometimes, and
 recruit him with our cordials, before we judge of him. The finest
 qualities of our nature, like the bloom on fruits, can be preserved only
 by the most delicate handling. Yet we do not treat ourselves nor one
 another thus tenderly.
 
 Some of you, we all know, are poor, find it hard to live, are sometimes,
 as it were, gasping for breath. I have no doubt that some of you who
 read this book are unable to pay for all the dinners which you have
 actually eaten, or for the coats and shoes which are fast wearing or are
 already worn out, and have come to this page to spend borrowed or stolen
 time, robbing your creditors of an hour. It is very evident what mean
 and sneaking lives many of you live, for my sight has been whetted by
 experience; always on the limits, trying to get into business and trying
 to get out of debt, a very ancient slough, called by the Latins _aes
 alienum_, another's brass, for some of their coins were made of brass;
 still living, and dying, and buried by this other's brass; always
 promising to pay, promising to pay, tomorrow, and dying today,
 insolvent; seeking to curry favor, to get custom, by how many modes,
 only not state-prison offenses; lying, flattering, voting, contracting
 yourselves into a nutshell of civility or dilating into an atmosphere of
 thin and vaporous generosity, that you may persuade your neighbor to let
 you make his shoes, or his hat, or his coat, or his carriage, or import
 his groceries for him; making yourselves sick, that you may lay up
 something against a sick day, something to be tucked away in an old
 chest, or in a stocking behind the plastering, or, more safely, in the
 brick bank; no matter where, no matter how much or how little.
 
 I sometimes wonder that we can be so frivolous, I may almost say, as to
 attend to the gross but somewhat foreign form of servitude called Negro
 Slavery, there are so many keen and subtle masters that enslave both
 North and South. It is hard to have a Southern overseer; it is worse to
 have a Northern one; but worst of all when you are the slave-driver
 of yourself. Talk of a divinity in man! Look at the teamster on the
 highway, wending to market by day or night; does any divinity stir
 within him? His highest duty to fodder and water his horses! What is his
 destiny to him compared with the shipping interests? Does not he drive
 for Squire Make-a-stir? How godlike, how immortal, is he? See how he
 cowers and sneaks, how vaguely all the day he fears, not being immortal
 nor divine, but the slave and prisoner of his own opinion of himself, a
 fame won by his own deeds. Public opinion is a weak tyrant compared with
 our own private opinion. What a man thinks of himself, that it is which
 determines, or rather indicates, his fate. Self-emancipation even in the
 West Indian provinces of the fancy and imagination--what Wilberforce
 is there to bring that about? Think, also, of the ladies of the land
 weaving toilet cushions against the last day, not to betray too green
 an interest in their fates! As if you could kill time without injuring
 eternity.
 
 The mass of men lead lives of quiet desperation. What is called
 resignation is confirmed desperation. From the desperate city you
 go into the desperate country, and have to console yourself with the
 bravery of minks and muskrats. A stereotyped but unconscious despair
 is concealed even under what are called the games and amusements of
 mankind. There is no play in them, for this comes after work. But it is
 a characteristic of wisdom not to do desperate things.
 
 When we consider what, to use the words of the catechism, is the chief
 end of man, and what are the true necessaries and means of life, it
 appears as if men had deliberately chosen the common mode of living
 because they preferred it to any other. Yet they honestly think there is
 no choice left. But alert and healthy natures remember that the sun
 rose clear. It is never too late to give up our prejudices. No way of
 thinking or doing, however ancient, can be trusted without proof. What
 everybody echoes or in silence passes by as true to-day may turn out to
 be falsehood to-morrow, mere smoke of opinion, which some had trusted
 for a cloud that would sprinkle fertilizing rain on their fields. What
 old people say you cannot do, you try and find that you can. Old deeds
 for old people, and new deeds for new. Old people did not know enough
 once, perchance, to fetch fresh fuel to keep the fire a-going; new
 people put a little dry wood under a pot, and are whirled round the
 globe with the speed of birds, in a way to kill old people, as the
 phrase is. Age is no better, hardly so well, qualified for an instructor
 as youth, for it has not profited so much as it has lost. One may
 almost doubt if the wisest man has learned anything of absolute value by
 living. Practically, the old have no very important advice to give the
 young, their own experience has been so partial, and their lives have
 been such miserable failures, for private reasons, as they must
 believe; and it may be that they have some faith left which belies that
 experience, and they are only less young than they were. I have lived
 some thirty years on this planet, and I have yet to hear the first
 syllable of valuable or even earnest advice from my seniors. They have
 told me nothing, and probably cannot tell me anything to the purpose.
 Here is life, an experiment to a great extent untried by me; but it does
 not avail me that they have tried it. If I have any experience which I
 think valuable, I am sure to reflect that this my Mentors said nothing
 about.
 
 One farmer says to me, "You cannot live on vegetable food solely, for it
 furnishes nothing to make bones with"; and so he religiously devotes a
 part of his day to supplying his system with the raw material of
 bones; walking all the while he talks behind his oxen, which, with
 vegetable-made bones, jerk him and his lumbering plow along in spite
 of every obstacle. Some things are really necessaries of life in some
 circles, the most helpless and diseased, which in others are luxuries
 merely, and in others still are entirely unknown.
 
 The whole ground of human life seems to some to have been gone over by
 their predecessors, both the heights and the valleys, and all things to
 have been cared for. According to Evelyn, "the wise Solomon prescribed
 ordinances for the very distances of trees; and the Roman prA|tors have
 decided how often you may go into your neighbor's land to gather the
 acorns which fall on it without trespass, and what share belongs to that
 neighbor." Hippocrates has even left directions how we should cut our
 nails; that is, even with the ends of the fingers, neither shorter nor
 longer. Undoubtedly the very tedium and ennui which presume to have
 exhausted the variety and the joys of life are as old as Adam. But man's
 capacities have never been measured; nor are we to judge of what he can
 do by any precedents, so little has been tried. Whatever have been thy
 failures hitherto, "be not afflicted, my child, for who shall assign to
 thee what thou hast left undone?"
 
 We might try our lives by a thousand simple tests; as, for instance,
 that the same sun which ripens my beans illumines at once a system of
 earths like ours. If I had remembered this it would have prevented some
 mistakes. This was not the light in which I hoed them. The stars are the
 apexes of what wonderful triangles! What distant and different beings in
 the various mansions of the universe are contemplating the same one at
 the same moment! Nature and human life are as various as our several
 constitutions. Who shall say what prospect life offers to another? Could
 a greater miracle take place than for us to look through each other's
 eyes for an instant? We should live in all the ages of the world in an
 hour; ay, in all the worlds of the ages. History, Poetry, Mythology!--I
 know of no reading of another's experience so startling and informing as
 this would be.
 
 The greater part of what my neighbors call good I believe in my soul
 to be bad, and if I repent of anything, it is very likely to be my good
 behavior. What demon possessed me that I behaved so well? You may say
 the wisest thing you can, old man--you who have lived seventy years, not
 without honor of a kind--I hear an irresistible voice which invites me
 away from all that. One generation abandons the enterprises of another
 like stranded vessels.
 
 I think that we may safely trust a good deal more than we do. We may
 waive just so much care of ourselves as we honestly bestow elsewhere.
 Nature is as well adapted to our weakness as to our strength. The
 incessant anxiety and strain of some is a well-nigh incurable form of
 disease. We are made to exaggerate the importance of what work we do;
 and yet how much is not done by us! or, what if we had been taken sick?
 How vigilant we are! determined not to live by faith if we can avoid it;
 all the day long on the alert, at night we unwillingly say our prayers
 and commit ourselves to uncertainties. So thoroughly and sincerely are
 we compelled to live, reverencing our life, and denying the possibility
 of change. This is the only way, we say; but there are as many ways as
 there can be drawn radii from one centre. All change is a miracle to
 contemplate; but it is a miracle which is taking place every instant.
 Confucius said, "To know that we know what we know, and that we do not
 know what we do not know, that is true knowledge." When one man has
 reduced a fact of the imagination to be a fact to his understanding, I
 foresee that all men at length establish their lives on that basis.
 
 Let us consider for a moment what most of the trouble and anxiety which
 I have referred to is about, and how much it is necessary that we be
 troubled, or at least careful. It would be some advantage to live
 a primitive and frontier life, though in the midst of an outward
 civilization, if only to learn what are the gross necessaries of life
 and what methods have been taken to obtain them; or even to look over
 the old day-books of the merchants, to see what it was that men most
 commonly bought at the stores, what they stored, that is, what are the
 grossest groceries. For the improvements of ages have had but little
 influence on the essential laws of man's existence; as our skeletons,
 probably, are not to be distinguished from those of our ancestors.
 
 By the words, _necessary of life_, I mean whatever, of all that man
 obtains by his own exertions, has been from the first, or from long use
 has become, so important to human life that few, if any, whether from
 savageness, or poverty, or philosophy, ever attempt to do without it. To
 many creatures there is in this sense but one necessary of life, Food.
 To the bison of the prairie it is a few inches of palatable grass,
 with water to drink; unless he seeks the Shelter of the forest or the
 mountain's shadow. None of the brute creation requires more than Food
 and Shelter. The necessaries of life for man in this climate may,
 accurately enough, be distributed under the several heads of Food,
 Shelter, Clothing, and Fuel; for not till we have secured these are
 we prepared to entertain the true problems of life with freedom and a
 prospect of success. Man has invented, not only houses, but clothes and
 cooked food; and possibly from the accidental discovery of the warmth of
 fire, and the consequent use of it, at first a luxury, arose the present
 necessity to sit by it. We observe cats and dogs acquiring the same
 second nature. By proper Shelter and Clothing we legitimately retain
 our own internal heat; but with an excess of these, or of Fuel, that
 is, with an external heat greater than our own internal, may not
 cookery properly be said to begin? Darwin, the naturalist, says of the
 inhabitants of Tierra del Fuego, that while his own party, who were well
 clothed and sitting close to a fire, were far from too warm, these naked
 savages, who were farther off, were observed, to his great surprise, "to
 be streaming with perspiration at undergoing such a roasting." So, we
 are told, the New Hollander goes naked with impunity, while the European
 shivers in his clothes. Is it impossible to combine the hardiness of
 these savages with the intellectualness of the civilized man? According
 to Liebig, man's body is a stove, and food the fuel which keeps up the
 internal combustion in the lungs. In cold weather we eat more, in warm
 less. The animal heat is the result of a slow combustion, and disease
 and death take place when this is too rapid; or for want of fuel, or
 from some defect in the draught, the fire goes out. Of course the vital
 heat is not to be confounded with fire; but so much for analogy. It
 appears, therefore, from the above list, that the expression, _animal
 life_, is nearly synonymous with the expression, _animal heat_; for while
 Food may be regarded as the Fuel which keeps up the fire within us--and
 Fuel serves only to prepare that Food or to increase the warmth of our
 bodies by addition from without--Shelter and Clothing also serve only to
 retain the heat thus generated and absorbed.
 
 The grand necessity, then, for our bodies, is to keep warm, to keep
 the vital heat in us. What pains we accordingly take, not only with
 our Food, and Clothing, and Shelter, but with our beds, which are our
 night-clothes, robbing the nests and breasts of birds to prepare this
 shelter within a shelter, as the mole has its bed of grass and leaves at
 the end of its burrow! The poor man is wont to complain that this is a
 cold world; and to cold, no less physical than social, we refer directly
 a great part of our ails. The summer, in some climates, makes possible
 to man a sort of Elysian life. Fuel, except to cook his Food, is
 then unnecessary; the sun is his fire, and many of the fruits are
 sufficiently cooked by its rays; while Food generally is more various,
 and more easily obtained, and Clothing and Shelter are wholly or half
 unnecessary. At the present day, and in this country, as I find by
 my own experience, a few implements, a knife, an axe, a spade, a
 wheelbarrow, etc., and for the studious, lamplight, stationery, and
 access to a few books, rank next to necessaries, and can all be obtained
 at a trifling cost. Yet some, not wise, go to the other side of the
 globe, to barbarous and unhealthy regions, and devote themselves to
 trade for ten or twenty years, in order that they may live--that is,
 keep comfortably warm--and die in New England at last. The luxuriously
 rich are not simply kept comfortably warm, but unnaturally hot; as I
 implied before, they are cooked, of course _A  la mode_.
 
 Most of the luxuries, and many of the so-called comforts of life, are
 not only not indispensable, but positive hindrances to the elevation
 of mankind. With respect to luxuries and comforts, the wisest have
 ever lived a more simple and meagre life than the poor. The ancient
 philosophers, Chinese, Hindoo, Persian, and Greek, were a class than
 which none has been poorer in outward riches, none so rich in inward. We
 know not much about them. It is remarkable that we know so much of them
 as we do. The same is true of the more modern reformers and benefactors
 of their race. None can be an impartial or wise observer of human life
 but from the vantage ground of what we should call voluntary poverty.
 Of a life of luxury the fruit is luxury, whether in agriculture, or
 commerce, or literature, or art. There are nowadays professors of
 philosophy, but not philosophers. Yet it is admirable to profess because
 it was once admirable to live. To be a philosopher is not merely to have
 subtle thoughts, nor even to found a school, but so to love wisdom as
 to live according to its dictates, a life of simplicity, independence,
 magnanimity, and trust. It is to solve some of the problems of life, not
 only theoretically, but practically. The success of great scholars and
 thinkers is commonly a courtier-like success, not kingly, not manly.
 They make shift to live merely by conformity, practically as their
 fathers did, and are in no sense the progenitors of a noble race of men.
 But why do men degenerate ever? What makes families run out? What is the
 nature of the luxury which enervates and destroys nations? Are we sure
 that there is none of it in our own lives? The philosopher is in
 advance of his age even in the outward form of his life. He is not fed,
 sheltered, clothed, warmed, like his contemporaries. How can a man be a
 philosopher and not maintain his vital heat by better methods than other
 men?
 
 When a man is warmed by the several modes which I have described, what
 does he want next? Surely not more warmth of the same kind, as more and
 richer food, larger and more splendid houses, finer and more abundant
 clothing, more numerous, incessant, and hotter fires, and the like.
 When he has obtained those things which are necessary to life, there is
 another alternative than to obtain the superfluities; and that is, to
 adventure on life now, his vacation from humbler toil having commenced.
 The soil, it appears, is suited to the seed, for it has sent its radicle
 downward, and it may now send its shoot upward also with confidence. Why
 has man rooted himself thus firmly in the earth, but that he may rise in
 the same proportion into the heavens above?--for the nobler plants are
 valued for the fruit they bear at last in the air and light, far from
 the ground, and are not treated like the humbler esculents, which,
 though they may be biennials, are cultivated only till they have
 perfected their root, and often cut down at top for this purpose, so
 that most would not know them in their flowering season.
 
 I do not mean to prescribe rules to strong and valiant natures, who will
 mind their own affairs whether in heaven or hell, and perchance build
 more magnificently and spend more lavishly than the richest, without
 ever impoverishing themselves, not knowing how they live--if, indeed,
 there are any such, as has been dreamed; nor to those who find their
 encouragement and inspiration in precisely the present condition of
 things, and cherish it with the fondness and enthusiasm of lovers--and,
 to some extent, I reckon myself in this number; I do not speak to those
 who are well employed, in whatever circumstances, and they know whether
 they are well employed or not;--but mainly to the mass of men who are
 discontented, and idly complaining of the hardness of their lot or of
 the times, when they might improve them. There are some who complain
 most energetically and inconsolably of any, because they are, as they
 say, doing their duty. I also have in my mind that seemingly wealthy,
 but most terribly impoverished class of all, who have accumulated dross,
 but know not how to use it, or get rid of it, and thus have forged their
 own golden or silver fetters.
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 If I should attempt to tell how I have desired to spend my life in years
 past, it would probably surprise those of my readers who are somewhat
 acquainted with its actual history; it would certainly astonish those
 who know nothing about it. I will only hint at some of the enterprises
 which I have cherished.
 
 In any weather, at any hour of the day or night, I have been anxious to
 improve the nick of time, and notch it on my stick too; to stand on the
 meeting of two eternities, the past and future, which is precisely the
 present moment; to toe that line. You will pardon some obscurities,
 for there are more secrets in my trade than in most men's, and yet not
 voluntarily kept, but inseparable from its very nature. I would gladly
 tell all that I know about it, and never paint "No Admittance" on my
 gate.
 
 I long ago lost a hound, a bay horse, and a turtle dove, and am still
 on their trail. Many are the travellers I have spoken concerning them,
 describing their tracks and what calls they answered to. I have met one
 or two who had heard the hound, and the tramp of the horse, and even
 seen the dove disappear behind a cloud, and they seemed as anxious to
 recover them as if they had lost them themselves.
 
 To anticipate, not the sunrise and the dawn merely, but, if possible,
 Nature herself! How many mornings, summer and winter, before yet any
 neighbor was stirring about his business, have I been about mine! No
 doubt, many of my townsmen have met me returning from this enterprise,
 farmers starting for Boston in the twilight, or woodchoppers going
 to their work. It is true, I never assisted the sun materially in his
 rising, but, doubt not, it was of the last importance only to be present
 at it.
 
 So many autumn, ay, and winter days, spent outside the town, trying to
 hear what was in the wind, to hear and carry it express! I well-nigh
 sunk all my capital in it, and lost my own breath into the bargain,
 running in the face of it. If it had concerned either of the political
 parties, depend upon it, it would have appeared in the Gazette with the
 earliest intelligence. At other times watching from the observatory of
 some cliff or tree, to telegraph any new arrival; or waiting at evening
 on the hill-tops for the sky to fall, that I might catch something,
 though I never caught much, and that, manna-wise, would dissolve again
 in the sun.
 
 For a long time I was reporter to a journal, of no very wide
 circulation, whose editor has never yet seen fit to print the bulk of my
 contributions, and, as is too common with writers, I got only my labor
 for my pains. However, in this case my pains were their own reward.
 
 For many years I was self-appointed inspector of snow-storms and
 rain-storms, and did my duty faithfully; surveyor, if not of highways,
 then of forest paths and all across-lot routes, keeping them open, and
 ravines bridged and passable at all seasons, where the public heel had
 testified to their utility.
 
 I have looked after the wild stock of the town, which give a faithful
 herdsman a good deal of trouble by leaping fences; and I have had an
 eye to the unfrequented nooks and corners of the farm; though I did
 not always know whether Jonas or Solomon worked in a particular
 field to-day; that was none of my business. I have watered the red
 huckleberry, the sand cherry and the nettle-tree, the red pine and
 the black ash, the white grape and the yellow violet, which might have
 withered else in dry seasons.
 
 In short, I went on thus for a long time (I may say it without
 boasting), faithfully minding my business, till it became more and more
 evident that my townsmen would not after all admit me into the list of
 town officers, nor make my place a sinecure with a moderate allowance.
 My accounts, which I can swear to have kept faithfully, I have, indeed,
 never got audited, still less accepted, still less paid and settled.
 However, I have not set my heart on that.
 
 Not long since, a strolling Indian went to sell baskets at the house
 of a well-known lawyer in my neighborhood. "Do you wish to buy any
 baskets?" he asked. "No, we do not want any," was the reply. "What!"
 exclaimed the Indian as he went out the gate, "do you mean to starve
 us?" Having seen his industrious white neighbors so well off--that
 the lawyer had only to weave arguments, and, by some magic, wealth and
 standing followed--he had said to himself: I will go into business; I
 will weave baskets; it is a thing which I can do. Thinking that when he
 had made the baskets he would have done his part, and then it would be
 the white man's to buy them. He had not discovered that it was necessary
 for him to make it worth the other's while to buy them, or at least make
 him think that it was so, or to make something else which it would be
 worth his while to buy. I too had woven a kind of basket of a delicate
 texture, but I had not made it worth any one's while to buy them. Yet
 not the less, in my case, did I think it worth my while to weave them,
 and instead of studying how to make it worth men's while to buy my
 baskets, I studied rather how to avoid the necessity of selling them.
 The life which men praise and regard as successful is but one kind. Why
 should we exaggerate any one kind at the expense of the others?
 
 Finding that my fellow-citizens were not likely to offer me any room in
 the court house, or any curacy or living anywhere else, but I must shift
 for myself, I turned my face more exclusively than ever to the woods,
 where I was better known. I determined to go into business at once, and
 not wait to acquire the usual capital, using such slender means as I had
 already got. My purpose in going to Walden Pond was not to live cheaply
 nor to live dearly there, but to transact some private business with the
 fewest obstacles; to be hindered from accomplishing which for want of a
 little common sense, a little enterprise and business talent, appeared
 not so sad as foolish.
 
 I have always endeavored to acquire strict business habits; they are
 indispensable to every man. If your trade is with the Celestial Empire,
 then some small counting house on the coast, in some Salem harbor, will
 be fixture enough. You will export such articles as the country affords,
 purely native products, much ice and pine timber and a little granite,
 always in native bottoms. These will be good ventures. To oversee all
 the details yourself in person; to be at once pilot and captain, and
 owner and underwriter; to buy and sell and keep the accounts; to
 read every letter received, and write or read every letter sent; to
 superintend the discharge of imports night and day; to be upon many
 parts of the coast almost at the same time--often the richest freight
 will be discharged upon a Jersey shore;--to be your own telegraph,
 unweariedly sweeping the horizon, speaking all passing vessels bound
 coastwise; to keep up a steady despatch of commodities, for the supply
 of such a distant and exorbitant market; to keep yourself informed of
 the state of the markets, prospects of war and peace everywhere, and
 anticipate the tendencies of trade and civilization--taking advantage
 of the results of all exploring expeditions, using new passages and all
 improvements in navigation;--charts to be studied, the position of reefs
 and new lights and buoys to be ascertained, and ever, and ever, the
 logarithmic tables to be corrected, for by the error of some calculator
 the vessel often splits upon a rock that should have reached a friendly
 pier--there is the untold fate of La Prouse;--universal science to
 be kept pace with, studying the lives of all great discoverers and
 navigators, great adventurers and merchants, from Hanno and the
 Phoenicians down to our day; in fine, account of stock to be taken from
 time to time, to know how you stand. It is a labor to task the faculties
 of a man--such problems of profit and loss, of interest, of tare and
 tret, and gauging of all kinds in it, as demand a universal knowledge.
 
 I have thought that Walden Pond would be a good place for business,
 not solely on account of the railroad and the ice trade; it offers
 advantages which it may not be good policy to divulge; it is a good port
 and a good foundation. No Neva marshes to be filled; though you must
 everywhere build on piles of your own driving. It is said that a
 flood-tide, with a westerly wind, and ice in the Neva, would sweep St.
 Petersburg from the face of the earth.
 
 As this business was to be entered into without the usual capital, it
 may not be easy to conjecture where those means, that will still be
 indispensable to every such undertaking, were to be obtained. As for
 Clothing, to come at once to the practical part of the question, perhaps
 we are led oftener by the love of novelty and a regard for the opinions
 of men, in procuring it, than by a true utility. Let him who has work to
 do recollect that the object of clothing is, first, to retain the vital
 heat, and secondly, in this state of society, to cover nakedness, and
 he may judge how much of any necessary or important work may be
 accomplished without adding to his wardrobe. Kings and queens who wear
 a suit but once, though made by some tailor or dressmaker to their
 majesties, cannot know the comfort of wearing a suit that fits. They are
 no better than wooden horses to hang the clean clothes on. Every day our
 garments become more assimilated to ourselves, receiving the impress of
 the wearer's character, until we hesitate to lay them aside without such
 delay and medical appliances and some such solemnity even as our bodies.
 No man ever stood the lower in my estimation for having a patch in his
 clothes; yet I am sure that there is greater anxiety, commonly, to have
 fashionable, or at least clean and unpatched clothes, than to have a
 sound conscience. But even if the rent is not mended, perhaps the worst
 vice betrayed is improvidence. I sometimes try my acquaintances by such
 tests as this--Who could wear a patch, or two extra seams only, over
 the knee? Most behave as if they believed that their prospects for life
 would be ruined if they should do it. It would be easier for them to
 hobble to town with a broken leg than with a broken pantaloon. Often if
 an accident happens to a gentleman's legs, they can be mended; but if a
 similar accident happens to the legs of his pantaloons, there is no help
 for it; for he considers, not what is truly respectable, but what is
 respected. We know but few men, a great many coats and breeches. Dress
 a scarecrow in your last shift, you standing shiftless by, who would not
 soonest salute the scarecrow? Passing a cornfield the other day, close
 by a hat and coat on a stake, I recognized the owner of the farm. He was
 only a little more weather-beaten than when I saw him last. I have
 heard of a dog that barked at every stranger who approached his master's
 premises with clothes on, but was easily quieted by a naked thief. It is
 an interesting question how far men would retain their relative rank
 if they were divested of their clothes. Could you, in such a case,
 tell surely of any company of civilized men which belonged to the most
 respected class? When Madam Pfeiffer, in her adventurous travels round
 the world, from east to west, had got so near home as Asiatic Russia,
 she says that she felt the necessity of wearing other than a travelling
 dress, when she went to meet the authorities, for she "was now in a
 civilized country, where... people are judged of by their clothes." Even
 in our democratic New England towns the accidental possession of wealth,
 and its manifestation in dress and equipage alone, obtain for the
 possessor almost universal respect. But they yield such respect,
 numerous as they are, are so far heathen, and need to have a missionary
 sent to them. Beside, clothes introduced sewing, a kind of work which
 you may call endless; a woman's dress, at least, is never done.
 
 A man who has at length found something to do will not need to get a new
 suit to do it in; for him the old will do, that has lain dusty in the
 garret for an indeterminate period. Old shoes will serve a hero longer
 than they have served his valet--if a hero ever has a valet--bare feet
 are older than shoes, and he can make them do. Only they who go to
 soirA(C)es and legislative balls must have new coats, coats to change as
 often as the man changes in them. But if my jacket and trousers, my hat
 and shoes, are fit to worship God in, they will do; will they not? Who
 ever saw his old clothes--his old coat, actually worn out, resolved into
 its primitive elements, so that it was not a deed of charity to bestow
 it on some poor boy, by him perchance to be bestowed on some poorer
 still, or shall we say richer, who could do with less? I say, beware of
 all enterprises that require new clothes, and not rather a new wearer of
 clothes. If there is not a new man, how can the new clothes be made to
 fit? If you have any enterprise before you, try it in your old clothes.
 All men want, not something to _do with_, but something to _do_, or rather
 something to _be_. Perhaps we should never procure a new suit, however
 ragged or dirty the old, until we have so conducted, so enterprised or
 sailed in some way, that we feel like new men in the old, and that to
 retain it would be like keeping new wine in old bottles. Our moulting
 season, like that of the fowls, must be a crisis in our lives. The loon
 retires to solitary ponds to spend it. Thus also the snake casts its
 slough, and the caterpillar its wormy coat, by an internal industry
 and expansion; for clothes are but our outmost cuticle and mortal
 coil. Otherwise we shall be found sailing under false colors, and be
 inevitably cashiered at last by our own opinion, as well as that of
 mankind.
 
 We don garment after garment, as if we grew like exogenous plants by
 addition without. Our outside and often thin and fanciful clothes are
 our epidermis, or false skin, which partakes not of our life, and may be
 stripped off here and there without fatal injury; our thicker garments,
 constantly worn, are our cellular integument, or cortex; but our shirts
 are our liber, or true bark, which cannot be removed without girdling
 and so destroying the man. I believe that all races at some seasons wear
 something equivalent to the shirt. It is desirable that a man be clad
 so simply that he can lay his hands on himself in the dark, and that he
 live in all respects so compactly and preparedly that, if an enemy
 take the town, he can, like the old philosopher, walk out the gate
 empty-handed without anxiety. While one thick garment is, for most
 purposes, as good as three thin ones, and cheap clothing can be obtained
 at prices really to suit customers; while a thick coat can be bought for
 five dollars, which will last as many years, thick pantaloons for two
 dollars, cowhide boots for a dollar and a half a pair, a summer hat for
 a quarter of a dollar, and a winter cap for sixty-two and a half cents,
 or a better be made at home at a nominal cost, where is he so poor that,
 clad in such a suit, of _his own earning_, there will not be found wise
 men to do him reverence?
 
 When I ask for a garment of a particular form, my tailoress tells me
 gravely, "They do not make them so now," not emphasizing the "They" at
 all, as if she quoted an authority as impersonal as the Fates, and I
 find it difficult to get made what I want, simply because she cannot
 believe that I mean what I say, that I am so rash. When I hear this
 oracular sentence, I am for a moment absorbed in thought, emphasizing to
 myself each word separately that I may come at the meaning of it, that I
 may find out by what degree of consanguinity _They_ are related to _me_,
 and what authority they may have in an affair which affects me so
 nearly; and, finally, I am inclined to answer her with equal mystery,
 and without any more emphasis of the "they"--"It is true, they did not
 make them so recently, but they do now." Of what use this measuring of
 me if she does not measure my character, but only the breadth of my
 shoulders, as it were a peg to hang the coat on? We worship not the
 Graces, nor the Parcae, but Fashion. She spins and weaves and cuts with
 full authority. The head monkey at Paris puts on a traveller's cap, and
 all the monkeys in America do the same. I sometimes despair of getting
 anything quite simple and honest done in this world by the help of men.
 They would have to be passed through a powerful press first, to squeeze
 their old notions out of them, so that they would not soon get upon
 their legs again; and then there would be some one in the company with a
 maggot in his head, hatched from an egg deposited there nobody knows
 when, for not even fire kills these things, and you would have lost your
 labor. Nevertheless, we will not forget that some Egyptian wheat was
 handed down to us by a mummy.
 
 On the whole, I think that it cannot be maintained that dressing has in
 this or any country risen to the dignity of an art. At present men make
 shift to wear what they can get. Like shipwrecked sailors, they put on
 what they can find on the beach, and at a little distance, whether of
 space or time, laugh at each other's masquerade. Every generation laughs
 at the old fashions, but follows religiously the new. We are amused at
 beholding the costume of Henry VIII, or Queen Elizabeth, as much as if
 it was that of the King and Queen of the Cannibal Islands. All costume
 off a man is pitiful or grotesque. It is only the serious eye peering
 from and the sincere life passed within it which restrain laughter and
 consecrate the costume of any people. Let Harlequin be taken with a fit
 of the colic and his trappings will have to serve that mood too. When
 the soldier is hit by a cannonball, rags are as becoming as purple.
 
 The childish and savage taste of men and women for new patterns keeps
 how many shaking and squinting through kaleidoscopes that they may
 discover the particular figure which this generation requires today. The
 manufacturers have learned that this taste is merely whimsical. Of two
 patterns which differ only by a few threads more or less of a particular
 color, the one will be sold readily, the other lie on the shelf, though
 it frequently happens that after the lapse of a season the latter
 becomes the most fashionable. Comparatively, tattooing is not the
 hideous custom which it is called. It is not barbarous merely because
 the printing is skin-deep and unalterable.
 
 I cannot believe that our factory system is the best mode by which men
 may get clothing. The condition of the operatives is becoming every day
 more like that of the English; and it cannot be wondered at, since,
 as far as I have heard or observed, the principal object is, not
 that mankind may be well and honestly clad, but, unquestionably, that
 corporations may be enriched. In the long run men hit only what they aim
 at. Therefore, though they should fail immediately, they had better aim
 at something high.
 
 As for a Shelter, I will not deny that this is now a necessary of
 life, though there are instances of men having done without it for
 long periods in colder countries than this. Samuel Laing says that "the
 Laplander in his skin dress, and in a skin bag which he puts over his
 head and shoulders, will sleep night after night on the snow... in a
 degree of cold which would extinguish the life of one exposed to it in
 any woollen clothing." He had seen them asleep thus. Yet he adds, "They
 are not hardier than other people." But, probably, man did not live long
 on the earth without discovering the convenience which there is in a
 house, the domestic comforts, which phrase may have originally signified
 the satisfactions of the house more than of the family; though these
 must be extremely partial and occasional in those climates where the
 house is associated in our thoughts with winter or the rainy season
 chiefly, and two thirds of the year, except for a parasol, is
 unnecessary. In our climate, in the summer, it was formerly almost
 solely a covering at night. In the Indian gazettes a wigwam was the
 symbol of a day's march, and a row of them cut or painted on the bark of
 a tree signified that so many times they had camped. Man was not made
 so large limbed and robust but that he must seek to narrow his world
 and wall in a space such as fitted him. He was at first bare and out of
 doors; but though this was pleasant enough in serene and warm weather,
 by daylight, the rainy season and the winter, to say nothing of the
 torrid sun, would perhaps have nipped his race in the bud if he had not
 made haste to clothe himself with the shelter of a house. Adam and Eve,
 according to the fable, wore the bower before other clothes. Man wanted
 a home, a place of warmth, or comfort, first of warmth, then the warmth
 of the affections.
 
 We may imagine a time when, in the infancy of the human race, some
 enterprising mortal crept into a hollow in a rock for shelter. Every
 child begins the world again, to some extent, and loves to stay
 outdoors, even in wet and cold. It plays house, as well as horse, having
 an instinct for it. Who does not remember the interest with which, when
 young, he looked at shelving rocks, or any approach to a cave? It was
 the natural yearning of that portion, any portion of our most primitive
 ancestor which still survived in us. From the cave we have advanced to
 roofs of palm leaves, of bark and boughs, of linen woven and stretched,
 of grass and straw, of boards and shingles, of stones and tiles. At
 last, we know not what it is to live in the open air, and our lives are
 domestic in more senses than we think. From the hearth the field is a
 great distance. It would be well, perhaps, if we were to spend more of
 our days and nights without any obstruction between us and the celestial
 bodies, if the poet did not speak so much from under a roof, or the
 saint dwell there so long. Birds do not sing in caves, nor do doves
 cherish their innocence in dovecots.
 
 However, if one designs to construct a dwelling-house, it behooves him
 to exercise a little Yankee shrewdness, lest after all he find himself
 in a workhouse, a labyrinth without a clue, a museum, an almshouse, a
 prison, or a splendid mausoleum instead. Consider first how slight a
 shelter is absolutely necessary. I have seen Penobscot Indians, in this
 town, living in tents of thin cotton cloth, while the snow was nearly a
 foot deep around them, and I thought that they would be glad to have
 it deeper to keep out the wind. Formerly, when how to get my living
 honestly, with freedom left for my proper pursuits, was a question
 which vexed me even more than it does now, for unfortunately I am become
 somewhat callous, I used to see a large box by the railroad, six feet
 long by three wide, in which the laborers locked up their tools at
 night; and it suggested to me that every man who was hard pushed might
 get such a one for a dollar, and, having bored a few auger holes in it,
 to admit the air at least, get into it when it rained and at night, and
 hook down the lid, and so have freedom in his love, and in his soul
 be free. This did not appear the worst, nor by any means a despicable
 alternative. You could sit up as late as you pleased, and, whenever you
 got up, go abroad without any landlord or house-lord dogging you for
 rent. Many a man is harassed to death to pay the rent of a larger and
 more luxurious box who would not have frozen to death in such a box as
 this. I am far from jesting. Economy is a subject which admits of being
 treated with levity, but it cannot so be disposed of. A comfortable
 house for a rude and hardy race, that lived mostly out of doors, was
 once made here almost entirely of such materials as Nature furnished
 ready to their hands. Gookin, who was superintendent of the Indians
 subject to the Massachusetts Colony, writing in 1674, says, "The best
 of their houses are covered very neatly, tight and warm, with barks of
 trees, slipped from their bodies at those seasons when the sap is up,
 and made into great flakes, with pressure of weighty timber, when they
 are green.... The meaner sort are covered with mats which they make of
 a kind of bulrush, and are also indifferently tight and warm, but not
 so good as the former.... Some I have seen, sixty or a hundred feet
 long and thirty feet broad.... I have often lodged in their wigwams, and
 found them as warm as the best English houses." He adds that they were
 commonly carpeted and lined within with well-wrought embroidered mats,
 and were furnished with various utensils. The Indians had advanced so
 far as to regulate the effect of the wind by a mat suspended over the
 hole in the roof and moved by a string. Such a lodge was in the first
 instance constructed in a day or two at most, and taken down and put up
 in a few hours; and every family owned one, or its apartment in one.
 
 In the savage state every family owns a shelter as good as the best, and
 sufficient for its coarser and simpler wants; but I think that I speak
 within bounds when I say that, though the birds of the air have their
 nests, and the foxes their holes, and the savages their wigwams, in
 modern civilized society not more than one half the families own a
 shelter. In the large towns and cities, where civilization especially
 prevails, the number of those who own a shelter is a very small fraction
 of the whole. The rest pay an annual tax for this outside garment of
 all, become indispensable summer and winter, which would buy a village
 of Indian wigwams, but now helps to keep them poor as long as they live.
 I do not mean to insist here on the disadvantage of hiring compared with
 owning, but it is evident that the savage owns his shelter because it
 costs so little, while the civilized man hires his commonly because he
 cannot afford to own it; nor can he, in the long run, any better afford
 to hire. But, answers one, by merely paying this tax, the poor civilized
 man secures an abode which is a palace compared with the savage's. An
 annual rent of from twenty-five to a hundred dollars (these are the
 country rates) entitles him to the benefit of the improvements
 of centuries, spacious apartments, clean paint and paper, Rumford
 fire-place, back plastering, Venetian blinds, copper pump, spring lock,
 a commodious cellar, and many other things. But how happens it that he
 who is said to enjoy these things is so commonly a poor civilized
 man, while the savage, who has them not, is rich as a savage? If it
 is asserted that civilization is a real advance in the condition
 of man--and I think that it is, though only the wise improve their
 advantages--it must be shown that it has produced better dwellings
 without making them more costly; and the cost of a thing is the amount
 of what I will call life which is required to be exchanged for it,
 immediately or in the long run. An average house in this neighborhood
 costs perhaps eight hundred dollars, and to lay up this sum will take
 from ten to fifteen years of the laborer's life, even if he is not
 encumbered with a family--estimating the pecuniary value of every man's
 labor at one dollar a day, for if some receive more, others receive
 less;--so that he must have spent more than half his life commonly
 before his wigwam will be earned. If we suppose him to pay a rent
 instead, this is but a doubtful choice of evils. Would the savage have
 been wise to exchange his wigwam for a palace on these terms?
 
 It may be guessed that I reduce almost the whole advantage of holding
 this superfluous property as a fund in store against the future, so
 far as the individual is concerned, mainly to the defraying of
 funeral expenses. But perhaps a man is not required to bury himself.
 Nevertheless this points to an important distinction between the
 civilized man and the savage; and, no doubt, they have designs on us for
 our benefit, in making the life of a civilized people an _institution_, in
 which the life of the individual is to a great extent absorbed, in order
 to preserve and perfect that of the race. But I wish to show at what a
 sacrifice this advantage is at present obtained, and to suggest that we
 may possibly so live as to secure all the advantage without suffering
 any of the disadvantage. What mean ye by saying that the poor ye have
 always with you, or that the fathers have eaten sour grapes, and the
 children's teeth are set on edge?
 
 "As I live, saith the Lord God, ye shall not have occasion any more to
 use this proverb in Israel.
 
 "Behold all souls are mine; as the soul of the father, so also the soul
 of the son is mine: the soul that sinneth, it shall die."
 
 When I consider my neighbors, the farmers of Concord, who are at least
 as well off as the other classes, I find that for the most part they
 have been toiling twenty, thirty, or forty years, that they may become
 the real owners of their farms, which commonly they have inherited with
 encumbrances, or else bought with hired money--and we may regard one
 third of that toil as the cost of their houses--but commonly they have
 not paid for them yet. It is true, the encumbrances sometimes outweigh
 the value of the farm, so that the farm itself becomes one great
 encumbrance, and still a man is found to inherit it, being well
 acquainted with it, as he says. On applying to the assessors, I am
 surprised to learn that they cannot at once name a dozen in the town who
 own their farms free and clear. If you would know the history of these
 homesteads, inquire at the bank where they are mortgaged. The man who
 has actually paid for his farm with labor on it is so rare that every
 neighbor can point to him. I doubt if there are three such men in
 Concord. What has been said of the merchants, that a very large
 majority, even ninety-seven in a hundred, are sure to fail, is equally
 true of the farmers. With regard to the merchants, however, one of them
 says pertinently that a great part of their failures are not genuine
 pecuniary failures, but merely failures to fulfil their engagements,
 because it is inconvenient; that is, it is the moral character that
 breaks down. But this puts an infinitely worse face on the matter, and
 suggests, beside, that probably not even the other three succeed in
 saving their souls, but are perchance bankrupt in a worse sense than
 they who fail honestly. Bankruptcy and repudiation are the springboards
 from which much of our civilization vaults and turns its somersets, but
 the savage stands on the unelastic plank of famine. Yet the Middlesex
 Cattle Show goes off here with _A(C)clat_ annually, as if all the joints of
 the agricultural machine were suent.
 
 The farmer is endeavoring to solve the problem of a livelihood by a
 formula more complicated than the problem itself. To get his shoestrings
 he speculates in herds of cattle. With consummate skill he has set his
 trap with a hair spring to catch comfort and independence, and then, as
 he turned away, got his own leg into it. This is the reason he is poor;
 and for a similar reason we are all poor in respect to a thousand savage
 comforts, though surrounded by luxuries. As Chapman sings,
 
              "The false society of men--
                 --for earthly greatness
               All heavenly comforts rarefies to air."
 
 And when the farmer has got his house, he may not be the richer but the
 poorer for it, and it be the house that has got him. As I understand
 it, that was a valid objection urged by Momus against the house which
 Minerva made, that she "had not made it movable, by which means a bad
 neighborhood might be avoided"; and it may still be urged, for our
 houses are such unwieldy property that we are often imprisoned rather
 than housed in them; and the bad neighborhood to be avoided is our own
 scurvy selves. I know one or two families, at least, in this town, who,
 for nearly a generation, have been wishing to sell their houses in
 the outskirts and move into the village, but have not been able to
 accomplish it, and only death will set them free.
 
 Granted that the majority are able at last either to own or hire the
 modern house with all its improvements. While civilization has been
 improving our houses, it has not equally improved the men who are to
 inhabit them. It has created palaces, but it was not so easy to create
 noblemen and kings. And _if the civilized man's pursuits are no worthier
 than the savage's, if he is employed the greater part of his life in
 obtaining gross necessaries and comforts merely, why should he have a
 better dwelling than the former?_
 
 But how do the poor minority fare? Perhaps it will be found that just in
 proportion as some have been placed in outward circumstances above the
 savage, others have been degraded below him. The luxury of one class
 is counterbalanced by the indigence of another. On the one side is the
 palace, on the other are the almshouse and "silent poor." The myriads
 who built the pyramids to be the tombs of the Pharaohs were fed on
 garlic, and it may be were not decently buried themselves. The mason who
 finishes the cornice of the palace returns at night perchance to a hut
 not so good as a wigwam. It is a mistake to suppose that, in a country
 where the usual evidences of civilization exist, the condition of a very
 large body of the inhabitants may not be as degraded as that of savages.
 I refer to the degraded poor, not now to the degraded rich. To know this
 I should not need to look farther than to the shanties which everywhere
 border our railroads, that last improvement in civilization; where I see
 in my daily walks human beings living in sties, and all winter with an
 open door, for the sake of light, without any visible, often imaginable,
 wood-pile, and the forms of both old and young are permanently
 contracted by the long habit of shrinking from cold and misery, and the
 development of all their limbs and faculties is checked. It certainly
 is fair to look at that class by whose labor the works which distinguish
 this generation are accomplished. Such too, to a greater or less extent,
 is the condition of the operatives of every denomination in England,
 which is the great workhouse of the world. Or I could refer you to
 Ireland, which is marked as one of the white or enlightened spots on the
 map. Contrast the physical condition of the Irish with that of the North
 American Indian, or the South Sea Islander, or any other savage race
 before it was degraded by contact with the civilized man. Yet I have no
 doubt that that people's rulers are as wise as the average of civilized
 rulers. Their condition only proves what squalidness may consist with
 civilization. I hardly need refer now to the laborers in our Southern
 States who produce the staple exports of this country, and are
 themselves a staple production of the South. But to confine myself to
 those who are said to be in _moderate_ circumstances.
 
 Most men appear never to have considered what a house is, and are
 actually though needlessly poor all their lives because they think that
 they must have such a one as their neighbors have. As if one were
 to wear any sort of coat which the tailor might cut out for him, or,
 gradually leaving off palm-leaf hat or cap of woodchuck skin, complain
 of hard times because he could not afford to buy him a crown! It is
 possible to invent a house still more convenient and luxurious than we
 have, which yet all would admit that man could not afford to pay for.
 Shall we always study to obtain more of these things, and not sometimes
 to be content with less? Shall the respectable citizen thus gravely
 teach, by precept and example, the necessity of the young man's
 providing a certain number of superfluous glow-shoes, and umbrellas, and
 empty guest chambers for empty guests, before he dies? Why should not
 our furniture be as simple as the Arab's or the Indian's? When I think
 of the benefactors of the race, whom we have apotheosized as messengers
 from heaven, bearers of divine gifts to man, I do not see in my mind any
 retinue at their heels, any carload of fashionable furniture. Or what
 if I were to allow--would it not be a singular allowance?--that our
 furniture should be more complex than the Arab's, in proportion as we
 are morally and intellectually his superiors! At present our houses are
 cluttered and defiled with it, and a good housewife would sweep out
 the greater part into the dust hole, and not leave her morning's work
 undone. Morning work! By the blushes of Aurora and the music of Memnon,
 what should be man's _morning work_ in this world? I had three pieces of
 limestone on my desk, but I was terrified to find that they required to
 be dusted daily, when the furniture of my mind was all undusted still,
 and threw them out the window in disgust. How, then, could I have a
 furnished house? I would rather sit in the open air, for no dust gathers
 on the grass, unless where man has broken ground.
 
 It is the luxurious and dissipated who set the fashions which the herd
 so diligently follow. The traveller who stops at the best houses, so
 called, soon discovers this, for the publicans presume him to be a
 Sardanapalus, and if he resigned himself to their tender mercies he
 would soon be completely emasculated. I think that in the railroad car
 we are inclined to spend more on luxury than on safety and convenience,
 and it threatens without attaining these to become no better than a
 modern drawing-room, with its divans, and ottomans, and sun-shades,
 and a hundred other oriental things, which we are taking west with us,
 invented for the ladies of the harem and the effeminate natives of the
 Celestial Empire, which Jonathan should be ashamed to know the names
 of. I would rather sit on a pumpkin and have it all to myself than be
 crowded on a velvet cushion. I would rather ride on earth in an ox
 cart, with a free circulation, than go to heaven in the fancy car of an
 excursion train and breathe a _malaria_ all the way.
 
 The very simplicity and nakedness of man's life in the primitive ages
 imply this advantage, at least, that they left him still but a sojourner
 in nature. When he was refreshed with food and sleep, he contemplated
 his journey again. He dwelt, as it were, in a tent in this world, and
 was either threading the valleys, or crossing the plains, or climbing
 the mountain-tops. But lo! men have become the tools of their tools. The
 man who independently plucked the fruits when he was hungry is become a
 farmer; and he who stood under a tree for shelter, a housekeeper. We
 now no longer camp as for a night, but have settled down on earth and
 forgotten heaven. We have adopted Christianity merely as an improved
 method of _agri_-culture. We have built for this world a family mansion,
 and for the next a family tomb. The best works of art are the expression
 of man's struggle to free himself from this condition, but the effect
 of our art is merely to make this low state comfortable and that higher
 state to be forgotten. There is actually no place in this village for a
 work of _fine_ art, if any had come down to us, to stand, for our lives,
 our houses and streets, furnish no proper pedestal for it. There is not
 a nail to hang a picture on, nor a shelf to receive the bust of a hero
 or a saint. When I consider how our houses are built and paid for, or
 not paid for, and their internal economy managed and sustained, I wonder
 that the floor does not give way under the visitor while he is admiring
 the gewgaws upon the mantelpiece, and let him through into the cellar,
 to some solid and honest though earthy foundation. I cannot but perceive
 that this so-called rich and refined life is a thing jumped at, and I
 do not get on in the enjoyment of the fine arts which adorn it, my
 attention being wholly occupied with the jump; for I remember that the
 greatest genuine leap, due to human muscles alone, on record, is that of
 certain wandering Arabs, who are said to have cleared twenty-five feet
 on level ground. Without factitious support, man is sure to come to
 earth again beyond that distance. The first question which I am tempted
 to put to the proprietor of such great impropriety is, Who bolsters
 you? Are you one of the ninety-seven who fail, or the three who succeed?
 Answer me these questions, and then perhaps I may look at your bawbles
 and find them ornamental. The cart before the horse is neither beautiful
 nor useful. Before we can adorn our houses with beautiful objects the
 walls must be stripped, and our lives must be stripped, and beautiful
 housekeeping and beautiful living be laid for a foundation: now, a taste
 for the beautiful is most cultivated out of doors, where there is no
 house and no housekeeper.
 
 Old Johnson, in his "Wonder-Working Providence," speaking of the first
 settlers of this town, with whom he was contemporary, tells us that
 "they burrow themselves in the earth for their first shelter under some
 hillside, and, casting the soil aloft upon timber, they make a smoky
 fire against the earth, at the highest side." They did not "provide them
 houses," says he, "till the earth, by the Lord's blessing, brought forth
 bread to feed them," and the first year's crop was so light that
 "they were forced to cut their bread very thin for a long season." The
 secretary of the Province of New Netherland, writing in Dutch, in 1650,
 for the information of those who wished to take up land there, states
 more particularly that "those in New Netherland, and especially in New
 England, who have no means to build farmhouses at first according to
 their wishes, dig a square pit in the ground, cellar fashion, six or
 seven feet deep, as long and as broad as they think proper, case the
 earth inside with wood all round the wall, and line the wood with the
 bark of trees or something else to prevent the caving in of the earth;
 floor this cellar with plank, and wainscot it overhead for a ceiling,
 raise a roof of spars clear up, and cover the spars with bark or green
 sods, so that they can live dry and warm in these houses with their
 entire families for two, three, and four years, it being understood that
 partitions are run through those cellars which are adapted to the size
 of the family. The wealthy and principal men in New England, in the
 beginning of the colonies, commenced their first dwelling-houses in
 this fashion for two reasons: firstly, in order not to waste time in
 building, and not to want food the next season; secondly, in order not
 to discourage poor laboring people whom they brought over in numbers
 from Fatherland. In the course of three or four years, when the country
 became adapted to agriculture, they built themselves handsome houses,
 spending on them several thousands."
 
 In this course which our ancestors took there was a show of prudence
 at least, as if their principle were to satisfy the more pressing wants
 first. But are the more pressing wants satisfied now? When I think of
 acquiring for myself one of our luxurious dwellings, I am deterred, for,
 so to speak, the country is not yet adapted to _human_ culture, and we are
 still forced to cut our _spiritual_ bread far thinner than our forefathers
 did their wheaten. Not that all architectural ornament is to be
 neglected even in the rudest periods; but let our houses first be
 lined with beauty, where they come in contact with our lives, like the
 tenement of the shellfish, and not overlaid with it. But, alas! I have
 been inside one or two of them, and know what they are lined with.
 
 Though we are not so degenerate but that we might possibly live in a
 cave or a wigwam or wear skins today, it certainly is better to accept
 the advantages, though so dearly bought, which the invention and
 industry of mankind offer. In such a neighborhood as this, boards and
 shingles, lime and bricks, are cheaper and more easily obtained than
 suitable caves, or whole logs, or bark in sufficient quantities, or
 even well-tempered clay or flat stones. I speak understandingly on this
 subject, for I have made myself acquainted with it both theoretically
 and practically. With a little more wit we might use these materials so
 as to become richer than the richest now are, and make our civilization
 a blessing. The civilized man is a more experienced and wiser savage.
 But to make haste to my own experiment.
 
 Near the end of March, 1845, I borrowed an axe and went down to the
 woods by Walden Pond, nearest to where I intended to build my house, and
 began to cut down some tall, arrowy white pines, still in their youth,
 for timber. It is difficult to begin without borrowing, but perhaps it
 is the most generous course thus to permit your fellow-men to have an
 interest in your enterprise. The owner of the axe, as he released his
 hold on it, said that it was the apple of his eye; but I returned it
 sharper than I received it. It was a pleasant hillside where I worked,
 covered with pine woods, through which I looked out on the pond, and a
 small open field in the woods where pines and hickories were springing
 up. The ice in the pond was not yet dissolved, though there were some
 open spaces, and it was all dark-colored and saturated with water. There
 were some slight flurries of snow during the days that I worked there;
 but for the most part when I came out on to the railroad, on my
 way home, its yellow sand heap stretched away gleaming in the hazy
 atmosphere, and the rails shone in the spring sun, and I heard the lark
 and pewee and other birds already come to commence another year with us.
 They were pleasant spring days, in which the winter of man's discontent
 was thawing as well as the earth, and the life that had lain torpid
 began to stretch itself. One day, when my axe had come off and I had cut
 a green hickory for a wedge, driving it with a stone, and had placed the
 whole to soak in a pond-hole in order to swell the wood, I saw a striped
 snake run into the water, and he lay on the bottom, apparently without
 inconvenience, as long as I stayed there, or more than a quarter of
 an hour; perhaps because he had not yet fairly come out of the torpid
 state. It appeared to me that for a like reason men remain in their
 present low and primitive condition; but if they should feel the
 influence of the spring of springs arousing them, they would of
 necessity rise to a higher and more ethereal life. I had previously seen
 the snakes in frosty mornings in my path with portions of their bodies
 still numb and inflexible, waiting for the sun to thaw them. On the 1st
 of April it rained and melted the ice, and in the early part of the day,
 which was very foggy, I heard a stray goose groping about over the pond
 and cackling as if lost, or like the spirit of the fog.
 
 So I went on for some days cutting and hewing timber, and also studs
 and rafters, all with my narrow axe, not having many communicable or
 scholar-like thoughts, singing to myself,--
 
                   Men say they know many things;
                   But lo! they have taken wings--
                   The arts and sciences,
                   And a thousand appliances;
                   The wind that blows
                   Is all that any body knows.
 
 I hewed the main timbers six inches square, most of the studs on two
 sides only, and the rafters and floor timbers on one side, leaving
 the rest of the bark on, so that they were just as straight and much
 stronger than sawed ones. Each stick was carefully mortised or tenoned
 by its stump, for I had borrowed other tools by this time. My days in
 the woods were not very long ones; yet I usually carried my dinner of
 bread and butter, and read the newspaper in which it was wrapped, at
 noon, sitting amid the green pine boughs which I had cut off, and to my
 bread was imparted some of their fragrance, for my hands were covered
 with a thick coat of pitch. Before I had done I was more the friend than
 the foe of the pine tree, though I had cut down some of them, having
 become better acquainted with it. Sometimes a rambler in the wood was
 attracted by the sound of my axe, and we chatted pleasantly over the
 chips which I had made.
 
 By the middle of April, for I made no haste in my work, but rather made
 the most of it, my house was framed and ready for the raising. I had
 already bought the shanty of James Collins, an Irishman who worked on
 the Fitchburg Railroad, for boards. James Collins' shanty was considered
 an uncommonly fine one. When I called to see it he was not at home. I
 walked about the outside, at first unobserved from within, the window
 was so deep and high. It was of small dimensions, with a peaked cottage
 roof, and not much else to be seen, the dirt being raised five feet all
 around as if it were a compost heap. The roof was the soundest part,
 though a good deal warped and made brittle by the sun. Doorsill there
 was none, but a perennial passage for the hens under the door board.
 Mrs. C. came to the door and asked me to view it from the inside. The
 hens were driven in by my approach. It was dark, and had a dirt floor
 for the most part, dank, clammy, and aguish, only here a board and there
 a board which would not bear removal. She lighted a lamp to show me the
 inside of the roof and the walls, and also that the board floor extended
 under the bed, warning me not to step into the cellar, a sort of dust
 hole two feet deep. In her own words, they were "good boards overhead,
 good boards all around, and a good window"--of two whole squares
 originally, only the cat had passed out that way lately. There was a
 stove, a bed, and a place to sit, an infant in the house where it
 was born, a silk parasol, gilt-framed looking-glass, and a patent new
 coffee-mill nailed to an oak sapling, all told. The bargain was soon
 concluded, for James had in the meanwhile returned. I to pay four
 dollars and twenty-five cents tonight, he to vacate at five tomorrow
 morning, selling to nobody else meanwhile: I to take possession at
 six. It were well, he said, to be there early, and anticipate certain
 indistinct but wholly unjust claims on the score of ground rent and
 fuel. This he assured me was the only encumbrance. At six I passed
 him and his family on the road. One large bundle held their all--bed,
 coffee-mill, looking-glass, hens--all but the cat; she took to the woods
 and became a wild cat, and, as I learned afterward, trod in a trap set
 for woodchucks, and so became a dead cat at last.
 
 I took down this dwelling the same morning, drawing the nails, and
 removed it to the pond-side by small cartloads, spreading the boards
 on the grass there to bleach and warp back again in the sun. One early
 thrush gave me a note or two as I drove along the woodland path. I
 was informed treacherously by a young Patrick that neighbor Seeley,
 an Irishman, in the intervals of the carting, transferred the still
 tolerable, straight, and drivable nails, staples, and spikes to his
 pocket, and then stood when I came back to pass the time of day, and
 look freshly up, unconcerned, with spring thoughts, at the devastation;
 there being a dearth of work, as he said. He was there to represent
 spectatordom, and help make this seemingly insignificant event one with
 the removal of the gods of Troy.
 
 I dug my cellar in the side of a hill sloping to the south, where
 a woodchuck had formerly dug his burrow, down through sumach and
 blackberry roots, and the lowest stain of vegetation, six feet square
 by seven deep, to a fine sand where potatoes would not freeze in any
 winter. The sides were left shelving, and not stoned; but the sun having
 never shone on them, the sand still keeps its place. It was but two
 hours' work. I took particular pleasure in this breaking of ground,
 for in almost all latitudes men dig into the earth for an equable
 temperature. Under the most splendid house in the city is still to be
 found the cellar where they store their roots as of old, and long after
 the superstructure has disappeared posterity remark its dent in the
 earth. The house is still but a sort of porch at the entrance of a
 burrow.
 
 At length, in the beginning of May, with the help of some of my
 acquaintances, rather to improve so good an occasion for neighborliness
 than from any necessity, I set up the frame of my house. No man was ever
 more honored in the character of his raisers than I. They are destined,
 I trust, to assist at the raising of loftier structures one day. I began
 to occupy my house on the 4th of July, as soon as it was boarded and
 roofed, for the boards were carefully feather-edged and lapped, so that
 it was perfectly impervious to rain, but before boarding I laid the
 foundation of a chimney at one end, bringing two cartloads of stones up
 the hill from the pond in my arms. I built the chimney after my hoeing
 in the fall, before a fire became necessary for warmth, doing my cooking
 in the meanwhile out of doors on the ground, early in the morning: which
 mode I still think is in some respects more convenient and agreeable
 than the usual one. When it stormed before my bread was baked, I fixed
 a few boards over the fire, and sat under them to watch my loaf, and
 passed some pleasant hours in that way. In those days, when my hands
 were much employed, I read but little, but the least scraps of paper
 which lay on the ground, my holder, or tablecloth, afforded me as much
 entertainment, in fact answered the same purpose as the Iliad.
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 It would be worth the while to build still more deliberately than I did,
 considering, for instance, what foundation a door, a window, a cellar,
 a garret, have in the nature of man, and perchance never raising any
 superstructure until we found a better reason for it than our temporal
 necessities even. There is some of the same fitness in a man's building
 his own house that there is in a bird's building its own nest. Who
 knows but if men constructed their dwellings with their own hands, and
 provided food for themselves and families simply and honestly enough,
 the poetic faculty would be universally developed, as birds universally
 sing when they are so engaged? But alas! we do like cowbirds and
 cuckoos, which lay their eggs in nests which other birds have built, and
 cheer no traveller with their chattering and unmusical notes. Shall we
 forever resign the pleasure of construction to the carpenter? What does
 architecture amount to in the experience of the mass of men? I never
 in all my walks came across a man engaged in so simple and natural an
 occupation as building his house. We belong to the community. It is
 not the tailor alone who is the ninth part of a man; it is as much the
 preacher, and the merchant, and the farmer. Where is this division of
 labor to end? and what object does it finally serve? No doubt another
 _may_ also think for me; but it is not therefore desirable that he should
 do so to the exclusion of my thinking for myself.
 
 True, there are architects so called in this country, and I have
 heard of one at least possessed with the idea of making architectural
 ornaments have a core of truth, a necessity, and hence a beauty, as if
 it were a revelation to him. All very well perhaps from his point
 of view, but only a little better than the common dilettantism. A
 sentimental reformer in architecture, he began at the cornice, not
 at the foundation. It was only how to put a core of truth within the
 ornaments, that every sugarplum, in fact, might have an almond or
 caraway seed in it--though I hold that almonds are most wholesome
 without the sugar--and not how the inhabitant, the indweller, might
 build truly within and without, and let the ornaments take care of
 themselves. What reasonable man ever supposed that ornaments were
 something outward and in the skin merely--that the tortoise got his
 spotted shell, or the shell-fish its mother-o'-pearl tints, by such a
 contract as the inhabitants of Broadway their Trinity Church? But a man
 has no more to do with the style of architecture of his house than a
 tortoise with that of its shell: nor need the soldier be so idle as to
 try to paint the precise color of his virtue on his standard. The enemy
 will find it out. He may turn pale when the trial comes. This man seemed
 to me to lean over the cornice, and timidly whisper his half truth
 to the rude occupants who really knew it better than he. What of
 architectural beauty I now see, I know has gradually grown from within
 outward, out of the necessities and character of the indweller, who is
 the only builder--out of some unconscious truthfulness, and nobleness,
 without ever a thought for the appearance and whatever additional beauty
 of this kind is destined to be produced will be preceded by a like
 unconscious beauty of life. The most interesting dwellings in this
 country, as the painter knows, are the most unpretending, humble
 log huts and cottages of the poor commonly; it is the life of the
 inhabitants whose shells they are, and not any peculiarity in their
 surfaces merely, which makes them picturesque; and equally interesting
 will be the citizen's suburban box, when his life shall be as simple and
 as agreeable to the imagination, and there is as little straining after
 effect in the style of his dwelling. A great proportion of architectural
 ornaments are literally hollow, and a September gale would strip them
 off, like borrowed plumes, without injury to the substantials. They can
 do without architecture who have no olives nor wines in the cellar. What
 if an equal ado were made about the ornaments of style in literature,
 and the architects of our bibles spent as much time about their cornices
 as the architects of our churches do? So are made the _belles-lettres_ and
 the _beaux-arts_ and their professors. Much it concerns a man, forsooth,
 how a few sticks are slanted over him or under him, and what colors
 are daubed upon his box. It would signify somewhat, if, in any earnest
 sense, he slanted them and daubed it; but the spirit having departed out
 of the tenant, it is of a piece with constructing his own coffin--the
 architecture of the grave--and "carpenter" is but another name for
 "coffin-maker." One man says, in his despair or indifference to life,
 take up a handful of the earth at your feet, and paint your house that
 color. Is he thinking of his last and narrow house? Toss up a copper for
 it as well. What an abundance of leisure he must have! Why do you take
 up a handful of dirt? Better paint your house your own complexion; let
 it turn pale or blush for you. An enterprise to improve the style of
 cottage architecture! When you have got my ornaments ready, I will wear
 them.
 
 Before winter I built a chimney, and shingled the sides of my house,
 which were already impervious to rain, with imperfect and sappy shingles
 made of the first slice of the log, whose edges I was obliged to
 straighten with a plane.
 
 I have thus a tight shingled and plastered house, ten feet wide by
 fifteen long, and eight-feet posts, with a garret and a closet, a large
 window on each side, two trap doors, one door at the end, and a brick
 fireplace opposite. The exact cost of my house, paying the usual price
 for such materials as I used, but not counting the work, all of which
 was done by myself, was as follows; and I give the details because very
 few are able to tell exactly what their houses cost, and fewer still, if
 any, the separate cost of the various materials which compose them:--
 
     Boards.......................... $ 8.03-1/2, mostly shanty boards.
     Refuse shingles for roof sides...  4.00
     Laths............................  1.25
     Two second-hand windows
        with glass....................  2.43
     One thousand old brick...........  4.00
     Two casks of lime................  2.40  That was high.
     Hair.............................  0.31  More than I needed.
     Mantle-tree iron.................  0.15
     Nails............................  3.90
     Hinges and screws................  0.14
     Latch............................  0.10
     Chalk............................  0.01
     Transportation...................  1.40  I carried a good part
                                      -------- on my back.
         In all...................... $28.12-1/2
 
 These are all the materials, excepting the timber, stones, and sand,
 which I claimed by squatter's right. I have also a small woodshed
 adjoining, made chiefly of the stuff which was left after building the
 house.
 
 I intend to build me a house which will surpass any on the main street
 in Concord in grandeur and luxury, as soon as it pleases me as much and
 will cost me no more than my present one.
 
 I thus found that the student who wishes for a shelter can obtain one
 for a lifetime at an expense not greater than the rent which he now pays
 annually. If I seem to boast more than is becoming, my excuse is that
 I brag for humanity rather than for myself; and my shortcomings and
 inconsistencies do not affect the truth of my statement. Notwithstanding
 much cant and hypocrisy--chaff which I find it difficult to separate
 from my wheat, but for which I am as sorry as any man--I will breathe
 freely and stretch myself in this respect, it is such a relief to both
 the moral and physical system; and I am resolved that I will not through
 humility become the devil's attorney. I will endeavor to speak a good
 word for the truth. At Cambridge College the mere rent of a student's
 room, which is only a little larger than my own, is thirty dollars each
 year, though the corporation had the advantage of building thirty-two
 side by side and under one roof, and the occupant suffers the
 inconvenience of many and noisy neighbors, and perhaps a residence in
 the fourth story. I cannot but think that if we had more true wisdom
 in these respects, not only less education would be needed, because,
 forsooth, more would already have been acquired, but the pecuniary
 expense of getting an education would in a great measure vanish. Those
 conveniences which the student requires at Cambridge or elsewhere cost
 him or somebody else ten times as great a sacrifice of life as they
 would with proper management on both sides. Those things for which
 the most money is demanded are never the things which the student most
 wants. Tuition, for instance, is an important item in the term bill,
 while for the far more valuable education which he gets by associating
 with the most cultivated of his contemporaries no charge is made. The
 mode of founding a college is, commonly, to get up a subscription of
 dollars and cents, and then, following blindly the principles of a
 division of labor to its extreme--a principle which should never be
 followed but with circumspection--to call in a contractor who makes this
 a subject of speculation, and he employs Irishmen or other operatives
 actually to lay the foundations, while the students that are to be
 are said to be fitting themselves for it; and for these oversights
 successive generations have to pay. I think that it would be better _than
 this_, for the students, or those who desire to be benefited by it, even
 to lay the foundation themselves. The student who secures his coveted
 leisure and retirement by systematically shirking any labor necessary to
 man obtains but an ignoble and unprofitable leisure, defrauding himself
 of the experience which alone can make leisure fruitful. "But," says
 one, "you do not mean that the students should go to work with their
 hands instead of their heads?" I do not mean that exactly, but I mean
 something which he might think a good deal like that; I mean that they
 should not _play_ life, or _study_ it merely, while the community supports
 them at this expensive game, but earnestly live it from beginning to
 end. How could youths better learn to live than by at once trying the
 experiment of living? Methinks this would exercise their minds as much
 as mathematics. If I wished a boy to know something about the arts and
 sciences, for instance, I would not pursue the common course, which
 is merely to send him into the neighborhood of some professor, where
 anything is professed and practised but the art of life;--to survey the
 world through a telescope or a microscope, and never with his natural
 eye; to study chemistry, and not learn how his bread is made, or
 mechanics, and not learn how it is earned; to discover new satellites to
 Neptune, and not detect the motes in his eyes, or to what vagabond he
 is a satellite himself; or to be devoured by the monsters that swarm all
 around him, while contemplating the monsters in a drop of vinegar. Which
 would have advanced the most at the end of a month--the boy who had made
 his own jackknife from the ore which he had dug and smelted, reading
 as much as would be necessary for this--or the boy who had attended
 the lectures on metallurgy at the Institute in the meanwhile, and had
 received a Rodgers' penknife from his father? Which would be most likely
 to cut his fingers?... To my astonishment I was informed on leaving
 college that I had studied navigation!--why, if I had taken one turn
 down the harbor I should have known more about it. Even the poor student
 studies and is taught only _political_ economy, while that economy
 of living which is synonymous with philosophy is not even sincerely
 professed in our colleges. The consequence is, that while he is reading
 Adam Smith, Ricardo, and Say, he runs his father in debt irretrievably.
 
 As with our colleges, so with a hundred "modern improvements"; there
 is an illusion about them; there is not always a positive advance. The
 devil goes on exacting compound interest to the last for his early share
 and numerous succeeding investments in them. Our inventions are wont to
 be pretty toys, which distract our attention from serious things. They
 are but improved means to an unimproved end, an end which it was already
 but too easy to arrive at; as railroads lead to Boston or New York.
 We are in great haste to construct a magnetic telegraph from Maine
 to Texas; but Maine and Texas, it may be, have nothing important to
 communicate. Either is in such a predicament as the man who was
 earnest to be introduced to a distinguished deaf woman, but when he was
 presented, and one end of her ear trumpet was put into his hand, had
 nothing to say. As if the main object were to talk fast and not to talk
 sensibly. We are eager to tunnel under the Atlantic and bring the Old
 World some weeks nearer to the New; but perchance the first news that
 will leak through into the broad, flapping American ear will be that the
 Princess Adelaide has the whooping cough. After all, the man whose horse
 trots a mile in a minute does not carry the most important messages;
 he is not an evangelist, nor does he come round eating locusts and wild
 honey. I doubt if Flying Childers ever carried a peck of corn to mill.
 
 One says to me, "I wonder that you do not lay up money; you love to
 travel; you might take the cars and go to Fitchburg today and see the
 country." But I am wiser than that. I have learned that the swiftest
 traveller is he that goes afoot. I say to my friend, Suppose we try
 who will get there first. The distance is thirty miles; the fare ninety
 cents. That is almost a day's wages. I remember when wages were sixty
 cents a day for laborers on this very road. Well, I start now on foot,
 and get there before night; I have travelled at that rate by the week
 together. You will in the meanwhile have earned your fare, and arrive
 there some time tomorrow, or possibly this evening, if you are lucky
 enough to get a job in season. Instead of going to Fitchburg, you will
 be working here the greater part of the day. And so, if the railroad
 reached round the world, I think that I should keep ahead of you; and
 as for seeing the country and getting experience of that kind, I should
 have to cut your acquaintance altogether.
 
 Such is the universal law, which no man can ever outwit, and with regard
 to the railroad even we may say it is as broad as it is long. To make
 a railroad round the world available to all mankind is equivalent to
 grading the whole surface of the planet. Men have an indistinct notion
 that if they keep up this activity of joint stocks and spades long
 enough all will at length ride somewhere, in next to no time, and for
 nothing; but though a crowd rushes to the depot, and the conductor
 shouts "All aboard!" when the smoke is blown away and the vapor
 condensed, it will be perceived that a few are riding, but the rest are
 run over--and it will be called, and will be, "A melancholy accident."
 No doubt they can ride at last who shall have earned their fare, that
 is, if they survive so long, but they will probably have lost their
 elasticity and desire to travel by that time. This spending of the
 best part of one's life earning money in order to enjoy a questionable
 liberty during the least valuable part of it reminds me of the
 Englishman who went to India to make a fortune first, in order that he
 might return to England and live the life of a poet. He should have gone
 up garret at once. "What!" exclaim a million Irishmen starting up from
 all the shanties in the land, "is not this railroad which we have built
 a good thing?" Yes, I answer, comparatively good, that is, you might
 have done worse; but I wish, as you are brothers of mine, that you could
 have spent your time better than digging in this dirt.
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 Before I finished my house, wishing to earn ten or twelve dollars by
 some honest and agreeable method, in order to meet my unusual expenses,
 I planted about two acres and a half of light and sandy soil near it
 chiefly with beans, but also a small part with potatoes, corn, peas, and
 turnips. The whole lot contains eleven acres, mostly growing up to pines
 and hickories, and was sold the preceding season for eight dollars and
 eight cents an acre. One farmer said that it was "good for nothing but
 to raise cheeping squirrels on." I put no manure whatever on this
 land, not being the owner, but merely a squatter, and not expecting to
 cultivate so much again, and I did not quite hoe it all once. I got out
 several cords of stumps in plowing, which supplied me with fuel for
 a long time, and left small circles of virgin mould, easily
 distinguishable through the summer by the greater luxuriance of the
 beans there. The dead and for the most part unmerchantable wood behind
 my house, and the driftwood from the pond, have supplied the remainder
 of my fuel. I was obliged to hire a team and a man for the plowing,
 though I held the plow myself. My farm outgoes for the first season
 were, for implements, seed, work, etc., $14.72-1/2. The seed corn was given
 me. This never costs anything to speak of, unless you plant more than
 enough. I got twelve bushels of beans, and eighteen bushels of potatoes,
 beside some peas and sweet corn. The yellow corn and turnips were too
 late to come to anything. My whole income from the farm was
 
                                        $ 23.44
       Deducting the outgoes............  14.72-1/2
                                          --------
       There are left.................. $  8.71-1/2
 
 beside produce consumed and on hand at the time this estimate was made
 of the value of $4.50--the amount on hand much more than balancing a
 little grass which I did not raise. All things considered, that is,
 considering the importance of a man's soul and of today, notwithstanding
 the short time occupied by my experiment, nay, partly even because of
 its transient character, I believe that that was doing better than any
 farmer in Concord did that year.
 
 The next year I did better still, for I spaded up all the land which I
 required, about a third of an acre, and I learned from the experience
 of both years, not being in the least awed by many celebrated works on
 husbandry, Arthur Young among the rest, that if one would live simply
 and eat only the crop which he raised, and raise no more than he ate,
 and not exchange it for an insufficient quantity of more luxurious and
 expensive things, he would need to cultivate only a few rods of ground,
 and that it would be cheaper to spade up that than to use oxen to plow
 it, and to select a fresh spot from time to time than to manure the old,
 and he could do all his necessary farm work as it were with his left
 hand at odd hours in the summer; and thus he would not be tied to an ox,
 or horse, or cow, or pig, as at present. I desire to speak impartially
 on this point, and as one not interested in the success or failure of
 the present economical and social arrangements. I was more independent
 than any farmer in Concord, for I was not anchored to a house or farm,
 but could follow the bent of my genius, which is a very crooked one,
 every moment. Beside being better off than they already, if my house had
 been burned or my crops had failed, I should have been nearly as well
 off as before.
 
 I am wont to think that men are not so much the keepers of herds as
 herds are the keepers of men, the former are so much the freer. Men and
 oxen exchange work; but if we consider necessary work only, the oxen
 will be seen to have greatly the advantage, their farm is so much the
 larger. Man does some of his part of the exchange work in his six weeks
 of haying, and it is no boy's play. Certainly no nation that lived
 simply in all respects, that is, no nation of philosophers, would commit
 so great a blunder as to use the labor of animals. True, there never was
 and is not likely soon to be a nation of philosophers, nor am I certain
 it is desirable that there should be. However, _I_ should never have
 broken a horse or bull and taken him to board for any work he might do
 for me, for fear I should become a horseman or a herdsman merely; and if
 society seems to be the gainer by so doing, are we certain that what is
 one man's gain is not another's loss, and that the stable-boy has equal
 cause with his master to be satisfied? Granted that some public works
 would not have been constructed without this aid, and let man share the
 glory of such with the ox and horse; does it follow that he could not
 have accomplished works yet more worthy of himself in that case? When
 men begin to do, not merely unnecessary or artistic, but luxurious and
 idle work, with their assistance, it is inevitable that a few do all the
 exchange work with the oxen, or, in other words, become the slaves of
 the strongest. Man thus not only works for the animal within him, but,
 for a symbol of this, he works for the animal without him. Though we
 have many substantial houses of brick or stone, the prosperity of the
 farmer is still measured by the degree to which the barn overshadows the
 house. This town is said to have the largest houses for oxen, cows, and
 horses hereabouts, and it is not behindhand in its public buildings; but
 there are very few halls for free worship or free speech in this county.
 It should not be by their architecture, but why not even by their power
 of abstract thought, that nations should seek to commemorate themselves?
 How much more admirable the Bhagvat-Geeta than all the ruins of the
 East! Towers and temples are the luxury of princes. A simple and
 independent mind does not toil at the bidding of any prince. Genius is
 not a retainer to any emperor, nor is its material silver, or gold, or
 marble, except to a trifling extent. To what end, pray, is so much stone
 hammered? In Arcadia, when I was there, I did not see any hammering
 stone. Nations are possessed with an insane ambition to perpetuate the
 memory of themselves by the amount of hammered stone they leave. What if
 equal pains were taken to smooth and polish their manners? One piece of
 good sense would be more memorable than a monument as high as the moon.
 I love better to see stones in place. The grandeur of Thebes was a
 vulgar grandeur. More sensible is a rod of stone wall that bounds an
 honest man's field than a hundred-gated Thebes that has wandered farther
 from the true end of life. The religion and civilization which are
 barbaric and heathenish build splendid temples; but what you might call
 Christianity does not. Most of the stone a nation hammers goes toward
 its tomb only. It buries itself alive. As for the Pyramids, there is
 nothing to wonder at in them so much as the fact that so many men could
 be found degraded enough to spend their lives constructing a tomb for
 some ambitious booby, whom it would have been wiser and manlier to
 have drowned in the Nile, and then given his body to the dogs. I might
 possibly invent some excuse for them and him, but I have no time for it.
 As for the religion and love of art of the builders, it is much the same
 all the world over, whether the building be an Egyptian temple or the
 United States Bank. It costs more than it comes to. The mainspring is
 vanity, assisted by the love of garlic and bread and butter. Mr. Balcom,
 a promising young architect, designs it on the back of his Vitruvius,
 with hard pencil and ruler, and the job is let out to Dobson & Sons,
 stonecutters. When the thirty centuries begin to look down on it,
 mankind begin to look up at it. As for your high towers and monuments,
 there was a crazy fellow once in this town who undertook to dig through
 to China, and he got so far that, as he said, he heard the Chinese pots
 and kettles rattle; but I think that I shall not go out of my way to
 admire the hole which he made. Many are concerned about the monuments
 of the West and the East--to know who built them. For my part, I should
 like to know who in those days did not build them--who were above such
 trifling. But to proceed with my statistics.
 
 By surveying, carpentry, and day-labor of various other kinds in the
 village in the meanwhile, for I have as many trades as fingers, I had
 earned $13.34. The expense of food for eight months, namely, from July
 4th to March 1st, the time when these estimates were made, though I
 lived there more than two years--not counting potatoes, a little green
 corn, and some peas, which I had raised, nor considering the value of
 what was on hand at the last date--was
 
     Rice.................... $ 1.73-1/2
     Molasses.................  1.73     Cheapest form of the
                                          saccharine.
     Rye meal.................  1.04-3/4
     Indian meal..............  0.99-3/4  Cheaper than rye.
     Pork.....................  0.22
     All experiments which failed:
     Flour....................  0.88  Costs more than Indian meal,
                                       both money and trouble.
     Sugar....................  0.80
     Lard.....................  0.65
     Apples...................  0.25
     Dried apple..............  0.22
     Sweet potatoes...........  0.10
     One pumpkin..............  0.06
     One watermelon...........  0.02
     Salt.....................  0.03
 
 Yes, I did eat $8.74, all told; but I should not thus unblushingly
 publish my guilt, if I did not know that most of my readers were equally
 guilty with myself, and that their deeds would look no better in print.
 The next year I sometimes caught a mess of fish for my dinner, and
 once I went so far as to slaughter a woodchuck which ravaged my
 bean-field--effect his transmigration, as a Tartar would say--and devour
 him, partly for experiment's sake; but though it afforded me a momentary
 enjoyment, notwithstanding a musky flavor, I saw that the longest use
 would not make that a good practice, however it might seem to have your
 woodchucks ready dressed by the village butcher.
 
 Clothing and some incidental expenses within the same dates, though
 little can be inferred from this item, amounted to
 
                                             $8.40-3/4
     Oil and some household utensils........  2.00
 
 So that all the pecuniary outgoes, excepting for washing and mending,
 which for the most part were done out of the house, and their bills have
 not yet been received--and these are all and more than all the ways by
 which money necessarily goes out in this part of the world--were
 
     House................................. $ 28.12-1/2
     Farm one year........................... 14.72-1/2
     Food eight months.......................  8.74
     Clothing, etc., eight months............  8.40-3/4
     Oil, etc., eight months.................  2.00
                                            ------------
         In all............................ $ 61.99-3/4
 
 I address myself now to those of my readers who have a living to get.
 And to meet this I have for farm produce sold
 
                                             $23.44
     Earned by day-labor....................  13.34
                                            --------
         In all............................. $36.78,
 
 which subtracted from the sum of the outgoes leaves a balance of $25.21-3/4
 on the one side--this being very nearly the means with which I
 started, and the measure of expenses to be incurred--and on the
 other, beside the leisure and independence and health thus secured, a
 comfortable house for me as long as I choose to occupy it.
 
 These statistics, however accidental and therefore uninstructive they
 may appear, as they have a certain completeness, have a certain value
 also. Nothing was given me of which I have not rendered some account.
 It appears from the above estimate, that my food alone cost me in money
 about twenty-seven cents a week. It was, for nearly two years after
 this, rye and Indian meal without yeast, potatoes, rice, a very little
 salt pork, molasses, and salt; and my drink, water. It was fit that I
 should live on rice, mainly, who love so well the philosophy of India.
 To meet the objections of some inveterate cavillers, I may as well
 state, that if I dined out occasionally, as I always had done, and I
 trust shall have opportunities to do again, it was frequently to the
 detriment of my domestic arrangements. But the dining out, being, as
 I have stated, a constant element, does not in the least affect a
 comparative statement like this.
 
 I learned from my two years' experience that it would cost incredibly
 little trouble to obtain one's necessary food, even in this latitude;
 that a man may use as simple a diet as the animals, and yet retain
 health and strength. I have made a satisfactory dinner, satisfactory
 on several accounts, simply off a dish of purslane (_Portulaca oleracea_)
 which I gathered in my cornfield, boiled and salted. I give the Latin on
 account of the savoriness of the trivial name. And pray what more can
 a reasonable man desire, in peaceful times, in ordinary noons, than a
 sufficient number of ears of green sweet corn boiled, with the addition
 of salt? Even the little variety which I used was a yielding to the
 demands of appetite, and not of health. Yet men have come to such a pass
 that they frequently starve, not for want of necessaries, but for want
 of luxuries; and I know a good woman who thinks that her son lost his
 life because he took to drinking water only.
 
 The reader will perceive that I am treating the subject rather from an
 economic than a dietetic point of view, and he will not venture to put
 my abstemiousness to the test unless he has a well-stocked larder.
 
 Bread I at first made of pure Indian meal and salt, genuine hoe-cakes,
 which I baked before my fire out of doors on a shingle or the end of a
 stick of timber sawed off in building my house; but it was wont to get
 smoked and to have a piny flavor. I tried flour also; but have at last
 found a mixture of rye and Indian meal most convenient and agreeable. In
 cold weather it was no little amusement to bake several small loaves of
 this in succession, tending and turning them as carefully as an Egyptian
 his hatching eggs. They were a real cereal fruit which I ripened, and
 they had to my senses a fragrance like that of other noble fruits, which
 I kept in as long as possible by wrapping them in cloths. I made a study
 of the ancient and indispensable art of bread-making, consulting such
 authorities as offered, going back to the primitive days and first
 invention of the unleavened kind, when from the wildness of nuts and
 meats men first reached the mildness and refinement of this diet, and
 travelling gradually down in my studies through that accidental souring
 of the dough which, it is supposed, taught the leavening process, and
 through the various fermentations thereafter, till I came to "good,
 sweet, wholesome bread," the staff of life. Leaven, which some deem the
 soul of bread, the _spiritus_ which fills its cellular tissue, which is
 religiously preserved like the vestal fire--some precious bottleful,
 I suppose, first brought over in the Mayflower, did the business for
 America, and its influence is still rising, swelling, spreading, in
 cerealian billows over the land--this seed I regularly and faithfully
 procured from the village, till at length one morning I forgot the
 rules, and scalded my yeast; by which accident I discovered that even
 this was not indispensable--for my discoveries were not by the synthetic
 but analytic process--and I have gladly omitted it since, though most
 housewives earnestly assured me that safe and wholesome bread without
 yeast might not be, and elderly people prophesied a speedy decay of the
 vital forces. Yet I find it not to be an essential ingredient, and after
 going without it for a year am still in the land of the living; and I
 am glad to escape the trivialness of carrying a bottleful in my pocket,
 which would sometimes pop and discharge its contents to my discomfiture.
 It is simpler and more respectable to omit it. Man is an animal who
 more than any other can adapt himself to all climates and circumstances.
 Neither did I put any sal-soda, or other acid or alkali, into my bread.
 It would seem that I made it according to the recipe which Marcus
 Porcius Cato gave about two centuries before Christ. "Panem depsticium
 sic facito. Manus mortariumque bene lavato. Farinam in mortarium
 indito, aquae paulatim addito, subigitoque pulchre. Ubi bene subegeris,
 defingito, coquitoque sub testu." Which I take to mean,--"Make kneaded
 bread thus. Wash your hands and trough well. Put the meal into the
 trough, add water gradually, and knead it thoroughly. When you have
 kneaded it well, mould it, and bake it under a cover," that is, in a
 baking kettle. Not a word about leaven. But I did not always use this
 staff of life. At one time, owing to the emptiness of my purse, I saw
 none of it for more than a month.
 
 Every New Englander might easily raise all his own breadstuffs in this
 land of rye and Indian corn, and not depend on distant and fluctuating
 markets for them. Yet so far are we from simplicity and independence
 that, in Concord, fresh and sweet meal is rarely sold in the shops, and
 hominy and corn in a still coarser form are hardly used by any. For the
 most part the farmer gives to his cattle and hogs the grain of his own
 producing, and buys flour, which is at least no more wholesome, at a
 greater cost, at the store. I saw that I could easily raise my bushel
 or two of rye and Indian corn, for the former will grow on the poorest
 land, and the latter does not require the best, and grind them in a
 hand-mill, and so do without rice and pork; and if I must have some
 concentrated sweet, I found by experiment that I could make a very good
 molasses either of pumpkins or beets, and I knew that I needed only to
 set out a few maples to obtain it more easily still, and while these
 were growing I could use various substitutes beside those which I have
 named. "For," as the Forefathers sang,--
 
                 "we can make liquor to sweeten our lips
         Of pumpkins and parsnips and walnut-tree chips."
 
 Finally, as for salt, that grossest of groceries, to obtain this might
 be a fit occasion for a visit to the seashore, or, if I did without it
 altogether, I should probably drink the less water. I do not learn that
 the Indians ever troubled themselves to go after it.
 
 Thus I could avoid all trade and barter, so far as my food was
 concerned, and having a shelter already, it would only remain to get
 clothing and fuel. The pantaloons which I now wear were woven in a
 farmer's family--thank Heaven there is so much virtue still in man; for
 I think the fall from the farmer to the operative as great and memorable
 as that from the man to the farmer;--and in a new country, fuel is an
 encumbrance. As for a habitat, if I were not permitted still to squat,
 I might purchase one acre at the same price for which the land I
 cultivated was sold--namely, eight dollars and eight cents. But as it
 was, I considered that I enhanced the value of the land by squatting on
 it.
 
 There is a certain class of unbelievers who sometimes ask me such
 questions as, if I think that I can live on vegetable food alone; and
 to strike at the root of the matter at once--for the root is faith--I
 am accustomed to answer such, that I can live on board nails. If they
 cannot understand that, they cannot understand much that I have to say.
 For my part, I am glad to hear of experiments of this kind being tried;
 as that a young man tried for a fortnight to live on hard, raw corn on
 the ear, using his teeth for all mortar. The squirrel tribe tried the
 same and succeeded. The human race is interested in these experiments,
 though a few old women who are incapacitated for them, or who own their
 thirds in mills, may be alarmed.
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 My furniture, part of which I made myself--and the rest cost me nothing
 of which I have not rendered an account--consisted of a bed, a table, a
 desk, three chairs, a looking-glass three inches in diameter, a pair of
 tongs and andirons, a kettle, a skillet, and a frying-pan, a dipper, a
 wash-bowl, two knives and forks, three plates, one cup, one spoon, a jug
 for oil, a jug for molasses, and a japanned lamp. None is so poor that
 he need sit on a pumpkin. That is shiftlessness. There is a plenty of
 such chairs as I like best in the village garrets to be had for taking
 them away. Furniture! Thank God, I can sit and I can stand without the
 aid of a furniture warehouse. What man but a philosopher would not
 be ashamed to see his furniture packed in a cart and going up country
 exposed to the light of heaven and the eyes of men, a beggarly account
 of empty boxes? That is Spaulding's furniture. I could never tell from
 inspecting such a load whether it belonged to a so-called rich man or a
 poor one; the owner always seemed poverty-stricken. Indeed, the more
 you have of such things the poorer you are. Each load looks as if it
 contained the contents of a dozen shanties; and if one shanty is poor,
 this is a dozen times as poor. Pray, for what do we _move_ ever but to
 get rid of our furniture, our _exuviA|_: at last to go from this world to
 another newly furnished, and leave this to be burned? It is the same as
 if all these traps were buckled to a man's belt, and he could not
 move over the rough country where our lines are cast without dragging
 them--dragging his trap. He was a lucky fox that left his tail in the
 trap. The muskrat will gnaw his third leg off to be free. No wonder man
 has lost his elasticity. How often he is at a dead set! "Sir, if I may
 be so bold, what do you mean by a dead set?" If you are a seer, whenever
 you meet a man you will see all that he owns, ay, and much that he
 pretends to disown, behind him, even to his kitchen furniture and all
 the trumpery which he saves and will not burn, and he will appear to be
 harnessed to it and making what headway he can. I think that the man
 is at a dead set who has got through a knot-hole or gateway where his
 sledge load of furniture cannot follow him. I cannot but feel compassion
 when I hear some trig, compact-looking man, seemingly free, all girded
 and ready, speak of his "furniture," as whether it is insured or not.
 "But what shall I do with my furniture?"--My gay butterfly is entangled
 in a spider's web then. Even those who seem for a long while not to
 have any, if you inquire more narrowly you will find have some stored
 in somebody's barn. I look upon England today as an old gentleman who is
 travelling with a great deal of baggage, trumpery which has accumulated
 from long housekeeping, which he has not the courage to burn; great
 trunk, little trunk, bandbox, and bundle. Throw away the first three at
 least. It would surpass the powers of a well man nowadays to take up his
 bed and walk, and I should certainly advise a sick one to lay down his
 bed and run. When I have met an immigrant tottering under a bundle which
 contained his all--looking like an enormous wen which had grown out of
 the nape of his neck--I have pitied him, not because that was his all,
 but because he had all _that_ to carry. If I have got to drag my trap, I
 will take care that it be a light one and do not nip me in a vital part.
 But perchance it would be wisest never to put one's paw into it.
 
 I would observe, by the way, that it costs me nothing for curtains, for
 I have no gazers to shut out but the sun and moon, and I am willing that
 they should look in. The moon will not sour milk nor taint meat of mine,
 nor will the sun injure my furniture or fade my carpet; and if he is
 sometimes too warm a friend, I find it still better economy to retreat
 behind some curtain which nature has provided, than to add a single item
 to the details of housekeeping. A lady once offered me a mat, but as
 I had no room to spare within the house, nor time to spare within or
 without to shake it, I declined it, preferring to wipe my feet on the
 sod before my door. It is best to avoid the beginnings of evil.
 
 Not long since I was present at the auction of a deacon's effects, for
 his life had not been ineffectual:--
 
       "The evil that men do lives after them."
 
 As usual, a great proportion was trumpery which had begun to accumulate
 in his father's day. Among the rest was a dried tapeworm. And now, after
 lying half a century in his garret and other dust holes, these things
 were not burned; instead of a _bonfire_, or purifying destruction of
 them, there was an _auction_, or increasing of them. The neighbors eagerly
 collected to view them, bought them all, and carefully transported them
 to their garrets and dust holes, to lie there till their estates are
 settled, when they will start again. When a man dies he kicks the dust.
 
 The customs of some savage nations might, perchance, be profitably
 imitated by us, for they at least go through the semblance of casting
 their slough annually; they have the idea of the thing, whether they
 have the reality or not. Would it not be well if we were to celebrate
 such a "busk," or "feast of first fruits," as Bartram describes to have
 been the custom of the Mucclasse Indians? "When a town celebrates the
 busk," says he, "having previously provided themselves with new clothes,
 new pots, pans, and other household utensils and furniture, they collect
 all their worn out clothes and other despicable things, sweep and
 cleanse their houses, squares, and the whole town of their filth, which
 with all the remaining grain and other old provisions they cast together
 into one common heap, and consume it with fire. After having taken
 medicine, and fasted for three days, all the fire in the town is
 extinguished. During this fast they abstain from the gratification of
 every appetite and passion whatever. A general amnesty is proclaimed;
 all malefactors may return to their town."
 
 "On the fourth morning, the high priest, by rubbing dry wood together,
 produces new fire in the public square, from whence every habitation in
 the town is supplied with the new and pure flame."
 
 They then feast on the new corn and fruits, and dance and sing for three
 days, "and the four following days they receive visits and rejoice with
 their friends from neighboring towns who have in like manner purified
 and prepared themselves."
 
 The Mexicans also practised a similar purification at the end of every
 fifty-two years, in the belief that it was time for the world to come to
 an end.
 
 I have scarcely heard of a truer sacrament, that is, as the dictionary
 defines it, "outward and visible sign of an inward and spiritual grace,"
 than this, and I have no doubt that they were originally inspired
 directly from Heaven to do thus, though they have no Biblical record of
 the revelation.
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 For more than five years I maintained myself thus solely by the labor
 of my hands, and I found that, by working about six weeks in a year, I
 could meet all the expenses of living. The whole of my winters, as well
 as most of my summers, I had free and clear for study. I have thoroughly
 tried school-keeping, and found that my expenses were in proportion, or
 rather out of proportion, to my income, for I was obliged to dress and
 train, not to say think and believe, accordingly, and I lost my time
 into the bargain. As I did not teach for the good of my fellow-men, but
 simply for a livelihood, this was a failure. I have tried trade but I
 found that it would take ten years to get under way in that, and that
 then I should probably be on my way to the devil. I was actually afraid
 that I might by that time be doing what is called a good business. When
 formerly I was looking about to see what I could do for a living, some
 sad experience in conforming to the wishes of friends being fresh in
 my mind to tax my ingenuity, I thought often and seriously of picking
 huckleberries; that surely I could do, and its small profits might
 suffice--for my greatest skill has been to want but little--so little
 capital it required, so little distraction from my wonted moods, I
 foolishly thought. While my acquaintances went unhesitatingly into trade
 or the professions, I contemplated this occupation as most like theirs;
 ranging the hills all summer to pick the berries which came in my way,
 and thereafter carelessly dispose of them; so, to keep the flocks of
 Admetus. I also dreamed that I might gather the wild herbs, or carry
 evergreens to such villagers as loved to be reminded of the woods, even
 to the city, by hay-cart loads. But I have since learned that trade
 curses everything it handles; and though you trade in messages from
 heaven, the whole curse of trade attaches to the business.
 
 As I preferred some things to others, and especially valued my freedom,
 as I could fare hard and yet succeed well, I did not wish to spend
 my time in earning rich carpets or other fine furniture, or delicate
 cookery, or a house in the Grecian or the Gothic style just yet. If
 there are any to whom it is no interruption to acquire these things,
 and who know how to use them when acquired, I relinquish to them the
 pursuit. Some are "industrious," and appear to love labor for its own
 sake, or perhaps because it keeps them out of worse mischief; to such I
 have at present nothing to say. Those who would not know what to do with
 more leisure than they now enjoy, I might advise to work twice as
 hard as they do--work till they pay for themselves, and get their free
 papers. For myself I found that the occupation of a day-laborer was the
 most independent of any, especially as it required only thirty or forty
 days in a year to support one. The laborer's day ends with the going
 down of the sun, and he is then free to devote himself to his chosen
 pursuit, independent of his labor; but his employer, who speculates from
 month to month, has no respite from one end of the year to the other.
 
 In short, I am convinced, both by faith and experience, that to maintain
 one's self on this earth is not a hardship but a pastime, if we will
 live simply and wisely; as the pursuits of the simpler nations are still
 the sports of the more artificial. It is not necessary that a man should
 earn his living by the sweat of his brow, unless he sweats easier than I
 do.
 
 One young man of my acquaintance, who has inherited some acres, told me
 that he thought he should live as I did, _if he had the means_. I would
 not have any one adopt _my_ mode of living on any account; for, beside
 that before he has fairly learned it I may have found out another for
 myself, I desire that there may be as many different persons in the
 world as possible; but I would have each one be very careful to find
 out and pursue _his own_ way, and not his father's or his mother's or his
 neighbor's instead. The youth may build or plant or sail, only let him
 not be hindered from doing that which he tells me he would like to do.
 It is by a mathematical point only that we are wise, as the sailor or
 the fugitive slave keeps the polestar in his eye; but that is sufficient
 guidance for all our life. We may not arrive at our port within a
 calculable period, but we would preserve the true course.
 
 Undoubtedly, in this case, what is true for one is truer still for a
 thousand, as a large house is not proportionally more expensive than a
 small one, since one roof may cover, one cellar underlie, and one wall
 separate several apartments. But for my part, I preferred the solitary
 dwelling. Moreover, it will commonly be cheaper to build the whole
 yourself than to convince another of the advantage of the common wall;
 and when you have done this, the common partition, to be much cheaper,
 must be a thin one, and that other may prove a bad neighbor, and also
 not keep his side in repair. The only co-operation which is commonly
 possible is exceedingly partial and superficial; and what little true
 co-operation there is, is as if it were not, being a harmony inaudible
 to men. If a man has faith, he will co-operate with equal faith
 everywhere; if he has not faith, he will continue to live like the rest
 of the world, whatever company he is joined to. To co-operate in the
 highest as well as the lowest sense, means _to get our living together_. I
 heard it proposed lately that two young men should travel together over
 the world, the one without money, earning his means as he went, before
 the mast and behind the plow, the other carrying a bill of exchange in
 his pocket. It was easy to see that they could not long be companions or
 co-operate, since one would not _operate_ at all. They would part at
 the first interesting crisis in their adventures. Above all, as I have
 implied, the man who goes alone can start today; but he who travels with
 another must wait till that other is ready, and it may be a long time
 before they get off.
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 But all this is very selfish, I have heard some of my townsmen say.
 I confess that I have hitherto indulged very little in philanthropic
 enterprises. I have made some sacrifices to a sense of duty, and among
 others have sacrificed this pleasure also. There are those who have
 used all their arts to persuade me to undertake the support of some
 poor family in the town; and if I had nothing to do--for the devil finds
 employment for the idle--I might try my hand at some such pastime as
 that. However, when I have thought to indulge myself in this respect,
 and lay their Heaven under an obligation by maintaining certain poor
 persons in all respects as comfortably as I maintain myself, and have
 even ventured so far as to make them the offer, they have one and all
 unhesitatingly preferred to remain poor. While my townsmen and women are
 devoted in so many ways to the good of their fellows, I trust that one
 at least may be spared to other and less humane pursuits. You must have
 a genius for charity as well as for anything else. As for Doing-good,
 that is one of the professions which are full. Moreover, I have tried it
 fairly, and, strange as it may seem, am satisfied that it does not agree
 with my constitution. Probably I should not consciously and deliberately
 forsake my particular calling to do the good which society demands of
 me, to save the universe from annihilation; and I believe that a like
 but infinitely greater steadfastness elsewhere is all that now preserves
 it. But I would not stand between any man and his genius; and to him who
 does this work, which I decline, with his whole heart and soul and life,
 I would say, Persevere, even if the world call it doing evil, as it is
 most likely they will.
 
 I am far from supposing that my case is a peculiar one; no doubt many of
 my readers would make a similar defence. At doing something--I will not
 engage that my neighbors shall pronounce it good--I do not hesitate to
 say that I should be a capital fellow to hire; but what that is, it is
 for my employer to find out. What _good_ I do, in the common sense of
 that word, must be aside from my main path, and for the most part wholly
 unintended. Men say, practically, Begin where you are and such as you
 are, without aiming mainly to become of more worth, and with kindness
 aforethought go about doing good. If I were to preach at all in this
 strain, I should say rather, Set about being good. As if the sun should
 stop when he had kindled his fires up to the splendor of a moon or
 a star of the sixth magnitude, and go about like a Robin Goodfellow,
 peeping in at every cottage window, inspiring lunatics, and tainting
 meats, and making darkness visible, instead of steadily increasing his
 genial heat and beneficence till he is of such brightness that no mortal
 can look him in the face, and then, and in the meanwhile too, going
 about the world in his own orbit, doing it good, or rather, as a truer
 philosophy has discovered, the world going about him getting good. When
 Phaeton, wishing to prove his heavenly birth by his beneficence, had the
 sun's chariot but one day, and drove out of the beaten track, he burned
 several blocks of houses in the lower streets of heaven, and scorched
 the surface of the earth, and dried up every spring, and made the great
 desert of Sahara, till at length Jupiter hurled him headlong to the
 earth with a thunderbolt, and the sun, through grief at his death, did
 not shine for a year.
 
 There is no odor so bad as that which arises from goodness tainted. It
 is human, it is divine, carrion. If I knew for a certainty that a man
 was coming to my house with the conscious design of doing me good,
 I should run for my life, as from that dry and parching wind of the
 African deserts called the simoom, which fills the mouth and nose and
 ears and eyes with dust till you are suffocated, for fear that I should
 get some of his good done to me--some of its virus mingled with my
 blood. No--in this case I would rather suffer evil the natural way.
 A man is not a good _man_ to me because he will feed me if I should be
 starving, or warm me if I should be freezing, or pull me out of a ditch
 if I should ever fall into one. I can find you a Newfoundland dog that
 will do as much. Philanthropy is not love for one's fellow-man in the
 broadest sense. Howard was no doubt an exceedingly kind and worthy man
 in his way, and has his reward; but, comparatively speaking, what are a
 hundred Howards to _us_, if their philanthropy do not help us in our
 best estate, when we are most worthy to be helped? I never heard of a
 philanthropic meeting in which it was sincerely proposed to do any good
 to me, or the like of me.
 
 The Jesuits were quite balked by those Indians who, being burned at
 the stake, suggested new modes of torture to their tormentors. Being
 superior to physical suffering, it sometimes chanced that they were
 superior to any consolation which the missionaries could offer; and the
 law to do as you would be done by fell with less persuasiveness on the
 ears of those who, for their part, did not care how they were done by,
 who loved their enemies after a new fashion, and came very near freely
 forgiving them all they did.
 
 Be sure that you give the poor the aid they most need, though it be your
 example which leaves them far behind. If you give money, spend yourself
 with it, and do not merely abandon it to them. We make curious mistakes
 sometimes. Often the poor man is not so cold and hungry as he is
 dirty and ragged and gross. It is partly his taste, and not merely his
 misfortune. If you give him money, he will perhaps buy more rags with
 it. I was wont to pity the clumsy Irish laborers who cut ice on the
 pond, in such mean and ragged clothes, while I shivered in my more tidy
 and somewhat more fashionable garments, till, one bitter cold day, one
 who had slipped into the water came to my house to warm him, and I saw
 him strip off three pairs of pants and two pairs of stockings ere he got
 down to the skin, though they were dirty and ragged enough, it is true,
 and that he could afford to refuse the _extra_ garments which I offered
 him, he had so many _intra_ ones. This ducking was the very thing he
 needed. Then I began to pity myself, and I saw that it would be a
 greater charity to bestow on me a flannel shirt than a whole slop-shop
 on him. There are a thousand hacking at the branches of evil to one who
 is striking at the root, and it may be that he who bestows the largest
 amount of time and money on the needy is doing the most by his mode of
 life to produce that misery which he strives in vain to relieve. It is
 the pious slave-breeder devoting the proceeds of every tenth slave to
 buy a Sunday's liberty for the rest. Some show their kindness to the
 poor by employing them in their kitchens. Would they not be kinder if
 they employed themselves there? You boast of spending a tenth part of
 your income in charity; maybe you should spend the nine tenths so, and
 done with it. Society recovers only a tenth part of the property then.
 Is this owing to the generosity of him in whose possession it is found,
 or to the remissness of the officers of justice?
 
 Philanthropy is almost the only virtue which is sufficiently appreciated
 by mankind. Nay, it is greatly overrated; and it is our selfishness
 which overrates it. A robust poor man, one sunny day here in Concord,
 praised a fellow-townsman to me, because, as he said, he was kind to the
 poor; meaning himself. The kind uncles and aunts of the race are more
 esteemed than its true spiritual fathers and mothers. I once heard a
 reverend lecturer on England, a man of learning and intelligence,
 after enumerating her scientific, literary, and political worthies,
 Shakespeare, Bacon, Cromwell, Milton, Newton, and others, speak next of
 her Christian heroes, whom, as if his profession required it of him,
 he elevated to a place far above all the rest, as the greatest of the
 great. They were Penn, Howard, and Mrs. Fry. Every one must feel the
 falsehood and cant of this. The last were not England's best men and
 women; only, perhaps, her best philanthropists.
 
 I would not subtract anything from the praise that is due to
 philanthropy, but merely demand justice for all who by their lives
 and works are a blessing to mankind. I do not value chiefly a man's
 uprightness and benevolence, which are, as it were, his stem and leaves.
 Those plants of whose greenness withered we make herb tea for the sick
 serve but a humble use, and are most employed by quacks. I want the
 flower and fruit of a man; that some fragrance be wafted over from him
 to me, and some ripeness flavor our intercourse. His goodness must not
 be a partial and transitory act, but a constant superfluity, which costs
 him nothing and of which he is unconscious. This is a charity that hides
 a multitude of sins. The philanthropist too often surrounds mankind with
 the remembrance of his own castoff griefs as an atmosphere, and calls it
 sympathy. We should impart our courage, and not our despair, our health
 and ease, and not our disease, and take care that this does not spread
 by contagion. From what southern plains comes up the voice of wailing?
 Under what latitudes reside the heathen to whom we would send light? Who
 is that intemperate and brutal man whom we would redeem? If anything ail
 a man, so that he does not perform his functions, if he have a pain in
 his bowels even--for that is the seat of sympathy--he forthwith sets
 about reforming--the world. Being a microcosm himself, he discovers--and
 it is a true discovery, and he is the man to make it--that the world has
 been eating green apples; to his eyes, in fact, the globe itself is
 a great green apple, which there is danger awful to think of that the
 children of men will nibble before it is ripe; and straightway his
 drastic philanthropy seeks out the Esquimau and the Patagonian, and
 embraces the populous Indian and Chinese villages; and thus, by a few
 years of philanthropic activity, the powers in the meanwhile using him
 for their own ends, no doubt, he cures himself of his dyspepsia, the
 globe acquires a faint blush on one or both of its cheeks, as if it were
 beginning to be ripe, and life loses its crudity and is once more sweet
 and wholesome to live. I never dreamed of any enormity greater than I
 have committed. I never knew, and never shall know, a worse man than
 myself.
 
 I believe that what so saddens the reformer is not his sympathy with his
 fellows in distress, but, though he be the holiest son of God, is
 his private ail. Let this be righted, let the spring come to him, the
 morning rise over his couch, and he will forsake his generous companions
 without apology. My excuse for not lecturing against the use of
 tobacco is, that I never chewed it, that is a penalty which reformed
 tobacco-chewers have to pay; though there are things enough I have
 chewed which I could lecture against. If you should ever be betrayed
 into any of these philanthropies, do not let your left hand know what
 your right hand does, for it is not worth knowing. Rescue the drowning
 and tie your shoestrings. Take your time, and set about some free labor.
 
 Our manners have been corrupted by communication with the saints. Our
 hymn-books resound with a melodious cursing of God and enduring Him
 forever. One would say that even the prophets and redeemers had rather
 consoled the fears than confirmed the hopes of man. There is nowhere
 recorded a simple and irrepressible satisfaction with the gift of
 life, any memorable praise of God. All health and success does me good,
 however far off and withdrawn it may appear; all disease and failure
 helps to make me sad and does me evil, however much sympathy it may have
 with me or I with it. If, then, we would indeed restore mankind by truly
 Indian, botanic, magnetic, or natural means, let us first be as simple
 and well as Nature ourselves, dispel the clouds which hang over our own
 brows, and take up a little life into our pores. Do not stay to be an
 overseer of the poor, but endeavor to become one of the worthies of the
 world.
 
 I read in the Gulistan, or Flower Garden, of Sheik Sadi of Shiraz, that
 "they asked a wise man, saying: Of the many celebrated trees which the
 Most High God has created lofty and umbrageous, they call none azad, or
 free, excepting the cypress, which bears no fruit; what mystery is there
 in this? He replied, Each has its appropriate produce, and appointed
 season, during the continuance of which it is fresh and blooming, and
 during their absence dry and withered; to neither of which states is the
 cypress exposed, being always flourishing; and of this nature are the
 azads, or religious independents.--Fix not thy heart on that which is
 transitory; for the Dijlah, or Tigris, will continue to flow through
 Bagdad after the race of caliphs is extinct: if thy hand has plenty, be
 liberal as the date tree; but if it affords nothing to give away, be an
 azad, or free man, like the cypress."
 
                         COMPLEMENTAL VERSES
 
                     The Pretensions of Poverty
 
           Thou dost presume too much, poor needy wretch,
           To claim a station in the firmament
           Because thy humble cottage, or thy tub,
           Nurses some lazy or pedantic virtue
           In the cheap sunshine or by shady springs,
           With roots and pot-herbs; where thy right hand,
           Tearing those humane passions from the mind,
           Upon whose stocks fair blooming virtues flourish,
           Degradeth nature, and benumbeth sense,
           And, Gorgon-like, turns active men to stone.
           We not require the dull society
           Of your necessitated temperance,
           Or that unnatural stupidity
           That knows nor joy nor sorrow; nor your forc'd
           Falsely exalted passive fortitude
           Above the active.  This low abject brood,
           That fix their seats in mediocrity,
           Become your servile minds; but we advance
           Such virtues only as admit excess,
           Brave, bounteous acts, regal magnificence,
           All-seeing prudence, magnanimity
           That knows no bound, and that heroic virtue
           For which antiquity hath left no name,
           But patterns only, such as Hercules,
           Achilles, Theseus.  Back to thy loath'd cell;
           And when thou seest the new enlightened sphere,
           Study to know but what those worthies were.
                                  T. CAREW
 
 
 
 
 Where I Lived, and What I Lived For
 
 
 At a certain season of our life we are accustomed to consider every spot
 as the possible site of a house. I have thus surveyed the country on
 every side within a dozen miles of where I live. In imagination I have
 bought all the farms in succession, for all were to be bought, and I
 knew their price. I walked over each farmer's premises, tasted his wild
 apples, discoursed on husbandry with him, took his farm at his price, at
 any price, mortgaging it to him in my mind; even put a higher price on
 it--took everything but a deed of it--took his word for his deed, for I
 dearly love to talk--cultivated it, and him too to some extent, I trust,
 and withdrew when I had enjoyed it long enough, leaving him to carry it
 on. This experience entitled me to be regarded as a sort of real-estate
 broker by my friends. Wherever I sat, there I might live, and the
 landscape radiated from me accordingly. What is a house but a _sedes_, a
 seat?--better if a country seat. I discovered many a site for a house
 not likely to be soon improved, which some might have thought too far
 from the village, but to my eyes the village was too far from it. Well,
 there I might live, I said; and there I did live, for an hour, a summer
 and a winter life; saw how I could let the years run off, buffet the
 winter through, and see the spring come in. The future inhabitants of
 this region, wherever they may place their houses, may be sure that they
 have been anticipated. An afternoon sufficed to lay out the land into
 orchard, wood-lot, and pasture, and to decide what fine oaks or pines
 should be left to stand before the door, and whence each blasted tree
 could be seen to the best advantage; and then I let it lie, fallow,
 perchance, for a man is rich in proportion to the number of things which
 he can afford to let alone.
 
 My imagination carried me so far that I even had the refusal of several
 farms--the refusal was all I wanted--but I never got my fingers burned
 by actual possession. The nearest that I came to actual possession was
 when I bought the Hollowell place, and had begun to sort my seeds, and
 collected materials with which to make a wheelbarrow to carry it on or
 off with; but before the owner gave me a deed of it, his wife--every man
 has such a wife--changed her mind and wished to keep it, and he offered
 me ten dollars to release him. Now, to speak the truth, I had but ten
 cents in the world, and it surpassed my arithmetic to tell, if I was
 that man who had ten cents, or who had a farm, or ten dollars, or all
 together. However, I let him keep the ten dollars and the farm too, for
 I had carried it far enough; or rather, to be generous, I sold him the
 farm for just what I gave for it, and, as he was not a rich man, made
 him a present of ten dollars, and still had my ten cents, and seeds, and
 materials for a wheelbarrow left. I found thus that I had been a rich
 man without any damage to my poverty. But I retained the landscape, and
 I have since annually carried off what it yielded without a wheelbarrow.
 With respect to landscapes,
 
                "I am monarch of all I _survey_,
                 My right there is none to dispute."
 
 I have frequently seen a poet withdraw, having enjoyed the most valuable
 part of a farm, while the crusty farmer supposed that he had got a few
 wild apples only. Why, the owner does not know it for many years when
 a poet has put his farm in rhyme, the most admirable kind of invisible
 fence, has fairly impounded it, milked it, skimmed it, and got all the
 cream, and left the farmer only the skimmed milk.
 
 The real attractions of the Hollowell farm, to me, were: its complete
 retirement, being, about two miles from the village, half a mile from
 the nearest neighbor, and separated from the highway by a broad field;
 its bounding on the river, which the owner said protected it by its fogs
 from frosts in the spring, though that was nothing to me; the gray color
 and ruinous state of the house and barn, and the dilapidated fences,
 which put such an interval between me and the last occupant; the hollow
 and lichen-covered apple trees, gnawed by rabbits, showing what kind of
 neighbors I should have; but above all, the recollection I had of it
 from my earliest voyages up the river, when the house was concealed
 behind a dense grove of red maples, through which I heard the house-dog
 bark. I was in haste to buy it, before the proprietor finished getting
 out some rocks, cutting down the hollow apple trees, and grubbing up
 some young birches which had sprung up in the pasture, or, in short, had
 made any more of his improvements. To enjoy these advantages I was ready
 to carry it on; like Atlas, to take the world on my shoulders--I never
 heard what compensation he received for that--and do all those things
 which had no other motive or excuse but that I might pay for it and
 be unmolested in my possession of it; for I knew all the while that it
 would yield the most abundant crop of the kind I wanted, if I could only
 afford to let it alone. But it turned out as I have said.
 
 All that I could say, then, with respect to farming on a large scale--I
 have always cultivated a garden--was, that I had had my seeds ready.
 Many think that seeds improve with age. I have no doubt that time
 discriminates between the good and the bad; and when at last I shall
 plant, I shall be less likely to be disappointed. But I would say to my
 fellows, once for all, As long as possible live free and uncommitted. It
 makes but little difference whether you are committed to a farm or the
 county jail.
 
 Old Cato, whose "De Re RusticAc" is my "Cultivator," says--and the only
 translation I have seen makes sheer nonsense of the passage--"When you
 think of getting a farm turn it thus in your mind, not to buy greedily;
 nor spare your pains to look at it, and do not think it enough to go
 round it once. The oftener you go there the more it will please you, if
 it is good." I think I shall not buy greedily, but go round and round it
 as long as I live, and be buried in it first, that it may please me the
 more at last.
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 The present was my next experiment of this kind, which I purpose to
 describe more at length, for convenience putting the experience of two
 years into one. As I have said, I do not propose to write an ode
 to dejection, but to brag as lustily as chanticleer in the morning,
 standing on his roost, if only to wake my neighbors up.
 
 When first I took up my abode in the woods, that is, began to spend my
 nights as well as days there, which, by accident, was on Independence
 Day, or the Fourth of July, 1845, my house was not finished for winter,
 but was merely a defence against the rain, without plastering or
 chimney, the walls being of rough, weather-stained boards, with wide
 chinks, which made it cool at night. The upright white hewn studs and
 freshly planed door and window casings gave it a clean and airy look,
 especially in the morning, when its timbers were saturated with dew, so
 that I fancied that by noon some sweet gum would exude from them. To my
 imagination it retained throughout the day more or less of this auroral
 character, reminding me of a certain house on a mountain which I had
 visited a year before. This was an airy and unplastered cabin, fit
 to entertain a travelling god, and where a goddess might trail her
 garments. The winds which passed over my dwelling were such as sweep
 over the ridges of mountains, bearing the broken strains, or celestial
 parts only, of terrestrial music. The morning wind forever blows, the
 poem of creation is uninterrupted; but few are the ears that hear it.
 Olympus is but the outside of the earth everywhere.
 
 The only house I had been the owner of before, if I except a boat, was
 a tent, which I used occasionally when making excursions in the summer,
 and this is still rolled up in my garret; but the boat, after passing
 from hand to hand, has gone down the stream of time. With this more
 substantial shelter about me, I had made some progress toward
 settling in the world. This frame, so slightly clad, was a sort of
 crystallization around me, and reacted on the builder. It was suggestive
 somewhat as a picture in outlines. I did not need to go outdoors to take
 the air, for the atmosphere within had lost none of its freshness. It
 was not so much within doors as behind a door where I sat, even in the
 rainiest weather. The Harivansa says, "An abode without birds is like
 a meat without seasoning." Such was not my abode, for I found myself
 suddenly neighbor to the birds; not by having imprisoned one, but having
 caged myself near them. I was not only nearer to some of those which
 commonly frequent the garden and the orchard, but to those smaller and
 more thrilling songsters of the forest which never, or rarely, serenade
 a villager--the wood thrush, the veery, the scarlet tanager, the field
 sparrow, the whip-poor-will, and many others.
 
 I was seated by the shore of a small pond, about a mile and a half south
 of the village of Concord and somewhat higher than it, in the midst of
 an extensive wood between that town and Lincoln, and about two miles
 south of that our only field known to fame, Concord Battle Ground; but
 I was so low in the woods that the opposite shore, half a mile off, like
 the rest, covered with wood, was my most distant horizon. For the first
 week, whenever I looked out on the pond it impressed me like a tarn high
 up on the side of a mountain, its bottom far above the surface of other
 lakes, and, as the sun arose, I saw it throwing off its nightly clothing
 of mist, and here and there, by degrees, its soft ripples or its smooth
 reflecting surface was revealed, while the mists, like ghosts, were
 stealthily withdrawing in every direction into the woods, as at the
 breaking up of some nocturnal conventicle. The very dew seemed to
 hang upon the trees later into the day than usual, as on the sides of
 mountains.
 
 This small lake was of most value as a neighbor in the intervals of a
 gentle rain-storm in August, when, both air and water being perfectly
 still, but the sky overcast, mid-afternoon had all the serenity of
 evening, and the wood thrush sang around, and was heard from shore to
 shore. A lake like this is never smoother than at such a time; and the
 clear portion of the air above it being, shallow and darkened by clouds,
 the water, full of light and reflections, becomes a lower heaven itself
 so much the more important. From a hill-top near by, where the wood had
 been recently cut off, there was a pleasing vista southward across
 the pond, through a wide indentation in the hills which form the shore
 there, where their opposite sides sloping toward each other suggested a
 stream flowing out in that direction through a wooded valley, but stream
 there was none. That way I looked between and over the near green
 hills to some distant and higher ones in the horizon, tinged with blue.
 Indeed, by standing on tiptoe I could catch a glimpse of some of
 the peaks of the still bluer and more distant mountain ranges in the
 northwest, those true-blue coins from heaven's own mint, and also of
 some portion of the village. But in other directions, even from this
 point, I could not see over or beyond the woods which surrounded me. It
 is well to have some water in your neighborhood, to give buoyancy to and
 float the earth. One value even of the smallest well is, that when you
 look into it you see that earth is not continent but insular. This is
 as important as that it keeps butter cool. When I looked across the
 pond from this peak toward the Sudbury meadows, which in time of flood
 I distinguished elevated perhaps by a mirage in their seething valley,
 like a coin in a basin, all the earth beyond the pond appeared like
 a thin crust insulated and floated even by this small sheet of
 interverting water, and I was reminded that this on which I dwelt was
 but _dry land_.
 
 Though the view from my door was still more contracted, I did not
 feel crowded or confined in the least. There was pasture enough for my
 imagination. The low shrub oak plateau to which the opposite shore
 arose stretched away toward the prairies of the West and the steppes of
 Tartary, affording ample room for all the roving families of men.
 "There are none happy in the world but beings who enjoy freely a
 vast horizon"--said Damodara, when his herds required new and larger
 pastures.
 
 Both place and time were changed, and I dwelt nearer to those parts of
 the universe and to those eras in history which had most attracted
 me. Where I lived was as far off as many a region viewed nightly by
 astronomers. We are wont to imagine rare and delectable places in some
 remote and more celestial corner of the system, behind the constellation
 of Cassiopeia's Chair, far from noise and disturbance. I discovered that
 my house actually had its site in such a withdrawn, but forever new and
 unprofaned, part of the universe. If it were worth the while to settle
 in those parts near to the Pleiades or the Hyades, to Aldebaran or
 Altair, then I was really there, or at an equal remoteness from the life
 which I had left behind, dwindled and twinkling with as fine a ray to
 my nearest neighbor, and to be seen only in moonless nights by him. Such
 was that part of creation where I had squatted;
 
               "There was a shepherd that did live,
                   And held his thoughts as high
                As were the mounts whereon his flocks
                   Did hourly feed him by."
 
 What should we think of the shepherd's life if his flocks always
 wandered to higher pastures than his thoughts?
 
 Every morning was a cheerful invitation to make my life of equal
 simplicity, and I may say innocence, with Nature herself. I have been as
 sincere a worshipper of Aurora as the Greeks. I got up early and bathed
 in the pond; that was a religious exercise, and one of the best things
 which I did. They say that characters were engraven on the bathing tub
 of King Tchingthang to this effect: "Renew thyself completely each
 day; do it again, and again, and forever again." I can understand that.
 Morning brings back the heroic ages. I was as much affected by the faint
 hum of a mosquito making its invisible and unimaginable tour through
 my apartment at earliest dawn, when I was sitting with door and windows
 open, as I could be by any trumpet that ever sang of fame. It was
 Homer's requiem; itself an Iliad and Odyssey in the air, singing its own
 wrath and wanderings. There was something cosmical about it; a standing
 advertisement, till forbidden, of the everlasting vigor and fertility of
 the world. The morning, which is the most memorable season of the day,
 is the awakening hour. Then there is least somnolence in us; and for an
 hour, at least, some part of us awakes which slumbers all the rest of
 the day and night. Little is to be expected of that day, if it can be
 called a day, to which we are not awakened by our Genius, but by the
 mechanical nudgings of some servitor, are not awakened by our own
 newly acquired force and aspirations from within, accompanied by
 the undulations of celestial music, instead of factory bells, and a
 fragrance filling the air--to a higher life than we fell asleep from;
 and thus the darkness bear its fruit, and prove itself to be good,
 no less than the light. That man who does not believe that each day
 contains an earlier, more sacred, and auroral hour than he has yet
 profaned, has despaired of life, and is pursuing a descending and
 darkening way. After a partial cessation of his sensuous life, the soul
 of man, or its organs rather, are reinvigorated each day, and his Genius
 tries again what noble life it can make. All memorable events, I should
 say, transpire in morning time and in a morning atmosphere. The Vedas
 say, "All intelligences awake with the morning." Poetry and art, and
 the fairest and most memorable of the actions of men, date from such an
 hour. All poets and heroes, like Memnon, are the children of Aurora, and
 emit their music at sunrise. To him whose elastic and vigorous thought
 keeps pace with the sun, the day is a perpetual morning. It matters not
 what the clocks say or the attitudes and labors of men. Morning is when
 I am awake and there is a dawn in me. Moral reform is the effort to
 throw off sleep. Why is it that men give so poor an account of their day
 if they have not been slumbering? They are not such poor calculators.
 If they had not been overcome with drowsiness, they would have performed
 something. The millions are awake enough for physical labor; but only
 one in a million is awake enough for effective intellectual exertion,
 only one in a hundred millions to a poetic or divine life. To be awake
 is to be alive. I have never yet met a man who was quite awake. How
 could I have looked him in the face?
 
 We must learn to reawaken and keep ourselves awake, not by mechanical
 aids, but by an infinite expectation of the dawn, which does not forsake
 us in our soundest sleep. I know of no more encouraging fact than
 the unquestionable ability of man to elevate his life by a conscious
 endeavor. It is something to be able to paint a particular picture, or
 to carve a statue, and so to make a few objects beautiful; but it is far
 more glorious to carve and paint the very atmosphere and medium through
 which we look, which morally we can do. To affect the quality of the
 day, that is the highest of arts. Every man is tasked to make his life,
 even in its details, worthy of the contemplation of his most elevated
 and critical hour. If we refused, or rather used up, such paltry
 information as we get, the oracles would distinctly inform us how this
 might be done.
 
 I went to the woods because I wished to live deliberately, to front only
 the essential facts of life, and see if I could not learn what it had to
 teach, and not, when I came to die, discover that I had not lived. I did
 not wish to live what was not life, living is so dear; nor did I wish
 to practise resignation, unless it was quite necessary. I wanted to
 live deep and suck out all the marrow of life, to live so sturdily and
 Spartan-like as to put to rout all that was not life, to cut a broad
 swath and shave close, to drive life into a corner, and reduce it to its
 lowest terms, and, if it proved to be mean, why then to get the whole
 and genuine meanness of it, and publish its meanness to the world; or
 if it were sublime, to know it by experience, and be able to give a true
 account of it in my next excursion. For most men, it appears to me, are
 in a strange uncertainty about it, whether it is of the devil or of God,
 and have _somewhat hastily_ concluded that it is the chief end of man here
 to "glorify God and enjoy him forever."
 
 Still we live meanly, like ants; though the fable tells us that we were
 long ago changed into men; like pygmies we fight with cranes; it is
 error upon error, and clout upon clout, and our best virtue has for its
 occasion a superfluous and evitable wretchedness. Our life is frittered
 away by detail. An honest man has hardly need to count more than his ten
 fingers, or in extreme cases he may add his ten toes, and lump the rest.
 Simplicity, simplicity, simplicity! I say, let your affairs be as two or
 three, and not a hundred or a thousand; instead of a million count half
 a dozen, and keep your accounts on your thumb-nail. In the midst of
 this chopping sea of civilized life, such are the clouds and storms and
 quicksands and thousand-and-one items to be allowed for, that a man has
 to live, if he would not founder and go to the bottom and not make his
 port at all, by dead reckoning, and he must be a great calculator indeed
 who succeeds. Simplify, simplify. Instead of three meals a day, if it
 be necessary eat but one; instead of a hundred dishes, five; and reduce
 other things in proportion. Our life is like a German Confederacy, made
 up of petty states, with its boundary forever fluctuating, so that even
 a German cannot tell you how it is bounded at any moment. The nation
 itself, with all its so-called internal improvements, which, by the way
 are all external and superficial, is just such an unwieldy and overgrown
 establishment, cluttered with furniture and tripped up by its own traps,
 ruined by luxury and heedless expense, by want of calculation and a
 worthy aim, as the million households in the land; and the only cure for
 it, as for them, is in a rigid economy, a stern and more than Spartan
 simplicity of life and elevation of purpose. It lives too fast. Men
 think that it is essential that the _Nation_ have commerce, and export
 ice, and talk through a telegraph, and ride thirty miles an hour,
 without a doubt, whether _they_ do or not; but whether we should live
 like baboons or like men, is a little uncertain. If we do not get out
 sleepers, and forge rails, and devote days and nights to the work,
 but go to tinkering upon our _lives_ to improve _them_, who will build
 railroads? And if railroads are not built, how shall we get to heaven
 in season? But if we stay at home and mind our business, who will want
 railroads? We do not ride on the railroad; it rides upon us. Did you
 ever think what those sleepers are that underlie the railroad? Each one
 is a man, an Irishman, or a Yankee man. The rails are laid on them, and
 they are covered with sand, and the cars run smoothly over them. They
 are sound sleepers, I assure you. And every few years a new lot is laid
 down and run over; so that, if some have the pleasure of riding on a
 rail, others have the misfortune to be ridden upon. And when they run
 over a man that is walking in his sleep, a supernumerary sleeper in the
 wrong position, and wake him up, they suddenly stop the cars, and make
 a hue and cry about it, as if this were an exception. I am glad to know
 that it takes a gang of men for every five miles to keep the sleepers
 down and level in their beds as it is, for this is a sign that they may
 sometime get up again.
 
 Why should we live with such hurry and waste of life? We are determined
 to be starved before we are hungry. Men say that a stitch in time saves
 nine, and so they take a thousand stitches today to save nine tomorrow.
 As for _work_, we haven't any of any consequence. We have the Saint Vitus'
 dance, and cannot possibly keep our heads still. If I should only give
 a few pulls at the parish bell-rope, as for a fire, that is, without
 setting the bell, there is hardly a man on his farm in the outskirts of
 Concord, notwithstanding that press of engagements which was his excuse
 so many times this morning, nor a boy, nor a woman, I might almost say,
 but would forsake all and follow that sound, not mainly to save property
 from the flames, but, if we will confess the truth, much more to see
 it burn, since burn it must, and we, be it known, did not set it on
 fire--or to see it put out, and have a hand in it, if that is done as
 handsomely; yes, even if it were the parish church itself. Hardly a man
 takes a half-hour's nap after dinner, but when he wakes he holds up his
 head and asks, "What's the news?" as if the rest of mankind had stood
 his sentinels. Some give directions to be waked every half-hour,
 doubtless for no other purpose; and then, to pay for it, they tell what
 they have dreamed. After a night's sleep the news is as indispensable
 as the breakfast. "Pray tell me anything new that has happened to a man
 anywhere on this globe"--and he reads it over his coffee and rolls, that
 a man has had his eyes gouged out this morning on the Wachito River;
 never dreaming the while that he lives in the dark unfathomed mammoth
 cave of this world, and has but the rudiment of an eye himself.
 
 For my part, I could easily do without the post-office. I think that
 there are very few important communications made through it. To speak
 critically, I never received more than one or two letters in my life--I
 wrote this some years ago--that were worth the postage. The penny-post
 is, commonly, an institution through which you seriously offer a man
 that penny for his thoughts which is so often safely offered in jest.
 And I am sure that I never read any memorable news in a newspaper. If we
 read of one man robbed, or murdered, or killed by accident, or one house
 burned, or one vessel wrecked, or one steamboat blown up, or one cow
 run over on the Western Railroad, or one mad dog killed, or one lot
 of grasshoppers in the winter--we never need read of another. One is
 enough. If you are acquainted with the principle, what do you care for
 a myriad instances and applications? To a philosopher all _news_, as it
 is called, is gossip, and they who edit and read it are old women over
 their tea. Yet not a few are greedy after this gossip. There was such
 a rush, as I hear, the other day at one of the offices to learn the
 foreign news by the last arrival, that several large squares of plate
 glass belonging to the establishment were broken by the pressure--news
 which I seriously think a ready wit might write a twelve-month, or
 twelve years, beforehand with sufficient accuracy. As for Spain, for
 instance, if you know how to throw in Don Carlos and the Infanta,
 and Don Pedro and Seville and Granada, from time to time in the right
 proportions--they may have changed the names a little since I saw the
 papers--and serve up a bull-fight when other entertainments fail, it
 will be true to the letter, and give us as good an idea of the exact
 state or ruin of things in Spain as the most succinct and lucid reports
 under this head in the newspapers: and as for England, almost the last
 significant scrap of news from that quarter was the revolution of 1649;
 and if you have learned the history of her crops for an average year,
 you never need attend to that thing again, unless your speculations are
 of a merely pecuniary character. If one may judge who rarely looks into
 the newspapers, nothing new does ever happen in foreign parts, a French
 revolution not excepted.
 
 What news! how much more important to know what that is which was never
 old! "Kieou-he-yu (great dignitary of the state of Wei) sent a man to
 Khoung-tseu to know his news. Khoung-tseu caused the messenger to be
 seated near him, and questioned him in these terms: What is your
 master doing? The messenger answered with respect: My master desires
 to diminish the number of his faults, but he cannot come to the end of
 them. The messenger being gone, the philosopher remarked: What a worthy
 messenger! What a worthy messenger!" The preacher, instead of vexing the
 ears of drowsy farmers on their day of rest at the end of the week--for
 Sunday is the fit conclusion of an ill-spent week, and not the fresh
 and brave beginning of a new one--with this one other draggle-tail of
 a sermon, should shout with thundering voice, "Pause! Avast! Why so
 seeming fast, but deadly slow?"
 
 Shams and delusions are esteemed for soundest truths, while reality is
 fabulous. If men would steadily observe realities only, and not allow
 themselves to be deluded, life, to compare it with such things as we
 know, would be like a fairy tale and the Arabian Nights' Entertainments.
 If we respected only what is inevitable and has a right to be, music and
 poetry would resound along the streets. When we are unhurried and wise,
 we perceive that only great and worthy things have any permanent and
 absolute existence, that petty fears and petty pleasures are but the
 shadow of the reality. This is always exhilarating and sublime. By
 closing the eyes and slumbering, and consenting to be deceived by
 shows, men establish and confirm their daily life of routine and
 habit everywhere, which still is built on purely illusory foundations.
 Children, who play life, discern its true law and relations more clearly
 than men, who fail to live it worthily, but who think that they are
 wiser by experience, that is, by failure. I have read in a Hindoo book,
 that "there was a king's son, who, being expelled in infancy from his
 native city, was brought up by a forester, and, growing up to maturity
 in that state, imagined himself to belong to the barbarous race with
 which he lived. One of his father's ministers having discovered him,
 revealed to him what he was, and the misconception of his character was
 removed, and he knew himself to be a prince. So soul," continues the
 Hindoo philosopher, "from the circumstances in which it is placed,
 mistakes its own character, until the truth is revealed to it by some
 holy teacher, and then it knows itself to be Brahme." I perceive that
 we inhabitants of New England live this mean life that we do because our
 vision does not penetrate the surface of things. We think that that _is_
 which _appears_ to be. If a man should walk through this town and see only
 the reality, where, think you, would the "Mill-dam" go to? If he should
 give us an account of the realities he beheld there, we should not
 recognize the place in his description. Look at a meeting-house, or a
 court-house, or a jail, or a shop, or a dwelling-house, and say what
 that thing really is before a true gaze, and they would all go to pieces
 in your account of them. Men esteem truth remote, in the outskirts of
 the system, behind the farthest star, before Adam and after the last
 man. In eternity there is indeed something true and sublime. But all
 these times and places and occasions are now and here. God himself
 culminates in the present moment, and will never be more divine in the
 lapse of all the ages. And we are enabled to apprehend at all what is
 sublime and noble only by the perpetual instilling and drenching of
 the reality that surrounds us. The universe constantly and obediently
 answers to our conceptions; whether we travel fast or slow, the track is
 laid for us. Let us spend our lives in conceiving then. The poet or
 the artist never yet had so fair and noble a design but some of his
 posterity at least could accomplish it.
 
 Let us spend one day as deliberately as Nature, and not be thrown off
 the track by every nutshell and mosquito's wing that falls on the
 rails. Let us rise early and fast, or break fast, gently and without
 perturbation; let company come and let company go, let the bells ring
 and the children cry--determined to make a day of it. Why should we
 knock under and go with the stream? Let us not be upset and overwhelmed
 in that terrible rapid and whirlpool called a dinner, situated in the
 meridian shallows. Weather this danger and you are safe, for the rest of
 the way is down hill. With unrelaxed nerves, with morning vigor, sail
 by it, looking another way, tied to the mast like Ulysses. If the engine
 whistles, let it whistle till it is hoarse for its pains. If the bell
 rings, why should we run? We will consider what kind of music they are
 like. Let us settle ourselves, and work and wedge our feet downward
 through the mud and slush of opinion, and prejudice, and tradition, and
 delusion, and appearance, that alluvion which covers the globe, through
 Paris and London, through New York and Boston and Concord, through
 Church and State, through poetry and philosophy and religion, till we
 come to a hard bottom and rocks in place, which we can call _reality_, and
 say, This is, and no mistake; and then begin, having a _point d'appui_,
 below freshet and frost and fire, a place where you might found a
 wall or a state, or set a lamp-post safely, or perhaps a gauge, not
 a Nilometer, but a Realometer, that future ages might know how deep a
 freshet of shams and appearances had gathered from time to time. If you
 stand right fronting and face to face to a fact, you will see the sun
 glimmer on both its surfaces, as if it were a cimeter, and feel its
 sweet edge dividing you through the heart and marrow, and so you will
 happily conclude your mortal career. Be it life or death, we crave only
 reality. If we are really dying, let us hear the rattle in our throats
 and feel cold in the extremities; if we are alive, let us go about our
 business.
 
 Time is but the stream I go a-fishing in. I drink at it; but while I
 drink I see the sandy bottom and detect how shallow it is. Its thin
 current slides away, but eternity remains. I would drink deeper; fish in
 the sky, whose bottom is pebbly with stars. I cannot count one. I know
 not the first letter of the alphabet. I have always been regretting that
 I was not as wise as the day I was born. The intellect is a cleaver; it
 discerns and rifts its way into the secret of things. I do not wish to
 be any more busy with my hands than is necessary. My head is hands and
 feet. I feel all my best faculties concentrated in it. My instinct tells
 me that my head is an organ for burrowing, as some creatures use their
 snout and fore paws, and with it I would mine and burrow my way through
 these hills. I think that the richest vein is somewhere hereabouts;
 so by the divining-rod and thin rising vapors I judge; and here I will
 begin to mine.
 
 
 
 
 Reading
 
 
 With a little more deliberation in the choice of their pursuits, all men
 would perhaps become essentially students and observers, for certainly
 their nature and destiny are interesting to all alike. In accumulating
 property for ourselves or our posterity, in founding a family or a
 state, or acquiring fame even, we are mortal; but in dealing with
 truth we are immortal, and need fear no change nor accident. The oldest
 Egyptian or Hindoo philosopher raised a corner of the veil from the
 statue of the divinity; and still the trembling robe remains raised, and
 I gaze upon as fresh a glory as he did, since it was I in him that was
 then so bold, and it is he in me that now reviews the vision. No dust
 has settled on that robe; no time has elapsed since that divinity was
 revealed. That time which we really improve, or which is improvable, is
 neither past, present, nor future.
 
 My residence was more favorable, not only to thought, but to serious
 reading, than a university; and though I was beyond the range of the
 ordinary circulating library, I had more than ever come within the
 influence of those books which circulate round the world, whose
 sentences were first written on bark, and are now merely copied from
 time to time on to linen paper. Says the poet MA(R)r Camar UddA(R)n Mast,
 "Being seated, to run through the region of the spiritual world; I have
 had this advantage in books. To be intoxicated by a single glass of
 wine; I have experienced this pleasure when I have drunk the liquor of
 the esoteric doctrines." I kept Homer's Iliad on my table through the
 summer, though I looked at his page only now and then. Incessant labor
 with my hands, at first, for I had my house to finish and my beans to
 hoe at the same time, made more study impossible. Yet I sustained myself
 by the prospect of such reading in future. I read one or two shallow
 books of travel in the intervals of my work, till that employment made
 me ashamed of myself, and I asked where it was then that _I_ lived.
 
 The student may read Homer or Aschylus in the Greek without danger of
 dissipation or luxuriousness, for it implies that he in some measure
 emulate their heroes, and consecrate morning hours to their pages. The
 heroic books, even if printed in the character of our mother tongue,
 will always be in a language dead to degenerate times; and we must
 laboriously seek the meaning of each word and line, conjecturing a
 larger sense than common use permits out of what wisdom and valor and
 generosity we have. The modern cheap and fertile press, with all its
 translations, has done little to bring us nearer to the heroic writers
 of antiquity. They seem as solitary, and the letter in which they
 are printed as rare and curious, as ever. It is worth the expense of
 youthful days and costly hours, if you learn only some words of an
 ancient language, which are raised out of the trivialness of the street,
 to be perpetual suggestions and provocations. It is not in vain that the
 farmer remembers and repeats the few Latin words which he has heard. Men
 sometimes speak as if the study of the classics would at length make way
 for more modern and practical studies; but the adventurous student will
 always study classics, in whatever language they may be written and
 however ancient they may be. For what are the classics but the noblest
 recorded thoughts of man? They are the only oracles which are not
 decayed, and there are such answers to the most modern inquiry in them
 as Delphi and Dodona never gave. We might as well omit to study Nature
 because she is old. To read well, that is, to read true books in a true
 spirit, is a noble exercise, and one that will task the reader more than
 any exercise which the customs of the day esteem. It requires a training
 such as the athletes underwent, the steady intention almost of the whole
 life to this object. Books must be read as deliberately and reservedly
 as they were written. It is not enough even to be able to speak the
 language of that nation by which they are written, for there is a
 memorable interval between the spoken and the written language, the
 language heard and the language read. The one is commonly transitory,
 a sound, a tongue, a dialect merely, almost brutish, and we learn
 it unconsciously, like the brutes, of our mothers. The other is the
 maturity and experience of that; if that is our mother tongue, this is
 our father tongue, a reserved and select expression, too significant to
 be heard by the ear, which we must be born again in order to speak. The
 crowds of men who merely spoke the Greek and Latin tongues in the Middle
 Ages were not entitled by the accident of birth to read the works of
 genius written in those languages; for these were not written in
 that Greek or Latin which they knew, but in the select language of
 literature. They had not learned the nobler dialects of Greece and Rome,
 but the very materials on which they were written were waste paper to
 them, and they prized instead a cheap contemporary literature. But when
 the several nations of Europe had acquired distinct though rude written
 languages of their own, sufficient for the purposes of their rising
 literatures, then first learning revived, and scholars were enabled to
 discern from that remoteness the treasures of antiquity. What the Roman
 and Grecian multitude could not _hear_, after the lapse of ages a few
 scholars _read_, and a few scholars only are still reading it.
 
 However much we may admire the orator's occasional bursts of eloquence,
 the noblest written words are commonly as far behind or above the
 fleeting spoken language as the firmament with its stars is behind
 the clouds. _There_ are the stars, and they who can may read them.
 The astronomers forever comment on and observe them. They are not
 exhalations like our daily colloquies and vaporous breath. What is
 called eloquence in the forum is commonly found to be rhetoric in the
 study. The orator yields to the inspiration of a transient occasion, and
 speaks to the mob before him, to those who can _hear_ him; but the writer,
 whose more equable life is his occasion, and who would be distracted
 by the event and the crowd which inspire the orator, speaks to the
 intellect and health of mankind, to all in any age who can _understand_
 him.
 
 No wonder that Alexander carried the Iliad with him on his expeditions
 in a precious casket. A written word is the choicest of relics. It is
 something at once more intimate with us and more universal than any
 other work of art. It is the work of art nearest to life itself. It may
 be translated into every language, and not only be read but actually
 breathed from all human lips;--not be represented on canvas or in marble
 only, but be carved out of the breath of life itself. The symbol of
 an ancient man's thought becomes a modern man's speech. Two thousand
 summers have imparted to the monuments of Grecian literature, as to her
 marbles, only a maturer golden and autumnal tint, for they have carried
 their own serene and celestial atmosphere into all lands to protect them
 against the corrosion of time. Books are the treasured wealth of the
 world and the fit inheritance of generations and nations. Books, the
 oldest and the best, stand naturally and rightfully on the shelves of
 every cottage. They have no cause of their own to plead, but while they
 enlighten and sustain the reader his common sense will not refuse
 them. Their authors are a natural and irresistible aristocracy in
 every society, and, more than kings or emperors, exert an influence on
 mankind. When the illiterate and perhaps scornful trader has earned by
 enterprise and industry his coveted leisure and independence, and is
 admitted to the circles of wealth and fashion, he turns inevitably at
 last to those still higher but yet inaccessible circles of intellect and
 genius, and is sensible only of the imperfection of his culture and the
 vanity and insufficiency of all his riches, and further proves his
 good sense by the pains which he takes to secure for his children that
 intellectual culture whose want he so keenly feels; and thus it is that
 he becomes the founder of a family.
 
 Those who have not learned to read the ancient classics in the language
 in which they were written must have a very imperfect knowledge of the
 history of the human race; for it is remarkable that no transcript of
 them has ever been made into any modern tongue, unless our civilization
 itself may be regarded as such a transcript. Homer has never yet been
 printed in English, nor Aschylus, nor Virgil even--works as refined, as
 solidly done, and as beautiful almost as the morning itself; for
 later writers, say what we will of their genius, have rarely, if ever,
 equalled the elaborate beauty and finish and the lifelong and heroic
 literary labors of the ancients. They only talk of forgetting them who
 never knew them. It will be soon enough to forget them when we have the
 learning and the genius which will enable us to attend to and appreciate
 them. That age will be rich indeed when those relics which we call
 Classics, and the still older and more than classic but even less known
 Scriptures of the nations, shall have still further accumulated, when
 the Vaticans shall be filled with Vedas and Zendavestas and Bibles, with
 Homers and Dantes and Shakespeares, and all the centuries to come shall
 have successively deposited their trophies in the forum of the world. By
 such a pile we may hope to scale heaven at last.
 
 The works of the great poets have never yet been read by mankind,
 for only great poets can read them. They have only been read as the
 multitude read the stars, at most astrologically, not astronomically.
 Most men have learned to read to serve a paltry convenience, as they
 have learned to cipher in order to keep accounts and not be cheated in
 trade; but of reading as a noble intellectual exercise they know little
 or nothing; yet this only is reading, in a high sense, not that which
 lulls us as a luxury and suffers the nobler faculties to sleep the
 while, but what we have to stand on tip-toe to read and devote our most
 alert and wakeful hours to.
 
 I think that having learned our letters we should read the best that is
 in literature, and not be forever repeating our a-b-abs, and words of
 one syllable, in the fourth or fifth classes, sitting on the lowest and
 foremost form all our lives. Most men are satisfied if they read or hear
 read, and perchance have been convicted by the wisdom of one good book,
 the Bible, and for the rest of their lives vegetate and dissipate their
 faculties in what is called easy reading. There is a work in several
 volumes in our Circulating Library entitled "Little Reading," which I
 thought referred to a town of that name which I had not been to. There
 are those who, like cormorants and ostriches, can digest all sorts of
 this, even after the fullest dinner of meats and vegetables, for they
 suffer nothing to be wasted. If others are the machines to provide
 this provender, they are the machines to read it. They read the nine
 thousandth tale about Zebulon and Sophronia, and how they loved as none
 had ever loved before, and neither did the course of their true love run
 smooth--at any rate, how it did run and stumble, and get up again and
 go on! how some poor unfortunate got up on to a steeple, who had better
 never have gone up as far as the belfry; and then, having needlessly
 got him up there, the happy novelist rings the bell for all the world to
 come together and hear, O dear! how he did get down again! For my part,
 I think that they had better metamorphose all such aspiring heroes of
 universal noveldom into man weather-cocks, as they used to put heroes
 among the constellations, and let them swing round there till they are
 rusty, and not come down at all to bother honest men with their pranks.
 The next time the novelist rings the bell I will not stir though the
 meeting-house burn down. "The Skip of the Tip-Toe-Hop, a Romance of the
 Middle Ages, by the celebrated author of 'Tittle-Tol-Tan,' to appear
 in monthly parts; a great rush; don't all come together." All this
 they read with saucer eyes, and erect and primitive curiosity, and with
 unwearied gizzard, whose corrugations even yet need no sharpening, just
 as some little four-year-old bencher his two-cent gilt-covered
 edition of Cinderella--without any improvement, that I can see, in the
 pronunciation, or accent, or emphasis, or any more skill in extracting
 or inserting the moral. The result is dulness of sight, a stagnation of
 the vital circulations, and a general deliquium and sloughing off of all
 the intellectual faculties. This sort of gingerbread is baked daily and
 more sedulously than pure wheat or rye-and-Indian in almost every oven,
 and finds a surer market.
 
 The best books are not read even by those who are called good readers.
 What does our Concord culture amount to? There is in this town, with a
 very few exceptions, no taste for the best or for very good books even
 in English literature, whose words all can read and spell. Even the
 college-bred and so-called liberally educated men here and elsewhere
 have really little or no acquaintance with the English classics; and
 as for the recorded wisdom of mankind, the ancient classics and Bibles,
 which are accessible to all who will know of them, there are the
 feeblest efforts anywhere made to become acquainted with them. I know a
 woodchopper, of middle age, who takes a French paper, not for news as he
 says, for he is above that, but to "keep himself in practice," he being
 a Canadian by birth; and when I ask him what he considers the best thing
 he can do in this world, he says, beside this, to keep up and add to
 his English. This is about as much as the college-bred generally do or
 aspire to do, and they take an English paper for the purpose. One who
 has just come from reading perhaps one of the best English books will
 find how many with whom he can converse about it? Or suppose he comes
 from reading a Greek or Latin classic in the original, whose praises are
 familiar even to the so-called illiterate; he will find nobody at all
 to speak to, but must keep silence about it. Indeed, there is hardly the
 professor in our colleges, who, if he has mastered the difficulties of
 the language, has proportionally mastered the difficulties of the wit
 and poetry of a Greek poet, and has any sympathy to impart to the
 alert and heroic reader; and as for the sacred Scriptures, or Bibles of
 mankind, who in this town can tell me even their titles? Most men do not
 know that any nation but the Hebrews have had a scripture. A man, any
 man, will go considerably out of his way to pick up a silver dollar; but
 here are golden words, which the wisest men of antiquity have uttered,
 and whose worth the wise of every succeeding age have assured us
 of;--and yet we learn to read only as far as Easy Reading, the primers
 and class-books, and when we leave school, the "Little Reading," and
 story-books, which are for boys and beginners; and our reading, our
 conversation and thinking, are all on a very low level, worthy only of
 pygmies and manikins.
 
 I aspire to be acquainted with wiser men than this our Concord soil has
 produced, whose names are hardly known here. Or shall I hear the name of
 Plato and never read his book? As if Plato were my townsman and I never
 saw him--my next neighbor and I never heard him speak or attended to
 the wisdom of his words. But how actually is it? His Dialogues, which
 contain what was immortal in him, lie on the next shelf, and yet I never
 read them. We are underbred and low-lived and illiterate; and in this
 respect I confess I do not make any very broad distinction between
 the illiterateness of my townsman who cannot read at all and the
 illiterateness of him who has learned to read only what is for
 children and feeble intellects. We should be as good as the worthies of
 antiquity, but partly by first knowing how good they were. We are a race
 of tit-men, and soar but little higher in our intellectual flights than
 the columns of the daily paper.
 
 It is not all books that are as dull as their readers. There are
 probably words addressed to our condition exactly, which, if we could
 really hear and understand, would be more salutary than the morning or
 the spring to our lives, and possibly put a new aspect on the face of
 things for us. How many a man has dated a new era in his life from the
 reading of a book! The book exists for us, perchance, which will explain
 our miracles and reveal new ones. The at present unutterable things we
 may find somewhere uttered. These same questions that disturb and puzzle
 and confound us have in their turn occurred to all the wise men; not one
 has been omitted; and each has answered them, according to his ability,
 by his words and his life. Moreover, with wisdom we shall learn
 liberality. The solitary hired man on a farm in the outskirts of
 Concord, who has had his second birth and peculiar religious experience,
 and is driven as he believes into the silent gravity and exclusiveness
 by his faith, may think it is not true; but Zoroaster, thousands of
 years ago, travelled the same road and had the same experience; but
 he, being wise, knew it to be universal, and treated his neighbors
 accordingly, and is even said to have invented and established worship
 among men. Let him humbly commune with Zoroaster then, and through the
 liberalizing influence of all the worthies, with Jesus Christ himself,
 and let "our church" go by the board.
 
 We boast that we belong to the Nineteenth Century and are making the
 most rapid strides of any nation. But consider how little this village
 does for its own culture. I do not wish to flatter my townsmen, nor to
 be flattered by them, for that will not advance either of us. We need
 to be provoked--goaded like oxen, as we are, into a trot. We have a
 comparatively decent system of common schools, schools for infants only;
 but excepting the half-starved Lyceum in the winter, and latterly
 the puny beginning of a library suggested by the State, no school for
 ourselves. We spend more on almost any article of bodily aliment or
 ailment than on our mental aliment. It is time that we had uncommon
 schools, that we did not leave off our education when we begin to be men
 and women. It is time that villages were universities, and their elder
 inhabitants the fellows of universities, with leisure--if they are,
 indeed, so well off--to pursue liberal studies the rest of their lives.
 Shall the world be confined to one Paris or one Oxford forever? Cannot
 students be boarded here and get a liberal education under the skies of
 Concord? Can we not hire some Abelard to lecture to us? Alas! what with
 foddering the cattle and tending the store, we are kept from school too
 long, and our education is sadly neglected. In this country, the village
 should in some respects take the place of the nobleman of Europe. It
 should be the patron of the fine arts. It is rich enough. It wants only
 the magnanimity and refinement. It can spend money enough on such things
 as farmers and traders value, but it is thought Utopian to propose
 spending money for things which more intelligent men know to be of
 far more worth. This town has spent seventeen thousand dollars on a
 town-house, thank fortune or politics, but probably it will not spend so
 much on living wit, the true meat to put into that shell, in a hundred
 years. The one hundred and twenty-five dollars annually subscribed for a
 Lyceum in the winter is better spent than any other equal sum raised in
 the town. If we live in the Nineteenth Century, why should we not enjoy
 the advantages which the Nineteenth Century offers? Why should our life
 be in any respect provincial? If we will read newspapers, why not
 skip the gossip of Boston and take the best newspaper in the world at
 once?--not be sucking the pap of "neutral family" papers, or browsing
 "Olive Branches" here in New England. Let the reports of all the learned
 societies come to us, and we will see if they know anything. Why
 should we leave it to Harper & Brothers and Redding & Co. to select
 our reading? As the nobleman of cultivated taste surrounds himself
 with whatever conduces to his culture--genius--learning--wit--books--
 paintings--statuary--music--philosophical instruments, and the like; so
 let the village do--not stop short at a pedagogue, a parson, a sexton, a
 parish library, and three selectmen, because our Pilgrim forefathers got
 through a cold winter once on a bleak rock with these. To act
 collectively is according to the spirit of our institutions; and I am
 confident that, as our circumstances are more flourishing, our means are
 greater than the nobleman's. New England can hire all the wise men in
 the world to come and teach her, and board them round the while, and not
 be provincial at all. That is the _uncommon_ school we want. Instead of
 noblemen, let us have noble villages of men. If it is necessary, omit
 one bridge over the river, go round a little there, and throw one arch
 at least over the darker gulf of ignorance which surrounds us.
 
 
 
 
 Sounds
 
 
 But while we are confined to books, though the most select and classic,
 and read only particular written languages, which are themselves but
 dialects and provincial, we are in danger of forgetting the language
 which all things and events speak without metaphor, which alone is
 copious and standard. Much is published, but little printed. The rays
 which stream through the shutter will be no longer remembered when the
 shutter is wholly removed. No method nor discipline can supersede the
 necessity of being forever on the alert. What is a course of history or
 philosophy, or poetry, no matter how well selected, or the best society,
 or the most admirable routine of life, compared with the discipline of
 looking always at what is to be seen? Will you be a reader, a student
 merely, or a seer? Read your fate, see what is before you, and walk on
 into futurity.
 
 I did not read books the first summer; I hoed beans. Nay, I often did
 better than this. There were times when I could not afford to sacrifice
 the bloom of the present moment to any work, whether of the head or
 hands. I love a broad margin to my life. Sometimes, in a summer morning,
 having taken my accustomed bath, I sat in my sunny doorway from sunrise
 till noon, rapt in a revery, amidst the pines and hickories and sumachs,
 in undisturbed solitude and stillness, while the birds sing around or
 flitted noiseless through the house, until by the sun falling in at
 my west window, or the noise of some traveller's wagon on the distant
 highway, I was reminded of the lapse of time. I grew in those seasons
 like corn in the night, and they were far better than any work of the
 hands would have been. They were not time subtracted from my life, but
 so much over and above my usual allowance. I realized what the Orientals
 mean by contemplation and the forsaking of works. For the most part, I
 minded not how the hours went. The day advanced as if to light some
 work of mine; it was morning, and lo, now it is evening, and nothing
 memorable is accomplished. Instead of singing like the birds, I silently
 smiled at my incessant good fortune. As the sparrow had its trill,
 sitting on the hickory before my door, so had I my chuckle or suppressed
 warble which he might hear out of my nest. My days were not days of the
 week, bearing the stamp of any heathen deity, nor were they minced into
 hours and fretted by the ticking of a clock; for I lived like the Puri
 Indians, of whom it is said that "for yesterday, today, and tomorrow
 they have only one word, and they express the variety of meaning by
 pointing backward for yesterday forward for tomorrow, and overhead for
 the passing day." This was sheer idleness to my fellow-townsmen, no
 doubt; but if the birds and flowers had tried me by their standard, I
 should not have been found wanting. A man must find his occasions in
 himself, it is true. The natural day is very calm, and will hardly
 reprove his indolence.
 
 I had this advantage, at least, in my mode of life, over those who were
 obliged to look abroad for amusement, to society and the theatre, that
 my life itself was become my amusement and never ceased to be novel.
 It was a drama of many scenes and without an end. If we were always,
 indeed, getting our living, and regulating our lives according to the
 last and best mode we had learned, we should never be troubled with
 ennui. Follow your genius closely enough, and it will not fail to show
 you a fresh prospect every hour. Housework was a pleasant pastime. When
 my floor was dirty, I rose early, and, setting all my furniture out of
 doors on the grass, bed and bedstead making but one budget, dashed water
 on the floor, and sprinkled white sand from the pond on it, and then
 with a broom scrubbed it clean and white; and by the time the villagers
 had broken their fast the morning sun had dried my house sufficiently to
 allow me to move in again, and my meditations were almost uninterupted.
 It was pleasant to see my whole household effects out on the grass,
 making a little pile like a gypsy's pack, and my three-legged table,
 from which I did not remove the books and pen and ink, standing amid the
 pines and hickories. They seemed glad to get out themselves, and as if
 unwilling to be brought in. I was sometimes tempted to stretch an awning
 over them and take my seat there. It was worth the while to see the sun
 shine on these things, and hear the free wind blow on them; so much more
 interesting most familiar objects look out of doors than in the house. A
 bird sits on the next bough, life-everlasting grows under the table,
 and blackberry vines run round its legs; pine cones, chestnut burs, and
 strawberry leaves are strewn about. It looked as if this was the way
 these forms came to be transferred to our furniture, to tables, chairs,
 and bedsteads--because they once stood in their midst.
 
 My house was on the side of a hill, immediately on the edge of
 the larger wood, in the midst of a young forest of pitch pines and
 hickories, and half a dozen rods from the pond, to which a narrow
 footpath led down the hill. In my front yard grew the strawberry,
 blackberry, and life-everlasting, johnswort and goldenrod, shrub oaks
 and sand cherry, blueberry and groundnut. Near the end of May, the sand
 cherry (_Cerasus pumila_) adorned the sides of the path with its delicate
 flowers arranged in umbels cylindrically about its short stems, which
 last, in the fall, weighed down with good-sized and handsome cherries,
 fell over in wreaths like rays on every side. I tasted them out of
 compliment to Nature, though they were scarcely palatable. The sumach
 (_Rhus glabra_) grew luxuriantly about the house, pushing up through the
 embankment which I had made, and growing five or six feet the first
 season. Its broad pinnate tropical leaf was pleasant though strange to
 look on. The large buds, suddenly pushing out late in the spring from
 dry sticks which had seemed to be dead, developed themselves as by
 magic into graceful green and tender boughs, an inch in diameter; and
 sometimes, as I sat at my window, so heedlessly did they grow and tax
 their weak joints, I heard a fresh and tender bough suddenly fall like
 a fan to the ground, when there was not a breath of air stirring, broken
 off by its own weight. In August, the large masses of berries, which,
 when in flower, had attracted many wild bees, gradually assumed their
 bright velvety crimson hue, and by their weight again bent down and
 broke the tender limbs.
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 As I sit at my window this summer afternoon, hawks are circling about my
 clearing; the tantivy of wild pigeons, flying by two and threes athwart
 my view, or perching restless on the white pine boughs behind my house,
 gives a voice to the air; a fish hawk dimples the glassy surface of the
 pond and brings up a fish; a mink steals out of the marsh before my door
 and seizes a frog by the shore; the sedge is bending under the weight of
 the reed-birds flitting hither and thither; and for the last half-hour I
 have heard the rattle of railroad cars, now dying away and then reviving
 like the beat of a partridge, conveying travellers from Boston to the
 country. For I did not live so out of the world as that boy who, as I
 hear, was put out to a farmer in the east part of the town, but ere long
 ran away and came home again, quite down at the heel and homesick. He
 had never seen such a dull and out-of-the-way place; the folks were all
 gone off; why, you couldn't even hear the whistle! I doubt if there is
 such a place in Massachusetts now:--
 
       "In truth, our village has become a butt
        For one of those fleet railroad shafts, and o'er
        Our peaceful plain its soothing sound is--Concord."
 
 The Fitchburg Railroad touches the pond about a hundred rods south of
 where I dwell. I usually go to the village along its causeway, and am,
 as it were, related to society by this link. The men on the freight
 trains, who go over the whole length of the road, bow to me as to an old
 acquaintance, they pass me so often, and apparently they take me for an
 employee; and so I am. I too would fain be a track-repairer somewhere in
 the orbit of the earth.
 
 The whistle of the locomotive penetrates my woods summer and winter,
 sounding like the scream of a hawk sailing over some farmer's yard,
 informing me that many restless city merchants are arriving within the
 circle of the town, or adventurous country traders from the other side.
 As they come under one horizon, they shout their warning to get off the
 track to the other, heard sometimes through the circles of two towns.
 Here come your groceries, country; your rations, countrymen! Nor is
 there any man so independent on his farm that he can say them nay. And
 here's your pay for them! screams the countryman's whistle; timber like
 long battering-rams going twenty miles an hour against the city's walls,
 and chairs enough to seat all the weary and heavy-laden that dwell
 within them. With such huge and lumbering civility the country hands a
 chair to the city. All the Indian huckleberry hills are stripped, all
 the cranberry meadows are raked into the city. Up comes the cotton, down
 goes the woven cloth; up comes the silk, down goes the woollen; up come
 the books, but down goes the wit that writes them.
 
 When I meet the engine with its train of cars moving off with planetary
 motion--or, rather, like a comet, for the beholder knows not if with
 that velocity and with that direction it will ever revisit this system,
 since its orbit does not look like a returning curve--with its steam
 cloud like a banner streaming behind in golden and silver wreaths, like
 many a downy cloud which I have seen, high in the heavens, unfolding its
 masses to the light--as if this traveling demigod, this cloud-compeller,
 would ere long take the sunset sky for the livery of his train; when
 I hear the iron horse make the hills echo with his snort like thunder,
 shaking the earth with his feet, and breathing fire and smoke from his
 nostrils (what kind of winged horse or fiery dragon they will put into
 the new Mythology I don't know), it seems as if the earth had got a
 race now worthy to inhabit it. If all were as it seems, and men made the
 elements their servants for noble ends! If the cloud that hangs over the
 engine were the perspiration of heroic deeds, or as beneficent as that
 which floats over the farmer's fields, then the elements and Nature
 herself would cheerfully accompany men on their errands and be their
 escort.
 
 I watch the passage of the morning cars with the same feeling that I
 do the rising of the sun, which is hardly more regular. Their train
 of clouds stretching far behind and rising higher and higher, going to
 heaven while the cars are going to Boston, conceals the sun for a minute
 and casts my distant field into the shade, a celestial train beside
 which the petty train of cars which hugs the earth is but the barb
 of the spear. The stabler of the iron horse was up early this winter
 morning by the light of the stars amid the mountains, to fodder and
 harness his steed. Fire, too, was awakened thus early to put the vital
 heat in him and get him off. If the enterprise were as innocent as it is
 early! If the snow lies deep, they strap on his snowshoes, and, with the
 giant plow, plow a furrow from the mountains to the seaboard, in which
 the cars, like a following drill-barrow, sprinkle all the restless men
 and floating merchandise in the country for seed. All day the fire-steed
 flies over the country, stopping only that his master may rest, and I am
 awakened by his tramp and defiant snort at midnight, when in some remote
 glen in the woods he fronts the elements incased in ice and snow; and he
 will reach his stall only with the morning star, to start once more on
 his travels without rest or slumber. Or perchance, at evening, I hear
 him in his stable blowing off the superfluous energy of the day, that he
 may calm his nerves and cool his liver and brain for a few hours of
 iron slumber. If the enterprise were as heroic and commanding as it is
 protracted and unwearied!
 
 Far through unfrequented woods on the confines of towns, where once only
 the hunter penetrated by day, in the darkest night dart these bright
 saloons without the knowledge of their inhabitants; this moment stopping
 at some brilliant station-house in town or city, where a social crowd
 is gathered, the next in the Dismal Swamp, scaring the owl and fox. The
 startings and arrivals of the cars are now the epochs in the village
 day. They go and come with such regularity and precision, and their
 whistle can be heard so far, that the farmers set their clocks by them,
 and thus one well-conducted institution regulates a whole country.
 Have not men improved somewhat in punctuality since the railroad was
 invented? Do they not talk and think faster in the depot than they did
 in the stage-office? There is something electrifying in the atmosphere
 of the former place. I have been astonished at the miracles it has
 wrought; that some of my neighbors, who, I should have prophesied, once
 for all, would never get to Boston by so prompt a conveyance, are on
 hand when the bell rings. To do things "railroad fashion" is now the
 byword; and it is worth the while to be warned so often and so sincerely
 by any power to get off its track. There is no stopping to read the
 riot act, no firing over the heads of the mob, in this case. We have
 constructed a fate, an _Atropos_, that never turns aside. (Let that be
 the name of your engine.) Men are advertised that at a certain hour and
 minute these bolts will be shot toward particular points of the compass;
 yet it interferes with no man's business, and the children go to school
 on the other track. We live the steadier for it. We are all educated
 thus to be sons of Tell. The air is full of invisible bolts. Every path
 but your own is the path of fate. Keep on your own track, then.
 
 What recommends commerce to me is its enterprise and bravery. It does
 not clasp its hands and pray to Jupiter. I see these men every day go
 about their business with more or less courage and content, doing more
 even than they suspect, and perchance better employed than they could
 have consciously devised. I am less affected by their heroism who stood
 up for half an hour in the front line at Buena Vista, than by the steady
 and cheerful valor of the men who inhabit the snowplow for their winter
 quarters; who have not merely the three-o'-clock-in-the-morning courage,
 which Bonaparte thought was the rarest, but whose courage does not go to
 rest so early, who go to sleep only when the storm sleeps or the sinews
 of their iron steed are frozen. On this morning of the Great Snow,
 perchance, which is still raging and chilling men's blood, I bear the
 muffled tone of their engine bell from out the fog bank of their chilled
 breath, which announces that the cars _are coming_, without long delay,
 notwithstanding the veto of a New England northeast snow-storm, and
 I behold the plowmen covered with snow and rime, their heads peering,
 above the mould-board which is turning down other than daisies and the
 nests of field mice, like bowlders of the Sierra Nevada, that occupy an
 outside place in the universe.
 
 Commerce is unexpectedly confident and serene, alert, adventurous, and
 unwearied. It is very natural in its methods withal, far more so than
 many fantastic enterprises and sentimental experiments, and hence its
 singular success. I am refreshed and expanded when the freight train
 rattles past me, and I smell the stores which go dispensing their odors
 all the way from Long Wharf to Lake Champlain, reminding me of foreign
 parts, of coral reefs, and Indian oceans, and tropical climes, and the
 extent of the globe. I feel more like a citizen of the world at the
 sight of the palm-leaf which will cover so many flaxen New England heads
 the next summer, the Manilla hemp and cocoanut husks, the old junk,
 gunny bags, scrap iron, and rusty nails. This carload of torn sails is
 more legible and interesting now than if they should be wrought into
 paper and printed books. Who can write so graphically the history of
 the storms they have weathered as these rents have done? They are
 proof-sheets which need no correction. Here goes lumber from the Maine
 woods, which did not go out to sea in the last freshet, risen four
 dollars on the thousand because of what did go out or was split up;
 pine, spruce, cedar--first, second, third, and fourth qualities,
 so lately all of one quality, to wave over the bear, and moose, and
 caribou. Next rolls Thomaston lime, a prime lot, which will get far
 among the hills before it gets slacked. These rags in bales, of all hues
 and qualities, the lowest condition to which cotton and linen descend,
 the final result of dress--of patterns which are now no longer cried up,
 unless it be in Milwaukee, as those splendid articles, English, French,
 or American prints, ginghams, muslins, etc., gathered from all quarters
 both of fashion and poverty, going to become paper of one color or a
 few shades only, on which, forsooth, will be written tales of real life,
 high and low, and founded on fact! This closed car smells of salt fish,
 the strong New England and commercial scent, reminding me of the Grand
 Banks and the fisheries. Who has not seen a salt fish, thoroughly
 cured for this world, so that nothing can spoil it, and putting the
 perseverance of the saints to the blush? with which you may sweep or
 pave the streets, and split your kindlings, and the teamster shelter
 himself and his lading against sun, wind, and rain behind it--and the
 trader, as a Concord trader once did, hang it up by his door for a sign
 when he commences business, until at last his oldest customer cannot
 tell surely whether it be animal, vegetable, or mineral, and yet it
 shall be as pure as a snowflake, and if it be put into a pot and boiled,
 will come out an excellent dun-fish for a Saturday's dinner. Next
 Spanish hides, with the tails still preserving their twist and the angle
 of elevation they had when the oxen that wore them were careering over
 the pampas of the Spanish Main--a type of all obstinacy, and evincing
 how almost hopeless and incurable are all constitutional vices. I
 confess, that practically speaking, when I have learned a man's real
 disposition, I have no hopes of changing it for the better or worse
 in this state of existence. As the Orientals say, "A cur's tail may be
 warmed, and pressed, and bound round with ligatures, and after a twelve
 years' labor bestowed upon it, still it will retain its natural form."
 The only effectual cure for such inveteracies as these tails exhibit is
 to make glue of them, which I believe is what is usually done with them,
 and then they will stay put and stick. Here is a hogshead of molasses
 or of brandy directed to John Smith, Cuttingsville, Vermont, some
 trader among the Green Mountains, who imports for the farmers near his
 clearing, and now perchance stands over his bulkhead and thinks of
 the last arrivals on the coast, how they may affect the price for him,
 telling his customers this moment, as he has told them twenty times
 before this morning, that he expects some by the next train of prime
 quality. It is advertised in the Cuttingsville Times.
 
 While these things go up other things come down. Warned by the whizzing
 sound, I look up from my book and see some tall pine, hewn on far
 northern hills, which has winged its way over the Green Mountains and
 the Connecticut, shot like an arrow through the township within ten
 minutes, and scarce another eye beholds it; going
 
                           "to be the mast
                  Of some great ammiral."
 
 And hark! here comes the cattle-train bearing the cattle of a thousand
 hills, sheepcots, stables, and cow-yards in the air, drovers with their
 sticks, and shepherd boys in the midst of their flocks, all but the
 mountain pastures, whirled along like leaves blown from the mountains by
 the September gales. The air is filled with the bleating of calves and
 sheep, and the hustling of oxen, as if a pastoral valley were going by.
 When the old bell-wether at the head rattles his bell, the mountains
 do indeed skip like rams and the little hills like lambs. A carload
 of drovers, too, in the midst, on a level with their droves now, their
 vocation gone, but still clinging to their useless sticks as their badge
 of office. But their dogs, where are they? It is a stampede to them;
 they are quite thrown out; they have lost the scent. Methinks I hear
 them barking behind the Peterboro' Hills, or panting up the western
 slope of the Green Mountains. They will not be in at the death. Their
 vocation, too, is gone. Their fidelity and sagacity are below par now.
 They will slink back to their kennels in disgrace, or perchance run wild
 and strike a league with the wolf and the fox. So is your pastoral life
 whirled past and away. But the bell rings, and I must get off the track
 and let the cars go by;--
 
                   What's the railroad to me?
                   I never go to see
                   Where it ends.
                   It fills a few hollows,
                   And makes banks for the swallows,
                   It sets the sand a-blowing,
                   And the blackberries a-growing,
 
 but I cross it like a cart-path in the woods. I will not have my eyes
 put out and my ears spoiled by its smoke and steam and hissing.
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 Now that the cars are gone by and all the restless world with them, and
 the fishes in the pond no longer feel their rumbling, I am more alone
 than ever. For the rest of the long afternoon, perhaps, my meditations
 are interrupted only by the faint rattle of a carriage or team along the
 distant highway.
 
 Sometimes, on Sundays, I heard the bells, the Lincoln, Acton, Bedford,
 or Concord bell, when the wind was favorable, a faint, sweet, and, as
 it were, natural melody, worth importing into the wilderness. At
 a sufficient distance over the woods this sound acquires a certain
 vibratory hum, as if the pine needles in the horizon were the strings of
 a harp which it swept. All sound heard at the greatest possible distance
 produces one and the same effect, a vibration of the universal lyre,
 just as the intervening atmosphere makes a distant ridge of earth
 interesting to our eyes by the azure tint it imparts to it. There came
 to me in this case a melody which the air had strained, and which had
 conversed with every leaf and needle of the wood, that portion of the
 sound which the elements had taken up and modulated and echoed from vale
 to vale. The echo is, to some extent, an original sound, and therein
 is the magic and charm of it. It is not merely a repetition of what was
 worth repeating in the bell, but partly the voice of the wood; the same
 trivial words and notes sung by a wood-nymph.
 
 At evening, the distant lowing of some cow in the horizon beyond the
 woods sounded sweet and melodious, and at first I would mistake it for
 the voices of certain minstrels by whom I was sometimes serenaded, who
 might be straying over hill and dale; but soon I was not unpleasantly
 disappointed when it was prolonged into the cheap and natural music of
 the cow. I do not mean to be satirical, but to express my appreciation
 of those youths' singing, when I state that I perceived clearly that
 it was akin to the music of the cow, and they were at length one
 articulation of Nature.
 
 Regularly at half-past seven, in one part of the summer, after the
 evening train had gone by, the whip-poor-wills chanted their vespers for
 half an hour, sitting on a stump by my door, or upon the ridge-pole of
 the house. They would begin to sing almost with as much precision as a
 clock, within five minutes of a particular time, referred to the setting
 of the sun, every evening. I had a rare opportunity to become acquainted
 with their habits. Sometimes I heard four or five at once in different
 parts of the wood, by accident one a bar behind another, and so near me
 that I distinguished not only the cluck after each note, but often that
 singular buzzing sound like a fly in a spider's web, only proportionally
 louder. Sometimes one would circle round and round me in the woods a few
 feet distant as if tethered by a string, when probably I was near its
 eggs. They sang at intervals throughout the night, and were again as
 musical as ever just before and about dawn.
 
 When other birds are still, the screech owls take up the strain, like
 mourning women their ancient u-lu-lu. Their dismal scream is truly Ben
 Jonsonian. Wise midnight hags! It is no honest and blunt tu-whit tu-who
 of the poets, but, without jesting, a most solemn graveyard ditty, the
 mutual consolations of suicide lovers remembering the pangs and the
 delights of supernal love in the infernal groves. Yet I love to hear
 their wailing, their doleful responses, trilled along the woodside;
 reminding me sometimes of music and singing birds; as if it were the
 dark and tearful side of music, the regrets and sighs that would fain be
 sung. They are the spirits, the low spirits and melancholy forebodings,
 of fallen souls that once in human shape night-walked the earth and did
 the deeds of darkness, now expiating their sins with their wailing hymns
 or threnodies in the scenery of their transgressions. They give me a
 new sense of the variety and capacity of that nature which is our common
 dwelling. _Oh-o-o-o-o that I never had been bor-r-r-r-n!_ sighs one on
 this side of the pond, and circles with the restlessness of despair
 to some new perch on the gray oaks. Then--_that I never had been
 bor-r-r-r-n!_ echoes another on the farther side with tremulous
 sincerity, and--_bor-r-r-r-n!_ comes faintly from far in the Lincoln
 woods.
 
 I was also serenaded by a hooting owl. Near at hand you could fancy
 it the most melancholy sound in Nature, as if she meant by this to
 stereotype and make permanent in her choir the dying moans of a human
 being--some poor weak relic of mortality who has left hope behind, and
 howls like an animal, yet with human sobs, on entering the dark valley,
 made more awful by a certain gurgling melodiousness--I find myself
 beginning with the letters _gl_ when I try to imitate it--expressive of
 a mind which has reached the gelatinous, mildewy stage in the
 mortification of all healthy and courageous thought. It reminded me
 of ghouls and idiots and insane howlings. But now one answers from far
 woods in a strain made really melodious by distance--_Hoo hoo hoo,
 hoorer hoo_; and indeed for the most part it suggested only pleasing
 associations, whether heard by day or night, summer or winter.
 
 I rejoice that there are owls. Let them do the idiotic and maniacal
 hooting for men. It is a sound admirably suited to swamps and twilight
 woods which no day illustrates, suggesting a vast and undeveloped nature
 which men have not recognized. They represent the stark twilight and
 unsatisfied thoughts which all have. All day the sun has shone on the
 surface of some savage swamp, where the single spruce stands hung with
 usnea lichens, and small hawks circulate above, and the chickadee lisps
 amid the evergreens, and the partridge and rabbit skulk beneath; but now
 a more dismal and fitting day dawns, and a different race of creatures
 awakes to express the meaning of Nature there.
 
 Late in the evening I heard the distant rumbling of wagons over
 bridges--a sound heard farther than almost any other at night--the
 baying of dogs, and sometimes again the lowing of some disconsolate cow
 in a distant barn-yard. In the mean-while all the shore rang with the
 trump of bullfrogs, the sturdy spirits of ancient wine-bibbers and
 wassailers, still unrepentant, trying to sing a catch in their Stygian
 lake--if the Walden nymphs will pardon the comparison, for though there
 are almost no weeds, there are frogs there--who would fain keep up the
 hilarious rules of their old festal tables, though their voices have
 waxed hoarse and solemnly grave, mocking at mirth, and the wine has lost
 its flavor, and become only liquor to distend their paunches, and sweet
 intoxication never comes to drown the memory of the past, but mere
 saturation and waterloggedness and distention. The most aldermanic, with
 his chin upon a heart-leaf, which serves for a napkin to his drooling
 chaps, under this northern shore quaffs a deep draught of the
 once scorned water, and passes round the cup with the ejaculation
 _tr-r-r-oonk, tr-r-r--oonk, tr-r-r-oonk!_ and straightway comes over the
 water from some distant cove the same password repeated, where the
 next in seniority and girth has gulped down to his mark; and when this
 observance has made the circuit of the shores, then ejaculates the
 master of ceremonies, with satisfaction, _tr-r-r-oonk!_ and each in
 his turn repeats the same down to the least distended, leakiest, and
 flabbiest paunched, that there be no mistake; and then the howl goes
 round again and again, until the sun disperses the morning mist, and
 only the patriarch is not under the pond, but vainly bellowing _troonk_
 from time to time, and pausing for a reply.
 
 I am not sure that I ever heard the sound of cock-crowing from my
 clearing, and I thought that it might be worth the while to keep a
 cockerel for his music merely, as a singing bird. The note of this once
 wild Indian pheasant is certainly the most remarkable of any bird's, and
 if they could be naturalized without being domesticated, it would soon
 become the most famous sound in our woods, surpassing the clangor of the
 goose and the hooting of the owl; and then imagine the cackling of the
 hens to fill the pauses when their lords' clarions rested! No wonder
 that man added this bird to his tame stock--to say nothing of the eggs
 and drumsticks. To walk in a winter morning in a wood where these birds
 abounded, their native woods, and hear the wild cockerels crow on the
 trees, clear and shrill for miles over the resounding earth, drowning
 the feebler notes of other birds--think of it! It would put nations on
 the alert. Who would not be early to rise, and rise earlier and earlier
 every successive day of his life, till he became unspeakably healthy,
 wealthy, and wise? This foreign bird's note is celebrated by the poets
 of all countries along with the notes of their native songsters. All
 climates agree with brave Chanticleer. He is more indigenous even than
 the natives. His health is ever good, his lungs are sound, his spirits
 never flag. Even the sailor on the Atlantic and Pacific is awakened by
 his voice; but its shrill sound never roused me from my slumbers. I kept
 neither dog, cat, cow, pig, nor hens, so that you would have said
 there was a deficiency of domestic sounds; neither the churn, nor the
 spinning-wheel, nor even the singing of the kettle, nor the hissing of
 the urn, nor children crying, to comfort one. An old-fashioned man would
 have lost his senses or died of ennui before this. Not even rats in the
 wall, for they were starved out, or rather were never baited in--only
 squirrels on the roof and under the floor, a whip-poor-will on the
 ridge-pole, a blue jay screaming beneath the window, a hare or woodchuck
 under the house, a screech owl or a cat owl behind it, a flock of wild
 geese or a laughing loon on the pond, and a fox to bark in the night.
 Not even a lark or an oriole, those mild plantation birds, ever visited
 my clearing. No cockerels to crow nor hens to cackle in the yard. No
 yard! but unfenced nature reaching up to your very sills. A young forest
 growing up under your meadows, and wild sumachs and blackberry vines
 breaking through into your cellar; sturdy pitch pines rubbing and
 creaking against the shingles for want of room, their roots reaching
 quite under the house. Instead of a scuttle or a blind blown off in the
 gale--a pine tree snapped off or torn up by the roots behind your
 house for fuel. Instead of no path to the front-yard gate in the Great
 Snow--no gate--no front-yard--and no path to the civilized world.
 
 
 
 
 Solitude
 
 
 This is a delicious evening, when the whole body is one sense, and
 imbibes delight through every pore. I go and come with a strange liberty
 in Nature, a part of herself. As I walk along the stony shore of the
 pond in my shirt-sleeves, though it is cool as well as cloudy and windy,
 and I see nothing special to attract me, all the elements are unusually
 congenial to me. The bullfrogs trump to usher in the night, and the note
 of the whip-poor-will is borne on the rippling wind from over the water.
 Sympathy with the fluttering alder and poplar leaves almost takes away
 my breath; yet, like the lake, my serenity is rippled but not ruffled.
 These small waves raised by the evening wind are as remote from storm
 as the smooth reflecting surface. Though it is now dark, the wind still
 blows and roars in the wood, the waves still dash, and some creatures
 lull the rest with their notes. The repose is never complete. The
 wildest animals do not repose, but seek their prey now; the fox, and
 skunk, and rabbit, now roam the fields and woods without fear. They are
 Nature's watchmen--links which connect the days of animated life.
 
 When I return to my house I find that visitors have been there and left
 their cards, either a bunch of flowers, or a wreath of evergreen, or a
 name in pencil on a yellow walnut leaf or a chip. They who come rarely
 to the woods take some little piece of the forest into their hands
 to play with by the way, which they leave, either intentionally or
 accidentally. One has peeled a willow wand, woven it into a ring, and
 dropped it on my table. I could always tell if visitors had called in
 my absence, either by the bended twigs or grass, or the print of their
 shoes, and generally of what sex or age or quality they were by some
 slight trace left, as a flower dropped, or a bunch of grass plucked and
 thrown away, even as far off as the railroad, half a mile distant, or by
 the lingering odor of a cigar or pipe. Nay, I was frequently notified of
 the passage of a traveller along the highway sixty rods off by the scent
 of his pipe.
 
 There is commonly sufficient space about us. Our horizon is never quite
 at our elbows. The thick wood is not just at our door, nor the pond, but
 somewhat is always clearing, familiar and worn by us, appropriated and
 fenced in some way, and reclaimed from Nature. For what reason have I
 this vast range and circuit, some square miles of unfrequented forest,
 for my privacy, abandoned to me by men? My nearest neighbor is a mile
 distant, and no house is visible from any place but the hill-tops within
 half a mile of my own. I have my horizon bounded by woods all to myself;
 a distant view of the railroad where it touches the pond on the one
 hand, and of the fence which skirts the woodland road on the other. But
 for the most part it is as solitary where I live as on the prairies. It
 is as much Asia or Africa as New England. I have, as it were, my own sun
 and moon and stars, and a little world all to myself. At night there was
 never a traveller passed my house, or knocked at my door, more than if
 I were the first or last man; unless it were in the spring, when at long
 intervals some came from the village to fish for pouts--they plainly
 fished much more in the Walden Pond of their own natures, and baited
 their hooks with darkness--but they soon retreated, usually with light
 baskets, and left "the world to darkness and to me," and the black
 kernel of the night was never profaned by any human neighborhood. I
 believe that men are generally still a little afraid of the dark,
 though the witches are all hung, and Christianity and candles have been
 introduced.
 
 Yet I experienced sometimes that the most sweet and tender, the most
 innocent and encouraging society may be found in any natural object,
 even for the poor misanthrope and most melancholy man. There can be no
 very black melancholy to him who lives in the midst of Nature and has
 his senses still. There was never yet such a storm but it was Aolian
 music to a healthy and innocent ear. Nothing can rightly compel a simple
 and brave man to a vulgar sadness. While I enjoy the friendship of the
 seasons I trust that nothing can make life a burden to me. The gentle
 rain which waters my beans and keeps me in the house today is not drear
 and melancholy, but good for me too. Though it prevents my hoeing them,
 it is of far more worth than my hoeing. If it should continue so long as
 to cause the seeds to rot in the ground and destroy the potatoes in the
 low lands, it would still be good for the grass on the uplands, and,
 being good for the grass, it would be good for me. Sometimes, when I
 compare myself with other men, it seems as if I were more favored by the
 gods than they, beyond any deserts that I am conscious of; as if I had
 a warrant and surety at their hands which my fellows have not, and were
 especially guided and guarded. I do not flatter myself, but if it be
 possible they flatter me. I have never felt lonesome, or in the least
 oppressed by a sense of solitude, but once, and that was a few weeks
 after I came to the woods, when, for an hour, I doubted if the near
 neighborhood of man was not essential to a serene and healthy life. To
 be alone was something unpleasant. But I was at the same time conscious
 of a slight insanity in my mood, and seemed to foresee my recovery.
 In the midst of a gentle rain while these thoughts prevailed, I was
 suddenly sensible of such sweet and beneficent society in Nature, in
 the very pattering of the drops, and in every sound and sight around my
 house, an infinite and unaccountable friendliness all at once like
 an atmosphere sustaining me, as made the fancied advantages of human
 neighborhood insignificant, and I have never thought of them since.
 Every little pine needle expanded and swelled with sympathy and
 befriended me. I was so distinctly made aware of the presence of
 something kindred to me, even in scenes which we are accustomed to call
 wild and dreary, and also that the nearest of blood to me and humanest
 was not a person nor a villager, that I thought no place could ever be
 strange to me again.
 
           "Mourning untimely consumes the sad;
            Few are their days in the land of the living,
            Beautiful daughter of Toscar."
 
 Some of my pleasantest hours were during the long rain-storms in the
 spring or fall, which confined me to the house for the afternoon as well
 as the forenoon, soothed by their ceaseless roar and pelting; when an
 early twilight ushered in a long evening in which many thoughts had time
 to take root and unfold themselves. In those driving northeast rains
 which tried the village houses so, when the maids stood ready with mop
 and pail in front entries to keep the deluge out, I sat behind my door
 in my little house, which was all entry, and thoroughly enjoyed its
 protection. In one heavy thunder-shower the lightning struck a large
 pitch pine across the pond, making a very conspicuous and perfectly
 regular spiral groove from top to bottom, an inch or more deep, and four
 or five inches wide, as you would groove a walking-stick. I passed it
 again the other day, and was struck with awe on looking up and beholding
 that mark, now more distinct than ever, where a terrific and resistless
 bolt came down out of the harmless sky eight years ago. Men frequently
 say to me, "I should think you would feel lonesome down there, and want
 to be nearer to folks, rainy and snowy days and nights especially." I
 am tempted to reply to such--This whole earth which we inhabit is but
 a point in space. How far apart, think you, dwell the two most distant
 inhabitants of yonder star, the breadth of whose disk cannot be
 appreciated by our instruments? Why should I feel lonely? is not our
 planet in the Milky Way? This which you put seems to me not to be the
 most important question. What sort of space is that which separates
 a man from his fellows and makes him solitary? I have found that no
 exertion of the legs can bring two minds much nearer to one another.
 What do we want most to dwell near to? Not to many men surely,
 the depot, the post-office, the bar-room, the meeting-house, the
 school-house, the grocery, Beacon Hill, or the Five Points, where men
 most congregate, but to the perennial source of our life, whence in all
 our experience we have found that to issue, as the willow stands near
 the water and sends out its roots in that direction. This will vary with
 different natures, but this is the place where a wise man will dig
 his cellar.... I one evening overtook one of my townsmen, who has
 accumulated what is called "a handsome property"--though I never got a
 _fair_ view of it--on the Walden road, driving a pair of cattle to market,
 who inquired of me how I could bring my mind to give up so many of the
 comforts of life. I answered that I was very sure I liked it passably
 well; I was not joking. And so I went home to my bed, and left him
 to pick his way through the darkness and the mud to Brighton--or
 Bright-town--which place he would reach some time in the morning.
 
 Any prospect of awakening or coming to life to a dead man makes
 indifferent all times and places. The place where that may occur is
 always the same, and indescribably pleasant to all our senses. For the
 most part we allow only outlying and transient circumstances to make our
 occasions. They are, in fact, the cause of our distraction. Nearest
 to all things is that power which fashions their being. _Next_ to us the
 grandest laws are continually being executed. _Next_ to us is not the
 workman whom we have hired, with whom we love so well to talk, but the
 workman whose work we are.
 
 "How vast and profound is the influence of the subtile powers of Heaven
 and of Earth!"
 
 "We seek to perceive them, and we do not see them; we seek to hear them,
 and we do not hear them; identified with the substance of things, they
 cannot be separated from them."
 
 "They cause that in all the universe men purify and sanctify their
 hearts, and clothe themselves in their holiday garments to offer
 sacrifices and oblations to their ancestors. It is an ocean of subtile
 intelligences. They are everywhere, above us, on our left, on our right;
 they environ us on all sides."
 
 We are the subjects of an experiment which is not a little interesting
 to me. Can we not do without the society of our gossips a little while
 under these circumstances--have our own thoughts to cheer us? Confucius
 says truly, "Virtue does not remain as an abandoned orphan; it must of
 necessity have neighbors."
 
 With thinking we may be beside ourselves in a sane sense. By a
 conscious effort of the mind we can stand aloof from actions and their
 consequences; and all things, good and bad, go by us like a torrent. We
 are not wholly involved in Nature. I may be either the driftwood in the
 stream, or Indra in the sky looking down on it. I _may_ be affected by a
 theatrical exhibition; on the other hand, I _may not_ be affected by an
 actual event which appears to concern me much more. I only know myself
 as a human entity; the scene, so to speak, of thoughts and affections;
 and am sensible of a certain doubleness by which I can stand as remote
 from myself as from another. However intense my experience, I am
 conscious of the presence and criticism of a part of me, which, as it
 were, is not a part of me, but spectator, sharing no experience, but
 taking note of it, and that is no more I than it is you. When the play,
 it may be the tragedy, of life is over, the spectator goes his way. It
 was a kind of fiction, a work of the imagination only, so far as he was
 concerned. This doubleness may easily make us poor neighbors and friends
 sometimes.
 
 I find it wholesome to be alone the greater part of the time. To be in
 company, even with the best, is soon wearisome and dissipating. I love
 to be alone. I never found the companion that was so companionable as
 solitude. We are for the most part more lonely when we go abroad among
 men than when we stay in our chambers. A man thinking or working is
 always alone, let him be where he will. Solitude is not measured by the
 miles of space that intervene between a man and his fellows. The really
 diligent student in one of the crowded hives of Cambridge College is as
 solitary as a dervish in the desert. The farmer can work alone in the
 field or the woods all day, hoeing or chopping, and not feel lonesome,
 because he is employed; but when he comes home at night he cannot sit
 down in a room alone, at the mercy of his thoughts, but must be where he
 can "see the folks," and recreate, and, as he thinks, remunerate himself
 for his day's solitude; and hence he wonders how the student can sit
 alone in the house all night and most of the day without ennui and "the
 blues"; but he does not realize that the student, though in the house,
 is still at work in _his_ field, and chopping in _his_ woods, as the farmer
 in his, and in turn seeks the same recreation and society that the
 latter does, though it may be a more condensed form of it.
 
 Society is commonly too cheap. We meet at very short intervals, not
 having had time to acquire any new value for each other. We meet at
 meals three times a day, and give each other a new taste of that old
 musty cheese that we are. We have had to agree on a certain set of
 rules, called etiquette and politeness, to make this frequent meeting
 tolerable and that we need not come to open war. We meet at the
 post-office, and at the sociable, and about the fireside every night;
 we live thick and are in each other's way, and stumble over one another,
 and I think that we thus lose some respect for one another.
 Certainly less frequency would suffice for all important and hearty
 communications. Consider the girls in a factory--never alone, hardly in
 their dreams. It would be better if there were but one inhabitant to
 a square mile, as where I live. The value of a man is not in his skin,
 that we should touch him.
 
 I have heard of a man lost in the woods and dying of famine and
 exhaustion at the foot of a tree, whose loneliness was relieved by the
 grotesque visions with which, owing to bodily weakness, his diseased
 imagination surrounded him, and which he believed to be real. So also,
 owing to bodily and mental health and strength, we may be continually
 cheered by a like but more normal and natural society, and come to know
 that we are never alone.
 
 I have a great deal of company in my house; especially in the morning,
 when nobody calls. Let me suggest a few comparisons, that some one may
 convey an idea of my situation. I am no more lonely than the loon in the
 pond that laughs so loud, or than Walden Pond itself. What company has
 that lonely lake, I pray? And yet it has not the blue devils, but the
 blue angels in it, in the azure tint of its waters. The sun is alone,
 except in thick weather, when there sometimes appear to be two, but one
 is a mock sun. God is alone--but the devil, he is far from being alone;
 he sees a great deal of company; he is legion. I am no more lonely than
 a single mullein or dandelion in a pasture, or a bean leaf, or sorrel,
 or a horse-fly, or a bumblebee. I am no more lonely than the Mill Brook,
 or a weathercock, or the north star, or the south wind, or an April
 shower, or a January thaw, or the first spider in a new house.
 
 I have occasional visits in the long winter evenings, when the snow
 falls fast and the wind howls in the wood, from an old settler and
 original proprietor, who is reported to have dug Walden Pond, and stoned
 it, and fringed it with pine woods; who tells me stories of old time
 and of new eternity; and between us we manage to pass a cheerful evening
 with social mirth and pleasant views of things, even without apples
 or cider--a most wise and humorous friend, whom I love much, who keeps
 himself more secret than ever did Goffe or Whalley; and though he is
 thought to be dead, none can show where he is buried. An elderly dame,
 too, dwells in my neighborhood, invisible to most persons, in whose
 odorous herb garden I love to stroll sometimes, gathering simples and
 listening to her fables; for she has a genius of unequalled fertility,
 and her memory runs back farther than mythology, and she can tell me the
 original of every fable, and on what fact every one is founded, for the
 incidents occurred when she was young. A ruddy and lusty old dame, who
 delights in all weathers and seasons, and is likely to outlive all her
 children yet.
 
 The indescribable innocence and beneficence of Nature--of sun and wind
 and rain, of summer and winter--such health, such cheer, they afford
 forever! and such sympathy have they ever with our race, that all Nature
 would be affected, and the sun's brightness fade, and the winds would
 sigh humanely, and the clouds rain tears, and the woods shed their
 leaves and put on mourning in midsummer, if any man should ever for a
 just cause grieve. Shall I not have intelligence with the earth? Am I
 not partly leaves and vegetable mould myself?
 
 What is the pill which will keep us well, serene, contented? Not my or
 thy great-grandfather's, but our great-grandmother Nature's universal,
 vegetable, botanic medicines, by which she has kept herself young
 always, outlived so many old Parrs in her day, and fed her health with
 their decaying fatness. For my panacea, instead of one of those quack
 vials of a mixture dipped from Acheron and the Dead Sea, which come out
 of those long shallow black-schooner looking wagons which we sometimes
 see made to carry bottles, let me have a draught of undiluted morning
 air. Morning air! If men will not drink of this at the fountainhead
 of the day, why, then, we must even bottle up some and sell it in the
 shops, for the benefit of those who have lost their subscription ticket
 to morning time in this world. But remember, it will not keep quite till
 noonday even in the coolest cellar, but drive out the stopples long
 ere that and follow westward the steps of Aurora. I am no worshipper of
 Hygeia, who was the daughter of that old herb-doctor Asculapius, and
 who is represented on monuments holding a serpent in one hand, and in
 the other a cup out of which the serpent sometimes drinks; but rather
 of Hebe, cup-bearer to Jupiter, who was the daughter of Juno and wild
 lettuce, and who had the power of restoring gods and men to the vigor of
 youth. She was probably the only thoroughly sound-conditioned, healthy,
 and robust young lady that ever walked the globe, and wherever she came
 it was spring.
 
 
 
 
 Visitors
 
 
 I think that I love society as much as most, and am ready enough to
 fasten myself like a bloodsucker for the time to any full-blooded man
 that comes in my way. I am naturally no hermit, but might possibly sit
 out the sturdiest frequenter of the bar-room, if my business called me
 thither.
 
 I had three chairs in my house; one for solitude, two for friendship,
 three for society. When visitors came in larger and unexpected
 numbers there was but the third chair for them all, but they generally
 economized the room by standing up. It is surprising how many great men
 and women a small house will contain. I have had twenty-five or thirty
 souls, with their bodies, at once under my roof, and yet we often parted
 without being aware that we had come very near to one another. Many
 of our houses, both public and private, with their almost innumerable
 apartments, their huge halls and their cellars for the storage of wines
 and other munitions of peace, appear to be extravagantly large for their
 inhabitants. They are so vast and magnificent that the latter seem to be
 only vermin which infest them. I am surprised when the herald blows his
 summons before some Tremont or Astor or Middlesex House, to see come
 creeping out over the piazza for all inhabitants a ridiculous mouse,
 which soon again slinks into some hole in the pavement.
 
 One inconvenience I sometimes experienced in so small a house, the
 difficulty of getting to a sufficient distance from my guest when we
 began to utter the big thoughts in big words. You want room for your
 thoughts to get into sailing trim and run a course or two before they
 make their port. The bullet of your thought must have overcome its
 lateral and ricochet motion and fallen into its last and steady course
 before it reaches the ear of the hearer, else it may plow out again
 through the side of his head. Also, our sentences wanted room to unfold
 and form their columns in the interval. Individuals, like nations, must
 have suitable broad and natural boundaries, even a considerable neutral
 ground, between them. I have found it a singular luxury to talk across
 the pond to a companion on the opposite side. In my house we were so
 near that we could not begin to hear--we could not speak low enough to
 be heard; as when you throw two stones into calm water so near that they
 break each other's undulations. If we are merely loquacious and loud
 talkers, then we can afford to stand very near together, cheek by
 jowl, and feel each other's breath; but if we speak reservedly and
 thoughtfully, we want to be farther apart, that all animal heat and
 moisture may have a chance to evaporate. If we would enjoy the most
 intimate society with that in each of us which is without, or above,
 being spoken to, we must not only be silent, but commonly so far apart
 bodily that we cannot possibly hear each other's voice in any case.
 Referred to this standard, speech is for the convenience of those who
 are hard of hearing; but there are many fine things which we cannot say
 if we have to shout. As the conversation began to assume a loftier and
 grander tone, we gradually shoved our chairs farther apart till they
 touched the wall in opposite corners, and then commonly there was not
 room enough.
 
 My "best" room, however, my withdrawing room, always ready for company,
 on whose carpet the sun rarely fell, was the pine wood behind my house.
 Thither in summer days, when distinguished guests came, I took them, and
 a priceless domestic swept the floor and dusted the furniture and kept
 the things in order.
 
 If one guest came he sometimes partook of my frugal meal, and it was no
 interruption to conversation to be stirring a hasty-pudding, or
 watching the rising and maturing of a loaf of bread in the ashes, in the
 meanwhile. But if twenty came and sat in my house there was nothing said
 about dinner, though there might be bread enough for two, more than if
 eating were a forsaken habit; but we naturally practised abstinence; and
 this was never felt to be an offence against hospitality, but the most
 proper and considerate course. The waste and decay of physical life,
 which so often needs repair, seemed miraculously retarded in such a
 case, and the vital vigor stood its ground. I could entertain thus a
 thousand as well as twenty; and if any ever went away disappointed or
 hungry from my house when they found me at home, they may depend upon
 it that I sympathized with them at least. So easy is it, though many
 housekeepers doubt it, to establish new and better customs in the place
 of the old. You need not rest your reputation on the dinners you give.
 For my own part, I was never so effectually deterred from frequenting a
 man's house, by any kind of Cerberus whatever, as by the parade one made
 about dining me, which I took to be a very polite and roundabout hint
 never to trouble him so again. I think I shall never revisit those
 scenes. I should be proud to have for the motto of my cabin those lines
 of Spenser which one of my visitors inscribed on a yellow walnut leaf
 for a card:--
 
        "ArrivA"d there, the little house they fill,
            Ne looke for entertainment where none was;
         Rest is their feast, and all things at their will:
            The noblest mind the best contentment has."
 
 When Winslow, afterward governor of the Plymouth Colony, went with a
 companion on a visit of ceremony to Massasoit on foot through the woods,
 and arrived tired and hungry at his lodge, they were well received by
 the king, but nothing was said about eating that day. When the night
 arrived, to quote their own words--"He laid us on the bed with himself
 and his wife, they at the one end and we at the other, it being only
 planks laid a foot from the ground and a thin mat upon them. Two more of
 his chief men, for want of room, pressed by and upon us; so that we were
 worse weary of our lodging than of our journey." At one o'clock the next
 day Massasoit "brought two fishes that he had shot," about thrice as big
 as a bream. "These being boiled, there were at least forty looked for a
 share in them; the most eat of them. This meal only we had in two nights
 and a day; and had not one of us bought a partridge, we had taken our
 journey fasting." Fearing that they would be light-headed for want of
 food and also sleep, owing to "the savages' barbarous singing, (for they
 use to sing themselves asleep,)" and that they might get home while they
 had strength to travel, they departed. As for lodging, it is true they
 were but poorly entertained, though what they found an inconvenience was
 no doubt intended for an honor; but as far as eating was concerned, I do
 not see how the Indians could have done better. They had nothing to
 eat themselves, and they were wiser than to think that apologies could
 supply the place of food to their guests; so they drew their belts
 tighter and said nothing about it. Another time when Winslow visited
 them, it being a season of plenty with them, there was no deficiency in
 this respect.
 
 As for men, they will hardly fail one anywhere. I had more visitors
 while I lived in the woods than at any other period in my life; I mean
 that I had some. I met several there under more favorable circumstances
 than I could anywhere else. But fewer came to see me on trivial
 business. In this respect, my company was winnowed by my mere distance
 from town. I had withdrawn so far within the great ocean of solitude,
 into which the rivers of society empty, that for the most part, so
 far as my needs were concerned, only the finest sediment was deposited
 around me. Beside, there were wafted to me evidences of unexplored and
 uncultivated continents on the other side.
 
 Who should come to my lodge this morning but a true Homeric or
 Paphlagonian man--he had so suitable and poetic a name that I am sorry I
 cannot print it here--a Canadian, a woodchopper and post-maker, who can
 hole fifty posts in a day, who made his last supper on a woodchuck which
 his dog caught. He, too, has heard of Homer, and, "if it were not for
 books," would "not know what to do rainy days," though perhaps he has
 not read one wholly through for many rainy seasons. Some priest who
 could pronounce the Greek itself taught him to read his verse in the
 Testament in his native parish far away; and now I must translate to
 him, while he holds the book, Achilles' reproof to Patroclus for his sad
 countenance.--"Why are you in tears, Patroclus, like a young girl?"--
 
       "Or have you alone heard some news from Phthia?
        They say that Menoetius lives yet, son of Actor,
        And Peleus lives, son of Aacus, among the Myrmidons,
        Either of whom having died, we should greatly grieve."
 
 He says, "That's good." He has a great bundle of white oak bark under
 his arm for a sick man, gathered this Sunday morning. "I suppose there's
 no harm in going after such a thing to-day," says he. To him Homer was a
 great writer, though what his writing was about he did not know. A more
 simple and natural man it would be hard to find. Vice and disease, which
 cast such a sombre moral hue over the world, seemed to have hardly any
 existence for him. He was about twenty-eight years old, and had left
 Canada and his father's house a dozen years before to work in the
 States, and earn money to buy a farm with at last, perhaps in his native
 country. He was cast in the coarsest mould; a stout but sluggish body,
 yet gracefully carried, with a thick sunburnt neck, dark bushy hair, and
 dull sleepy blue eyes, which were occasionally lit up with expression.
 He wore a flat gray cloth cap, a dingy wool-colored greatcoat, and
 cowhide boots. He was a great consumer of meat, usually carrying his
 dinner to his work a couple of miles past my house--for he chopped all
 summer--in a tin pail; cold meats, often cold woodchucks, and coffee in
 a stone bottle which dangled by a string from his belt; and sometimes he
 offered me a drink. He came along early, crossing my bean-field, though
 without anxiety or haste to get to his work, such as Yankees exhibit.
 He wasn't a-going to hurt himself. He didn't care if he only earned his
 board. Frequently he would leave his dinner in the bushes, when his
 dog had caught a woodchuck by the way, and go back a mile and a half to
 dress it and leave it in the cellar of the house where he boarded, after
 deliberating first for half an hour whether he could not sink it in the
 pond safely till nightfall--loving to dwell long upon these themes. He
 would say, as he went by in the morning, "How thick the pigeons are! If
 working every day were not my trade, I could get all the meat I should
 want by hunting-pigeons, woodchucks, rabbits, partridges--by gosh! I
 could get all I should want for a week in one day."
 
 He was a skilful chopper, and indulged in some flourishes and ornaments
 in his art. He cut his trees level and close to the ground, that the
 sprouts which came up afterward might be more vigorous and a sled might
 slide over the stumps; and instead of leaving a whole tree to support
 his corded wood, he would pare it away to a slender stake or splinter
 which you could break off with your hand at last.
 
 He interested me because he was so quiet and solitary and so happy
 withal; a well of good humor and contentment which overflowed at his
 eyes. His mirth was without alloy. Sometimes I saw him at his work
 in the woods, felling trees, and he would greet me with a laugh of
 inexpressible satisfaction, and a salutation in Canadian French, though
 he spoke English as well. When I approached him he would suspend his
 work, and with half-suppressed mirth lie along the trunk of a pine which
 he had felled, and, peeling off the inner bark, roll it up into a ball
 and chew it while he laughed and talked. Such an exuberance of animal
 spirits had he that he sometimes tumbled down and rolled on the ground
 with laughter at anything which made him think and tickled him. Looking
 round upon the trees he would exclaim--"By George! I can enjoy myself
 well enough here chopping; I want no better sport." Sometimes, when at
 leisure, he amused himself all day in the woods with a pocket pistol,
 firing salutes to himself at regular intervals as he walked. In the
 winter he had a fire by which at noon he warmed his coffee in a kettle;
 and as he sat on a log to eat his dinner the chickadees would sometimes
 come round and alight on his arm and peck at the potato in his fingers;
 and he said that he "liked to have the little _fellers_ about him."
 
 In him the animal man chiefly was developed. In physical endurance and
 contentment he was cousin to the pine and the rock. I asked him once
 if he was not sometimes tired at night, after working all day; and he
 answered, with a sincere and serious look, "Gorrappit, I never was tired
 in my life." But the intellectual and what is called spiritual man in
 him were slumbering as in an infant. He had been instructed only in that
 innocent and ineffectual way in which the Catholic priests teach the
 aborigines, by which the pupil is never educated to the degree of
 consciousness, but only to the degree of trust and reverence, and a
 child is not made a man, but kept a child. When Nature made him, she
 gave him a strong body and contentment for his portion, and propped him
 on every side with reverence and reliance, that he might live out his
 threescore years and ten a child. He was so genuine and unsophisticated
 that no introduction would serve to introduce him, more than if you
 introduced a woodchuck to your neighbor. He had got to find him out as
 you did. He would not play any part. Men paid him wages for work, and
 so helped to feed and clothe him; but he never exchanged opinions with
 them. He was so simply and naturally humble--if he can be called humble
 who never aspires--that humility was no distinct quality in him, nor
 could he conceive of it. Wiser men were demigods to him. If you told
 him that such a one was coming, he did as if he thought that anything so
 grand would expect nothing of himself, but take all the responsibility
 on itself, and let him be forgotten still. He never heard the sound of
 praise. He particularly reverenced the writer and the preacher. Their
 performances were miracles. When I told him that I wrote considerably,
 he thought for a long time that it was merely the handwriting which I
 meant, for he could write a remarkably good hand himself. I sometimes
 found the name of his native parish handsomely written in the snow by
 the highway, with the proper French accent, and knew that he had passed.
 I asked him if he ever wished to write his thoughts. He said that he had
 read and written letters for those who could not, but he never tried to
 write thoughts--no, he could not, he could not tell what to put first,
 it would kill him, and then there was spelling to be attended to at the
 same time!
 
 I heard that a distinguished wise man and reformer asked him if he did
 not want the world to be changed; but he answered with a chuckle of
 surprise in his Canadian accent, not knowing that the question had ever
 been entertained before, "No, I like it well enough." It would have
 suggested many things to a philosopher to have dealings with him. To
 a stranger he appeared to know nothing of things in general; yet I
 sometimes saw in him a man whom I had not seen before, and I did not
 know whether he was as wise as Shakespeare or as simply ignorant as
 a child, whether to suspect him of a fine poetic consciousness or of
 stupidity. A townsman told me that when he met him sauntering through
 the village in his small close-fitting cap, and whistling to himself, he
 reminded him of a prince in disguise.
 
 His only books were an almanac and an arithmetic, in which last he was
 considerably expert. The former was a sort of cyclopaedia to him, which
 he supposed to contain an abstract of human knowledge, as indeed it does
 to a considerable extent. I loved to sound him on the various reforms
 of the day, and he never failed to look at them in the most simple and
 practical light. He had never heard of such things before. Could he do
 without factories? I asked. He had worn the home-made Vermont gray, he
 said, and that was good. Could he dispense with tea and coffee? Did this
 country afford any beverage beside water? He had soaked hemlock leaves
 in water and drank it, and thought that was better than water in warm
 weather. When I asked him if he could do without money, he showed the
 convenience of money in such a way as to suggest and coincide with the
 most philosophical accounts of the origin of this institution, and the
 very derivation of the word _pecunia_. If an ox were his property, and he
 wished to get needles and thread at the store, he thought it would be
 inconvenient and impossible soon to go on mortgaging some portion of
 the creature each time to that amount. He could defend many institutions
 better than any philosopher, because, in describing them as they
 concerned him, he gave the true reason for their prevalence, and
 speculation had not suggested to him any other. At another time, hearing
 Plato's definition of a man--a biped without feathers--and that one
 exhibited a cock plucked and called it Plato's man, he thought it
 an important difference that the _knees_ bent the wrong way. He would
 sometimes exclaim, "How I love to talk! By George, I could talk all
 day!" I asked him once, when I had not seen him for many months, if he
 had got a new idea this summer. "Good Lord"--said he, "a man that has
 to work as I do, if he does not forget the ideas he has had, he will do
 well. May be the man you hoe with is inclined to race; then, by gorry,
 your mind must be there; you think of weeds." He would sometimes ask me
 first on such occasions, if I had made any improvement. One winter day I
 asked him if he was always satisfied with himself, wishing to suggest a
 substitute within him for the priest without, and some higher motive for
 living. "Satisfied!" said he; "some men are satisfied with one thing,
 and some with another. One man, perhaps, if he has got enough, will be
 satisfied to sit all day with his back to the fire and his belly to the
 table, by George!" Yet I never, by any manoeuvring, could get him to
 take the spiritual view of things; the highest that he appeared to
 conceive of was a simple expediency, such as you might expect an
 animal to appreciate; and this, practically, is true of most men. If
 I suggested any improvement in his mode of life, he merely answered,
 without expressing any regret, that it was too late. Yet he thoroughly
 believed in honesty and the like virtues.
 
 There was a certain positive originality, however slight, to be detected
 in him, and I occasionally observed that he was thinking for himself and
 expressing his own opinion, a phenomenon so rare that I would any day
 walk ten miles to observe it, and it amounted to the re-origination of
 many of the institutions of society. Though he hesitated, and perhaps
 failed to express himself distinctly, he always had a presentable
 thought behind. Yet his thinking was so primitive and immersed in his
 animal life, that, though more promising than a merely learned man's,
 it rarely ripened to anything which can be reported. He suggested that
 there might be men of genius in the lowest grades of life, however
 permanently humble and illiterate, who take their own view always, or do
 not pretend to see at all; who are as bottomless even as Walden Pond was
 thought to be, though they may be dark and muddy.
 
 Many a traveller came out of his way to see me and the inside of my
 house, and, as an excuse for calling, asked for a glass of water. I told
 them that I drank at the pond, and pointed thither, offering to lend
 them a dipper. Far off as I lived, I was not exempted from the annual
 visitation which occurs, methinks, about the first of April, when
 everybody is on the move; and I had my share of good luck, though there
 were some curious specimens among my visitors. Half-witted men from the
 almshouse and elsewhere came to see me; but I endeavored to make them
 exercise all the wit they had, and make their confessions to me; in such
 cases making wit the theme of our conversation; and so was compensated.
 Indeed, I found some of them to be wiser than the so-called _overseers_
 of the poor and selectmen of the town, and thought it was time that the
 tables were turned. With respect to wit, I learned that there was not
 much difference between the half and the whole. One day, in particular,
 an inoffensive, simple-minded pauper, whom with others I had often seen
 used as fencing stuff, standing or sitting on a bushel in the fields to
 keep cattle and himself from straying, visited me, and expressed a wish
 to live as I did. He told me, with the utmost simplicity and truth,
 quite superior, or rather _inferior_, to anything that is called humility,
 that he was "deficient in intellect." These were his words. The Lord
 had made him so, yet he supposed the Lord cared as much for him as for
 another. "I have always been so," said he, "from my childhood; I never
 had much mind; I was not like other children; I am weak in the head. It
 was the Lord's will, I suppose." And there he was to prove the truth
 of his words. He was a metaphysical puzzle to me. I have rarely met a
 fellowman on such promising ground--it was so simple and sincere and so
 true all that he said. And, true enough, in proportion as he appeared
 to humble himself was he exalted. I did not know at first but it was the
 result of a wise policy. It seemed that from such a basis of truth and
 frankness as the poor weak-headed pauper had laid, our intercourse might
 go forward to something better than the intercourse of sages.
 
 I had some guests from those not reckoned commonly among the town's
 poor, but who should be; who are among the world's poor, at any rate;
 guests who appeal, not to your hospitality, but to your _hospitalality_;
 who earnestly wish to be helped, and preface their appeal with the
 information that they are resolved, for one thing, never to help
 themselves. I require of a visitor that he be not actually starving,
 though he may have the very best appetite in the world, however he got
 it. Objects of charity are not guests. Men who did not know when their
 visit had terminated, though I went about my business again, answering
 them from greater and greater remoteness. Men of almost every degree of
 wit called on me in the migrating season. Some who had more wits than
 they knew what to do with; runaway slaves with plantation manners, who
 listened from time to time, like the fox in the fable, as if they heard
 the hounds a-baying on their track, and looked at me beseechingly, as
 much as to say,--
 
            "O Christian, will you send me back?
 
 One real runaway slave, among the rest, whom I helped to forward toward
 the north star. Men of one idea, like a hen with one chicken, and that
 a duckling; men of a thousand ideas, and unkempt heads, like those hens
 which are made to take charge of a hundred chickens, all in pursuit
 of one bug, a score of them lost in every morning's dew--and become
 frizzled and mangy in consequence; men of ideas instead of legs, a sort
 of intellectual centipede that made you crawl all over. One man proposed
 a book in which visitors should write their names, as at the White
 Mountains; but, alas! I have too good a memory to make that necessary.
 
 I could not but notice some of the peculiarities of my visitors. Girls
 and boys and young women generally seemed glad to be in the woods. They
 looked in the pond and at the flowers, and improved their time. Men of
 business, even farmers, thought only of solitude and employment, and of
 the great distance at which I dwelt from something or other; and though
 they said that they loved a ramble in the woods occasionally, it was
 obvious that they did not. Restless committed men, whose time was an
 taken up in getting a living or keeping it; ministers who spoke of God
 as if they enjoyed a monopoly of the subject, who could not bear all
 kinds of opinions; doctors, lawyers, uneasy housekeepers who pried
 into my cupboard and bed when I was out--how came Mrs.--to know that my
 sheets were not as clean as hers?--young men who had ceased to be young,
 and had concluded that it was safest to follow the beaten track of the
 professions--all these generally said that it was not possible to do so
 much good in my position. Ay! there was the rub. The old and infirm and
 the timid, of whatever age or sex, thought most of sickness, and sudden
 accident and death; to them life seemed full of danger--what danger is
 there if you don't think of any?--and they thought that a prudent man
 would carefully select the safest position, where Dr. B. might be
 on hand at a moment's warning. To them the village was literally a
 _com-munity_, a league for mutual defence, and you would suppose that they
 would not go a-huckleberrying without a medicine chest. The amount of
 it is, if a man is alive, there is always danger that he may die,
 though the danger must be allowed to be less in proportion as he is
 dead-and-alive to begin with. A man sits as many risks as he runs.
 Finally, there were the self-styled reformers, the greatest bores of
 all, who thought that I was forever singing,--
 
        This is the house that I built;
        This is the man that lives in the house that I built;
 
 but they did not know that the third line was,
 
               These are the folks that worry the man
               That lives in the house that I built.
 
 I did not fear the hen-harriers, for I kept no chickens; but I feared
 the men-harriers rather.
 
 I had more cheering visitors than the last. Children come a-berrying,
 railroad men taking a Sunday morning walk in clean shirts, fishermen and
 hunters, poets and philosophers; in short, all honest pilgrims, who came
 out to the woods for freedom's sake, and really left the village behind,
 I was ready to greet with--"Welcome, Englishmen! welcome, Englishmen!"
 for I had had communication with that race.
 
 
 
 
 The Bean-Field
 
 
 Meanwhile my beans, the length of whose rows, added together, was seven
 miles already planted, were impatient to be hoed, for the earliest had
 grown considerably before the latest were in the ground; indeed they
 were not easily to be put off. What was the meaning of this so steady
 and self-respecting, this small Herculean labor, I knew not. I came to
 love my rows, my beans, though so many more than I wanted. They attached
 me to the earth, and so I got strength like Antaeus. But why should I
 raise them? Only Heaven knows. This was my curious labor all summer--to
 make this portion of the earth's surface, which had yielded only
 cinquefoil, blackberries, johnswort, and the like, before, sweet wild
 fruits and pleasant flowers, produce instead this pulse. What shall I
 learn of beans or beans of me? I cherish them, I hoe them, early and
 late I have an eye to them; and this is my day's work. It is a fine
 broad leaf to look on. My auxiliaries are the dews and rains which water
 this dry soil, and what fertility is in the soil itself, which for the
 most part is lean and effete. My enemies are worms, cool days, and most
 of all woodchucks. The last have nibbled for me a quarter of an acre
 clean. But what right had I to oust johnswort and the rest, and break
 up their ancient herb garden? Soon, however, the remaining beans will be
 too tough for them, and go forward to meet new foes.
 
 When I was four years old, as I well remember, I was brought from Boston
 to this my native town, through these very woods and this field, to
 the pond. It is one of the oldest scenes stamped on my memory. And now
 to-night my flute has waked the echoes over that very water. The pines
 still stand here older than I; or, if some have fallen, I have cooked
 my supper with their stumps, and a new growth is rising all around,
 preparing another aspect for new infant eyes. Almost the same johnswort
 springs from the same perennial root in this pasture, and even I have at
 length helped to clothe that fabulous landscape of my infant dreams, and
 one of the results of my presence and influence is seen in these bean
 leaves, corn blades, and potato vines.
 
 I planted about two acres and a half of upland; and as it was only about
 fifteen years since the land was cleared, and I myself had got out
 two or three cords of stumps, I did not give it any manure; but in the
 course of the summer it appeared by the arrowheads which I turned up in
 hoeing, that an extinct nation had anciently dwelt here and planted corn
 and beans ere white men came to clear the land, and so, to some extent,
 had exhausted the soil for this very crop.
 
 Before yet any woodchuck or squirrel had run across the road, or the
 sun had got above the shrub oaks, while all the dew was on, though the
 farmers warned me against it--I would advise you to do all your work
 if possible while the dew is on--I began to level the ranks of haughty
 weeds in my bean-field and throw dust upon their heads. Early in the
 morning I worked barefooted, dabbling like a plastic artist in the dewy
 and crumbling sand, but later in the day the sun blistered my feet.
 There the sun lighted me to hoe beans, pacing slowly backward and
 forward over that yellow gravelly upland, between the long green rows,
 fifteen rods, the one end terminating in a shrub oak copse where I
 could rest in the shade, the other in a blackberry field where the
 green berries deepened their tints by the time I had made another
 bout. Removing the weeds, putting fresh soil about the bean stems, and
 encouraging this weed which I had sown, making the yellow soil express
 its summer thought in bean leaves and blossoms rather than in wormwood
 and piper and millet grass, making the earth say beans instead of
 grass--this was my daily work. As I had little aid from horses or
 cattle, or hired men or boys, or improved implements of husbandry, I was
 much slower, and became much more intimate with my beans than usual.
 But labor of the hands, even when pursued to the verge of drudgery,
 is perhaps never the worst form of idleness. It has a constant and
 imperishable moral, and to the scholar it yields a classic result. A
 very _agricola laboriosus_ was I to travellers bound westward through
 Lincoln and Wayland to nobody knows where; they sitting at their ease in
 gigs, with elbows on knees, and reins loosely hanging in festoons; I the
 home-staying, laborious native of the soil. But soon my homestead was
 out of their sight and thought. It was the only open and cultivated
 field for a great distance on either side of the road, so they made the
 most of it; and sometimes the man in the field heard more of travellers'
 gossip and comment than was meant for his ear: "Beans so late! peas
 so late!"--for I continued to plant when others had begun to hoe--the
 ministerial husbandman had not suspected it. "Corn, my boy, for fodder;
 corn for fodder." "Does he _live_ there?" asks the black bonnet of the
 gray coat; and the hard-featured farmer reins up his grateful dobbin to
 inquire what you are doing where he sees no manure in the furrow, and
 recommends a little chip dirt, or any little waste stuff, or it may be
 ashes or plaster. But here were two acres and a half of furrows, and
 only a hoe for cart and two hands to draw it--there being an aversion
 to other carts and horses--and chip dirt far away. Fellow-travellers as
 they rattled by compared it aloud with the fields which they had passed,
 so that I came to know how I stood in the agricultural world. This was
 one field not in Mr. Coleman's report. And, by the way, who estimates
 the value of the crop which nature yields in the still wilder fields
 unimproved by man? The crop of _English_ hay is carefully weighed, the
 moisture calculated, the silicates and the potash; but in all dells and
 pond-holes in the woods and pastures and swamps grows a rich and various
 crop only unreaped by man. Mine was, as it were, the connecting link
 between wild and cultivated fields; as some states are civilized, and
 others half-civilized, and others savage or barbarous, so my field was,
 though not in a bad sense, a half-cultivated field. They were
 beans cheerfully returning to their wild and primitive state that I
 cultivated, and my hoe played the _Ranz des Vaches_ for them.
 
 Near at hand, upon the topmost spray of a birch, sings the brown
 thrasher--or red mavis, as some love to call him--all the morning, glad
 of your society, that would find out another farmer's field if yours
 were not here. While you are planting the seed, he cries--"Drop it, drop
 it--cover it up, cover it up--pull it up, pull it up, pull it up." But
 this was not corn, and so it was safe from such enemies as he. You may
 wonder what his rigmarole, his amateur Paganini performances on one
 string or on twenty, have to do with your planting, and yet prefer it to
 leached ashes or plaster. It was a cheap sort of top dressing in which I
 had entire faith.
 
 As I drew a still fresher soil about the rows with my hoe, I disturbed
 the ashes of unchronicled nations who in primeval years lived under
 these heavens, and their small implements of war and hunting were
 brought to the light of this modern day. They lay mingled with other
 natural stones, some of which bore the marks of having been burned by
 Indian fires, and some by the sun, and also bits of pottery and glass
 brought hither by the recent cultivators of the soil. When my hoe
 tinkled against the stones, that music echoed to the woods and the
 sky, and was an accompaniment to my labor which yielded an instant and
 immeasurable crop. It was no longer beans that I hoed, nor I that hoed
 beans; and I remembered with as much pity as pride, if I remembered at
 all, my acquaintances who had gone to the city to attend the oratorios.
 The nighthawk circled overhead in the sunny afternoons--for I sometimes
 made a day of it--like a mote in the eye, or in heaven's eye, falling
 from time to time with a swoop and a sound as if the heavens were rent,
 torn at last to very rags and tatters, and yet a seamless cope remained;
 small imps that fill the air and lay their eggs on the ground on bare
 sand or rocks on the tops of hills, where few have found them; graceful
 and slender like ripples caught up from the pond, as leaves are raised
 by the wind to float in the heavens; such kindredship is in nature.
 The hawk is aerial brother of the wave which he sails over and surveys,
 those his perfect air-inflated wings answering to the elemental
 unfledged pinions of the sea. Or sometimes I watched a pair of
 hen-hawks circling high in the sky, alternately soaring and descending,
 approaching, and leaving one another, as if they were the embodiment of
 my own thoughts. Or I was attracted by the passage of wild pigeons from
 this wood to that, with a slight quivering winnowing sound and carrier
 haste; or from under a rotten stump my hoe turned up a sluggish
 portentous and outlandish spotted salamander, a trace of Egypt and
 the Nile, yet our contemporary. When I paused to lean on my hoe, these
 sounds and sights I heard and saw anywhere in the row, a part of the
 inexhaustible entertainment which the country offers.
 
 On gala days the town fires its great guns, which echo like popguns to
 these woods, and some waifs of martial music occasionally penetrate thus
 far. To me, away there in my bean-field at the other end of the town,
 the big guns sounded as if a puffball had burst; and when there was a
 military turnout of which I was ignorant, I have sometimes had a vague
 sense all the day of some sort of itching and disease in the horizon,
 as if some eruption would break out there soon, either scarlatina or
 canker-rash, until at length some more favorable puff of wind, making
 haste over the fields and up the Wayland road, brought me information of
 the "trainers." It seemed by the distant hum as if somebody's bees had
 swarmed, and that the neighbors, according to Virgil's advice, by a
 faint _tintinnabulum_ upon the most sonorous of their domestic utensils,
 were endeavoring to call them down into the hive again. And when the
 sound died quite away, and the hum had ceased, and the most favorable
 breezes told no tale, I knew that they had got the last drone of them
 all safely into the Middlesex hive, and that now their minds were bent
 on the honey with which it was smeared.
 
 I felt proud to know that the liberties of Massachusetts and of our
 fatherland were in such safe keeping; and as I turned to my hoeing again
 I was filled with an inexpressible confidence, and pursued my labor
 cheerfully with a calm trust in the future.
 
 When there were several bands of musicians, it sounded as if all the
 village was a vast bellows and all the buildings expanded and collapsed
 alternately with a din. But sometimes it was a really noble and
 inspiring strain that reached these woods, and the trumpet that sings
 of fame, and I felt as if I could spit a Mexican with a good relish--for
 why should we always stand for trifles?--and looked round for a
 woodchuck or a skunk to exercise my chivalry upon. These martial strains
 seemed as far away as Palestine, and reminded me of a march of crusaders
 in the horizon, with a slight tantivy and tremulous motion of the elm
 tree tops which overhang the village. This was one of the _great_ days;
 though the sky had from my clearing only the same everlastingly great
 look that it wears daily, and I saw no difference in it.
 
 It was a singular experience that long acquaintance which I cultivated
 with beans, what with planting, and hoeing, and harvesting, and
 threshing, and picking over and selling them--the last was the hardest
 of all--I might add eating, for I did taste. I was determined to know
 beans. When they were growing, I used to hoe from five o'clock in the
 morning till noon, and commonly spent the rest of the day about other
 affairs. Consider the intimate and curious acquaintance one makes with
 various kinds of weeds--it will bear some iteration in the account, for
 there was no little iteration in the labor--disturbing their delicate
 organizations so ruthlessly, and making such invidious distinctions
 with his hoe, levelling whole ranks of one species, and sedulously
 cultivating another. That's Roman wormwood--that's pigweed--that's
 sorrel--that's piper-grass--have at him, chop him up, turn his roots
 upward to the sun, don't let him have a fibre in the shade, if you do
 he'll turn himself t' other side up and be as green as a leek in two
 days. A long war, not with cranes, but with weeds, those Trojans who
 had sun and rain and dews on their side. Daily the beans saw me come
 to their rescue armed with a hoe, and thin the ranks of their enemies,
 filling up the trenches with weedy dead. Many a lusty crest--waving
 Hector, that towered a whole foot above his crowding comrades, fell
 before my weapon and rolled in the dust.
 
 Those summer days which some of my contemporaries devoted to the fine
 arts in Boston or Rome, and others to contemplation in India, and others
 to trade in London or New York, I thus, with the other farmers of New
 England, devoted to husbandry. Not that I wanted beans to eat, for I
 am by nature a Pythagorean, so far as beans are concerned, whether they
 mean porridge or voting, and exchanged them for rice; but, perchance, as
 some must work in fields if only for the sake of tropes and expression,
 to serve a parable-maker one day. It was on the whole a rare amusement,
 which, continued too long, might have become a dissipation. Though I
 gave them no manure, and did not hoe them all once, I hoed them unusually
 well as far as I went, and was paid for it in the end, "there being in
 truth," as Evelyn says, "no compost or laetation whatsoever comparable
 to this continual motion, repastination, and turning of the mould with
 the spade." "The earth," he adds elsewhere, "especially if fresh, has a
 certain magnetism in it, by which it attracts the salt, power, or virtue
 (call it either) which gives it life, and is the logic of all the labor
 and stir we keep about it, to sustain us; all dungings and other sordid
 temperings being but the vicars succedaneous to this improvement."
 Moreover, this being one of those "worn-out and exhausted lay fields
 which enjoy their sabbath," had perchance, as Sir Kenelm Digby thinks
 likely, attracted "vital spirits" from the air. I harvested twelve
 bushels of beans.
 
 But to be more particular, for it is complained that Mr. Coleman has
 reported chiefly the expensive experiments of gentlemen farmers, my
 outgoes were,--
 
     For a hoe................................... $ 0.54
     Plowing, harrowing, and furrowing............  7.50  Too much.
     Beans for seed...............................  3.12-1/2
     Potatoes for seed............................  1.33
     Peas for seed................................  0.40
     Turnip seed..................................  0.06
     White line for crow fence....................  0.02
     Horse cultivator and boy three hours.........  1.00
     Horse and cart to get crop...................  0.75
                                                 --------
         In all.................................. $14.72-1/2
 
 My income was (patrem familias vendacem, non emacem esse oportet), from
 
     Nine bushels and twelve quarts of beans sold.. $16.94
     Five    "    large potatoes..................... 2.50
     Nine    "    small.............................. 2.25
     Grass........................................... 1.00
     Stalks.......................................... 0.75
                                                   --------
         In all.................................... $23.44
     Leaving a pecuniary profit,
         as I have elsewhere said, of.............. $8.71-1/2
 
 This is the result of my experience in raising beans: Plant the common
 small white bush bean about the first of June, in rows three feet by
 eighteen inches apart, being careful to select fresh round and unmixed
 seed. First look out for worms, and supply vacancies by planting anew.
 Then look out for woodchucks, if it is an exposed place, for they will
 nibble off the earliest tender leaves almost clean as they go; and
 again, when the young tendrils make their appearance, they have notice
 of it, and will shear them off with both buds and young pods, sitting
 erect like a squirrel. But above all harvest as early as possible, if
 you would escape frosts and have a fair and salable crop; you may save
 much loss by this means.
 
 This further experience also I gained: I said to myself, I will not
 plant beans and corn with so much industry another summer, but such
 seeds, if the seed is not lost, as sincerity, truth, simplicity, faith,
 innocence, and the like, and see if they will not grow in this soil,
 even with less toil and manurance, and sustain me, for surely it has
 not been exhausted for these crops. Alas! I said this to myself; but now
 another summer is gone, and another, and another, and I am obliged to
 say to you, Reader, that the seeds which I planted, if indeed they _were_
 the seeds of those virtues, were wormeaten or had lost their vitality,
 and so did not come up. Commonly men will only be brave as their fathers
 were brave, or timid. This generation is very sure to plant corn and
 beans each new year precisely as the Indians did centuries ago and
 taught the first settlers to do, as if there were a fate in it. I saw an
 old man the other day, to my astonishment, making the holes with a hoe
 for the seventieth time at least, and not for himself to lie down in!
 But why should not the New Englander try new adventures, and not lay
 so much stress on his grain, his potato and grass crop, and his
 orchards--raise other crops than these? Why concern ourselves so much
 about our beans for seed, and not be concerned at all about a new
 generation of men? We should really be fed and cheered if when we met a
 man we were sure to see that some of the qualities which I have named,
 which we all prize more than those other productions, but which are
 for the most part broadcast and floating in the air, had taken root
 and grown in him. Here comes such a subtile and ineffable quality,
 for instance, as truth or justice, though the slightest amount or new
 variety of it, along the road. Our ambassadors should be instructed to
 send home such seeds as these, and Congress help to distribute them over
 all the land. We should never stand upon ceremony with sincerity. We
 should never cheat and insult and banish one another by our meanness, if
 there were present the kernel of worth and friendliness. We should not
 meet thus in haste. Most men I do not meet at all, for they seem not to
 have time; they are busy about their beans. We would not deal with a man
 thus plodding ever, leaning on a hoe or a spade as a staff between his
 work, not as a mushroom, but partially risen out of the earth, something
 more than erect, like swallows alighted and walking on the ground:--
 
         "And as he spake, his wings would now and then
          Spread, as he meant to fly, then close again--"
 
 so that we should suspect that we might be conversing with an angel.
 Bread may not always nourish us; but it always does us good, it even
 takes stiffness out of our joints, and makes us supple and buoyant, when
 we knew not what ailed us, to recognize any generosity in man or Nature,
 to share any unmixed and heroic joy.
 
 Ancient poetry and mythology suggest, at least, that husbandry was once
 a sacred art; but it is pursued with irreverent haste and heedlessness
 by us, our object being to have large farms and large crops merely.
 We have no festival, nor procession, nor ceremony, not excepting our
 cattle-shows and so-called Thanksgivings, by which the farmer expresses
 a sense of the sacredness of his calling, or is reminded of its sacred
 origin. It is the premium and the feast which tempt him. He sacrifices
 not to Ceres and the Terrestrial Jove, but to the infernal Plutus
 rather. By avarice and selfishness, and a grovelling habit, from which
 none of us is free, of regarding the soil as property, or the means
 of acquiring property chiefly, the landscape is deformed, husbandry is
 degraded with us, and the farmer leads the meanest of lives. He knows
 Nature but as a robber. Cato says that the profits of agriculture are
 particularly pious or just (_maximeque pius quaestus_), and according
 to Varro the old Romans "called the same earth Mother and Ceres, and
 thought that they who cultivated it led a pious and useful life, and
 that they alone were left of the race of King Saturn."
 
 We are wont to forget that the sun looks on our cultivated fields and
 on the prairies and forests without distinction. They all reflect and
 absorb his rays alike, and the former make but a small part of the
 glorious picture which he beholds in his daily course. In his view
 the earth is all equally cultivated like a garden. Therefore we should
 receive the benefit of his light and heat with a corresponding trust and
 magnanimity. What though I value the seed of these beans, and harvest
 that in the fall of the year? This broad field which I have looked at
 so long looks not to me as the principal cultivator, but away from me to
 influences more genial to it, which water and make it green. These
 beans have results which are not harvested by me. Do they not grow for
 woodchucks partly? The ear of wheat (in Latin _spica_, obsoletely _speca_,
 from _spe_, hope) should not be the only hope of the husbandman; its
 kernel or grain (_granum_ from _gerendo_, bearing) is not all that it
 bears. How, then, can our harvest fail? Shall I not rejoice also at
 the abundance of the weeds whose seeds are the granary of the birds? It
 matters little comparatively whether the fields fill the farmer's barns.
 The true husbandman will cease from anxiety, as the squirrels manifest
 no concern whether the woods will bear chestnuts this year or not, and
 finish his labor with every day, relinquishing all claim to the produce
 of his fields, and sacrificing in his mind not only his first but his
 last fruits also.
 
 
 
 
 The Village
 
 
 After hoeing, or perhaps reading and writing, in the forenoon, I usually
 bathed again in the pond, swimming across one of its coves for a stint,
 and washed the dust of labor from my person, or smoothed out the last
 wrinkle which study had made, and for the afternoon was absolutely free.
 Every day or two I strolled to the village to hear some of the gossip
 which is incessantly going on there, circulating either from mouth to
 mouth, or from newspaper to newspaper, and which, taken in homoeopathic
 doses, was really as refreshing in its way as the rustle of leaves and
 the peeping of frogs. As I walked in the woods to see the birds and
 squirrels, so I walked in the village to see the men and boys; instead
 of the wind among the pines I heard the carts rattle. In one direction
 from my house there was a colony of muskrats in the river meadows; under
 the grove of elms and buttonwoods in the other horizon was a village
 of busy men, as curious to me as if they had been prairie-dogs, each
 sitting at the mouth of its burrow, or running over to a neighbor's to
 gossip. I went there frequently to observe their habits. The village
 appeared to me a great news room; and on one side, to support it, as
 once at Redding & Company's on State Street, they kept nuts and raisins,
 or salt and meal and other groceries. Some have such a vast appetite
 for the former commodity, that is, the news, and such sound digestive
 organs, that they can sit forever in public avenues without stirring,
 and let it simmer and whisper through them like the Etesian winds, or
 as if inhaling ether, it only producing numbness and insensibility to
 pain--otherwise it would often be painful to bear--without affecting the
 consciousness. I hardly ever failed, when I rambled through the village,
 to see a row of such worthies, either sitting on a ladder sunning
 themselves, with their bodies inclined forward and their eyes glancing
 along the line this way and that, from time to time, with a voluptuous
 expression, or else leaning against a barn with their hands in their
 pockets, like caryatides, as if to prop it up. They, being commonly out
 of doors, heard whatever was in the wind. These are the coarsest mills,
 in which all gossip is first rudely digested or cracked up before it is
 emptied into finer and more delicate hoppers within doors. I observed
 that the vitals of the village were the grocery, the bar-room, the
 post-office, and the bank; and, as a necessary part of the machinery,
 they kept a bell, a big gun, and a fire-engine, at convenient places;
 and the houses were so arranged as to make the most of mankind, in
 lanes and fronting one another, so that every traveller had to run the
 gauntlet, and every man, woman, and child might get a lick at him. Of
 course, those who were stationed nearest to the head of the line, where
 they could most see and be seen, and have the first blow at him, paid
 the highest prices for their places; and the few straggling inhabitants
 in the outskirts, where long gaps in the line began to occur, and the
 traveller could get over walls or turn aside into cow-paths, and so
 escape, paid a very slight ground or window tax. Signs were hung out
 on all sides to allure him; some to catch him by the appetite, as the
 tavern and victualling cellar; some by the fancy, as the dry goods store
 and the jeweller's; and others by the hair or the feet or the skirts,
 as the barber, the shoemaker, or the tailor. Besides, there was a still
 more terrible standing invitation to call at every one of these houses,
 and company expected about these times. For the most part I escaped
 wonderfully from these dangers, either by proceeding at once boldly and
 without deliberation to the goal, as is recommended to those who run the
 gauntlet, or by keeping my thoughts on high things, like Orpheus, who,
 "loudly singing the praises of the gods to his lyre, drowned the voices
 of the Sirens, and kept out of danger." Sometimes I bolted suddenly,
 and nobody could tell my whereabouts, for I did not stand much about
 gracefulness, and never hesitated at a gap in a fence. I was even
 accustomed to make an irruption into some houses, where I was well
 entertained, and after learning the kernels and very last sieveful of
 news--what had subsided, the prospects of war and peace, and whether the
 world was likely to hold together much longer--I was let out through the
 rear avenues, and so escaped to the woods again.
 
 It was very pleasant, when I stayed late in town, to launch myself into
 the night, especially if it was dark and tempestuous, and set sail from
 some bright village parlor or lecture room, with a bag of rye or Indian
 meal upon my shoulder, for my snug harbor in the woods, having made all
 tight without and withdrawn under hatches with a merry crew of thoughts,
 leaving only my outer man at the helm, or even tying up the helm when it
 was plain sailing. I had many a genial thought by the cabin fire "as I
 sailed." I was never cast away nor distressed in any weather, though
 I encountered some severe storms. It is darker in the woods, even in
 common nights, than most suppose. I frequently had to look up at the
 opening between the trees above the path in order to learn my route,
 and, where there was no cart-path, to feel with my feet the faint track
 which I had worn, or steer by the known relation of particular trees
 which I felt with my hands, passing between two pines for instance, not
 more than eighteen inches apart, in the midst of the woods, invariably,
 in the darkest night. Sometimes, after coming home thus late in a dark
 and muggy night, when my feet felt the path which my eyes could not see,
 dreaming and absent-minded all the way, until I was aroused by having to
 raise my hand to lift the latch, I have not been able to recall a single
 step of my walk, and I have thought that perhaps my body would find its
 way home if its master should forsake it, as the hand finds its way to
 the mouth without assistance. Several times, when a visitor chanced to
 stay into evening, and it proved a dark night, I was obliged to conduct
 him to the cart-path in the rear of the house, and then point out to him
 the direction he was to pursue, and in keeping which he was to be guided
 rather by his feet than his eyes. One very dark night I directed thus
 on their way two young men who had been fishing in the pond. They lived
 about a mile off through the woods, and were quite used to the route.
 A day or two after one of them told me that they wandered about the
 greater part of the night, close by their own premises, and did not get
 home till toward morning, by which time, as there had been several
 heavy showers in the meanwhile, and the leaves were very wet, they were
 drenched to their skins. I have heard of many going astray even in the
 village streets, when the darkness was so thick that you could cut it
 with a knife, as the saying is. Some who live in the outskirts, having
 come to town a-shopping in their wagons, have been obliged to put up for
 the night; and gentlemen and ladies making a call have gone half a mile
 out of their way, feeling the sidewalk only with their feet, and not
 knowing when they turned. It is a surprising and memorable, as well
 as valuable experience, to be lost in the woods any time. Often in a
 snow-storm, even by day, one will come out upon a well-known road and
 yet find it impossible to tell which way leads to the village. Though he
 knows that he has travelled it a thousand times, he cannot recognize
 a feature in it, but it is as strange to him as if it were a road in
 Siberia. By night, of course, the perplexity is infinitely greater.
 In our most trivial walks, we are constantly, though unconsciously,
 steering like pilots by certain well-known beacons and headlands, and if
 we go beyond our usual course we still carry in our minds the bearing
 of some neighboring cape; and not till we are completely lost, or turned
 round--for a man needs only to be turned round once with his eyes shut
 in this world to be lost--do we appreciate the vastness and strangeness
 of nature. Every man has to learn the points of compass again as often
 as he awakes, whether from sleep or any abstraction. Not till we are
 lost, in other words not till we have lost the world, do we begin to
 find ourselves, and realize where we are and the infinite extent of our
 relations.
 
 One afternoon, near the end of the first summer, when I went to the
 village to get a shoe from the cobbler's, I was seized and put into
 jail, because, as I have elsewhere related, I did not pay a tax to, or
 recognize the authority of, the State which buys and sells men, women,
 and children, like cattle, at the door of its senate-house. I had gone
 down to the woods for other purposes. But, wherever a man goes, men
 will pursue and paw him with their dirty institutions, and, if they can,
 constrain him to belong to their desperate odd-fellow society. It is
 true, I might have resisted forcibly with more or less effect, might
 have run "amok" against society; but I preferred that society should run
 "amok" against me, it being the desperate party. However, I was released
 the next day, obtained my mended shoe, and returned to the woods in
 season to get my dinner of huckleberries on Fair Haven Hill. I was never
 molested by any person but those who represented the State. I had no
 lock nor bolt but for the desk which held my papers, not even a nail
 to put over my latch or windows. I never fastened my door night or day,
 though I was to be absent several days; not even when the next fall
 I spent a fortnight in the woods of Maine. And yet my house was more
 respected than if it had been surrounded by a file of soldiers. The
 tired rambler could rest and warm himself by my fire, the literary amuse
 himself with the few books on my table, or the curious, by opening my
 closet door, see what was left of my dinner, and what prospect I had of
 a supper. Yet, though many people of every class came this way to the
 pond, I suffered no serious inconvenience from these sources, and I
 never missed anything but one small book, a volume of Homer, which
 perhaps was improperly gilded, and this I trust a soldier of our camp
 has found by this time. I am convinced, that if all men were to live as
 simply as I then did, thieving and robbery would be unknown. These take
 place only in communities where some have got more than is sufficient
 while others have not enough. The Pope's Homers would soon get properly
 distributed.
 
                       "Nec bella fuerunt,
          Faginus astabat dum scyphus ante dapes."
 
                          "Nor wars did men molest,
          When only beechen bowls were in request."
 
 "You who govern public affairs, what need have you to employ
 punishments? Love virtue, and the people will be virtuous. The virtues
 of a superior man are like the wind; the virtues of a common man are
 like the grass--the grass, when the wind passes over it, bends."
 
 
 
 
 The Ponds
 
 
 Sometimes, having had a surfeit of human society and gossip, and worn
 out all my village friends, I rambled still farther westward than I
 habitually dwell, into yet more unfrequented parts of the town, "to
 fresh woods and pastures new," or, while the sun was setting, made my
 supper of huckleberries and blueberries on Fair Haven Hill, and laid up
 a store for several days. The fruits do not yield their true flavor to
 the purchaser of them, nor to him who raises them for the market. There
 is but one way to obtain it, yet few take that way. If you would know
 the flavor of huckleberries, ask the cowboy or the partridge. It is a
 vulgar error to suppose that you have tasted huckleberries who never
 plucked them. A huckleberry never reaches Boston; they have not been
 known there since they grew on her three hills. The ambrosial and
 essential part of the fruit is lost with the bloom which is rubbed off
 in the market cart, and they become mere provender. As long as Eternal
 Justice reigns, not one innocent huckleberry can be transported thither
 from the country's hills.
 
 Occasionally, after my hoeing was done for the day, I joined some
 impatient companion who had been fishing on the pond since morning,
 as silent and motionless as a duck or a floating leaf, and, after
 practising various kinds of philosophy, had concluded commonly, by the
 time I arrived, that he belonged to the ancient sect of CA|nobites.
 There was one older man, an excellent fisher and skilled in all kinds of
 woodcraft, who was pleased to look upon my house as a building erected
 for the convenience of fishermen; and I was equally pleased when he sat
 in my doorway to arrange his lines. Once in a while we sat together on
 the pond, he at one end of the boat, and I at the other; but not many
 words passed between us, for he had grown deaf in his later years, but
 he occasionally hummed a psalm, which harmonized well enough with my
 philosophy. Our intercourse was thus altogether one of unbroken harmony,
 far more pleasing to remember than if it had been carried on by speech.
 When, as was commonly the case, I had none to commune with, I used
 to raise the echoes by striking with a paddle on the side of my boat,
 filling the surrounding woods with circling and dilating sound, stirring
 them up as the keeper of a menagerie his wild beasts, until I elicited a
 growl from every wooded vale and hillside.
 
 In warm evenings I frequently sat in the boat playing the flute, and
 saw the perch, which I seem to have charmed, hovering around me, and
 the moon travelling over the ribbed bottom, which was strewed with the
 wrecks of the forest. Formerly I had come to this pond adventurously,
 from time to time, in dark summer nights, with a companion, and, making
 a fire close to the water's edge, which we thought attracted the fishes,
 we caught pouts with a bunch of worms strung on a thread, and when we
 had done, far in the night, threw the burning brands high into the air
 like skyrockets, which, coming down into the pond, were quenched with
 a loud hissing, and we were suddenly groping in total darkness. Through
 this, whistling a tune, we took our way to the haunts of men again. But
 now I had made my home by the shore.
 
 Sometimes, after staying in a village parlor till the family had all
 retired, I have returned to the woods, and, partly with a view to the
 next day's dinner, spent the hours of midnight fishing from a boat by
 moonlight, serenaded by owls and foxes, and hearing, from time to time,
 the creaking note of some unknown bird close at hand. These experiences
 were very memorable and valuable to me--anchored in forty feet of
 water, and twenty or thirty rods from the shore, surrounded sometimes
 by thousands of small perch and shiners, dimpling the surface with their
 tails in the moonlight, and communicating by a long flaxen line with
 mysterious nocturnal fishes which had their dwelling forty feet below,
 or sometimes dragging sixty feet of line about the pond as I drifted in
 the gentle night breeze, now and then feeling a slight vibration along
 it, indicative of some life prowling about its extremity, of dull
 uncertain blundering purpose there, and slow to make up its mind.
 At length you slowly raise, pulling hand over hand, some horned pout
 squeaking and squirming to the upper air. It was very queer, especially
 in dark nights, when your thoughts had wandered to vast and cosmogonal
 themes in other spheres, to feel this faint jerk, which came to
 interrupt your dreams and link you to Nature again. It seemed as if I
 might next cast my line upward into the air, as well as downward into
 this element, which was scarcely more dense. Thus I caught two fishes as
 it were with one hook.
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 The scenery of Walden is on a humble scale, and, though very beautiful,
 does not approach to grandeur, nor can it much concern one who has not
 long frequented it or lived by its shore; yet this pond is so remarkable
 for its depth and purity as to merit a particular description. It is
 a clear and deep green well, half a mile long and a mile and three
 quarters in circumference, and contains about sixty-one and a half
 acres; a perennial spring in the midst of pine and oak woods, without
 any visible inlet or outlet except by the clouds and evaporation. The
 surrounding hills rise abruptly from the water to the height of forty to
 eighty feet, though on the southeast and east they attain to about one
 hundred and one hundred and fifty feet respectively, within a quarter
 and a third of a mile. They are exclusively woodland. All our Concord
 waters have two colors at least; one when viewed at a distance, and
 another, more proper, close at hand. The first depends more on the
 light, and follows the sky. In clear weather, in summer, they appear
 blue at a little distance, especially if agitated, and at a great
 distance all appear alike. In stormy weather they are sometimes of a
 dark slate-color. The sea, however, is said to be blue one day and green
 another without any perceptible change in the atmosphere. I have seen
 our river, when, the landscape being covered with snow, both water and
 ice were almost as green as grass. Some consider blue "to be the color
 of pure water, whether liquid or solid." But, looking directly down into
 our waters from a boat, they are seen to be of very different colors.
 Walden is blue at one time and green at another, even from the same
 point of view. Lying between the earth and the heavens, it partakes of
 the color of both. Viewed from a hilltop it reflects the color of the
 sky; but near at hand it is of a yellowish tint next the shore where
 you can see the sand, then a light green, which gradually deepens to a
 uniform dark green in the body of the pond. In some lights, viewed
 even from a hilltop, it is of a vivid green next the shore. Some have
 referred this to the reflection of the verdure; but it is equally green
 there against the railroad sandbank, and in the spring, before the
 leaves are expanded, and it may be simply the result of the prevailing
 blue mixed with the yellow of the sand. Such is the color of its iris.
 This is that portion, also, where in the spring, the ice being warmed
 by the heat of the sun reflected from the bottom, and also transmitted
 through the earth, melts first and forms a narrow canal about the still
 frozen middle. Like the rest of our waters, when much agitated, in clear
 weather, so that the surface of the waves may reflect the sky at the
 right angle, or because there is more light mixed with it, it appears
 at a little distance of a darker blue than the sky itself; and at such
 a time, being on its surface, and looking with divided vision, so as to
 see the reflection, I have discerned a matchless and indescribable light
 blue, such as watered or changeable silks and sword blades suggest, more
 cerulean than the sky itself, alternating with the original dark green
 on the opposite sides of the waves, which last appeared but muddy in
 comparison. It is a vitreous greenish blue, as I remember it, like those
 patches of the winter sky seen through cloud vistas in the west before
 sundown. Yet a single glass of its water held up to the light is as
 colorless as an equal quantity of air. It is well known that a large
 plate of glass will have a green tint, owing, as the makers say, to its
 "body," but a small piece of the same will be colorless. How large a
 body of Walden water would be required to reflect a green tint I have
 never proved. The water of our river is black or a very dark brown to
 one looking directly down on it, and, like that of most ponds, imparts
 to the body of one bathing in it a yellowish tinge; but this water is
 of such crystalline purity that the body of the bather appears of an
 alabaster whiteness, still more unnatural, which, as the limbs are
 magnified and distorted withal, produces a monstrous effect, making fit
 studies for a Michael Angelo.
 
 The water is so transparent that the bottom can easily be discerned at
 the depth of twenty-five or thirty feet. Paddling over it, you may see,
 many feet beneath the surface, the schools of perch and shiners,
 perhaps only an inch long, yet the former easily distinguished by their
 transverse bars, and you think that they must be ascetic fish that find
 a subsistence there. Once, in the winter, many years ago, when I had
 been cutting holes through the ice in order to catch pickerel, as I
 stepped ashore I tossed my axe back on to the ice, but, as if some evil
 genius had directed it, it slid four or five rods directly into one of
 the holes, where the water was twenty-five feet deep. Out of curiosity,
 I lay down on the ice and looked through the hole, until I saw the axe
 a little on one side, standing on its head, with its helve erect and
 gently swaying to and fro with the pulse of the pond; and there it
 might have stood erect and swaying till in the course of time the handle
 rotted off, if I had not disturbed it. Making another hole directly over
 it with an ice chisel which I had, and cutting down the longest
 birch which I could find in the neighborhood with my knife, I made a
 slip-noose, which I attached to its end, and, letting it down carefully,
 passed it over the knob of the handle, and drew it by a line along the
 birch, and so pulled the axe out again.
 
 The shore is composed of a belt of smooth rounded white stones like
 paving-stones, excepting one or two short sand beaches, and is so steep
 that in many places a single leap will carry you into water over your
 head; and were it not for its remarkable transparency, that would be the
 last to be seen of its bottom till it rose on the opposite side. Some
 think it is bottomless. It is nowhere muddy, and a casual observer would
 say that there were no weeds at all in it; and of noticeable plants,
 except in the little meadows recently overflowed, which do not properly
 belong to it, a closer scrutiny does not detect a flag nor a bulrush,
 nor even a lily, yellow or white, but only a few small heart-leaves and
 potamogetons, and perhaps a water-target or two; all which however a
 bather might not perceive; and these plants are clean and bright like
 the element they grow in. The stones extend a rod or two into the water,
 and then the bottom is pure sand, except in the deepest parts, where
 there is usually a little sediment, probably from the decay of the
 leaves which have been wafted on to it so many successive falls, and a
 bright green weed is brought up on anchors even in midwinter.
 
 We have one other pond just like this, White Pond, in Nine Acre Corner,
 about two and a half miles westerly; but, though I am acquainted with
 most of the ponds within a dozen miles of this centre I do not know a
 third of this pure and well-like character. Successive nations perchance
 have drank at, admired, and fathomed it, and passed away, and still its
 water is green and pellucid as ever. Not an intermitting spring! Perhaps
 on that spring morning when Adam and Eve were driven out of Eden Walden
 Pond was already in existence, and even then breaking up in a gentle
 spring rain accompanied with mist and a southerly wind, and covered with
 myriads of ducks and geese, which had not heard of the fall, when still
 such pure lakes sufficed them. Even then it had commenced to rise and
 fall, and had clarified its waters and colored them of the hue they now
 wear, and obtained a patent of Heaven to be the only Walden Pond in
 the world and distiller of celestial dews. Who knows in how many
 unremembered nations' literatures this has been the Castalian Fountain?
 or what nymphs presided over it in the Golden Age? It is a gem of the
 first water which Concord wears in her coronet.
 
 Yet perchance the first who came to this well have left some trace of
 their footsteps. I have been surprised to detect encircling the pond,
 even where a thick wood has just been cut down on the shore, a narrow
 shelf-like path in the steep hillside, alternately rising and falling,
 approaching and receding from the water's edge, as old probably as the
 race of man here, worn by the feet of aboriginal hunters, and still from
 time to time unwittingly trodden by the present occupants of the land.
 This is particularly distinct to one standing on the middle of the pond
 in winter, just after a light snow has fallen, appearing as a clear
 undulating white line, unobscured by weeds and twigs, and very obvious
 a quarter of a mile off in many places where in summer it is hardly
 distinguishable close at hand. The snow reprints it, as it were, in
 clear white type alto-relievo. The ornamented grounds of villas which
 will one day be built here may still preserve some trace of this.
 
 The pond rises and falls, but whether regularly or not, and within what
 period, nobody knows, though, as usual, many pretend to know. It is
 commonly higher in the winter and lower in the summer, though not
 corresponding to the general wet and dryness. I can remember when it
 was a foot or two lower, and also when it was at least five feet higher,
 than when I lived by it. There is a narrow sand-bar running into it,
 with very deep water on one side, on which I helped boil a kettle of
 chowder, some six rods from the main shore, about the year 1824, which
 it has not been possible to do for twenty-five years; and, on the other
 hand, my friends used to listen with incredulity when I told them, that
 a few years later I was accustomed to fish from a boat in a secluded
 cove in the woods, fifteen rods from the only shore they knew, which
 place was long since converted into a meadow. But the pond has risen
 steadily for two years, and now, in the summer of '52, is just five feet
 higher than when I lived there, or as high as it was thirty years ago,
 and fishing goes on again in the meadow. This makes a difference of
 level, at the outside, of six or seven feet; and yet the water shed by
 the surrounding hills is insignificant in amount, and this overflow must
 be referred to causes which affect the deep springs. This same
 summer the pond has begun to fall again. It is remarkable that this
 fluctuation, whether periodical or not, appears thus to require many
 years for its accomplishment. I have observed one rise and a part of two
 falls, and I expect that a dozen or fifteen years hence the water will
 again be as low as I have ever known it. Flint's Pond, a mile eastward,
 allowing for the disturbance occasioned by its inlets and outlets,
 and the smaller intermediate ponds also, sympathize with Walden, and
 recently attained their greatest height at the same time with the
 latter. The same is true, as far as my observation goes, of White Pond.
 
 This rise and fall of Walden at long intervals serves this use at least;
 the water standing at this great height for a year or more, though it
 makes it difficult to walk round it, kills the shrubs and trees which
 have sprung up about its edge since the last rise--pitch pines, birches,
 alders, aspens, and others--and, falling again, leaves an unobstructed
 shore; for, unlike many ponds and all waters which are subject to a
 daily tide, its shore is cleanest when the water is lowest. On the side
 of the pond next my house a row of pitch pines, fifteen feet high, has
 been killed and tipped over as if by a lever, and thus a stop put to
 their encroachments; and their size indicates how many years have
 elapsed since the last rise to this height. By this fluctuation the pond
 asserts its title to a shore, and thus the _shore_ is _shorn_, and the
 trees cannot hold it by right of possession. These are the lips of the
 lake, on which no beard grows. It licks its chaps from time to time.
 When the water is at its height, the alders, willows, and maples send
 forth a mass of fibrous red roots several feet long from all sides of
 their stems in the water, and to the height of three or four feet from
 the ground, in the effort to maintain themselves; and I have known the
 high blueberry bushes about the shore, which commonly produce no fruit,
 bear an abundant crop under these circumstances.
 
 Some have been puzzled to tell how the shore became so regularly paved.
 My townsmen have all heard the tradition--the oldest people tell me that
 they heard it in their youth--that anciently the Indians were holding
 a pow-wow upon a hill here, which rose as high into the heavens as the
 pond now sinks deep into the earth, and they used much profanity, as
 the story goes, though this vice is one of which the Indians were never
 guilty, and while they were thus engaged the hill shook and suddenly
 sank, and only one old squaw, named Walden, escaped, and from her the
 pond was named. It has been conjectured that when the hill shook these
 stones rolled down its side and became the present shore. It is very
 certain, at any rate, that once there was no pond here, and now there
 is one; and this Indian fable does not in any respect conflict with the
 account of that ancient settler whom I have mentioned, who remembers
 so well when he first came here with his divining-rod, saw a thin vapor
 rising from the sward, and the hazel pointed steadily downward, and he
 concluded to dig a well here. As for the stones, many still think that
 they are hardly to be accounted for by the action of the waves on these
 hills; but I observe that the surrounding hills are remarkably full of
 the same kind of stones, so that they have been obliged to pile them
 up in walls on both sides of the railroad cut nearest the pond; and,
 moreover, there are most stones where the shore is most abrupt; so that,
 unfortunately, it is no longer a mystery to me. I detect the paver. If
 the name was not derived from that of some English locality--Saffron
 Walden, for instance--one might suppose that it was called originally
 _Walled-in_ Pond.
 
 The pond was my well ready dug. For four months in the year its water is
 as cold as it is pure at all times; and I think that it is then as good
 as any, if not the best, in the town. In the winter, all water which is
 exposed to the air is colder than springs and wells which are protected
 from it. The temperature of the pond water which had stood in the room
 where I sat from five o'clock in the afternoon till noon the next day,
 the sixth of March, 1846, the thermometer having been up to 65A or 70A
 some of the time, owing partly to the sun on the roof, was 42A, or one
 degree colder than the water of one of the coldest wells in the village
 just drawn. The temperature of the Boiling Spring the same day was 45A,
 or the warmest of any water tried, though it is the coldest that I know
 of in summer, when, beside, shallow and stagnant surface water is not
 mingled with it. Moreover, in summer, Walden never becomes so warm as
 most water which is exposed to the sun, on account of its depth. In the
 warmest weather I usually placed a pailful in my cellar, where it
 became cool in the night, and remained so during the day; though I also
 resorted to a spring in the neighborhood. It was as good when a week old
 as the day it was dipped, and had no taste of the pump. Whoever camps
 for a week in summer by the shore of a pond, needs only bury a pail of
 water a few feet deep in the shade of his camp to be independent of the
 luxury of ice.
 
 There have been caught in Walden pickerel, one weighing seven pounds--to
 say nothing of another which carried off a reel with great velocity,
 which the fisherman safely set down at eight pounds because he did
 not see him--perch and pouts, some of each weighing over two pounds,
 shiners, chivins or roach (_Leuciscus pulchellus_), a very few breams, and
 a couple of eels, one weighing four pounds--I am thus particular because
 the weight of a fish is commonly its only title to fame, and these are
 the only eels I have heard of here;--also, I have a faint recollection
 of a little fish some five inches long, with silvery sides and a
 greenish back, somewhat dace-like in its character, which I mention here
 chiefly to link my facts to fable. Nevertheless, this pond is not very
 fertile in fish. Its pickerel, though not abundant, are its chief boast.
 I have seen at one time lying on the ice pickerel of at least three
 different kinds: a long and shallow one, steel-colored, most like those
 caught in the river; a bright golden kind, with greenish reflections
 and remarkably deep, which is the most common here; and another,
 golden-colored, and shaped like the last, but peppered on the sides with
 small dark brown or black spots, intermixed with a few faint blood-red
 ones, very much like a trout. The specific name _reticulatus_ would not
 apply to this; it should be _guttatus_ rather. These are all very firm
 fish, and weigh more than their size promises. The shiners, pouts, and
 perch also, and indeed all the fishes which inhabit this pond, are much
 cleaner, handsomer, and firmer-fleshed than those in the river and most
 other ponds, as the water is purer, and they can easily be distinguished
 from them. Probably many ichthyologists would make new varieties of some
 of them. There are also a clean race of frogs and tortoises, and a
 few mussels in it; muskrats and minks leave their traces about it, and
 occasionally a travelling mud-turtle visits it. Sometimes, when I pushed
 off my boat in the morning, I disturbed a great mud-turtle which had
 secreted himself under the boat in the night. Ducks and geese frequent
 it in the spring and fall, the white-bellied swallows (_Hirundo bicolor_)
 skim over it, and the peetweets (_Totanus macularius_) "teeter" along its
 stony shores all summer. I have sometimes disturbed a fish hawk sitting
 on a white pine over the water; but I doubt if it is ever profaned by
 the wind of a gull, like Fair Haven. At most, it tolerates one annual
 loon. These are all the animals of consequence which frequent it now.
 
 You may see from a boat, in calm weather, near the sandy eastern shore,
 where the water is eight or ten feet deep, and also in some other parts
 of the pond, some circular heaps half a dozen feet in diameter by a foot
 in height, consisting of small stones less than a hen's egg in size,
 where all around is bare sand. At first you wonder if the Indians
 could have formed them on the ice for any purpose, and so, when the ice
 melted, they sank to the bottom; but they are too regular and some of
 them plainly too fresh for that. They are similar to those found in
 rivers; but as there are no suckers nor lampreys here, I know not by
 what fish they could be made. Perhaps they are the nests of the chivin.
 These lend a pleasing mystery to the bottom.
 
 The shore is irregular enough not to be monotonous. I have in my mind's
 eye the western, indented with deep bays, the bolder northern, and the
 beautifully scalloped southern shore, where successive capes overlap
 each other and suggest unexplored coves between. The forest has never
 so good a setting, nor is so distinctly beautiful, as when seen from the
 middle of a small lake amid hills which rise from the water's edge; for
 the water in which it is reflected not only makes the best foreground in
 such a case, but, with its winding shore, the most natural and agreeable
 boundary to it. There is no rawness nor imperfection in its edge there,
 as where the axe has cleared a part, or a cultivated field abuts on it.
 The trees have ample room to expand on the water side, and each sends
 forth its most vigorous branch in that direction. There Nature has woven
 a natural selvage, and the eye rises by just gradations from the low
 shrubs of the shore to the highest trees. There are few traces of man's
 hand to be seen. The water laves the shore as it did a thousand years
 ago.
 
 A lake is the landscape's most beautiful and expressive feature. It is
 earth's eye; looking into which the beholder measures the depth of
 his own nature. The fluviatile trees next the shore are the slender
 eyelashes which fringe it, and the wooded hills and cliffs around are
 its overhanging brows.
 
 Standing on the smooth sandy beach at the east end of the pond, in
 a calm September afternoon, when a slight haze makes the opposite
 shore-line indistinct, I have seen whence came the expression, "the
 glassy surface of a lake." When you invert your head, it looks like
 a thread of finest gossamer stretched across the valley, and gleaming
 against the distant pine woods, separating one stratum of the atmosphere
 from another. You would think that you could walk dry under it to the
 opposite hills, and that the swallows which skim over might perch on it.
 Indeed, they sometimes dive below this line, as it were by mistake, and
 are undeceived. As you look over the pond westward you are obliged to
 employ both your hands to defend your eyes against the reflected as well
 as the true sun, for they are equally bright; and if, between the two,
 you survey its surface critically, it is literally as smooth as glass,
 except where the skater insects, at equal intervals scattered over its
 whole extent, by their motions in the sun produce the finest imaginable
 sparkle on it, or, perchance, a duck plumes itself, or, as I have said,
 a swallow skims so low as to touch it. It may be that in the distance a
 fish describes an arc of three or four feet in the air, and there is one
 bright flash where it emerges, and another where it strikes the water;
 sometimes the whole silvery arc is revealed; or here and there, perhaps,
 is a thistle-down floating on its surface, which the fishes dart at and
 so dimple it again. It is like molten glass cooled but not congealed,
 and the few motes in it are pure and beautiful like the imperfections in
 glass. You may often detect a yet smoother and darker water, separated
 from the rest as if by an invisible cobweb, boom of the water nymphs,
 resting on it. From a hilltop you can see a fish leap in almost any
 part; for not a pickerel or shiner picks an insect from this smooth
 surface but it manifestly disturbs the equilibrium of the whole lake.
 It is wonderful with what elaborateness this simple fact is
 advertised--this piscine murder will out--and from my distant perch I
 distinguish the circling undulations when they are half a dozen rods
 in diameter. You can even detect a water-bug (_Gyrinus_) ceaselessly
 progressing over the smooth surface a quarter of a mile off; for they
 furrow the water slightly, making a conspicuous ripple bounded by two
 diverging lines, but the skaters glide over it without rippling it
 perceptibly. When the surface is considerably agitated there are no
 skaters nor water-bugs on it, but apparently, in calm days, they leave
 their havens and adventurously glide forth from the shore by short
 impulses till they completely cover it. It is a soothing employment,
 on one of those fine days in the fall when all the warmth of the sun
 is fully appreciated, to sit on a stump on such a height as this,
 overlooking the pond, and study the dimpling circles which are
 incessantly inscribed on its otherwise invisible surface amid the
 reflected skies and trees. Over this great expanse there is no
 disturbance but it is thus at once gently smoothed away and assuaged,
 as, when a vase of water is jarred, the trembling circles seek the shore
 and all is smooth again. Not a fish can leap or an insect fall on the
 pond but it is thus reported in circling dimples, in lines of beauty, as
 it were the constant welling up of its fountain, the gentle pulsing of
 its life, the heaving of its breast. The thrills of joy and thrills
 of pain are undistinguishable. How peaceful the phenomena of the lake!
 Again the works of man shine as in the spring. Ay, every leaf and twig
 and stone and cobweb sparkles now at mid-afternoon as when covered with
 dew in a spring morning. Every motion of an oar or an insect produces a
 flash of light; and if an oar falls, how sweet the echo!
 
 In such a day, in September or October, Walden is a perfect forest
 mirror, set round with stones as precious to my eye as if fewer or
 rarer. Nothing so fair, so pure, and at the same time so large, as a
 lake, perchance, lies on the surface of the earth. Sky water. It needs
 no fence. Nations come and go without defiling it. It is a mirror which
 no stone can crack, whose quicksilver will never wear off, whose gilding
 Nature continually repairs; no storms, no dust, can dim its surface ever
 fresh;--a mirror in which all impurity presented to it sinks, swept and
 dusted by the sun's hazy brush--this the light dust-cloth--which retains
 no breath that is breathed on it, but sends its own to float as clouds
 high above its surface, and be reflected in its bosom still.
 
 A field of water betrays the spirit that is in the air. It is
 continually receiving new life and motion from above. It is intermediate
 in its nature between land and sky. On land only the grass and trees
 wave, but the water itself is rippled by the wind. I see where the
 breeze dashes across it by the streaks or flakes of light. It is
 remarkable that we can look down on its surface. We shall, perhaps,
 look down thus on the surface of air at length, and mark where a still
 subtler spirit sweeps over it.
 
 The skaters and water-bugs finally disappear in the latter part of
 October, when the severe frosts have come; and then and in November,
 usually, in a calm day, there is absolutely nothing to ripple the
 surface. One November afternoon, in the calm at the end of a rain-storm
 of several days' duration, when the sky was still completely overcast
 and the air was full of mist, I observed that the pond was remarkably
 smooth, so that it was difficult to distinguish its surface; though it
 no longer reflected the bright tints of October, but the sombre November
 colors of the surrounding hills. Though I passed over it as gently as
 possible, the slight undulations produced by my boat extended almost
 as far as I could see, and gave a ribbed appearance to the reflections.
 But, as I was looking over the surface, I saw here and there at a
 distance a faint glimmer, as if some skater insects which had escaped
 the frosts might be collected there, or, perchance, the surface, being
 so smooth, betrayed where a spring welled up from the bottom. Paddling
 gently to one of these places, I was surprised to find myself surrounded
 by myriads of small perch, about five inches long, of a rich bronze
 color in the green water, sporting there, and constantly rising to
 the surface and dimpling it, sometimes leaving bubbles on it. In such
 transparent and seemingly bottomless water, reflecting the clouds,
 I seemed to be floating through the air as in a balloon, and their
 swimming impressed me as a kind of flight or hovering, as if they were
 a compact flock of birds passing just beneath my level on the right or
 left, their fins, like sails, set all around them. There were many such
 schools in the pond, apparently improving the short season before winter
 would draw an icy shutter over their broad skylight, sometimes giving
 to the surface an appearance as if a slight breeze struck it, or a few
 rain-drops fell there. When I approached carelessly and alarmed them,
 they made a sudden splash and rippling with their tails, as if one had
 struck the water with a brushy bough, and instantly took refuge in the
 depths. At length the wind rose, the mist increased, and the waves began
 to run, and the perch leaped much higher than before, half out of water,
 a hundred black points, three inches long, at once above the surface.
 Even as late as the fifth of December, one year, I saw some dimples on
 the surface, and thinking it was going to rain hard immediately, the
 air being full of mist, I made haste to take my place at the oars and row
 homeward; already the rain seemed rapidly increasing, though I felt
 none on my cheek, and I anticipated a thorough soaking. But suddenly the
 dimples ceased, for they were produced by the perch, which the noise
 of my oars had seared into the depths, and I saw their schools dimly
 disappearing; so I spent a dry afternoon after all.
 
 An old man who used to frequent this pond nearly sixty years ago, when
 it was dark with surrounding forests, tells me that in those days he
 sometimes saw it all alive with ducks and other water-fowl, and that
 there were many eagles about it. He came here a-fishing, and used an
 old log canoe which he found on the shore. It was made of two white pine
 logs dug out and pinned together, and was cut off square at the ends.
 It was very clumsy, but lasted a great many years before it became
 water-logged and perhaps sank to the bottom. He did not know whose it
 was; it belonged to the pond. He used to make a cable for his anchor of
 strips of hickory bark tied together. An old man, a potter, who lived
 by the pond before the Revolution, told him once that there was an iron
 chest at the bottom, and that he had seen it. Sometimes it would come
 floating up to the shore; but when you went toward it, it would go back
 into deep water and disappear. I was pleased to hear of the old log
 canoe, which took the place of an Indian one of the same material but
 more graceful construction, which perchance had first been a tree on the
 bank, and then, as it were, fell into the water, to float there for a
 generation, the most proper vessel for the lake. I remember that when I
 first looked into these depths there were many large trunks to be seen
 indistinctly lying on the bottom, which had either been blown over
 formerly, or left on the ice at the last cutting, when wood was cheaper;
 but now they have mostly disappeared.
 
 When I first paddled a boat on Walden, it was completely surrounded by
 thick and lofty pine and oak woods, and in some of its coves grape-vines
 had run over the trees next the water and formed bowers under which a
 boat could pass. The hills which form its shores are so steep, and the
 woods on them were then so high, that, as you looked down from the west
 end, it had the appearance of an amphitheatre for some land of sylvan
 spectacle. I have spent many an hour, when I was younger, floating over
 its surface as the zephyr willed, having paddled my boat to the middle,
 and lying on my back across the seats, in a summer forenoon, dreaming
 awake, until I was aroused by the boat touching the sand, and I arose to
 see what shore my fates had impelled me to; days when idleness was the
 most attractive and productive industry. Many a forenoon have I stolen
 away, preferring to spend thus the most valued part of the day; for I
 was rich, if not in money, in sunny hours and summer days, and spent
 them lavishly; nor do I regret that I did not waste more of them in
 the workshop or the teacher's desk. But since I left those shores the
 woodchoppers have still further laid them waste, and now for many a
 year there will be no more rambling through the aisles of the wood,
 with occasional vistas through which you see the water. My Muse may be
 excused if she is silent henceforth. How can you expect the birds to
 sing when their groves are cut down?
 
 Now the trunks of trees on the bottom, and the old log canoe, and the
 dark surrounding woods, are gone, and the villagers, who scarcely know
 where it lies, instead of going to the pond to bathe or drink, are
 thinking to bring its water, which should be as sacred as the Ganges
 at least, to the village in a pipe, to wash their dishes with!--to
 earn their Walden by the turning of a cock or drawing of a plug! That
 devilish Iron Horse, whose ear-rending neigh is heard throughout the
 town, has muddied the Boiling Spring with his foot, and he it is that
 has browsed off all the woods on Walden shore, that Trojan horse, with a
 thousand men in his belly, introduced by mercenary Greeks! Where is the
 country's champion, the Moore of Moore Hill, to meet him at the Deep Cut
 and thrust an avenging lance between the ribs of the bloated pest?
 
 Nevertheless, of all the characters I have known, perhaps Walden wears
 best, and best preserves its purity. Many men have been likened to it,
 but few deserve that honor. Though the woodchoppers have laid bare first
 this shore and then that, and the Irish have built their sties by it,
 and the railroad has infringed on its border, and the ice-men have
 skimmed it once, it is itself unchanged, the same water which my
 youthful eyes fell on; all the change is in me. It has not acquired one
 permanent wrinkle after all its ripples. It is perennially young, and
 I may stand and see a swallow dip apparently to pick an insect from its
 surface as of yore. It struck me again tonight, as if I had not seen it
 almost daily for more than twenty years--Why, here is Walden, the same
 woodland lake that I discovered so many years ago; where a forest was
 cut down last winter another is springing up by its shore as lustily as
 ever; the same thought is welling up to its surface that was then; it
 is the same liquid joy and happiness to itself and its Maker, ay, and it
 may be to me. It is the work of a brave man surely, in whom there was no
 guile! He rounded this water with his hand, deepened and clarified it in
 his thought, and in his will bequeathed it to Concord. I see by its face
 that it is visited by the same reflection; and I can almost say, Walden,
 is it you?
 
               It is no dream of mine,
               To ornament a line;
               I cannot come nearer to God and Heaven
               Than I live to Walden even.
               I am its stony shore,
               And the breeze that passes o'er;
               In the hollow of my hand
               Are its water and its sand,
               And its deepest resort
               Lies high in my thought.
 
 The cars never pause to look at it; yet I fancy that the engineers and
 firemen and brakemen, and those passengers who have a season ticket and
 see it often, are better men for the sight. The engineer does not forget
 at night, or his nature does not, that he has beheld this vision of
 serenity and purity once at least during the day. Though seen but once,
 it helps to wash out State Street and the engine's soot. One proposes
 that it be called "God's Drop."
 
 I have said that Walden has no visible inlet nor outlet, but it is on
 the one hand distantly and indirectly related to Flint's Pond, which is
 more elevated, by a chain of small ponds coming from that quarter, and
 on the other directly and manifestly to Concord River, which is lower,
 by a similar chain of ponds through which in some other geological
 period it may have flowed, and by a little digging, which God forbid,
 it can be made to flow thither again. If by living thus reserved and
 austere, like a hermit in the woods, so long, it has acquired such
 wonderful purity, who would not regret that the comparatively impure
 waters of Flint's Pond should be mingled with it, or itself should ever
 go to waste its sweetness in the ocean wave?
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 Flint's, or Sandy Pond, in Lincoln, our greatest lake and inland sea,
 lies about a mile east of Walden. It is much larger, being said to
 contain one hundred and ninety-seven acres, and is more fertile in fish;
 but it is comparatively shallow, and not remarkably pure. A walk through
 the woods thither was often my recreation. It was worth the while, if
 only to feel the wind blow on your cheek freely, and see the waves run,
 and remember the life of mariners. I went a-chestnutting there in the
 fall, on windy days, when the nuts were dropping into the water and were
 washed to my feet; and one day, as I crept along its sedgy shore, the
 fresh spray blowing in my face, I came upon the mouldering wreck of a
 boat, the sides gone, and hardly more than the impression of its flat
 bottom left amid the rushes; yet its model was sharply defined, as if it
 were a large decayed pad, with its veins. It was as impressive a wreck
 as one could imagine on the seashore, and had as good a moral. It is by
 this time mere vegetable mould and undistinguishable pond shore, through
 which rushes and flags have pushed up. I used to admire the ripple marks
 on the sandy bottom, at the north end of this pond, made firm and hard
 to the feet of the wader by the pressure of the water, and the rushes
 which grew in Indian file, in waving lines, corresponding to these
 marks, rank behind rank, as if the waves had planted them. There also
 I have found, in considerable quantities, curious balls, composed
 apparently of fine grass or roots, of pipewort perhaps, from half an
 inch to four inches in diameter, and perfectly spherical. These wash
 back and forth in shallow water on a sandy bottom, and are sometimes
 cast on the shore. They are either solid grass, or have a little sand in
 the middle. At first you would say that they were formed by the action
 of the waves, like a pebble; yet the smallest are made of equally coarse
 materials, half an inch long, and they are produced only at one season
 of the year. Moreover, the waves, I suspect, do not so much construct
 as wear down a material which has already acquired consistency. They
 preserve their form when dry for an indefinite period.
 
 _Flint's Pond!_ Such is the poverty of our nomenclature. What right had
 the unclean and stupid farmer, whose farm abutted on this sky water,
 whose shores he has ruthlessly laid bare, to give his name to it? Some
 skin-flint, who loved better the reflecting surface of a dollar, or a
 bright cent, in which he could see his own brazen face; who regarded
 even the wild ducks which settled in it as trespassers; his fingers
 grown into crooked and bony talons from the long habit of grasping
 harpy-like;--so it is not named for me. I go not there to see him nor to
 hear of him; who never saw it, who never bathed in it, who never loved
 it, who never protected it, who never spoke a good word for it, nor
 thanked God that He had made it. Rather let it be named from the fishes
 that swim in it, the wild fowl or quadrupeds which frequent it, the wild
 flowers which grow by its shores, or some wild man or child the thread
 of whose history is interwoven with its own; not from him who could show
 no title to it but the deed which a like-minded neighbor or legislature
 gave him--him who thought only of its money value; whose presence
 perchance cursed all the shores; who exhausted the land around it, and
 would fain have exhausted the waters within it; who regretted only that
 it was not English hay or cranberry meadow--there was nothing to redeem
 it, forsooth, in his eyes--and would have drained and sold it for the
 mud at its bottom. It did not turn his mill, and it was no _privilege_ to
 him to behold it. I respect not his labors, his farm where everything
 has its price, who would carry the landscape, who would carry his God,
 to market, if he could get anything for him; who goes to market _for_ his
 god as it is; on whose farm nothing grows free, whose fields bear no
 crops, whose meadows no flowers, whose trees no fruits, but dollars; who
 loves not the beauty of his fruits, whose fruits are not ripe for him
 till they are turned to dollars. Give me the poverty that enjoys true
 wealth. Farmers are respectable and interesting to me in proportion as
 they are poor--poor farmers. A model farm! where the house stands like a
 fungus in a muckheap, chambers for men, horses, oxen, and swine, cleansed
 and uncleansed, all contiguous to one another! Stocked with men! A great
 grease-spot, redolent of manures and buttermilk! Under a high state of
 cultivation, being manured with the hearts and brains of men! As if you
 were to raise your potatoes in the churchyard! Such is a model farm.
 
 No, no; if the fairest features of the landscape are to be named after
 men, let them be the noblest and worthiest men alone. Let our lakes
 receive as true names at least as the Icarian Sea, where "still the
 shore" a "brave attempt resounds."
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 Goose Pond, of small extent, is on my way to Flint's; Fair Haven, an
 expansion of Concord River, said to contain some seventy acres, is a
 mile southwest; and White Pond, of about forty acres, is a mile and a
 half beyond Fair Haven. This is my lake country. These, with Concord
 River, are my water privileges; and night and day, year in year out,
 they grind such grist as I carry to them.
 
 Since the wood-cutters, and the railroad, and I myself have profaned
 Walden, perhaps the most attractive, if not the most beautiful, of all
 our lakes, the gem of the woods, is White Pond;--a poor name from its
 commonness, whether derived from the remarkable purity of its waters or
 the color of its sands. In these as in other respects, however, it is
 a lesser twin of Walden. They are so much alike that you would say they
 must be connected under ground. It has the same stony shore, and its
 waters are of the same hue. As at Walden, in sultry dog-day weather,
 looking down through the woods on some of its bays which are not so deep
 but that the reflection from the bottom tinges them, its waters are of
 a misty bluish-green or glaucous color. Many years since I used to go
 there to collect the sand by cartloads, to make sandpaper with, and I
 have continued to visit it ever since. One who frequents it proposes to
 call it Virid Lake. Perhaps it might be called Yellow Pine Lake, from
 the following circumstance. About fifteen years ago you could see the
 top of a pitch pine, of the kind called yellow pine hereabouts, though
 it is not a distinct species, projecting above the surface in deep
 water, many rods from the shore. It was even supposed by some that the
 pond had sunk, and this was one of the primitive forest that formerly
 stood there. I find that even so long ago as 1792, in a "Topographical
 Description of the Town of Concord," by one of its citizens, in the
 Collections of the Massachusetts Historical Society, the author, after
 speaking of Walden and White Ponds, adds, "In the middle of the latter
 may be seen, when the water is very low, a tree which appears as if it
 grew in the place where it now stands, although the roots are fifty feet
 below the surface of the water; the top of this tree is broken off, and
 at that place measures fourteen inches in diameter." In the spring of
 '49 I talked with the man who lives nearest the pond in Sudbury, who
 told me that it was he who got out this tree ten or fifteen years
 before. As near as he could remember, it stood twelve or fifteen rods
 from the shore, where the water was thirty or forty feet deep. It was
 in the winter, and he had been getting out ice in the forenoon, and had
 resolved that in the afternoon, with the aid of his neighbors, he would
 take out the old yellow pine. He sawed a channel in the ice toward the
 shore, and hauled it over and along and out on to the ice with oxen;
 but, before he had gone far in his work, he was surprised to find that
 it was wrong end upward, with the stumps of the branches pointing down,
 and the small end firmly fastened in the sandy bottom. It was about
 a foot in diameter at the big end, and he had expected to get a good
 saw-log, but it was so rotten as to be fit only for fuel, if for that.
 He had some of it in his shed then. There were marks of an axe and of
 woodpeckers on the butt. He thought that it might have been a dead tree
 on the shore, but was finally blown over into the pond, and after the
 top had become water-logged, while the butt-end was still dry and light,
 had drifted out and sunk wrong end up. His father, eighty years old,
 could not remember when it was not there. Several pretty large logs may
 still be seen lying on the bottom, where, owing to the undulation of the
 surface, they look like huge water snakes in motion.
 
 This pond has rarely been profaned by a boat, for there is little in it
 to tempt a fisherman. Instead of the white lily, which requires mud, or
 the common sweet flag, the blue flag (_Iris versicolor_) grows thinly in
 the pure water, rising from the stony bottom all around the shore, where
 it is visited by hummingbirds in June; and the color both of its bluish
 blades and its flowers and especially their reflections, is in singular
 harmony with the glaucous water.
 
 White Pond and Walden are great crystals on the surface of the earth,
 Lakes of Light. If they were permanently congealed, and small enough
 to be clutched, they would, perchance, be carried off by slaves, like
 precious stones, to adorn the heads of emperors; but being liquid, and
 ample, and secured to us and our successors forever, we disregard them,
 and run after the diamond of Kohinoor. They are too pure to have a
 market value; they contain no muck. How much more beautiful than our
 lives, how much more transparent than our characters, are they! We
 never learned meanness of them. How much fairer than the pool before the
 farmer's door, in which his ducks swim! Hither the clean wild ducks come.
 Nature has no human inhabitant who appreciates her. The birds with their
 plumage and their notes are in harmony with the flowers, but what
 youth or maiden conspires with the wild luxuriant beauty of Nature? She
 flourishes most alone, far from the towns where they reside. Talk of
 heaven! ye disgrace earth.
 
 
 
 
 Baker Farm
 
 
 Sometimes I rambled to pine groves, standing like temples, or like
 fleets at sea, full-rigged, with wavy boughs, and rippling with light,
 so soft and green and shady that the Druids would have forsaken their
 oaks to worship in them; or to the cedar wood beyond Flint's Pond, where
 the trees, covered with hoary blue berries, spiring higher and higher,
 are fit to stand before Valhalla, and the creeping juniper covers the
 ground with wreaths full of fruit; or to swamps where the usnea lichen
 hangs in festoons from the white spruce trees, and toadstools, round
 tables of the swamp gods, cover the ground, and more beautiful fungi
 adorn the stumps, like butterflies or shells, vegetable winkles; where
 the swamp-pink and dogwood grow, the red alderberry glows like eyes of
 imps, the waxwork grooves and crushes the hardest woods in its folds,
 and the wild holly berries make the beholder forget his home with their
 beauty, and he is dazzled and tempted by nameless other wild forbidden
 fruits, too fair for mortal taste. Instead of calling on some scholar,
 I paid many a visit to particular trees, of kinds which are rare in this
 neighborhood, standing far away in the middle of some pasture, or in the
 depths of a wood or swamp, or on a hilltop; such as the black birch, of
 which we have some handsome specimens two feet in diameter; its cousin,
 the yellow birch, with its loose golden vest, perfumed like the first;
 the beech, which has so neat a bole and beautifully lichen-painted,
 perfect in all its details, of which, excepting scattered specimens, I
 know but one small grove of sizable trees left in the township, supposed
 by some to have been planted by the pigeons that were once baited with
 beechnuts near by; it is worth the while to see the silver grain
 sparkle when you split this wood; the bass; the hornbeam; the _Celtis
 occidentalis_, or false elm, of which we have but one well-grown; some
 taller mast of a pine, a shingle tree, or a more perfect hemlock than
 usual, standing like a pagoda in the midst of the woods; and many
 others I could mention. These were the shrines I visited both summer and
 winter.
 
 Once it chanced that I stood in the very abutment of a rainbow's arch,
 which filled the lower stratum of the atmosphere, tinging the grass and
 leaves around, and dazzling me as if I looked through colored crystal.
 It was a lake of rainbow light, in which, for a short while, I lived
 like a dolphin. If it had lasted longer it might have tinged my
 employments and life. As I walked on the railroad causeway, I used
 to wonder at the halo of light around my shadow, and would fain fancy
 myself one of the elect. One who visited me declared that the shadows
 of some Irishmen before him had no halo about them, that it was only
 natives that were so distinguished. Benvenuto Cellini tells us in his
 memoirs, that, after a certain terrible dream or vision which he had
 during his confinement in the castle of St. Angelo a resplendent light
 appeared over the shadow of his head at morning and evening, whether
 he was in Italy or France, and it was particularly conspicuous when the
 grass was moist with dew. This was probably the same phenomenon to which
 I have referred, which is especially observed in the morning, but also
 at other times, and even by moonlight. Though a constant one, it is
 not commonly noticed, and, in the case of an excitable imagination like
 Cellini's, it would be basis enough for superstition. Beside, he tells
 us that he showed it to very few. But are they not indeed distinguished
 who are conscious that they are regarded at all?
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 I set out one afternoon to go a-fishing to Fair Haven, through the
 woods, to eke out my scanty fare of vegetables. My way led through
 Pleasant Meadow, an adjunct of the Baker Farm, that retreat of which a
 poet has since sung, beginning,--
 
                "Thy entry is a pleasant field,
                 Which some mossy fruit trees yield
                 Partly to a ruddy brook,
                 By gliding musquash undertook,
                 And mercurial trout,
                 Darting about."
 
 I thought of living there before I went to Walden. I "hooked" the
 apples, leaped the brook, and scared the musquash and the trout. It
 was one of those afternoons which seem indefinitely long before one,
 in which many events may happen, a large portion of our natural life,
 though it was already half spent when I started. By the way there came
 up a shower, which compelled me to stand half an hour under a pine,
 piling boughs over my head, and wearing my handkerchief for a shed; and
 when at length I had made one cast over the pickerelweed, standing up
 to my middle in water, I found myself suddenly in the shadow of a cloud,
 and the thunder began to rumble with such emphasis that I could do no
 more than listen to it. The gods must be proud, thought I, with such
 forked flashes to rout a poor unarmed fisherman. So I made haste for
 shelter to the nearest hut, which stood half a mile from any road, but
 so much the nearer to the pond, and had long been uninhabited:--
 
                  "And here a poet builded,
                      In the completed years,
                   For behold a trivial cabin
                      That to destruction steers."
 
 So the Muse fables. But therein, as I found, dwelt now John Field, an
 Irishman, and his wife, and several children, from the broad-faced boy
 who assisted his father at his work, and now came running by his
 side from the bog to escape the rain, to the wrinkled, sibyl-like,
 cone-headed infant that sat upon its father's knee as in the palaces
 of nobles, and looked out from its home in the midst of wet and hunger
 inquisitively upon the stranger, with the privilege of infancy, not
 knowing but it was the last of a noble line, and the hope and cynosure
 of the world, instead of John Field's poor starveling brat. There we sat
 together under that part of the roof which leaked the least, while it
 showered and thundered without. I had sat there many times of old
 before the ship was built that floated his family to America. An honest,
 hard-working, but shiftless man plainly was John Field; and his wife,
 she too was brave to cook so many successive dinners in the recesses of
 that lofty stove; with round greasy face and bare breast, still thinking
 to improve her condition one day; with the never absent mop in one hand,
 and yet no effects of it visible anywhere. The chickens, which had also
 taken shelter here from the rain, stalked about the room like members
 of the family, too humanized, methought, to roast well. They stood and
 looked in my eye or pecked at my shoe significantly. Meanwhile my
 host told me his story, how hard he worked "bogging" for a neighboring
 farmer, turning up a meadow with a spade or bog hoe at the rate of ten
 dollars an acre and the use of the land with manure for one year, and
 his little broad-faced son worked cheerfully at his father's side the
 while, not knowing how poor a bargain the latter had made. I tried to
 help him with my experience, telling him that he was one of my nearest
 neighbors, and that I too, who came a-fishing here, and looked like a
 loafer, was getting my living like himself; that I lived in a tight,
 light, and clean house, which hardly cost more than the annual rent of
 such a ruin as his commonly amounts to; and how, if he chose, he might
 in a month or two build himself a palace of his own; that I did not use
 tea, nor coffee, nor butter, nor milk, nor fresh meat, and so did not
 have to work to get them; again, as I did not work hard, I did not have
 to eat hard, and it cost me but a trifle for my food; but as he began
 with tea, and coffee, and butter, and milk, and beef, he had to work
 hard to pay for them, and when he had worked hard he had to eat hard
 again to repair the waste of his system--and so it was as broad as
 it was long, indeed it was broader than it was long, for he was
 discontented and wasted his life into the bargain; and yet he had rated
 it as a gain in coming to America, that here you could get tea, and
 coffee, and meat every day. But the only true America is that country
 where you are at liberty to pursue such a mode of life as may enable you
 to do without these, and where the state does not endeavor to compel
 you to sustain the slavery and war and other superfluous expenses
 which directly or indirectly result from the use of such things. For I
 purposely talked to him as if he were a philosopher, or desired to be
 one. I should be glad if all the meadows on the earth were left in a
 wild state, if that were the consequence of men's beginning to redeem
 themselves. A man will not need to study history to find out what is
 best for his own culture. But alas! the culture of an Irishman is an
 enterprise to be undertaken with a sort of moral bog hoe. I told him,
 that as he worked so hard at bogging, he required thick boots and stout
 clothing, which yet were soon soiled and worn out, but I wore light
 shoes and thin clothing, which cost not half so much, though he might
 think that I was dressed like a gentleman (which, however, was not the
 case), and in an hour or two, without labor, but as a recreation, I
 could, if I wished, catch as many fish as I should want for two days, or
 earn enough money to support me a week. If he and his family would
 live simply, they might all go a-huckleberrying in the summer for their
 amusement. John heaved a sigh at this, and his wife stared with arms
 a-kimbo, and both appeared to be wondering if they had capital enough to
 begin such a course with, or arithmetic enough to carry it through. It
 was sailing by dead reckoning to them, and they saw not clearly how to
 make their port so; therefore I suppose they still take life bravely,
 after their fashion, face to face, giving it tooth and nail, not having
 skill to split its massive columns with any fine entering wedge, and
 rout it in detail;--thinking to deal with it roughly, as one
 should handle a thistle. But they fight at an overwhelming
 disadvantage--living, John Field, alas! without arithmetic, and failing
 so.
 
 "Do you ever fish?" I asked. "Oh yes, I catch a mess now and then when
 I am lying by; good perch I catch."--"What's your bait?" "I catch shiners
 with fishworms, and bait the perch with them." "You'd better go now,
 John," said his wife, with glistening and hopeful face; but John
 demurred.
 
 The shower was now over, and a rainbow above the eastern woods promised
 a fair evening; so I took my departure. When I had got without I asked
 for a drink, hoping to get a sight of the well bottom, to complete my
 survey of the premises; but there, alas! are shallows and quicksands,
 and rope broken withal, and bucket irrecoverable. Meanwhile the right
 culinary vessel was selected, water was seemingly distilled, and after
 consultation and long delay passed out to the thirsty one--not yet
 suffered to cool, not yet to settle. Such gruel sustains life here, I
 thought; so, shutting my eyes, and excluding the motes by a skilfully
 directed undercurrent, I drank to genuine hospitality the heartiest
 draught I could. I am not squeamish in such cases when manners are
 concerned.
 
 As I was leaving the Irishman's roof after the rain, bending my steps
 again to the pond, my haste to catch pickerel, wading in retired
 meadows, in sloughs and bog-holes, in forlorn and savage places,
 appeared for an instant trivial to me who had been sent to school and
 college; but as I ran down the hill toward the reddening west, with the
 rainbow over my shoulder, and some faint tinkling sounds borne to my ear
 through the cleansed air, from I know not what quarter, my Good Genius
 seemed to say--Go fish and hunt far and wide day by day--farther and
 wider--and rest thee by many brooks and hearth-sides without misgiving.
 Remember thy Creator in the days of thy youth. Rise free from care
 before the dawn, and seek adventures. Let the noon find thee by other
 lakes, and the night overtake thee everywhere at home. There are no
 larger fields than these, no worthier games than may here be played.
 Grow wild according to thy nature, like these sedges and brakes, which
 will never become English bay. Let the thunder rumble; what if it
 threaten ruin to farmers' crops? That is not its errand to thee. Take
 shelter under the cloud, while they flee to carts and sheds. Let not
 to get a living be thy trade, but thy sport. Enjoy the land, but own it
 not. Through want of enterprise and faith men are where they are, buying
 and selling, and spending their lives like serfs.
 
 O Baker Farm!
 
                "Landscape where the richest element
                 Is a little sunshine innocent."...
 
                "No one runs to revel
                 On thy rail-fenced lea."...
 
                "Debate with no man hast thou,
                    With questions art never perplexed,
                 As tame at the first sight as now,
                    In thy plain russet gabardine dressed."...
 
                "Come ye who love,
                    And ye who hate,
                 Children of the Holy Dove,
                    And Guy Faux of the state,
                 And hang conspiracies
                 From the tough rafters of the trees!"
 
 Men come tamely home at night only from the next field or street, where
 their household echoes haunt, and their life pines because it breathes
 its own breath over again; their shadows, morning and evening, reach
 farther than their daily steps. We should come home from far, from
 adventures, and perils, and discoveries every day, with new experience
 and character.
 
 Before I had reached the pond some fresh impulse had brought out John
 Field, with altered mind, letting go "bogging" ere this sunset. But he,
 poor man, disturbed only a couple of fins while I was catching a fair
 string, and he said it was his luck; but when we changed seats in the
 boat luck changed seats too. Poor John Field!--I trust he does not read
 this, unless he will improve by it--thinking to live by some derivative
 old-country mode in this primitive new country--to catch perch with
 shiners. It is good bait sometimes, I allow. With his horizon all
 his own, yet he a poor man, born to be poor, with his inherited Irish
 poverty or poor life, his Adam's grandmother and boggy ways, not to
 rise in this world, he nor his posterity, till their wading webbed
 bog-trotting feet get _talaria_ to their heels.
 
 
 
 
 Higher Laws
 
 
 As I came home through the woods with my string of fish, trailing
 my pole, it being now quite dark, I caught a glimpse of a woodchuck
 stealing across my path, and felt a strange thrill of savage delight,
 and was strongly tempted to seize and devour him raw; not that I was
 hungry then, except for that wildness which he represented. Once or
 twice, however, while I lived at the pond, I found myself ranging the
 woods, like a half-starved hound, with a strange abandonment, seeking
 some kind of venison which I might devour, and no morsel could have been
 too savage for me. The wildest scenes had become unaccountably familiar.
 I found in myself, and still find, an instinct toward a higher, or,
 as it is named, spiritual life, as do most men, and another toward a
 primitive rank and savage one, and I reverence them both. I love the
 wild not less than the good. The wildness and adventure that are in
 fishing still recommended it to me. I like sometimes to take rank hold
 on life and spend my day more as the animals do. Perhaps I have owed
 to this employment and to hunting, when quite young, my closest
 acquaintance with Nature. They early introduce us to and detain us
 in scenery with which otherwise, at that age, we should have little
 acquaintance. Fishermen, hunters, woodchoppers, and others, spending
 their lives in the fields and woods, in a peculiar sense a part of
 Nature themselves, are often in a more favorable mood for observing her,
 in the intervals of their pursuits, than philosophers or poets even, who
 approach her with expectation. She is not afraid to exhibit herself to
 them. The traveller on the prairie is naturally a hunter, on the head
 waters of the Missouri and Columbia a trapper, and at the Falls of
 St. Mary a fisherman. He who is only a traveller learns things at
 second-hand and by the halves, and is poor authority. We are most
 interested when science reports what those men already know practically
 or instinctively, for that alone is a true _humanity_, or account of human
 experience.
 
 They mistake who assert that the Yankee has few amusements, because he
 has not so many public holidays, and men and boys do not play so many
 games as they do in England, for here the more primitive but solitary
 amusements of hunting, fishing, and the like have not yet given place
 to the former. Almost every New England boy among my contemporaries
 shouldered a fowling-piece between the ages of ten and fourteen; and his
 hunting and fishing grounds were not limited, like the preserves of an
 English nobleman, but were more boundless even than those of a savage.
 No wonder, then, that he did not oftener stay to play on the common. But
 already a change is taking place, owing, not to an increased humanity,
 but to an increased scarcity of game, for perhaps the hunter is the
 greatest friend of the animals hunted, not excepting the Humane Society.
 
 Moreover, when at the pond, I wished sometimes to add fish to my fare
 for variety. I have actually fished from the same kind of necessity that
 the first fishers did. Whatever humanity I might conjure up against it
 was all factitious, and concerned my philosophy more than my feelings.
 I speak of fishing only now, for I had long felt differently about
 fowling, and sold my gun before I went to the woods. Not that I am less
 humane than others, but I did not perceive that my feelings were much
 affected. I did not pity the fishes nor the worms. This was habit. As
 for fowling, during the last years that I carried a gun my excuse was
 that I was studying ornithology, and sought only new or rare birds. But
 I confess that I am now inclined to think that there is a finer way of
 studying ornithology than this. It requires so much closer attention
 to the habits of the birds, that, if for that reason only, I have been
 willing to omit the gun. Yet notwithstanding the objection on the score
 of humanity, I am compelled to doubt if equally valuable sports are
 ever substituted for these; and when some of my friends have asked me
 anxiously about their boys, whether they should let them hunt, I have
 answered, yes--remembering that it was one of the best parts of my
 education--_make_ them hunters, though sportsmen only at first, if
 possible, mighty hunters at last, so that they shall not find game large
 enough for them in this or any vegetable wilderness--hunters as well as
 fishers of men. Thus far I am of the opinion of Chaucer's nun, who
 
                  "yave not of the text a pulled hen
             That saith that hunters ben not holy men."
 
 There is a period in the history of the individual, as of the race, when
 the hunters are the "best men," as the Algonquins called them. We cannot
 but pity the boy who has never fired a gun; he is no more humane, while
 his education has been sadly neglected. This was my answer with respect
 to those youths who were bent on this pursuit, trusting that they would
 soon outgrow it. No humane being, past the thoughtless age of boyhood,
 will wantonly murder any creature which holds its life by the same
 tenure that he does. The hare in its extremity cries like a child.
 I warn you, mothers, that my sympathies do not always make the usual
 phil-_anthropic_ distinctions.
 
 Such is oftenest the young man's introduction to the forest, and the
 most original part of himself. He goes thither at first as a hunter and
 fisher, until at last, if he has the seeds of a better life in him, he
 distinguishes his proper objects, as a poet or naturalist it may be,
 and leaves the gun and fish-pole behind. The mass of men are still and
 always young in this respect. In some countries a hunting parson is no
 uncommon sight. Such a one might make a good shepherd's dog, but is far
 from being the Good Shepherd. I have been surprised to consider that the
 only obvious employment, except wood-chopping, ice-cutting, or the like
 business, which ever to my knowledge detained at Walden Pond for a whole
 half-day any of my fellow-citizens, whether fathers or children of the
 town, with just one exception, was fishing. Commonly they did not think
 that they were lucky, or well paid for their time, unless they got a
 long string of fish, though they had the opportunity of seeing the pond
 all the while. They might go there a thousand times before the sediment
 of fishing would sink to the bottom and leave their purpose pure; but
 no doubt such a clarifying process would be going on all the while.
 The Governor and his Council faintly remember the pond, for they went
 a-fishing there when they were boys; but now they are too old and
 dignified to go a-fishing, and so they know it no more forever. Yet even
 they expect to go to heaven at last. If the legislature regards it, it
 is chiefly to regulate the number of hooks to be used there; but they
 know nothing about the hook of hooks with which to angle for the pond
 itself, impaling the legislature for a bait. Thus, even in civilized
 communities, the embryo man passes through the hunter stage of
 development.
 
 I have found repeatedly, of late years, that I cannot fish without
 falling a little in self-respect. I have tried it again and again. I
 have skill at it, and, like many of my fellows, a certain instinct for
 it, which revives from time to time, but always when I have done I feel
 that it would have been better if I had not fished. I think that I do
 not mistake. It is a faint intimation, yet so are the first streaks of
 morning. There is unquestionably this instinct in me which belongs to
 the lower orders of creation; yet with every year I am less a fisherman,
 though without more humanity or even wisdom; at present I am no
 fisherman at all. But I see that if I were to live in a wilderness
 I should again be tempted to become a fisher and hunter in earnest.
 Beside, there is something essentially unclean about this diet and all
 flesh, and I began to see where housework commences, and whence the
 endeavor, which costs so much, to wear a tidy and respectable appearance
 each day, to keep the house sweet and free from all ill odors and
 sights. Having been my own butcher and scullion and cook, as well as
 the gentleman for whom the dishes were served up, I can speak from an
 unusually complete experience. The practical objection to animal food in
 my case was its uncleanness; and besides, when I had caught and
 cleaned and cooked and eaten my fish, they seemed not to have fed me
 essentially. It was insignificant and unnecessary, and cost more than it
 came to. A little bread or a few potatoes would have done as well, with
 less trouble and filth. Like many of my contemporaries, I had rarely
 for many years used animal food, or tea, or coffee, etc.; not so much
 because of any ill effects which I had traced to them, as because they
 were not agreeable to my imagination. The repugnance to animal food
 is not the effect of experience, but is an instinct. It appeared more
 beautiful to live low and fare hard in many respects; and though I never
 did so, I went far enough to please my imagination. I believe that every
 man who has ever been earnest to preserve his higher or poetic faculties
 in the best condition has been particularly inclined to abstain from
 animal food, and from much food of any kind. It is a significant fact,
 stated by entomologists--I find it in Kirby and Spence--that "some
 insects in their perfect state, though furnished with organs of feeding,
 make no use of them"; and they lay it down as "a general rule, that
 almost all insects in this state eat much less than in that of larvA|.
 The voracious caterpillar when transformed into a butterfly... and the
 gluttonous maggot when become a fly" content themselves with a drop or
 two of honey or some other sweet liquid. The abdomen under the wings
 of the butterfly still represents the larva. This is the tidbit which
 tempts his insectivorous fate. The gross feeder is a man in the larva
 state; and there are whole nations in that condition, nations without
 fancy or imagination, whose vast abdomens betray them.
 
 It is hard to provide and cook so simple and clean a diet as will not
 offend the imagination; but this, I think, is to be fed when we feed the
 body; they should both sit down at the same table. Yet perhaps this may
 be done. The fruits eaten temperately need not make us ashamed of
 our appetites, nor interrupt the worthiest pursuits. But put an extra
 condiment into your dish, and it will poison you. It is not worth the
 while to live by rich cookery. Most men would feel shame if caught
 preparing with their own hands precisely such a dinner, whether of
 animal or vegetable food, as is every day prepared for them by others.
 Yet till this is otherwise we are not civilized, and, if gentlemen and
 ladies, are not true men and women. This certainly suggests what change
 is to be made. It may be vain to ask why the imagination will not be
 reconciled to flesh and fat. I am satisfied that it is not. Is it not a
 reproach that man is a carnivorous animal? True, he can and does live,
 in a great measure, by preying on other animals; but this is a miserable
 way--as any one who will go to snaring rabbits, or slaughtering lambs,
 may learn--and he will be regarded as a benefactor of his race who shall
 teach man to confine himself to a more innocent and wholesome diet.
 Whatever my own practice may be, I have no doubt that it is a part of
 the destiny of the human race, in its gradual improvement, to leave off
 eating animals, as surely as the savage tribes have left off eating each
 other when they came in contact with the more civilized.
 
 If one listens to the faintest but constant suggestions of his genius,
 which are certainly true, he sees not to what extremes, or even
 insanity, it may lead him; and yet that way, as he grows more resolute
 and faithful, his road lies. The faintest assured objection which one
 healthy man feels will at length prevail over the arguments and customs
 of mankind. No man ever followed his genius till it misled him. Though
 the result were bodily weakness, yet perhaps no one can say that the
 consequences were to be regretted, for these were a life in conformity
 to higher principles. If the day and the night are such that you greet
 them with joy, and life emits a fragrance like flowers and sweet-scented
 herbs, is more elastic, more starry, more immortal--that is your
 success. All nature is your congratulation, and you have cause
 momentarily to bless yourself. The greatest gains and values are
 farthest from being appreciated. We easily come to doubt if they exist.
 We soon forget them. They are the highest reality. Perhaps the facts
 most astounding and most real are never communicated by man to man.
 The true harvest of my daily life is somewhat as intangible and
 indescribable as the tints of morning or evening. It is a little
 star-dust caught, a segment of the rainbow which I have clutched.
 
 Yet, for my part, I was never unusually squeamish; I could sometimes eat
 a fried rat with a good relish, if it were necessary. I am glad to have
 drunk water so long, for the same reason that I prefer the natural sky
 to an opium-eater's heaven. I would fain keep sober always; and there
 are infinite degrees of drunkenness. I believe that water is the only
 drink for a wise man; wine is not so noble a liquor; and think of
 dashing the hopes of a morning with a cup of warm coffee, or of an
 evening with a dish of tea! Ah, how low I fall when I am tempted by
 them! Even music may be intoxicating. Such apparently slight causes
 destroyed Greece and Rome, and will destroy England and America. Of all
 ebriosity, who does not prefer to be intoxicated by the air he breathes?
 I have found it to be the most serious objection to coarse labors long
 continued, that they compelled me to eat and drink coarsely also. But
 to tell the truth, I find myself at present somewhat less particular in
 these respects. I carry less religion to the table, ask no blessing; not
 because I am wiser than I was, but, I am obliged to confess, because,
 however much it is to be regretted, with years I have grown more coarse
 and indifferent. Perhaps these questions are entertained only in youth,
 as most believe of poetry. My practice is "nowhere," my opinion is here.
 Nevertheless I am far from regarding myself as one of those privileged
 ones to whom the Ved refers when it says, that "he who has true faith in
 the Omnipresent Supreme Being may eat all that exists," that is, is not
 bound to inquire what is his food, or who prepares it; and even in their
 case it is to be observed, as a Hindoo commentator has remarked, that
 the Vedant limits this privilege to "the time of distress."
 
 Who has not sometimes derived an inexpressible satisfaction from his
 food in which appetite had no share? I have been thrilled to think that
 I owed a mental perception to the commonly gross sense of taste, that
 I have been inspired through the palate, that some berries which I had
 eaten on a hillside had fed my genius. "The soul not being mistress
 of herself," says Thseng-tseu, "one looks, and one does not see; one
 listens, and one does not hear; one eats, and one does not know the
 savor of food." He who distinguishes the true savor of his food can
 never be a glutton; he who does not cannot be otherwise. A puritan
 may go to his brown-bread crust with as gross an appetite as ever an
 alderman to his turtle. Not that food which entereth into the mouth
 defileth a man, but the appetite with which it is eaten. It is neither
 the quality nor the quantity, but the devotion to sensual savors; when
 that which is eaten is not a viand to sustain our animal, or inspire our
 spiritual life, but food for the worms that possess us. If the hunter
 has a taste for mud-turtles, muskrats, and other such savage tidbits,
 the fine lady indulges a taste for jelly made of a calf's foot, or for
 sardines from over the sea, and they are even. He goes to the mill-pond,
 she to her preserve-pot. The wonder is how they, how you and I, can live
 this slimy, beastly life, eating and drinking.
 
 Our whole life is startlingly moral. There is never an instant's truce
 between virtue and vice. Goodness is the only investment that never
 fails. In the music of the harp which trembles round the world it is the
 insisting on this which thrills us. The harp is the travelling patterer
 for the Universe's Insurance Company, recommending its laws, and our
 little goodness is all the assessment that we pay. Though the youth at
 last grows indifferent, the laws of the universe are not indifferent,
 but are forever on the side of the most sensitive. Listen to every
 zephyr for some reproof, for it is surely there, and he is unfortunate
 who does not hear it. We cannot touch a string or move a stop but the
 charming moral transfixes us. Many an irksome noise, go a long way off,
 is heard as music, a proud, sweet satire on the meanness of our lives.
 
 We are conscious of an animal in us, which awakens in proportion as our
 higher nature slumbers. It is reptile and sensual, and perhaps cannot be
 wholly expelled; like the worms which, even in life and health, occupy
 our bodies. Possibly we may withdraw from it, but never change its
 nature. I fear that it may enjoy a certain health of its own; that we
 may be well, yet not pure. The other day I picked up the lower jaw of
 a hog, with white and sound teeth and tusks, which suggested that
 there was an animal health and vigor distinct from the spiritual. This
 creature succeeded by other means than temperance and purity. "That
 in which men differ from brute beasts," says Mencius, "is a thing very
 inconsiderable; the common herd lose it very soon; superior men preserve
 it carefully." Who knows what sort of life would result if we had
 attained to purity? If I knew so wise a man as could teach me purity I
 would go to seek him forthwith. "A command over our passions, and over
 the external senses of the body, and good acts, are declared by the Ved
 to be indispensable in the mind's approximation to God." Yet the spirit
 can for the time pervade and control every member and function of the
 body, and transmute what in form is the grossest sensuality into
 purity and devotion. The generative energy, which, when we are loose,
 dissipates and makes us unclean, when we are continent invigorates
 and inspires us. Chastity is the flowering of man; and what are called
 Genius, Heroism, Holiness, and the like, are but various fruits which
 succeed it. Man flows at once to God when the channel of purity is
 open. By turns our purity inspires and our impurity casts us down. He is
 blessed who is assured that the animal is dying out in him day by day,
 and the divine being established. Perhaps there is none but has cause
 for shame on account of the inferior and brutish nature to which he
 is allied. I fear that we are such gods or demigods only as fauns and
 satyrs, the divine allied to beasts, the creatures of appetite, and
 that, to some extent, our very life is our disgrace.--
 
             "How happy's he who hath due place assigned
              To his beasts and disafforested his mind!
                           . . . . . . .
              Can use this horse, goat, wolf, and ev'ry beast,
              And is not ass himself to all the rest!
              Else man not only is the herd of swine,
              But he's those devils too which did incline
              Them to a headlong rage, and made them worse."
 
 All sensuality is one, though it takes many forms; all purity is one. It
 is the same whether a man eat, or drink, or cohabit, or sleep sensually.
 They are but one appetite, and we only need to see a person do any one
 of these things to know how great a sensualist he is. The impure can
 neither stand nor sit with purity. When the reptile is attacked at
 one mouth of his burrow, he shows himself at another. If you would be
 chaste, you must be temperate. What is chastity? How shall a man know if
 he is chaste? He shall not know it. We have heard of this virtue, but
 we know not what it is. We speak conformably to the rumor which we have
 heard. From exertion come wisdom and purity; from sloth ignorance and
 sensuality. In the student sensuality is a sluggish habit of mind. An
 unclean person is universally a slothful one, one who sits by a stove,
 whom the sun shines on prostrate, who reposes without being fatigued. If
 you would avoid uncleanness, and all the sins, work earnestly, though it
 be at cleaning a stable. Nature is hard to be overcome, but she must be
 overcome. What avails it that you are Christian, if you are not purer
 than the heathen, if you deny yourself no more, if you are not more
 religious? I know of many systems of religion esteemed heathenish whose
 precepts fill the reader with shame, and provoke him to new endeavors,
 though it be to the performance of rites merely.
 
 I hesitate to say these things, but it is not because of the subject--I
 care not how obscene my _words_ are--but because I cannot speak of them
 without betraying my impurity. We discourse freely without shame of one
 form of sensuality, and are silent about another. We are so degraded
 that we cannot speak simply of the necessary functions of human nature.
 In earlier ages, in some countries, every function was reverently
 spoken of and regulated by law. Nothing was too trivial for the Hindoo
 lawgiver, however offensive it may be to modern taste. He teaches how to
 eat, drink, cohabit, void excrement and urine, and the like, elevating
 what is mean, and does not falsely excuse himself by calling these
 things trifles.
 
 Every man is the builder of a temple, called his body, to the god he
 worships, after a style purely his own, nor can he get off by hammering
 marble instead. We are all sculptors and painters, and our material
 is our own flesh and blood and bones. Any nobleness begins at once to
 refine a man's features, any meanness or sensuality to imbrute them.
 
 John Farmer sat at his door one September evening, after a hard day's
 work, his mind still running on his labor more or less. Having bathed,
 he sat down to re-create his intellectual man. It was a rather cool
 evening, and some of his neighbors were apprehending a frost. He had
 not attended to the train of his thoughts long when he heard some one
 playing on a flute, and that sound harmonized with his mood. Still he
 thought of his work; but the burden of his thought was, that though this
 kept running in his head, and he found himself planning and contriving
 it against his will, yet it concerned him very little. It was no more
 than the scurf of his skin, which was constantly shuffled off. But the
 notes of the flute came home to his ears out of a different sphere
 from that he worked in, and suggested work for certain faculties which
 slumbered in him. They gently did away with the street, and the village,
 and the state in which he lived. A voice said to him--Why do you stay
 here and live this mean moiling life, when a glorious existence is
 possible for you? Those same stars twinkle over other fields than
 these.--But how to come out of this condition and actually migrate
 thither? All that he could think of was to practise some new austerity,
 to let his mind descend into his body and redeem it, and treat himself
 with ever increasing respect.
 
 
 
 
 Brute Neighbors
 
 
 Sometimes I had a companion in my fishing, who came through the village
 to my house from the other side of the town, and the catching of the
 dinner was as much a social exercise as the eating of it.
 
 _Hermit._ I wonder what the world is doing now. I have not heard so much
 as a locust over the sweet-fern these three hours. The pigeons are all
 asleep upon their roosts--no flutter from them. Was that a farmer's noon
 horn which sounded from beyond the woods just now? The hands are coming
 in to boiled salt beef and cider and Indian bread. Why will men worry
 themselves so? He that does not eat need not work. I wonder how much
 they have reaped. Who would live there where a body can never think
 for the barking of Bose? And oh, the housekeeping! to keep bright the
 devil's door-knobs, and scour his tubs this bright day! Better not
 keep a house. Say, some hollow tree; and then for morning calls and
 dinner-parties! Only a woodpecker tapping. Oh, they swarm; the sun is
 too warm there; they are born too far into life for me. I have water
 from the spring, and a loaf of brown bread on the shelf.--Hark! I hear a
 rustling of the leaves. Is it some ill-fed village hound yielding to
 the instinct of the chase? or the lost pig which is said to be in these
 woods, whose tracks I saw after the rain? It comes on apace; my sumachs
 and sweetbriers tremble.--Eh, Mr. Poet, is it you? How do you like the
 world to-day?
 
 _Poet._ See those clouds; how they hang! That's the greatest thing I have
 seen to-day. There's nothing like it in old paintings, nothing like it
 in foreign lands--unless when we were off the coast of Spain. That's a
 true Mediterranean sky. I thought, as I have my living to get, and have
 not eaten to-day, that I might go a-fishing. That's the true industry
 for poets. It is the only trade I have learned. Come, let's along.
 
 _Hermit._ I cannot resist. My brown bread will soon be gone. I will go
 with you gladly soon, but I am just concluding a serious meditation. I
 think that I am near the end of it. Leave me alone, then, for a while.
 But that we may not be delayed, you shall be digging the bait meanwhile.
 Angleworms are rarely to be met with in these parts, where the soil was
 never fattened with manure; the race is nearly extinct. The sport of
 digging the bait is nearly equal to that of catching the fish, when
 one's appetite is not too keen; and this you may have all to yourself
 today. I would advise you to set in the spade down yonder among the
 ground-nuts, where you see the johnswort waving. I think that I may
 warrant you one worm to every three sods you turn up, if you look well
 in among the roots of the grass, as if you were weeding. Or, if you
 choose to go farther, it will not be unwise, for I have found the
 increase of fair bait to be very nearly as the squares of the distances.
 
 _Hermit alone._ Let me see; where was I? Methinks I was nearly in this
 frame of mind; the world lay about at this angle. Shall I go to heaven
 or a-fishing? If I should soon bring this meditation to an end, would
 another so sweet occasion be likely to offer? I was as near being
 resolved into the essence of things as ever I was in my life. I fear
 my thoughts will not come back to me. If it would do any good, I would
 whistle for them. When they make us an offer, is it wise to say, We will
 think of it? My thoughts have left no track, and I cannot find the path
 again. What was it that I was thinking of? It was a very hazy day. I
 will just try these three sentences of Confut-see; they may fetch that
 state about again. I know not whether it was the dumps or a budding
 ecstasy. Mem. There never is but one opportunity of a kind.
 
 _Poet._ How now, Hermit, is it too soon? I have got just thirteen whole
 ones, beside several which are imperfect or undersized; but they will
 do for the smaller fry; they do not cover up the hook so much. Those
 village worms are quite too large; a shiner may make a meal off one
 without finding the skewer.
 
 _Hermit._ Well, then, let's be off. Shall we to the Concord? There's good
 sport there if the water be not too high.
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 Why do precisely these objects which we behold make a world? Why has
 man just these species of animals for his neighbors; as if nothing but
 a mouse could have filled this crevice? I suspect that Pilpay & Co. have
 put animals to their best use, for they are all beasts of burden, in a
 sense, made to carry some portion of our thoughts.
 
 The mice which haunted my house were not the common ones, which are said
 to have been introduced into the country, but a wild native kind not
 found in the village. I sent one to a distinguished naturalist, and
 it interested him much. When I was building, one of these had its nest
 underneath the house, and before I had laid the second floor, and swept
 out the shavings, would come out regularly at lunch time and pick up the
 crumbs at my feet. It probably had never seen a man before; and it soon
 became quite familiar, and would run over my shoes and up my clothes.
 It could readily ascend the sides of the room by short impulses, like a
 squirrel, which it resembled in its motions. At length, as I leaned
 with my elbow on the bench one day, it ran up my clothes, and along my
 sleeve, and round and round the paper which held my dinner, while I kept
 the latter close, and dodged and played at bopeep with it; and when at
 last I held still a piece of cheese between my thumb and finger, it came
 and nibbled it, sitting in my hand, and afterward cleaned its face and
 paws, like a fly, and walked away.
 
 A phoebe soon built in my shed, and a robin for protection in a pine
 which grew against the house. In June the partridge (_Tetrao umbellus_),
 which is so shy a bird, led her brood past my windows, from the woods in
 the rear to the front of my house, clucking and calling to them like a
 hen, and in all her behavior proving herself the hen of the woods. The
 young suddenly disperse on your approach, at a signal from the mother,
 as if a whirlwind had swept them away, and they so exactly resemble the
 dried leaves and twigs that many a traveler has placed his foot in the
 midst of a brood, and heard the whir of the old bird as she flew off,
 and her anxious calls and mewing, or seen her trail her wings to attract
 his attention, without suspecting their neighborhood. The parent will
 sometimes roll and spin round before you in such a dishabille, that you
 cannot, for a few moments, detect what kind of creature it is. The young
 squat still and flat, often running their heads under a leaf, and mind
 only their mother's directions given from a distance, nor will your
 approach make them run again and betray themselves. You may even tread
 on them, or have your eyes on them for a minute, without discovering
 them. I have held them in my open hand at such a time, and still their
 only care, obedient to their mother and their instinct, was to squat
 there without fear or trembling. So perfect is this instinct, that once,
 when I had laid them on the leaves again, and one accidentally fell on
 its side, it was found with the rest in exactly the same position ten
 minutes afterward. They are not callow like the young of most birds,
 but more perfectly developed and precocious even than chickens. The
 remarkably adult yet innocent expression of their open and serene
 eyes is very memorable. All intelligence seems reflected in them. They
 suggest not merely the purity of infancy, but a wisdom clarified by
 experience. Such an eye was not born when the bird was, but is coeval
 with the sky it reflects. The woods do not yield another such a gem. The
 traveller does not often look into such a limpid well. The ignorant or
 reckless sportsman often shoots the parent at such a time, and leaves
 these innocents to fall a prey to some prowling beast or bird, or
 gradually mingle with the decaying leaves which they so much resemble.
 It is said that when hatched by a hen they will directly disperse on
 some alarm, and so are lost, for they never hear the mother's call which
 gathers them again. These were my hens and chickens.
 
 It is remarkable how many creatures live wild and free though secret in
 the woods, and still sustain themselves in the neighborhood of towns,
 suspected by hunters only. How retired the otter manages to live here!
 He grows to be four feet long, as big as a small boy, perhaps without
 any human being getting a glimpse of him. I formerly saw the raccoon in
 the woods behind where my house is built, and probably still heard their
 whinnering at night. Commonly I rested an hour or two in the shade at
 noon, after planting, and ate my lunch, and read a little by a spring
 which was the source of a swamp and of a brook, oozing from under
 Brister's Hill, half a mile from my field. The approach to this was
 through a succession of descending grassy hollows, full of young pitch
 pines, into a larger wood about the swamp. There, in a very secluded and
 shaded spot, under a spreading white pine, there was yet a clean, firm
 sward to sit on. I had dug out the spring and made a well of clear gray
 water, where I could dip up a pailful without roiling it, and thither I
 went for this purpose almost every day in midsummer, when the pond was
 warmest. Thither, too, the woodcock led her brood, to probe the mud for
 worms, flying but a foot above them down the bank, while they ran in
 a troop beneath; but at last, spying me, she would leave her young and
 circle round and round me, nearer and nearer till within four or five
 feet, pretending broken wings and legs, to attract my attention, and get
 off her young, who would already have taken up their march, with faint,
 wiry peep, single file through the swamp, as she directed. Or I heard
 the peep of the young when I could not see the parent bird. There too
 the turtle doves sat over the spring, or fluttered from bough to bough
 of the soft white pines over my head; or the red squirrel, coursing down
 the nearest bough, was particularly familiar and inquisitive. You only
 need sit still long enough in some attractive spot in the woods that all
 its inhabitants may exhibit themselves to you by turns.
 
 I was witness to events of a less peaceful character. One day when I
 went out to my wood-pile, or rather my pile of stumps, I observed two
 large ants, the one red, the other much larger, nearly half an inch
 long, and black, fiercely contending with one another. Having once got
 hold they never let go, but struggled and wrestled and rolled on the
 chips incessantly. Looking farther, I was surprised to find that the
 chips were covered with such combatants, that it was not a _duellum_, but
 a _bellum_, a war between two races of ants, the red always pitted against
 the black, and frequently two red ones to one black. The legions of
 these Myrmidons covered all the hills and vales in my wood-yard, and the
 ground was already strewn with the dead and dying, both red and
 black. It was the only battle which I have ever witnessed, the only
 battle-field I ever trod while the battle was raging; internecine war;
 the red republicans on the one hand, and the black imperialists on the
 other. On every side they were engaged in deadly combat, yet without any
 noise that I could hear, and human soldiers never fought so resolutely.
 I watched a couple that were fast locked in each other's embraces, in
 a little sunny valley amid the chips, now at noonday prepared to fight
 till the sun went down, or life went out. The smaller red champion had
 fastened himself like a vice to his adversary's front, and through all
 the tumblings on that field never for an instant ceased to gnaw at one
 of his feelers near the root, having already caused the other to go by
 the board; while the stronger black one dashed him from side to side,
 and, as I saw on looking nearer, had already divested him of several of
 his members. They fought with more pertinacity than bulldogs. Neither
 manifested the least disposition to retreat. It was evident that their
 battle-cry was "Conquer or die." In the meanwhile there came along
 a single red ant on the hillside of this valley, evidently full of
 excitement, who either had despatched his foe, or had not yet taken part
 in the battle; probably the latter, for he had lost none of his limbs;
 whose mother had charged him to return with his shield or upon it. Or
 perchance he was some Achilles, who had nourished his wrath apart, and
 had now come to avenge or rescue his Patroclus. He saw this unequal
 combat from afar--for the blacks were nearly twice the size of the
 red--he drew near with rapid pace till he stood on his guard within half
 an inch of the combatants; then, watching his opportunity, he sprang
 upon the black warrior, and commenced his operations near the root of
 his right fore leg, leaving the foe to select among his own members; and
 so there were three united for life, as if a new kind of attraction had
 been invented which put all other locks and cements to shame. I should
 not have wondered by this time to find that they had their respective
 musical bands stationed on some eminent chip, and playing their national
 airs the while, to excite the slow and cheer the dying combatants. I was
 myself excited somewhat even as if they had been men. The more you think
 of it, the less the difference. And certainly there is not the fight
 recorded in Concord history, at least, if in the history of America,
 that will bear a moment's comparison with this, whether for the numbers
 engaged in it, or for the patriotism and heroism displayed. For numbers
 and for carnage it was an Austerlitz or Dresden. Concord Fight! Two
 killed on the patriots' side, and Luther Blanchard wounded! Why here
 every ant was a Buttrick--"Fire! for God's sake fire!"--and thousands
 shared the fate of Davis and Hosmer. There was not one hireling there.
 I have no doubt that it was a principle they fought for, as much as
 our ancestors, and not to avoid a three-penny tax on their tea; and the
 results of this battle will be as important and memorable to those whom
 it concerns as those of the battle of Bunker Hill, at least.
 
 I took up the chip on which the three I have particularly described were
 struggling, carried it into my house, and placed it under a tumbler on
 my window-sill, in order to see the issue. Holding a microscope to the
 first-mentioned red ant, I saw that, though he was assiduously gnawing
 at the near fore leg of his enemy, having severed his remaining feeler,
 his own breast was all torn away, exposing what vitals he had there
 to the jaws of the black warrior, whose breastplate was apparently too
 thick for him to pierce; and the dark carbuncles of the sufferer's eyes
 shone with ferocity such as war only could excite. They struggled half
 an hour longer under the tumbler, and when I looked again the black
 soldier had severed the heads of his foes from their bodies, and the
 still living heads were hanging on either side of him like ghastly
 trophies at his saddle-bow, still apparently as firmly fastened as ever,
 and he was endeavoring with feeble struggles, being without feelers and
 with only the remnant of a leg, and I know not how many other wounds,
 to divest himself of them; which at length, after half an hour more, he
 accomplished. I raised the glass, and he went off over the window-sill
 in that crippled state. Whether he finally survived that combat, and
 spent the remainder of his days in some Hotel des Invalides, I do
 not know; but I thought that his industry would not be worth much
 thereafter. I never learned which party was victorious, nor the cause of
 the war; but I felt for the rest of that day as if I had had my feelings
 excited and harrowed by witnessing the struggle, the ferocity and
 carnage, of a human battle before my door.
 
 Kirby and Spence tell us that the battles of ants have long been
 celebrated and the date of them recorded, though they say that Huber
 is the only modern author who appears to have witnessed them. "Aneas
 Sylvius," say they, "after giving a very circumstantial account of one
 contested with great obstinacy by a great and small species on the trunk
 of a pear tree," adds that "this action was fought in the pontificate
 of Eugenius the Fourth, in the presence of Nicholas Pistoriensis, an
 eminent lawyer, who related the whole history of the battle with the
 greatest fidelity." A similar engagement between great and small ants is
 recorded by Olaus Magnus, in which the small ones, being victorious, are
 said to have buried the bodies of their own soldiers, but left those of
 their giant enemies a prey to the birds. This event happened previous
 to the expulsion of the tyrant Christiern the Second from Sweden. The
 battle which I witnessed took place in the Presidency of Polk, five
 years before the passage of Webster's Fugitive-Slave Bill.
 
 Many a village Bose, fit only to course a mud-turtle in a victualling
 cellar, sported his heavy quarters in the woods, without the knowledge
 of his master, and ineffectually smelled at old fox burrows and
 woodchucks' holes; led perchance by some slight cur which nimbly
 threaded the wood, and might still inspire a natural terror in its
 denizens;--now far behind his guide, barking like a canine bull toward
 some small squirrel which had treed itself for scrutiny, then, cantering
 off, bending the bushes with his weight, imagining that he is on the
 track of some stray member of the jerbilla family. Once I was surprised
 to see a cat walking along the stony shore of the pond, for they rarely
 wander so far from home. The surprise was mutual. Nevertheless the most
 domestic cat, which has lain on a rug all her days, appears quite at
 home in the woods, and, by her sly and stealthy behavior, proves herself
 more native there than the regular inhabitants. Once, when berrying,
 I met with a cat with young kittens in the woods, quite wild, and they
 all, like their mother, had their backs up and were fiercely spitting at
 me. A few years before I lived in the woods there was what was called a
 "winged cat" in one of the farm-houses in Lincoln nearest the pond, Mr.
 Gilian Baker's. When I called to see her in June, 1842, she was gone
 a-hunting in the woods, as was her wont (I am not sure whether it was
 a male or female, and so use the more common pronoun), but her mistress
 told me that she came into the neighborhood a little more than a year
 before, in April, and was finally taken into their house; that she was
 of a dark brownish-gray color, with a white spot on her throat, and
 white feet, and had a large bushy tail like a fox; that in the winter
 the fur grew thick and flatted out along her sides, forming stripes ten
 or twelve inches long by two and a half wide, and under her chin like
 a muff, the upper side loose, the under matted like felt, and in the
 spring these appendages dropped off. They gave me a pair of her "wings,"
 which I keep still. There is no appearance of a membrane about them.
 Some thought it was part flying squirrel or some other wild animal,
 which is not impossible, for, according to naturalists, prolific hybrids
 have been produced by the union of the marten and domestic cat. This
 would have been the right kind of cat for me to keep, if I had kept any;
 for why should not a poet's cat be winged as well as his horse?
 
 In the fall the loon (_Colymbus glacialis_) came, as usual, to moult and
 bathe in the pond, making the woods ring with his wild laughter before I
 had risen. At rumor of his arrival all the Mill-dam sportsmen are on the
 alert, in gigs and on foot, two by two and three by three, with patent
 rifles and conical balls and spy-glasses. They come rustling through
 the woods like autumn leaves, at least ten men to one loon. Some station
 themselves on this side of the pond, some on that, for the poor bird
 cannot be omnipresent; if he dive here he must come up there. But
 now the kind October wind rises, rustling the leaves and rippling the
 surface of the water, so that no loon can be heard or seen, though his
 foes sweep the pond with spy-glasses, and make the woods resound with
 their discharges. The waves generously rise and dash angrily, taking
 sides with all water-fowl, and our sportsmen must beat a retreat to town
 and shop and unfinished jobs. But they were too often successful. When
 I went to get a pail of water early in the morning I frequently saw this
 stately bird sailing out of my cove within a few rods. If I endeavored
 to overtake him in a boat, in order to see how he would manoeuvre, he
 would dive and be completely lost, so that I did not discover him again,
 sometimes, till the latter part of the day. But I was more than a match
 for him on the surface. He commonly went off in a rain.
 
 As I was paddling along the north shore one very calm October afternoon,
 for such days especially they settle on to the lakes, like the milkweed
 down, having looked in vain over the pond for a loon, suddenly one,
 sailing out from the shore toward the middle a few rods in front of me,
 set up his wild laugh and betrayed himself. I pursued with a paddle and
 he dived, but when he came up I was nearer than before. He dived again,
 but I miscalculated the direction he would take, and we were fifty rods
 apart when he came to the surface this time, for I had helped to widen
 the interval; and again he laughed long and loud, and with more reason
 than before. He manoeuvred so cunningly that I could not get within half
 a dozen rods of him. Each time, when he came to the surface, turning his
 head this way and that, he cooly surveyed the water and the land, and
 apparently chose his course so that he might come up where there was the
 widest expanse of water and at the greatest distance from the boat. It
 was surprising how quickly he made up his mind and put his resolve into
 execution. He led me at once to the widest part of the pond, and could
 not be driven from it. While he was thinking one thing in his brain,
 I was endeavoring to divine his thought in mine. It was a pretty game,
 played on the smooth surface of the pond, a man against a loon. Suddenly
 your adversary's checker disappears beneath the board, and the problem
 is to place yours nearest to where his will appear again. Sometimes he
 would come up unexpectedly on the opposite side of me, having
 apparently passed directly under the boat. So long-winded was he and so
 unweariable, that when he had swum farthest he would immediately plunge
 again, nevertheless; and then no wit could divine where in the deep
 pond, beneath the smooth surface, he might be speeding his way like a
 fish, for he had time and ability to visit the bottom of the pond in
 its deepest part. It is said that loons have been caught in the New York
 lakes eighty feet beneath the surface, with hooks set for trout--though
 Walden is deeper than that. How surprised must the fishes be to see
 this ungainly visitor from another sphere speeding his way amid their
 schools! Yet he appeared to know his course as surely under water as on
 the surface, and swam much faster there. Once or twice I saw a ripple
 where he approached the surface, just put his head out to reconnoitre,
 and instantly dived again. I found that it was as well for me to rest
 on my oars and wait his reappearing as to endeavor to calculate where he
 would rise; for again and again, when I was straining my eyes over the
 surface one way, I would suddenly be startled by his unearthly laugh
 behind me. But why, after displaying so much cunning, did he invariably
 betray himself the moment he came up by that loud laugh? Did not his
 white breast enough betray him? He was indeed a silly loon, I thought. I
 could commonly hear the splash of the water when he came up, and so also
 detected him. But after an hour he seemed as fresh as ever, dived as
 willingly, and swam yet farther than at first. It was surprising to see
 how serenely he sailed off with unruffled breast when he came to the
 surface, doing all the work with his webbed feet beneath. His usual note
 was this demoniac laughter, yet somewhat like that of a water-fowl; but
 occasionally, when he had balked me most successfully and come up a long
 way off, he uttered a long-drawn unearthly howl, probably more like that
 of a wolf than any bird; as when a beast puts his muzzle to the ground
 and deliberately howls. This was his looning--perhaps the wildest sound
 that is ever heard here, making the woods ring far and wide. I concluded
 that he laughed in derision of my efforts, confident of his own
 resources. Though the sky was by this time overcast, the pond was so
 smooth that I could see where he broke the surface when I did not hear
 him. His white breast, the stillness of the air, and the smoothness of
 the water were all against him. At length having come up fifty rods off,
 he uttered one of those prolonged howls, as if calling on the god of
 loons to aid him, and immediately there came a wind from the east and
 rippled the surface, and filled the whole air with misty rain, and I was
 impressed as if it were the prayer of the loon answered, and his god was
 angry with me; and so I left him disappearing far away on the tumultuous
 surface.
 
 For hours, in fall days, I watched the ducks cunningly tack and veer and
 hold the middle of the pond, far from the sportsman; tricks which they
 will have less need to practise in Louisiana bayous. When compelled to
 rise they would sometimes circle round and round and over the pond at a
 considerable height, from which they could easily see to other ponds
 and the river, like black motes in the sky; and, when I thought they had
 gone off thither long since, they would settle down by a slanting flight
 of a quarter of a mile on to a distant part which was left free; but
 what beside safety they got by sailing in the middle of Walden I do not
 know, unless they love its water for the same reason that I do.
 
 
 
 
 House-Warming
 
 
 In October I went a-graping to the river meadows, and loaded myself with
 clusters more precious for their beauty and fragrance than for food.
 There, too, I admired, though I did not gather, the cranberries, small
 waxen gems, pendants of the meadow grass, pearly and red, which the
 farmer plucks with an ugly rake, leaving the smooth meadow in a snarl,
 heedlessly measuring them by the bushel and the dollar only, and sells
 the spoils of the meads to Boston and New York; destined to be _jammed_,
 to satisfy the tastes of lovers of Nature there. So butchers rake the
 tongues of bison out of the prairie grass, regardless of the torn and
 drooping plant. The barberry's brilliant fruit was likewise food for my
 eyes merely; but I collected a small store of wild apples for coddling,
 which the proprietor and travellers had overlooked. When chestnuts were
 ripe I laid up half a bushel for winter. It was very exciting at that
 season to roam the then boundless chestnut woods of Lincoln--they now
 sleep their long sleep under the railroad--with a bag on my shoulder,
 and a stick to open burs with in my hand, for I did not always wait for
 the frost, amid the rustling of leaves and the loud reproofs of the red
 squirrels and the jays, whose half-consumed nuts I sometimes stole,
 for the burs which they had selected were sure to contain sound ones.
 Occasionally I climbed and shook the trees. They grew also behind my
 house, and one large tree, which almost overshadowed it, was, when
 in flower, a bouquet which scented the whole neighborhood, but the
 squirrels and the jays got most of its fruit; the last coming in flocks
 early in the morning and picking the nuts out of the burs before they
 fell, I relinquished these trees to them and visited the more distant
 woods composed wholly of chestnut. These nuts, as far as they went, were
 a good substitute for bread. Many other substitutes might, perhaps, be
 found. Digging one day for fishworms, I discovered the ground-nut
 (_Apios tuberosa_) on its string, the potato of the aborigines, a sort of
 fabulous fruit, which I had begun to doubt if I had ever dug and eaten
 in childhood, as I had told, and had not dreamed it. I had often since
 seen its crumpled red velvety blossom supported by the stems of other
 plants without knowing it to be the same. Cultivation has well-nigh
 exterminated it. It has a sweetish taste, much like that of a
 frost-bitten potato, and I found it better boiled than roasted. This
 tuber seemed like a faint promise of Nature to rear her own children
 and feed them simply here at some future period. In these days of fatted
 cattle and waving grain-fields this humble root, which was once the
 _totem_ of an Indian tribe, is quite forgotten, or known only by its
 flowering vine; but let wild Nature reign here once more, and the tender
 and luxurious English grains will probably disappear before a myriad of
 foes, and without the care of man the crow may carry back even the
 last seed of corn to the great cornfield of the Indian's God in the
 southwest, whence he is said to have brought it; but the now almost
 exterminated ground-nut will perhaps revive and flourish in spite of
 frosts and wildness, prove itself indigenous, and resume its ancient
 importance and dignity as the diet of the hunter tribe. Some Indian
 Ceres or Minerva must have been the inventor and bestower of it; and
 when the reign of poetry commences here, its leaves and string of nuts
 may be represented on our works of art.
 
 Already, by the first of September, I had seen two or three small maples
 turned scarlet across the pond, beneath where the white stems of three
 aspens diverged, at the point of a promontory, next the water. Ah, many
 a tale their color told! And gradually from week to week the character
 of each tree came out, and it admired itself reflected in the smooth
 mirror of the lake. Each morning the manager of this gallery substituted
 some new picture, distinguished by more brilliant or harmonious
 coloring, for the old upon the walls.
 
 The wasps came by thousands to my lodge in October, as to winter
 quarters, and settled on my windows within and on the walls overhead,
 sometimes deterring visitors from entering. Each morning, when they were
 numbed with cold, I swept some of them out, but I did not trouble myself
 much to get rid of them; I even felt complimented by their regarding my
 house as a desirable shelter. They never molested me seriously, though
 they bedded with me; and they gradually disappeared, into what crevices
 I do not know, avoiding winter and unspeakable cold.
 
 Like the wasps, before I finally went into winter quarters in November,
 I used to resort to the northeast side of Walden, which the sun,
 reflected from the pitch pine woods and the stony shore, made the
 fireside of the pond; it is so much pleasanter and wholesomer to be
 warmed by the sun while you can be, than by an artificial fire. I thus
 warmed myself by the still glowing embers which the summer, like a
 departed hunter, had left.
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 When I came to build my chimney I studied masonry. My bricks, being
 second-hand ones, required to be cleaned with a trowel, so that I
 learned more than usual of the qualities of bricks and trowels. The
 mortar on them was fifty years old, and was said to be still growing
 harder; but this is one of those sayings which men love to repeat
 whether they are true or not. Such sayings themselves grow harder and
 adhere more firmly with age, and it would take many blows with a trowel
 to clean an old wiseacre of them. Many of the villages of Mesopotamia
 are built of second-hand bricks of a very good quality, obtained from
 the ruins of Babylon, and the cement on them is older and probably
 harder still. However that may be, I was struck by the peculiar
 toughness of the steel which bore so many violent blows without being
 worn out. As my bricks had been in a chimney before, though I did not
 read the name of Nebuchadnezzar on them, I picked out as many fireplace
 bricks as I could find, to save work and waste, and I filled the spaces
 between the bricks about the fireplace with stones from the pond shore,
 and also made my mortar with the white sand from the same place. I
 lingered most about the fireplace, as the most vital part of the house.
 Indeed, I worked so deliberately, that though I commenced at the ground
 in the morning, a course of bricks raised a few inches above the floor
 served for my pillow at night; yet I did not get a stiff neck for it
 that I remember; my stiff neck is of older date. I took a poet to board
 for a fortnight about those times, which caused me to be put to it for
 room. He brought his own knife, though I had two, and we used to scour
 them by thrusting them into the earth. He shared with me the labors
 of cooking. I was pleased to see my work rising so square and solid by
 degrees, and reflected, that, if it proceeded slowly, it was calculated
 to endure a long time. The chimney is to some extent an independent
 structure, standing on the ground, and rising through the house to the
 heavens; even after the house is burned it still stands sometimes, and
 its importance and independence are apparent. This was toward the end of
 summer. It was now November.
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 The north wind had already begun to cool the pond, though it took many
 weeks of steady blowing to accomplish it, it is so deep. When I began to
 have a fire at evening, before I plastered my house, the chimney carried
 smoke particularly well, because of the numerous chinks between the
 boards. Yet I passed some cheerful evenings in that cool and airy
 apartment, surrounded by the rough brown boards full of knots, and
 rafters with the bark on high overhead. My house never pleased my eye so
 much after it was plastered, though I was obliged to confess that it
 was more comfortable. Should not every apartment in which man dwells be
 lofty enough to create some obscurity overhead, where flickering shadows
 may play at evening about the rafters? These forms are more agreeable
 to the fancy and imagination than fresco paintings or other the most
 expensive furniture. I now first began to inhabit my house, I may say,
 when I began to use it for warmth as well as shelter. I had got a couple
 of old fire-dogs to keep the wood from the hearth, and it did me good
 to see the soot form on the back of the chimney which I had built, and
 I poked the fire with more right and more satisfaction than usual. My
 dwelling was small, and I could hardly entertain an echo in it; but it
 seemed larger for being a single apartment and remote from neighbors.
 All the attractions of a house were concentrated in one room; it was
 kitchen, chamber, parlor, and keeping-room; and whatever satisfaction
 parent or child, master or servant, derive from living in a house, I
 enjoyed it all. Cato says, the master of a family (_patremfamilias_) must
 have in his rustic villa "cellam oleariam, vinariam, dolia multa, uti
 lubeat caritatem expectare, et rei, et virtuti, et gloriae erit," that
 is, "an oil and wine cellar, many casks, so that it may be pleasant to
 expect hard times; it will be for his advantage, and virtue, and glory."
 I had in my cellar a firkin of potatoes, about two quarts of peas with
 the weevil in them, and on my shelf a little rice, a jug of molasses,
 and of rye and Indian meal a peck each.
 
 I sometimes dream of a larger and more populous house, standing in a
 golden age, of enduring materials, and without gingerbread work,
 which shall still consist of only one room, a vast, rude, substantial,
 primitive hall, without ceiling or plastering, with bare rafters and
 purlins supporting a sort of lower heaven over one's head--useful to
 keep off rain and snow, where the king and queen posts stand out to
 receive your homage, when you have done reverence to the prostrate
 Saturn of an older dynasty on stepping over the sill; a cavernous house,
 wherein you must reach up a torch upon a pole to see the roof; where
 some may live in the fireplace, some in the recess of a window, and some
 on settles, some at one end of the hall, some at another, and some aloft
 on rafters with the spiders, if they choose; a house which you have got
 into when you have opened the outside door, and the ceremony is over;
 where the weary traveller may wash, and eat, and converse, and sleep,
 without further journey; such a shelter as you would be glad to reach
 in a tempestuous night, containing all the essentials of a house, and
 nothing for house-keeping; where you can see all the treasures of the
 house at one view, and everything hangs upon its peg, that a man should
 use; at once kitchen, pantry, parlor, chamber, storehouse, and garret;
 where you can see so necessary a thing, as a barrel or a ladder, so
 convenient a thing as a cupboard, and hear the pot boil, and pay your
 respects to the fire that cooks your dinner, and the oven that bakes
 your bread, and the necessary furniture and utensils are the chief
 ornaments; where the washing is not put out, nor the fire, nor the
 mistress, and perhaps you are sometimes requested to move from off the
 trap-door, when the cook would descend into the cellar, and so learn
 whether the ground is solid or hollow beneath you without stamping. A
 house whose inside is as open and manifest as a bird's nest, and you
 cannot go in at the front door and out at the back without seeing some
 of its inhabitants; where to be a guest is to be presented with the
 freedom of the house, and not to be carefully excluded from seven
 eighths of it, shut up in a particular cell, and told to make yourself
 at home there--in solitary confinement. Nowadays the host does not
 admit you to _his_ hearth, but has got the mason to build one for yourself
 somewhere in his alley, and hospitality is the art of _keeping_ you at the
 greatest distance. There is as much secrecy about the cooking as if he
 had a design to poison you. I am aware that I have been on many a man's
 premises, and might have been legally ordered off, but I am not aware
 that I have been in many men's houses. I might visit in my old clothes a
 king and queen who lived simply in such a house as I have described, if
 I were going their way; but backing out of a modern palace will be all
 that I shall desire to learn, if ever I am caught in one.
 
 It would seem as if the very language of our parlors would lose all
 its nerve and degenerate into _palaver_ wholly, our lives pass at
 such remoteness from its symbols, and its metaphors and tropes are
 necessarily so far fetched, through slides and dumb-waiters, as it were;
 in other words, the parlor is so far from the kitchen and workshop. The
 dinner even is only the parable of a dinner, commonly. As if only the
 savage dwelt near enough to Nature and Truth to borrow a trope from
 them. How can the scholar, who dwells away in the North West Territory
 or the Isle of Man, tell what is parliamentary in the kitchen?
 
 However, only one or two of my guests were ever bold enough to stay and
 eat a hasty-pudding with me; but when they saw that crisis approaching
 they beat a hasty retreat rather, as if it would shake the house to its
 foundations. Nevertheless, it stood through a great many hasty-puddings.
 
 I did not plaster till it was freezing weather. I brought over some
 whiter and cleaner sand for this purpose from the opposite shore of the
 pond in a boat, a sort of conveyance which would have tempted me to go
 much farther if necessary. My house had in the meanwhile been shingled
 down to the ground on every side. In lathing I was pleased to be able
 to send home each nail with a single blow of the hammer, and it was my
 ambition to transfer the plaster from the board to the wall neatly and
 rapidly. I remembered the story of a conceited fellow, who, in fine
 clothes, was wont to lounge about the village once, giving advice to
 workmen. Venturing one day to substitute deeds for words, he turned
 up his cuffs, seized a plasterer's board, and having loaded his trowel
 without mishap, with a complacent look toward the lathing overhead,
 made a bold gesture thitherward; and straightway, to his complete
 discomfiture, received the whole contents in his ruffled bosom. I
 admired anew the economy and convenience of plastering, which so
 effectually shuts out the cold and takes a handsome finish, and I
 learned the various casualties to which the plasterer is liable. I was
 surprised to see how thirsty the bricks were which drank up all the
 moisture in my plaster before I had smoothed it, and how many pailfuls
 of water it takes to christen a new hearth. I had the previous winter
 made a small quantity of lime by burning the shells of the _Unio
 fluviatilis_, which our river affords, for the sake of the experiment;
 so that I knew where my materials came from. I might have got good
 limestone within a mile or two and burned it myself, if I had cared to
 do so.
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 The pond had in the meanwhile skimmed over in the shadiest and
 shallowest coves, some days or even weeks before the general freezing.
 The first ice is especially interesting and perfect, being hard, dark,
 and transparent, and affords the best opportunity that ever offers for
 examining the bottom where it is shallow; for you can lie at your length
 on ice only an inch thick, like a skater insect on the surface of the
 water, and study the bottom at your leisure, only two or three inches
 distant, like a picture behind a glass, and the water is necessarily
 always smooth then. There are many furrows in the sand where some
 creature has travelled about and doubled on its tracks; and, for wrecks,
 it is strewn with the cases of caddis-worms made of minute grains of
 white quartz. Perhaps these have creased it, for you find some of their
 cases in the furrows, though they are deep and broad for them to make.
 But the ice itself is the object of most interest, though you must
 improve the earliest opportunity to study it. If you examine it closely
 the morning after it freezes, you find that the greater part of the
 bubbles, which at first appeared to be within it, are against its under
 surface, and that more are continually rising from the bottom; while the
 ice is as yet comparatively solid and dark, that is, you see the water
 through it. These bubbles are from an eightieth to an eighth of an inch
 in diameter, very clear and beautiful, and you see your face reflected
 in them through the ice. There may be thirty or forty of them to
 a square inch. There are also already within the ice narrow oblong
 perpendicular bubbles about half an inch long, sharp cones with the apex
 upward; or oftener, if the ice is quite fresh, minute spherical bubbles
 one directly above another, like a string of beads. But these within the
 ice are not so numerous nor obvious as those beneath. I sometimes used
 to cast on stones to try the strength of the ice, and those which
 broke through carried in air with them, which formed very large and
 conspicuous white bubbles beneath. One day when I came to the same place
 forty-eight hours afterward, I found that those large bubbles were
 still perfect, though an inch more of ice had formed, as I could see
 distinctly by the seam in the edge of a cake. But as the last two
 days had been very warm, like an Indian summer, the ice was not now
 transparent, showing the dark green color of the water, and the bottom,
 but opaque and whitish or gray, and though twice as thick was hardly
 stronger than before, for the air bubbles had greatly expanded under
 this heat and run together, and lost their regularity; they were no
 longer one directly over another, but often like silvery coins poured
 from a bag, one overlapping another, or in thin flakes, as if occupying
 slight cleavages. The beauty of the ice was gone, and it was too late to
 study the bottom. Being curious to know what position my great bubbles
 occupied with regard to the new ice, I broke out a cake containing a
 middling sized one, and turned it bottom upward. The new ice had formed
 around and under the bubble, so that it was included between the two
 ices. It was wholly in the lower ice, but close against the upper, and
 was flattish, or perhaps slightly lenticular, with a rounded edge, a
 quarter of an inch deep by four inches in diameter; and I was surprised
 to find that directly under the bubble the ice was melted with great
 regularity in the form of a saucer reversed, to the height of five
 eighths of an inch in the middle, leaving a thin partition there between
 the water and the bubble, hardly an eighth of an inch thick; and in many
 places the small bubbles in this partition had burst out downward, and
 probably there was no ice at all under the largest bubbles, which were a
 foot in diameter. I inferred that the infinite number of minute bubbles
 which I had first seen against the under surface of the ice were now
 frozen in likewise, and that each, in its degree, had operated like
 a burning-glass on the ice beneath to melt and rot it. These are the
 little air-guns which contribute to make the ice crack and whoop.
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 At length the winter set in good earnest, just as I had finished
 plastering, and the wind began to howl around the house as if it had
 not had permission to do so till then. Night after night the geese came
 lumbering in the dark with a clangor and a whistling of wings, even
 after the ground was covered with snow, some to alight in Walden, and
 some flying low over the woods toward Fair Haven, bound for Mexico.
 Several times, when returning from the village at ten or eleven o'clock
 at night, I heard the tread of a flock of geese, or else ducks, on the
 dry leaves in the woods by a pond-hole behind my dwelling, where they
 had come up to feed, and the faint honk or quack of their leader as they
 hurried off. In 1845 Walden froze entirely over for the first time on
 the night of the 22d of December, Flint's and other shallower ponds and
 the river having been frozen ten days or more; in '46, the 16th; in '49,
 about the 31st; and in '50, about the 27th of December; in '52, the 5th
 of January; in '53, the 31st of December. The snow had already covered
 the ground since the 25th of November, and surrounded me suddenly
 with the scenery of winter. I withdrew yet farther into my shell, and
 endeavored to keep a bright fire both within my house and within my
 breast. My employment out of doors now was to collect the dead wood in
 the forest, bringing it in my hands or on my shoulders, or sometimes
 trailing a dead pine tree under each arm to my shed. An old forest fence
 which had seen its best days was a great haul for me. I sacrificed it
 to Vulcan, for it was past serving the god Terminus. How much more
 interesting an event is that man's supper who has just been forth in the
 snow to hunt, nay, you might say, steal, the fuel to cook it with! His
 bread and meat are sweet. There are enough fagots and waste wood of all
 kinds in the forests of most of our towns to support many fires, but
 which at present warm none, and, some think, hinder the growth of the
 young wood. There was also the driftwood of the pond. In the course of
 the summer I had discovered a raft of pitch pine logs with the bark on,
 pinned together by the Irish when the railroad was built. This I hauled
 up partly on the shore. After soaking two years and then lying high six
 months it was perfectly sound, though waterlogged past drying. I amused
 myself one winter day with sliding this piecemeal across the pond,
 nearly half a mile, skating behind with one end of a log fifteen feet
 long on my shoulder, and the other on the ice; or I tied several logs
 together with a birch withe, and then, with a longer birch or alder
 which had a hook at the end, dragged them across. Though completely
 waterlogged and almost as heavy as lead, they not only burned long, but
 made a very hot fire; nay, I thought that they burned better for the
 soaking, as if the pitch, being confined by the water, burned longer, as
 in a lamp.
 
 Gilpin, in his account of the forest borderers of England, says that
 "the encroachments of trespassers, and the houses and fences thus raised
 on the borders of the forest," were "considered as great nuisances
 by the old forest law, and were severely punished under the name of
 _purprestures_, as tending _ad terrorem ferarum--ad nocumentum forestae_,
 etc.," to the frightening of the game and the detriment of the forest.
 But I was interested in the preservation of the venison and the vert
 more than the hunters or woodchoppers, and as much as though I had been
 the Lord Warden himself; and if any part was burned, though I burned it
 myself by accident, I grieved with a grief that lasted longer and was
 more inconsolable than that of the proprietors; nay, I grieved when it
 was cut down by the proprietors themselves. I would that our farmers
 when they cut down a forest felt some of that awe which the old Romans
 did when they came to thin, or let in the light to, a consecrated grove
 (_lucum conlucare_), that is, would believe that it is sacred to some
 god. The Roman made an expiatory offering, and prayed, Whatever god or
 goddess thou art to whom this grove is sacred, be propitious to me, my
 family, and children, etc.
 
 It is remarkable what a value is still put upon wood even in this age
 and in this new country, a value more permanent and universal than that
 of gold. After all our discoveries and inventions no man will go by a
 pile of wood. It is as precious to us as it was to our Saxon and Norman
 ancestors. If they made their bows of it, we make our gun-stocks of it.
 Michaux, more than thirty years ago, says that the price of wood for
 fuel in New York and Philadelphia "nearly equals, and sometimes exceeds,
 that of the best wood in Paris, though this immense capital annually
 requires more than three hundred thousand cords, and is surrounded to
 the distance of three hundred miles by cultivated plains." In this town
 the price of wood rises almost steadily, and the only question is, how
 much higher it is to be this year than it was the last. Mechanics and
 tradesmen who come in person to the forest on no other errand, are sure
 to attend the wood auction, and even pay a high price for the privilege
 of gleaning after the woodchopper. It is now many years that men have
 resorted to the forest for fuel and the materials of the arts: the New
 Englander and the New Hollander, the Parisian and the Celt, the farmer
 and Robin Hood, Goody Blake and Harry Gill; in most parts of the world
 the prince and the peasant, the scholar and the savage, equally require
 still a few sticks from the forest to warm them and cook their food.
 Neither could I do without them.
 
 Every man looks at his wood-pile with a kind of affection. I love to
 have mine before my window, and the more chips the better to remind me
 of my pleasing work. I had an old axe which nobody claimed, with which
 by spells in winter days, on the sunny side of the house, I played about
 the stumps which I had got out of my bean-field. As my driver prophesied
 when I was plowing, they warmed me twice--once while I was splitting
 them, and again when they were on the fire, so that no fuel could
 give out more heat. As for the axe, I was advised to get the village
 blacksmith to "jump" it; but I jumped him, and, putting a hickory helve
 from the woods into it, made it do. If it was dull, it was at least hung
 true.
 
 A few pieces of fat pine were a great treasure. It is interesting to
 remember how much of this food for fire is still concealed in the bowels
 of the earth. In previous years I had often gone prospecting over some
 bare hillside, where a pitch pine wood had formerly stood, and got out
 the fat pine roots. They are almost indestructible. Stumps thirty or
 forty years old, at least, will still be sound at the core, though the
 sapwood has all become vegetable mould, as appears by the scales of
 the thick bark forming a ring level with the earth four or five inches
 distant from the heart. With axe and shovel you explore this mine, and
 follow the marrowy store, yellow as beef tallow, or as if you had struck
 on a vein of gold, deep into the earth. But commonly I kindled my fire
 with the dry leaves of the forest, which I had stored up in my shed
 before the snow came. Green hickory finely split makes the woodchopper's
 kindlings, when he has a camp in the woods. Once in a while I got a
 little of this. When the villagers were lighting their fires beyond the
 horizon, I too gave notice to the various wild inhabitants of Walden
 vale, by a smoky streamer from my chimney, that I was awake.--
 
            Light-winged Smoke, Icarian bird,
            Melting thy pinions in thy upward flight,
            Lark without song, and messenger of dawn,
            Circling above the hamlets as thy nest;
            Or else, departing dream, and shadowy form
            Of midnight vision, gathering up thy skirts;
            By night star-veiling, and by day
            Darkening the light and blotting out the sun;
            Go thou my incense upward from this hearth,
            And ask the gods to pardon this clear flame.
 
 Hard green wood just cut, though I used but little of that, answered my
 purpose better than any other. I sometimes left a good fire when I went
 to take a walk in a winter afternoon; and when I returned, three or four
 hours afterward, it would be still alive and glowing. My house was not
 empty though I was gone. It was as if I had left a cheerful housekeeper
 behind. It was I and Fire that lived there; and commonly my housekeeper
 proved trustworthy. One day, however, as I was splitting wood, I thought
 that I would just look in at the window and see if the house was not on
 fire; it was the only time I remember to have been particularly anxious
 on this score; so I looked and saw that a spark had caught my bed, and
 I went in and extinguished it when it had burned a place as big as my
 hand. But my house occupied so sunny and sheltered a position, and
 its roof was so low, that I could afford to let the fire go out in the
 middle of almost any winter day.
 
 The moles nested in my cellar, nibbling every third potato, and making
 a snug bed even there of some hair left after plastering and of brown
 paper; for even the wildest animals love comfort and warmth as well as
 man, and they survive the winter only because they are so careful to
 secure them. Some of my friends spoke as if I was coming to the woods on
 purpose to freeze myself. The animal merely makes a bed, which he warms
 with his body, in a sheltered place; but man, having discovered fire,
 boxes up some air in a spacious apartment, and warms that, instead of
 robbing himself, makes that his bed, in which he can move about divested
 of more cumbrous clothing, maintain a kind of summer in the midst of
 winter, and by means of windows even admit the light, and with a lamp
 lengthen out the day. Thus he goes a step or two beyond instinct, and
 saves a little time for the fine arts. Though, when I had been exposed
 to the rudest blasts a long time, my whole body began to grow torpid,
 when I reached the genial atmosphere of my house I soon recovered my
 faculties and prolonged my life. But the most luxuriously housed has
 little to boast of in this respect, nor need we trouble ourselves to
 speculate how the human race may be at last destroyed. It would be
 easy to cut their threads any time with a little sharper blast from the
 north. We go on dating from Cold Fridays and Great Snows; but a little
 colder Friday, or greater snow would put a period to man's existence on
 the globe.
 
 The next winter I used a small cooking-stove for economy, since I
 did not own the forest; but it did not keep fire so well as the open
 fireplace. Cooking was then, for the most part, no longer a poetic, but
 merely a chemic process. It will soon be forgotten, in these days of
 stoves, that we used to roast potatoes in the ashes, after the Indian
 fashion. The stove not only took up room and scented the house, but it
 concealed the fire, and I felt as if I had lost a companion. You can
 always see a face in the fire. The laborer, looking into it at evening,
 purifies his thoughts of the dross and earthiness which they have
 accumulated during the day. But I could no longer sit and look into
 the fire, and the pertinent words of a poet recurred to me with new
 force.--
 
      "Never, bright flame, may be denied to me
       Thy dear, life imaging, close sympathy.
       What but my hopes shot upward e'er so bright?
       What but my fortunes sunk so low in night?
       Why art thou banished from our hearth and hall,
       Thou who art welcomed and beloved by all?
       Was thy existence then too fanciful
       For our life's common light, who are so dull?
       Did thy bright gleam mysterious converse hold
       With our congenial souls? secrets too bold?
 
       Well, we are safe and strong, for now we sit
       Beside a hearth where no dim shadows flit,
       Where nothing cheers nor saddens, but a fire
       Warms feet and hands--nor does to more aspire;
       By whose compact utilitarian heap
       The present may sit down and go to sleep,
       Nor fear the ghosts who from the dim past walked,
       And with us by the unequal light of the old wood fire talked."
 
 
 
 
 Former Inhabitants and Winter Visitors
 
 
 I weathered some merry snow-storms, and spent some cheerful winter
 evenings by my fireside, while the snow whirled wildly without, and even
 the hooting of the owl was hushed. For many weeks I met no one in my
 walks but those who came occasionally to cut wood and sled it to the
 village. The elements, however, abetted me in making a path through the
 deepest snow in the woods, for when I had once gone through the wind
 blew the oak leaves into my tracks, where they lodged, and by absorbing
 the rays of the sun melted the snow, and so not only made a my bed
 for my feet, but in the night their dark line was my guide. For human
 society I was obliged to conjure up the former occupants of these woods.
 Within the memory of many of my townsmen the road near which my house
 stands resounded with the laugh and gossip of inhabitants, and the woods
 which border it were notched and dotted here and there with their little
 gardens and dwellings, though it was then much more shut in by the
 forest than now. In some places, within my own remembrance, the pines
 would scrape both sides of a chaise at once, and women and children who
 were compelled to go this way to Lincoln alone and on foot did it with
 fear, and often ran a good part of the distance. Though mainly but a
 humble route to neighboring villages, or for the woodman's team, it once
 amused the traveller more than now by its variety, and lingered longer
 in his memory. Where now firm open fields stretch from the village to
 the woods, it then ran through a maple swamp on a foundation of logs,
 the remnants of which, doubtless, still underlie the present dusty
 highway, from the Stratton, now the Alms-House Farm, to Brister's Hill.
 
 East of my bean-field, across the road, lived Cato Ingraham, slave of
 Duncan Ingraham, Esquire, gentleman, of Concord village, who built his
 slave a house, and gave him permission to live in Walden Woods;--Cato,
 not Uticensis, but Concordiensis. Some say that he was a Guinea Negro.
 There are a few who remember his little patch among the walnuts, which
 he let grow up till he should be old and need them; but a younger and
 whiter speculator got them at last. He too, however, occupies an equally
 narrow house at present. Cato's half-obliterated cellar-hole still
 remains, though known to few, being concealed from the traveller by a
 fringe of pines. It is now filled with the smooth sumach (_Rhus glabra_),
 and one of the earliest species of goldenrod (_Solidago stricta_) grows
 there luxuriantly.
 
 Here, by the very corner of my field, still nearer to town, Zilpha,
 a colored woman, had her little house, where she spun linen for the
 townsfolk, making the Walden Woods ring with her shrill singing, for
 she had a loud and notable voice. At length, in the war of 1812, her
 dwelling was set on fire by English soldiers, prisoners on parole, when
 she was away, and her cat and dog and hens were all burned up together.
 She led a hard life, and somewhat inhumane. One old frequenter of these
 woods remembers, that as he passed her house one noon he heard her
 muttering to herself over her gurgling pot--"Ye are all bones, bones!" I
 have seen bricks amid the oak copse there.
 
 Down the road, on the right hand, on Brister's Hill, lived Brister
 Freeman, "a handy Negro," slave of Squire Cummings once--there where
 grow still the apple trees which Brister planted and tended; large old
 trees now, but their fruit still wild and ciderish to my taste. Not long
 since I read his epitaph in the old Lincoln burying-ground, a little on
 one side, near the unmarked graves of some British grenadiers who fell
 in the retreat from Concord--where he is styled "Sippio Brister"--Scipio
 Africanus he had some title to be called--"a man of color," as if he
 were discolored. It also told me, with staring emphasis, when he died;
 which was but an indirect way of informing me that he ever lived.
 With him dwelt Fenda, his hospitable wife, who told fortunes, yet
 pleasantly--large, round, and black, blacker than any of the children of
 night, such a dusky orb as never rose on Concord before or since.
 
 Farther down the hill, on the left, on the old road in the woods, are
 marks of some homestead of the Stratton family; whose orchard once
 covered all the slope of Brister's Hill, but was long since killed out
 by pitch pines, excepting a few stumps, whose old roots furnish still
 the wild stocks of many a thrifty village tree.
 
 Nearer yet to town, you come to Breed's location, on the other side of
 the way, just on the edge of the wood; ground famous for the pranks of
 a demon not distinctly named in old mythology, who has acted a prominent
 and astounding part in our New England life, and deserves, as much as
 any mythological character, to have his biography written one day; who
 first comes in the guise of a friend or hired man, and then robs and
 murders the whole family--New-England Rum. But history must not yet
 tell the tragedies enacted here; let time intervene in some measure to
 assuage and lend an azure tint to them. Here the most indistinct and
 dubious tradition says that once a tavern stood; the well the same,
 which tempered the traveller's beverage and refreshed his steed. Here
 then men saluted one another, and heard and told the news, and went
 their ways again.
 
 Breed's hut was standing only a dozen years ago, though it had long
 been unoccupied. It was about the size of mine. It was set on fire by
 mischievous boys, one Election night, if I do not mistake. I lived on
 the edge of the village then, and had just lost myself over Davenant's
 "Gondibert," that winter that I labored with a lethargy--which, by the
 way, I never knew whether to regard as a family complaint, having
 an uncle who goes to sleep shaving himself, and is obliged to sprout
 potatoes in a cellar Sundays, in order to keep awake and keep the
 Sabbath, or as the consequence of my attempt to read Chalmers'
 collection of English poetry without skipping. It fairly overcame my
 Nervii. I had just sunk my head on this when the bells rung fire, and in
 hot haste the engines rolled that way, led by a straggling troop of
 men and boys, and I among the foremost, for I had leaped the brook.
 We thought it was far south over the woods--we who had run to fires
 before--barn, shop, or dwelling-house, or all together. "It's Baker's
 barn," cried one. "It is the Codman place," affirmed another. And then
 fresh sparks went up above the wood, as if the roof fell in, and we all
 shouted "Concord to the rescue!" Wagons shot past with furious speed
 and crushing loads, bearing, perchance, among the rest, the agent of the
 Insurance Company, who was bound to go however far; and ever and anon
 the engine bell tinkled behind, more slow and sure; and rearmost of all,
 as it was afterward whispered, came they who set the fire and gave the
 alarm. Thus we kept on like true idealists, rejecting the evidence
 of our senses, until at a turn in the road we heard the crackling and
 actually felt the heat of the fire from over the wall, and realized,
 alas! that we were there. The very nearness of the fire but cooled our
 ardor. At first we thought to throw a frog-pond on to it; but concluded
 to let it burn, it was so far gone and so worthless. So we stood round
 our engine, jostled one another, expressed our sentiments through
 speaking-trumpets, or in lower tone referred to the great conflagrations
 which the world has witnessed, including Bascom's shop, and, between
 ourselves, we thought that, were we there in season with our "tub," and
 a full frog-pond by, we could turn that threatened last and universal
 one into another flood. We finally retreated without doing any
 mischief--returned to sleep and "Gondibert." But as for "Gondibert,"
 I would except that passage in the preface about wit being the soul's
 powder--"but most of mankind are strangers to wit, as Indians are to
 powder."
 
 It chanced that I walked that way across the fields the following night,
 about the same hour, and hearing a low moaning at this spot, I drew near
 in the dark, and discovered the only survivor of the family that I know,
 the heir of both its virtues and its vices, who alone was interested in
 this burning, lying on his stomach and looking over the cellar wall at
 the still smouldering cinders beneath, muttering to himself, as is his
 wont. He had been working far off in the river meadows all day, and had
 improved the first moments that he could call his own to visit the home
 of his fathers and his youth. He gazed into the cellar from all sides
 and points of view by turns, always lying down to it, as if there was
 some treasure, which he remembered, concealed between the stones, where
 there was absolutely nothing but a heap of bricks and ashes. The house
 being gone, he looked at what there was left. He was soothed by the
 sympathy which my mere presence implied, and showed me, as well as the
 darkness permitted, where the well was covered up; which, thank Heaven,
 could never be burned; and he groped long about the wall to find the
 well-sweep which his father had cut and mounted, feeling for the iron
 hook or staple by which a burden had been fastened to the heavy end--all
 that he could now cling to--to convince me that it was no common
 "rider." I felt it, and still remark it almost daily in my walks, for by
 it hangs the history of a family.
 
 Once more, on the left, where are seen the well and lilac bushes by the
 wall, in the now open field, lived Nutting and Le Grosse. But to return
 toward Lincoln.
 
 Farther in the woods than any of these, where the road approaches
 nearest to the pond, Wyman the potter squatted, and furnished his
 townsmen with earthenware, and left descendants to succeed him. Neither
 were they rich in worldly goods, holding the land by sufferance while
 they lived; and there often the sheriff came in vain to collect the
 taxes, and "attached a chip," for form's sake, as I have read in his
 accounts, there being nothing else that he could lay his hands on. One
 day in midsummer, when I was hoeing, a man who was carrying a load
 of pottery to market stopped his horse against my field and inquired
 concerning Wyman the younger. He had long ago bought a potter's wheel
 of him, and wished to know what had become of him. I had read of the
 potter's clay and wheel in Scripture, but it had never occurred to me
 that the pots we use were not such as had come down unbroken from those
 days, or grown on trees like gourds somewhere, and I was pleased to hear
 that so fictile an art was ever practiced in my neighborhood.
 
 The last inhabitant of these woods before me was an Irishman, Hugh
 Quoil (if I have spelt his name with coil enough), who occupied Wyman's
 tenement--Col. Quoil, he was called. Rumor said that he had been a
 soldier at Waterloo. If he had lived I should have made him fight his
 battles over again. His trade here was that of a ditcher. Napoleon went
 to St. Helena; Quoil came to Walden Woods. All I know of him is tragic.
 He was a man of manners, like one who had seen the world, and was
 capable of more civil speech than you could well attend to. He wore a
 greatcoat in midsummer, being affected with the trembling delirium, and
 his face was the color of carmine. He died in the road at the foot of
 Brister's Hill shortly after I came to the woods, so that I have not
 remembered him as a neighbor. Before his house was pulled down, when his
 comrades avoided it as "an unlucky castle," I visited it. There lay his
 old clothes curled up by use, as if they were himself, upon his raised
 plank bed. His pipe lay broken on the hearth, instead of a bowl broken
 at the fountain. The last could never have been the symbol of his death,
 for he confessed to me that, though he had heard of Brister's Spring,
 he had never seen it; and soiled cards, kings of diamonds, spades,
 and hearts, were scattered over the floor. One black chicken which the
 administrator could not catch, black as night and as silent, not even
 croaking, awaiting Reynard, still went to roost in the next apartment.
 In the rear there was the dim outline of a garden, which had been
 planted but had never received its first hoeing, owing to those terrible
 shaking fits, though it was now harvest time. It was overrun with Roman
 wormwood and beggar-ticks, which last stuck to my clothes for all fruit.
 The skin of a woodchuck was freshly stretched upon the back of the
 house, a trophy of his last Waterloo; but no warm cap or mittens would
 he want more.
 
 Now only a dent in the earth marks the site of these dwellings, with
 buried cellar stones, and strawberries, raspberries, thimble-berries,
 hazel-bushes, and sumachs growing in the sunny sward there; some
 pitch pine or gnarled oak occupies what was the chimney nook, and a
 sweet-scented black birch, perhaps, waves where the door-stone was.
 Sometimes the well dent is visible, where once a spring oozed; now dry
 and tearless grass; or it was covered deep--not to be discovered till
 some late day--with a flat stone under the sod, when the last of the
 race departed. What a sorrowful act must that be--the covering up of
 wells! coincident with the opening of wells of tears. These cellar
 dents, like deserted fox burrows, old holes, are all that is left where
 once were the stir and bustle of human life, and "fate, free will,
 foreknowledge absolute," in some form and dialect or other were by turns
 discussed. But all I can learn of their conclusions amounts to just
 this, that "Cato and Brister pulled wool"; which is about as edifying as
 the history of more famous schools of philosophy.
 
 Still grows the vivacious lilac a generation after the door and lintel
 and the sill are gone, unfolding its sweet-scented flowers each spring,
 to be plucked by the musing traveller; planted and tended once by
 children's hands, in front-yard plots--now standing by wallsides in
 retired pastures, and giving place to new-rising forests;--the last of
 that stirp, sole survivor of that family. Little did the dusky children
 think that the puny slip with its two eyes only, which they stuck in the
 ground in the shadow of the house and daily watered, would root itself
 so, and outlive them, and house itself in the rear that shaded it, and
 grown man's garden and orchard, and tell their story faintly to the lone
 wanderer a half-century after they had grown up and died--blossoming as
 fair, and smelling as sweet, as in that first spring. I mark its still
 tender, civil, cheerful lilac colors.
 
 But this small village, germ of something more, why did it fail while
 Concord keeps its ground? Were there no natural advantages--no water
 privileges, forsooth? Ay, the deep Walden Pond and cool Brister's
 Spring--privilege to drink long and healthy draughts at these, all
 unimproved by these men but to dilute their glass. They were universally
 a thirsty race. Might not the basket, stable-broom, mat-making,
 corn-parching, linen-spinning, and pottery business have thrived here,
 making the wilderness to blossom like the rose, and a numerous posterity
 have inherited the land of their fathers? The sterile soil would at
 least have been proof against a low-land degeneracy. Alas! how little
 does the memory of these human inhabitants enhance the beauty of the
 landscape! Again, perhaps, Nature will try, with me for a first settler,
 and my house raised last spring to be the oldest in the hamlet.
 
 I am not aware that any man has ever built on the spot which I occupy.
 Deliver me from a city built on the site of a more ancient city, whose
 materials are ruins, whose gardens cemeteries. The soil is blanched and
 accursed there, and before that becomes necessary the earth itself will
 be destroyed. With such reminiscences I repeopled the woods and lulled
 myself asleep.
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 At this season I seldom had a visitor. When the snow lay deepest no
 wanderer ventured near my house for a week or fortnight at a time, but
 there I lived as snug as a meadow mouse, or as cattle and poultry which
 are said to have survived for a long time buried in drifts, even without
 food; or like that early settler's family in the town of Sutton, in this
 State, whose cottage was completely covered by the great snow of 1717
 when he was absent, and an Indian found it only by the hole which the
 chimney's breath made in the drift, and so relieved the family. But
 no friendly Indian concerned himself about me; nor needed he, for the
 master of the house was at home. The Great Snow! How cheerful it is to
 hear of! When the farmers could not get to the woods and swamps with
 their teams, and were obliged to cut down the shade trees before their
 houses, and, when the crust was harder, cut off the trees in the swamps,
 ten feet from the ground, as it appeared the next spring.
 
 In the deepest snows, the path which I used from the highway to
 my house, about half a mile long, might have been represented by a
 meandering dotted line, with wide intervals between the dots. For a week
 of even weather I took exactly the same number of steps, and of the same
 length, coming and going, stepping deliberately and with the precision
 of a pair of dividers in my own deep tracks--to such routine the winter
 reduces us--yet often they were filled with heaven's own blue. But no
 weather interfered fatally with my walks, or rather my going abroad, for
 I frequently tramped eight or ten miles through the deepest snow to
 keep an appointment with a beech tree, or a yellow birch, or an old
 acquaintance among the pines; when the ice and snow causing their limbs
 to droop, and so sharpening their tops, had changed the pines into fir
 trees; wading to the tops of the highest hills when the show was nearly
 two feet deep on a level, and shaking down another snow-storm on my head
 at every step; or sometimes creeping and floundering thither on my hands
 and knees, when the hunters had gone into winter quarters. One afternoon
 I amused myself by watching a barred owl (_Strix nebulosa_) sitting on one
 of the lower dead limbs of a white pine, close to the trunk, in broad
 daylight, I standing within a rod of him. He could hear me when I moved
 and cronched the snow with my feet, but could not plainly see me. When
 I made most noise he would stretch out his neck, and erect his neck
 feathers, and open his eyes wide; but their lids soon fell again, and he
 began to nod. I too felt a slumberous influence after watching him half
 an hour, as he sat thus with his eyes half open, like a cat, winged
 brother of the cat. There was only a narrow slit left between their
 lids, by which he preserved a peninsular relation to me; thus, with
 half-shut eyes, looking out from the land of dreams, and endeavoring
 to realize me, vague object or mote that interrupted his visions. At
 length, on some louder noise or my nearer approach, he would grow uneasy
 and sluggishly turn about on his perch, as if impatient at having his
 dreams disturbed; and when he launched himself off and flapped through
 the pines, spreading his wings to unexpected breadth, I could not hear
 the slightest sound from them. Thus, guided amid the pine boughs rather
 by a delicate sense of their neighborhood than by sight, feeling his
 twilight way, as it were, with his sensitive pinions, he found a new
 perch, where he might in peace await the dawning of his day.
 
 As I walked over the long causeway made for the railroad through the
 meadows, I encountered many a blustering and nipping wind, for nowhere
 has it freer play; and when the frost had smitten me on one cheek,
 heathen as I was, I turned to it the other also. Nor was it much better
 by the carriage road from Brister's Hill. For I came to town still, like
 a friendly Indian, when the contents of the broad open fields were all
 piled up between the walls of the Walden road, and half an hour sufficed
 to obliterate the tracks of the last traveller. And when I returned new
 drifts would have formed, through which I floundered, where the busy
 northwest wind had been depositing the powdery snow round a sharp angle
 in the road, and not a rabbit's track, nor even the fine print, the
 small type, of a meadow mouse was to be seen. Yet I rarely failed to
 find, even in midwinter, some warm and springly swamp where the grass
 and the skunk-cabbage still put forth with perennial verdure, and some
 hardier bird occasionally awaited the return of spring.
 
 Sometimes, notwithstanding the snow, when I returned from my walk at
 evening I crossed the deep tracks of a woodchopper leading from my door,
 and found his pile of whittlings on the hearth, and my house filled with
 the odor of his pipe. Or on a Sunday afternoon, if I chanced to be
 at home, I heard the cronching of the snow made by the step of a
 long-headed farmer, who from far through the woods sought my house, to
 have a social "crack"; one of the few of his vocation who are "men on
 their farms"; who donned a frock instead of a professor's gown, and is
 as ready to extract the moral out of church or state as to haul a load
 of manure from his barn-yard. We talked of rude and simple times, when
 men sat about large fires in cold, bracing weather, with clear heads;
 and when other dessert failed, we tried our teeth on many a nut which
 wise squirrels have long since abandoned, for those which have the
 thickest shells are commonly empty.
 
 The one who came from farthest to my lodge, through deepest snows and
 most dismal tempests, was a poet. A farmer, a hunter, a soldier, a
 reporter, even a philosopher, may be daunted; but nothing can deter a
 poet, for he is actuated by pure love. Who can predict his comings
 and goings? His business calls him out at all hours, even when doctors
 sleep. We made that small house ring with boisterous mirth and resound
 with the murmur of much sober talk, making amends then to Walden vale
 for the long silences. Broadway was still and deserted in comparison. At
 suitable intervals there were regular salutes of laughter, which might
 have been referred indifferently to the last-uttered or the forth-coming
 jest. We made many a "bran new" theory of life over a thin dish
 of gruel, which combined the advantages of conviviality with the
 clear-headedness which philosophy requires.
 
 I should not forget that during my last winter at the pond there was
 another welcome visitor, who at one time came through the village,
 through snow and rain and darkness, till he saw my lamp through the
 trees, and shared with me some long winter evenings. One of the last of
 the philosophers--Connecticut gave him to the world--he peddled first
 her wares, afterwards, as he declares, his brains. These he peddles
 still, prompting God and disgracing man, bearing for fruit his brain
 only, like the nut its kernel. I think that he must be the man of the
 most faith of any alive. His words and attitude always suppose a better
 state of things than other men are acquainted with, and he will be the
 last man to be disappointed as the ages revolve. He has no venture in
 the present. But though comparatively disregarded now, when his day
 comes, laws unsuspected by most will take effect, and masters of
 families and rulers will come to him for advice.
 
                "How blind that cannot see serenity!"
 
 A true friend of man; almost the only friend of human progress. An Old
 Mortality, say rather an Immortality, with unwearied patience and faith
 making plain the image engraven in men's bodies, the God of whom they
 are but defaced and leaning monuments. With his hospitable intellect
 he embraces children, beggars, insane, and scholars, and entertains the
 thought of all, adding to it commonly some breadth and elegance. I
 think that he should keep a caravansary on the world's highway, where
 philosophers of all nations might put up, and on his sign should be
 printed, "Entertainment for man, but not for his beast. Enter ye that
 have leisure and a quiet mind, who earnestly seek the right road." He is
 perhaps the sanest man and has the fewest crotchets of any I chance
 to know; the same yesterday and tomorrow. Of yore we had sauntered and
 talked, and effectually put the world behind us; for he was pledged to
 no institution in it, freeborn, _ingenuus_. Whichever way we turned,
 it seemed that the heavens and the earth had met together, since he
 enhanced the beauty of the landscape. A blue-robed man, whose fittest
 roof is the overarching sky which reflects his serenity. I do not see
 how he can ever die; Nature cannot spare him.
 
 Having each some shingles of thought well dried, we sat and whittled
 them, trying our knives, and admiring the clear yellowish grain of the
 pumpkin pine. We waded so gently and reverently, or we pulled together
 so smoothly, that the fishes of thought were not scared from the stream,
 nor feared any angler on the bank, but came and went grandly, like the
 clouds which float through the western sky, and the mother-o'-pearl
 flocks which sometimes form and dissolve there. There we worked,
 revising mythology, rounding a fable here and there, and building
 castles in the air for which earth offered no worthy foundation. Great
 Looker! Great Expecter! to converse with whom was a New England Night's
 Entertainment. Ah! such discourse we had, hermit and philosopher, and
 the old settler I have spoken of--we three--it expanded and racked my
 little house; I should not dare to say how many pounds' weight there
 was above the atmospheric pressure on every circular inch; it opened its
 seams so that they had to be calked with much dulness thereafter to stop
 the consequent leak;--but I had enough of that kind of oakum already
 picked.
 
 There was one other with whom I had "solid seasons," long to be
 remembered, at his house in the village, and who looked in upon me from
 time to time; but I had no more for society there.
 
 There too, as everywhere, I sometimes expected the Visitor who never
 comes. The Vishnu Purana says, "The house-holder is to remain at
 eventide in his courtyard as long as it takes to milk a cow, or longer
 if he pleases, to await the arrival of a guest." I often performed this
 duty of hospitality, waited long enough to milk a whole herd of cows,
 but did not see the man approaching from the town.
 
 
 
 
 Winter Animals
 
 
 When the ponds were firmly frozen, they afforded not only new and
 shorter routes to many points, but new views from their surfaces of the
 familiar landscape around them. When I crossed Flint's Pond, after it
 was covered with snow, though I had often paddled about and skated over
 it, it was so unexpectedly wide and so strange that I could think of
 nothing but Baffin's Bay. The Lincoln hills rose up around me at the
 extremity of a snowy plain, in which I did not remember to have stood
 before; and the fishermen, at an indeterminable distance over the ice,
 moving slowly about with their wolfish dogs, passed for sealers, or
 Esquimaux, or in misty weather loomed like fabulous creatures, and I did
 not know whether they were giants or pygmies. I took this course when
 I went to lecture in Lincoln in the evening, travelling in no road and
 passing no house between my own hut and the lecture room. In Goose Pond,
 which lay in my way, a colony of muskrats dwelt, and raised their cabins
 high above the ice, though none could be seen abroad when I crossed it.
 Walden, being like the rest usually bare of snow, or with only shallow
 and interrupted drifts on it, was my yard where I could walk freely when
 the snow was nearly two feet deep on a level elsewhere and the villagers
 were confined to their streets. There, far from the village street, and
 except at very long intervals, from the jingle of sleigh-bells, I slid
 and skated, as in a vast moose-yard well trodden, overhung by oak woods
 and solemn pines bent down with snow or bristling with icicles.
 
 For sounds in winter nights, and often in winter days, I heard the
 forlorn but melodious note of a hooting owl indefinitely far; such
 a sound as the frozen earth would yield if struck with a suitable
 plectrum, the very _lingua vernacula_ of Walden Wood, and quite familiar
 to me at last, though I never saw the bird while it was making it. I
 seldom opened my door in a winter evening without hearing it; _Hoo hoo
 hoo, hoorer, hoo,_ sounded sonorously, and the first three syllables
 accented somewhat like _how der do_; or sometimes _hoo, hoo_ only. One
 night in the beginning of winter, before the pond froze over, about nine
 o'clock, I was startled by the loud honking of a goose, and, stepping to
 the door, heard the sound of their wings like a tempest in the woods
 as they flew low over my house. They passed over the pond toward Fair
 Haven, seemingly deterred from settling by my light, their commodore
 honking all the while with a regular beat. Suddenly an unmistakable
 cat-owl from very near me, with the most harsh and tremendous voice
 I ever heard from any inhabitant of the woods, responded at regular
 intervals to the goose, as if determined to expose and disgrace this
 intruder from Hudson's Bay by exhibiting a greater compass and volume of
 voice in a native, and _boo-hoo_ him out of Concord horizon. What do you
 mean by alarming the citadel at this time of night consecrated to me? Do
 you think I am ever caught napping at such an hour, and that I have not
 got lungs and a larynx as well as yourself? _Boo-hoo, boo-hoo, boo-hoo!_
 It was one of the most thrilling discords I ever heard. And yet, if you
 had a discriminating ear, there were in it the elements of a concord
 such as these plains never saw nor heard.
 
 I also heard the whooping of the ice in the pond, my great bed-fellow in
 that part of Concord, as if it were restless in its bed and would fain
 turn over, were troubled with flatulency and had dreams; or I was waked
 by the cracking of the ground by the frost, as if some one had driven a
 team against my door, and in the morning would find a crack in the earth
 a quarter of a mile long and a third of an inch wide.
 
 Sometimes I heard the foxes as they ranged over the snow-crust, in
 moonlight nights, in search of a partridge or other game, barking
 raggedly and demoniacally like forest dogs, as if laboring with some
 anxiety, or seeking expression, struggling for light and to be dogs
 outright and run freely in the streets; for if we take the ages into our
 account, may there not be a civilization going on among brutes as
 well as men? They seemed to me to be rudimental, burrowing men, still
 standing on their defence, awaiting their transformation. Sometimes one
 came near to my window, attracted by my light, barked a vulpine curse at
 me, and then retreated.
 
 Usually the red squirrel (_Sciurus Hudsonius_) waked me in the dawn,
 coursing over the roof and up and down the sides of the house, as if
 sent out of the woods for this purpose. In the course of the winter I
 threw out half a bushel of ears of sweet corn, which had not got ripe,
 on to the snow-crust by my door, and was amused by watching the motions
 of the various animals which were baited by it. In the twilight and the
 night the rabbits came regularly and made a hearty meal. All day long
 the red squirrels came and went, and afforded me much entertainment by
 their manoeuvres. One would approach at first warily through the shrub
 oaks, running over the snow-crust by fits and starts like a leaf blown
 by the wind, now a few paces this way, with wonderful speed and waste
 of energy, making inconceivable haste with his "trotters," as if it were
 for a wager, and now as many paces that way, but never getting on more
 than half a rod at a time; and then suddenly pausing with a ludicrous
 expression and a gratuitous somerset, as if all the eyes in the universe
 were eyed on him--for all the motions of a squirrel, even in the most
 solitary recesses of the forest, imply spectators as much as those of a
 dancing girl--wasting more time in delay and circumspection than would
 have sufficed to walk the whole distance--I never saw one walk--and then
 suddenly, before you could say Jack Robinson, he would be in the top
 of a young pitch pine, winding up his clock and chiding all imaginary
 spectators, soliloquizing and talking to all the universe at the same
 time--for no reason that I could ever detect, or he himself was aware
 of, I suspect. At length he would reach the corn, and selecting a
 suitable ear, frisk about in the same uncertain trigonometrical way to
 the topmost stick of my wood-pile, before my window, where he looked me
 in the face, and there sit for hours, supplying himself with a new
 ear from time to time, nibbling at first voraciously and throwing the
 half-naked cobs about; till at length he grew more dainty still and
 played with his food, tasting only the inside of the kernel, and the
 ear, which was held balanced over the stick by one paw, slipped from
 his careless grasp and fell to the ground, when he would look over at it
 with a ludicrous expression of uncertainty, as if suspecting that it had
 life, with a mind not made up whether to get it again, or a new one,
 or be off; now thinking of corn, then listening to hear what was in
 the wind. So the little impudent fellow would waste many an ear in
 a forenoon; till at last, seizing some longer and plumper one,
 considerably bigger than himself, and skilfully balancing it, he would
 set out with it to the woods, like a tiger with a buffalo, by the same
 zig-zag course and frequent pauses, scratching along with it as if it
 were too heavy for him and falling all the while, making its fall a
 diagonal between a perpendicular and horizontal, being determined to
 put it through at any rate;--a singularly frivolous and whimsical
 fellow;--and so he would get off with it to where he lived, perhaps
 carry it to the top of a pine tree forty or fifty rods distant, and
 I would afterwards find the cobs strewn about the woods in various
 directions.
 
 At length the jays arrive, whose discordant screams were heard long
 before, as they were warily making their approach an eighth of a mile
 off, and in a stealthy and sneaking manner they flit from tree to tree,
 nearer and nearer, and pick up the kernels which the squirrels have
 dropped. Then, sitting on a pitch pine bough, they attempt to swallow in
 their haste a kernel which is too big for their throats and chokes
 them; and after great labor they disgorge it, and spend an hour in
 the endeavor to crack it by repeated blows with their bills. They
 were manifestly thieves, and I had not much respect for them; but the
 squirrels, though at first shy, went to work as if they were taking what
 was their own.
 
 Meanwhile also came the chickadees in flocks, which, picking up the
 crumbs the squirrels had dropped, flew to the nearest twig and, placing
 them under their claws, hammered away at them with their little bills,
 as if it were an insect in the bark, till they were sufficiently reduced
 for their slender throats. A little flock of these titmice came daily to
 pick a dinner out of my woodpile, or the crumbs at my door, with faint
 flitting lisping notes, like the tinkling of icicles in the grass, or
 else with sprightly _day day day_, or more rarely, in spring-like days,
 a wiry summery _phe-be_ from the woodside. They were so familiar that at
 length one alighted on an armful of wood which I was carrying in, and
 pecked at the sticks without fear. I once had a sparrow alight upon my
 shoulder for a moment while I was hoeing in a village garden, and I felt
 that I was more distinguished by that circumstance than I should have
 been by any epaulet I could have worn. The squirrels also grew at last
 to be quite familiar, and occasionally stepped upon my shoe, when that
 was the nearest way.
 
 When the ground was not yet quite covered, and again near the end of
 winter, when the snow was melted on my south hillside and about my
 wood-pile, the partridges came out of the woods morning and evening to
 feed there. Whichever side you walk in the woods the partridge bursts
 away on whirring wings, jarring the snow from the dry leaves and twigs
 on high, which comes sifting down in the sunbeams like golden dust, for
 this brave bird is not to be scared by winter. It is frequently covered
 up by drifts, and, it is said, "sometimes plunges from on wing into the
 soft snow, where it remains concealed for a day or two." I used to start
 them in the open land also, where they had come out of the woods at
 sunset to "bud" the wild apple trees. They will come regularly every
 evening to particular trees, where the cunning sportsman lies in wait
 for them, and the distant orchards next the woods suffer thus not
 a little. I am glad that the partridge gets fed, at any rate. It is
 Nature's own bird which lives on buds and diet drink.
 
 In dark winter mornings, or in short winter afternoons, I sometimes
 heard a pack of hounds threading all the woods with hounding cry and
 yelp, unable to resist the instinct of the chase, and the note of the
 hunting-horn at intervals, proving that man was in the rear. The woods
 ring again, and yet no fox bursts forth on to the open level of the
 pond, nor following pack pursuing their ActA|on. And perhaps at evening
 I see the hunters returning with a single brush trailing from their
 sleigh for a trophy, seeking their inn. They tell me that if the fox
 would remain in the bosom of the frozen earth he would be safe, or if he
 would run in a straight line away no foxhound could overtake him; but,
 having left his pursuers far behind, he stops to rest and listen till
 they come up, and when he runs he circles round to his old haunts, where
 the hunters await him. Sometimes, however, he will run upon a wall many
 rods, and then leap off far to one side, and he appears to know that
 water will not retain his scent. A hunter told me that he once saw a fox
 pursued by hounds burst out on to Walden when the ice was covered with
 shallow puddles, run part way across, and then return to the same shore.
 Ere long the hounds arrived, but here they lost the scent. Sometimes
 a pack hunting by themselves would pass my door, and circle round my
 house, and yelp and hound without regarding me, as if afflicted by a
 species of madness, so that nothing could divert them from the pursuit.
 Thus they circle until they fall upon the recent trail of a fox, for a
 wise hound will forsake everything else for this. One day a man came
 to my hut from Lexington to inquire after his hound that made a large
 track, and had been hunting for a week by himself. But I fear that he
 was not the wiser for all I told him, for every time I attempted to
 answer his questions he interrupted me by asking, "What do you do here?"
 He had lost a dog, but found a man.
 
 One old hunter who has a dry tongue, who used to come to bathe in Walden
 once every year when the water was warmest, and at such times looked in
 upon me, told me that many years ago he took his gun one afternoon and
 went out for a cruise in Walden Wood; and as he walked the Wayland road
 he heard the cry of hounds approaching, and ere long a fox leaped the
 wall into the road, and as quick as thought leaped the other wall out of
 the road, and his swift bullet had not touched him. Some way behind came
 an old hound and her three pups in full pursuit, hunting on their own
 account, and disappeared again in the woods. Late in the afternoon, as
 he was resting in the thick woods south of Walden, he heard the voice
 of the hounds far over toward Fair Haven still pursuing the fox; and
 on they came, their hounding cry which made all the woods ring sounding
 nearer and nearer, now from Well Meadow, now from the Baker Farm. For
 a long time he stood still and listened to their music, so sweet to
 a hunter's ear, when suddenly the fox appeared, threading the solemn
 aisles with an easy coursing pace, whose sound was concealed by a
 sympathetic rustle of the leaves, swift and still, keeping the round,
 leaving his pursuers far behind; and, leaping upon a rock amid the
 woods, he sat erect and listening, with his back to the hunter. For
 a moment compassion restrained the latter's arm; but that was a
 short-lived mood, and as quick as thought can follow thought his piece
 was levelled, and _whang!_--the fox, rolling over the rock, lay dead on
 the ground. The hunter still kept his place and listened to the hounds.
 Still on they came, and now the near woods resounded through all their
 aisles with their demoniac cry. At length the old hound burst into view
 with muzzle to the ground, and snapping the air as if possessed, and ran
 directly to the rock; but, spying the dead fox, she suddenly ceased her
 hounding as if struck dumb with amazement, and walked round and round
 him in silence; and one by one her pups arrived, and, like their mother,
 were sobered into silence by the mystery. Then the hunter came forward
 and stood in their midst, and the mystery was solved. They waited in
 silence while he skinned the fox, then followed the brush a while, and
 at length turned off into the woods again. That evening a Weston squire
 came to the Concord hunter's cottage to inquire for his hounds, and told
 how for a week they had been hunting on their own account from Weston
 woods. The Concord hunter told him what he knew and offered him the
 skin; but the other declined it and departed. He did not find his hounds
 that night, but the next day learned that they had crossed the river and
 put up at a farmhouse for the night, whence, having been well fed, they
 took their departure early in the morning.
 
 The hunter who told me this could remember one Sam Nutting, who used
 to hunt bears on Fair Haven Ledges, and exchange their skins for rum
 in Concord village; who told him, even, that he had seen a moose
 there. Nutting had a famous foxhound named Burgoyne--he pronounced it
 Bugine--which my informant used to borrow. In the "Wast Book" of an
 old trader of this town, who was also a captain, town-clerk, and
 representative, I find the following entry. Jan. 18th, 1742-3, "John
 Melven Cr. by 1 Grey Fox 0--2--3"; they are not now found here; and in
 his ledger, Feb, 7th, 1743, Hezekiah Stratton has credit "by 1/2 a Catt
 skin 0--1--4-1/2"; of course, a wild-cat, for Stratton was a sergeant in
 the old French war, and would not have got credit for hunting less noble
 game. Credit is given for deerskins also, and they were daily sold. One
 man still preserves the horns of the last deer that was killed in this
 vicinity, and another has told me the particulars of the hunt in which
 his uncle was engaged. The hunters were formerly a numerous and merry
 crew here. I remember well one gaunt Nimrod who would catch up a leaf
 by the roadside and play a strain on it wilder and more melodious, if my
 memory serves me, than any hunting-horn.
 
 At midnight, when there was a moon, I sometimes met with hounds in my
 path prowling about the woods, which would skulk out of my way, as if
 afraid, and stand silent amid the bushes till I had passed.
 
 Squirrels and wild mice disputed for my store of nuts. There were scores
 of pitch pines around my house, from one to four inches in diameter,
 which had been gnawed by mice the previous winter--a Norwegian winter
 for them, for the snow lay long and deep, and they were obliged to mix
 a large proportion of pine bark with their other diet. These trees were
 alive and apparently flourishing at midsummer, and many of them had
 grown a foot, though completely girdled; but after another winter such
 were without exception dead. It is remarkable that a single mouse should
 thus be allowed a whole pine tree for its dinner, gnawing round instead
 of up and down it; but perhaps it is necessary in order to thin these
 trees, which are wont to grow up densely.
 
 The hares (_Lepus Americanus_) were very familiar. One had her form under
 my house all winter, separated from me only by the flooring, and
 she startled me each morning by her hasty departure when I began to
 stir--thump, thump, thump, striking her head against the floor timbers
 in her hurry. They used to come round my door at dusk to nibble the
 potato parings which I had thrown out, and were so nearly the color of
 the ground that they could hardly be distinguished when still. Sometimes
 in the twilight I alternately lost and recovered sight of one sitting
 motionless under my window. When I opened my door in the evening, off
 they would go with a squeak and a bounce. Near at hand they only excited
 my pity. One evening one sat by my door two paces from me, at first
 trembling with fear, yet unwilling to move; a poor wee thing, lean and
 bony, with ragged ears and sharp nose, scant tail and slender paws. It
 looked as if Nature no longer contained the breed of nobler bloods, but
 stood on her last toes. Its large eyes appeared young and unhealthy,
 almost dropsical. I took a step, and lo, away it scud with an elastic
 spring over the snow-crust, straightening its body and its limbs into
 graceful length, and soon put the forest between me and itself--the wild
 free venison, asserting its vigor and the dignity of Nature. Not without
 reason was its slenderness. Such then was its nature. (_Lepus_, _levipes_,
 light-foot, some think.)
 
 What is a country without rabbits and partridges? They are among the
 most simple and indigenous animal products; ancient and venerable
 families known to antiquity as to modern times; of the very hue and
 substance of Nature, nearest allied to leaves and to the ground--and to
 one another; it is either winged or it is legged. It is hardly as if you
 had seen a wild creature when a rabbit or a partridge bursts away, only
 a natural one, as much to be expected as rustling leaves. The partridge
 and the rabbit are still sure to thrive, like true natives of the soil,
 whatever revolutions occur. If the forest is cut off, the sprouts and
 bushes which spring up afford them concealment, and they become more
 numerous than ever. That must be a poor country indeed that does not
 support a hare. Our woods teem with them both, and around every swamp
 may be seen the partridge or rabbit walk, beset with twiggy fences and
 horse-hair snares, which some cow-boy tends.
 
 
 
 
 The Pond in Winter
 
 
 After a still winter night I awoke with the impression that some
 question had been put to me, which I had been endeavoring in vain to
 answer in my sleep, as what--how--when--where? But there was dawning
 Nature, in whom all creatures live, looking in at my broad windows with
 serene and satisfied face, and no question on _her_ lips. I awoke to an
 answered question, to Nature and daylight. The snow lying deep on the
 earth dotted with young pines, and the very slope of the hill on which
 my house is placed, seemed to say, Forward! Nature puts no question
 and answers none which we mortals ask. She has long ago taken her
 resolution. "O Prince, our eyes contemplate with admiration and transmit
 to the soul the wonderful and varied spectacle of this universe. The
 night veils without doubt a part of this glorious creation; but day
 comes to reveal to us this great work, which extends from earth even
 into the plains of the ether."
 
 Then to my morning work. First I take an axe and pail and go in search
 of water, if that be not a dream. After a cold and snowy night it needed
 a divining-rod to find it. Every winter the liquid and trembling surface
 of the pond, which was so sensitive to every breath, and reflected every
 light and shadow, becomes solid to the depth of a foot or a foot and a
 half, so that it will support the heaviest teams, and perchance the snow
 covers it to an equal depth, and it is not to be distinguished from any
 level field. Like the marmots in the surrounding hills, it closes its
 eyelids and becomes dormant for three months or more. Standing on the
 snow-covered plain, as if in a pasture amid the hills, I cut my way
 first through a foot of snow, and then a foot of ice, and open a window
 under my feet, where, kneeling to drink, I look down into the quiet
 parlor of the fishes, pervaded by a softened light as through a window
 of ground glass, with its bright sanded floor the same as in summer;
 there a perennial waveless serenity reigns as in the amber twilight
 sky, corresponding to the cool and even temperament of the inhabitants.
 Heaven is under our feet is well as over our heads.
 
 Early in the morning, while all things are crisp with frost, men come
 with fishing-reels and slender lunch, and let down their fine lines
 through the snowy field to take pickerel and perch; wild men, who
 instinctively follow other fashions and trust other authorities than
 their townsmen, and by their goings and comings stitch towns together in
 parts where else they would be ripped. They sit and eat their luncheon
 in stout fear-naughts on the dry oak leaves on the shore, as wise in
 natural lore as the citizen is in artificial. They never consulted with
 books, and know and can tell much less than they have done. The things
 which they practice are said not yet to be known. Here is one fishing
 for pickerel with grown perch for bait. You look into his pail with
 wonder as into a summer pond, as if he kept summer locked up at home, or
 knew where she had retreated. How, pray, did he get these in midwinter?
 Oh, he got worms out of rotten logs since the ground froze, and so he
 caught them. His life itself passes deeper in nature than the studies
 of the naturalist penetrate; himself a subject for the naturalist.
 The latter raises the moss and bark gently with his knife in search of
 insects; the former lays open logs to their core with his axe, and moss
 and bark fly far and wide. He gets his living by barking trees. Such a
 man has some right to fish, and I love to see nature carried out in him.
 The perch swallows the grub-worm, the pickerel swallows the perch, and
 the fisher-man swallows the pickerel; and so all the chinks in the scale
 of being are filled.
 
 When I strolled around the pond in misty weather I was sometimes amused
 by the primitive mode which some ruder fisherman had adopted. He would
 perhaps have placed alder branches over the narrow holes in the ice,
 which were four or five rods apart and an equal distance from the shore,
 and having fastened the end of the line to a stick to prevent its being
 pulled through, have passed the slack line over a twig of the alder, a
 foot or more above the ice, and tied a dry oak leaf to it, which, being
 pulled down, would show when he had a bite. These alders loomed through
 the mist at regular intervals as you walked half way round the pond.
 
 Ah, the pickerel of Walden! when I see them lying on the ice, or in the
 well which the fisherman cuts in the ice, making a little hole to admit
 the water, I am always surprised by their rare beauty, as if they were
 fabulous fishes, they are so foreign to the streets, even to the woods,
 foreign as Arabia to our Concord life. They possess a quite dazzling
 and transcendent beauty which separates them by a wide interval from the
 cadaverous cod and haddock whose fame is trumpeted in our streets. They
 are not green like the pines, nor gray like the stones, nor blue like
 the sky; but they have, to my eyes, if possible, yet rarer colors, like
 flowers and precious stones, as if they were the pearls, the animalized
 nuclei or crystals of the Walden water. They, of course, are Walden
 all over and all through; are themselves small Waldens in the animal
 kingdom, Waldenses. It is surprising that they are caught here--that
 in this deep and capacious spring, far beneath the rattling teams and
 chaises and tinkling sleighs that travel the Walden road, this great
 gold and emerald fish swims. I never chanced to see its kind in any
 market; it would be the cynosure of all eyes there. Easily, with a
 few convulsive quirks, they give up their watery ghosts, like a mortal
 translated before his time to the thin air of heaven.
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 As I was desirous to recover the long lost bottom of Walden Pond, I
 surveyed it carefully, before the ice broke up, early in '46, with
 compass and chain and sounding line. There have been many stories told
 about the bottom, or rather no bottom, of this pond, which certainly had
 no foundation for themselves. It is remarkable how long men will believe
 in the bottomlessness of a pond without taking the trouble to sound
 it. I have visited two such Bottomless Ponds in one walk in this
 neighborhood. Many have believed that Walden reached quite through to
 the other side of the globe. Some who have lain flat on the ice for
 a long time, looking down through the illusive medium, perchance with
 watery eyes into the bargain, and driven to hasty conclusions by the
 fear of catching cold in their breasts, have seen vast holes "into which
 a load of hay might be driven," if there were anybody to drive it, the
 undoubted source of the Styx and entrance to the Infernal Regions from
 these parts. Others have gone down from the village with a "fifty-six"
 and a wagon load of inch rope, but yet have failed to find any bottom;
 for while the "fifty-six" was resting by the way, they were paying out
 the rope in the vain attempt to fathom their truly immeasurable capacity
 for marvellousness. But I can assure my readers that Walden has a
 reasonably tight bottom at a not unreasonable, though at an unusual,
 depth. I fathomed it easily with a cod-line and a stone weighing about
 a pound and a half, and could tell accurately when the stone left the
 bottom, by having to pull so much harder before the water got underneath
 to help me. The greatest depth was exactly one hundred and two feet; to
 which may be added the five feet which it has risen since, making one
 hundred and seven. This is a remarkable depth for so small an area; yet
 not an inch of it can be spared by the imagination. What if all ponds
 were shallow? Would it not react on the minds of men? I am thankful that
 this pond was made deep and pure for a symbol. While men believe in the
 infinite some ponds will be thought to be bottomless.
 
 A factory-owner, hearing what depth I had found, thought that it could
 not be true, for, judging from his acquaintance with dams, sand would
 not lie at so steep an angle. But the deepest ponds are not so deep in
 proportion to their area as most suppose, and, if drained, would not
 leave very remarkable valleys. They are not like cups between the hills;
 for this one, which is so unusually deep for its area, appears in a
 vertical section through its centre not deeper than a shallow plate.
 Most ponds, emptied, would leave a meadow no more hollow than we
 frequently see. William Gilpin, who is so admirable in all that relates
 to landscapes, and usually so correct, standing at the head of Loch
 Fyne, in Scotland, which he describes as "a bay of salt water, sixty
 or seventy fathoms deep, four miles in breadth," and about fifty miles
 long, surrounded by mountains, observes, "If we could have seen it
 immediately after the diluvian crash, or whatever convulsion of nature
 occasioned it, before the waters gushed in, what a horrid chasm must it
 have appeared!
 
             "So high as heaved the tumid hills, so low
              Down sunk a hollow bottom broad and deep,
              Capacious bed of waters."
 
 But if, using the shortest diameter of Loch Fyne, we apply these
 proportions to Walden, which, as we have seen, appears already in a
 vertical section only like a shallow plate, it will appear four times
 as shallow. So much for the increased horrors of the chasm of Loch
 Fyne when emptied. No doubt many a smiling valley with its stretching
 cornfields occupies exactly such a "horrid chasm," from which the waters
 have receded, though it requires the insight and the far sight of the
 geologist to convince the unsuspecting inhabitants of this fact. Often
 an inquisitive eye may detect the shores of a primitive lake in the
 low horizon hills, and no subsequent elevation of the plain have been
 necessary to conceal their history. But it is easiest, as they who work
 on the highways know, to find the hollows by the puddles after a shower.
 The amount of it is, the imagination give it the least license, dives
 deeper and soars higher than Nature goes. So, probably, the depth of the
 ocean will be found to be very inconsiderable compared with its breadth.
 
 As I sounded through the ice I could determine the shape of the bottom
 with greater accuracy than is possible in surveying harbors which do
 not freeze over, and I was surprised at its general regularity. In the
 deepest part there are several acres more level than almost any field
 which is exposed to the sun, wind, and plow. In one instance, on a line
 arbitrarily chosen, the depth did not vary more than one foot in thirty
 rods; and generally, near the middle, I could calculate the variation
 for each one hundred feet in any direction beforehand within three or
 four inches. Some are accustomed to speak of deep and dangerous holes
 even in quiet sandy ponds like this, but the effect of water under these
 circumstances is to level all inequalities. The regularity of the bottom
 and its conformity to the shores and the range of the neighboring
 hills were so perfect that a distant promontory betrayed itself in the
 soundings quite across the pond, and its direction could be determined
 by observing the opposite shore. Cape becomes bar, and plain shoal, and
 valley and gorge deep water and channel.
 
 When I had mapped the pond by the scale of ten rods to an inch, and
 put down the soundings, more than a hundred in all, I observed this
 remarkable coincidence. Having noticed that the number indicating the
 greatest depth was apparently in the centre of the map, I laid a rule
 on the map lengthwise, and then breadthwise, and found, to my surprise,
 that the line of greatest length intersected the line of greatest
 breadth _exactly_ at the point of greatest depth, notwithstanding that the
 middle is so nearly level, the outline of the pond far from regular, and
 the extreme length and breadth were got by measuring into the coves; and
 I said to myself, Who knows but this hint would conduct to the deepest
 part of the ocean as well as of a pond or puddle? Is not this the rule
 also for the height of mountains, regarded as the opposite of valleys?
 We know that a hill is not highest at its narrowest part.
 
 Of five coves, three, or all which had been sounded, were observed to
 have a bar quite across their mouths and deeper water within, so that
 the bay tended to be an expansion of water within the land not only
 horizontally but vertically, and to form a basin or independent pond,
 the direction of the two capes showing the course of the bar. Every
 harbor on the sea-coast, also, has its bar at its entrance. In
 proportion as the mouth of the cove was wider compared with its length,
 the water over the bar was deeper compared with that in the basin.
 Given, then, the length and breadth of the cove, and the character of
 the surrounding shore, and you have almost elements enough to make out a
 formula for all cases.
 
 In order to see how nearly I could guess, with this experience, at the
 deepest point in a pond, by observing the outlines of a surface and
 the character of its shores alone, I made a plan of White Pond, which
 contains about forty-one acres, and, like this, has no island in it, nor
 any visible inlet or outlet; and as the line of greatest breadth fell
 very near the line of least breadth, where two opposite capes approached
 each other and two opposite bays receded, I ventured to mark a point a
 short distance from the latter line, but still on the line of greatest
 length, as the deepest. The deepest part was found to be within one
 hundred feet of this, still farther in the direction to which I had
 inclined, and was only one foot deeper, namely, sixty feet. Of course, a
 stream running through, or an island in the pond, would make the problem
 much more complicated.
 
 If we knew all the laws of Nature, we should need only one fact, or
 the description of one actual phenomenon, to infer all the particular
 results at that point. Now we know only a few laws, and our result is
 vitiated, not, of course, by any confusion or irregularity in Nature,
 but by our ignorance of essential elements in the calculation. Our
 notions of law and harmony are commonly confined to those instances
 which we detect; but the harmony which results from a far greater number
 of seemingly conflicting, but really concurring, laws, which we have not
 detected, is still more wonderful. The particular laws are as our points
 of view, as, to the traveller, a mountain outline varies with every
 step, and it has an infinite number of profiles, though absolutely but
 one form. Even when cleft or bored through it is not comprehended in its
 entireness.
 
 What I have observed of the pond is no less true in ethics. It is the
 law of average. Such a rule of the two diameters not only guides us
 toward the sun in the system and the heart in man, but draws lines
 through the length and breadth of the aggregate of a man's particular
 daily behaviors and waves of life into his coves and inlets, and where
 they intersect will be the height or depth of his character. Perhaps
 we need only to know how his shores trend and his adjacent country
 or circumstances, to infer his depth and concealed bottom. If he is
 surrounded by mountainous circumstances, an Achillean shore, whose peaks
 overshadow and are reflected in his bosom, they suggest a corresponding
 depth in him. But a low and smooth shore proves him shallow on that
 side. In our bodies, a bold projecting brow falls off to and indicates a
 corresponding depth of thought. Also there is a bar across the entrance
 of our every cove, or particular inclination; each is our harbor for
 a season, in which we are detained and partially land-locked. These
 inclinations are not whimsical usually, but their form, size, and
 direction are determined by the promontories of the shore, the ancient
 axes of elevation. When this bar is gradually increased by storms,
 tides, or currents, or there is a subsidence of the waters, so that it
 reaches to the surface, that which was at first but an inclination in
 the shore in which a thought was harbored becomes an individual
 lake, cut off from the ocean, wherein the thought secures its own
 conditions--changes, perhaps, from salt to fresh, becomes a sweet sea,
 dead sea, or a marsh. At the advent of each individual into this life,
 may we not suppose that such a bar has risen to the surface somewhere?
 It is true, we are such poor navigators that our thoughts, for the most
 part, stand off and on upon a harborless coast, are conversant only with
 the bights of the bays of poesy, or steer for the public ports of entry,
 and go into the dry docks of science, where they merely refit for this
 world, and no natural currents concur to individualize them.
 
 As for the inlet or outlet of Walden, I have not discovered any but rain
 and snow and evaporation, though perhaps, with a thermometer and a line,
 such places may be found, for where the water flows into the pond it
 will probably be coldest in summer and warmest in winter. When the
 ice-men were at work here in '46-7, the cakes sent to the shore were one
 day rejected by those who were stacking them up there, not being
 thick enough to lie side by side with the rest; and the cutters thus
 discovered that the ice over a small space was two or three inches
 thinner than elsewhere, which made them think that there was an inlet
 there. They also showed me in another place what they thought was a
 "leach-hole," through which the pond leaked out under a hill into a
 neighboring meadow, pushing me out on a cake of ice to see it. It was a
 small cavity under ten feet of water; but I think that I can warrant the
 pond not to need soldering till they find a worse leak than that.
 One has suggested, that if such a "leach-hole" should be found, its
 connection with the meadow, if any existed, might be proved by conveying
 some colored powder or sawdust to the mouth of the hole, and then
 putting a strainer over the spring in the meadow, which would catch some
 of the particles carried through by the current.
 
 While I was surveying, the ice, which was sixteen inches thick,
 undulated under a slight wind like water. It is well known that a
 level cannot be used on ice. At one rod from the shore its greatest
 fluctuation, when observed by means of a level on land directed toward
 a graduated staff on the ice, was three quarters of an inch, though the
 ice appeared firmly attached to the shore. It was probably greater in
 the middle. Who knows but if our instruments were delicate enough we
 might detect an undulation in the crust of the earth? When two legs of
 my level were on the shore and the third on the ice, and the sights
 were directed over the latter, a rise or fall of the ice of an almost
 infinitesimal amount made a difference of several feet on a tree across
 the pond. When I began to cut holes for sounding there were three or
 four inches of water on the ice under a deep snow which had sunk it
 thus far; but the water began immediately to run into these holes, and
 continued to run for two days in deep streams, which wore away the ice
 on every side, and contributed essentially, if not mainly, to dry the
 surface of the pond; for, as the water ran in, it raised and floated the
 ice. This was somewhat like cutting a hole in the bottom of a ship to
 let the water out. When such holes freeze, and a rain succeeds,
 and finally a new freezing forms a fresh smooth ice over all, it is
 beautifully mottled internally by dark figures, shaped somewhat like a
 spider's web, what you may call ice rosettes, produced by the channels
 worn by the water flowing from all sides to a centre. Sometimes, also,
 when the ice was covered with shallow puddles, I saw a double shadow of
 myself, one standing on the head of the other, one on the ice, the other
 on the trees or hillside.
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 While yet it is cold January, and snow and ice are thick and solid, the
 prudent landlord comes from the village to get ice to cool his summer
 drink; impressively, even pathetically, wise, to foresee the heat and
 thirst of July now in January--wearing a thick coat and mittens! when so
 many things are not provided for. It may be that he lays up no treasures
 in this world which will cool his summer drink in the next. He cuts and
 saws the solid pond, unroofs the house of fishes, and carts off their
 very element and air, held fast by chains and stakes like corded wood,
 through the favoring winter air, to wintry cellars, to underlie the
 summer there. It looks like solidified azure, as, far off, it is drawn
 through the streets. These ice-cutters are a merry race, full of jest
 and sport, and when I went among them they were wont to invite me to saw
 pit-fashion with them, I standing underneath.
 
 In the winter of '46-7 there came a hundred men of Hyperborean
 extraction swoop down on to our pond one morning, with many carloads
 of ungainly-looking farming tools--sleds, plows, drill-barrows,
 turf-knives, spades, saws, rakes, and each man was armed with a
 double-pointed pike-staff, such as is not described in the New-England
 Farmer or the Cultivator. I did not know whether they had come to sow a
 crop of winter rye, or some other kind of grain recently introduced from
 Iceland. As I saw no manure, I judged that they meant to skim the land,
 as I had done, thinking the soil was deep and had lain fallow long
 enough. They said that a gentleman farmer, who was behind the scenes,
 wanted to double his money, which, as I understood, amounted to half
 a million already; but in order to cover each one of his dollars with
 another, he took off the only coat, ay, the skin itself, of Walden
 Pond in the midst of a hard winter. They went to work at once, plowing,
 barrowing, rolling, furrowing, in admirable order, as if they were bent
 on making this a model farm; but when I was looking sharp to see what
 kind of seed they dropped into the furrow, a gang of fellows by my side
 suddenly began to hook up the virgin mould itself, with a peculiar jerk,
 clean down to the sand, or rather the water--for it was a very springy
 soil--indeed all the _terra firma_ there was--and haul it away on sleds,
 and then I guessed that they must be cutting peat in a bog. So they came
 and went every day, with a peculiar shriek from the locomotive, from and
 to some point of the polar regions, as it seemed to me, like a flock
 of arctic snow-birds. But sometimes Squaw Walden had her revenge, and
 a hired man, walking behind his team, slipped through a crack in the
 ground down toward Tartarus, and he who was so brave before suddenly
 became but the ninth part of a man, almost gave up his animal heat, and
 was glad to take refuge in my house, and acknowledged that there was
 some virtue in a stove; or sometimes the frozen soil took a piece of
 steel out of a plowshare, or a plow got set in the furrow and had to be
 cut out.
 
 To speak literally, a hundred Irishmen, with Yankee overseers, came from
 Cambridge every day to get out the ice. They divided it into cakes by
 methods too well known to require description, and these, being sledded
 to the shore, were rapidly hauled off on to an ice platform, and raised
 by grappling irons and block and tackle, worked by horses, on to a
 stack, as surely as so many barrels of flour, and there placed evenly
 side by side, and row upon row, as if they formed the solid base of an
 obelisk designed to pierce the clouds. They told me that in a good day
 they could get out a thousand tons, which was the yield of about one
 acre. Deep ruts and "cradle-holes" were worn in the ice, as on _terra
 firma_, by the passage of the sleds over the same track, and the horses
 invariably ate their oats out of cakes of ice hollowed out like buckets.
 They stacked up the cakes thus in the open air in a pile thirty-five
 feet high on one side and six or seven rods square, putting hay between
 the outside layers to exclude the air; for when the wind, though never
 so cold, finds a passage through, it will wear large cavities, leaving
 slight supports or studs only here and there, and finally topple it
 down. At first it looked like a vast blue fort or Valhalla; but when
 they began to tuck the coarse meadow hay into the crevices, and this
 became covered with rime and icicles, it looked like a venerable
 moss-grown and hoary ruin, built of azure-tinted marble, the abode of
 Winter, that old man we see in the almanac--his shanty, as if he had
 a design to estivate with us. They calculated that not twenty-five per
 cent of this would reach its destination, and that two or three per cent
 would be wasted in the cars. However, a still greater part of this heap
 had a different destiny from what was intended; for, either because the
 ice was found not to keep so well as was expected, containing more air
 than usual, or for some other reason, it never got to market. This heap,
 made in the winter of '46-7 and estimated to contain ten thousand tons,
 was finally covered with hay and boards; and though it was unroofed the
 following July, and a part of it carried off, the rest remaining exposed
 to the sun, it stood over that summer and the next winter, and was not
 quite melted till September, 1848. Thus the pond recovered the greater
 part.
 
 Like the water, the Walden ice, seen near at hand, has a green tint, but
 at a distance is beautifully blue, and you can easily tell it from the
 white ice of the river, or the merely greenish ice of some ponds, a
 quarter of a mile off. Sometimes one of those great cakes slips from the
 ice-man's sled into the village street, and lies there for a week like a
 great emerald, an object of interest to all passers. I have noticed that
 a portion of Walden which in the state of water was green will often,
 when frozen, appear from the same point of view blue. So the hollows
 about this pond will, sometimes, in the winter, be filled with a
 greenish water somewhat like its own, but the next day will have frozen
 blue. Perhaps the blue color of water and ice is due to the light and
 air they contain, and the most transparent is the bluest. Ice is an
 interesting subject for contemplation. They told me that they had some
 in the ice-houses at Fresh Pond five years old which was as good as
 ever. Why is it that a bucket of water soon becomes putrid, but frozen
 remains sweet forever? It is commonly said that this is the difference
 between the affections and the intellect.
 
 Thus for sixteen days I saw from my window a hundred men at work like
 busy husbandmen, with teams and horses and apparently all the implements
 of farming, such a picture as we see on the first page of the almanac;
 and as often as I looked out I was reminded of the fable of the lark and
 the reapers, or the parable of the sower, and the like; and now they are
 all gone, and in thirty days more, probably, I shall look from the same
 window on the pure sea-green Walden water there, reflecting the clouds
 and the trees, and sending up its evaporations in solitude, and no
 traces will appear that a man has ever stood there. Perhaps I shall hear
 a solitary loon laugh as he dives and plumes himself, or shall see a
 lonely fisher in his boat, like a floating leaf, beholding his form
 reflected in the waves, where lately a hundred men securely labored.
 
 Thus it appears that the sweltering inhabitants of Charleston and New
 Orleans, of Madras and Bombay and Calcutta, drink at my well. In the
 morning I bathe my intellect in the stupendous and cosmogonal philosophy
 of the Bhagvat-Geeta, since whose composition years of the gods
 have elapsed, and in comparison with which our modern world and its
 literature seem puny and trivial; and I doubt if that philosophy is
 not to be referred to a previous state of existence, so remote is its
 sublimity from our conceptions. I lay down the book and go to my well
 for water, and lo! there I meet the servant of the Bramin, priest of
 Brahma and Vishnu and Indra, who still sits in his temple on the Ganges
 reading the Vedas, or dwells at the root of a tree with his crust and
 water jug. I meet his servant come to draw water for his master, and
 our buckets as it were grate together in the same well. The pure Walden
 water is mingled with the sacred water of the Ganges. With favoring
 winds it is wafted past the site of the fabulous islands of Atlantis and
 the Hesperides, makes the periplus of Hanno, and, floating by Ternate
 and Tidore and the mouth of the Persian Gulf, melts in the tropic gales
 of the Indian seas, and is landed in ports of which Alexander only heard
 the names.
 
 
 
 
 Spring
 
 
 The opening of large tracts by the ice-cutters commonly causes a pond
 to break up earlier; for the water, agitated by the wind, even in cold
 weather, wears away the surrounding ice. But such was not the effect on
 Walden that year, for she had soon got a thick new garment to take the
 place of the old. This pond never breaks up so soon as the others in
 this neighborhood, on account both of its greater depth and its having
 no stream passing through it to melt or wear away the ice. I never knew
 it to open in the course of a winter, not excepting that of '52-3, which
 gave the ponds so severe a trial. It commonly opens about the first
 of April, a week or ten days later than Flint's Pond and Fair Haven,
 beginning to melt on the north side and in the shallower parts where
 it began to freeze. It indicates better than any water hereabouts the
 absolute progress of the season, being least affected by transient
 changes of temperature. A severe cold of a few days' duration in
 March may very much retard the opening of the former ponds, while the
 temperature of Walden increases almost uninterruptedly. A thermometer
 thrust into the middle of Walden on the 6th of March, 1847, stood at
 32A, or freezing point; near the shore at 33A; in the middle of Flint's
 Pond, the same day, at 32A; at a dozen rods from the shore, in shallow
 water, under ice a foot thick, at 36A. This difference of three and a
 half degrees between the temperature of the deep water and the shallow
 in the latter pond, and the fact that a great proportion of it is
 comparatively shallow, show why it should break up so much sooner than
 Walden. The ice in the shallowest part was at this time several inches
 thinner than in the middle. In midwinter the middle had been the warmest
 and the ice thinnest there. So, also, every one who has waded about the
 shores of the pond in summer must have perceived how much warmer the
 water is close to the shore, where only three or four inches deep, than
 a little distance out, and on the surface where it is deep, than near
 the bottom. In spring the sun not only exerts an influence through the
 increased temperature of the air and earth, but its heat passes through
 ice a foot or more thick, and is reflected from the bottom in shallow
 water, and so also warms the water and melts the under side of the ice,
 at the same time that it is melting it more directly above, making
 it uneven, and causing the air bubbles which it contains to extend
 themselves upward and downward until it is completely honeycombed, and
 at last disappears suddenly in a single spring rain. Ice has its grain
 as well as wood, and when a cake begins to rot or "comb," that is,
 assume the appearance of honeycomb, whatever may be its position, the
 air cells are at right angles with what was the water surface. Where
 there is a rock or a log rising near to the surface the ice over it is
 much thinner, and is frequently quite dissolved by this reflected heat;
 and I have been told that in the experiment at Cambridge to freeze water
 in a shallow wooden pond, though the cold air circulated underneath, and
 so had access to both sides, the reflection of the sun from the bottom
 more than counterbalanced this advantage. When a warm rain in the middle
 of the winter melts off the snow-ice from Walden, and leaves a hard dark
 or transparent ice on the middle, there will be a strip of rotten though
 thicker white ice, a rod or more wide, about the shores, created by this
 reflected heat. Also, as I have said, the bubbles themselves within the
 ice operate as burning-glasses to melt the ice beneath.
 
 The phenomena of the year take place every day in a pond on a small
 scale. Every morning, generally speaking, the shallow water is being
 warmed more rapidly than the deep, though it may not be made so warm
 after all, and every evening it is being cooled more rapidly until the
 morning. The day is an epitome of the year. The night is the winter, the
 morning and evening are the spring and fall, and the noon is the summer.
 The cracking and booming of the ice indicate a change of temperature.
 One pleasant morning after a cold night, February 24th, 1850, having
 gone to Flint's Pond to spend the day, I noticed with surprise, that
 when I struck the ice with the head of my axe, it resounded like a gong
 for many rods around, or as if I had struck on a tight drum-head.
 The pond began to boom about an hour after sunrise, when it felt the
 influence of the sun's rays slanted upon it from over the hills;
 it stretched itself and yawned like a waking man with a gradually
 increasing tumult, which was kept up three or four hours. It took a
 short siesta at noon, and boomed once more toward night, as the sun
 was withdrawing his influence. In the right stage of the weather a pond
 fires its evening gun with great regularity. But in the middle of the
 day, being full of cracks, and the air also being less elastic, it had
 completely lost its resonance, and probably fishes and muskrats could
 not then have been stunned by a blow on it. The fishermen say that the
 "thundering of the pond" scares the fishes and prevents their biting.
 The pond does not thunder every evening, and I cannot tell surely when
 to expect its thundering; but though I may perceive no difference in
 the weather, it does. Who would have suspected so large and cold and
 thick-skinned a thing to be so sensitive? Yet it has its law to which
 it thunders obedience when it should as surely as the buds expand in the
 spring. The earth is all alive and covered with papillae. The largest
 pond is as sensitive to atmospheric changes as the globule of mercury in
 its tube.
 
 One attraction in coming to the woods to live was that I should have
 leisure and opportunity to see the Spring come in. The ice in the pond
 at length begins to be honeycombed, and I can set my heel in it as I
 walk. Fogs and rains and warmer suns are gradually melting the snow; the
 days have grown sensibly longer; and I see how I shall get through the
 winter without adding to my wood-pile, for large fires are no longer
 necessary. I am on the alert for the first signs of spring, to hear the
 chance note of some arriving bird, or the striped squirrel's chirp, for
 his stores must be now nearly exhausted, or see the woodchuck venture
 out of his winter quarters. On the 13th of March, after I had heard the
 bluebird, song sparrow, and red-wing, the ice was still nearly a foot
 thick. As the weather grew warmer it was not sensibly worn away by the
 water, nor broken up and floated off as in rivers, but, though it was
 completely melted for half a rod in width about the shore, the middle
 was merely honeycombed and saturated with water, so that you could put
 your foot through it when six inches thick; but by the next day evening,
 perhaps, after a warm rain followed by fog, it would have wholly
 disappeared, all gone off with the fog, spirited away. One year I went
 across the middle only five days before it disappeared entirely. In 1845
 Walden was first completely open on the 1st of April; in '46, the 25th
 of March; in '47, the 8th of April; in '51, the 28th of March; in '52,
 the 18th of April; in '53, the 23d of March; in '54, about the 7th of
 April.
 
 Every incident connected with the breaking up of the rivers and ponds
 and the settling of the weather is particularly interesting to us who
 live in a climate of so great extremes. When the warmer days come, they
 who dwell near the river hear the ice crack at night with a startling
 whoop as loud as artillery, as if its icy fetters were rent from end to
 end, and within a few days see it rapidly going out. So the alligator
 comes out of the mud with quakings of the earth. One old man, who has
 been a close observer of Nature, and seems as thoroughly wise in regard
 to all her operations as if she had been put upon the stocks when he was
 a boy, and he had helped to lay her keel--who has come to his growth,
 and can hardly acquire more of natural lore if he should live to the age
 of Methuselah--told me--and I was surprised to hear him express wonder
 at any of Nature's operations, for I thought that there were no secrets
 between them--that one spring day he took his gun and boat, and thought
 that he would have a little sport with the ducks. There was ice still on
 the meadows, but it was all gone out of the river, and he dropped down
 without obstruction from Sudbury, where he lived, to Fair Haven Pond,
 which he found, unexpectedly, covered for the most part with a firm
 field of ice. It was a warm day, and he was surprised to see so great
 a body of ice remaining. Not seeing any ducks, he hid his boat on the
 north or back side of an island in the pond, and then concealed himself
 in the bushes on the south side, to await them. The ice was melted for
 three or four rods from the shore, and there was a smooth and warm sheet
 of water, with a muddy bottom, such as the ducks love, within, and he
 thought it likely that some would be along pretty soon. After he had
 lain still there about an hour he heard a low and seemingly very distant
 sound, but singularly grand and impressive, unlike anything he had ever
 heard, gradually swelling and increasing as if it would have a universal
 and memorable ending, a sullen rush and roar, which seemed to him all
 at once like the sound of a vast body of fowl coming in to settle there,
 and, seizing his gun, he started up in haste and excited; but he found,
 to his surprise, that the whole body of the ice had started while he lay
 there, and drifted in to the shore, and the sound he had heard was made
 by its edge grating on the shore--at first gently nibbled and crumbled
 off, but at length heaving up and scattering its wrecks along the island
 to a considerable height before it came to a standstill.
 
 At length the sun's rays have attained the right angle, and warm winds
 blow up mist and rain and melt the snowbanks, and the sun, dispersing
 the mist, smiles on a checkered landscape of russet and white smoking
 with incense, through which the traveller picks his way from islet to
 islet, cheered by the music of a thousand tinkling rills and rivulets
 whose veins are filled with the blood of winter which they are bearing
 off.
 
 Few phenomena gave me more delight than to observe the forms which
 thawing sand and clay assume in flowing down the sides of a deep cut
 on the railroad through which I passed on my way to the village, a
 phenomenon not very common on so large a scale, though the number of
 freshly exposed banks of the right material must have been greatly
 multiplied since railroads were invented. The material was sand of every
 degree of fineness and of various rich colors, commonly mixed with
 a little clay. When the frost comes out in the spring, and even in a
 thawing day in the winter, the sand begins to flow down the slopes like
 lava, sometimes bursting out through the snow and overflowing it where
 no sand was to be seen before. Innumerable little streams overlap and
 interlace one with another, exhibiting a sort of hybrid product, which
 obeys half way the law of currents, and half way that of vegetation. As
 it flows it takes the forms of sappy leaves or vines, making heaps of
 pulpy sprays a foot or more in depth, and resembling, as you look
 down on them, the laciniated, lobed, and imbricated thalluses of some
 lichens; or you are reminded of coral, of leopard's paws or birds' feet,
 of brains or lungs or bowels, and excrements of all kinds. It is a truly
 _grotesque_ vegetation, whose forms and color we see imitated in bronze,
 a sort of architectural foliage more ancient and typical than acanthus,
 chiccory, ivy, vine, or any vegetable leaves; destined perhaps, under
 some circumstances, to become a puzzle to future geologists. The whole
 cut impressed me as if it were a cave with its stalactites laid open
 to the light. The various shades of the sand are singularly rich and
 agreeable, embracing the different iron colors, brown, gray, yellowish,
 and reddish. When the flowing mass reaches the drain at the foot of the
 bank it spreads out flatter into _strands_, the separate streams losing
 their semi-cylindrical form and gradually becoming more flat and broad,
 running together as they are more moist, till they form an almost flat
 _sand_, still variously and beautifully shaded, but in which you can trace
 the original forms of vegetation; till at length, in the water itself,
 they are converted into _banks_, like those formed off the mouths of
 rivers, and the forms of vegetation are lost in the ripple marks on the
 bottom.
 
 The whole bank, which is from twenty to forty feet high, is sometimes
 overlaid with a mass of this kind of foliage, or sandy rupture, for a
 quarter of a mile on one or both sides, the produce of one spring day.
 What makes this sand foliage remarkable is its springing into existence
 thus suddenly. When I see on the one side the inert bank--for the sun
 acts on one side first--and on the other this luxuriant foliage, the
 creation of an hour, I am affected as if in a peculiar sense I stood in
 the laboratory of the Artist who made the world and me--had come to
 where he was still at work, sporting on this bank, and with excess of
 energy strewing his fresh designs about. I feel as if I were nearer to
 the vitals of the globe, for this sandy overflow is something such a
 foliaceous mass as the vitals of the animal body. You find thus in the
 very sands an anticipation of the vegetable leaf. No wonder that the
 earth expresses itself outwardly in leaves, it so labors with the idea
 inwardly. The atoms have already learned this law, and are pregnant by
 it. The overhanging leaf sees here its prototype. _Internally_, whether
 in the globe or animal body, it is a moist thick _lobe_, a word
 especially applicable to the liver and lungs and the leaves of fat
 ([Greek: gehibo], _labor_, _lapsus_, to flow or slip downward, a
 lapsing; [Greek: lobhos], _globus_, lobe, globe; also lap, flap, and
 many other words); _externally_ a dry thin _leaf_, even as the _f_ and
 _v_ are a pressed and dried _b_. The radicals of _lobe_ are _lb_, the
 soft mass of the _b_ (single lobed, or B, double lobed), with the liquid
 _l_ behind it pressing it forward. In globe, _glb_, the guttural _g_
 adds to the meaning the capacity of the throat. The feathers and wings
 of birds are still drier and thinner leaves. Thus, also, you pass from
 the lumpish grub in the earth to the airy and fluttering butterfly. The
 very globe continually transcends and translates itself, and becomes
 winged in its orbit. Even ice begins with delicate crystal leaves, as if
 it had flowed into moulds which the fronds of waterplants have impressed
 on the watery mirror. The whole tree itself is but one leaf, and rivers
 are still vaster leaves whose pulp is intervening earth, and towns and
 cities are the ova of insects in their axils.
 
 When the sun withdraws the sand ceases to flow, but in the morning the
 streams will start once more and branch and branch again into a myriad
 of others. You here see perchance how blood-vessels are formed. If
 you look closely you observe that first there pushes forward from the
 thawing mass a stream of softened sand with a drop-like point, like the
 ball of the finger, feeling its way slowly and blindly downward, until
 at last with more heat and moisture, as the sun gets higher, the most
 fluid portion, in its effort to obey the law to which the most inert
 also yields, separates from the latter and forms for itself a meandering
 channel or artery within that, in which is seen a little silvery stream
 glancing like lightning from one stage of pulpy leaves or branches to
 another, and ever and anon swallowed up in the sand. It is wonderful how
 rapidly yet perfectly the sand organizes itself as it flows, using the
 best material its mass affords to form the sharp edges of its channel.
 Such are the sources of rivers. In the silicious matter which the water
 deposits is perhaps the bony system, and in the still finer soil and
 organic matter the fleshy fibre or cellular tissue. What is man but
 a mass of thawing clay? The ball of the human finger is but a drop
 congealed. The fingers and toes flow to their extent from the thawing
 mass of the body. Who knows what the human body would expand and flow
 out to under a more genial heaven? Is not the hand a spreading _palm_
 leaf with its lobes and veins? The ear may be regarded, fancifully, as a
 lichen, _Umbilicaria_, on the side of the head, with its lobe or drop.
 The lip--_labium_, from _labor_ (?)--laps or lapses from the sides of the
 cavernous mouth. The nose is a manifest congealed drop or stalactite.
 The chin is a still larger drop, the confluent dripping of the face. The
 cheeks are a slide from the brows into the valley of the face, opposed
 and diffused by the cheek bones. Each rounded lobe of the vegetable
 leaf, too, is a thick and now loitering drop, larger or smaller; the
 lobes are the fingers of the leaf; and as many lobes as it has, in
 so many directions it tends to flow, and more heat or other genial
 influences would have caused it to flow yet farther.
 
 Thus it seemed that this one hillside illustrated the principle of all
 the operations of Nature. The Maker of this earth but patented a leaf.
 What Champollion will decipher this hieroglyphic for us, that we may
 turn over a new leaf at last? This phenomenon is more exhilarating to
 me than the luxuriance and fertility of vineyards. True, it is somewhat
 excrementitious in its character, and there is no end to the heaps
 of liver, lights, and bowels, as if the globe were turned wrong side
 outward; but this suggests at least that Nature has some bowels, and
 there again is mother of humanity. This is the frost coming out of the
 ground; this is Spring. It precedes the green and flowery spring, as
 mythology precedes regular poetry. I know of nothing more purgative of
 winter fumes and indigestions. It convinces me that Earth is still in
 her swaddling-clothes, and stretches forth baby fingers on every side.
 Fresh curls spring from the baldest brow. There is nothing inorganic.
 These foliaceous heaps lie along the bank like the slag of a furnace,
 showing that Nature is "in full blast" within. The earth is not a mere
 fragment of dead history, stratum upon stratum like the leaves of a
 book, to be studied by geologists and antiquaries chiefly, but living
 poetry like the leaves of a tree, which precede flowers and fruit--not a
 fossil earth, but a living earth; compared with whose great central life
 all animal and vegetable life is merely parasitic. Its throes will heave
 our exuviae from their graves. You may melt your metals and cast them
 into the most beautiful moulds you can; they will never excite me like
 the forms which this molten earth flows out into. And not only it,
 but the institutions upon it are plastic like clay in the hands of the
 potter.
 
 Ere long, not only on these banks, but on every hill and plain and in
 every hollow, the frost comes out of the ground like a dormant quadruped
 from its burrow, and seeks the sea with music, or migrates to other
 climes in clouds. Thaw with his gentle persuasion is more powerful than
 Thor with his hammer. The one melts, the other but breaks in pieces.
 
 When the ground was partially bare of snow, and a few warm days had
 dried its surface somewhat, it was pleasant to compare the first tender
 signs of the infant year just peeping forth with the stately
 beauty of the withered vegetation which had withstood the
 winter--life-everlasting, goldenrods, pinweeds, and graceful wild
 grasses, more obvious and interesting frequently than in summer even,
 as if their beauty was not ripe till then; even cotton-grass, cat-tails,
 mulleins, johnswort, hard-hack, meadow-sweet, and other strong-stemmed
 plants, those unexhausted granaries which entertain the earliest
 birds--decent weeds, at least, which widowed Nature wears. I am
 particularly attracted by the arching and sheaf-like top of the
 wool-grass; it brings back the summer to our winter memories, and is
 among the forms which art loves to copy, and which, in the vegetable
 kingdom, have the same relation to types already in the mind of man that
 astronomy has. It is an antique style, older than Greek or Egyptian.
 Many of the phenomena of Winter are suggestive of an inexpressible
 tenderness and fragile delicacy. We are accustomed to hear this king
 described as a rude and boisterous tyrant; but with the gentleness of a
 lover he adorns the tresses of Summer.
 
 At the approach of spring the red squirrels got under my house, two at
 a time, directly under my feet as I sat reading or writing, and kept up
 the queerest chuckling and chirruping and vocal pirouetting and gurgling
 sounds that ever were heard; and when I stamped they only chirruped the
 louder, as if past all fear and respect in their mad pranks, defying
 humanity to stop them. No, you don't--chickaree--chickaree. They were
 wholly deaf to my arguments, or failed to perceive their force, and fell
 into a strain of invective that was irresistible.
 
 The first sparrow of spring! The year beginning with younger hope than
 ever! The faint silvery warblings heard over the partially bare and
 moist fields from the bluebird, the song sparrow, and the red-wing, as
 if the last flakes of winter tinkled as they fell! What at such a time
 are histories, chronologies, traditions, and all written revelations?
 The brooks sing carols and glees to the spring. The marsh hawk, sailing
 low over the meadow, is already seeking the first slimy life that
 awakes. The sinking sound of melting snow is heard in all dells, and the
 ice dissolves apace in the ponds. The grass flames up on the hillsides
 like a spring fire--"et primitus oritur herba imbribus primoribus
 evocata"--as if the earth sent forth an inward heat to greet the
 returning sun; not yellow but green is the color of its flame;--the
 symbol of perpetual youth, the grass-blade, like a long green ribbon,
 streams from the sod into the summer, checked indeed by the frost, but
 anon pushing on again, lifting its spear of last year's hay with the
 fresh life below. It grows as steadily as the rill oozes out of the
 ground. It is almost identical with that, for in the growing days of
 June, when the rills are dry, the grass-blades are their channels, and
 from year to year the herds drink at this perennial green stream, and
 the mower draws from it betimes their winter supply. So our human life
 but dies down to its root, and still puts forth its green blade to
 eternity.
 
 Walden is melting apace. There is a canal two rods wide along the
 northerly and westerly sides, and wider still at the east end. A great
 field of ice has cracked off from the main body. I hear a song sparrow
 singing from the bushes on the shore,--_olit_, _olit_, _olit,_--_chip_,
 _chip_, _chip_, _che char_,--_che wiss_, _wiss_, _wiss_. He too is
 helping to crack it. How handsome the great sweeping curves in the edge
 of the ice, answering somewhat to those of the shore, but more regular!
 It is unusually hard, owing to the recent severe but transient cold, and
 all watered or waved like a palace floor. But the wind slides eastward
 over its opaque surface in vain, till it reaches the living surface
 beyond. It is glorious to behold this ribbon of water sparkling in the
 sun, the bare face of the pond full of glee and youth, as if it spoke
 the joy of the fishes within it, and of the sands on its shore--a
 silvery sheen as from the scales of a leuciscus, as it were all one
 active fish. Such is the contrast between winter and spring. Walden was
 dead and is alive again. But this spring it broke up more steadily, as I
 have said.
 
 The change from storm and winter to serene and mild weather, from dark
 and sluggish hours to bright and elastic ones, is a memorable crisis
 which all things proclaim. It is seemingly instantaneous at last.
 Suddenly an influx of light filled my house, though the evening was at
 hand, and the clouds of winter still overhung it, and the eaves were
 dripping with sleety rain. I looked out the window, and lo! where
 yesterday was cold gray ice there lay the transparent pond already calm
 and full of hope as in a summer evening, reflecting a summer evening
 sky in its bosom, though none was visible overhead, as if it had
 intelligence with some remote horizon. I heard a robin in the distance,
 the first I had heard for many a thousand years, methought, whose note
 I shall not forget for many a thousand more--the same sweet and powerful
 song as of yore. O the evening robin, at the end of a New England summer
 day! If I could ever find the twig he sits upon! I mean _he_; I mean the
 _twig_. This at least is not the _Turdus migratorius_. The pitch pines and
 shrub oaks about my house, which had so long drooped, suddenly resumed
 their several characters, looked brighter, greener, and more erect and
 alive, as if effectually cleansed and restored by the rain. I knew that
 it would not rain any more. You may tell by looking at any twig of the
 forest, ay, at your very wood-pile, whether its winter is past or not.
 As it grew darker, I was startled by the honking of geese flying low
 over the woods, like weary travellers getting in late from Southern
 lakes, and indulging at last in unrestrained complaint and mutual
 consolation. Standing at my door, I could hear the rush of their wings;
 when, driving toward my house, they suddenly spied my light, and with
 hushed clamor wheeled and settled in the pond. So I came in, and shut
 the door, and passed my first spring night in the woods.
 
 In the morning I watched the geese from the door through the mist,
 sailing in the middle of the pond, fifty rods off, so large and
 tumultuous that Walden appeared like an artificial pond for their
 amusement. But when I stood on the shore they at once rose up with a
 great flapping of wings at the signal of their commander, and when they
 had got into rank circled about over my head, twenty-nine of them, and
 then steered straight to Canada, with a regular _honk_ from the leader at
 intervals, trusting to break their fast in muddier pools. A "plump" of
 ducks rose at the same time and took the route to the north in the wake
 of their noisier cousins.
 
 For a week I heard the circling, groping clangor of some solitary goose
 in the foggy mornings, seeking its companion, and still peopling the
 woods with the sound of a larger life than they could sustain. In April
 the pigeons were seen again flying express in small flocks, and in due
 time I heard the martins twittering over my clearing, though it had not
 seemed that the township contained so many that it could afford me any,
 and I fancied that they were peculiarly of the ancient race that dwelt
 in hollow trees ere white men came. In almost all climes the tortoise
 and the frog are among the precursors and heralds of this season, and
 birds fly with song and glancing plumage, and plants spring and bloom,
 and winds blow, to correct this slight oscillation of the poles and
 preserve the equilibrium of nature.
 
 As every season seems best to us in its turn, so the coming in of spring
 is like the creation of Cosmos out of Chaos and the realization of the
 Golden Age.--
 
   "Eurus ad Auroram Nabathaeaque regna recessit,
    Persidaque, et radiis juga subdita matutinis."
 
   "The East-Wind withdrew to Aurora and the NabathA|n kingdom,
    And the Persian, and the ridges placed under the morning rays.
                         . . . . . . .
    Man was born.  Whether that Artificer of things,
    The origin of a better world, made him from the divine seed;
    Or the earth, being recent and lately sundered from the high
    Ether, retained some seeds of cognate heaven."
 
 A single gentle rain makes the grass many shades greener. So our
 prospects brighten on the influx of better thoughts. We should be
 blessed if we lived in the present always, and took advantage of every
 accident that befell us, like the grass which confesses the influence
 of the slightest dew that falls on it; and did not spend our time in
 atoning for the neglect of past opportunities, which we call doing our
 duty. We loiter in winter while it is already spring. In a pleasant
 spring morning all men's sins are forgiven. Such a day is a truce to
 vice. While such a sun holds out to burn, the vilest sinner may return.
 Through our own recovered innocence we discern the innocence of our
 neighbors. You may have known your neighbor yesterday for a thief,
 a drunkard, or a sensualist, and merely pitied or despised him, and
 despaired of the world; but the sun shines bright and warm this first
 spring morning, recreating the world, and you meet him at some serene
 work, and see how it is exhausted and debauched veins expand with still
 joy and bless the new day, feel the spring influence with the innocence
 of infancy, and all his faults are forgotten. There is not only an
 atmosphere of good will about him, but even a savor of holiness groping
 for expression, blindly and ineffectually perhaps, like a new-born
 instinct, and for a short hour the south hill-side echoes to no vulgar
 jest. You see some innocent fair shoots preparing to burst from his
 gnarled rind and try another year's life, tender and fresh as the
 youngest plant. Even he has entered into the joy of his Lord. Why the
 jailer does not leave open his prison doors--why the judge does not
 dismis his case--why the preacher does not dismiss his congregation! It
 is because they do not obey the hint which God gives them, nor accept
 the pardon which he freely offers to all.
 
 "A return to goodness produced each day in the tranquil and beneficent
 breath of the morning, causes that in respect to the love of virtue and
 the hatred of vice, one approaches a little the primitive nature of man,
 as the sprouts of the forest which has been felled. In like manner
 the evil which one does in the interval of a day prevents the germs of
 virtues which began to spring up again from developing themselves and
 destroys them.
 
 "After the germs of virtue have thus been prevented many times from
 developing themselves, then the beneficent breath of evening does not
 suffice to preserve them. As soon as the breath of evening does not
 suffice longer to preserve them, then the nature of man does not differ
 much from that of the brute. Men seeing the nature of this man like that
 of the brute, think that he has never possessed the innate faculty of
 reason. Are those the true and natural sentiments of man?"
 
    "The Golden Age was first created, which without any avenger
     Spontaneously without law cherished fidelity and rectitude.
     Punishment and fear were not; nor were threatening words read
     On suspended brass; nor did the suppliant crowd fear
     The words of their judge; but were safe without an avenger.
     Not yet the pine felled on its mountains had descended
     To the liquid waves that it might see a foreign world,
     And mortals knew no shores but their own.
                           . . . . . . .
     There was eternal spring, and placid zephyrs with warm
     Blasts soothed the flowers born without seed."
 
 On the 29th of April, as I was fishing from the bank of the river near
 the Nine-Acre-Corner bridge, standing on the quaking grass and willow
 roots, where the muskrats lurk, I heard a singular rattling sound,
 somewhat like that of the sticks which boys play with their fingers,
 when, looking up, I observed a very slight and graceful hawk, like a
 nighthawk, alternately soaring like a ripple and tumbling a rod or two
 over and over, showing the under side of its wings, which gleamed like
 a satin ribbon in the sun, or like the pearly inside of a shell.
 This sight reminded me of falconry and what nobleness and poetry are
 associated with that sport. The Merlin it seemed to me it might be
 called: but I care not for its name. It was the most ethereal flight I
 had ever witnessed. It did not simply flutter like a butterfly, nor soar
 like the larger hawks, but it sported with proud reliance in the fields
 of air; mounting again and again with its strange chuckle, it repeated
 its free and beautiful fall, turning over and over like a kite, and then
 recovering from its lofty tumbling, as if it had never set its foot on
 _terra firma_. It appeared to have no companion in the universe--sporting
 there alone--and to need none but the morning and the ether with which
 it played. It was not lonely, but made all the earth lonely beneath it.
 Where was the parent which hatched it, its kindred, and its father in
 the heavens? The tenant of the air, it seemed related to the earth but
 by an egg hatched some time in the crevice of a crag;--or was its native
 nest made in the angle of a cloud, woven of the rainbow's trimmings and
 the sunset sky, and lined with some soft midsummer haze caught up from
 earth? Its eyry now some cliffy cloud.
 
 Beside this I got a rare mess of golden and silver and bright cupreous
 fishes, which looked like a string of jewels. Ah! I have penetrated to
 those meadows on the morning of many a first spring day, jumping from
 hummock to hummock, from willow root to willow root, when the wild river
 valley and the woods were bathed in so pure and bright a light as would
 have waked the dead, if they had been slumbering in their graves, as
 some suppose. There needs no stronger proof of immortality. All things
 must live in such a light. O Death, where was thy sting? O Grave, where
 was thy victory, then?
 
 Our village life would stagnate if it were not for the unexplored
 forests and meadows which surround it. We need the tonic of wildness--to
 wade sometimes in marshes where the bittern and the meadow-hen lurk, and
 hear the booming of the snipe; to smell the whispering sedge where only
 some wilder and more solitary fowl builds her nest, and the mink crawls
 with its belly close to the ground. At the same time that we are
 earnest to explore and learn all things, we require that all things
 be mysterious and unexplorable, that land and sea be infinitely wild,
 unsurveyed and unfathomed by us because unfathomable. We can never have
 enough of nature. We must be refreshed by the sight of inexhaustible
 vigor, vast and titanic features, the sea-coast with its wrecks, the
 wilderness with its living and its decaying trees, the thunder-cloud,
 and the rain which lasts three weeks and produces freshets. We need
 to witness our own limits transgressed, and some life pasturing freely
 where we never wander. We are cheered when we observe the vulture
 feeding on the carrion which disgusts and disheartens us, and deriving
 health and strength from the repast. There was a dead horse in the
 hollow by the path to my house, which compelled me sometimes to go
 out of my way, especially in the night when the air was heavy, but the
 assurance it gave me of the strong appetite and inviolable health of
 Nature was my compensation for this. I love to see that Nature is
 so rife with life that myriads can be afforded to be sacrificed and
 suffered to prey on one another; that tender organizations can be so
 serenely squashed out of existence like pulp--tadpoles which herons
 gobble up, and tortoises and toads run over in the road; and that
 sometimes it has rained flesh and blood! With the liability to accident,
 we must see how little account is to be made of it. The impression made
 on a wise man is that of universal innocence. Poison is not poisonous
 after all, nor are any wounds fatal. Compassion is a very untenable
 ground. It must be expeditious. Its pleadings will not bear to be
 stereotyped.
 
 Early in May, the oaks, hickories, maples, and other trees, just putting
 out amidst the pine woods around the pond, imparted a brightness like
 sunshine to the landscape, especially in cloudy days, as if the sun were
 breaking through mists and shining faintly on the hillsides here and
 there. On the third or fourth of May I saw a loon in the pond, and
 during the first week of the month I heard the whip-poor-will, the brown
 thrasher, the veery, the wood pewee, the chewink, and other birds. I had
 heard the wood thrush long before. The phoebe had already come once more
 and looked in at my door and window, to see if my house was cavern-like
 enough for her, sustaining herself on humming wings with clinched
 talons, as if she held by the air, while she surveyed the premises.
 The sulphur-like pollen of the pitch pine soon covered the pond and the
 stones and rotten wood along the shore, so that you could have collected
 a barrelful. This is the "sulphur showers" we hear of. Even in Calidas'
 drama of Sacontala, we read of "rills dyed yellow with the golden dust
 of the lotus." And so the seasons went rolling on into summer, as one
 rambles into higher and higher grass.
 
 Thus was my first year's life in the woods completed; and the second
 year was similar to it. I finally left Walden September 6th, 1847.
 
 
 
 
 Conclusion
 
 
 To the sick the doctors wisely recommend a change of air and scenery.
 Thank Heaven, here is not all the world. The buckeye does not grow in
 New England, and the mockingbird is rarely heard here. The wild goose
 is more of a cosmopolite than we; he breaks his fast in Canada, takes
 a luncheon in the Ohio, and plumes himself for the night in a southern
 bayou. Even the bison, to some extent, keeps pace with the seasons
 cropping the pastures of the Colorado only till a greener and sweeter
 grass awaits him by the Yellowstone. Yet we think that if rail fences
 are pulled down, and stone walls piled up on our farms, bounds are
 henceforth set to our lives and our fates decided. If you are chosen
 town clerk, forsooth, you cannot go to Tierra del Fuego this summer: but
 you may go to the land of infernal fire nevertheless. The universe is
 wider than our views of it.
 
 Yet we should oftener look over the tafferel of our craft, like curious
 passengers, and not make the voyage like stupid sailors picking oakum.
 The other side of the globe is but the home of our correspondent. Our
 voyaging is only great-circle sailing, and the doctors prescribe for
 diseases of the skin merely. One hastens to southern Africa to chase the
 giraffe; but surely that is not the game he would be after. How long,
 pray, would a man hunt giraffes if he could? Snipes and woodcocks also
 may afford rare sport; but I trust it would be nobler game to shoot
 one's self.--
 
           "Direct your eye right inward, and you'll find
            A thousand regions in your mind
            Yet undiscovered.  Travel them, and be
            Expert in home-cosmography."
 
 What does Africa--what does the West stand for? Is not our own interior
 white on the chart? black though it may prove, like the coast,
 when discovered. Is it the source of the Nile, or the Niger, or the
 Mississippi, or a Northwest Passage around this continent, that we would
 find? Are these the problems which most concern mankind? Is Franklin the
 only man who is lost, that his wife should be so earnest to find him?
 Does Mr. Grinnell know where he himself is? Be rather the Mungo Park,
 the Lewis and Clark and Frobisher, of your own streams and oceans;
 explore your own higher latitudes--with shiploads of preserved meats to
 support you, if they be necessary; and pile the empty cans sky-high for
 a sign. Were preserved meats invented to preserve meat merely? Nay, be
 a Columbus to whole new continents and worlds within you, opening new
 channels, not of trade, but of thought. Every man is the lord of a realm
 beside which the earthly empire of the Czar is but a petty state,
 a hummock left by the ice. Yet some can be patriotic who have no
 self-respect, and sacrifice the greater to the less. They love the soil
 which makes their graves, but have no sympathy with the spirit which may
 still animate their clay. Patriotism is a maggot in their heads. What
 was the meaning of that South-Sea Exploring Expedition, with all its
 parade and expense, but an indirect recognition of the fact that there
 are continents and seas in the moral world to which every man is an
 isthmus or an inlet, yet unexplored by him, but that it is easier to
 sail many thousand miles through cold and storm and cannibals, in a
 government ship, with five hundred men and boys to assist one, than it
 is to explore the private sea, the Atlantic and Pacific Ocean of one's
 being alone.
 
           "Erret, et extremos alter scrutetur Iberos.
            Plus habet hic vitae, plus habet ille viae."
 
    Let them wander and scrutinize the outlandish Australians.
    I have more of God, they more of the road.
 
 It is not worth the while to go round the world to count the cats in
 Zanzibar. Yet do this even till you can do better, and you may perhaps
 find some "Symmes' Hole" by which to get at the inside at last. England
 and France, Spain and Portugal, Gold Coast and Slave Coast, all front
 on this private sea; but no bark from them has ventured out of sight of
 land, though it is without doubt the direct way to India. If you would
 learn to speak all tongues and conform to the customs of all nations,
 if you would travel farther than all travellers, be naturalized in all
 climes, and cause the Sphinx to dash her head against a stone, even
 obey the precept of the old philosopher, and Explore thyself. Herein are
 demanded the eye and the nerve. Only the defeated and deserters go to
 the wars, cowards that run away and enlist. Start now on that farthest
 western way, which does not pause at the Mississippi or the Pacific, nor
 conduct toward a worn-out China or Japan, but leads on direct, a tangent
 to this sphere, summer and winter, day and night, sun down, moon down,
 and at last earth down too.
 
 It is said that Mirabeau took to highway robbery "to ascertain what
 degree of resolution was necessary in order to place one's self in
 formal opposition to the most sacred laws of society." He declared that
 "a soldier who fights in the ranks does not require half so much courage
 as a footpad"--"that honor and religion have never stood in the way of a
 well-considered and a firm resolve." This was manly, as the world goes;
 and yet it was idle, if not desperate. A saner man would have found
 himself often enough "in formal opposition" to what are deemed "the most
 sacred laws of society," through obedience to yet more sacred laws, and
 so have tested his resolution without going out of his way. It is not
 for a man to put himself in such an attitude to society, but to maintain
 himself in whatever attitude he find himself through obedience to the
 laws of his being, which will never be one of opposition to a just
 government, if he should chance to meet with such.
 
 I left the woods for as good a reason as I went there. Perhaps it seemed
 to me that I had several more lives to live, and could not spare any
 more time for that one. It is remarkable how easily and insensibly we
 fall into a particular route, and make a beaten track for ourselves. I
 had not lived there a week before my feet wore a path from my door to
 the pond-side; and though it is five or six years since I trod it, it
 is still quite distinct. It is true, I fear, that others may have fallen
 into it, and so helped to keep it open. The surface of the earth is soft
 and impressible by the feet of men; and so with the paths which the mind
 travels. How worn and dusty, then, must be the highways of the world,
 how deep the ruts of tradition and conformity! I did not wish to take a
 cabin passage, but rather to go before the mast and on the deck of the
 world, for there I could best see the moonlight amid the mountains. I do
 not wish to go below now.
 
 I learned this, at least, by my experiment: that if one advances
 confidently in the direction of his dreams, and endeavors to live the
 life which he has imagined, he will meet with a success unexpected in
 common hours. He will put some things behind, will pass an invisible
 boundary; new, universal, and more liberal laws will begin to establish
 themselves around and within him; or the old laws be expanded, and
 interpreted in his favor in a more liberal sense, and he will live with
 the license of a higher order of beings. In proportion as he simplifies
 his life, the laws of the universe will appear less complex, and
 solitude will not be solitude, nor poverty poverty, nor weakness
 weakness. If you have built castles in the air, your work need not be
 lost; that is where they should be. Now put the foundations under them.
 
 It is a ridiculous demand which England and America make, that you shall
 speak so that they can understand you. Neither men nor toadstools grow
 so. As if that were important, and there were not enough to understand
 you without them. As if Nature could support but one order of
 understandings, could not sustain birds as well as quadrupeds, flying as
 well as creeping things, and _hush_ and _whoa_, which Bright can
 understand, were the best English. As if there were safety in stupidity
 alone. I fear chiefly lest my expression may not be _extra-vagant_
 enough, may not wander far enough beyond the narrow limits of my daily
 experience, so as to be adequate to the truth of which I have been
 convinced. _Extra vagance!_ it depends on how you are yarded. The
 migrating buffalo, which seeks new pastures in another latitude, is not
 extravagant like the cow which kicks over the pail, leaps the cowyard
 fence, and runs after her calf, in milking time. I desire to speak
 somewhere _without_ bounds; like a man in a waking moment, to men in
 their waking moments; for I am convinced that I cannot exaggerate enough
 even to lay the foundation of a true expression. Who that has heard a
 strain of music feared then lest he should speak extravagantly any more
 forever? In view of the future or possible, we should live quite laxly
 and undefined in front, our outlines dim and misty on that side; as our
 shadows reveal an insensible perspiration toward the sun. The volatile
 truth of our words should continually betray the inadequacy of the
 residual statement. Their truth is instantly _translated_; its literal
 monument alone remains. The words which express our faith and piety are
 not definite; yet they are significant and fragrant like frankincense to
 superior natures.
 
 Why level downward to our dullest perception always, and praise that as
 common sense? The commonest sense is the sense of men asleep, which they
 express by snoring. Sometimes we are inclined to class those who are
 once-and-a-half-witted with the half-witted, because we appreciate only
 a third part of their wit. Some would find fault with the morning red,
 if they ever got up early enough. "They pretend," as I hear, "that the
 verses of Kabir have four different senses; illusion, spirit, intellect,
 and the exoteric doctrine of the Vedas"; but in this part of the world
 it is considered a ground for complaint if a man's writings admit
 of more than one interpretation. While England endeavors to cure the
 potato-rot, will not any endeavor to cure the brain-rot, which prevails
 so much more widely and fatally?
 
 I do not suppose that I have attained to obscurity, but I should be
 proud if no more fatal fault were found with my pages on this score than
 was found with the Walden ice. Southern customers objected to its blue
 color, which is the evidence of its purity, as if it were muddy, and
 preferred the Cambridge ice, which is white, but tastes of weeds. The
 purity men love is like the mists which envelop the earth, and not like
 the azure ether beyond.
 
 Some are dinning in our ears that we Americans, and moderns generally,
 are intellectual dwarfs compared with the ancients, or even the
 Elizabethan men. But what is that to the purpose? A living dog is better
 than a dead lion. Shall a man go and hang himself because he belongs to
 the race of pygmies, and not be the biggest pygmy that he can? Let every
 one mind his own business, and endeavor to be what he was made.
 
 Why should we be in such desperate haste to succeed and in such
 desperate enterprises? If a man does not keep pace with his companions,
 perhaps it is because he hears a different drummer. Let him step to the
 music which he hears, however measured or far away. It is not important
 that he should mature as soon as an apple tree or an oak. Shall he turn
 his spring into summer? If the condition of things which we were made
 for is not yet, what were any reality which we can substitute? We will
 not be shipwrecked on a vain reality. Shall we with pains erect a heaven
 of blue glass over ourselves, though when it is done we shall be sure to
 gaze still at the true ethereal heaven far above, as if the former were
 not?
 
 There was an artist in the city of Kouroo who was disposed to strive
 after perfection. One day it came into his mind to make a staff. Having
 considered that in an imperfect work time is an ingredient, but into
 a perfect work time does not enter, he said to himself, It shall be
 perfect in all respects, though I should do nothing else in my life.
 He proceeded instantly to the forest for wood, being resolved that it
 should not be made of unsuitable material; and as he searched for and
 rejected stick after stick, his friends gradually deserted him, for they
 grew old in their works and died, but he grew not older by a moment. His
 singleness of purpose and resolution, and his elevated piety, endowed
 him, without his knowledge, with perennial youth. As he made no
 compromise with Time, Time kept out of his way, and only sighed at a
 distance because he could not overcome him. Before he had found a stock
 in all respects suitable the city of Kouroo was a hoary ruin, and he
 sat on one of its mounds to peel the stick. Before he had given it the
 proper shape the dynasty of the Candahars was at an end, and with the
 point of the stick he wrote the name of the last of that race in
 the sand, and then resumed his work. By the time he had smoothed and
 polished the staff Kalpa was no longer the pole-star; and ere he had
 put on the ferule and the head adorned with precious stones, Brahma
 had awoke and slumbered many times. But why do I stay to mention these
 things? When the finishing stroke was put to his work, it suddenly
 expanded before the eyes of the astonished artist into the fairest of
 all the creations of Brahma. He had made a new system in making a staff,
 a world with full and fair proportions; in which, though the old cities
 and dynasties had passed away, fairer and more glorious ones had taken
 their places. And now he saw by the heap of shavings still fresh at his
 feet, that, for him and his work, the former lapse of time had been
 an illusion, and that no more time had elapsed than is required for a
 single scintillation from the brain of Brahma to fall on and inflame the
 tinder of a mortal brain. The material was pure, and his art was pure;
 how could the result be other than wonderful?
 
 No face which we can give to a matter will stead us so well at last as
 the truth. This alone wears well. For the most part, we are not where
 we are, but in a false position. Through an infinity of our natures, we
 suppose a case, and put ourselves into it, and hence are in two cases at
 the same time, and it is doubly difficult to get out. In sane moments we
 regard only the facts, the case that is. Say what you have to say, not
 what you ought. Any truth is better than make-believe. Tom Hyde, the
 tinker, standing on the gallows, was asked if he had anything to say.
 "Tell the tailors," said he, "to remember to make a knot in their thread
 before they take the first stitch." His companion's prayer is forgotten.
 
 However mean your life is, meet it and live it; do not shun it and call
 it hard names. It is not so bad as you are. It looks poorest when you
 are richest. The fault-finder will find faults even in paradise. Love
 your life, poor as it is. You may perhaps have some pleasant, thrilling,
 glorious hours, even in a poorhouse. The setting sun is reflected from
 the windows of the almshouse as brightly as from the rich man's abode;
 the snow melts before its door as early in the spring. I do not see
 but a quiet mind may live as contentedly there, and have as cheering
 thoughts, as in a palace. The town's poor seem to me often to live the
 most independent lives of any. Maybe they are simply great enough
 to receive without misgiving. Most think that they are above being
 supported by the town; but it oftener happens that they are not
 above supporting themselves by dishonest means, which should be more
 disreputable. Cultivate poverty like a garden herb, like sage. Do not
 trouble yourself much to get new things, whether clothes or friends.
 Turn the old; return to them. Things do not change; we change. Sell
 your clothes and keep your thoughts. God will see that you do not want
 society. If I were confined to a corner of a garret all my days, like a
 spider, the world would be just as large to me while I had my thoughts
 about me. The philosopher said: "From an army of three divisions one
 can take away its general, and put it in disorder; from the man the
 most abject and vulgar one cannot take away his thought." Do not seek so
 anxiously to be developed, to subject yourself to many influences to
 be played on; it is all dissipation. Humility like darkness reveals the
 heavenly lights. The shadows of poverty and meanness gather around us,
 "and lo! creation widens to our view." We are often reminded that if
 there were bestowed on us the wealth of Croesus, our aims must still
 be the same, and our means essentially the same. Moreover, if you
 are restricted in your range by poverty, if you cannot buy books and
 newspapers, for instance, you are but confined to the most significant
 and vital experiences; you are compelled to deal with the material which
 yields the most sugar and the most starch. It is life near the bone
 where it is sweetest. You are defended from being a trifler. No man
 loses ever on a lower level by magnanimity on a higher. Superfluous
 wealth can buy superfluities only. Money is not required to buy one
 necessary of the soul.
 
 I live in the angle of a leaden wall, into whose composition was poured
 a little alloy of bell-metal. Often, in the repose of my mid-day, there
 reaches my ears a confused tintinnabulum from without. It is the noise
 of my contemporaries. My neighbors tell me of their adventures
 with famous gentlemen and ladies, what notabilities they met at the
 dinner-table; but I am no more interested in such things than in the
 contents of the Daily Times. The interest and the conversation are about
 costume and manners chiefly; but a goose is a goose still, dress it
 as you will. They tell me of California and Texas, of England and the
 Indies, of the Hon. Mr.----of Georgia or of Massachusetts, all transient
 and fleeting phenomena, till I am ready to leap from their court-yard
 like the Mameluke bey. I delight to come to my bearings--not walk in
 procession with pomp and parade, in a conspicuous place, but to walk
 even with the Builder of the universe, if I may--not to live in this
 restless, nervous, bustling, trivial Nineteenth Century, but stand or
 sit thoughtfully while it goes by. What are men celebrating? They are
 all on a committee of arrangements, and hourly expect a speech from
 somebody. God is only the president of the day, and Webster is his
 orator. I love to weigh, to settle, to gravitate toward that which most
 strongly and rightfully attracts me--not hang by the beam of the scale
 and try to weigh less--not suppose a case, but take the case that is; to
 travel the only path I can, and that on which no power can resist me. It
 affords me no satisfaction to commence to spring an arch before I have
 got a solid foundation. Let us not play at kittly-benders. There is a
 solid bottom everywhere. We read that the traveller asked the boy if
 the swamp before him had a hard bottom. The boy replied that it had.
 But presently the traveller's horse sank in up to the girths, and
 he observed to the boy, "I thought you said that this bog had a hard
 bottom." "So it has," answered the latter, "but you have not got half
 way to it yet." So it is with the bogs and quicksands of society; but
 he is an old boy that knows it. Only what is thought, said, or done at
 a certain rare coincidence is good. I would not be one of those who will
 foolishly drive a nail into mere lath and plastering; such a deed would
 keep me awake nights. Give me a hammer, and let me feel for the
 furring. Do not depend on the putty. Drive a nail home and clinch it so
 faithfully that you can wake up in the night and think of your work with
 satisfaction--a work at which you would not be ashamed to invoke the
 Muse. So will help you God, and so only. Every nail driven should be as
 another rivet in the machine of the universe, you carrying on the work.
 
 Rather than love, than money, than fame, give me truth. I sat at a table
 where were rich food and wine in abundance, and obsequious attendance,
 but sincerity and truth were not; and I went away hungry from the
 inhospitable board. The hospitality was as cold as the ices. I thought
 that there was no need of ice to freeze them. They talked to me of the
 age of the wine and the fame of the vintage; but I thought of an older,
 a newer, and purer wine, of a more glorious vintage, which they had
 not got, and could not buy. The style, the house and grounds and
 "entertainment" pass for nothing with me. I called on the king, but he
 made me wait in his hall, and conducted like a man incapacitated for
 hospitality. There was a man in my neighborhood who lived in a hollow
 tree. His manners were truly regal. I should have done better had I
 called on him.
 
 How long shall we sit in our porticoes practising idle and musty
 virtues, which any work would make impertinent? As if one were to begin
 the day with long-suffering, and hire a man to hoe his potatoes; and in
 the afternoon go forth to practise Christian meekness and charity
 with goodness aforethought! Consider the China pride and stagnant
 self-complacency of mankind. This generation inclines a little to
 congratulate itself on being the last of an illustrious line; and in
 Boston and London and Paris and Rome, thinking of its long descent,
 it speaks of its progress in art and science and literature with
 satisfaction. There are the Records of the Philosophical Societies, and
 the public Eulogies of Great Men! It is the good Adam contemplating his
 own virtue. "Yes, we have done great deeds, and sung divine songs, which
 shall never die"--that is, as long as we can remember them. The learned
 societies and great men of Assyria--where are they? What youthful
 philosophers and experimentalists we are! There is not one of my readers
 who has yet lived a whole human life. These may be but the spring months
 in the life of the race. If we have had the seven-years' itch, we have
 not seen the seventeen-year locust yet in Concord. We are acquainted
 with a mere pellicle of the globe on which we live. Most have not delved
 six feet beneath the surface, nor leaped as many above it. We know not
 where we are. Beside, we are sound asleep nearly half our time. Yet we
 esteem ourselves wise, and have an established order on the surface.
 Truly, we are deep thinkers, we are ambitious spirits! As I stand over
 the insect crawling amid the pine needles on the forest floor, and
 endeavoring to conceal itself from my sight, and ask myself why it will
 cherish those humble thoughts, and bide its head from me who might,
 perhaps, be its benefactor, and impart to its race some cheering
 information, I am reminded of the greater Benefactor and Intelligence
 that stands over me the human insect.
 
 There is an incessant influx of novelty into the world, and yet we
 tolerate incredible dulness. I need only suggest what kind of sermons
 are still listened to in the most enlightened countries. There are such
 words as joy and sorrow, but they are only the burden of a psalm, sung
 with a nasal twang, while we believe in the ordinary and mean. We think
 that we can change our clothes only. It is said that the British
 Empire is very large and respectable, and that the United States are a
 first-rate power. We do not believe that a tide rises and falls behind
 every man which can float the British Empire like a chip, if he should
 ever harbor it in his mind. Who knows what sort of seventeen-year locust
 will next come out of the ground? The government of the world I live in
 was not framed, like that of Britain, in after-dinner conversations over
 the wine.
 
 The life in us is like the water in the river. It may rise this year
 higher than man has ever known it, and flood the parched uplands; even
 this may be the eventful year, which will drown out all our muskrats. It
 was not always dry land where we dwell. I see far inland the banks
 which the stream anciently washed, before science began to record its
 freshets. Every one has heard the story which has gone the rounds of New
 England, of a strong and beautiful bug which came out of the dry leaf of
 an old table of apple-tree wood, which had stood in a farmer's
 kitchen for sixty years, first in Connecticut, and afterward in
 Massachusetts--from an egg deposited in the living tree many years
 earlier still, as appeared by counting the annual layers beyond it;
 which was heard gnawing out for several weeks, hatched perchance by
 the heat of an urn. Who does not feel his faith in a resurrection and
 immortality strengthened by hearing of this? Who knows what beautiful
 and winged life, whose egg has been buried for ages under many
 concentric layers of woodenness in the dead dry life of society,
 deposited at first in the alburnum of the green and living tree, which
 has been gradually converted into the semblance of its well-seasoned
 tomb--heard perchance gnawing out now for years by the astonished family
 of man, as they sat round the festive board--may unexpectedly come forth
 from amidst society's most trivial and handselled furniture, to enjoy
 its perfect summer life at last!
 
 I do not say that John or Jonathan will realize all this; but such is
 the character of that morrow which mere lapse of time can never make to
 dawn. The light which puts out our eyes is darkness to us. Only that day
 dawns to which we are awake. There is more day to dawn. The sun is but a
 morning star.
 
 
 
 
 ON THE DUTY OF CIVIL DISOBEDIENCE
 
 
 I heartily accept the motto,--"That government is best which governs
 least"; and I should like to see it acted up to more rapidly and
 systematically. Carried out, it finally amounts to this, which also I
 believe,--"That government is best which governs not at all"; and when
 men are prepared for it, that will be the kind of government which they
 will have. Government is at best but an expedient; but most governments
 are usually, and all governments are sometimes, inexpedient. The
 objections which have been brought against a standing army, and they are
 many and weighty, and deserve to prevail, may also at last be brought
 against a standing government. The standing army is only an arm of the
 standing government. The government itself, which is only the mode which
 the people have chosen to execute their will, is equally liable to be
 abused and perverted before the people can act through it. Witness the
 present Mexican war, the work of comparatively a few individuals using
 the standing government as their tool; for, in the outset, the people
 would not have consented to this measure.
 
 This American government--what is it but a tradition, though a recent
 one, endeavoring to transmit itself unimpaired to posterity, but each
 instant losing some of its integrity? It has not the vitality and force
 of a single living man; for a single man can bend it to his will. It is
 a sort of wooden gun to the people themselves. But it is not the less
 necessary for this; for the people must have some complicated machinery
 or other, and hear its din, to satisfy that idea of government which
 they have. Governments show thus how successfully men can be imposed on,
 even impose on themselves, for their own advantage. It is excellent, we
 must all allow. Yet this government never of itself furthered any
 enterprise, but by the alacrity with which it got out of its way. _It_
 does not keep the country free. _It_ does not settle the West. _It_ does
 not educate. The character inherent in the American people has done all
 that has been accomplished; and it would have done somewhat more, if the
 government had not sometimes got in its way. For government is an
 expedient by which men would fain succeed in letting one another alone;
 and, as has been said, when it is most expedient, the governed are most
 let alone by it. Trade and commerce, if they were not made of India
 rubber, would never manage to bounce over the obstacles which
 legislators are continually putting in their way; and, if one were to
 judge these men wholly by the effects of their actions, and not partly
 by their intentions, they would deserve to be classed and punished with
 those mischievous persons who put obstructions on the railroads.
 
 But, to speak practically and as a citizen, unlike those who call
 themselves no-government men, I ask for, not at once no government,
 but _at once_ a better government. Let every man make known what kind of
 government would command his respect, and that will be one step toward
 obtaining it.
 
 After all, the practical reason why, when the power is once in the hands
 of the people, a majority are permitted, and for a long period continue,
 to rule, is not because they are most likely to be in the right,
 nor because this seems fairest to the minority, but because they are
 physically the strongest. But a government in which the majority rule in
 all cases cannot be based on justice, even as far as men understand
 it. Can there not be a government in which majorities do not virtually
 decide right and wrong, but conscience?--in which majorities decide only
 those questions to which the rule of expediency is applicable? Must the
 citizen ever for a moment, or in the least degree, resign his conscience
 to the legislator? Why has every man a conscience, then? I think that
 we should be men first, and subjects afterward. It is not desirable
 to cultivate a respect for the law, so much as for the right. The only
 obligation which I have a right to assume is to do at any time what
 I think right. It is truly enough said that a corporation has no
 conscience; but a corporation of conscientious men is a corporation
 with a conscience. Law never made men a whit more just; and, by means of
 their respect for it, even the well-disposed are daily made the agents
 of injustice. A common and natural result of an undue respect for law
 is, that you may see a file of soldiers, colonel, captain, corporal,
 privates, powder-monkeys, and all, marching in admirable order over
 hill and dale to the wars, against their wills, ay, against their common
 sense and consciences, which makes it very steep marching indeed, and
 produces a palpitation of the heart. They have no doubt that it is a
 damnable business in which they are concerned; they are all peaceably
 inclined. Now, what are they? Men at all? or small movable forts and
 magazines, at the service of some unscrupulous man in power? Visit the
 Navy Yard, and behold a marine, such a man as an American government can
 make, or such as it can make a man with its black arts--a mere shadow
 and reminiscence of humanity, a man laid out alive and standing, and
 already, as one may say, buried under arms with funeral accompaniments,
 though it may be,--
 
            "Not a drum was heard, not a funeral note,
                As his corpse to the rampart we hurried;
             Not a soldier discharged his farewell shot
                O'er the grave where our hero we buried."
 
 The mass of men serve the state thus, not as men mainly, but as
 machines, with their bodies. They are the standing army, and the
 militia, jailers, constables, posse comitatus, etc. In most cases there
 is no free exercise whatever of the judgment or of the moral sense;
 but they put themselves on a level with wood and earth and stones; and
 wooden men can perhaps be manufactured that will serve the purpose as
 well. Such command no more respect than men of straw or a lump of dirt.
 They have the same sort of worth only as horses and dogs. Yet such
 as these even are commonly esteemed good citizens. Others, as most
 legislators, politicians, lawyers, ministers, and office-holders, serve
 the state chiefly with their heads; and, as they rarely make any moral
 distinctions, they are as likely to serve the devil, without _intending_
 it, as God. A very few, as heroes, patriots, martyrs, reformers in the
 great sense, and men, serve the state with their consciences also,
 and so necessarily resist it for the most part; and they are commonly
 treated as enemies by it. A wise man will only be useful as a man, and
 will not submit to be "clay," and "stop a hole to keep the wind away,"
 but leave that office to his dust at least:--
 
           "I am too high-born to be propertied,
            To be a secondary at control,
            Or useful serving-man and instrument
            To any sovereign state throughout the world."
 
 He who gives himself entirely to his fellow-men appears to them useless
 and selfish; but he who gives himself partially to them is pronounced a
 benefactor and philanthropist.
 
 How does it become a man to behave toward this American government
 to-day? I answer, that he cannot without disgrace be associated with
 it. I cannot for an instant recognize that political organization as _my_
 government which is the _slave's_ government also.
 
 All men recognize the right of revolution; that is, the right to refuse
 allegiance to, and to resist, the government, when its tyranny or its
 inefficiency are great and unendurable. But almost all say that such is
 not the case now. But such was the case, they think, in the Revolution
 of '75. If one were to tell me that this was a bad government because
 it taxed certain foreign commodities brought to its ports, it is most
 probable that I should not make an ado about it, for I can do without
 them. All machines have their friction; and possibly this does enough
 good to counterbalance the evil. At any rate, it is a great evil to make
 a stir about it. But when the friction comes to have its machine, and
 oppression and robbery are organized, I say, let us not have such a
 machine any longer. In other words, when a sixth of the population of a
 nation which has undertaken to be the refuge of liberty are slaves, and
 a whole country is unjustly overrun and conquered by a foreign army, and
 subjected to military law, I think that it is not too soon for honest
 men to rebel and revolutionize. What makes this duty the more urgent
 is the fact that the country so overrun is not our own, but ours is the
 invading army.
 
 Paley, a common authority with many on moral questions, in his chapter
 on the "Duty of Submission to Civil Government," resolves all civil
 obligation into expediency; and he proceeds to say that "so long as
 the interest of the whole society requires it, that is, so long as the
 established government cannot be resisted or changed without public
 inconveniency, it is the will of God... that the established government
 be obeyed, and no longer.... This principle being admitted, the justice
 of every particular case of resistance is reduced to a computation of
 the quantity of the danger and grievance on the one side, and of the
 probability and expense of redressing it on the other." Of this, he
 says, every man shall judge for himself. But Paley appears never to have
 contemplated those cases to which the rule of expediency does not apply,
 in which a people, as well as an individual, must do justice, cost what
 it may. If I have unjustly wrested a plank from a drowning man, I must
 restore it to him though I drown myself. This, according to Paley, would
 be inconvenient. But he that would save his life, in such a case, shall
 lose it. This people must cease to hold slaves, and to make war on
 Mexico, though it cost them their existence as a people.
 
 In their practice, nations agree with Paley; but does any one think that
 Massachusetts does exactly what is right at the present crisis?
 
   "A drab of state, a cloth-o'-silver slut,
     To have her train borne up, and her soul trail in the dirt."
 
 Practically speaking, the opponents to a reform in Massachusetts are
 not a hundred thousand politicians at the South, but a hundred thousand
 merchants and farmers here, who are more interested in commerce and
 agriculture than they are in humanity, and are not prepared to do
 justice to the slave and to Mexico, _cost what it may_. I quarrel not with
 far-off foes, but with those who, near at home, co-operate with, and
 do the bidding of those far away, and without whom the latter would be
 harmless. We are accustomed to say, that the mass of men are unprepared;
 but improvement is slow, because the few are not materially wiser or
 better than the many. It is not so important that many should be as good
 as you, as that there be some absolute goodness somewhere; for that will
 leaven the whole lump. There are thousands who are _in opinion_ opposed
 to slavery and to the war, who yet in effect do nothing to put an end to
 them; who, esteeming themselves children of Washington and Franklin, sit
 down with their hands in their pockets, and say that they know not what
 to do, and do nothing; who even postpone the question of freedom to the
 question of free-trade, and quietly read the prices-current along with
 the latest advices from Mexico, after dinner, and, it may be, fall
 asleep over them both. What is the price-current of an honest man and
 patriot to-day? They hesitate, and they regret, and sometimes they
 petition; but they do nothing in earnest and with effect. They will
 wait, well disposed, for others to remedy the evil, that they may no
 longer have it to regret. At most, they give only a cheap vote, and a
 feeble countenance and Godspeed, to the right, as it goes by them. There
 are nine hundred and ninety-nine patrons of virtue to one virtuous man;
 but it is easier to deal with the real possessor of a thing than with
 the temporary guardian of it.
 
 All voting is a sort of gaming, like checkers or backgammon, with a
 slight moral tinge to it, a playing with right and wrong, with moral
 questions; and betting naturally accompanies it. The character of the
 voters is not staked. I cast my vote, perchance, as I think right; but I
 am not vitally concerned that that right should prevail. I am willing to
 leave it to the majority. Its obligation, therefore, never exceeds that
 of expediency. Even voting _for the right_ is _doing nothing_ for it. It is
 only expressing to men feebly your desire that it should prevail. A
 wise man will not leave the right to the mercy of chance, nor wish it to
 prevail through the power of the majority. There is but little virtue in
 the action of masses of men. When the majority shall at length vote for
 the abolition of slavery, it will be because they are indifferent to
 slavery, or because there is but little slavery left to be abolished by
 their vote. _They_ will then be the only slaves. Only _his_ vote can hasten
 the abolition of slavery who asserts his own freedom by his vote.
 
 I hear of a convention to be held at Baltimore, or elsewhere, for the
 selection of a candidate for the Presidency, made up chiefly of editors,
 and men who are politicians by profession; but I think, what is it to
 any independent, intelligent, and respectable man what decision they
 may come to? Shall we not have the advantage of his wisdom and honesty,
 nevertheless? Can we not count upon some independent votes? Are there
 not many individuals in the country who do not attend conventions? But
 no: I find that the respectable man, so called, has immediately drifted
 from his position, and despairs of his country, when his country has
 more reason to despair of him. He forthwith adopts one of the candidates
 thus selected as the only _available_ one, thus proving that he is himself
 _available_ for any purposes of the demagogue. His vote is of no more
 worth than that of any unprincipled foreigner or hireling native, who
 may have been bought. Oh for a man who is a _man_, and, as my neighbor
 says, has a bone in his back which you cannot pass your hand through!
 Our statistics are at fault: the population has been returned too large.
 How many _men_ are there to a square thousand miles in this country?
 Hardly one. Does not America offer any inducement for men to settle
 here? The American has dwindled into an Odd Fellow--one who may be known
 by the development of his organ of gregariousness, and a manifest lack
 of intellect and cheerful self-reliance; whose first and chief concern,
 on coming into the world, is to see that the almshouses are in good
 repair; and, before yet he has lawfully donned the virile garb, to
 collect a fund for the support of the widows and orphans that may be;
 who, in short ventures to live only by the aid of the Mutual Insurance
 company, which has promised to bury him decently.
 
 It is not a man's duty, as a matter of course, to devote himself to the
 eradication of any, even the most enormous wrong; he may still properly
 have other concerns to engage him; but it is his duty, at least, to wash
 his hands of it, and, if he gives it no thought longer, not to give
 it practically his support. If I devote myself to other pursuits and
 contemplations, I must first see, at least, that I do not pursue them
 sitting upon another man's shoulders. I must get off him first, that
 he may pursue his contemplations too. See what gross inconsistency is
 tolerated. I have heard some of my townsmen say, "I should like to have
 them order me out to help put down an insurrection of the slaves, or to
 march to Mexico;--see if I would go"; and yet these very men have each,
 directly by their allegiance, and so indirectly, at least, by their
 money, furnished a substitute. The soldier is applauded who refuses to
 serve in an unjust war by those who do not refuse to sustain the unjust
 government which makes the war; is applauded by those whose own act
 and authority he disregards and sets at naught; as if the state were
 penitent to that degree that it hired one to scourge it while it sinned,
 but not to that degree that it left off sinning for a moment. Thus,
 under the name of Order and Civil Government, we are all made at last to
 pay homage to and support our own meanness. After the first blush of
 sin comes its indifference; and from immoral it becomes, as it were,
 _un_moral, and not quite unnecessary to that life which we have made.
 
 The broadest and most prevalent error requires the most disinterested
 virtue to sustain it. The slight reproach to which the virtue of
 patriotism is commonly liable, the noble are most likely to incur.
 Those who, while they disapprove of the character and measures of a
 government, yield to it their allegiance and support are undoubtedly
 its most conscientious supporters, and so frequently the most serious
 obstacles to reform. Some are petitioning the State to dissolve the
 Union, to disregard the requisitions of the President. Why do they not
 dissolve it themselves--the union between themselves and the State--and
 refuse to pay their quota into its treasury? Do not they stand in the
 same relation to the State, that the State does to the Union? And have
 not the same reasons prevented the State from resisting the Union, which
 have prevented them from resisting the State?
 
 How can a man be satisfied to entertain an opinion merely, and enjoy it?
 Is there any enjoyment in _it_, if his opinion is that he is aggrieved? If
 you are cheated out of a single dollar by your neighbor, you do not rest
 satisfied with knowing that you are cheated, or with saying that you are
 cheated, or even with petitioning him to pay you your due; but you take
 effectual steps at once to obtain the full amount, and see that you
 are never cheated again. Action from principle--the perception and the
 performance of right--changes things and relations; it is essentially
 revolutionary, and does not consist wholly with anything which was.
 It not only divides states and churches, it divides families; ay,
 it divides the _individual_, separating the diabolical in him from the
 divine.
 
 Unjust laws exist; shall we be content to obey them, or shall we
 endeavor to amend them, and obey them until we have succeeded, or shall
 we transgress them at once? Men generally, under such a government
 as this, think that they ought to wait until they have persuaded the
 majority to alter them. They think that, if they should resist,
 the remedy would be worse than the evil. But it is the fault of the
 government itself that the remedy _is_ worse than the evil. _It_ makes it
 worse. Why is it not more apt to anticipate and provide for reform? Why
 does it not cherish its wise minority? Why does it cry and resist before
 it is hurt? Why does it not encourage its citizens to be on the alert to
 point out its faults, and _do_ better than it would have them? Why does
 it always crucify Christ, and excommunicate Copernicus and Luther, and
 pronounce Washington and Franklin rebels?
 
 One would think, that a deliberate and practical denial of its authority
 was the only offence never contemplated by government; else, why has it
 not assigned its definite, its suitable and proportionate, penalty? If a
 man who has no property refuses but once to earn nine shillings for
 the State, he is put in prison for a period unlimited by any law that
 I know, and determined only by the discretion of those who placed him
 there; but if he should steal ninety times nine shillings from the
 State, he is soon permitted to go at large again.
 
 If the injustice is part of the necessary friction of the machine
 of government, let it go, let it go; perchance it will wear
 smooth--certainly the machine will wear out. If the injustice has a
 spring, or a pulley, or a rope, or a crank, exclusively for itself, then
 perhaps you may consider whether the remedy will not be worse than the
 evil; but if it is of such a nature that it requires you to be the agent
 of injustice to another, then, I say, break the law. Let your life be
 a counter friction to stop the machine. What I have to do is to see, at
 any rate, that I do not lend myself to the wrong which I condemn.
 
 As for adopting the ways which the State has provided for remedying the
 evil, I know not of such ways. They take too much time, and a man's life
 will be gone. I have other affairs to attend to. I came into this world,
 not chiefly to make this a good place to live in, but to live in it,
 be it good or bad. A man has not everything to do, but something; and
 because he cannot do _everything_, it is not necessary that he should do
 _something_ wrong. It is not my business to be petitioning the Governor or
 the Legislature any more than it is theirs to petition me; and if they
 should not hear my petition, what should I do then? But in this case the
 State has provided no way; its very Constitution is the evil. This may
 seem to be harsh and stubborn and unconciliatory; but it is to treat
 with the utmost kindness and consideration the only spirit that can
 appreciate or deserves it. So is an change for the better, like birth
 and death which convulse the body.
 
 I do not hesitate to say, that those who call themselves Abolitionists
 should at once effectually withdraw their support, both in person and
 property, from the government of Massachusetts, and not wait till they
 constitute a majority of one, before they suffer the right to prevail
 through them. I think that it is enough if they have God on their side,
 without waiting for that other one. Moreover, any man more right than
 his neighbors constitutes a majority of one already.
 
 I meet this American government, or its representative, the State
 government, directly, and face to face, once a year--no more--in
 the person of its tax-gatherer; this is the only mode in which a man
 situated as I am necessarily meets it; and it then says distinctly,
 Recognize me; and the simplest, the most effectual, and, in the present
 posture of affairs, the indispensablest mode of treating with it on this
 head, of expressing your little satisfaction with and love for it, is
 to deny it then. My civil neighbor, the tax-gatherer, is the very man I
 have to deal with--for it is, after all, with men and not with parchment
 that I quarrel--and he has voluntarily chosen to be an agent of the
 government. How shall he ever know well what he is and does as an
 officer of the government, or as a man, until he is obliged to consider
 whether he shall treat me, his neighbor, for whom he has respect, as
 a neighbor and well-disposed man, or as a maniac and disturber of the
 peace, and see if he can get over this obstruction to his neighborliness
 without a ruder and more impetuous thought or speech corresponding with
 his action? I know this well, that if one thousand, if one hundred, if
 ten men whom I could name--if ten _honest_ men only--ay, if _one_ HONEST
 man, in this State of Massachusetts, _ceasing to hold slaves_, were
 actually to withdraw from this copartnership, and be locked up in the
 county jail therefor, it would be the abolition of slavery in America.
 For it matters not how small the beginning may seem to be: what is once
 well done is done forever. But we love better to talk about it: that
 we say is our mission. Reform keeps many scores of newspapers in
 its service, but not one man. If my esteemed neighbor, the State's
 ambassador, who will devote his days to the settlement of the question
 of human rights in the Council Chamber, instead of being threatened with
 the prisons of Carolina, were to sit down the prisoner of Massachusetts,
 that State which is so anxious to foist the sin of slavery upon her
 sister--though at present she can discover only an act of inhospitality
 to be the ground of a quarrel with her--the Legislature would not wholly
 waive the subject the following winter.
 
 Under a government which imprisons any unjustly, the true place for a
 just man is also a prison. The proper place to-day, the only place which
 Massachusetts has provided for her freer and less desponding spirits,
 is in her prisons, to be put out and locked out of the State by her own
 act, as they have already put themselves out by their principles. It is
 there that the fugitive slave, and the Mexican prisoner on parole, and
 the Indian come to plead the wrongs of his race, should find them;
 on that separate, but more free and honorable ground, where the State
 places those who are not _with_ her, but _against_ her--the only house in a
 slave State in which a free man can abide with honor. If any think that
 their influence would be lost there, and their voices no longer afflict
 the ear of the State, that they would not be as an enemy within its
 walls, they do not know by how much truth is stronger than error, nor
 how much more eloquently and effectively he can combat injustice who
 has experienced a little in his own person. Cast your whole vote, not a
 strip of paper merely, but your whole influence. A minority is powerless
 while it conforms to the majority; it is not even a minority then; but
 it is irresistible when it clogs by its whole weight. If the alternative
 is to keep all just men in prison, or give up war and slavery, the State
 will not hesitate which to choose. If a thousand men were not to pay
 their tax-bills this year, that would not be a violent and bloody
 measure, as it would be to pay them, and enable the State to commit
 violence and shed innocent blood. This is, in fact, the definition of a
 peaceable revolution, if any such is possible. If the tax-gatherer, or
 any other public officer, asks me, as one has done, "But what shall
 I do?" my answer is, "If you really wish to do anything, resign your
 office." When the subject has refused allegiance, and the officer has
 resigned his office, then the revolution is accomplished. But even
 suppose blood should flow. Is there not a sort of blood shed when the
 conscience is wounded? Through this wound a man's real manhood and
 immortality flow out, and he bleeds to an everlasting death. I see this
 blood flowing now.
 
 I have contemplated the imprisonment of the offender, rather than the
 seizure of his goods--though both will serve the same purpose--because
 they who assert the purest right, and consequently are most dangerous
 to a corrupt State, commonly have not spent much time in accumulating
 property. To such the State renders comparatively small service, and
 a slight tax is wont to appear exorbitant, particularly if they are
 obliged to earn it by special labor with their hands. If there were
 one who lived wholly without the use of money, the State itself
 would hesitate to demand it of him. But the rich man--not to make any
 invidious comparison--is always sold to the institution which makes him
 rich. Absolutely speaking, the more money, the less virtue; for money
 comes between a man and his objects, and obtains them for him; and
 it was certainly no great virtue to obtain it. It puts to rest many
 questions which he would otherwise be taxed to answer; while the only
 new question which it puts is the hard but superfluous one, how to
 spend it. Thus his moral ground is taken from under his feet. The
 opportunities of living are diminished in proportion as what are called
 the "means" are increased. The best thing a man can do for his culture
 when he is rich is to endeavor to carry out those schemes which he
 entertained when he was poor. Christ answered the Herodians according to
 their condition. "Show me the tribute-money," said he;--and one took a
 penny out of his pocket;--if you use money which has the image of CA|sar
 on it, and which he has made current and valuable, that is, _if you
 are men of the State_, and gladly enjoy the advantages of CA|sar's
 government, then pay him back some of his own when he demands it;
 "Render therefore to CA|sar that which is CA|sar's, and to God those
 things which are God's"--leaving them no wiser than before as to which
 was which; for they did not wish to know.
 
 When I converse with the freest of my neighbors, I perceive that,
 whatever they may say about the magnitude and seriousness of the
 question, and their regard for the public tranquillity, the long and
 the short of the matter is, that they cannot spare the protection of the
 existing government, and they dread the consequences to their property
 and families of disobedience to it. For my own part, I should not like
 to think that I ever rely on the protection of the State. But, if I deny
 the authority of the State when it presents its tax-bill, it will soon
 take and waste all my property, and so harass me and my children without
 end. This is hard. This makes it impossible for a man to live honestly,
 and at the same time comfortably in outward respects. It will not be
 worth the while to accumulate property; that would be sure to go again.
 You must hire or squat somewhere, and raise but a small crop, and eat
 that soon. You must live within yourself, and depend upon yourself
 always tucked up and ready for a start, and not have many affairs. A
 man may grow rich in Turkey even, if he will be in all respects a
 good subject of the Turkish government. Confucius said, "If a state is
 governed by the principles of reason, poverty and misery are subjects
 of shame; if a state is not governed by the principles of reason, riches
 and honors are the subjects of shame." No: until I want the protection
 of Massachusetts to be extended to me in some distant Southern port,
 where my liberty is endangered, or until I am bent solely on building
 up an estate at home by peaceful enterprise, I can afford to refuse
 allegiance to Massachusetts, and her right to my property and life. It
 costs me less in every sense to incur the penalty of disobedience to the
 State than it would to obey. I should feel as if I were worth less in
 that case.
 
 Some years ago, the State met me in behalf of the Church, and commanded
 me to pay a certain sum toward the support of a clergyman whose
 preaching my father attended, but never I myself. "Pay," it said, "or be
 locked up in the jail." I declined to pay. But, unfortunately, another
 man saw fit to pay it. I did not see why the schoolmaster should be
 taxed to support the priest, and not the priest the schoolmaster: for
 I was not the State's schoolmaster, but I supported myself by voluntary
 subscription. I did not see why the lyceum should not present its
 tax-bill, and have the State to back its demand, as well as the Church.
 However, at the request of the selectmen, I condescended to make some
 such statement as this in writing:--"Know all men by these presents,
 that I, Henry Thoreau, do not wish to be regarded as a member of any
 incorporated society which I have not joined." This I gave to the town
 clerk; and he has it. The State, having thus learned that I did not wish
 to be regarded as a member of that church, has never made a like
 demand on me since; though it said that it must adhere to its original
 presumption that time. If I had known how to name them, I should then
 have signed off in detail from all the societies which I never signed on
 to; but I did not know where to find a complete list.
 
 I have paid no poll-tax for six years. I was put into a jail once on
 this account, for one night; and, as I stood considering the walls of
 solid stone, two or three feet thick, the door of wood and iron, a foot
 thick, and the iron grating which strained the light, I could not help
 being struck with the foolishness of that institution which treated me
 as if I were mere flesh and blood and bones, to be locked up. I wondered
 that it should have concluded at length that this was the best use it
 could put me to, and had never thought to avail itself of my services
 in some way. I saw that, if there was a wall of stone between me and
 my townsmen, there was a still more difficult one to climb or break
 through, before they could get to be as free as I was. I did not for a
 moment feel confined, and the walls seemed a great waste of stone and
 mortar. I felt as if I alone of all my townsmen had paid my tax. They
 plainly did not know how to treat me, but behaved like persons who are
 underbred. In every threat and in every compliment there was a blunder;
 for they thought that my chief desire was to stand the other side of
 that stone wall. I could not but smile to see how industriously they
 locked the door on my meditations, which followed them out again without
 let or hindrance, and _they_ were really all that was dangerous. As they
 could not reach me, they had resolved to punish my body; just as boys,
 if they cannot come at some person against whom they have a spite, will
 abuse his dog. I saw that the State was half-witted, that it was timid
 as a lone woman with her silver spoons, and that it did not know its
 friends from its foes, and I lost all my remaining respect for it, and
 pitied it.
 
 Thus the State never intentionally confronts a man's sense, intellectual
 or moral, but only his body, his senses. It is not armed with superior
 wit or honesty, but with superior physical strength. I was not born to
 be forced. I will breathe after my own fashion. Let us see who is the
 strongest. What force has a multitude? They only can force me who obey a
 higher law than I. They force me to become like themselves. I do not
 hear of _men_ being _forced_ to have this way or that by masses of men.
 What sort of life were that to live? When I meet a government which says
 to me, "Your money or your life," why should I be in haste to give it my
 money? It may be in a great strait, and not know what to do: I cannot
 help that. It must help itself; do as I do. It is not worth the while to
 snivel about it. I am not responsible for the successful working of the
 machinery of society. I am not the son of the engineer. I perceive that,
 when an acorn and a chestnut fall side by side, the one does not remain
 inert to make way for the other, but both obey their own laws, and
 spring and grow and flourish as best they can, till one, perchance,
 overshadows and destroys the other. If a plant cannot live according to
 its nature, it dies; and so a man.
 
 The night in prison was novel and interesting enough. The prisoners
 in their shirt-sleeves were enjoying a chat and the evening air in the
 doorway, when I entered. But the jailer said, "Come, boys, it is time
 to lock up"; and so they dispersed, and I heard the sound of their steps
 returning into the hollow apartments. My room-mate was introduced to me
 by the jailer as "a first-rate fellow and a clever man." When the
 door was locked, he showed me where to hang my hat, and how he managed
 matters there. The rooms were whitewashed once a month; and this one, at
 least, was the whitest, most simply furnished, and probably the neatest
 apartment in the town. He naturally wanted to know where I came from,
 and what brought me there; and, when I had told him, I asked him in my
 turn how he came there, presuming him to be an honest man, of course;
 and, as the world goes, I believe he was. "Why," said he, "they accuse
 me of burning a barn; but I never did it." As near as I could discover,
 he had probably gone to bed in a barn when drunk, and smoked his pipe
 there; and so a barn was burnt. He had the reputation of being a clever
 man, had been there some three months waiting for his trial to come on,
 and would have to wait as much longer; but he was quite domesticated and
 contented, since he got his board for nothing, and thought that he was
 well treated.
 
 He occupied one window, and I the other; and I saw that if one stayed
 there long, his principal business would be to look out the window. I
 had soon read all the tracts that were left there, and examined where
 former prisoners had broken out, and where a grate had been sawed off,
 and heard the history of the various occupants of that room; for I found
 that even here there was a history and a gossip which never circulated
 beyond the walls of the jail. Probably this is the only house in
 the town where verses are composed, which are afterward printed in
 a circular form, but not published. I was shown quite a long list of
 verses which were composed by some young men who had been detected in an
 attempt to escape, who avenged themselves by singing them.
 
 I pumped my fellow-prisoner as dry as I could, for fear I should never
 see him again; but at length he showed me which was my bed, and left me
 to blow out the lamp.
 
 It was like travelling into a far country, such as I had never expected
 to behold, to lie there for one night. It seemed to me that I never
 had heard the town-clock strike before, nor the evening sounds of the
 village; for we slept with the windows open, which were inside the
 grating. It was to see my native village in the light of the Middle
 Ages, and our Concord was turned into a Rhine stream, and visions
 of knights and castles passed before me. They were the voices of old
 burghers that I heard in the streets. I was an involuntary spectator
 and auditor of whatever was done and said in the kitchen of the adjacent
 village-inn--a wholly new and rare experience to me. It was a closer
 view of my native town. I was fairly inside of it. I never had seen its
 institutions before. This is one of its peculiar institutions; for it is
 a shire town. I began to comprehend what its inhabitants were about.
 
 In the morning, our breakfasts were put through the hole in the door,
 in small oblong-square tin pans, made to fit, and holding a pint of
 chocolate, with brown bread, and an iron spoon. When they called for the
 vessels again, I was green enough to return what bread I had left; but
 my comrade seized it, and said that I should lay that up for lunch or
 dinner. Soon after he was let out to work at haying in a neighboring
 field, whither he went every day, and would not be back till noon; so he
 bade me good-day, saying that he doubted if he should see me again.
 
 When I came out of prison--for some one interfered, and paid that tax--I
 did not perceive that great changes had taken place on the common,
 such as he observed who went in a youth and emerged a tottering
 and gray-headed man; and yet a change had to my eyes come over the
 scene--the town, and State, and country--greater than any that mere time
 could effect. I saw yet more distinctly the State in which I lived. I
 saw to what extent the people among whom I lived could be trusted as
 good neighbors and friends; that their friendship was for summer weather
 only; that they did not greatly propose to do right; that they were
 a distinct race from me by their prejudices and superstitions, as the
 Chinamen and Malays are; that in their sacrifices to humanity, they ran
 no risks, not even to their property; that after all they were not so
 noble but they treated the thief as he had treated them, and hoped, by
 a certain outward observance and a few prayers, and by walking in a
 particular straight though useless path from time to time, to save their
 souls. This may be to judge my neighbors harshly; for I believe that
 many of them are not aware that they have such an institution as the
 jail in their village.
 
 It was formerly the custom in our village, when a poor debtor came out
 of jail, for his acquaintances to salute him, looking through their
 fingers, which were crossed to represent the grating of a jail window,
 "How do ye do?" My neighbors did not thus salute me, but first looked at
 me, and then at one another, as if I had returned from a long journey. I
 was put into jail as I was going to the shoemaker's to get a shoe which
 was mended. When I was let out the next morning, I proceeded to finish
 my errand, and, having put on my mended shoe, joined a huckleberry
 party, who were impatient to put themselves under my conduct; and in
 half an hour--for the horse was soon tackled--was in the midst of a
 huckleberry field, on one of our highest hills, two miles off, and then
 the State was nowhere to be seen.
 
 This is the whole history of "My Prisons."
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 I have never declined paying the highway tax, because I am as desirous
 of being a good neighbor as I am of being a bad subject; and as for
 supporting schools, I am doing my part to educate my fellow-countrymen
 now. It is for no particular item in the tax-bill that I refuse to pay
 it. I simply wish to refuse allegiance to the State, to withdraw and
 stand aloof from it effectually. I do not care to trace the course of
 my dollar, if I could, till it buys a man or a musket to shoot one
 with--the dollar is innocent--but I am concerned to trace the effects of
 my allegiance. In fact, I quietly declare war with the State, after my
 fashion, though I will still make what use and get what advantage of her
 I can, as is usual in such cases.
 
 If others pay the tax which is demanded of me, from a sympathy with the
 State, they do but what they have already done in their own case, or
 rather they abet injustice to a greater extent than the State requires.
 If they pay the tax from a mistaken interest in the individual taxed, to
 save his property, or prevent his going to jail, it is because they have
 not considered wisely how far they let their private feelings interfere
 with the public good.
 
 This, then, is my position at present. But one cannot be too much on his
 guard in such a case, lest his action be biased by obstinacy or an
 undue regard for the opinions of men. Let him see that he does only what
 belongs to himself and to the hour.
 
 I think sometimes, Why, this people mean well; they are only ignorant;
 they would do better if they knew how: why give your neighbors this pain
 to treat you as they are not inclined to? But I think, again, This is
 no reason why I should do as they do, or permit others to suffer much
 greater pain of a different kind. Again, I sometimes say to myself, When
 many millions of men, without heat, without ill-will, without personal
 feeling of any kind, demand of you a few shillings only, without the
 possibility, such is their constitution, of retracting or altering their
 present demand, and without the possibility, on your side, of appeal
 to any other millions, why expose yourself to this overwhelming brute
 force? You do not resist cold and hunger, the winds and the waves, thus
 obstinately; you quietly submit to a thousand similar necessities. You
 do not put your head into the fire. But just in proportion as I regard
 this as not wholly a brute force, but partly a human force, and consider
 that I have relations to those millions as to so many millions of
 men, and not of mere brute or inanimate things, I see that appeal is
 possible, first and instantaneously, from them to the Maker of
 them, and, secondly, from them to themselves. But, if I put my head
 deliberately into the fire, there is no appeal to fire or to the Maker
 of fire, and I have only myself to blame. If I could convince myself
 that I have any right to be satisfied with men as they are, and to
 treat them accordingly, and not according, in some respects, to my
 requisitions and expectations of what they and I ought to be, then, like
 a good Mussulman and fatalist, I should endeavor to be satisfied with
 things as they are, and say it is the will of God. And, above all, there
 is this difference between resisting this and a purely brute or natural
 force, that I can resist this with some effect; but I cannot expect,
 like Orpheus, to change the nature of the rocks and trees and beasts.
 
 I do not wish to quarrel with any man or nation. I do not wish to split
 hairs, to make fine distinctions, or set myself up as better than my
 neighbors. I seek rather, I may say, even an excuse for conforming to
 the laws of the land. I am but too ready to conform to them. Indeed,
 I have reason to suspect myself on this head; and each year, as the
 tax-gatherer comes round, I find myself disposed to review the acts and
 position of the general and State governments, and the spirit of the
 people, to discover a pretext for conformity.
 
             "We must affect our country as our parents,
              And if at any time we alienate
              Our love or industry from doing it honor,
              We must respect effects and teach the soul
              Matter of conscience and religion,
              And not desire of rule or benefit."
 
 I believe that the State will soon be able to take all my work of this
 sort out of my hands, and then I shall be no better a patriot than my
 fellow-countrymen. Seen from a lower point of view, the Constitution,
 with all its faults, is very good; the law and the courts are very
 respectable; even this State and this American government are, in many
 respects, very admirable and rare things, to be thankful for, such as a
 great many have described them; but seen from a point of view a little
 higher, they are what I have described them; seen from a higher still,
 and the highest, who shall say what they are, or that they are worth
 looking at or thinking of at all?
 
 However, the government does not concern me much, and I shall bestow the
 fewest possible thoughts on it. It is not many moments that I live under
 a government, even in this world. If a man is thought-free, fancy-free,
 imagination-free, that which _is not_ never for a long time appearing _to
 be_ to him, unwise rulers or reformers cannot fatally interrupt him.
 
 I know that most men think differently from myself; but those whose
 lives are by profession devoted to the study of these or kindred
 subjects, content me as little as any. Statesmen and legislators,
 standing so completely within the institution, never distinctly
 and nakedly behold it. They speak of moving society, but have no
 resting-place without it. They may be men of a certain experience and
 discrimination, and have no doubt invented ingenious and even useful
 systems, for which we sincerely thank them; but all their wit and
 usefulness lie within certain not very wide limits. They are wont to
 forget that the world is not governed by policy and expediency. Webster
 never goes behind government, and so cannot speak with authority
 about it. His words are wisdom to those legislators who contemplate no
 essential reform in the existing government; but for thinkers, and those
 who legislate for all time, he never once glances at the subject. I know
 of those whose serene and wise speculations on this theme would soon
 reveal the limits of his mind's range and hospitality. Yet, compared
 with the cheap professions of most reformers, and the still cheaper
 wisdom and eloquence of politicians in general, his are almost the only
 sensible and valuable words, and we thank Heaven for him. Comparatively,
 he is always strong, original, and, above all, practical. Still, his
 quality is not wisdom, but prudence. The lawyer's truth is not truth,
 but consistency or a consistent expediency. Truth is always in harmony
 with herself, and is not concerned chiefly to reveal the justice that
 may consist with wrong-doing. He well deserves to be called, as he has
 been called, the Defender of the Constitution. There are really no
 blows to be given by him but defensive ones. He is not a leader, but a
 follower. His leaders are the men of '87. "I have never made an effort,"
 he says, "and never propose to make an effort; I have never countenanced
 an effort, and never mean to countenance an effort, to disturb the
 arrangement as originally made, by which the various States came into
 the Union." Still thinking of the sanction which the Constitution gives
 to slavery, he says, "Because it was a part of the original compact--let
 it stand." Notwithstanding his special acuteness and ability, he is
 unable to take a fact out of its merely political relations, and behold
 it as it lies absolutely to be disposed of by the intellect--what, for
 instance, it behooves a man to do here in America to-day with regard to
 slavery, but ventures, or is driven, to make some such desperate answer
 as the following, while professing to speak absolutely, and as a private
 man--from which what new and singular code of social duties might be
 inferred? "The manner," says he, "in which the governments of those
 States where slavery exists are to regulate it is for their own
 consideration, under their responsibility to their constituents, to
 the general laws of propriety, humanity, and justice, and to God.
 Associations formed elsewhere, springing from a feeling of humanity, or
 any other cause, have nothing whatever to do with it. They have never
 received any encouragement from me, and they never will."
 
 They who know of no purer sources of truth, who have traced up its
 stream no higher, stand, and wisely stand, by the Bible and the
 Constitution, and drink at it there with reverence and humility; but
 they who behold where it comes trickling into this lake or that pool,
 gird up their loins once more, and continue their pilgrimage toward its
 fountain-head.
 
 No man with a genius for legislation has appeared in America. They are
 rare in the history of the world. There are orators, politicians, and
 eloquent men, by the thousand; but the speaker has not yet opened his
 mouth to speak who is capable of settling the much-vexed questions of
 the day. We love eloquence for its own sake, and not for any truth which
 it may utter, or any heroism it may inspire. Our legislators have not
 yet learned the comparative value of free-trade and of freedom, of
 union, and of rectitude, to a nation. They have no genius or talent for
 comparatively humble questions of taxation and finance, commerce and
 manufacturers and agriculture. If we were left solely to the wordy
 wit of legislators in Congress for our guidance, uncorrected by the
 seasonable experience and the effectual complaints of the people,
 America would not long retain her rank among the nations. For eighteen
 hundred years, though perchance I have no right to say it, the New
 Testament has been written; yet where is the legislator who has wisdom
 and practical talent enough to avail himself of the light which it sheds
 on the science of legislation?
 
 The authority of government, even such as I am willing to submit to--for
 I will cheerfully obey those who know and can do better than I, and in
 many things even those who neither know nor can do so well--is still an
 impure one: to be strictly just, it must have the sanction and consent
 of the governed. It can have no pure right over my person and property
 but what I concede to it. The progress from an absolute to a limited
 monarchy, from a limited monarchy to a democracy, is a progress toward
 a true respect for the individual. Even the Chinese philosopher was
 wise enough to regard the individual as the basis of the empire. Is
 a democracy, such as we know it, the last improvement possible
 in government? Is it not possible to take a step further towards
 recognizing and organizing the rights of man? There will never be a
 really free and enlightened State until the State comes to recognize
 the individual as a higher and independent power, from which all its own
 power and authority are derived, and treats him accordingly. I please
 myself with imagining a State at least which can afford to be just to
 all men, and to treat the individual with respect as a neighbor; which
 even would not think it inconsistent with its own repose if a few were
 to live aloof from it, not meddling with it, nor embraced by it, who
 fulfilled all the duties of neighbors and fellow-men. A State which bore
 this kind of fruit, and suffered it to drop off as fast as it ripened,
 would prepare the way for a still more perfect and glorious State, which
 also I have imagined, but not yet anywhere seen.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 End of the Project Gutenberg EBook of Walden, and On The Duty Of Civil

 
 
 
 Produced by Jason Filley
 
 
 
 
 
 A PLEA FOR CAPTAIN JOHN BROWN
 
 By Henry David Thoreau
 
 
 [Read to the citizens of Concord, Mass., Sunday Evening, October 30,
 1859.]
 
 
 
 I trust that you will pardon me for being here. I do not wish to force
 my thoughts upon you, but I feel forced myself. Little as I know of
 Captain Brown, I would fain do my part to correct the tone and the
 statements of the newspapers, and of my countrymen generally, respecting
 his character and actions. It costs us nothing to be just. We can
 at least express our sympathy with, and admiration of, him and his
 companions, and that is what I now propose to do.
 
 First, as to his history. I will endeavor to omit, as much as possible,
 what you have already read. I need not describe his person to you, for
 probably most of you have seen and will not soon forget him. I am told
 that his grandfather, John Brown, was an officer in the Revolution; that
 he himself was born in Connecticut about the beginning of this century,
 but early went with his father to Ohio. I heard him say that his father
 was a contractor who furnished beef to the army there, in the war of
 1812; that he accompanied him to the camp, and assisted him in that
 employment, seeing a good deal of military life,--more, perhaps, than if
 he had been a soldier; for he was often present at the councils of the
 officers. Especially, he learned by experience how armies are supplied
 and maintained in the field,--a work which, he observed, requires at
 least as much experience and skill as to lead them in battle. He said
 that few persons had any conception of the cost, even the pecuniary
 cost, of firing a single bullet in war. He saw enough, at any rate,
 to disgust him with a military life; indeed, to excite in his a great
 abhorrence of it; so much so, that though he was tempted by the offer of
 some petty office in the army, when he was about eighteen, he not only
 declined that, but he also refused to train when warned, and was fined
 for it. He then resolved that he would never have anything to do with
 any war, unless it were a war for liberty.
 
 When the troubles in Kansas began, he sent several of his sons thither
 to strengthen the party of the Free State men, fitting them out with
 such weapons as he had; telling them that if the troubles should
 increase, and there should be need of his, he would follow, to assist
 them with his hand and counsel. This, as you all know, he soon after
 did; and it was through his agency, far more than any other's, that
 Kansas was made free.
 
 For a part of his life he was a surveyor, and at one time he was engaged
 in wool-growing, and he went to Europe as an agent about that business.
 There, as everywhere, he had his eyes about him, and made many original
 observations. He said, for instance, that he saw why the soil of England
 was so rich, and that of Germany (I think it was) so poor, and he
 thought of writing to some of the crowned heads about it. It was because
 in England the peasantry live on the soil which they cultivate, but in
 Germany they are gathered into villages, at night. It is a pity that he
 did not make a book of his observations.
 
 I should say that he was an old-fashioned man in respect for the
 Constitution, and his faith in the permanence of this Union. Slavery he
 deemed to be wholly opposed to these, and he was its determined foe.
 
 He was by descent and birth a New England farmer, a man of great
 common-sense, deliberate and practical as that class is, and tenfold
 more so. He was like the best of those who stood at Concord Bridge once,
 on Lexington Common, and on Bunker Hill, only he was firmer and higher
 principled than any that I have chanced to hear of as there. It was no
 abolition lecturer that converted him. Ethan Allen and Stark, with whom
 he may in some respects be compared, were rangers in a lower and less
 important field. They could bravely face their country's foes, but he
 had the courage to face his country herself, when she was in the wrong.
 A Western writer says, to account for his escape from so many perils,
 that he was concealed under a "rural exterior"; as if, in that prairie
 land, a hero should, by good rights, wear a citizen's dress only.
 
 He did not go to the college called Harvard, good old Alma Mater as she
 is. He was not fed on the pap that is there furnished. As he phrased it,
 "I know no more of grammar than one of your calves." But he went to the
 great university of the West, where he sedulously pursued the study of
 Liberty, for which he had early betrayed a fondness, and having taken
 many degrees, he finally commenced the public practice of Humanity in
 Kansas, as you all know. Such were his humanities and not any study of
 grammar. He would have left a Greek accent slanting the wrong way, and
 righted up a falling man.
 
 He was one of that class of whom we hear a great deal, but, for the most
 part, see nothing at all,--the Puritans. It would be in vain to kill
 him. He died lately in the time of Cromwell, but he reappeared here. Why
 should he not? Some of the Puritan stock are said to have come over and
 settled in New England. They were a class that did something else than
 celebrate their forefathers' day, and eat parched corn in remembrance
 of that time. They were neither Democrats nor Republicans, but men of
 simple habits, straightforward, prayerful; not thinking much of rulers
 who did not fear God, not making many compromises, nor seeking after
 available candidates.
 
 "In his camp," as one has recently written, and as I have myself heard
 him state, "he permitted no profanity; no man of loose morals was
 suffered to remain there, unless, indeed, as a prisoner of war. 'I would
 rather,' said he, 'have the small-pox, yellow-fever, and cholera, all
 together in my camp, than a man without principle.... It is a mistake,
 sir, that our people make, when they think that bullies are the best
 fighters, or that they are the fit men to oppose these Southerners.
 Give me men of good principles,--God-fearing men,--men who respect
 themselves, and with a dozen of them I will oppose any hundred such men
 as these Buford ruffians.'" He said that if one offered himself to be a
 soldier under him, who was forward to tell what he could or would do,
 if he could only get sight of the enemy, he had but little confidence in
 him.
 
 He was never able to find more than a score or so of recruits whom he
 would accept, and only about a dozen, among them his sons, in whom he
 had perfect faith. When he was here, some years ago, he showed to a
 few a little manuscript book,--his "orderly book" I think he called
 it,--containing the names of his company in Kansas, and the rules by
 which they bound themselves; and he stated that several of them had
 already sealed the contract with their blood. When some one remarked
 that, with the addition of a chaplain, it would have been a perfect
 Cromwellian troop, he observed that he would have been glad to add a
 chaplain to the list, if he could have found one who could fill that
 office worthily. It is easy enough to find one for the United States
 army. I believe that he had prayers in his camp morning and evening,
 nevertheless.
 
 He was a man of Spartan habits, and at sixty was scrupulous about
 his diet at your table, excusing himself by saying that he must eat
 sparingly and fare hard, as became a soldier, or one who was fitting
 himself for difficult enterprises, a life of exposure.
 
 A man of rare common-sense and directness of speech, as of action; a
 transcendentalist above all, a man of ideas and principles,--that was
 what distinguished him. Not yielding to a whim or transient impulse, but
 carrying out the purpose of a life. I noticed that he did not overstate
 anything, but spoke within bounds. I remember, particularly, how, in
 his speech here, he referred to what his family had suffered in Kansas,
 without ever giving the least vent to his pent-up fire. It was a volcano
 with an ordinary chimney-flue. Also referring to the deeds of certain
 Border Ruffians, he said, rapidly paring away his speech, like an
 experienced soldier, keeping a reserve of force and meaning, "They had
 a perfect right to be hung." He was not in the least a rhetorician, was
 not talking to Buncombe or his constituents anywhere, had no need to
 invent anything but to tell the simple truth, and communicate his own
 resolution; therefore he appeared incomparably strong, and eloquence
 in Congress and elsewhere seemed to me at a discount. It was like the
 speeches of Cromwell compared with those of an ordinary king.
 
 As for his tact and prudence, I will merely say, that at a time when
 scarcely a man from the Free States was able to reach Kansas by any
 direct route, at least without having his arms taken from him, he,
 carrying what imperfect guns and other weapons he could collect, openly
 and slowly drove an ox-cart through Missouri, apparently in the capacity
 of a surveyor, with his surveying compass exposed in it, and so passed
 unsuspected, and had ample opportunity to learn the designs of the
 enemy. For some time after his arrival he still followed the same
 profession. When, for instance, he saw a knot of the ruffians on the
 prairie, discussing, of course, the single topic which then occupied
 their minds, he would, perhaps, take his compass and one of his sons,
 and proceed to run an imaginary line right through the very spot on
 which that conclave had assembled, and when he came up to them, he would
 naturally pause and have some talk with them, learning their news, and,
 at last, all their plans perfectly; and having thus completed his real
 survey he would resume his imaginary one, and run on his line till he
 was out of sight.
 
 When I expressed surprise that he could live in Kansas at all, with
 a price set upon his head, and so large a number, including the
 authorities, exasperated against him, he accounted for it by saying, "It
 is perfectly well understood that I will not be taken." Much of the time
 for some years he has had to skulk in swamps, suffering from poverty and
 from sickness, which was the consequence of exposure, befriended only
 by Indians and a few whites. But though it might be known that he was
 lurking in a particular swamp, his foes commonly did not care to go
 in after him. He could even come out into a town where there were more
 Border Ruffians than Free State men, and transact some business, without
 delaying long, and yet not be molested; for, said he, "No little handful
 of men were willing to undertake it, and a large body could not be got
 together in season."
 
 As for his recent failure, we do not know the facts about it. It was
 evidently far from being a wild and desperate attempt. His enemy, Mr.
 Vallandigham, is compelled to say, that "it was among the best planned
 executed conspiracies that ever failed."
 
 Not to mention his other successes, was it a failure, or did it show a
 want of good management, to deliver from bondage a dozen human beings,
 and walk off with them by broad daylight, for weeks if not months, at a
 leisurely pace, through one State after another, for half the length of
 the North, conspicuous to all parties, with a price set upon his head,
 going into a court-room on his way and telling what he had done, thus
 convincing Missouri that it was not profitable to try to hold slaves
 in his neighborhood?--and this, not because the government menials were
 lenient, but because they were afraid of him.
 
 Yet he did not attribute his success, foolishly, to "his star," or to
 any magic. He said, truly, that the reason why such greatly superior
 numbers quailed before him was, as one of his prisoners confessed,
 because they lacked a cause,--a kind of armor which he and his party
 never lacked. When the time came, few men were found willing to lay down
 their lives in defence of what they knew to be wrong; they did not like
 that this should be their last act in this world.
 
 But to make haste to his last act, and its effects.
 
 The newspapers seem to ignore, or perhaps are really ignorant of the
 fact, that there are at least as many as two or three individuals to
 a town throughout the North who think much as the present speaker does
 about him and his enterprise. I do not hesitate to say that they are an
 important and growing party. We aspire to be something more than stupid
 and timid chattels, pretending to read history and our Bibles, but
 desecrating every house and every day we breathe in. Perhaps anxious
 politicians may prove that only seventeen white men and five negroes
 were concerned in the late enterprise; but their very anxiety to prove
 this might suggest to themselves that all is not told. Why do they still
 dodge the truth? They are so anxious because of a dim consciousness of
 the fact, which they do not distinctly face, that at least a million of
 the free inhabitants of the United States would have rejoiced if it had
 succeeded. They at most only criticise the tactics. Though we wear no
 crape, the thought of that man's position and probable fate is spoiling
 many a man's day here at the North for other thinking. If any one who
 has seen him here can pursue successfully any other train of thought, I
 do not know what he is made of. If there is any such who gets his
 usual allowance of sleep, I will warrant him to fatten easily under any
 circumstances which do not touch his body or purse. I put a piece of
 paper and a pencil under my pillow, and when I could not sleep, I wrote
 in the dark.
 
 On the whole, my respect for my fellow-men, except as one may outweigh
 a million, is not being increased these days. I have noticed the
 cold-blooded way in which newspaper writers and men generally speak
 of this event, as if an ordinary malefactor, though one of unusual
 "pluck,"--as the Governor of Virginia is reported to have said, using
 the language of the cock-pit, "the gamest man he ever saw,"--had been
 caught, and were about to be hung. He was not dreaming of his foes when
 the governor thought he looked so brave. It turns what sweetness I have
 to gall, to hear, or hear of, the remarks of some of my neighbors. When
 we heard at first that he was dead, one of my townsmen observed that "he
 died as the fool dieth"; which, pardon me, for an instant suggested a
 likeness in him dying to my neighbor living. Others, craven-hearted,
 said disparagingly, that "he threw his life away," because he resisted
 the government. Which way have they thrown their lives, pray?--such as
 would praise a man for attacking singly an ordinary band of thieves or
 murderers. I hear another ask, Yankee-like, "What will he gain by it?"
 as if he expected to fill his pockets by this enterprise. Such a one
 has no idea of gain but in this worldly sense. If it does not lead to a
 "surprise" party, if he does not get a new pair of boots, or a vote of
 thanks, it must be a failure. "But he won't gain anything by it." Well,
 no, I don't suppose he could get four-and-sixpence a day for being hung,
 take the year round; but then he stands a chance to save a considerable
 part of his soul,--and such a soul!--when you do not. No doubt you can
 get more in your market for a quart of milk than for a quart of blood,
 but that is not the market that heroes carry their blood to.
 
 Such do not know that like the seed is the fruit, and that, in the moral
 world, when good seed is planted, good fruit is inevitable, and does not
 depend on our watering and cultivating; that when you plant, or bury, a
 hero in his field, a crop of heroes is sure to spring up. This is a seed
 of such force and vitality, that it does not ask our leave to germinate.
 
 The momentary charge at Balaclava, in obedience to a blundering command,
 proving what a perfect machine the soldier is, has, properly enough,
 been celebrated by a poet laureate; but the steady, and for the most
 part successful, charge of this man, for some years, against the legions
 of Slavery, in obedience to an infinitely higher command, is as much
 more memorable than that, as an intelligent and conscientious man is
 superior to a machine. Do you think that that will go unsung?
 
 "Served him right,"--"A dangerous man,"--"He is undoubtedly insane."
 So they proceed to live their sane, and wise, and altogether admirable
 lives, reading their Plutarch a little, but chiefly pausing at that feat
 of Putnam, who was let down into a wolf's den; and in this wise they
 nourish themselves for brave and patriotic deeds some time or other. The
 Tract Society could afford to print that story of Putnam. You might open
 the district schools with the reading of it, for there is nothing about
 Slavery or the Church in it; unless it occurs to the reader that
 some pastors are wolves in sheep's clothing. "The American Board of
 Commissioners for Foreign Missions" even, might dare to protest against
 that wolf. I have heard of boards, and of American boards, but it
 chances that I never heard of this particular lumber till lately. And
 yet I hear of Northern men, and women, and children, by families, buying
 a "life membership" in such societies as these. A life-membership in the
 grave! You can get buried cheaper than that.
 
 Our foes are in our midst and all about us. There is hardly a house
 but is divided against itself, for our foe is the all but universal
 woodenness of both head and heart, the want of vitality in man, which
 is the effect of our vice; and hence are begotten fear, superstition,
 bigotry, persecution, and slavery of all kinds. We are mere figureheads
 upon a hulk, with livers in the place of hearts. The curse is the
 worship of idols, which at length changes the worshipper into a stone
 image himself; and the New-Englander is just as much an idolater as
 the Hindoo. This man was an exception, for he did not set up even a
 political graven image between him and his God.
 
 A church that can never have done with excommunicating Christ while it
 exists! Away with your broad and flat churches, and your narrow and tall
 churches! Take a step forward, and invent a new style of out-houses.
 Invent a salt that will save you, and defend our nostrils.
 
 The modern Christian is a man who has consented to say all the prayers
 in the liturgy, provided you will let him go straight to bed and sleep
 quietly afterward. All his prayers begin with "Now I lay me down to
 sleep," and he is forever looking forward to the time when he shall go
 to his "long rest." He has consented to perform certain old-established
 charities, too, after a fashion, but he does not wish to hear of any
 new-fangled ones; he doesn't wish to have any supplementary articles
 added to the contract, to fit it to the present time. He shows the
 whites of his eyes on the Sabbath, and the blacks all the rest of the
 week. The evil is not merely a stagnation of blood, but a stagnation of
 spirit. Many, no doubt, are well disposed, but sluggish by constitution
 and by habit, and they cannot conceive of a man who is actuated by
 higher motives than they are. Accordingly they pronounce this man
 insane, for they know that they could never act as he does, as long as
 they are themselves.
 
 We dream of foreign countries, of other times and races of men, placing
 them at a distance in history or space; but let some significant event
 like the present occur in our midst, and we discover, often, this
 distance and this strangeness between us and our nearest neighbors. They
 are our Austrias, and Chinas, and South Sea Islands. Our crowded society
 becomes well spaced all at once, clean and handsome to the eye,--a
 city of magnificent distances. We discover why it was that we never got
 beyond compliments and surfaces with them before; we become aware of as
 many versts between us and them as there are between a wandering
 Tartar and a Chinese town. The thoughtful man becomes a hermit in the
 thoroughfares of the market-place. Impassable seas suddenly find their
 level between us, or dumb steppes stretch themselves out there. It is
 the difference of constitution, of intelligence, and faith, and not
 streams and mountains, that make the true and impassable boundaries
 between individuals and between states. None but the like-minded can
 come plenipotentiary to our court.
 
 I read all the newspapers I could get within a week after this event,
 and I do not remember in them a single expression of sympathy for these
 men. I have since seen one noble statement, in a Boston paper, not
 editorial. Some voluminous sheets decided not to print the full report
 of Brown's words to the exclusion of other matter. It was as if a
 publisher should reject the manuscript of the New Testament, and print
 Wilson's last speech. The same journal which contained this pregnant
 news, was chiefly filled, in parallel columns, with the reports of the
 political conventions that were being held. But the descent to them was
 too steep. They should have been spared this contrast,--been printed in
 an extra, at least. To turn from the voices and deeds of earnest men to
 the cackling of political conventions! Office-seekers and speech-makers,
 who do not so much as lay an honest egg, but wear their breasts bare
 upon an egg of chalk! Their great game is the game of straws, or rather
 that universal aboriginal game of the platter, at which the Indians
 cried hub, bub! Exclude the reports of religious and political
 conventions, and publish the words of a living man.
 
 But I object not so much to what they have omitted, as to what they
 have inserted. Even the Liberator called it "a misguided, wild, and
 apparently insane--effort." As for the herd of newspapers and magazines,
 I do not chance to know an editor in the country who will deliberately
 print anything which he knows will ultimately and permanently reduce
 the number of his subscribers. They do not believe that it would be
 expedient. How then can they print truth? If we do not say pleasant
 things, they argue, nobody will attend to us. And so they do like some
 travelling auctioneers, who sing an obscene song, in order to draw a
 crowd around them. Republican editors, obliged to get their sentences
 ready for the morning edition, and accustomed to look at everything by
 the twilight of politics, express no admiration, nor true sorrow even,
 but call these men "deluded fanatics,"--"mistaken men,"--"insane," or
 "crazed." It suggests what a sane set of editors we are blessed with,
 not "mistaken men"; who know very well on which side their bread is
 buttered, at least.
 
 A man does a brave and humane deed, and at once, on all sides, we hear
 people and parties declaring, "I didn't do it, nor countenance him to
 do it, in any conceivable way. It can't be fairly inferred from my past
 career." I, for one, am not interested to hear you define your position.
 I don't know that I ever was, or ever shall be. I think it is mere
 egotism, or impertinent at this time. Ye needn't take so much pains to
 wash your skirts of him. No intelligent man will ever be convinced that
 he was any creature of yours. He went and came, as he himself informs
 us, "under the auspices of John Brown and nobody else." The Republican
 party does not perceive how many his failure will make to vote more
 correctly than they would have them. They have counted the votes of
 Pennsylvania & Co., but they have not correctly counted Captain Brown's
 vote. He has taken the wind out of their sails,--the little wind they
 had,--and they may as well lie to and repair.
 
 What though he did not belong to your clique! Though you may not approve
 of his method or his principles, recognize his magnanimity. Would you
 not like to claim kindredship with him in that, though in no other thing
 he is like, or likely, to you? Do you think that you would lose your
 reputation so? What you lost at the spile, you would gain at the bung.
 
 If they do not mean all this, then they do not speak the truth, and say
 what they mean. They are simply at their old tricks still.
 
 "It was always conceded to him," says one who calls him crazy, "that
 he was a conscientious man, very modest in his demeanor, apparently
 inoffensive, until the subject of Slavery was introduced, when he would
 exhibit a feeling of indignation unparalleled."
 
 The slave-ship is on her way, crowded with its dying victims; new
 cargoes are being added in mid-ocean; a small crew of slaveholders,
 countenanced by a large body of passengers, is smothering four millions
 under the hatches, and yet the politician asserts that the only proper
 way by which deliverance is to be obtained, is by "the quiet diffusion
 of the sentiments of humanity," without any "outbreak." As if the
 sentiments of humanity were ever found unaccompanied by its deeds, and
 you could disperse them, all finished to order, the pure article, as
 easily as water with a watering-pot, and so lay the dust. What is that
 that I hear cast overboard? The bodies of the dead that have found
 deliverance. That is the way we are "diffusing" humanity, and its
 sentiments with it.
 
 Prominent and influential editors, accustomed to deal with politicians,
 men of an infinitely lower grade, say, in their ignorance, that he
 acted "on the principle of revenge." They do not know the man. They must
 enlarge themselves to conceive of him. I have no doubt that the time
 will come when they will begin to see him as he was. They have got
 to conceive of a man of faith and of religious principle, and not
 a politician or an Indian; of a man who did not wait till he was
 personally interfered with or thwarted in some harmless business before
 he gave his life to the cause of the oppressed.
 
 If Walker may be considered the representative of the South, I wish
 I could say that Brown was the representative of the North. He was a
 superior man. He did not value his bodily life in comparison with ideal
 things. He did not recognize unjust human laws, but resisted them as
 he was bid. For once we are lifted out of the trivialness and dust of
 politics into the region of truth and manhood. No man in America has
 ever stood up so persistently and effectively for the dignity of
 human nature, knowing himself for a man, and the equal of any and all
 governments. In that sense he was the most American of us all. He needed
 no babbling lawyer, making false issues, to defend him. He was more than
 a match for all the judges that American voters, or office-holders of
 whatever grade, can create. He could not have been tried by a jury
 of his peers, because his peers did not exist. When a man stands up
 serenely against the condemnation and vengeance of mankind, rising above
 them literally by a whole body,--even though he were of late the vilest
 murderer, who has settled that matter with himself,--the spectacle is
 a sublime one,--didn't ye know it, ye Liberators, ye Tribunes, ye
 Republicans?--and we become criminal in comparison. Do yourselves the
 honor to recognize him. He needs none of your respect.
 
 As for the Democratic journals, they are not human enough to affect me
 at all. I do not feel indignation at anything they may say.
 
 I am aware that I anticipate a little,--that he was still, at the last
 accounts, alive in the hands of his foes; but that being the case, I
 have all along found myself thinking and speaking of him as physically
 dead.
 
 I do not believe in erecting statues to those who still live in our
 hearts, whose bones have not yet crumbled in the earth around us, but
 I would rather see the statue of Captain Brown in the Massachusetts
 State-House yard, than that of any other man whom I know. I rejoice that
 I live in this age, that I am his contemporary.
 
 What a contrast, when we turn to that political party which is so
 anxiously shuffling him and his plot out of its way, and looking around
 for some available slave holder, perhaps, to be its candidate, at least
 for one who will execute the Fugitive Slave Law, and all those other
 unjust laws which he took up arms to annul!
 
 Insane! A father and six sons, and one son-in-law, and several more
 men besides,--as many at least as twelve disciples,--all struck with
 insanity at once; while the same tyrant holds with a firmer gripe than
 ever his four millions of slaves, and a thousand sane editors, his
 abettors, are saving their country and their bacon! Just as insane were
 his efforts in Kansas. Ask the tyrant who is his most dangerous foe,
 the sane man or the insane? Do the thousands who know him best, who
 have rejoiced at his deeds in Kansas, and have afforded him material aid
 there, think him insane? Such a use of this word is a mere trope with
 most who persist in using it, and I have no doubt that many of the rest
 have already in silence retracted their words.
 
 Read his admirable answers to Mason and others. How they are dwarfed
 and defeated by the contrast! On the one side, half-brutish, half-timid
 questioning; on the other, truth, clear as lightning, crashing into
 their obscene temples. They are made to stand with Pilate, and Gesler,
 and the Inquisition. How ineffectual their speech and action! and what
 a void their silence! They are but helpless tools in this great work. It
 was no human power that gathered them about this preacher.
 
 What have Massachusetts and the North sent a few sane representatives
 to Congress for, of late years?--to declare with effect what kind
 of sentiments? All their speeches put together and boiled down,--and
 probably they themselves will confess it,--do not match for manly
 directness and force, and for simple truth, the few casual remarks of
 crazy John Brown, on the floor of the Harper's Ferry engine-house,--that
 man whom you are about to hang, to send to the other world, though not
 to represent you there. No, he was not our representative in any sense.
 He was too fair a specimen of a man to represent the like of us. Who,
 then, were his constituents? If you read his words understandingly you
 will find out. In his case there is no idle eloquence, no made, nor
 maiden speech, no compliments to the oppressor. Truth is his inspirer,
 and earnestness the polisher of his sentences. He could afford to
 lose his Sharp's rifles, while he retained his faculty of speech,--a
 Sharp's rifle of infinitely surer and longer range.
 
 And the New York Herald reports the conversation verbatim! It does not
 know of what undying words it is made the vehicle.
 
 I have no respect for the penetration of any man who can read the report
 of that conversation, and still call the principal in it insane. It has
 the ring of a saner sanity than an ordinary discipline and habits
 of life, than an ordinary organization, secure. Take any sentence of
 it,--"Any questions that I can honorably answer, I will; not otherwise.
 So far as I am myself concerned, I have told everything truthfully. I
 value my word, sir." The few who talk about his vindictive spirit, while
 they really admire his heroism, have no test by which to detect a noble
 man, no amalgam to combine with his pure gold. They mix their own dross
 with it.
 
 It is a relief to turn from these slanders to the testimony of his more
 truthful, but frightened jailers and hangmen. Governor Wise speaks
 far more justly and appreciatingly of him than any Northern editor, or
 politician, or public personage, that I chance to have heard from. I
 know that you can afford to hear him again on this subject. He says:
 "They are themselves mistaken who take him to be madman.... He is cool,
 collected, and indomitable, and it is but just to him to say, that he
 was humane to his prisoners.... And he inspired me with great trust in
 his integrity as a man of truth. He is a fanatic, vain and garrulous,"
 (I leave that part to Mr. Wise,) "but firm, truthful, and intelligent.
 His men, too, who survive, are like him.... Colonel Washington says that
 he was the coolest and firmest man he ever saw in defying danger and
 death. With one son dead by his side, and another shot through, he felt
 the pulse of his dying son with one hand, and held his rifle with the
 other, and commanded his men with the utmost composure, encouraging them
 to be firm, and to sell their lives as dear as they could. Of the three
 white prisoners, Brown, Stephens, and Coppic, it was hard to say which
 was most firm."
 
 Almost the first Northern men whom the slaveholder has learned to
 respect!
 
 The testimony of Mr. Vallandigham, though less valuable, is of the
 same purport, that "it is vain to underrate either the man or his
 conspiracy.... He is the farthest possible removed from the ordinary
 ruffian, fanatic, or madman."
 
 "All is quiet at Harper's Ferry," say the journals. What is the
 character of that calm which follows when the law and the slaveholder
 prevail? I regard this event as a touchstone designed to bring out, with
 glaring distinctness, the character of this government. We needed to
 be thus assisted to see it by the light of history. It needed to
 see itself. When a government puts forth its strength on the side of
 injustice, as ours to maintain slavery and kill the liberators of the
 slave, it reveals itself a merely brute force, or worse, a demoniacal
 force. It is the head of the Plug-Uglies. It is more manifest than ever
 that tyranny rules. I see this government to be effectually allied with
 France and Austria in oppressing mankind. There sits a tyrant holding
 fettered four millions of slaves; here comes their heroic liberator.
 This most hypocritical and diabolical government looks up from its
 seat on the gasping four millions, and inquires with an assumption of
 innocence: "What do you assault me for? Am I not an honest man? Cease
 agitation on this subject, or I will make a slave of you, too, or else
 hang you."
 
 We talk about a representative government; but what a monster of a
 government is that where the noblest faculties of the mind, and the
 whole heart, are not represented. A semi-human tiger or ox, stalking
 over the earth, with its heart taken out and the top of its brain shot
 away. Heroes have fought well on their stumps when their legs were shot
 off, but I never heard of any good done by such a government as that.
 
 The only government that I recognize,--and it matters not how few are at
 the head of it, or how small its army,--is that power that establishes
 justice in the land, never that which establishes injustice. What shall
 we think of a government to which all the truly brave and just men in
 the land are enemies, standing between it and those whom it oppresses? A
 government that pretends to be Christian and crucifies a million Christs
 every day!
 
 Treason! Where does such treason take its rise? I cannot help thinking
 of you as you deserve, ye governments. Can you dry up the fountains of
 thought? High treason, when it is resistance to tyranny here below,
 has its origin in, and is first committed by, the power that makes and
 forever recreates man. When you have caught and hung all these human
 rebels, you have accomplished nothing but your own guilt, for you have
 not struck at the fountain-head. You presume to contend with a foe
 against whom West Point cadets and rifled cannon point not. Can all the
 art of the cannon-founder tempt matter to turn against its maker? Is
 the form in which the founder thinks he casts it more essential than the
 constitution of it and of himself?
 
 The United States have a coffle of four millions of slaves. They are
 determined to keep them in this condition; and Massachusetts is one of
 the confederated overseers to prevent their escape. Such are not all the
 inhabitants of Massachusetts, but such are they who rule and are obeyed
 here. It was Massachusetts, as well as Virginia, that put down this
 insurrection at Harper's Ferry. She sent the marines there, and she will
 have to pay the penalty of her sin.
 
 Suppose that there is a society in this State that out of its own
 purse and magnanimity saves all the fugitive slaves that run to us, and
 protects our colored fellow-citizens, and leaves the other work to
 the government, so-called. Is not that government fast losing its
 occupation, and becoming contemptible to mankind? If private men are
 obliged to perform the offices of government, to protect the weak and
 dispense justice, then the government becomes only a hired man, or
 clerk, to perform menial or indifferent services. Of course, that is
 but the shadow of a government whose existence necessitates a Vigilant
 Committee. What should we think of the Oriental Cadi even, behind whom
 worked in secret a vigilant committee? But such is the character of our
 Northern States generally; each has its Vigilant Committee. And, to
 a certain extent, these crazy governments recognize and accept this
 relation. They say, virtually, "We'll be glad to work for you on these
 terms, only don't make a noise about it." And thus the government,
 its salary being insured, withdraws into the back shop, taking the
 Constitution with it, and bestows most of its labor on repairing that.
 When I hear it at work sometimes, as I go by, it reminds me, at best,
 of those farmers who in winter contrive to turn a penny by following
 the coopering business. And what kind of spirit is their barrel made to
 hold? They speculate in stocks, and bore holes in mountains, but they
 are not competent to lay out even a decent highway. The only free
 road, the Underground Railroad, is owned and managed by the Vigilant
 Committee. They have tunnelled under the whole breadth of the land. Such
 a government is losing its power and respectability as surely as water
 runs out of a leaky vessel, and is held by one that can contain it.
 
 I hear many condemn these men because they were so few. When were the
 good and the brave ever in a majority? Would you have had him wait till
 that time came?--till you and I came over to him? The very fact that he
 had no rabble or troop of hirelings about him would alone distinguish
 him from ordinary heroes. His company was small indeed, because few
 could be found worthy to pass muster. Each one who there laid down his
 life for the poor and oppressed was a picked man, culled out of many
 thousands, if not millions; apparently a man of principle, of rare
 courage, and devoted humanity; ready to sacrifice his life at any moment
 for the benefit of his fellow-man. It may be doubted if there were as
 many more their equals in these respects in all the country--I speak of
 his followers only--for their leader, no doubt, scoured the land far and
 wide, seeking to swell his troop. These alone were ready to step between
 the oppressor and the oppressed. Surely they were the very best men you
 could select to be hung. That was the greatest compliment which this
 country could pay them. They were ripe for her gallows. She has tried
 a long time, she has hung a good many, but never found the right one
 before.
 
 When I think of him, and his six sons, and his son-in-law, not to
 enumerate the others, enlisted for this fight, proceeding coolly,
 reverently, humanely to work, for months if not years, sleeping and
 waking upon it, summering and wintering the thought, without expecting
 any reward but a good conscience, while almost all America stood
 ranked on the other side--I say again that it affects me as a sublime
 spectacle. If he had any journal advocating 'his cause,' any organ, as
 the phrase is, monotonously and wearisomely playing the same old
 tune, and then passing round the hat, it would have been fatal to his
 efficiency. If he had acted in any way so as to be let alone by the
 government, he might have been suspected. It was the fact that the
 tyrant must give place to him, or he to the tyrant, that distinguished
 him from all the reformers of the day that I know.
 
 It was his peculiar doctrine that a man has a perfect right to interfere
 by force with the slaveholder, in order to rescue the slave. I agree
 with him. They who are continually shocked by slavery have some right to
 be shocked by the violent death of the slaveholder, but no others.
 Such will be more shocked by his life than by his death. I shall not
 be forward to think him mistaken in his method who quickest succeeds to
 liberate the slave. I speak for the slave when I say that I prefer the
 philanthropy of Captain Brown to that philanthropy which neither shoots
 me nor liberates me. At any rate, I do not think it is quite sane for
 one to spend his whole life in talking or writing about this matter,
 unless he is continuously inspired, and I have not done so. A man may
 have other affairs to attend to. I do not wish to kill nor to be killed,
 but I can foresee circumstances in which both these things would be
 by me unavoidable. We preserve the so-called peace of our community by
 deeds of petty violence every day. Look at the policeman's billy and
 handcuffs! Look at the jail! Look at the gallows! Look at the chaplain
 of the regiment! We are hoping only to live safely on the outskirts of
 this provisional army. So we defend ourselves and our hen-roosts, and
 maintain slavery. I know that the mass of my countrymen think that the
 only righteous use that can be made of Sharp's rifles and revolvers is
 to fight duels with them, when we are insulted by other nations, or to
 hunt Indians, or shoot fugitive slaves with them, or the like. I think
 that for once the Sharp's rifles and the revolvers were employed in a
 righteous cause. The tools were in the hands of one who could use them.
 
 The same indignation that is said to have cleared the temple once will
 clear it again. The question is not about the weapon, but the spirit in
 which you use it. No man has appeared in America, as yet, who loved his
 fellow-man so well, and treated him so tenderly. He lived for him. He
 took up his life and he laid it down for him. What sort of violence is
 that which is encouraged, not by soldiers, but by peaceable citizens,
 not so much by laymen as by ministers of the Gospel, not so much by the
 fighting sects as by the Quakers, and not so much by Quaker men as by
 Quaker women?
 
 This event advertises me that there is such a fact as death,--the
 possibility of a man's dying. It seems as if no man had ever died in
 America before; for in order to die you must first have lived. I don't
 believe in the hearses, and palls, and funerals that they have had.
 There was no death in the case, because there had been no life; they
 merely rotted or sloughed off, pretty much as they had rotted or
 sloughed along. No temple's veil was rent, only a hole dug somewhere.
 Let the dead bury their dead. The best of them fairly ran down like a
 clock. Franklin,--Washington,--they were let off without dying; they
 were merely missing one day. I hear a good many pretend that they are
 going to die; or that they have died, for aught that I know. Nonsense!
 I'll defy them to do it. They haven't got life enough in them. They'll
 deliquesce like fungi, and keep a hundred eulogists mopping the spot
 where they left off. Only half a dozen or so have died since the world
 began. Do you think that you are going to die, sir? No! there's no
 hope of you. You haven't got your lesson yet. You've got to stay after
 school. We make a needless ado about capital punishment,--taking lives,
 when there is no life to take. Memento mori! We don't understand that
 sublime sentence which some worthy got sculptured on his gravestone
 once. We've interpreted it in a grovelling and snivelling sense; we've
 wholly forgotten how to die.
 
 But be sure you do die nevertheless. Do your work, and finish it. If you
 know how to begin, you will know when to end.
 
 These men, in teaching us how to die, have at the same time taught us
 how to live. If this man's acts and words do not create a revival, it
 will be the severest possible satire on the acts and words that do. It
 is the best news that America has ever heard. It has already quickened
 the feeble pulse of the North, and infused more and more generous blood
 into her veins and heart, than any number of years of what is called
 commercial and political prosperity could. How many a man who was lately
 contemplating suicide has now something to live for!
 
 One writer says that Brown's peculiar monomania made him to be "dreaded
 by the Missourians as a supernatural being." Sure enough, a hero in
 the midst of us cowards is always so dreaded. He is just that thing. He
 shows himself superior to nature. He has a spark of divinity in him.
 
                 "Unless above himself he can
     Erect himself, how poor a thing is man!"
 
 Newspaper editors argue also that it is a proof of his insanity that he
 thought he was appointed to do this work which he did,--that he did not
 suspect himself for a moment! They talk as if it were impossible that a
 man could be "divinely appointed" in these days to do any work whatever;
 as if vows and religion were out of date as connected with any man's
 daily work; as if the agent to abolish slavery could only be somebody
 appointed by the President, or by some political party. They talk as if
 a man's death were a failure, and his continued life, be it of whatever
 character, were a success.
 
 When I reflect to what a cause this man devoted himself, and how
 religiously, and then reflect to what cause his judges and all who
 condemn him so angrily and fluently devote themselves, I see that they
 are as far apart as the heavens and earth are asunder.
 
 The amount of it is, our "leading men" are a harmless kind of folk, and
 they know well enough that they were not divinely appointed, but elected
 by the votes of their party.
 
 Who is it whose safety requires that Captain Brown be hung? Is it
 indispensable to any Northern man? Is there no resource but to cast
 this man also to the Minotaur? If you do not wish it, say so distinctly.
 While these things are being done, beauty stands veiled and music is a
 screeching lie. Think of him,--of his rare qualities!--such a man as
 it takes ages to make, and ages to understand; no mock hero, nor the
 representative of any party. A man such as the sun may not rise upon
 again in this benighted land. To whose making went the costliest
 material, the finest adamant; sent to be the redeemer of those in
 captivity; and the only use to which you can put him is to hang him
 at the end of a rope! You who pretend to care for Christ crucified,
 consider what you are about to do to him who offered himself to be the
 savior of four millions of men.
 
 Any man knows when he is justified, and all the wits in the world cannot
 enlighten him on that point. The murderer always knows that he is justly
 punished; but when a government takes the life of a man without the
 consent of his conscience, it is an audacious government, and is
 taking a step towards its own dissolution. Is it not possible that an
 individual may be right and a government wrong? Are laws to be enforced
 simply because they were made? or declared by any number of men to be
 good, if they are not good? Is there any necessity for a man's being a
 tool to perform a deed of which his better nature disapproves? Is it the
 intention of law-makers that good men shall be hung ever? Are judges
 to interpret the law according to the letter, and not the spirit? What
 right have you to enter into a compact with yourself that you will do
 thus or so, against the light within you? Is it for you to make up your
 mind,--to form any resolution whatever,--and not accept the convictions
 that are forced upon you, and which ever pass your understanding? I do
 not believe in lawyers, in that mode of attacking or defending a man,
 because you descend to meet the judge on his own ground, and, in cases
 of the highest importance, it is of no consequence whether a man breaks
 a human law or not. Let lawyers decide trivial cases. Business men may
 arrange that among themselves. If they were the interpreters of the
 everlasting laws which rightfully bind man, that would be another thing.
 A counterfeiting law-factory, standing half in a slave land and half in
 free! What kind of laws for free men can you expect from that?
 
 I am here to plead his cause with you. I plead not for his life, but for
 his character,--his immortal life; and so it becomes your cause wholly,
 and is not his in the least. Some eighteen hundred years ago Christ was
 crucified; this morning, perchance, Captain Brown was hung. These are
 the two ends of a chain which is not without its links. He is not Old
 Brown any longer; he is an angel of light.
 
 I see now that it was necessary that the bravest and humanest man in
 all the country should be hung. Perhaps he saw it himself. I almost fear
 that I may yet hear of his deliverance, doubting if a prolonged life, if
 any life, can do as much good as his death.
 
 "Misguided"! "Garrulous"! "Insane"! "Vindictive"! So ye write in your
 easy-chairs, and thus he wounded responds from the floor of the Armory,
 clear as a cloudless sky, true as the voice of nature is: "No man sent
 me here; it was my own prompting and that of my Maker. I acknowledge no
 master in human form."
 
 And in what a sweet and noble strain he proceeds, addressing his
 captors, who stand over him: "I think, my friends, you are guilty of a
 great wrong against God and humanity, and it would be perfectly right
 for any one to interfere with you so far as to free those you willfully
 and wickedly hold in bondage."
 
 And, referring to his movement: "It is, in my opinion, the greatest
 service a man can render to God."
 
 "I pity the poor in bondage that have none to help them; that is why I
 am here; not to gratify any personal animosity, revenge, or vindictive
 spirit. It is my sympathy with the oppressed and the wronged, that are
 as good as you, and as precious in the sight of God."
 
 You don't know your testament when you see it.
 
 "I want you to understand that I respect the rights of the poorest and
 weakest of colored people, oppressed by the slave power, just as much as
 I do those of the most wealthy and powerful."
 
 "I wish to say, furthermore, that you had better, all you people at the
 South, prepare yourselves for a settlement of that question, that must
 come up for settlement sooner than you are prepared for it. The sooner
 you are prepared the better. You may dispose of me very easily. I am
 nearly disposed of now; but this question is still to be settled,--this
 negro question, I mean; the end of that is not yet."
 
 I foresee the time when the painter will paint that scene, no longer
 going to Rome for a subject; the poet will sing it; the historian
 record it; and, with the Landing of the Pilgrims and the Declaration of
 Independence, it will be the ornament of some future national gallery,
 when at least the present form of slavery shall be no more here. We
 shall then be at liberty to weep for Captain Brown. Then, and not till
 then, we will take our revenge.
 
 
 
 
 
 End of the Project Gutenberg EBook of A Plea for Captain John Brown, by

 
 
 
 Produced by Bryan Ness and the Online Distributed
 Proofreading Team at http://www.pgdp.net (This file was
 produced from images generously made available by The
 Internet Archive/Canadian Libraries)
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 TRANSCRIBER'S NOTE
 
     Obvious typographical errors have been corrected in this text.
     For a complete list, please see the bottom of this document.
 
 
 
 
 CANOEING
 IN THE
 WILDERNESS
 
 HENRY D. THOREAU
 
 By Clifton Johnson
 
 
 BATTLEGROUND ADVENTURES. Illustrated.
 A BOOK OF FAIRY-TALE FOXES. Illustrated.
 A BOOK OF FAIRY-TALE BEARS. Illustrated.
 
 HOUGHTON MIFFLIN COMPANY
 BOSTON AND NEW YORK
 
 
 
 
 CANOEING IN THE
 WILDERNESS
 
 [Illustration: _The Indian Guide's Evening Prayer_ (_page 59_)]
 
 
 
 
 CANOEING IN THE
 WILDERNESS
 
 BY HENRY D. THOREAU
 
 EDITED BY
 CLIFTON JOHNSON
 
 ILLUSTRATED BY
 WILL HAMMELL
 
 BOSTON AND NEW YORK
 HOUGHTON MIFFLIN COMPANY
 The Riverside Press Cambridge
 1916
 
 COPYRIGHT, 1906, BY HOUGHTON, MIFFLIN & CO.
 COPYRIGHT, 1916, BY HOUGHTON MIFFLIN COMPANY
 
 ALL RIGHTS RESERVED
 
 _Published April 1916_
 
 
 
 
 ILLUSTRATIONS
 
 
 THE INDIAN GUIDE'S EVENING PRAYER        _Frontispiece_
 
 THE STAGE ON THE ROAD TO MOOSEHEAD LAKE               8
 
 MAKING A CAMP IN THE STREAMSIDE WOODLAND             52
 
 FISHING                                              72
 
 THE RED SQUIRREL                                     78
 
 COMING DOWN THE RAPIDS                              132
 
 SHOOTING THE MOOSE                                  154
 
 CARRYING ROUND THE FALLS                            180
 
 
 
 
 INTRODUCTION
 
 
 Thoreau was born at Concord, Massachusetts, July 12, 1817, and at the
 time he made this wilderness canoe trip he was forty years old. The
 record of the journey is the latter half of his _The Maine Woods_, which
 is perhaps the finest idyl of the forest ever written. It is
 particularly charming in its blending of meditative and poetic fancies
 with the minute description of the voyager's experiences.
 
 The chief attraction that inspired Thoreau to make the trip was the
 primitiveness of the region. Here was a vast tract of almost virgin
 woodland, peopled only with a few loggers and pioneer farmers, Indians,
 and wild animals. No one could have been better fitted than Thoreau to
 enjoy such a region and to transmit his enjoyment of it to others. For
 though he was a person of culture and refinement, with a college
 education, and had for an intimate friend so rare a man as Ralph Waldo
 Emerson, he was half wild in many of his tastes and impatient of the
 restraints and artificiality of the ordinary social life of the towns
 and cities.
 
 He liked especially the companionship of men who were in close contact
 with nature, and in this book we find him deeply interested in his
 Indian guide and lingering fondly over the man's characteristics and
 casual remarks. The Indian retained many of his aboriginal instincts and
 ways, though his tribe was in most respects civilized. His home was in
 an Indian village on an island in the Penobscot River at Oldtown, a few
 miles above Bangor.
 
 Thoreau was one of the world's greatest nature writers, and as the years
 pass, his fame steadily increases. He was a careful and accurate
 observer, more at home in the fields and woods than in village and town,
 and with a gift of piquant originality in recording his impressions. The
 play of his imagination is keen and nimble, yet his fancy is so well
 balanced by his native common sense that it does not run away with him.
 There is never any doubt about his genuineness, or that what he states
 is free from bias and romantic exaggeration.
 
 It is to be noted that he was no hunter. His inquisitiveness into the
 ways of the wild creatures carried with it no desire to shoot them, and
 to his mind the killing of game for mere sport was akin to butchery. The
 kindly and sympathetic spirit constantly manifest in his pages is very
 attractive, and the fellowship one gains with him through his written
 words is both delightful and wholesome. He stimulates not only a love
 for nature, but a love for simple ways of living, and for all that is
 sincere and unaffected in human life, wherever found.
 
 In the present volume various details and digressions that are not of
 interest to most readers have been omitted, but except for such
 elimination Thoreau's text has been retained throughout. It is believed
 that nothing essential has been sacrificed, and that the narrative in
 this form will be found lively, informing, and thoroughly enjoyable.
 
 CLIFTON JOHNSON.
 
 HADLEY, MASSACHUSETTS.
 
 
 
 
 CANOEING IN THE
 WILDERNESS
 
 
 
 
 CANOEING IN THE WILDERNESS
 
 
 
 
 I
 
 MONDAY, TUESDAY, WEDNESDAY, THURSDAY JULY 20-23, 1857
 
 
 I started on my third excursion to the Maine woods Monday, July 20,
 1857, with one companion, arriving at Bangor the next day at noon. The
 succeeding morning, a relative of mine who is well acquainted with the
 Penobscot Indians took me in his wagon to Oldtown to assist me in
 obtaining an Indian for this expedition. We were ferried across to the
 Indian Island in a bateau. The ferryman's boy had the key to it, but the
 father, who was a blacksmith, after a little hesitation, cut the chain
 with a cold chisel on the rock. He told me that the Indians were nearly
 all gone to the seaboard and to Massachusetts, partly on account of the
 smallpox, of which they are very much afraid, having broken out in
 Oldtown. The old chief Neptune, however, was there still.
 
 The first man we saw on the island was an Indian named Joseph Polis,
 whom my relative addressed familiarly as "Joe." He was dressing a
 deerskin in his yard. The skin was spread over a slanting log, and he
 was scraping it with a stick held by both hands. He was stoutly built,
 perhaps a little above the middle height, with a broad face, and, as
 others said, perfect Indian features and complexion. His house was a
 two-story white one with blinds, the best-looking that I noticed there,
 and as good as an average one on a New England village street. It was
 surrounded by a garden and fruit trees, single cornstalks standing
 thinly amid the beans. We asked him if he knew any good Indian who would
 like to go into the woods with us, that is, to the Allegash Lakes by way
 of Moosehead, and return by the East Branch of the Penobscot.
 
 To which he answered out of that strange remoteness in which the Indian
 ever dwells to the white man, "Me like to go myself; me want to get some
 moose"; and kept on scraping the skin.
 
 The ferryman had told us that all the best Indians were gone except
 Polis, who was one of the aristocracy. He, to be sure, would be the best
 man we could have, but if he went at all would want a great price. Polis
 asked at first two dollars a day but agreed to go for a dollar and a
 half, and fifty cents a week for his canoe. He would come to Bangor with
 his canoe by the seven o'clock train that evening--we might depend on
 him. We thought ourselves lucky to secure the services of this man, who
 was known to be particularly steady and trustworthy.
 
 I spent the afternoon with my companion, who had remained in Bangor, in
 preparing for our expedition, purchasing provisions, hard-bread,[1]
 pork, coffee, sugar, etc., and some india-rubber clothing.
 
 At evening the Indian arrived in the cars, and I led the way, while he
 followed me, three quarters of a mile to my friend's house, with the
 canoe on his head. I did not know the exact route, but steered by the
 lay of the land, as I do in Boston. I tried to enter into conversation
 with him, but as he was puffing under the weight of his canoe, not
 having the usual apparatus for carrying it, but, above all, as he was an
 Indian, I might as well have been thumping on the bottom of his birch
 the while. In answer to the various observations that I made he only
 grunted vaguely from beneath his canoe once or twice, so that I knew he
 was there.
 
 Early the next morning the stage called for us. My companion and I had
 each a large knapsack as full as it would hold, and we had two large
 rubber bags which held our provisions and utensils. As for the Indian,
 all the baggage he had, beside his axe and gun, was a blanket, which he
 brought loose in his hand. However, he had laid in a store of tobacco
 and a new pipe for the excursion. The canoe was securely lashed
 diagonally across the top of the stage, with bits of carpet tucked under
 the edge to prevent its chafing. The driver appeared as much accustomed
 to carrying canoes in this way as bandboxes.
 
 At the Bangor House we took in four men bound on a hunting excursion,
 one of the men going as cook. They had a dog, a middling-sized brindled
 cur, which ran by the side of the stage, his master showing his head and
 whistling from time to time. But after we had gone about three miles the
 dog was suddenly missing, and two of the party went back for him, while
 the stage, which was full of passengers, waited. At length one man came
 back, while the other kept on. This whole party of hunters declared
 their intention to stop till the dog was found, but the very obliging
 driver was ready to wait a spell longer. He was evidently unwilling to
 lose so many passengers, who would have taken a private conveyance, or
 perhaps the other line of stages, the next day. Such progress did we
 make, with a journey of over sixty miles to be accomplished that day,
 and a rainstorm just setting in. We discussed the subject of dogs and
 their instincts till it was threadbare, while we waited there, and the
 scenery of the suburbs of Bangor is still distinctly impressed on my
 memory.
 
 [Illustration: _The Stage on the Road to Moosehead Lake_]
 
 After full half an hour the man returned, leading the dog by a rope. He
 had overtaken him just as he was entering the Bangor House. He was then
 tied on the top of the stage, but, being wet and cold, several times in
 the course of the journey he jumped off, and I saw him dangling by his
 neck. This dog was depended on to stop bears. He had already stopped one
 somewhere in New Hampshire, and I can testify that he stopped a stage in
 Maine. This party of four probably paid nothing for the dog's ride,
 nor for his run, while our party of three paid two dollars--and were
 charged four--for the light canoe which lay still on the top.
 
 The stage was crowded all the way. If you had looked inside you would
 have thought that we were prepared to run the gantlet of a band of
 robbers, for there were four or five guns on the front seat and one or
 two on the back one, each man holding his darling in his arms. It
 appeared that this party of hunters was going our way, but much farther.
 Their leader was a handsome man about thirty years old, of good height,
 but not apparently robust, of gentlemanly address and faultless toilet.
 He had a fair white complexion as if he had always lived in the shade,
 and an intellectual face, and with his quiet manners might have passed
 for a divinity student who had seen something of the world. I was
 surprised to find that he was probably the chief white hunter of Maine
 and was known all along the road. I afterwards heard him spoken of as
 one who could endure a great deal of exposure and fatigue without
 showing the effect of it; and he could not only use guns, but make them,
 being himself a gunsmith. In the spring he had saved a stage-driver and
 two passengers from drowning in the backwater of the Piscataquis on this
 road, having swum ashore in the freezing water and made a raft and got
 them off--though the horses were drowned--at great risk to himself,
 while the only other man who could swim withdrew to the nearest house to
 prevent freezing. He knew our man, and remarked that we had a good
 Indian there, a good hunter; adding that he was said to be worth six
 thousand dollars. The Indian also knew him, and said to me, "The great
 hunter."
 
 The Indian sat on the front seat with a stolid expression of face as if
 barely awake to what was going on. Again I was struck by the peculiar
 vagueness of his replies when addressed in the stage or at the taverns.
 He really never said anything on such occasions. He was merely stirred
 up like a wild beast, and passively muttered some insignificant
 response. His answer, in such cases, was vague as a puff of smoke,
 suggesting no _responsibility_, and if you considered it you would find
 that you had got nothing out of him. This was instead of the
 conventional palaver and smartness of the white man, and equally
 profitable. Most get no more than this out of the Indian, and pronounce
 him stolid accordingly. I was surprised to see what a foolish and
 impertinent style a Maine man, a passenger, used in addressing him, as
 if he were a child, which only made his eyes glisten a little. A tipsy
 Canadian asked him at a tavern, in a drawling tone, if he smoked, to
 which he answered with an indefinite "Yes."
 
 "Won't you lend me your pipe a little while?" asked the other.
 
 He replied, looking straight by the man's head, with a face singularly
 vacant to all neighboring interests, "Me got no pipe"; yet I had seen
 him put a new one, with a supply of tobacco, into his pocket that
 morning.
 
 Our little canoe, so neat and strong, drew a favorable criticism from
 all the wiseacres among the tavern loungers along the road. By the
 roadside, close to the wheels, I noticed a splendid great purple fringed
 orchis which I would fain have stopped the stage to pluck, but as this
 had never been known to stop a bear, like the cur on the stage, the
 driver would probably have thought it a waste of time.
 
 When we reached the lake, about half past eight in the evening, it was
 still steadily raining, and in that fresh, cool atmosphere the hylas
 were peeping and the toads ringing about the lake. It was as if the
 season had revolved backward two or three months, or I had arrived at
 the abode of perpetual spring.
 
 We had expected to go upon the lake at once, and, after paddling up two
 or three miles, to camp on one of its islands, but on account of the
 rain we decided to go to one of the taverns for the night.
 
 FOOTNOTES:
 
 [1] Hard-bread or ship-bread is a kind of hard biscuit commonly baked in
 large cakes and much used by sailors and soldiers.
 
 
 
 
 II
 
 FRIDAY, JULY 24.
 
 
 About four o'clock the next morning, though it was quite cloudy,
 accompanied by the landlord to the water's edge, in the twilight, we
 launched our canoe from a rock on Moosehead Lake. We had a rather small
 canoe for three persons, eighteen and one fourth feet long by two feet
 six and one half inches wide in the middle, and one foot deep within. I
 judged that it would weigh not far from eighty pounds. The Indian had
 recently made it himself, and its smallness was partly compensated for
 by its newness, as well as stanchness and solidity, it being made of
 very thick bark and ribs. Our baggage weighed about one hundred and
 sixty-six pounds. The principal part of the baggage was, as usual,
 placed in the middle of the broadest part, while we stowed ourselves in
 the chinks and crannies that were left before and behind it, where there
 was no room to extend our legs, the loose articles being tucked into the
 ends. The canoe was thus as closely packed as a market basket. The
 Indian sat on a crossbar in the stern, but we flat on the bottom with a
 splint or chip behind our backs to protect them from the crossbar, and
 one of us commonly paddled with the Indian.
 
 Paddling along the eastern side of the lake in the still of the morning,
 we soon saw a few sheldrakes, which the Indian called _Shecorways_, and
 some peetweets on the rocky shore. We also saw and heard loons. It was
 inspiriting to hear the regular dip of the paddles, as if they were our
 fins or flippers, and to realize that we were at length fairly embarked.
 
 Having passed the small rocky isles within two or three miles of the
 foot of the lake, we had a short consultation respecting our course, and
 inclined to the western shore for the sake of its lee; for otherwise,
 if the wind should rise, it would be impossible for us to reach Mount
 Kineo, which is about midway up the lake on the east side, but at its
 narrowest part, where probably we could recross if we took the western
 side. The wind is the chief obstacle to crossing the lakes, especially
 in so small a canoe. The Indian remarked several times that he did not
 like to cross the lakes "in littlum canoe," but nevertheless, "just as
 we say, it made no odds to him."
 
 Moosehead Lake is twelve miles wide at the widest place, and thirty
 miles long in a direct line, but longer as it lies. Paddling near the
 shore, we frequently heard the _pe-pe_ of the olive-sided flycatcher,
 also the wood pewee and the kingfisher. The Indian reminding us that he
 could not work without eating, we stopped to breakfast on the main shore
 southwest of Deer Island. We took out our bags, and the Indian made a
 fire under a very large bleached log, using white pine bark from a
 stump, though he said that hemlock was better, and kindling with canoe
 birch bark. Our table was a large piece of freshly peeled birch bark,
 laid wrong side up, and our breakfast consisted of hard-bread, fried
 pork, and strong coffee well sweetened, in which we did not miss the
 milk.
 
 While we were getting breakfast a brood of twelve black dippers,[2] half
 grown, came paddling by within three or four rods, not at all alarmed;
 and they loitered about as long as we stayed, now huddled close
 together, now moving off in a long line, very cunningly.
 
 Looking northward from this place it appeared as if we were entering a
 large bay, and we did not know whether we should be obliged to diverge
 from our course and keep outside a point which we saw, or should find a
 passage between this and the mainland. It was misty dog-day weather, and
 we had already penetrated a smaller bay of the same kind, and knocked
 the bottom out of it, though we had been obliged to pass over a bar
 between an island and the shore, where there was but just breadth and
 depth enough to float the canoe, and the Indian had observed, "Very easy
 makum bridge here," but now it seemed that if we held on we should be
 fairly embayed. Presently, however, the mist lifted somewhat and
 revealed a break in the shore northward. The Indian immediately
 remarked, "I guess you and I go there."
 
 This was his common expression instead of saying "we." He never
 addressed us by our names, though curious to know how they were spelled
 and what they meant. We called him Polis. He had already guessed very
 accurately at our ages, and said that he was forty-eight.
 
 After breakfast I emptied the melted pork that was left into the lake,
 making what the sailors call a "slick," and watching to see how much it
 spread over and smoothed the agitated surface. The Indian looked at it
 a moment and said, "That make hard paddlum through; hold 'em canoe. So
 say old times."
 
 We hastily reloaded, putting the dishes loose in the bows, that they
 might be at hand when wanted, and set out again. The western shore, near
 which we paddled along, rose gently to a considerable height and was
 everywhere densely covered with the forest, in which was a large
 proportion of hard wood to enliven and relieve the fir and spruce.
 
 The Indian said that the lichen which we saw hanging from the trees was
 called _chorchorque_. We asked him the names of several birds which we
 heard this morning. The thrush, which was quite common, and whose note
 he imitated, he said was called _Adelungquamooktum_; but sometimes he
 could not tell the name of some small bird which I heard and knew, but
 he said, "I tell all the birds about here; can't tell littlum noise, but
 I see 'em, then I can tell."
 
 I observed that I should like to go to school to him to learn his
 language, living on the Indian island the while; could not that be done?
 
 "Oh, yer," he replied, "good many do so."
 
 I asked how long he thought it would take. He said one week. I told him
 that in this voyage I would tell him all I knew, and he should tell me
 all he knew, to which he readily agreed.
 
 Mount Kineo, which was generally visible, though occasionally concealed
 by islands or the mainland in front, had a level bar of cloud concealing
 its summit, and all the mountain-tops about the lake were cut off at the
 same height. Ducks of various kinds were quite common, and ran over the
 water before us as fast as a horse trots.
 
 The Indian asked the meaning of _reality_, as near as I could make out
 the word, which he said one of us had used; also of _interrent_, that
 is, intelligent. I observed that he could rarely sound the letter r,
 but used l, as also r for l sometimes; as _load_ for road, _pickelel_
 for pickerel, _Soogle_ Island for Sugar Island. He generally added the
 syllable _um_ to his words, as _paddlum_, etc.
 
 On a point on the mainland where we landed to stretch our legs and look
 at the vegetation, going inland a few steps, I discovered a fire still
 glowing beneath its ashes, where somebody had breakfasted, and a bed of
 twigs prepared for the following night. So I knew not only that they had
 just left, but that they designed to return, and by the breadth of the
 bed that there was more than one in the party. You might have gone
 within six feet of these signs without seeing them. There grew the
 beaked hazel, rue seven feet high, and red osier, whose bark the Indian
 said was good to smoke, "tobacco before white people came to this
 country, Indian tobacco."
 
 The Indian was always very careful in approaching the shore, lest he
 should injure his canoe on the rocks, letting it swing round slowly
 sidewise, and was still more particular that we should not step into it
 on shore, nor till it floated free, and then should step gently lest we
 should open its seams, or make a hole in the bottom.
 
 After passing Deer Island we saw the little steamer from Greenville, far
 east in the middle of the lake. Sometimes we could hardly tell her from
 an island which had a few trees on it. Here we were exposed to the wind
 from over the whole breadth of the lake, and ran a little risk of being
 swamped. While I had my eye fixed on the spot where a large fish had
 leaped, we took in a gallon or two of water; but we soon reached the
 shore and took the canoe over the bar at Sand-bar Island, a few feet
 wide only, and so saved a considerable distance.
 
 We crossed a broad bay and found the water quite rough. A very little
 wind on these broad lakes raises a sea which will swamp a canoe. Looking
 off from the shore, the surface may appear to be almost smooth a mile
 distant, or if you see a few white crests they appear nearly level with
 the rest of the lake, but when you get out so far, you may find quite a
 sea running, and ere long, before you think of it, a wave will gently
 creep up the side of the canoe and fill your lap, like a monster
 deliberately covering you with its slime before it swallows you, or it
 will strike the canoe violently and break into it. The same thing may
 happen when the wind rises suddenly, though it were perfectly calm and
 smooth there a few minutes before; so that nothing can save you, unless
 you can swim ashore, for it is impossible to get into a canoe when it is
 upset. Since you sit flat on the bottom, though the danger should not be
 imminent, a little water is a great inconvenience, not to mention the
 wetting of your provisions. We rarely crossed even a bay directly, from
 point to point, when there was wind, but made a slight curve
 corresponding somewhat to the shore, that we might the sooner reach it
 if the wind increased.
 
 When the wind is aft, and not too strong, the Indian makes a spritsail
 of his blanket. He thus easily skims over the whole length of this lake
 in a day.
 
 The Indian paddled on one side, and one of us on the other, to keep the
 canoe steady, and when he wanted to change hands he would say, "T' other
 side." He asserted, in answer to our questions, that he had never upset
 a canoe himself, though he may have been upset by others.
 
 Think of our little eggshell of a canoe tossing across that great lake,
 a mere black speck to the eagle soaring above it!
 
 My companion trailed for trout as we paddled along, but, the Indian
 warning him that a big fish might upset us, for there are some very
 large ones there, he agreed to pass the line quickly to the stern if he
 had a bite.
 
 While we were crossing this bay, where Mount Kineo rose dark before us
 within two or three miles, the Indian repeated the tradition respecting
 this mountain's having anciently been a cow moose--how a mighty Indian
 hunter succeeded in killing this queen of the moose tribe with great
 difficulty, while her calf was killed somewhere among the islands in
 Penobscot Bay, and, to his eyes, this mountain had still the form of the
 moose in a reclining posture. He told this at some length and with
 apparent good faith, and asked us how we supposed the hunter could have
 killed such a mighty moose as that. An Indian tells such a story as if
 he thought it deserved to have a good deal said about it, only he has
 not got it to say, and so he makes up for the deficiency by a drawling
 tone, long-windedness, and a dumb wonder which he hopes will be
 contagious.
 
 We approached the land again through pretty rough water, and then
 steered directly across the lake at its narrowest part to the eastern
 side, and were soon partly under the lee of the mountain, having
 paddled about twenty miles. It was now about noon.
 
 We designed to stop there that afternoon and night, and spent half an
 hour looking along the shore northward for a suitable place to camp. At
 length, by going half a dozen rods into the dense spruce and fir wood on
 the side of the mountain almost as dark as a cellar, we found a place
 sufficiently clear and level to lie down on, after cutting away a few
 bushes. The Indian cleared a path to it from the shore with his axe, and
 we then carried up all our baggage, pitched our tent, and made our bed,
 in order to be ready for foul weather, which then threatened us, and for
 the night. He gathered a large armful of fir twigs, breaking them off,
 which he said were the best for our bed, partly, I thought, because they
 were the largest and could be most rapidly collected. It had been
 raining more or less for four or five days, and the wood was even damper
 than usual, but he got dry bark from the under side of a dead leaning
 hemlock, which he said he could always do.
 
 This noon his mind was occupied with a law question, and I referred him
 to my companion, who was a lawyer. It appeared that he had been buying
 land lately--I think it was a hundred acres--but there was probably an
 incumbrance to it, somebody else claiming to have bought some grass on
 it for this year. He wished to know to whom the grass belonged, and was
 told that if the other man could prove that he bought the grass before
 he, Polis, bought the land, the former could take it whether the latter
 knew it or not. To which he only answered, "Strange!" He went over this
 several times, fairly sat down to it, with his back to a tree, as if he
 meant to confine us to this topic henceforth; but as he made no headway,
 only reached the jumping-off place of his wonder at white men's
 institutions after each explanation, we let the subject die.
 
 He said that he had fifty acres of grass, potatoes, etc., somewhere
 above Oldtown, besides some about his house; that he hired a good deal
 of his work, hoeing, etc., and preferred white men to Indians because
 "they keep steady and know how."
 
 After dinner we returned southward along the shore, in the canoe, on
 account of the difficulty of climbing over the rocks and fallen trees,
 and began to ascend the mountain along the edge of the precipice. But, a
 smart shower coming up just then, the Indian crept under his canoe,
 while we, protected by our rubber coats, proceeded to botanize. So we
 sent him back to the camp for shelter, agreeing that he should come for
 us with his canoe toward night. It had rained a little in the forenoon,
 and we trusted that this would be the clearing-up shower, which it
 proved; but our feet and legs were thoroughly wet by the bushes. The
 clouds breaking away a little, we had a glorious wild view, as we
 ascended, of the broad lake with its numerous forest-clad islands
 extending beyond our sight both north and south, and the boundless
 forest undulating away from its shores on every side, as densely packed
 as a rye-field and enveloping nameless mountains in succession. It was a
 perfect lake of the woods.
 
 Looking southward, the heavens were completely overcast, the mountains
 capped with clouds, and the lake generally wore a dark and stormy
 appearance, but from its surface six or eight miles distant there was
 reflected upward through the misty air a bright blue tinge from the
 unseen sky of another latitude beyond. They probably had a clear sky
 then at the south end of the lake.
 
 Again we mistook a little rocky islet seen through the "drisk," with
 some taller bare trunks or stumps on it, for the steamer with its
 smoke-pipes, but as it had not changed its position after half an hour
 we were undeceived. So much do the works of man resemble the works of
 nature. A moose might mistake a steamer for a floating isle, and not be
 scared till he heard its puffing or its whistle.
 
 If I wished to see a mountain or other scenery under the most favorable
 auspices, I would go to it in foul weather so as to be there when it
 cleared up. We are then in the most suitable mood, and nature is most
 fresh and inspiring. There is no serenity so fair as that which is just
 established in a tearful eye.
 
 Jackson, in his "Report on the Geology of Maine," says: "Hornstone,
 which will answer for flints, occurs in various parts of the State. The
 largest mass of this stone known in the world is Mount Kineo, upon
 Moosehead Lake, which appears to be entirely composed of it, and rises
 seven hundred feet above the lake level. This variety of hornstone I
 have seen in every part of New England in the form of Indian
 arrow-heads, hatchets, chisels, etc., which were probably obtained from
 this mountain by the aboriginal inhabitants of the country."
 
 I have myself found hundreds of arrow-heads made of the same material.
 It is generally slate-colored, with white specks, becoming a uniform
 white where exposed to the light and air. I picked up a small thin piece
 which had so sharp an edge that I used it as a knife, and, to see what I
 could do, fairly cut off an aspen one inch thick with it, by bending it
 and making many cuts; though I cut my fingers badly with the back of it
 in the meanwhile.
 
 From the summit of the precipice which forms the southern and eastern
 sides of this mountain peninsula, five or six hundred feet high, we
 probably might have jumped down to the water, or to the seemingly
 dwarfish trees on the narrow neck of land which connects it with the
 main. It is a dangerous place to try the steadiness of your nerves.
 
 The plants which attracted our attention on this mountain were the
 mountain cinquefoil, abundant and in bloom still at the very base by
 the waterside, very beautiful harebells overhanging the precipice,
 bearberry, the Canada blueberry, wild holly, the great round-leafed
 orchis, bunchberry, reddening as we ascended, green at the base of the
 mountain, red at the top, and the small fern _Woodsia ilvensis_, growing
 in tufts, now in fruit. Having explored the wonders of the mountain, and
 the weather being now cleared up, we commenced the descent. We met the
 Indian, puffing and panting, about one third of the way up, but thinking
 that he must be near the top. On reaching the canoe we found that he had
 caught a lake trout weighing about three pounds, while we were on the
 mountain.
 
 When we got to the camp, the canoe was taken out and turned over, and a
 log laid across it to prevent its being blown away. The Indian cut some
 large logs of damp and rotten wood to smoulder and keep fire through the
 night. The trout was fried for supper.
 
 Our tent was of thin cotton cloth and quite small, forming with the
 ground a triangular prism closed at the rear end, six feet long, seven
 wide, and four high, so that we could barely sit up in the middle. It
 required two forked stakes, a smooth ridgepole, and a dozen or more pins
 to pitch it. It kept off dew and wind and an ordinary rain, and answered
 our purpose well enough. We reclined within it till bedtime, each with
 his baggage at his head, or else sat about the fire, having hung our wet
 clothes on a pole before the fire for the night.
 
 As we sat there, just before night, looking out through the dusky wood,
 the Indian heard a noise which he said was made by a snake. He imitated
 it at my request, making a low whistling note--_pheet_--_pheet_--two or
 three times repeated, somewhat like the peep of the hyla, but not so
 loud. He said that he had never seen them while making it, but going to
 the spot he finds the snake. This, he said, was a sign of rain. When I
 had selected this place for our camp he had remarked that there were
 snakes there. "But they won't do any hurt," I said.
 
 "Oh, no," he answered, "just as you say; it makes no difference to me."
 
 He lay on the right side of the tent, because, as he said, he was partly
 deaf in one ear, and he wanted to lie with his good ear up. As we lay
 there he inquired if I ever heard "Indian sing." I replied that I had
 not often, and asked him if he would not favor us with a song. He
 readily assented, and, lying on his back, with his blanket wrapped
 around him, he commenced a slow, somewhat nasal, yet musical chant, in
 his own language, which probably was taught his tribe long ago by the
 Catholic missionaries. He translated it to us, sentence by sentence,
 afterward. It proved to be a very simple religious exercise or hymn, the
 burden of which was that there was only one God who ruled all the
 world.
 
 His singing carried me back to the period of the discovery of America,
 when Europeans first encountered the simple faith of the Indian. There
 was, indeed, a beautiful simplicity about it; nothing of the dark and
 savage, only the mild and infantile. The sentiments of humility and
 reverence chiefly were expressed.
 
 It was a dense and damp spruce and fir wood in which we lay, and, except
 for our fire, perfectly dark; and when I awoke in the night, I either
 heard an owl from deeper in the forest behind us, or a loon from a
 distance over the lake. Getting up some time after midnight to collect
 the scattered brands together, while my companions were sound asleep, I
 observed, partly in the fire, which had ceased to blaze, a perfectly
 regular elliptical ring of light, about five inches in its shortest
 diameter, six or seven in its longer, and from one eighth to one quarter
 of an inch wide. It was fully as bright as the fire, but not reddish or
 scarlet like a coal, but a white and slumbering light, like the
 glowworm's. I saw at once that it must be phosphorescent wood, which I
 had often heard of, but never chanced to see. Putting my finger on it,
 with a little hesitation, I found that it was a piece of dead moosewood
 which the Indian had cut off in a slanting direction the evening before.
 
 Using my knife, I discovered that the light proceeded from that portion
 of the sapwood immediately under the bark, and thus presented a regular
 ring at the end, and when I pared off the bark and cut into the sap, it
 was all aglow along the log. I was surprised to find the wood quite hard
 and apparently sound, though probably decay had commenced in the sap,
 and I cut out some little triangular chips, and, placing them in the
 hollow of my hand, carried them into the camp, waked my companion, and
 showed them to him. They lit up the inside of my hand, revealing the
 lines and wrinkles, and appearing exactly like coals of fire raised to a
 white heat.
 
 I noticed that part of a decayed stump within four or five feet of the
 fire, an inch wide and six inches long, soft and shaking wood, shone
 with equal brightness.
 
 I neglected to ascertain whether our fire had anything to do with this,
 but the previous day's rain and long-continued wet weather undoubtedly
 had.
 
 I was exceedingly interested by this phenomenon. It could hardly have
 thrilled me more if it had taken the form of letters, or of the human
 face. I little thought that there was such a light shining in the
 darkness of the wilderness for me.
 
 The next day the Indian told me their name for the
 light--_artoosoqu'_--and on my inquiring concerning the will-o'-the-wisp
 he said that his "folks" sometimes saw fires passing along at various
 heights, even as high as the trees, and making a noise. I was prepared
 after this to hear of the most startling and unimagined phenomena
 witnessed by "his folks," they are abroad at all hours and seasons in
 scenes so unfrequented by white men. Nature must have made a thousand
 revelations to them which are still secrets to us.
 
 I did not regret my not having seen this before, since I now saw it
 under circumstances so favorable. I was in just the frame of mind to see
 something wonderful, and this was a phenomenon adequate to my
 circumstances and expectation, and it put me on the alert to see more
 like it. I let science slide, and rejoiced in that light as if it had
 been a fellow creature. A scientific _explanation_, as it is called,
 would have been altogether out of place there. That is for pale
 daylight. Science with its retorts would have put me to sleep; it was
 the opportunity to be ignorant that I improved. It made a believer of me
 more than before. I believed that the woods were not tenantless, but
 choke-full of honest spirits as good as myself any day--not an empty
 chamber in which chemistry was left to work alone, but an inhabited
 house. It suggested, too, that the same experience always gives birth
 to the same sort of belief or religion. One revelation has been made to
 the Indian, another to the white man. I have much to learn of the
 Indian, nothing of the missionary. I am not sure but all that would
 tempt me to teach the Indian my religion would be his promise to teach
 me _his_. Long enough I had heard of irrelevant things; now at length I
 was glad to make acquaintance with the light that dwells in rotten wood.
 
 I kept those little chips and wet them again the next night, but they
 emitted no light.
 
 FOOTNOTES:
 
 [2] The name dipper is applied to several species of water-birds that
 are notable for their skill in diving.
 
 
 
 
 III
 
 SATURDAY, JULY 25
 
 
 At breakfast, the Indian, evidently curious to know what would be
 expected of him the next day, asked me how I spent the Sunday when at
 home. I told him that I commonly sat in my chamber reading, etc., in the
 forenoon, and went to walk in the afternoon. At which he shook his head
 and said, "Er, that is ver' bad."
 
 "How do you spend it?" I asked.
 
 He said that he did no work, that he went to church at Oldtown when he
 was at home; in short, he did as he had been taught by the whites.
 
 When we were washing the dishes in the lakes, many fishes came close up
 to us to get the particles of grease.
 
 The weather seemed to be more settled this morning, and we set out early
 in order to finish our voyage up the lake before the wind arose. Soon
 after starting, the Indian directed our attention to the Northeast
 Carry, which we could plainly see, about thirteen miles distant. This
 carry is a rude wooden railroad running north and south about two miles,
 perfectly straight, from the lake to the Penobscot through a low tract,
 with a clearing three or four rods wide. This opening appeared as a
 clear bright, or light, point in the horizon, resting on the edge of the
 lake. We should not have suspected it to be visible if the Indian had
 not drawn our attention to it. It was a remarkable kind of light to
 steer for--daylight seen through a vista in the forest--but visible as
 far as an ordinary beacon by night.
 
 We crossed a deep wide bay north of Kineo, leaving an island on our left
 and keeping up the eastern side of the lake. We then crossed another
 broad bay, which, as we could no longer observe the shore particularly,
 afforded ample time for conversation. The Indian said that he had got
 his money by hunting, mostly high up the West Branch of the Penobscot,
 and toward the head of the St. John. He had hunted there from a boy, and
 knew all about that region. His game had been beaver, otter, black cat
 (or fisher), sable, moose, etc. Canada lynx were plenty yet in burnt
 grounds. For food in the woods he uses partridges, ducks, dried moose
 meat, hedgehog, etc. Loons, too, were good, only "bile 'em good."
 
 Pointing into the bay he said that it was the way to various lakes which
 he knew. Only solemn bear-haunted mountains with their great wooded
 slopes were visible. The Indian said that he had been along there
 several times. I asked him how he guided himself in the woods.
 
 "Oh," said he, "I can tell good many ways."
 
 When I pressed him further he answered, "Sometimes I lookum sidehill,"
 and he glanced toward a high hill or mountain on the eastern shore;
 "great difference between the north and south; see where the sun has
 shone most. So trees--the large limbs bend toward south. Sometimes I
 lookum locks" (rocks).
 
 I asked what he saw on the rocks, but he did not describe anything in
 particular, answering vaguely, in a mysterious or drawling tone, "bare
 locks on lake shore--great difference between north, south, east, west
 side--can tell what the sun has shone on."
 
 "Suppose," said I, "that I should take you in a dark night right up here
 into the middle of the woods a hundred miles, set you down, and turn you
 round quickly twenty times, could you steer straight to Oldtown?"
 
 "Oh, yer," said he, "have done pretty much same thing. I will tell you.
 Some years ago I met an old white hunter at Millinocket; very good
 hunter. He said he could go anywhere in the woods. He wanted to hunt
 with me that day, so we start. We chase a moose all the forenoon, round
 and round, till middle of afternoon, when we kill him. Then I said to
 him, 'Now you go straight to camp.'
 
 "He said, 'I can't do that. I don't know where I am.'
 
 "'Where you think camp?' I asked.
 
 "He pointed so. Then I laugh at him. I take the lead and go right off
 the other way, cross our tracks many times, straight camp."
 
 "How do you do that?" asked I.
 
 "Oh, I can't tell _you_," he replied. "Great difference between me and
 white man."
 
 It appeared as if the sources of information were so various that he did
 not give a distinct conscious attention to any one, and so could not
 readily refer to any when questioned about it, but he found his way very
 much as an animal does. Perhaps what is commonly called instinct in the
 animal in this case is merely a sharpened and educated sense. Often,
 when an Indian says, "I don't know," in regard to the route he is to
 take, he does not mean what a white man would by those words, for his
 Indian instinct may tell him still as much as the most confident white
 man knows. He does not carry things in his head, nor remember the route
 exactly, like a white man, but relies on himself at the moment. Not
 having experienced the need of the other sort of knowledge--all labeled
 and arranged--he has not acquired it.
 
 The hunter with whom I talked in the stage knew some of the resources of
 the Indian. He said that he steered by the wind, or by the limbs of the
 hemlocks, which were largest on the south side; also sometimes, when he
 knew that there was a lake near, by firing his gun and listening to hear
 the direction and distance of the echo from over it.
 
 As the forenoon advanced the wind increased. The last bay which we
 crossed before reaching the desolate pier at the Northeast Carry, was
 two or three miles over, and the wind was southwesterly. After going a
 third of the way, the waves had increased so as occasionally to wash
 into the canoe, and we saw that it was worse ahead. At first we might
 have turned about, but were not willing to. It would have been of no use
 to follow the course of the shore, for the waves ran still higher there
 on account of the greater sweep the wind had. At any rate it would have
 been dangerous now to alter our course, because the waves would have
 struck us at an advantage. It will not do to meet them at right angles,
 for then they will wash in both sides, but you must take them
 quartering. So the Indian stood up in the canoe and exerted all his
 skill and strength for a mile or two, while I paddled right along in
 order to give him more steerage-way. For more than a mile he did not
 allow a single wave to strike the canoe as it would, but turned it
 quickly from this side to that, so that it would always be on or near
 the crest of a wave when it broke, where all its force was spent, and we
 merely settled down with it. At length I jumped out onto the end of the
 pier against which the waves were dashing violently, in order to lighten
 the canoe and catch it at the landing, which was not much sheltered, but
 just as I jumped we took in two or three gallons of water. I remarked to
 the Indian, "You managed that well," to which he replied: "Ver' few men
 do that. Great many waves; when I look out for one, another come quick."
 
 While the Indian went to get cedar bark, etc., to carry his canoe with,
 we cooked the dinner on the shore in the midst of a sprinkling rain. He
 prepared his canoe for carrying in this wise. He took a cedar shingle or
 splint eighteen inches long and four or five wide, rounded at one end,
 that the corners might not be in the way, and tied it with cedar bark by
 two holes made midway, near the edge on each side, to the middle
 crossbar of the canoe. When the canoe was lifted upon his head bottom
 up, this shingle, with its rounded end uppermost, distributed the weight
 over his shoulders and head, while a band of cedar bark, tied to the
 crossbar on each side of the shingle, passed round his breast, and
 another longer one, outside of the last, round his forehead; also a hand
 on each side rail served to steer the canoe and keep it from rocking. He
 thus carried it with his shoulders, head, breast, forehead, and both
 hands, as if the upper part of his body were all one hand to clasp and
 hold it. A cedar tree furnished all the gear in this case, as it had the
 woodwork of the canoe. One of the paddles rested on the crossbars in the
 bows. I took the canoe upon my head and found that I could carry it with
 ease, but I let him carry it, not caring to establish a different
 precedent. This shingle remained tied to the crossbar throughout the
 voyage, was always ready for the carries, and also served to protect the
 back of one passenger.
 
 We were obliged to go over this carry twice, our load was so great. But
 the carries were an agreeable variety, and we improved the opportunity
 to gather the rare plants which we had seen, when we returned
 empty-handed.
 
 We reached the Penobscot about four o'clock, and found there some St.
 Francis Indians encamped on the bank. They were making a canoe and
 drying moose meat. Their camp was covered with spruce bark. They had a
 young moose, taken in the river a fortnight before, confined in a sort
 of cage of logs piled up cob-fashion, seven or eight feet high. It was
 quite tame, about four feet high, and covered with moose flies. There
 was a large quantity of cornel, red maple, and also willow and aspen
 boughs, stuck through between the logs on all sides, butt ends out, and
 on their leaves it was browsing. It looked at first as if it were in a
 bower rather than a pen.
 
 Our Indian said that _he_ used _black_ spruce roots to sew canoes with,
 obtaining it from high lands or mountains. The St. Francis Indians
 thought that _white_ spruce roots might be best. But the former said,
 "No good, break, can't split 'em."
 
 I told him I thought that I could make a canoe, but he expressed great
 doubt of it; at any rate he thought that my work would not be "neat" the
 first time.
 
 Having reloaded, we paddled down the Penobscot. We saw a splendid yellow
 lily by the shore, which I plucked. It was six feet high and had twelve
 flowers, in two whorls, forming a pyramid. We afterward saw many more
 thus tall along this stream, and on the East Branch. The Indian said
 that the roots were good for soup, that is, to cook with meat, to
 thicken it, taking the place of flour. They get them in the fall. I dug
 some, and found a mass of bulbs pretty deep in the earth, two inches in
 diameter, looking, and even tasting, somewhat like raw green corn on the
 ear.
 
 When we had gone about three miles down the Penobscot, we saw through
 the tree-tops a thunder-shower coming up in the west, and we looked out
 a camping-place in good season, about five o'clock.
 
 I will describe the routine of camping. We generally told the Indian
 that we would stop at the first suitable place, so that he might be on
 the lookout for it. Having observed a clear, hard, and flat beach to
 land on, free from mud, and from stones which would injure the canoe,
 one would run up the bank to see if there were open and level space
 enough for the camp between the trees, or if it could be easily cleared,
 preferring at the same time a cool place, on account of insects.
 Sometimes we paddled a mile or more before finding one to our minds, for
 where the shore was suitable the bank would often be too steep, or else
 too low and grassy, and therefore mosquitoey. We then took out the
 baggage and drew up the canoe. The Indian cut a path to the spot we had
 selected, which was usually within two or three rods of the water, and
 we carried up our baggage.
 
 One, perhaps, takes birch bark, always at hand, and dead dry wood, and
 kindles a fire five or six feet in front of where we intend to lie. It
 matters not, commonly, on which side this is, because there is little or
 no wind in so dense a wood at that season; and then he gets a kettle of
 water from the river, and takes out the pork, bread, coffee, etc., from
 their several packages.
 
 Another, meanwhile, having the axe, cuts down the nearest dead rock
 maple or other dry hard wood, collecting several large logs to last
 through the night, also a green stake, with a notch or fork to it, which
 is slanted over the fire, perhaps resting on a rock or forked stake, to
 hang the kettle on, and two forked stakes and a pole for the tent.
 
 [Illustration: _Making a Camp in the Streamside Woodland_]
 
 The third man pitches the tent, cuts a dozen or more pins with his knife
 to fasten it down with, and then collects an armful or two of fir twigs,
 arbor-vitae, spruce, or hemlock, whichever is at hand, and makes the
 bed, beginning at either end, and laying the twigs wrong side up, in
 regular rows, covering the stub ends of the last row; first, however,
 filling the hollows, if there are any, with coarser material.
 
 Commonly, by the time the bed is made, or within fifteen or twenty
 minutes, the water boils, the pork is fried, and supper is ready. We eat
 this sitting on the ground, or a stump, around a large piece of birch
 bark for a table, each holding a dipper in one hand and a piece of
 ship-bread or fried pork in the other, frequently making a pass with his
 hand, or thrusting his head into the smoke, to avoid the mosquitoes.
 
 Next, pipes are lit by those who smoke, and veils are donned by those
 who have them, and we hastily examine and dry our plants, anoint our
 faces and hands, and go to bed.
 
 Though you have nothing to do but see the country, there's rarely any
 time to spare, hardly enough to examine a plant, before the night or
 drowsiness is upon you.
 
 Such was the ordinary experience, but this evening we had camped earlier
 on account of the rain, and had more time. We found that our camp was on
 an old indistinct supply-road, running along the river. What is called a
 road there shows no ruts or trace of wheels, for they are not used; nor,
 indeed, of runners, since they are used only in the winter when the snow
 is several feet deep. It is only an indistinct vista through the wood,
 which it takes an experienced eye to detect.
 
 We had no sooner pitched our tent than the thunder-shower burst on us,
 and we hastily crept under it, drawing our bags after us, curious to see
 how much of a shelter our thin cotton roof was going to be in this
 excursion. Though the violence of the rain forced a fine shower through
 the cloth before it was fairly wetted and shrunk, with which we were
 well bedewed, we managed to keep pretty dry, only a box of matches
 having been left out and spoiled, and before we were aware of it the
 shower was over, and only the dripping trees imprisoned us.
 
 Wishing to see what fishes were in the river there, we cast our lines
 over the wet bushes on the shore, but they were repeatedly swept down
 the swift stream in vain. So, leaving the Indian, we took the canoe,
 just before dark, and dropped down the river a few rods to fish at the
 mouth of a sluggish brook. We pushed up this a rod or two, but were soon
 driven off by the mosquitoes. While there we heard the Indian fire his
 gun twice in rapid succession. His object was to clean out and dry it
 after the rain, and he then loaded it with ball, being now on ground
 where he expected to meet with large game. This sudden loud crashing
 noise in the still aisles of the forest affected me like an insult to
 nature, or ill manners at any rate, as if you were to fire a gun in a
 hall or temple. It was not heard far, however, except along the river,
 the sound being rapidly hushed up or absorbed by the damp trees and
 mossy ground.
 
 The Indian made a little smothered fire of damp leaves close to the back
 of the camp, that the smoke might drive through and keep out the
 mosquitoes, but just before we fell asleep this suddenly blazed up and
 came near setting fire to the tent.
 
 
 
 
 IV
 
 SUNDAY, JULY 26
 
 
 The note of the white-throated sparrow was the first heard in the
 morning, and with this all the woods rang. Though commonly unseen, their
 simple _ah, te-te-te, te-te-te, te-te-te_, so sharp and piercing, was as
 distinct to the ear as the passage of a spark of fire shot into the
 darkest of the forest would be to the eye. We were commonly aroused by
 their lively strain very early. What a glorious time they must have in
 that wilderness, far from mankind!
 
 I told the Indian that we would go to church to Chesuncook this morning,
 some fifteen miles. It was settled weather at last. A few swallows
 flitted over the water, we heard Maryland yellow-throats along the
 shore, the notes of the chickadee, and, I believe, redstarts.
 Moose-flies of large size pursued us in midstream.
 
 The Indian thought that we should lie by on Sunday. Said he, "We come
 here lookum things, look all round, but come Sunday look up all that,
 and then Monday look again."
 
 He spoke of an Indian of his acquaintance who had been with some
 ministers to Katahdin and had told him how they conducted. This he
 described in a low and solemn voice. "They make a long prayer every
 morning and night, and at every meal. Come Sunday, they stop 'em, no go
 at all that day--keep still--preach all day--first one, then another,
 just like church. Oh, ver' good men. One day going along a river, they
 came to the body of a man in the water, drowned good while. They go
 right ashore--stop there, go no farther that day--they have meeting
 there, preach and pray just like Sunday. Then they go back and carry the
 body with them. Oh, they ver' good men."
 
 I judged from this account that their every camp was a camp-meeting, and
 that they wanted an opportunity to preach somewhere more than to see
 Katahdin.
 
 However, the Indian added, plying the paddle all the while, that if we
 would go along he must go with us, he our man, and he suppose that if he
 no takum pay for what he do Sunday then ther's no harm, but if he takum
 pay then wrong. I told him that he was stricter than white men.
 Nevertheless, I noticed that he did not forget to reckon in the Sundays
 at last.
 
 He appeared to be a very religious man, and said his prayers in a loud
 voice, in Indian, kneeling before the camp, morning and
 evening--sometimes scrambling up in haste when he had forgotten this,
 and saying them with great rapidity. In the course of the day he
 remarked, "Poor man rememberum God more than rich."
 
 We soon passed the island where I had camped four years before. The
 deadwater, a mile or two below it, the Indian said was "a great place
 for moose." We saw the grass bent where a moose came out the night
 before, and the Indian said that he could smell one as far as he could
 see him, but he added that if he should see five or six to-day close by
 canoe he no shoot 'em. Accordingly, as he was the only one of the party
 who had a gun, or had come a-hunting, the moose were safe.
 
 Just below this a cat owl flew heavily over the stream, and he, asking
 if I knew what it was, imitated very well the common _hoo, hoo, hoo,
 hoorer, hoo_, of our woods.
 
 We carried a part of the baggage about Pine Stream Falls, while the
 Indian went down in the canoe. A Bangor merchant had told us that two
 men in his employ were drowned some time ago while passing these falls
 in a bateau, and a third clung to a rock all night and was taken off in
 the morning. There were magnificent great purple fringed orchises on
 this carry and the neighboring shores. I measured the largest canoe
 birch which I saw in this journey near the end of the carry. It was
 fourteen and one half feet in circumference at two feet from the ground,
 but at five feet divided into three parts. The Indian cut a small woody
 knob as big as a filbert from the trunk of a fir, apparently an old
 balsam vesicle filled with wood, which he said was good medicine.
 
 After we had embarked and gone half a mile, my companion remembered that
 he had left his knife, and we paddled back to get it, against the strong
 and swift current. This taught us the difference between going up and
 down the stream, for while we were working our way back a quarter of a
 mile, we should have gone down a mile and half at least. So we landed,
 and while he and the Indian were gone back for it, I watched the motions
 of the foam, a kind of white waterfowl near the shore, forty or fifty
 rods below. It alternately appeared and disappeared behind the rock,
 being carried round by an eddy.
 
 Immediately below these falls was the Chesuncook Deadwater, caused by
 the flowing back of the lake. As we paddled slowly over this, the Indian
 told us a story of his hunting thereabouts, and something more
 interesting about himself. It appeared that he had represented his tribe
 at Augusta, and once at Washington. He had a great idea of education,
 and would occasionally break out into such expressions as this,
 "Kademy--good thing--I suppose they usum Fifth Reader there. You been
 college?"
 
 We steered across the northwest end of the lake. It is an agreeable
 change to cross a lake after you have been shut up in the woods, not
 only on account of the greater expanse of water, but also of sky. It is
 one of the surprises which Nature has in store for the traveler in the
 forest. To look down, in this case, over eighteen miles of water was
 liberating and civilizing even. The lakes also reveal the mountains, and
 give ample scope and range to our thought. Already there were half a
 dozen log huts about this end of the lake, though so far from a road. In
 these woods the earliest settlements are clustering about the lakes,
 partly, I think, for the sake of the neighborhood as the oldest
 clearings. Water is a pioneer which the settler follows, taking
 advantage of its improvements.
 
 About noon we turned northward up a broad kind of estuary, and at its
 northeast corner found the Caucomgomoc River, and after going about a
 mile from the lake reached the Umbazookskus. Our course was up the
 Umbazookskus, but as the Indian knew of a good camping-place, that is, a
 cool place where there were few mosquitoes, about half a mile farther up
 the Caucomgomoc, we went thither. So quickly we changed the civilizing
 sky of Chesuncook for the dark wood of the Caucomgomoc. On reaching the
 Indian's camping-ground on the south side, where the bank was about a
 dozen feet high, I read on the trunk of a fir tree blazed by an axe an
 inscription in charcoal which had been left by him. It was surmounted by
 a drawing of a bear paddling a canoe, which he said was the sign used by
 his family always. The drawing, though rude, could not be mistaken for
 anything but a bear, and he doubted my ability to copy it. The
 inscription ran thus. I interline the English of his Indian as he gave
 it to me.
 
       (The figure of a bear in a boat.)
                 July 26
                  1853
 
                _niasoseb_
              We alone Joseph
                _Polis  elioi_
                 Polis  start
                _sia  olta_
                 for  Oldtown
                _onke  ni_
                 right away
                _quambi_
 
                  July 15
                   1855
                _niasoseb_
 
 He added now below:--
 
                   1857
                  July 26
                 Jo. Polis
 
 This was one of his homes. I saw where he had sometimes stretched his
 moose-hides on the sunny north side of the river where there was a
 narrow meadow.
 
 After we had selected a place for our camp, and kindled our fire, almost
 exactly on the site of the Indian's last camp here, he, looking up,
 observed, "That tree danger."
 
 It was a dead part, more than a foot in diameter, of a large canoe
 birch, which branched at the ground. This branch, rising thirty feet or
 more, slanted directly over the spot which we had chosen for our bed. I
 told him to try it with his axe, but he could not shake it perceptibly,
 and, therefore, seemed inclined to disregard it, and my companion
 expressed his willingness to run the risk. But it seemed to me that we
 should be fools to lie under it, for though the lower part was firm,
 the top, for aught we knew, might be just ready to fall, and we should
 at any rate be very uneasy if the wind arose in the night. It is a
 common accident for men camping in the woods to be killed by a falling
 tree. So the camp was moved to the other side of the fire.
 
 The Indian said that the Umbazookskus, being a dead stream with broad
 meadows, was a good place for moose, and he frequently came a-hunting
 here, being out alone three weeks or more from Oldtown. He sometimes,
 also, went a-hunting to the Seboois Lakes, taking the stage, with his
 gun and ammunition, axe and blankets, hard-bread and pork, perhaps for a
 hundred miles of the way, and jumped off at the wildest place on the
 road, where he was at once at home, and every rod was a tavern-site for
 him. Then, after a short journey through the woods, he would build a
 spruce-bark canoe in one day, putting but few ribs into it, that it
 might be light, and, after doing his hunting with it on the lakes,
 would return with his furs the same way he had come. Thus you have an
 Indian availing himself of the advantages of civilization, without
 losing any of his woodcraft, but proving himself the more successful
 hunter for it.
 
 This man was very clever and quick to learn anything in his line. Our
 tent was of a kind new to him, but when he had once seen it pitched it
 was surprising how quickly he would find and prepare the pole and forked
 stakes to pitch it with, cutting and placing them right the first time,
 though I am sure that the majority of white men would have blundered
 several times.
 
 Now I thought I would observe how he spent his Sunday. While I and my
 companion were looking about at the trees and river he went to sleep.
 Indeed, he improved every opportunity to get a nap, whatever the day.
 
 Rambling about the woods at this camp, I noticed that they consisted
 chiefly of firs, spruce, red maple, birch, and, along the river, the
 hoary alder. I could trace the outlines of large birches that had fallen
 long ago, collapsed and rotted and turned to soil, by faint
 yellowish-green lines of featherlike moss, eighteen inches wide and
 twenty or thirty feet long, crossed by other similar lines.
 
 Wild as it was, it was hard for me to get rid of the associations of the
 settlements. Any steady and monotonous sound, to which I did not
 distinctly attend, passed for a sound of human industry. The waterfalls
 which I heard were not without their dams and mills to my imagination;
 and several times I found that I had been regarding the steady rushing
 sound of the wind from over the woods beyond the rivers as that of a
 train of cars. Our minds anywhere, when left to themselves, are always
 thus busily drawing conclusions from false premises.
 
 I asked the Indian to make us a sugar-bowl of birch bark, which he did,
 using the great knife which dangled in a sheath from his belt; but the
 bark broke at the corners when he bent it up, and he said it was not
 good--that there was a great difference in this respect between the bark
 of one canoe birch and that of another.
 
 My companion, wishing to distinguish between the black and white spruce,
 asked Polis to show him a twig of the latter, which he did at once,
 together with the black; indeed, he could distinguish them about as far
 as he could see them. As the two twigs appeared very much alike, my
 companion asked the Indian to point out the difference; whereupon the
 latter, taking the twigs, instantly remarked, as he passed his hand over
 them successively in a stroking manner, that the white was rough, that
 is, the needles stood up nearly perpendicular, but the black smooth,
 that is, as if bent down. This was an obvious difference, both to sight
 and touch.
 
 I asked him to get some black spruce root and make some thread.
 Whereupon, without looking up at the trees overhead, he began to grub in
 the ground, instantly distinguishing the black spruce roots, and cutting
 off a slender one, three or four feet long, and as big as a pipestem, he
 split the end with his knife, and taking a half between the thumb and
 forefinger of each hand, rapidly separated its whole length into two
 equal semi-cylindrical halves. Then, giving me another root, he said,
 "You try."
 
 But in my hands it immediately ran off one side, and I got only a very
 short piece. Though it looked easy, I found that there was a great art
 in splitting these roots. The split is skillfully humored by bending
 short with this hand or that, and so kept in the middle. He then took
 off the bark from each half, pressing a short piece of cedar bark
 against the convex side with both hands, while he drew the root upward
 with his teeth. An Indian's teeth are strong, and I noticed that he
 used his often where we should have used a hand. They amounted to a
 third hand. He thus obtained in a moment a very neat, tough, and
 flexible string, which he could tie into a knot, or make into a fishline
 even. He said that you would be obliged to give half a dollar for spruce
 root enough for a canoe, thus prepared.
 
 He had discovered the day before that his canoe leaked a little, and
 said that it was owing to stepping into it violently. I asked him where
 he would get pitch to mend it with, for they commonly use hard pitch,
 obtained of the whites at Oldtown. He said that he could make something
 very similar, and equally good, of material which we had with us; and he
 wished me to guess what. But I could not, and he would not tell me,
 though he showed me a ball of it when made, as big as a pea and like
 black pitch, saying, at last, that there were some things which a man
 did not tell even his wife.
 
 Being curious to see what kind of fishes there were in this dark, deep,
 sluggish river, I cast in my line just before night, and caught several
 small sucker-like fishes, which the Indian at once rejected, saying that
 they were good for nothing. Also, he would not touch a pout, which I
 caught, and said that neither Indians nor whites thereabouts ever ate
 them. But he said that some small silvery fishes, which I called white
 chivin, were the best fish in the Penobscot waters, and if I would toss
 them up the bank to him, he would cook them for me. After cleaning them,
 not very carefully, leaving the heads on, he laid them on the coals and
 so broiled them.
 
 [Illustration: _Fishing_]
 
 Returning from a short walk, he brought a vine in his hand, saying that
 it made the best tea of anything in the woods. It was the creeping
 snowberry, which was quite common there, its berries just grown. So we
 determined to have some tea made of this. It had a slight
 checkerberry flavor, and we both agreed that it was really better
 than the black tea which we had brought. We thought it quite a
 discovery, and that it might well be dried and sold in the shops. I for
 one, however, am not an old tea-drinker and cannot speak with authority
 to others. The Indian said that they also used for tea a certain herb
 which grew in low ground, which he did not find there, and Labrador tea;
 also hemlock leaves, the last especially in winter when the other plants
 were covered with snow; and various other things. We could have had a
 new kind of tea every night.
 
 Just before night we saw a _musquash_, the only one we saw in this
 voyage, swimming downward on the opposite side of the stream. The
 Indian, wishing to get one to eat, hushed us, saying, "Stop, me call
 'em"; and, sitting flat on the bank, he began to make a curious
 squeaking, wiry sound with his lips, exerting himself considerably. I
 was greatly surprised--thought that I had at last got into the
 wilderness, and that he was a wild man indeed, to be talking to a
 musquash! I did not know which of the two was the strangest to me. He
 seemed suddenly to have quite forsaken humanity, and gone over to the
 musquash side. The musquash, however, as near as I could see, did not
 turn aside, and the Indian said that he saw our fire; but it was evident
 that he was in the habit of calling the musquash to him, as he said. An
 acquaintance of mine who was hunting moose in these woods a month after
 this, tells me that his Indian in this way repeatedly called the
 musquash within reach of his paddle in the moonlight, and struck at
 them.
 
 The Indian said a particularly long prayer this Sunday evening, as if to
 atone for working in the morning.
 
 
 
 
 V
 
 MONDAY, JULY 27
 
 
 Having rapidly loaded the canoe, which the Indian always carefully
 attended to, that it might be well trimmed, and each having taken a
 look, as usual, to see that nothing was left, we set out again,
 descending the Caucomgomoc, and turning northeasterly up the
 Umbazookskus. This name, the Indian said, meant _Much Meadow River_. We
 found it now very wide on account of the rains. The space between the
 woods, chiefly bare meadow, was from fifty to two hundred rods in
 breadth.
 
 In the water on the meadows grew sedges, wool-grass, the common blue
 flag abundantly, its flower just showing itself above the high water, as
 if it were a blue water-lily, and higher in the meadows a great many
 clumps of a peculiar narrow-leaved willow. Here also grew the red
 osier, its large fruit now whitish.
 
 It was unusual for the woods to be so distant from the shore, and there
 was quite an echo from them, but when I was shouting in order to awake
 it, the Indian reminded me that I should scare the moose, which he was
 looking out for, and which we all wanted to see.
 
 Having paddled several miles up the Umbazookskus, it suddenly contracted
 to a mere brook, narrow and swift, the larches and other trees
 approaching the bank and leaving no open meadow. We landed to get a
 black spruce pole for pushing against the stream. The one selected was
 quite slender, cut about ten feet long, merely whittled to a point, and
 the bark shaved off.
 
 While we were thus employed, two Indians in a canoe hove in sight round
 the bushes, coming down stream. Our Indian knew one of them, an old man,
 and fell into conversation with him. He belonged at the foot of
 Moosehead. The other was of another tribe. They were returning from
 hunting. I asked the younger if they had seen any moose, to which he
 said "No"; but I, seeing the moose-hides sticking out from a great
 bundle made with their blankets in the middle of the canoe, added, "Only
 their hides."
 
 As he was a foreigner, he may have wished to deceive me, for it is
 against the law for white men and foreigners to kill moose in Maine at
 this season. But perhaps he need not have been alarmed, for the
 moose-wardens are not very particular. I heard of one who, being asked
 by a white man going into the woods what he would say if he killed a
 moose, answered, "If you bring me a quarter of it I guess you won't be
 troubled." His duty being, as he said, only to prevent the
 "indiscriminate" slaughter of them for their hides. I suppose that he
 would consider it an _indiscriminate_ slaughter when a quarter was not
 reserved for himself.
 
 We continued along through the most extensive larch wood which I had
 seen--tall and slender trees with fantastic branches. You do not find
 straggling trees of this species here and there throughout the wood, but
 rather a little forest of them. The same is the case with the white and
 red pines and some other trees, greatly to the convenience of the
 lumberer. They are of a social habit, growing in "veins," "clumps,"
 "groups," or "communities," as the explorers call them, distinguishing
 them far away, from the top of a hill or a tree, the white pines
 towering above the surrounding forest, or else they form extensive
 forests by themselves. I should have liked to come across a large
 community of pines which had never been invaded by the lumbering army.
 
 [Illustration: _The Red Squirrel_]
 
 We saw some fresh moose-tracks along the shore. The stream was only from
 one and one half to three rods wide, quite winding, with occasional
 small islands, meadows, and some very swift and shallow places. When
 we came to an island the Indian never hesitated which side to take, as
 if the current told him which was the shortest and deepest. It was lucky
 for us that the water was so high. We had to walk but once on this
 stream, carrying a part of the load, at a swift and shallow reach, while
 he got up with the canoe, not being obliged to take out, though he said
 it was very strong water. Once or twice we passed the red wreck of a
 bateau which had been stove some spring.
 
 While making this portage I saw many splendid specimens of the great
 purple fringed orchis, three feet high. It is remarkable that such
 delicate flowers should here adorn these wilderness paths.
 
 The Umbazookskus is called ten miles long. Having poled up the narrowest
 part some three or four miles, the next opening in the sky was over
 Umbazookskus Lake, which we suddenly entered about eleven o'clock in the
 forenoon. It stretches north-westerly four or five miles. We crossed
 the southeast end to the carry into Mud Pond.
 
 Hodge, who went through this way to the St. Lawrence in the service of
 the State, calls the portage here a mile and three quarters long. The
 Indian said this was the wettest carry in the State, and as the season
 was a very wet one we anticipated an unpleasant walk. As usual he made
 one large bundle of the pork-keg, cooking-utensils, and other loose
 traps, by tying them up in his blanket. We should be obliged to go over
 the carry twice, and our method was to carry one half part way, and then
 go back for the rest.
 
 Our path ran close by the door of a log hut in a clearing at this end of
 the carry, which the Indian, who alone entered it, found to be occupied
 by a Canadian and his family, and that the man had been blind for a
 year. This was the first house above Chesuncook, and was built here, no
 doubt, because it was the route of the lumberers in the winter and
 spring.
 
 After a slight ascent from the lake through the springy soil of the
 Canadian's clearing, we entered on a level and very wet and rocky path
 through the dense evergreen forest, a loosely paved gutter merely, where
 we went leaping from rock to rock and from side to side in the vain
 attempt to keep out of the water and mud. It was on this carry that the
 white hunter whom I met in the stage, as he told me, had shot two bears
 a few months before. They stood directly in the path and did not turn
 out for him. He said that at this season bears were found on the
 mountains and hillsides in search of berries and were apt to be saucy.
 
 Here commences what was called, twenty years ago, the best timber land
 in the State. This very spot was described as "covered with the greatest
 abundance of pine," but now this appeared to me, comparatively, an
 uncommon tree there--and yet you did not see where any more could have
 stood, amid the dense growth of cedar, fir, etc.
 
 The Indian with his canoe soon disappeared before us, but ere long he
 came back and told us to take a path which turned off westward, it being
 better walking, and, at my suggestion, he agreed to leave a bough in the
 regular carry at that place that we might not pass it by mistake.
 Thereafter, he said, we were to keep the main path, and he added, "You
 see 'em my tracks."
 
 But I had not much faith that we could distinguish his tracks, since
 others had passed over the carry within a few days. We turned off at the
 right place, but were soon confused by numerous logging-paths coming
 into the one we were on. However, we kept what we considered the main
 path, though it was a winding one, and in this, at long intervals, we
 distinguished a faint trace of a footstep. This, though comparatively
 unworn, was at first a better, or, at least, a dryer road than the
 regular carry which we had left. It led through an arbor-vitae wilderness
 of the grimmest character. The great fallen and rotting trees had been
 cut through and rolled aside, and their huge trunks abutted on the path
 on each side, while others still lay across it two or three feet high.
 
 It was impossible for us to discern the Indian's trail in the elastic
 moss, which, like a thick carpet, covered every rock and fallen tree, as
 well as the earth. Nevertheless, I did occasionally detect the track of
 a man, and I gave myself some credit for it. I carried my whole load at
 once, a heavy knapsack, and a large rubber bag containing our bread and
 a blanket, swung on a paddle, in all about sixty pounds; but my
 companion preferred to make two journeys by short stages while I waited
 for him. We could not be sure that we were not depositing our loads each
 time farther off from the true path.
 
 As I sat waiting for my companion, he would seem to be gone a long time,
 and I had ample opportunity to make observations on the forest. I now
 first began to be seriously molested by the black fly, a very small but
 perfectly formed fly of that color, about one tenth of an inch long,
 which I felt, and then saw, in swarms about me, as I sat by a wider and
 more than usually doubtful fork in this dark forest path. Remembering
 that I had a wash in my knapsack, prepared by a thoughtful hand in
 Bangor, I made haste to apply it to my face and hands, and was glad to
 find it effectual, as long as it was fresh, or for twenty minutes, not
 only against black flies, but all the insects that molested us. They
 would not alight on the part thus defended. It was composed of sweet oil
 and oil of turpentine, with a little oil of spearmint, and camphor.
 However, I finally concluded that the remedy was worse than the disease,
 it was so disagreeable and inconvenient to have your face and hands
 covered with such a mixture.
 
 Three large slate-colored birds of the jay genus, the Canada jay, came
 flitting silently and by degrees toward me, and hopped down the limbs
 inquisitively to within seven or eight feet. Fish hawks from the lake
 uttered their sharp whistling notes low over the top of the forest near
 me, as if they were anxious about a nest there.
 
 After I had sat there some time I noticed at this fork in the path a
 tree which had been blazed, and the letters "Chamb. L." written on it
 with red chalk. This I knew to mean Chamberlain Lake. So I concluded
 that on the whole we were on the right course.
 
 My companion having returned with his bag, we set forward again. The
 walking rapidly grew worse and the path more indistinct, and at length
 we found ourselves in a more open and regular swamp made less passable
 than ordinary by the unusual wetness of the season. We sank a foot deep
 in water and mud at every step, and sometimes up to our knees. The trail
 was almost obliterated, being no more than a musquash leaves in similar
 places when he parts the floating sedge. In fact, it probably was a
 musquash trail in some places. We concluded that if Mud Pond was as
 muddy as the approach to it was wet, it certainly deserved its name. It
 would have been amusing to behold the dogged and deliberate pace at
 which we entered that swamp, without interchanging a word, as if
 determined to go through it, though it should come up to our necks.
 Having penetrated a considerable distance into this and found a tussock
 on which we could deposit our loads, though there was no place to sit,
 my companion went back for the rest of his pack.
 
 After a long while my companion came back, and the Indian with him. We
 had taken the wrong road, and the Indian had lost us. He had gone back
 to the Canadian's camp and asked him which way we had probably gone,
 since he could better understand the ways of white men, and he told him
 correctly that we had undoubtedly taken the supply road to Chamberlain
 Lake. The Indian was greatly surprised that we should have taken what he
 called a "tow," that is, tote, toting, or supply, road instead of a
 carry path,--that we had not followed his tracks,--said it was
 "strange," and evidently thought little of our woodcraft.
 
 Having held a consultation and eaten a mouthful of bread, we concluded
 that it would perhaps be nearer for us two now to keep on to Chamberlain
 Lake, omitting Mud Pond, than to go back and start anew for the last
 place, though the Indian had never been through this way and knew
 nothing about it. In the meanwhile he would go back and finish carrying
 over his canoe and bundle to Mud Pond, cross that, and go down its
 outlet and up Chamberlain Lake, and trust to meet us there before night.
 It was now a little after noon. He supposed that the water in which we
 stood had flowed back from Mud Pond, which could not be far off
 eastward, but was unapproachable through the dense cedar swamp.
 
 Keeping on, we were ere long agreeably disappointed by reaching firmer
 ground, and we crossed a ridge where the path was more distinct, but
 there was never any outlook over the forest. At one place I heard a very
 clear and piercing note from a small hawk as he dashed through the
 tree-tops over my head. We also saw and heard several times the red
 squirrel. This, according to the Indian, is the only squirrel found in
 those woods, except a very few striped ones. It must have a solitary
 time in that dark evergreen forest, where there is so little life,
 seventy-five miles from a road as we had come. I wondered how he could
 call any particular tree there his home, and yet he would run up the
 stem of one out of the myriads, as if it were an old road to him. I
 fancied that he must be glad to see us, though he did seem to chide us.
 One of those somber fir and spruce woods is not complete unless you
 hear from out its cavernous mossy and twiggy recesses his fine
 alarum--his spruce voice, like the working of the sap through some crack
 in a tree. Such an impertinent fellow would occasionally try to alarm
 the wood about me.
 
 "Oh," said I, "I am well acquainted with your family. I know your
 cousins in Concord very well." But my overtures were vain, for he would
 withdraw by his aerial turnpikes into a more distant cedar-top, and
 spring his rattle again.
 
 We entered another swamp, at a necessarily slow pace, where the walking
 was worse than ever, not only on account of the water, but the fallen
 timber, which often obliterated the indistinct trail entirely. The
 fallen trees were so numerous that for long distances the route was
 through a succession of small yards, where we climbed over fences as
 high as our heads, down into water often up to our knees, and then over
 another fence into a second yard, and so on. In many places the canoe
 would have run if it had not been for the fallen timber. Again it would
 be more open, but equally wet, too wet for trees to grow. It was a mossy
 swamp, which it required the long legs of a moose to traverse, and it is
 very likely that we scared some of them in our transit, though we saw
 none. It was ready to echo the growl of a bear, the howl of a wolf, or
 the scream of a panther; but when you get fairly into the middle of one
 of these grim forests you are surprised to find that the larger
 inhabitants are not at home commonly, but have left only a puny red
 squirrel to bark at you. Generally speaking, a howling wilderness does
 not howl; it is the imagination of the traveler that does the howling. I
 did, however, see one dead porcupine. Perhaps he had succumbed to the
 difficulties of the way. These bristly fellows are a very suitable small
 fruit of such unkempt wildernesses.
 
 Making a logging-road in the Maine woods is called "swamping" it, and
 they who do the work are called "swampers." I now perceived the fitness
 of the term. This was the most perfectly swamped of all the roads I ever
 saw. Nature must have cooperated with art here. However, I suppose they
 would tell you that this name took its origin from the fact that the
 chief work of roadmakers in those woods is to make the swamps passable.
 We came to a stream where the bridge, which had been made of logs tied
 together with cedar bark, had been broken up, and we got over as we
 could. Such as it was, this ruined bridge was the chief evidence that we
 were on a path of any kind.
 
 We then crossed another low rising ground, and I, who wore shoes, had an
 opportunity to wring out my stockings, but my companion, who used boots,
 had found that this was not a safe experiment for him, for he might not
 be able to get his wet boots on again. He went over the whole ground, or
 water, three times, for which reason our progress was very slow. Beside
 that, the water softened our feet, and to some extent unfitted them for
 walking.
 
 As I sat waiting for him it would naturally seem an unaccountable time
 that he was gone. Therefore, as I could see through the woods that the
 sun was getting low, and it was uncertain how far the lake might be,
 even if we were on the right course, and in what part of the world we
 should find ourselves at nightfall, I proposed that I should push
 through with what speed I could, leaving boughs to mark my path, and
 find the lake and the Indian, if possible, before night, and send the
 latter back to carry my companion's bag.
 
 Having gone about a mile I heard a noise like the note of an owl, which
 I soon discovered to be made by the Indian, and answering him, we soon
 came together. He had reached the lake after crossing Mud Pond and
 running some rapids below it, and had come up about a mile and a half
 on our path. If he had not come back to meet us, we probably should not
 have found him that night, for the path branched once or twice before
 reaching this particular part of the lake. So he went back for my
 companion and his bag. Having waded through another stream, where the
 bridge of logs had been broken up and half floated away, we continued on
 through alternate mud and water to the shores of Apmoojenegamook Lake,
 which we reached in season for a late supper, instead of dining there,
 as we had expected, having gone without our dinner.
 
 It was at least five miles by the way we had come, and as my companion
 had gone over most of it three times he had walked full a dozen miles.
 In the winter, when the water is frozen and the snow is four feet deep,
 it is no doubt a tolerable path to a footman. If you want an exact
 recipe for making such a road, take one part Mud Pond, and dilute it
 with equal parts of Umbazookskus and Apmoojenegamook; then send a
 family of musquash through to locate it, look after the grades and
 culverts, and finish it to their minds, and let a hurricane follow to do
 the fencing.
 
 We had come out on a point extending into Apmoojenegamook, or
 Chamberlain Lake, where there was a broad, gravelly, and rocky shore,
 encumbered with bleached logs and trees. We were rejoiced to see such
 dry things in that part of the world. But at first we did not attend to
 dryness so much as to mud and wetness. We all three walked into the lake
 up to our middle to wash our clothes.
 
 This was another noble lake, twelve miles long; if you add Telos Lake,
 which, since the dam was built, has been connected with it by dead
 water, it will be twenty; and it is apparently from a mile and a half to
 two miles wide. We were about midway its length on the south side. We
 could see the only clearing in these parts, called the "Chamberlain
 Farm," with two or three log buildings close together, on the opposite
 shore, some two and a half miles distant. The smoke of our fire on the
 shore brought over two men in a canoe from the farm, that being a common
 signal agreed on when one wishes to cross. It took them about half an
 hour to come over, and they had their labor for their pains this time.
 
 After putting on such dry clothes as we had, and hanging the others to
 dry on the pole which the Indian arranged over the fire, we ate our
 supper, and lay down on the pebbly shore with our feet to the fire
 without pitching our tent, making a thin bed of grass to cover the
 stones.
 
 Here first I was molested by the little midge called the no-see-em,
 especially over the sand at the water's edge, for it is a kind of
 sand-fly. You would not observe them but for their light-colored wings.
 They are said to get under your clothes and produce a feverish heat,
 which I suppose was what I felt that night.
 
 Our insect foes in this excursion were, first, mosquitoes, only
 troublesome at night, or when we sat still on shore by day; second,
 black flies (_simulium molestum_), which molested us more or less on the
 carries by day, and sometimes in narrower parts of the stream; third,
 moose-flies, stout brown flies much like a horsefly. They can bite
 smartly, according to Polis, but are easily avoided or killed. Fourth,
 the no-see-ems. Of all these, the mosquitoes are the only ones that
 troubled me seriously, but as I was provided with a wash and a veil,
 they have not made any deep impression.
 
 The Indian would not use our wash to protect his face and hands, for
 fear that it would hurt his skin, nor had he any veil. He, therefore,
 suffered from insects throughout this journey more than either of us. He
 regularly tied up his face in his handkerchief, and buried it in his
 blanket, and he now finally lay down on the sand between us and the fire
 for the sake of the smoke, which he tried to make enter his blanket
 about his face, and for the same purpose he lit his pipe and breathed
 the smoke into his blanket.
 
 In the middle of the night we heard the voice of the loon, loud and
 distinct, from far over the lake. It is a very wild sound, quite in
 keeping with the place and the circumstances of the traveler, and very
 unlike the voice of a bird. I could lie awake for hours listening to it,
 it is so thrilling. When camping in such a wilderness as this, you are
 prepared to hear sounds from some of its inhabitants which will give
 voice to its wildness. Some idea of bears, wolves, or panthers runs in
 your head naturally, and when this note is first heard very far off at
 midnight, as you lie with your ear to the ground,--the forest being
 perfectly still about you, you take it for granted that it is the voice
 of a wolf or some other wild beast,--you conclude that it is a pack of
 wolves baying the moon, or, perchance, cantering after a moose. It was
 the unfailing and characteristic sound of those lakes.
 
 Some friends of mine, who two years ago went up the Caucomgomoc River,
 were serenaded by wolves while moose-hunting by moonlight. It was a
 sudden burst, as if a hundred demons had broke loose,--a startling sound
 enough, which, if any, would make your hair stand on end,--and all was
 still again. It lasted but a moment, and you'd have thought there were
 twenty of them, when probably there were only two or three. They heard
 it twice only, and they said that it gave expression to the wilderness
 which it lacked before. I heard of some men, who, while skinning a moose
 lately in those woods, were driven off from the carcass by a pack of
 wolves, which ate it up.
 
 This of the loon--I do not mean its laugh, but its looning--is a
 long-drawn call, as it were, sometimes singularly human to my
 ear--_hoo-hoo-ooooo_, like the hallooing of a man on a very high key,
 having thrown his voice into his head. I have heard a sound exactly like
 it when breathing heavily through my own nostrils, half awake at ten at
 night, suggesting my affinity to the loon; as if its language were but a
 dialect of my own, after all. Formerly, when lying awake at midnight in
 those woods, I had listened to hear some words or syllables of their
 language, but it chanced that I listened in vain until I heard the cry
 of the loon. I have heard it occasionally on the ponds of my native
 town, but there its wildness is not enhanced by the surrounding scenery.
 
 I was awakened at midnight by some heavy, low-flying bird, probably a
 loon, flapping by close over my head along the shore. So, turning the
 other side of my half-clad body to the fire, I sought slumber again.
 
 
 
 
 VI
 
 TUESDAY, JULY 28
 
 
 When we awoke we found a heavy dew on our blankets. I lay awake very
 early and listened to the clear, shrill _ah, te te, te te, te_ of the
 white-throated sparrow, repeated at short intervals, without the least
 variation, for half an hour, as if it could not enough express its
 happiness.
 
 We did some more washing in the lake this morning, and, with our clothes
 hung about on the dead trees and rocks, the shore looked like
 washing-day at home. The Indian, taking the hint, borrowed the soap,
 and, walking into the lake, washed his only cotton shirt on his person,
 then put on his pants and let it dry on him.
 
 I observed that he wore a cotton shirt, originally white, a greenish
 flannel one over it, but no waistcoat, flannel drawers, and strong
 linen or duck pants, which also had been white, blue woolen stockings,
 cowhide boots, and a Kossuth hat.[3] He carried no change of clothing,
 but, putting on a stout, thick jacket, which he laid aside in the canoe,
 and seizing a full-sized axe, his gun and ammunition, and a blanket,
 which would do for a sail or knapsack, if wanted, and strapping on his
 belt, which contained a large sheath-knife, he walked off at once, ready
 to be gone all summer. This looked very independent--a few simple and
 effective tools, and no rubber clothing. He was always the first ready
 to start in the morning. Instead of carrying a large bundle of his own
 extra clothing, etc., he brought back the greatcoats of moose tied up in
 his blanket. I found that his outfit was the result of a long
 experience, and in the main hardly to be improved on, unless by washing
 and an extra shirt. Wanting a button here, he walked off to a place
 where some Indians had recently encamped, and searched for one, but I
 believe in vain.
 
 Having softened our stiffened boots and shoes with the pork fat, the
 usual disposition of what was left at breakfast, we crossed the lake,
 steering in a diagonal direction northeastly about four miles to the
 outlet. The Indian name, Apmoojenegamook, means lake that is crossed,
 because the usual course lies across and not along it. We did not intend
 to go far down the Allegash, but merely to get a view of the lakes which
 are its source, and then return this way to the East Branch of the
 Penobscot.
 
 After reaching the middle of the lake, we found the waves pretty high,
 and the Indian warned my companion, who was nodding, that he must not
 allow himself to fall asleep in the canoe lest he should upset us;
 adding, that when Indians want to sleep in a canoe, they lie down
 straight on the bottom. But in this crowded one that was impossible.
 However, he said that he would nudge him if he saw him nodding.
 
 A belt of dead trees stood all around the lake, some far out in the
 water, with others prostrate behind them, and they made the shore, for
 the most part, almost inaccessible. This is the effect of the dam at the
 outlet. Thus the natural sandy or rocky shore, with its green fringe,
 was concealed and destroyed. We coasted westward along the north side,
 searching for the outlet, about quarter of a mile distant from this
 savage-looking shore, on which the waves were breaking violently,
 knowing that it might easily be concealed amid this rubbish, or by the
 overlapping of the shore. It is remarkable how little these important
 gates to a lake are blazoned. There is no triumphal arch over the modest
 inlet or outlet, but at some undistinguished point it trickles in or out
 through the uninterrupted forest, almost as through a sponge.
 
 We reached the outlet in about an hour, and carried over the dam there,
 which is quite a solid structure, and about one quarter of a mile
 farther there was a second dam. The result of this particular damming
 about Chamberlain Lake is that the headwaters of the St. John are made
 to flow by Bangor. They have thus dammed all the larger lakes, raising
 their broad surfaces many feet, thus turning the forces of Nature
 against herself, that they might float their spoils out of the country.
 They rapidly run out of these immense forests all the finer and more
 accessible pine timber, and then leave the bears to watch the decaying
 dams, not clearing nor cultivating the land, nor making roads, nor
 building houses, but leaving it a wilderness, as they found it. In many
 parts only these dams remain, like deserted beaver dams. Think how much
 land they have flowed without asking Nature's leave.
 
 The wilderness experiences a sudden rise of all her streams and lakes.
 She feels ten thousand vermin gnawing at the base of her noblest trees.
 Many combining drag them off, jarring over the roots of the survivors,
 and tumble them into the nearest stream, till, the fairest having
 fallen, they scamper off to ransack some new wilderness, and all is
 still again. It is as when a migrating army of mice girdles a forest of
 pines. The chopper fells trees from the same motive that the mouse gnaws
 them--to get his living. You tell me that he has a more interesting
 family than the mouse. That is as it happens. He speaks of a "berth" of
 timber, a good place for him to get into, just as a worm might.
 
 When the chopper would praise a pine he will commonly tell you that the
 one he cut was so big that a yoke of oxen stood on its stump; as if that
 were what the pine had grown for, to become the footstool of oxen. In my
 mind's eye I can see these unwieldy tame deer, with a yoke binding them
 together, the brazen-tipped horns betraying their servitude, taking
 their stand on the stump of each giant pine in succession throughout
 this whole forest, and chewing their cud there, until it is nothing but
 an ox-pasture, and run out at that. As if it were good for the oxen, and
 some medicinal quality ascended into their nostrils. Or is their
 elevated position intended merely as a symbol of the fact that the
 pastoral comes next in order to the sylvan or hunter life?
 
 The character of the logger's admiration is betrayed by his very mode of
 expressing it. If he told all that was in his mind, he would say, "It
 was so big that I cut it down, and then a yoke of oxen could stand on
 its stump." He admires the log, the carcass or corpse, more than the
 tree. Why, my dear sir, the tree might have stood on its own stump, and
 a great deal more comfortably and firmly than a yoke of oxen can, if you
 had not cut it down.
 
 The Anglo-American can indeed cut down and grub up all this waving
 forest, and make a stump speech on its ruins, but he cannot converse
 with the spirit of the tree he fells, he cannot read the poetry and
 mythology which retire as he advances. He ignorantly erases mythological
 tablets in order to print his handbills and town-meeting warrants on
 them. Before he has learned his a b c in the beautiful but mystic lore
 of the wilderness he cuts it down, puts up a "deestrict" schoolhouse,
 and introduces Webster's spelling-book.
 
 Below the last dam, the river being swift and shallow, we two walked
 about half a mile to lighten the canoe. I made it a rule to carry my
 knapsack when I walked, and also to keep it tied to a crossbar when in
 the canoe, that it might be found with the canoe if we should upset.
 
 I heard the dog-day locust here, a sound which I had associated only
 with more open, if not settled countries.
 
 We were now fairly on the Allegash River. After perhaps two miles of
 river we entered Heron Lake, scaring up forty or fifty young sheldrakes,
 at the entrance, which ran over the water with great rapidity, as usual
 in a long line.
 
 This lake, judging from the map, is about ten miles long. We had entered
 it on the southwest side, and saw a dark mountain northeast over the
 lake which the Indian said was called Peaked Mountain, and used by
 explorers to look for timber from. The shores were in the same ragged
 and unsightly condition, encumbered with dead timber, both fallen and
 standing, as in the last lake, owing to the dam on the Allegash below.
 Some low points or islands were almost drowned.
 
 I saw something white a mile off on the water, which turned out to be a
 great gull on a rock, which the Indian would have been glad to kill and
 eat. But it flew away long before we were near; and also a flock of
 summer ducks that were about the rock with it. I asking him about
 herons, since this was Heron Lake, he said that he found the blue
 heron's nests in the hard-wood trees.
 
 Rounding a point, we stood across a bay toward a large island three or
 four miles down the lake. We met with shadflies midway, about a mile
 from the shore, and they evidently fly over the whole lake. On Moosehead
 I had seen a large devil's-needle half a mile from the shore, coming
 from the middle of the lake, where it was three or four miles wide at
 least. It had probably crossed.
 
 We landed on the southeast side of the island, which was rather
 elevated, and densely wooded, with a rocky shore, in season for an early
 dinner. Somebody had camped there not long before and left the frame on
 which they stretched a moose-hide. The Indian proceeded at once to cut a
 canoe birch, slanted it up against another tree on the shore, tying it
 with a withe, and lay down to sleep in its shade. We made this island
 the limit of our excursion in this direction.
 
 The next dam was about fifteen miles farther north down the Allegash. We
 had been told in Bangor of a man who lived alone, a sort of hermit, at
 that dam, to take care of it, who spent his time tossing a bullet from
 one hand to the other, for want of employment. This sort of tit-for-tat
 intercourse between his two hands, bandying to and fro a leaden subject,
 seems to have been his symbol for society.
 
 There was another island visible toward the north end of the lake, with
 an elevated clearing on it; but we learned afterward that it was not
 inhabited, had only been used as a pasture for cattle which summered in
 these woods. This unnaturally smooth-shaven, squarish spot, in the midst
 of the otherwise uninterrupted forest, only reminded us how uninhabited
 the country was. You would sooner expect to meet a bear than an ox in
 such a clearing. At any rate, it must have been a surprise to the bears
 when they came across it. Such, seen far or near, you know at once to be
 man's work, for Nature never does it. In order to let in the light to
 the earth he clears off the forest on the hillsides and plains, and
 sprinkles fine grass seed like an enchanter, and so carpets the earth
 with a firm sward.
 
 Polis had evidently more curiosity respecting the few settlers in those
 woods than we. If nothing was said, he took it for granted that we
 wanted to go straight to the next log hut. Having observed that we came
 by the log huts at Chesuncook, and the blind Canadian's at the Mud Pond
 carry, without stopping to communicate with the inhabitants, he took
 occasion now to suggest that the usual way was, when you came near a
 house, to go to it, and tell the inhabitants what you had seen or heard,
 and then they told you what they had seen; but we laughed and said that
 we had had enough of houses for the present, and had come here partly to
 avoid them.
 
 In the meanwhile, the wind, increasing, blew down the Indian's birch and
 created such a sea that we found ourselves prisoners on the island, the
 nearest shore being perhaps a mile distant, and we took the canoe out
 to prevent its drifting away. We did not know but we should be compelled
 to spend the rest of the day and the night there. At any rate, the
 Indian went to sleep again, my companion busied himself drying his
 plants, and I rambled along the shore westward, which was quite stony,
 and obstructed with fallen bleached or drifted trees for four or five
 rods in width.
 
 Our Indian said that he was a doctor, and could tell me some medicinal
 use for every plant I could show him. I immediately tried him. He said
 that the inner bark of the aspen was good for sore eyes; and so with
 various other plants, proving himself as good as his word. According to
 his account, he had acquired such knowledge in his youth from a wise old
 Indian with whom he associated, and he lamented that the present
 generation of Indians "had lost a great deal."
 
 He said that the caribou was a "very great runner," that there were none
 about this lake now, though there used to be many, and, pointing to the
 belt of dead trees caused by the dams, he added: "No likum stump. When
 he sees that he scared."
 
 Pointing southeasterly over the lake and distant forest, he observed,
 "Me go Oldtown in three days."
 
 I asked how he would get over the swamps and fallen trees. "Oh," said
 he, "in winter all covered, go anywhere on snowshoes, right across
 lakes."
 
 What a wilderness walk for a man to take alone! None of your half-mile
 swamps, none of your mile-wide woods merely, as on the skirts of our
 towns, without hotels, only a dark mountain or a lake for guide-board
 and station, over ground much of it impassable in summer!
 
 Here was traveling of the old heroic kind over the unaltered face of
 nature. From the Allegash River, across great Apmoojenegamook, he takes
 his way under the bear-haunted slopes of Katahdin to Pamadumcook and
 Millinocket's inland seas, and so to the forks of the Nicketow, ever
 pushing the boughs of the fir and spruce aside, with his load of furs,
 contending day and night, night and day, with the shaggy demon
 vegetation, traveling through the mossy graveyard of trees. Or he could
 go by "that rough tooth of the sea" Kineo, great source of arrows and of
 spears to the ancients, when weapons of stone were used. Seeing and
 hearing moose, caribou, bears, porcupines, lynxes, wolves, and panthers.
 Places where he might live and die and never hear of the United
 States--never hear of America.
 
 There is a lumberer's road called the Eagle Lake Road from the Seboois
 to the east side of this lake. It may seem strange that any road through
 such a wilderness should be passable, even in winter, but at that
 season, wherever lumbering operations are actively carried on, teams are
 continually passing on the single track, and it becomes as smooth almost
 as a railway. I am told that in the Aroostook country the sleds are
 required by law to be of one width, four feet, and sleighs must be
 altered to fit the track, so that one runner may go in one rut and the
 other follow the horse. Yet it is very bad turning out.
 
 We had for some time seen a thunder-shower coming up from the west over
 the woods of the island, and heard the muttering of the thunder, though
 we were in doubt whether it would reach us; but now the darkness rapidly
 increasing, and a fresh breeze rustling the forest, we hastily put up
 the plants which we had been drying, and with one consent made a rush
 for the tent material and set about pitching it. A place was selected
 and stakes and pins cut in the shortest possible time, and we were
 pinning it down lest it should be blown away, when the storm suddenly
 burst over us.
 
 As we lay huddled together under the tent, which leaked considerably
 about the sides, with our baggage at our feet, we listened to some of
 the grandest thunder which I ever heard--rapid peals, round and plump,
 bang, bang, bang, in succession, like artillery from some fortress in
 the sky; and the lightning was proportionally brilliant. The Indian
 said, "It must be good powder." All for the benefit of the moose and us,
 echoing far over the concealed lakes. I thought it must be a place which
 the thunder loved, where the lightning practiced to keep its hand in,
 and it would do no harm to shatter a few pines.
 
 Looking out, I perceived that the violent shower falling on the lake had
 almost instantaneously flattened the waves, and, it clearing off, we
 resolved to start immediately, before the wind raised them again.
 
 Getting outside, I said that I saw clouds still in the southwest, and
 heard thunder there. We embarked, nevertheless, and paddled rapidly back
 toward the dams.
 
 At the outlet of Chamberlain Lake we were overtaken by another gusty
 rainstorm, which compelled us to take shelter, the Indian under his
 canoe on the bank, and we under the edge of the dam. However, we were
 more scared than wet. From my covert I could see the Indian peeping out
 from beneath his canoe to see what had become of the rain. When we had
 taken our respective places thus once or twice, the rain not coming down
 in earnest, we commenced rambling about the neighborhood, for the wind
 had by this time raised such waves on the lake that we could not stir,
 and we feared that we should be obliged to camp there. We got an early
 supper on the dam and tried for fish, while waiting for the tumult to
 subside. The fishes were not only few, but small and worthless.
 
 At length, just before sunset, we set out again. It was a wild evening
 when we coasted up the north side of this Apmoojenegamook Lake. One
 thunder-storm was just over, and the waves which it had raised still
 running with violence, and another storm was now seen coming up in the
 southwest, far over the lake; but it might be worse in the morning, and
 we wished to get as far as possible on our way while we might.
 
 It blew hard against the shore, which was as dreary and harborless as
 you can conceive. For half a dozen rods in width it was a perfect maze
 of submerged trees, all dead and bare and bleaching, some standing half
 their original height, others prostrate, and criss-across, above or
 beneath the surface, and mingled with them were loose trees and limbs
 and stumps, beating about. We could not have landed if we would, without
 the greatest danger of being swamped; so blow as it might, we must
 depend on coasting. It was twilight, too, and that stormy cloud was
 advancing rapidly in our rear. It was a pleasant excitement, yet we were
 glad to reach, at length, the cleared shore of the Chamberlain Farm.
 
 We landed on a low and thinly wooded point, and while my companions
 were pitching the tent, I ran up to the house to get some sugar, our
 six pounds being gone. It was no wonder they were, for Polis had a sweet
 tooth. He would first fill his dipper nearly a third full of sugar, and
 then add the coffee to it. Here was a clearing extending back from the
 lake to a hilltop, with some dark-colored log buildings and a storehouse
 in it, and half a dozen men standing in front of the principal hut,
 greedy for news. Among them was the man who tended the dam on the
 Allegash and tossed the bullet. He, having charge of the dams, and
 learning that we were going to Webster Stream the next day, told me that
 some of their men, who were haying at Telos Lake, had shut the dam at
 the canal there in order to catch trout, and if we wanted more water to
 take us through the canal we might raise the gate.
 
 They were unwilling to spare more than four pounds of brown
 sugar,--unlocking the storehouse to get it,--since they only kept a
 little for such cases as this, and they charged twenty cents a pound for
 it, which certainly it was worth to get it up there.
 
 When I returned to the shore it was quite dark, but we had a rousing
 fire to warm and dry us by, and a snug apartment behind it. The Indian
 went up to the house to inquire after a brother who had been absent
 hunting a year or two, and while another shower was beginning, I groped
 about cutting spruce and arbor-vitae twigs for a bed. I preferred the
 arbor-vitae on account of its fragrance, and spread it particularly thick
 about the shoulders. It is remarkable with what pure satisfaction the
 traveler in those woods will reach his camping-ground on the eve of a
 tempestuous night like this, as if he had got to his inn, and, rolling
 himself in his blanket, stretch himself on his six-feet-by-two bed of
 dripping fir twigs, with a thin sheet of cotton for roof, snug as a
 meadow mouse in its nest. Invariably our best nights were those when it
 rained, for then we were not troubled with mosquitoes.
 
 You soon come to disregard rain on such excursions, at least in the
 summer, it is so easy to dry yourself, supposing a dry change of
 clothing is not to be had. You can much sooner dry you by such a fire as
 you can make in the woods than in anybody's kitchen, the fireplace is so
 much larger, and wood so much more abundant. A shed-shaped tent will
 catch and reflect the heat, and you may be drying while you are
 sleeping.
 
 Some who have leaky roofs in the towns may have been kept awake, but we
 were soon lulled asleep by a steady, soaking rain, which lasted all
 night.
 
 FOOTNOTES:
 
 [3] A soft felt hat of the kind worn by the Hungarian patriot, Kossuth,
 on his visit to this country in 1851-52.
 
 
 
 
 VII
 
 WEDNESDAY, JULY 29
 
 
 When we awoke it had done raining, though it was still cloudy. The fire
 was put out, and the Indian's boots, which stood under the eaves of the
 tent, were half full of water. He was much more improvident in such
 respects than either of us, and he had to thank us for keeping his
 powder dry. We decided to cross the lake at once, before breakfast; and
 before starting I took the bearing of the shore which we wished to
 strike, about three miles distant, lest a sudden misty rain should
 conceal it when we were midway.
 
 Though the bay in which we were was perfectly quiet and smooth, we found
 the lake already wide awake outside, but not dangerously or unpleasantly
 so. Nevertheless, when you get out on one of those lakes in a canoe like
 this, you do not forget that you are completely at the mercy of the
 wind, and a fickle power it is. The playful waves may at any time become
 too rude for you in their sport, and play right on over you. After much
 steady paddling and dancing over the dark waves we found ourselves in
 the neighborhood of the southern land. We breakfasted on a rocky point,
 the first convenient place that offered.
 
 It was well enough that we crossed thus early, for the waves now ran
 quite high, but beyond this point we had comparatively smooth water. You
 can commonly go along one side or the other of a lake, when you cannot
 cross it.
 
 My companion and I, having a discussion on some point of ancient
 history, were amused by the attitude which the Indian, who could not
 tell what we were talking about, assumed. He constituted himself umpire,
 and, judging by our air and gesture, he very seriously remarked from
 time to time, "You beat," or "He beat."
 
 Leaving a spacious bay on our left, we entered through a short strait
 into a small lake a couple of miles over, and thence into Telos Lake.
 This curved round toward the northeast, and may have been three or four
 miles long as we paddled.
 
 The outlet from the lake into the East Branch of the Penobscot is an
 artificial one, and it was not very apparent where it was exactly, but
 the lake ran curving far up northeasterly into two narrow valleys or
 ravines, as if it had for a long time been groping its way toward the
 Penobscot waters. By observing where the horizon was lowest, and
 following the longest of these, we at length reached the dam, having
 come about a dozen miles from the last camp. Somebody had left a line
 set for trout, and the jackknife with which the bait had been cut on the
 dam beside it, and, on a log close by, a loaf of bread. These proved the
 property of a solitary hunter, whom we soon met, and canoe and gun and
 traps were not far off. He told us that it was twenty miles to the foot
 of Grand Lake, and that the first house below the foot of the lake, on
 the East Branch, was Hunt's, about forty-five miles farther.
 
 This hunter, who was a quite small, sunburnt man, having already carried
 his canoe over, had nothing so interesting and pressing to do as to
 observe our transit. He had been out a month or more alone. How much
 more respectable is the life of the solitary pioneer or settler in
 these, or any woods--having real difficulties, not of his own creation,
 drawing his subsistence directly from nature--than that of the helpless
 multitudes in the towns who depend on gratifying the extremely
 artificial wants of society and are thrown out of employment by hard
 times!
 
 Telos Lake, the head of the St. John on this side, and Webster Pond, the
 head of the East Branch of the Penobscot, are only about a mile apart,
 and they are connected by a ravine, in which but little digging was
 required to make the water of the former, which is the highest, flow
 into the latter. This canal is something less than a mile long and about
 four rods wide. The rush of the water has produced such changes in the
 canal that it has now the appearance of a very rapid mountain stream
 flowing through a ravine, and you would not suspect that any digging had
 been required to persuade the waters of the St. John to flow into the
 Penobscot here. It was so winding that one could see but a little way
 down.
 
 It is wonderful how well watered this country is. As you paddle across a
 lake, bays will be pointed out to you, by following up which, and
 perhaps the tributary stream which empties in, you may, after a short
 portage, or possibly, at some seasons, none at all, get into another
 river, which empties far away from the one you are on. Generally, you
 may go in any direction in a canoe, by making frequent but not very long
 portages. It seems as if the more youthful and impressionable streams
 can hardly resist the numerous invitations and temptations to leave
 their native beds and run down their neighbors' channels.
 
 Wherever there is a channel for water there is a road for the canoe. It
 is said that some Western steamers can run on a heavy dew, whence we can
 imagine what a canoe may do.
 
 This canal, so called, was a considerable and extremely rapid and rocky
 river. The Indian decided that there was water enough in it without
 raising the dam, which would only make it more violent, and that he
 would run down it alone, while we carried the greater part of the
 baggage. Our provisions being about half consumed, there was the less
 left in the canoe. We had thrown away the pork-keg and wrapped its
 contents in birch bark.
 
 Following a moist trail through the forest, we reached the head of
 Webster Pond about the same time with the Indian, notwithstanding the
 velocity with which he moved, our route being the most direct. The pond
 was two or three miles long.
 
 At the outlet was another dam, at which we stopped and picked
 raspberries, while the Indian went down the stream a half-mile through
 the forest, to see what he had got to contend with. There was a deserted
 log camp here, apparently used the previous winter, with its "hovel" or
 barn for cattle. In the hut was a large fir-twig bed, raised two feet
 from the floor, occupying a large part of the single apartment, a long
 narrow table against the wall, with a stout log bench before it, and
 above the table a small window, the only one there was, which admitted a
 feeble light. It was a simple and strong fort erected against the cold.
 
 We got our dinner on the shore, on the upper side of the dam. As we were
 sitting by our fire, concealed by the earth bank of the dam, a long
 line of sheldrakes, half grown, came waddling over it from the water
 below, passing within about a rod of us, so that we could almost have
 caught them in our hands. They were very abundant on all the streams and
 lakes which we visited, and every two or three hours they would rush
 away in a long string over the water before us, twenty to fifty of them
 at once, rarely ever flying, but running with great rapidity up or down
 the stream, even in the midst of the most violent rapids, and apparently
 as fast up as down.
 
 An Indian at Oldtown had told us that we should be obliged to carry ten
 miles between Telos Lake on the St. John and Second Lake on the East
 Branch of the Penobscot; but the lumberers whom we met assured us that
 there would not be more than a mile of carry. It turned out that the
 Indian was nearest right, as far as we were concerned. However, if one
 of us could have assisted the Indian in managing the canoe in the
 rapids, we might have run the greater part of the way; but as he was
 alone in the management of the canoe in such places we were obliged to
 walk the greater part.
 
 My companion and I carried a good part of the baggage on our shoulders,
 while the Indian took that which would be least injured by wet in the
 canoe. We did not know when we should see him again, for he had not been
 this way since the canal was cut. He agreed to stop when he got to
 smooth water, come up and find our path if he could, and halloo for us,
 and after waiting a reasonable time go on and try again--and we were to
 look out in like manner for him.
 
 He commenced by running through the sluiceway and over the dam, as
 usual, standing up in his tossing canoe, and was soon out of sight
 behind a point in a wild gorge. This Webster Stream is well known to
 lumbermen as a difficult one. It is exceedingly rapid and rocky, and
 also shallow, and can hardly be considered navigable, unless that may
 mean that what is launched in it is sure to be carried swiftly down it,
 though it may be dashed to pieces by the way. It is somewhat like
 navigating a thunder-spout. With commonly an irresistible force urging
 you on, you have got to choose your own course each moment between the
 rocks and shallows, and to get into it, moving forward always with the
 utmost possible moderation, and often holding on, if you can, that you
 may inspect the rapids before you.
 
 By the Indian's direction we took an old path on the south side, which
 appeared to keep down the stream. It was a wild wood-path, with a few
 tracks of oxen which had been driven over it, probably to some old camp
 clearing for pasturage, mingled with the tracks of moose which had
 lately used it. We kept on steadily for about an hour without putting
 down our packs, occasionally winding around or climbing over a fallen
 tree, for the most part far out of sight and hearing of the river;
 till, after walking about three miles, we were glad to find that the
 path came to the river again at an old camp-ground, where there was a
 small opening in the forest, at which we paused.
 
 Swiftly as the shallow and rocky river ran here, a continuous rapid with
 dancing waves, I saw, as I sat on the shore, a long string of
 sheldrakes, which something scared, run up the opposite side of the
 stream by me, just touching the surface of the waves, and getting an
 impulse from them as they flowed from under them; but they soon came
 back, driven by the Indian, who had fallen a little behind us on account
 of the windings. He shot round a point just above, and came to land by
 us with considerable water in his canoe. He had found it, as he said,
 "very strong water," and had been obliged to land once before to empty
 out what he had taken in.
 
 [Illustration: _Coming Down the Rapids_]
 
 He complained that it strained him to paddle so hard in order to keep
 his canoe straight in its course, having no one in the bows to aid
 him, and, shallow as it was, said that it would be no joke to upset
 there, for the force of the water was such that he had as lief I would
 strike him over the head with a paddle as have that water strike him.
 Seeing him come out of that gap was as if you should pour water down an
 inclined and zigzag trough, then drop a nutshell into it, and, taking a
 short cut to the bottom, get there in time to see it come out,
 notwithstanding the rush and tumult, right side up, and only partly full
 of water.
 
 After a moment's breathing-space, while I held his canoe, he was soon
 out of sight again around another bend, and we, shouldering our packs,
 resumed our course.
 
 Before going a mile we heard the Indian calling to us. He had come up
 through the woods and along the path to find us, having reached
 sufficiently smooth water to warrant his taking us in. The shore was
 about one fourth of a mile distant through a dense, dark forest, and as
 he led us back to it, winding rapidly about to the right and left, I had
 the curiosity to look down carefully and found that he was following his
 steps backward. I could only occasionally perceive his trail in the
 moss, and yet he did not appear to look down nor hesitate an instant,
 but led us out exactly to his canoe. This surprised me, for without a
 compass, or the sight or noise of the river to guide us, we could not
 have kept our course many minutes, and could have retraced our steps but
 a short distance, with a great deal of pains and very slowly, using a
 laborious circumspection. But it was evident that he could go back
 through the forest wherever he had been during the day.
 
 After this rough walking in the dark woods it was an agreeable change to
 glide down the rapid river in the canoe once more. This river, though
 still very swift, was almost perfectly smooth here, and showed a very
 visible declivity, a regularly inclined plane, for several miles, like
 a mirror set a little aslant, on which we coasted down. It was very
 exhilarating, and the perfection of traveling, the coasting down this
 inclined mirror between two evergreen forests edged with lofty dead
 white pines, sometimes slanted half-way over the stream. I saw some
 monsters there, nearly destitute of branches, and scarcely diminishing
 in diameter for eighty or ninety feet.
 
 As we were thus swept along, our Indian repeated in a deliberate and
 drawling tone the words, "Daniel Webster, great lawyer," apparently
 reminded of him by the name of the stream, and he described his calling
 on him once in Boston at what he supposed was his boarding-house. He had
 no business with him but merely went to pay his respects, as we should
 say. It was on the day after Webster delivered his Bunker Hill oration.
 The first time he called he waited till he was tired without seeing him,
 and then went away. The next time he saw him go by the door of the room
 in which he was waiting several times, in his shirt-sleeves, without
 noticing him. He thought that if he had come to see Indians they would
 not have treated him so. At length, after very long delay, he came in,
 walked toward him, and asked in a loud voice, gruffly, "What do you
 want?" and he, thinking at first, by the motion of his hand, that he was
 going to strike him, said to himself, "You'd better take care; if you
 try that I shall know what to do."
 
 He did not like him, and declared that all he said "was not worth talk
 about a musquash."
 
 Coming to falls and rapids, our easy progress was suddenly terminated.
 The Indian went alongshore to inspect the water, while we climbed over
 the rocks, picking berries. When the Indian came back, he remarked, "You
 got to walk; ver' strong water."
 
 So, taking out his canoe, he launched it again below the falls, and was
 soon out of sight. At such times he would step into the canoe, take up
 his paddle, and start off, looking far down-stream as if absorbing all
 the intelligence of forest and stream into himself. We meanwhile
 scrambled along the shore with our packs, without any path. This was the
 last of _our_ boating for the day.
 
 The Indian now got along much faster than we, and waited for us from
 time to time. I found here the only cool spring that I drank at anywhere
 on this excursion, a little water filling a hollow in the sandy bank. It
 was a quite memorable event, and due to the elevation of the country,
 for wherever else we had been the water in the rivers and the streams
 emptying in was dead and warm, compared with that of a mountainous
 region. It was very bad walking along the shore over fallen and drifted
 trees and bushes, and rocks, from time to time swinging ourselves round
 over the water, or else taking to a gravel bar or going inland. At one
 place, the Indian being ahead, I was obliged to take off all my clothes
 in order to ford a small but deep stream emptying in, while my
 companion, who was inland, found a rude bridge, high up in the woods,
 and I saw no more of him for some time. I saw there very fresh moose
 tracks, and I passed one white pine log, lodged in the forest near the
 edge of the stream, which was quite five feet in diameter at the butt.
 
 Shortly after this I overtook the Indian at the edge of some burnt land,
 which extended three or four miles at least, beginning about three miles
 above Second Lake, which we were expecting to reach that night. This
 burnt region was still more rocky than before, but, though comparatively
 open, we could not yet see the lake. Not having seen my companion for
 some time, I climbed with the Indian a high rock on the edge of the
 river forming a narrow ridge only a foot or two wide at top, in order to
 look for him. After calling many times I at length heard him answer
 from a considerable distance inland, he having taken a trail which led
 off from the river, and being now in search of the river again. Seeing a
 much higher rock of the same character about one third of a mile farther
 down-stream, I proceeded toward it through the burnt land, in order to
 look for the lake from its summit, and hallooing all the while that my
 companion might join me on the way.
 
 Before we came together I noticed where a moose, which possibly I had
 scared by my shouting, had apparently just run along a large rotten
 trunk of a pine, which made a bridge thirty or forty feet long over a
 hollow, as convenient for him as for me. The tracks were as large as
 those of an ox, but an ox could not have crossed there. This burnt land
 was an exceedingly wild and desolate region. Judging by the weeds and
 sprouts, it appeared to have been burnt about two years before. It was
 covered with charred trunks, either prostrate or standing, which
 crocked our clothes and hands. Great shells of trees, sometimes unburnt
 without, or burnt on one side only, but black within, stood twenty or
 forty feet high. The fire had run up inside, as in a chimney, leaving
 the sapwood. There were great fields of fireweed, which presented masses
 of pink. Intermixed with these were blueberry and raspberry bushes.
 
 Having crossed a second rocky ridge, when I was beginning to ascend the
 third, the Indian, whom I had left on the shore, beckoned to me to come
 to him, but I made sign that I would first ascend the rock before me. My
 companion accompanied me to the top.
 
 There was a remarkable series of these great rock-waves revealed by the
 burning; breakers, as it were. No wonder that the river that found its
 way through them was rapid and obstructed by falls. We could see the
 lake over the woods, and that the river made an abrupt turn southward
 around the end of the cliff on which we stood, and that there was an
 important fall in it a short distance below us. I could see the canoe a
 hundred rods behind, but now on the opposite shore, and supposed that
 the Indian had concluded to take out and carry round some bad rapids on
 that side, but after waiting a while I could still see nothing of him,
 and I began to suspect that he had gone inland to look for the lake from
 some hilltop on that side. This proved to be the case, for after I had
 started to return to the canoe I heard a faint halloo, and descried him
 on the top of a distant rocky hill. I began to return along the ridge
 toward the angle in the river. My companion inquired where I was going;
 to which I answered that I was going far enough back to communicate with
 the Indian.
 
 When we reached the shore the Indian appeared from out the woods on the
 opposite side, but on account of the roar of the water it was difficult
 to communicate with him. He kept along the shore westward to his canoe,
 while we stopped at the angle where the stream turned southward around
 the precipice. I said to my companion that we would keep along the shore
 and keep the Indian in sight. We started to do so, being close together,
 the Indian behind us having launched his canoe again, but I saw the
 latter beckoning to me, and I called to my companion, who had just
 disappeared behind large rocks at the point of the precipice on his way
 down the stream, that I was going to help the Indian.
 
 I did so--helped get the canoe over a fall, lying with my breast over a
 rock, and holding one end while he received it below--and within ten or
 fifteen minutes I was back at the point where the river turned
 southward, while Polis glided down the river alone, parallel with me.
 But to my surprise, when I rounded the precipice, though the shore was
 bare of trees, without rocks, for a quarter of a mile at least, my
 companion was not to be seen. It was as if he had sunk into the earth.
 This was the more unaccountable to me, because I knew that his feet were
 very sore, and that he wished to keep with the party.
 
 I hastened along, hallooing and searching for him, thinking he might be
 concealed behind a rock, but the Indian had got along faster in his
 canoe, till he was arrested by the falls, about a quarter of a mile
 below. He then landed, and said that we could go no farther that night.
 The sun was setting, and on account of falls and rapids we should be
 obliged to leave this river and carry a good way into another farther
 east. The first thing then was to find my companion, for I was now very
 much alarmed about him, and I sent the Indian along the shore
 down-stream, which began to be covered with unburnt wood again just
 below the falls, while I searched backward about the precipice which we
 had passed.
 
 The Indian showed some unwillingness to exert himself, complaining that
 he was very tired in consequence of his day's work, that it had strained
 him getting down so many rapids alone; but he went off calling somewhat
 like an owl. I remembered that my companion was nearsighted, and I
 feared that he had either fallen from the precipice, or fainted and sunk
 down amid the rocks beneath it. I shouted and searched above and below
 this precipice in the twilight till I could not see, expecting nothing
 less than to find his body beneath it. For half an hour I anticipated
 and believed only the worst. I thought what I should do the next day if
 I did not find him, and how his relatives would feel if I should return
 without him. I felt that if he were really lost away from the river
 there, it would be a desperate undertaking to find him; and where were
 they who could help you? What would it be to raise the country, where
 there were only two or three camps, twenty or thirty miles apart, and
 no road, and perhaps nobody at home?
 
 I rushed down from this precipice to the canoe in order to fire the
 Indian's gun, but found that my companion had the caps. When the Indian
 returned he said that he had seen his tracks once or twice along the
 shore. This encouraged me very much. He objected to firing the gun,
 saying that if my companion heard it, which was not likely, on account
 of the roar of the stream, it would tempt him to come toward us, and he
 might break his neck in the dark. For the same reason we refrained from
 lighting a fire on the highest rock. I proposed that we should both keep
 down the stream to the lake, or that I should go at any rate, but the
 Indian said: "No use, can't do anything in the dark. Come morning, then
 we find 'em. No harm--he make 'em camp. No bad animals here--warm
 night--he well off as you and I."
 
 The darkness in the woods was by this so thick that it decided the
 question. We must camp where we were. I knew that he had his knapsack,
 with blankets and matches, and, if well, would fare no worse than we,
 except that he would have no supper nor society.
 
 This side of the river being so encumbered with rocks, we crossed to the
 eastern or smoother shore, and proceeded to camp there, within two or
 three rods of the falls. We pitched no tent, but lay on the sand,
 putting a few handfuls of grass and twigs under us, there being no
 evergreen at hand. For fuel we had some of the charred stumps. Our
 various bags of provisions had got quite wet in the rapids, and I
 arranged them about the fire to dry. The fall close by was the principal
 one on this stream, and it shook the earth under us. It was a cool, dewy
 night. I lay awake a good deal from anxiety. From time to time I fancied
 that I heard his voice calling through the roar of the falls from the
 opposite side of the river; but it is doubtful if we could have heard
 him across the stream there. Sometimes I doubted whether the Indian had
 really seen his tracks, since he manifested an unwillingness to make
 much of a search.
 
 It was the most wild and desolate region we had camped in, where, if
 anywhere, one might expect to meet with befitting inhabitants, but I
 heard only the squeak of a nighthawk flitting over. The moon in her
 first quarter, in the fore part of the night, setting over the bare
 rocky hills garnished with tall, charred, and hollow stumps or shells of
 trees, served to reveal the desolation.
 
 
 
 
 VIII
 
 THURSDAY, JULY 30
 
 
 I aroused the Indian early to go in search of our companion, expecting
 to find him within a mile or two, farther down the stream. The Indian
 wanted his breakfast first, but I reminded him that my companion had had
 neither breakfast nor supper. We were obliged first to carry our canoe
 and baggage over into another stream, the main East Branch, about three
 fourths of a mile distant, for Webster Stream was no farther navigable.
 We went twice over this carry, and the dewy bushes wet us through like
 water up to the middle. I hallooed from time to time, though I had
 little expectation that I could be heard over the roar of the rapids.
 
 In going over this portage the last time, the Indian, who was before me
 with the canoe on his head, stumbled and fell heavily once, and lay for
 a moment silent as if in pain. I hastily stepped forward to help him,
 asking if he was much hurt, but after a moment's pause, without
 replying, he sprang up and went forward.
 
 We had launched our canoe and gone but little way down the East Branch,
 when I heard an answering shout from my companion, and soon after saw
 him standing on a point where there was a clearing a quarter of a mile
 below, and the smoke of his fire was rising near by. Before I saw him I
 naturally shouted again and again, but the Indian curtly remarked, "He
 hears you," as if once was enough.
 
 It was just below the mouth of Webster Stream. When we arrived he was
 smoking his pipe, and said that he had passed a pretty comfortable
 night, though it was rather cold, on account of the dew. It appeared
 that when we stood together the previous evening, and I was shouting to
 the Indian across the river, he, being nearsighted, had not seen the
 Indian nor his canoe, and when I went back to the Indian's assistance,
 did not see which way I went, and supposed that we were below and not
 above him, and so, making haste to catch up, he ran away from us. Having
 reached this clearing, a mile or more below our camp, the night overtook
 him, and he made a fire in a little hollow, and lay down by it in his
 blanket, still thinking that we were ahead of him.
 
 He had stuck up the remnant of a lumberer's shirt, found on the point,
 on a pole by the waterside for a signal, and attached a note to it to
 inform us that he had gone on to the lake, and that if he did not find
 us there he would be back in a couple of hours. If he had not found us
 soon he had some thoughts of going back in search of the solitary hunter
 whom we had met at Telos Lake, ten miles behind, and, if successful,
 hire him to take him to Bangor. But if this hunter had moved as fast as
 we, he would have been twenty miles off by this time, and who could
 guess in what direction? It would have been like looking for a needle in
 a haymow to search for him in these woods. He had been considering how
 long he could live on berries alone.
 
 We all had good appetites for the breakfast which we made haste to cook
 here, and then, having partially dried our clothes, we glided swiftly
 down the winding stream toward Second Lake.
 
 As the shores became flatter with frequent sandbars, and the stream more
 winding in the lower land near the lake, elms and ash trees made their
 appearance; also the wild yellow lily, some of whose bulbs I collected
 for a soup. On some ridges the burnt land extended as far as the lake.
 This was a very beautiful lake, two or three miles long, with high
 mountains on the southwest side. The morning was a bright one, and
 perfectly still, the lake as smooth as glass, we making the only ripple
 as we paddled into it. The dark mountains about it were seen through a
 glaucous mist, and the white stems of canoe birches mingled with the
 other woods around it. The thrush sang on the distant shore, and the
 laugh of some loons, sporting in a concealed western bay, as if inspired
 by the morning, came distinct over the lake to us. The beauty of the
 scene may have been enhanced to our eyes by the fact that we had just
 come together after a night of some anxiety.
 
 Having paddled down three quarters of the lake, we came to a standstill
 while my companion let down for fish. In the midst of our dreams of
 giant lake trout, even then supposed to be nibbling, our fisherman drew
 up a diminutive red perch, and we took up our paddles.
 
 It was not apparent where the outlet of the lake was, and while the
 Indian thought it was in one direction, I thought it was in another. He
 said, "I bet you fourpence it is there," but he still held on in my
 direction, which proved to be the right one.
 
 As we were approaching the outlet he suddenly exclaimed, "Moose! moose!"
 and told us to be still. He put a cap on his gun, and, standing up in
 the stern, rapidly pushed the canoe straight toward the shore and the
 moose. It was a cow moose, about thirty rods off, standing in the water
 by the side of the outlet, partly behind some fallen timber and bushes,
 and at that distance she did not look very large. She was flapping her
 large ears, and from time to time poking off the flies with her nose
 from some part of her body. She did not appear much alarmed by our
 neighborhood, only occasionally turned her head and looked straight at
 us, and then gave her attention to the flies again. As we approached
 nearer she got out of the water, stood higher, and regarded us more
 suspiciously.
 
 Polis pushed the canoe steadily forward in the shallow water, but the
 canoe soon grounded in the mud eight or ten rods distant from the
 moose, and the Indian seized his gun. After standing still a moment she
 turned so as to expose her side, and he improved this moment to fire,
 over our heads. She thereupon moved off eight or ten rods at a moderate
 pace across a shallow bay to the opposite shore, and she stood still
 again while the Indian hastily loaded and fired twice at her, without
 her moving. My companion, who passed him his caps and bullets, said that
 Polis was as excited as a boy of fifteen, that his hand trembled, and he
 once put his ramrod back upside down.
 
 The Indian now pushed quickly and quietly back, and a long distance
 round, in order to get into the outlet,--for he had fired over the neck
 of a peninsula between it and the lake,--till we approached the place
 where the moose had stood, when he exclaimed, "She is a goner!"
 
 [Illustration: _Shooting the Moose_]
 
 There, to be sure, she lay perfectly dead, just where she had stood
 to receive the last shots. Using a tape, I found that the moose measured
 six feet from the shoulder to the tip of the hoof, and was eight feet
 long.
 
 Polis, preparing to skin the moose, asked me to help him find a stone on
 which to sharpen his large knife. It being flat alluvial ground, covered
 with red maples, etc., this was no easy matter. We searched far and wide
 a long time till at length I found a flat kind of slate stone, on which
 he soon made his knife very sharp.
 
 While he was skinning the moose I proceeded to ascertain what kind of
 fishes were to be found in the sluggish and muddy outlet. The greatest
 difficulty was to find a pole. It was almost impossible to find a
 slender, straight pole ten or twelve feet long in those woods. You might
 search half an hour in vain. They are commonly spruce, arbor-vitae, fir,
 etc., short, stout, and branchy, and do not make good fishpoles, even
 after you have patiently cut off all their tough and scraggy branches.
 The fishes were red perch and chivin.
 
 The Indian, having cut off a large piece of sirloin, the upper lip, and
 the tongue, wrapped them in the hide, and placed them in the bottom of
 the canoe, observing that there was "one man," meaning the weight of
 one. Our load had previously been reduced some thirty pounds, but a
 hundred pounds were now added, which made our quarters still more
 narrow, and considerably increased the danger on the lakes and rapids as
 well as the labor of the carries. The skin was ours according to custom,
 since the Indian was in our employ, but we did not think of claiming it.
 He being a skillful dresser of moose-hides would make it worth seven or
 eight dollars to him, as I was told. He said that he sometimes earned
 fifty or sixty dollars in a day at them; he had killed ten moose in one
 day, though the skinning and all took two days. This was the way he had
 got his property.
 
 We continued along the outlet through a swampy region, by a long,
 winding deadwater, very much choked up by wood, where we were obliged to
 land sometimes in order to get the canoe over a log. It was hard to find
 any channel, and we did not know but we should be lost in the swamp. It
 abounded in ducks, as usual. At length we reached Grand Lake.
 
 We stopped to dine on an interesting rocky island, securing our canoe to
 the cliffy shore. Here was a good opportunity to dry our dewy blankets
 on the open sunny rock. Indians had recently camped here, and
 accidentally burned over the western end of the island. Polis picked up
 a gun-case of blue broadcloth, and said that he knew the Indian it
 belonged to and would carry it to him. His tribe is not so large but he
 may know all its effects. We proceeded to make a fire and cook our
 dinner amid some pines.
 
 I saw where the Indians had made canoes in a little secluded hollow in
 the woods, on the top of the rock, where they were out of the wind, and
 large piles of whittlings remained. This must have been a favorite
 resort of their ancestors, and, indeed, we found here the point of an
 arrow-head, such as they have not used for two centuries and now know
 not how to make. The Indian picked up a yellowish curved bone by the
 side of our fireplace and asked me to guess what it was. It was one of
 the upper incisors of a beaver, on which some party had feasted within a
 year or two. I found also most of the teeth and the skull. We here dined
 on fried moose meat.
 
 Our blankets being dry, we set out again, the Indian, as usual, having
 left his gazette on a tree. We paddled southward, keeping near the
 western shore. The Indian did not know exactly where the outlet was, and
 he went feeling his way by a middle course between two probable points,
 from which he could diverge either way at last without losing much
 distance. In approaching the south shore, as the clouds looked gusty and
 the waves ran pretty high, we so steered as to get partly under the lee
 of an island, though at a great distance from it.
 
 I could not distinguish the outlet till we were almost in it, and heard
 the water falling over the dam there. Here was a considerable fall, and
 a very substantial dam, but no sign of a cabin or camp.
 
 While we loitered here Polis took occasion to cut with his big knife
 some of the hair from his moose-hide, and so lightened and prepared it
 for drying. I noticed at several old Indian camps in the woods the pile
 of hair which they had cut from their hides.
 
 Having carried over the dam, he darted down the rapids, leaving us to
 walk for a mile or more, where for the most part there was no path, but
 very thick and difficult traveling near the stream. He would call to
 let us know where he was waiting for us with his canoe, when, on account
 of the windings of the stream, we did not know where the shore was, but
 he did not call often enough, forgetting that we were not Indians. He
 seemed to be very saving of his breath--yet he would be surprised if we
 went by, or did not strike the right spot. This was not because he was
 unaccommodating, but a proof of superior manners. Indians like to get
 along with the least possible communication and ado. He was really
 paying us a great compliment all the while, thinking that we preferred a
 hint to a kick.
 
 At length, climbing over the willows and fallen trees, when this was
 easier than to go round or under them, we overtook the canoe, and glided
 down the stream in smooth but swift water for several miles. I here
 observed, as at Webster Stream, that the river was a smooth and
 regularly inclined plane down which we coasted.
 
 We decided to camp early that we might have ample time before dark. So
 we stopped at the first favorable shore, where there was a narrow
 gravelly beach, some five miles below the outlet of the lake. Two steps
 from the water on either side, and you come to the abrupt, bushy, and
 rooty, if not turfy, edge of the bank, four or five feet high, where the
 interminable forest begins, as if the stream had but just cut its way
 through it.
 
 It is surprising on stepping ashore anywhere into this unbroken
 wilderness to see so often, at least within a few rods of the river, the
 marks of the axe, made by lumberers who have either camped here or
 driven logs past in previous springs. You will see perchance where they
 have cut large chips from a tall white pine stump for their fire.
 
 While we were pitching the camp and getting supper, the Indian cut the
 rest of the hair from his moose-hide, and proceeded to extend it
 vertically on a temporary frame between two small trees, half a dozen
 feet from the opposite side of the fire, lashing and stretching it with
 arbor-vitae bark. Asking for a new kind of tea, he made us some pretty
 good of the checkerberry, which covered the ground, dropping a little
 bunch of it tied up with cedar bark into the kettle.
 
 After supper he put on the moose tongue and lips to boil. He showed me
 how to write on the under side of birch bark with a black spruce twig,
 which is hard and tough and can be brought to a point.
 
 The Indian wandered off into the woods a short distance just before
 night, and, coming back, said, "Me found great treasure."
 
 "What's that?" we asked.
 
 "Steel traps, under a log, thirty or forty, I didn't count 'em. I guess
 Indian work--worth three dollars apiece."
 
 It was a singular coincidence that he should have chanced to walk to and
 look under that particular log in that trackless forest.
 
 I saw chivin and chub in the stream when washing my hands, but my
 companion tried in vain to catch them. I heard the sound of bullfrogs
 from a swamp on the opposite side.
 
 You commonly make your camp just at sundown, and are collecting wood,
 getting your supper, or pitching your tent while the shades of night are
 gathering around and adding to the already dense gloom of the forest.
 You have no time to explore or look around you before it is dark. You
 may penetrate half a dozen rods farther into that twilight wilderness
 after some dry bark to kindle your fire with, and wonder what mysteries
 lie hidden still deeper in it, or you may run down to the shore for a
 dipper of water, and get a clearer view for a short distance up or down
 the stream, and while you stand there, see a fish leap, or duck alight
 in the river, or hear a thrush or robin sing in the woods.
 
 But there is no sauntering off to see the country. Ten or fifteen rods
 seems a great way from your companions, and you come back with the air
 of a much traveled man, as from a long journey, with adventures to
 relate, though you may have heard the crackling of the fire all the
 while--and at a hundred rods you might be lost past recovery and have to
 camp out. It is all mossy and _moosey_. In some of those dense fir and
 spruce woods there is hardly room for the smoke to go up. The trees are
 a _standing_ night, and every fir and spruce which you fell is a plume
 plucked from night's raven wing. Then at night the general stillness is
 more impressive than any sound, but occasionally you hear the note of an
 owl farther or nearer in the woods, and if near a lake, the semihuman
 cry of the loons at their unearthly revels.
 
 To-night the Indian lay between the fire and his stretched moose-hide,
 to avoid mosquitoes. Indeed, he also made a small smoky fire of damp
 leaves at his head and feet, and then as usual rolled up his head in
 his blanket. We with our veils and our wash were tolerably comfortable,
 but it would be difficult to pursue any sedentary occupation in the
 woods at this season; you cannot see to read much by the light of a fire
 through a veil in the evening, nor handle pencil and paper well with
 gloves or anointed fingers.
 
 
 
 
 IX
 
 FRIDAY, JULY 31
 
 
 We had smooth but swift water for a considerable distance, where we
 glided rapidly along, scaring up ducks and kingfishers. But, as usual,
 our smooth progress ere long come to an end, and we were obliged to
 carry canoe and all about half a mile down the right bank around some
 rapids or falls. It required sharp eyes sometimes to tell which side was
 the carry, before you went over the falls, but Polis never failed to
 land us rightly. The raspberries were particularly abundant and large
 here, and all hands went to eating them, the Indian remarking on their
 size.
 
 Often on bare rocky carries the trail was so indistinct that I
 repeatedly lost it, but when I walked behind him I observed that he
 could keep it almost like a hound, and rarely hesitated, or, if he
 paused a moment on a bare rock, his eye immediately detected some sign
 which would have escaped me. Frequently _we_ found no path at all at
 these places, and were to him unaccountably delayed. He would only say
 it was "ver' strange."
 
 We had heard of a Grand Fall on this stream, and thought that each fall
 we came to must be it, but after christening several in succession with
 this name we gave up the search. There were more Grand or Petty Falls
 than I can remember.
 
 I cannot tell how many times we had to walk on account of falls or
 rapids. We were expecting all the while that the river would take a
 final leap and get to smooth water, but there was no improvement this
 forenoon. However, the carries were an agreeable variety. So surely as
 we stepped out of the canoe and stretched our legs we found ourselves in
 a blueberry and raspberry garden, each side of our rocky trail being
 lined with one or both. There was not a carry on the main East Branch
 where we did not find an abundance of both these berries, for these
 were the rockiest places and partially cleared, such as these plants
 prefer, and there had been none to gather the finest before us.
 
 We bathed and dined at the foot of one of these carries. It was the
 Indian who commonly reminded us that it was dinner-time, sometimes even
 by turning the prow to the shore. He once made an indirect, but lengthy
 apology, by saying that we might think it strange, but that one who
 worked hard all day was very particular to have his dinner in good
 season. At the most considerable fall on this stream, when I was walking
 over the carry close behind the Indian, he observed a track on the rock,
 which was but slightly covered with soil, and, stooping, muttered,
 "Caribou."
 
 When we returned, he observed a much larger track near the same place,
 where some animal's foot had sunk into a small hollow in the rock,
 partly filled with grass and earth, and he exclaimed with surprise,
 "What that?"
 
 "Well, what is it?" I asked.
 
 Stooping and laying his hand in it, he answered with a mysterious air,
 and in a half-whisper, "Devil [that is, Indian devil, or cougar]--ledges
 about here--very bad animal--pull 'em rocks all to pieces."
 
 "How long since it was made?" I asked.
 
 "To-day or yesterday," said he.
 
 We spent at least half the time in walking to-day. The Indian, being
 alone, commonly ran down far below the foot of the carries before he
 waited for us. The carry-paths themselves were more than usually
 indistinct, often the route being revealed only by the countless small
 holes in the fallen timber made by the tacks in the drivers' boots. It
 was a tangled and perplexing thicket, through which we stumbled and
 threaded our way, and when we had finished a mile of it, our
 starting-point seemed far away. We were glad that we had not got to
 walk to Bangor along the banks of this river, which would be a journey
 of more than a hundred miles. Think of the denseness of the forest, the
 fallen trees and rocks, the windings of the river, the streams emptying
 in, and the frequent swamps to be crossed. It made you shudder. Yet the
 Indian from time to time pointed out to us where he had thus crept along
 day after day when he was a boy of ten, and in a starving condition.
 
 He had been hunting far north of this with two grown Indians. The winter
 came on unexpectedly early, and the ice compelled them to leave their
 canoe at Grand Lake, and walk down the bank. They shouldered their furs
 and started for Oldtown. The snow was not deep enough for snowshoes, or
 to cover the inequalities of the ground. Polis was soon too weak to
 carry any burden, but he managed to catch one otter. This was the most
 they all had to eat on this journey, and he remembered how good the
 yellow lily roots were, made into a soup with the otter oil. He shared
 this food equally with the other two, but being so small he suffered
 much more than they. He waded through the Mattawamkeag at its mouth,
 when it was freezing cold and came up to his chin, and he, being very
 weak and emaciated, expected to be swept away. The first house which
 they reached was at Lincoln, and thereabouts they met a white teamster
 with supplies, who, seeing their condition, gave them as much as they
 could eat. For six months after getting home he was very low and did not
 expect to live, and was perhaps always the worse for it.
 
 For seven or eight miles below that succession of "Grand" falls the
 aspect of the banks as well as the character of the stream was changed.
 After passing a tributary from the northeast we had swift smooth water.
 Low grassy banks and muddy shores began. Many elms as well as maples and
 more ash trees overhung the stream and supplanted the spruce.
 
 Mosquitoes, black flies, etc., pursued us in mid-channel, and we were
 glad sometimes to get into violent rapids, for then we escaped them. As
 we glided swiftly down the inclined plane of the river, a great cat owl
 launched itself away from a stump on the bank, and flew heavily across
 the stream, and the Indian, as usual, imitated its note. Soon afterward
 a white-headed eagle sailed down the stream before us. We drove him
 several miles, while we were looking for a good place to camp,--for we
 expected to be overtaken by a shower,--and still we could distinguish
 him by his white tail, sailing away from time to time from some tree by
 the shore still farther down the stream. Some _she-corways_ being
 surprised by us, a part of them dived, and we passed directly over them,
 and could trace their course here and there by a bubble on the surface,
 but we did not see them come up.
 
 It was some time before we found a camping-place, for the shore was
 either too grassy and muddy, where mosquitoes abounded, or too steep a
 hillside. We at length found a place to our minds, where, in a very
 dense spruce wood above a gravelly shore, there seemed to be but few
 insects. The trees were so thick that we were obliged to clear a space
 to build our fire and lie down in, and the young spruce trees that were
 left were like the wall of an apartment rising around us. We were
 obliged to pull ourselves up a steep bank to get there. But the place
 which you have selected for your camp, though never so rough and grim,
 begins at once to have its attractions, and becomes a very center of
 civilization to you: "Home is home, be it never so homely."
 
 The mosquitoes were numerous, and the Indian complained a good deal,
 though he lay, as the night before, between three fires and his
 stretched hide. As I sat on a stump by the fire with a veil and gloves
 on, trying to read, he observed, "I make you candle," and in a minute he
 took a piece of birch bark about two inches wide and rolled it hard,
 like an allumette[4] fifteen inches long, lit it, fixed it by the other
 end horizontally in a split stick three feet high, and stuck it in the
 ground, turning the blazing end to the wind, and telling me to snuff it
 from time to time. It answered the purpose of a candle pretty well.
 
 I noticed, as I had before, that there was a lull among the mosquitoes
 about midnight, and that they began again in the morning. Apparently
 they need rest as well as we. Few, if any, creatures are equally active
 all night. As soon as it was light I saw, through my veil, that the
 inside of the tent about our heads was quite blackened with myriads, and
 their combined hum was almost as bad to endure as their stings. I had an
 uncomfortable night on this account, though I am not sure that one
 succeeded in his attempt to sting me.
 
 FOOTNOTES:
 
 [4] A match. In this case an old-fashioned "spill," or lamplighter, made
 by twisting a piece of paper, into a long, tight spiral roll.
 
 
 
 
 X
 
 SATURDAY, SUNDAY, MONDAY AUGUST 1-3
 
 
 I caught two or three large red chivin within twenty feet of the camp,
 which, added to the moose tongue that had been left in the kettle
 boiling over night, and to our other stores, made a sumptuous breakfast.
 The Indian made us some hemlock tea instead of coffee. This was
 tolerable, though he said it was not strong enough. It was interesting
 to see so simple a dish as a kettle of water with a handful of green
 hemlock sprigs in it boiling over the huge fire in the open air, the
 leaves fast losing their lively green color, and know that it was for
 our breakfast.
 
 We were glad to embark once more and leave some of the mosquitoes
 behind. We found that we had camped about a mile above Hunt's, which is
 the last house for those who ascend Katahdin on this side. We had
 expected to ascend it from this point, but my companion was obliged to
 give up this on account of sore feet. The Indian, however, suggested
 that perhaps he might get a pair of moccasins at this place, and that he
 could walk very easily in them without hurting his feet, wearing several
 pairs of stockings, and he said beside that they were so porous that
 when you had taken in water it all drained out in a little while. We
 stopped to get some sugar, but found that the family had moved away, and
 the house was unoccupied, except temporarily by some men who were
 getting the hay. I noticed a seine here stretched on the bank, which
 probably had been used to catch salmon.
 
 Just below this, on the west bank, we saw a moose-hide stretched, and
 with it a bearskin. The Indian said they belonged to Joe Aitteon,[5] but
 how he told I do not know. He was probably hunting near and had left
 them for the day. Finding that we were going directly to Oldtown, he
 regretted that he had not taken more of the moose meat to his family,
 saying that in a short time, by drying it, he could have made it so
 light as to have brought away the greater part, leaving the bones. We
 once or twice inquired after the lip, which is a famous tidbit, but he
 said, "That go Oldtown for my old woman; don't get it every day."
 
 Maples grew more and more numerous. It rained a little during the
 forenoon, and, as we expected a wetting, we stopped early and dined just
 above Whetstone Falls, about a dozen miles below Hunt's. My companion,
 having lost his pipe, asked the Indian if he could make him one.
 
 "Oh, yer," said he, and in a minute rolled up one of birch bark, telling
 him to wet the bowl from time to time.
 
 We carried round the falls. The distance was about three fourths of a
 mile. When we had carried over one load, the Indian returned by the
 shore, and I by the path; and though I made no particular haste I was
 nevertheless surprised to find him at the other end as soon as I. It was
 remarkable how easily he got over the worst ground. He said to me, "I
 take canoe and you take the rest, suppose you can keep along with me?"
 
 I thought he meant that while he ran down the rapids I should keep along
 the shore, and be ready to assist him from time to time, as I had done
 before; but as the walking would be very bad, I answered, "I suppose you
 will go too fast for me, but I will try."
 
 But I was to go by the path, he said. This I thought would not help the
 matter, I should have so far to go to get to the riverside when he
 wanted me. But neither was this what he meant. He was proposing a race
 over the carry, and asked me if I thought I could keep along with him by
 the same path, adding that I must be pretty smart to do it. As his
 load, the canoe, would be much the heaviest and bulkiest, I thought that
 I ought to be able to do it, and said that I would try. So I proceeded
 to gather up the gun, axe, paddle, kettle, frying-pan, plates, dippers,
 carpets, etc., and while I was thus engaged he threw me his cowhide
 boots. "What, are these in the bargain?" I asked.
 
 "Oh, yer," said he; but before I could make a bundle of my load I saw
 him disappearing over a hill with the canoe on his head.
 
 Hastily scraping the various articles together, I started on the run,
 and immediately went by him in the bushes, but I had no sooner left him
 out of sight in a rocky hollow than the greasy plates, dippers, etc.,
 took to themselves wings, and while I was employed in gathering them up,
 he went by me; but, hastily pressing the sooty kettle to my side, I
 started once more, and, soon passing him again, I saw him no more on the
 carry. I do not mention this as anything of a feat, for it was but poor
 running on my part, and he was obliged to move with great caution for
 fear of breaking his canoe as well as his neck. When he made his
 appearance, puffing and panting like myself, in answer to my inquiries
 where he had been, he said, "Locks cut 'em feet," and, laughing, added,
 "Oh, me love to play sometimes."
 
 He said that he and his companions when they came to carries several
 miles long used to try who would get over first; each perhaps with a
 canoe on his head. I bore the sign of the kettle on my brown linen sack
 for the rest of the voyage.
 
 [Illustration: _Carrying round the Falls_]
 
 As we approached the mouth of the East Branch we passed two or three
 huts, the first sign of civilization after Hunt's, though we saw no road
 as yet. We heard a cowbell, and even saw an infant held up to a small
 square window to see us pass. On entering the West Branch at Nicketow,
 Polis remarked that it was all smooth water hence to Oldtown, and he
 threw away his pole which was cut on the Umbazookskus.
 
 We camped about two miles below Nicketow, covering with fresh twigs the
 withered bed of a former traveler, and feeling that we were now in a
 settled country, especially when in the evening we heard an ox sneeze in
 its wild pasture across the river. Wherever you land along the
 frequented part of the river you have not far to go to find these sites
 of temporary inns, the withered bed of flattened twigs, the charred
 sticks, and perhaps the tent-poles. Not long since, similar beds were
 spread along the Connecticut, the Hudson, and the Delaware, and longer
 still ago, by the Thames and Seine, and they now help to make the soil
 where private and public gardens, mansions, and palaces are. We could
 not get fir twigs for our bed here, and the spruce was harsh in
 comparison, having more twig in proportion to its leaf, but we improved
 it somewhat with hemlock.
 
 After the regular supper we attempted to make a lily soup of the bulbs
 which I had brought along, for I wished to learn all I could before I
 got out of the woods. Following the Indian's directions, I washed the
 bulbs carefully, minced some moose meat and some pork, salted and boiled
 all together, but we had not the patience to try the experiment fairly,
 for he said it must be boiled till the roots were completely softened so
 as to thicken the soup like flour; but though we left it on all night,
 we found it dried to the kettle in the morning and not yet boiled to a
 flour. Perhaps the roots were not ripe enough, for they commonly gather
 them in the fall. The Indian's name for these bulbs was _sheepnoc_.
 
 He prepared to camp as usual between his moose-hide and the fire, but it
 beginning to rain suddenly he took refuge under the tent with us, and
 gave us a song before falling asleep. It rained hard in the night and
 spoiled another box of matches for us, which the Indian had left out,
 for he was very careless; but we had so much the better night for the
 rain, since it kept the mosquitoes down.
 
 Sunday, a cloudy and unpromising morning. One of us observed to the
 Indian, "You did not stretch your moose-hide last night, did you, Mr.
 Polis?"
 
 Whereat he replied in a tone of surprise, though perhaps not of ill
 humor: "What you ask me that question for? Suppose I stretch 'em, you
 see 'em. May be your way talking, may be all right, no Indian way."
 
 I had observed that he did not wish to answer the same question more
 than once, and was often silent when it was put again, as if he were
 moody. Not that he was incommunicative, for he frequently commenced a
 longwinded narrative of his own accord--repeated at length the tradition
 of some old battle, or some passage in the recent history of his tribe
 in which he had acted a prominent part, from time to time drawing a
 long breath, and resuming the thread of his tale, with the true
 story-teller's leisureliness. Especially after the day's work was over,
 and he had put himself in posture for the night, he would be
 unexpectedly sociable, and we would fall asleep before he got through.
 
 The Indian was quite sick this morning with the colic. I thought that he
 was the worse for the moose meat he had eaten.
 
 We reached the Mattawamkeag at half past eight in the morning, in the
 midst of a drizzling rain, and, after buying some sugar, set out again.
 
 The Indian growing much worse, we stopped in the north part of Lincoln
 to get some brandy for him, but, failing in this, an apothecary
 recommended Brandreth's pills, which he refused to take because he was
 not acquainted with them. He said, "Me doctor--first study my case, find
 out what ail 'em--then I know what to take."
 
 We stopped at mid-forenoon on an island and made him a dipper of tea.
 Here, too, we dined and did some washing and botanizing, while he lay on
 the bank. In the afternoon we went on a little farther. As a
 thunder-shower appeared to be coming up we stopped opposite a barn on
 the west bank. Here we were obliged to spend the rest of the day and
 night, on account of our patient, whose sickness did not abate. He lay
 groaning under his canoe on the bank, looking very woebegone. You would
 not have thought, if you had seen him lying about thus, that he was
 worth six thousand dollars and had been to Washington. It seemed to me
 that he made a greater ado about his sickness than a Yankee does, and
 was more alarmed about himself. We talked somewhat of leaving him with
 his people in Lincoln,--for that is one of their homes,--but he objected
 on account of the expense, saying, "Suppose me well in morning, you and
 I go Oldtown by noon."
 
 As we were taking our tea at twilight, while he lay groaning under his
 canoe, he asked me to get him a dipper of water. Taking the dipper in
 one hand, he seized his powderhorn with the other, and, pouring into it
 a charge or two of powder, stirred it up with his finger, and drank it
 off. This was all he took to-day after breakfast beside his tea.
 
 To save the trouble of pitching our tent, when we had secured our stores
 from wandering dogs, we camped in the solitary half-open barn near the
 bank, with the permission of the owner, lying on new-mown hay four feet
 deep. The fragrance of the hay, in which many ferns, etc., were mingled,
 was agreeable, though it was quite alive with grasshoppers which you
 could hear crawling through it. This served to graduate our approach to
 houses and feather beds. In the night some large bird, probably an owl,
 flitted through over our heads, and very early in the morning we were
 awakened by the twittering of swallows which had their nests there.
 
 We started early before breakfast, the Indian being considerably better,
 and soon glided by Lincoln, and stopped to breakfast two or three miles
 below this town.
 
 We frequently passed Indian islands with their small houses on them. The
 Penobscot Indians seem to be more social even than the whites. Ever and
 anon in the deepest wilderness of Maine you come to the log hut of a
 Yankee or Canada settler, but a Penobscot never takes up his residence
 in such a solitude. They are not even scattered about on their islands
 in the Penobscot, but gathered together on two or three, evidently for
 the sake of society. I saw one or two houses not now used by them,
 because, as our Indian said, they were too solitary.
 
 From time to time we met Indians in their canoes going up river. Our man
 did not commonly approach them, but only exchanged a few words with them
 at a distance. We took less notice of the scenery to-day, because we
 were in quite a settled country. The river became broad and sluggish,
 and we saw a blue heron winging its way slowly down the stream before
 us.
 
 The Sunkhaze, a short dead stream, comes in from the east two miles
 above Oldtown. Asking the meaning of this name, the Indian said,
 "Suppose you are going down Penobscot, just like we, and you see a canoe
 come out of bank and go along before you, but you no see 'em stream.
 That is _Sunkhaze_."
 
 He had previously complimented me on my paddling, saying that I paddled
 "just like anybody," giving me an Indian name which meant "great
 paddler." When off this stream he said to me, who sat in the bows, "Me
 teach you paddle."
 
 So, turning toward the shore, he got out, came forward, and placed my
 hands as he wished. He placed one of them quite outside the boat, and
 the other parallel with the first, grasping the paddle near the end,
 not over the flat extremity, and told me to slide it back and forth on
 the side of the canoe. This, I found, was a great improvement which I
 had not thought of, saving me the labor of lifting the paddle each time,
 and I wondered that he had not suggested it before. It is true, before
 our baggage was reduced we had been obliged to sit with our legs drawn
 up, and our knees above the side of the canoe, which would have
 prevented our paddling thus, or perhaps he was afraid of wearing out his
 canoe by constant friction on the side.
 
 I told him that I had been accustomed to sit in the stern, and lift my
 paddle at each stroke, getting a pry on the side each time, and I still
 paddled partly as if in the stern. He then wanted to see me paddle in
 the stern. So, changing paddles, for he had the longer and better one,
 and turning end for end, he sitting flat on the bottom and I on the
 crossbar, he began to paddle very hard, trying to turn the canoe,
 looking over his shoulder and laughing, but, finding it in vain, he
 relaxed his efforts, though we still sped along a mile or two very
 swiftly. He said that he had no fault to find with my paddling in the
 stern, but I complained that he did not paddle according to his own
 directions in the bows.
 
 As we drew near to Oldtown I asked Polis if he was not glad to get home
 again; but there was no relenting to his wildness, and he said, "It
 makes no difference to me where I am." Such is the Indian's pretense
 always.
 
 We approached the Indian Island through the narrow strait called "Cook."
 He said: "I 'xpect we take in some water there, river so high--never see
 it so high at this season. Very rough water there; swamp steamboat once.
 Don't you paddle till I tell you. Then you paddle right along."
 
 It was a very short rapid. When we were in the midst of it he shouted,
 "Paddle!" and we shot through without taking in a drop. Soon after the
 Indian houses came in sight. I could not at first tell my companion
 which of two or three large white ones was our guide's. He said it was
 the one with blinds.
 
 We landed opposite his door at about four in the afternoon, having come
 some forty miles this day. We stopped for an hour at his house. Mrs. P.
 wore a hat and had a silver brooch on her breast, but she was not
 introduced to us. The house was roomy and neat. A large new map of
 Oldtown and the Indian Island hung on the wall, and a clock opposite to
 it.
 
 This was the last that I saw of Joe Polis. We took the last train, and
 reached Bangor that night.
 
 THE END
 
 The Riverside Press
 
 CAMBRIDGE. MASSACHUSETTS
 
 U. S. A
 
 FOOTNOTES:
 
 [5] Joe Aitteon was Thoreau's guide on the second of his three
 excursions into the Maine Woods. He was an Indian whose home was on the
 same island where Polis lived.
 
 
 
 
 A SELECTED LIST OF OUT-OF-DOOR
 AND NATURE BOOKS
 
 
 _By JOHN BURROUGHS_
 
 The Summit of the Years
 Time and Change
 Leaf and Tendril
 Ways of Nature
 Far and Near
 Wake-Robin
 Winter Sunshine
 Pepacton, and Other Sketches
 Fresh Fields
 Signs and Seasons
 Birds and Poets, with Other Papers
 Locusts and Wild Honey
 Riverby
     Each of the above, 16mo, gilt top, $1.15 _net_.
 
 A Year in the Fields
     Selections appropriate to each season of the year from the writings of
     JOHN BURROUGHS. With a Biographical Sketch, and 24 illustrations
     from Photographs by CLIFTON JOHNSON. 12mo, gilt top, $1.50 _net_.
 
 Squirrels and Other Fur-Bearers
     Illustrated in color after AUDUBON. Square 12mo, $1.00 _net_.
 
 In the Catskills
     Illustrated by CLIFTON JOHNSON. $1.50 _net_.
 
 
 _By J. SMEATON CHASE_
 
 California Coast Trails
     16 full-page illustrations from Photographs. Large crown 8vo,
     $2.00 _net_.
 
 Yosemite Trails
     Illustrated. Large crown 8vo, $2.00 _net_.
 
 
 _By ELLERY H. CLARK_
 
 Reminiscences of an Athlete
     Illustrated. 12mo, $1.25 _net_.
 
 
 _By FANNIE HARDY ECKSTORM_
 
 The Woodpeckers
     With 5 colored Illustrations by LOUIS AGASSIZ FUERTES, and many
     Text Illustrations. Square 12mo, $1.00 _net_.
 
 
 _By FLORENCE MERRIAM BAILEY_
 
 Handbook of Birds of the Western United States
     Profusely illustrated by LOUIS AGASSIZ FUERTES. 12mo, $3.50 _net_.
 
 Birds of Village and Field
     A Bird Book for Beginners. With a General Field Color Key to 154
     Birds, and over 300 Illustrations. 12mo, $2.00 _net_.
 
 A-Birding on a Bronco
     With numerous Illustrations. 16mo, $1.25 _net_.
 
 My Summer in a Mormon Village
     Illustrated. 16mo, $1.00 _net_.
 
 Birds through an Opera-Glass
     Illustrated. 16mo, 75 cents _net_.
 
 
 _By MARY E. BAMFORD_
 
 Up and Down the Brooks
     Illustrated. 16mo, 75 cents _net_.
 
 
 _By C. WILLIAM BEEBE_
 
 Two Bird-Lovers in Mexico
     With more than one hundred illustrations. Large crown 8vo, $3.00
     _net_.
 
 
 _By FRANK BOLLES_
 
 Chocorua's Tenants
     Illustrated. 16mo, gilt top, $1.00 _net_.
 
 From Blomidon to Smoky, and Other Papers
 Land of the Lingering Snow. Chronicles of a Stroller in New England
   from January to June
 At the North of Bearcamp Water. Chronicles of a Stroller in New
   England from July to December
     Each of the above, 16mo, $1.25 _net_.
 
 
 _By EDWARD BRECK_
 
 Wilderness Pets at Camp Buckshaw
     Illustrated. Square crown 8vo, $1.50 _net_.
 
 
 _By EDWIN T. BREWSTER_
 
 Swimming
     With frontispiece and diagrams. 16mo, $1.00 _net_.
 
 
 _By SIMON B. ELLIOTT_
 
 The Important Timber Trees of the United States
     With 47 Illustrations from Photographs. Large crown 8vo, $2.50 _net_.
 
 
 _By THOMAS WENTWORTH HIGGINSON_
 
 Outdoor Studies, and Poems
     12mo, gilt top, $2.00 _net_.
 
 The Procession of the Flowers, and Kindred Papers
     With Frontispiece, and an Index of Plants and Animals mentioned. 16mo,
     gilt top, $1.25 _net_.
 
 
 _By RALPH HOFFMANN_
 
 A Guide to the Birds of New England and Eastern New
   York
     With 4 full-page plates by LOUIS AGASSIZ FUERTES, and about 100
     cuts in the text. 12mo, $1.50 _net_. _Field Edition_, bound in
     flexible leather, pocket size. $2.00 _net_.
 
 
 _By SARAH ORNE JEWETT_
 
 Country By-ways
     18mo, gilt top, $1.00 _net_.
 
 
 _By JAMES RUSSELL LOWELL_
 
 My Garden Acquaintance
     32mo, 40 cents _net_; postpaid.
 
 
 _By OLIVE THORNE MILLER_
 
 The Bird Our Brother
     12mo, $1.25 _net_.
 
 With the Birds in Maine
     16mo, $1.10 _net_.
 
 The First Book of Birds
     With colored Illustrations. Square 12mo, $1.00.
 
 The Second Book of Birds: Bird Families
     With colored Illustrations by LOUIS AGASSIZ FUERTES. Square 12mo, $1.00
     _net_.
 
 True Bird Stories from My Note-Books
     With Illustrations by LOUIS AGASSIZ FUERTES. 12mo, $1.00 _net_.
 
 
 _By SAMUEL H. SCUDDER_
 
 Frail Children of the Air: Excursions into the World of Butterflies
     With 9 plates. 16mo, 75 cents _net_.
 
 Every-Day Butterflies
     With numerous Illustrations, including 8 full-page colored
     Plates. Crown 8vo, $2.00 _net_.
 
 
 _By DALLAS LORE SHARP_
 
 Where Rolls the Oregon
     Illustrated. Crown 8vo, $1.25 _net_.
 
 Nature Series:
   Book I. The Fall of the Year
   Book II. Winter
   Book III. The Spring of the Year
   Book IV. Summer
     Illustrated by ROBERT B. HORSFALL. Each, 12mo, 60 cents, _net_;
     postpaid.
 
 The Face of the Fields
     12mo, $1.25 _net_.
 
 The Lay of the Land
     With illustrated Chapter Headings. 12mo, $1.25 _net_.
 
 
 _By CELIA THAXTER_
 
 An Island Garden
     With Portrait. Crown 8vo, $1.25 _net_.
 
 Among the Isles of Shoals
     Illustrated. 18mo, $1.25 _net_.
 
 Poems
     Edited, with a Preface, by SARAH ORNE JEWETT. 12mo, gilt top,
     $1.50 _net_.
 
 
 _By HENRY D. THOREAU_
 
 A Week on the Concord and Merrimack Rivers. With Portrait.
 
 Walden; or, Life in the Woods
 
 The Maine Woods
 
 Cape Cod
 
 Early Spring in Massachusetts          Autumn
 Summer. With Map of Concord.           Winter
     The above four are from the Journal of THOREAU. Edited by H. G.
     O. BLAKE.
 
 
 
 
 TRANSCRIBER'S NOTE
 
     The illustration "The Red Squirrel" appears facing page 78, not
     page 88. List of Illustrations amended.
 
     Page 37: "phenemona" amended to "phenomena"
 
 
 
 
 
 
 

 
 
 
 Produced by Charles Franks and the Online Distributed
 Proofreading Team. HTML version by Al Haines.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 Wild Apples.
 
 
 By
 
 Henry David Thoreau
 
 
 
 
 CONTENTS
 
   THE HISTORY OF THE APPLE-TREE.
   THE WILD APPLE.
   THE CRAB.
   HOW THE WILD APPLE GROWS.
   THE FRUIT, AND ITS FLAVOR.
   THEIR BEAUTY.
   THE NAMING OF THEM.
   THE LAST GLEANING.
   THE "FROZEN-THAWED" APPLE.
 
 
 
 
 THE HISTORY OF THE APPLE-TREE.
 
 It is remarkable how closely the history of the Apple-tree is connected
 with that of man. The geologist tells us that the order of the
 Rosaceae, which includes the Apple, also the true Grasses, and the
 Labiatae, or Mints, were introduced only a short time previous to the
 appearance of man on the globe.
 
 It appears that apples made a part of the food of that unknown
 primitive people whose traces have lately been found at the bottom of
 the Swiss lakes, supposed to be older than the foundation of Rome, so
 old that they had no metallic implements. An entire black and
 shrivelled Crab-Apple has been recovered from their stores.
 
 Tacitus says of the ancient Germans that they satisfied their hunger
 with wild apples, among other things.
 
 Niebuhr[1] observes that "the words for a house, a field, a plough,
 ploughing, wine, oil, milk, sheep, apples, and others relating to
 agriculture and the gentler ways of life, agree in Latin and Greek,
 while the Latin words for all objects pertaining to war or the chase
 are utterly alien from the Greek." Thus the apple-tree may be
 considered a symbol of peace no less than the olive.
 
 [1] A German historical critic of ancient life.
 
 The apple was early so important, and so generally distributed, that
 its name traced to its root in many languages signifies fruit in
 general. Maelon (Melon), in Greek, means an apple, also the fruit of
 other trees, also a sheep and any cattle, and finally riches in general.
 
 The apple-tree has been celebrated by the Hebrews, Greeks, Romans, and
 Scandinavians. Some have thought that the first human pair were tempted
 by its fruit. Goddesses are fabled to have contended for it, dragons
 were set to watch it, and heroes were employed to pluck it.[2]
 
 [2] The Greek myths especially referred to are The Choice of Paris and
 The Apples of the Hesperides.
 
 The tree is mentioned in at least three places in the Old Testament,
 and its fruit in two or three more. Solomon sings, "As the apple-tree
 among the trees of the wood, so is my beloved among the sons." And
 again, "Stay me with flagons, comfort me with apples." The noblest part
 of man's noblest feature is named from this fruit, "the apple of the
 eye."
 
 The apple-tree is also mentioned by Homer and Herodotus. Ulysses saw in
 the glorious garden of Alcinous "pears and pomegranates and apple-trees
 bearing beautiful fruit." And according to Homer, apples were among the
 fruits which Tantalus could not pluck, the wind ever blowing their
 boughs away from him. Theophrastus knew and described the apple-tree as
 a botanist.
 
 According to the prose Edda,[3] "Iduna keeps in a box the apples which
 the gods, when they feel old age approaching, have only to taste of to
 become young again. It is in this manner that they will be kept in
 renovated youth until Ragnarok" (or the destruction of the Gods).
 
 [3] The stories of the early Scandinavians.
 
 I learn from Loudon[4] that "the ancient Welsh bards were rewarded for
 excelling in song by the token of the apple-spray;" and "in the
 Highlands of Scotland the apple-tree is the badge of the clan Lamont."
 
 [4] An English authority on the culture of orchards and gardens.
 
 The apple-tree belongs chiefly to the northern temperate zone. Loudon
 says, that "it grows spontaneously in every part of Europe except the
 frigid zone, and throughout Western Asia, China and Japan." We have
 also two or three varieties of the apple indigenous in North America.
 The cultivated apple-tree was first introduced into this country by the
 earliest settlers, and is thought to do as well or better here than
 anywhere else. Probably some of the varieties which are now cultivated
 were first introduced into Britain by the Romans.
 
 Pliny, adopting the distinction of Theophrastus, says, "Of trees there
 are some which are altogether wild, some more civilized." Theophrastus
 includes the apple among the last; and, indeed, it is in this sense the
 most civilized of all trees. It is as harmless as a dove, as beautiful
 as a rose, and as valuable as flocks and herds. It has been longer
 cultivated than any other, and so is more humanized; and who knows but,
 like the dog, it will at length be no longer traceable to its wild
 original? It migrates with man, like the dog and horse and cow; first,
 perchance, from Greece to Italy, thence to England, thence to America;
 and our Western emigrant is still marching steadily toward the setting
 sun with the seeds of the apple in his pocket, or perhaps a few young
 trees strapped to his load. At least a million apple-trees are thus set
 farther westward this year than any cultivated ones grew last year.
 Consider how the Blossom-Week, like the Sabbath, is thus annually
 spreading over the prairies; for when man migrates he carries with him
 not only his birds, quadrupeds, insects, vegetables, and his very
 sward, but his orchard also.
 
 The leaves and tender twigs are an agreeable food to many domestic
 animals, as the cow, horse, sheep, and goat; and the fruit is sought
 after by the first, as well as by the hog. Thus there appears to have
 existed a natural alliance between these animals and this tree from the
 first. "The fruit of the Crab in the forests of France" is said to be
 "a great resource for the wild boar."
 
 Not only the Indian, but many indigenous insects, birds, and
 quadrupeds, welcomed the apple-tree to these shores. The
 tent-caterpillar saddled her eggs on the very first twig that was
 formed, and it has since shared her affections with the wild cherry;
 and the canker-worm also in a measure abandoned the elm to feed on it.
 As it grew apace, the bluebird, robin, cherry-bird, king-bird, and many
 more, came with haste and built their nests and warbled in its boughs,
 and so became orchard-birds, and multiplied more than ever. It was an
 era in the history of their race. The downy woodpecker found such a
 savory morsel under its bark, that he perforated it in a ring quite
 round the tree before he left it,--a thing which he had never done
 before, to my knowledge. It did not take the partridge long to find out
 how sweet its buds were, and every winter eve she flew, and still
 flies, from the wood, to pluck them, much to the farmer's sorrow. The
 rabbit, too, was not slow to learn the taste of its twigs and bark; and
 when the fruit was ripe, the squirrel half-rolled, half-carried it to
 his hole; and even the musquash crept up the bank from the brook at
 evening, and greedily devoured it, until he had worn a path in the
 grass there; and when it was frozen and thawed, the crow and the jay
 were glad to taste it occasionally. The owl crept into the first
 apple-tree that became hollow, and fairly hooted with delight, finding
 it just the place for him; so, settling down into it, he has remained
 there ever since.
 
 My theme being the Wild Apple, I will merely glance at some of the
 seasons in the annual growth of the cultivated apple, and pass on to my
 special province.
 
 The flowers of the apple are perhaps the most beautiful of any tree, so
 copious and so delicious to both sight and scent. The walker is
 frequently tempted to turn and linger near some more than usually
 handsome one, whose blossoms are two thirds expanded. How superior it
 is in these respects to the pear, whose blossoms are neither colored
 nor fragrant!
 
 By the middle of July, green apples are so large as to remind us of
 coddling, and of the autumn. The sward is commonly strewed with little
 ones which fall still-born, as it were,--Nature thus thinning them for
 us. The Roman writer Palladius said: "If apples are inclined to fall
 before their time, a stone placed in a split root will retain them."
 Some such notion, still surviving, may account for some of the stones
 which we see placed to be overgrown in the forks of trees. They have a
 saying in Suffolk, England,--
 
     "At Michaelmas time, or a little before,
      Half an apple goes to the core."
 
 Early apples begin to be ripe about the first of August; but I think
 that none of them are so good to eat as some to smell. One is worth
 more to scent your handkerchief with than any perfume which they sell
 in the shops. The fragrance of some fruits is not to be forgotten,
 along with that of flowers. Some gnarly apple which I pick up in the
 road reminds me by its fragrance of all the wealth of
 Pomona,[5]--carrying me forward to those days when they will be
 collected in golden and ruddy heaps in the orchards and about the
 cider-mills.
 
 [5] The Roman goddess of fruit and fruit-trees.
 
 A week or two later, as you are going by orchards or gardens,
 especially in the evenings, you pass through a little region possessed
 by the fragrance of ripe apples, and thus enjoy them without price, and
 without robbing anybody.
 
 There is thus about all natural products a certain volatile and
 ethereal quality which represents their highest value, and which cannot
 be vulgarized, or bought and sold. No mortal has ever enjoyed the
 perfect flavor of any fruit, and only the godlike among men begin to
 taste its ambrosial qualities. For nectar and ambrosia are only those
 fine flavors of every earthly fruit which our coarse palates fail to
 perceive,--just as we occupy the heaven of the gods without knowing it.
 When I see a particularly mean man carrying a load of fair and fragrant
 early apples to market, I seem to see a contest going on between him
 and his horse, on the one side, and the apples on the other, and, to my
 mind, the apples always gain it. Pliny says that apples are the
 heaviest of all things, and that the oxen begin to sweat at the mere
 sight of a load of them. Our driver begins to lose his load the moment
 he tries to transport them to where they do not belong, that is, to any
 but the most beautiful. Though he gets out from time to time, and feels
 of them, and thinks they are all there, I see the stream of their
 evanescent and celestial qualities going to heaven from his cart, while
 the pulp and skin and core only are going to market. They are not
 apples, but pomace. Are not these still Iduna's apples, the taste of
 which keeps the gods forever young? and think you that they will let
 Loki or Thjassi carry them off to Jotunheim,[6] while they grow
 wrinkled and gray? No, for Ragnarok, or the destruction of the gods, is
 not yet.
 
 [6] Jotunheim (Ye(r)t'-un-hime) in Scandinavian mythology was the home
 of the Jotun or Giants. Loki was a descendant of the gods, and a
 companion of the Giants. Thjassi (Tee-assy) was a giant.
 
 There is another thinning of the fruit, commonly near the end of August
 or in September, when the ground is strewn with windfalls; and this
 happens especially when high winds occur after rain. In some orchards
 you may see fully three quarters of the whole crop on the ground, lying
 in a circular form beneath the trees, yet hard and green,--or, if it is
 a hillside, rolled far down the hill. However, it is an ill wind that
 blows nobody any good. All the country over, people are busy picking up
 the windfalls, and this will make them cheap for early apple-pies.
 
 In October, the leaves falling, the apples are more distinct on the
 trees. I saw one year in a neighboring town some trees fuller of fruit
 than I remember to have ever seen before, small yellow apples hanging
 over the road. The branches were gracefully drooping with their weight,
 like a barberry-bush, so that the whole tree acquired a new character.
 Even the topmost branches, instead of standing erect, spread and
 drooped in all directions; and there were so many poles supporting the
 lower ones, that they looked like pictures of banian-trees. As an old
 English manuscript says, "The mo appelen the tree bereth the more sche
 boweth to the folk."
 
 Surely the apple is the noblest of fruits. Let the most beautiful or
 the swiftest have it. That should be the "going" price of apples.
 
 Between the fifth and twentieth of October I see the barrels lie under
 the trees. And perhaps I talk with one who is selecting some choice
 barrels to fulfil an order. He turns a specked one over many times
 before he leaves it out. If I were to tell what is passing in my mind,
 I should say that every one was specked which he had handled; for he
 rubs off all the bloom, and those fugacious ethereal qualities leave
 it. Cool evenings prompt the farmers to make haste, and at length I see
 only the ladders here and there left leaning against the trees.
 
 It would be well if we accepted these gifts with more joy and
 gratitude, and did not think it enough simply to put a fresh load of
 compost about the tree. Some old English customs are suggestive at
 least. I find them described chiefly in Brand's "Popular Antiquities."
 It appears that "on Christmas eve the farmers and their men in
 Devonshire take a large bowl of cider, with a toast in it, and carrying
 it in state to the orchard, they salute the apple-trees with much
 ceremony, in order to make them bear well the next season." This
 salutation consists in "throwing some of the cider about the roots of
 the tree, placing bits of the toast on the branches," and then,
 "encircling one of the best bearing trees in the orchard, they drink
 the following toast three several times:--
 
       "'Here's to thee, old apple-tree,
      Whence thou mayst bud, and whence thou mayst blow,
      And whence thou mayst bear apples enow!
         Hats-full! caps-full!
         Bushel, bushel, sacks-full!
         And my pockets full, too! Hurra!'"
 
 
 Also what was called "apple-howling" used to be practised in various
 counties of England on New-Year's eve. A troop of boys visited the
 different orchards, and, encircling the apple-trees, repeated the
 following words:--
 
     "Stand fast, root! bear well, top!
      Pray God send us a good howling crop:
      Every twig, apples big;
      Every bow, apples enow!"
 
 
 "They then shout in chorus, one of the boys accompanying them on a
 cow's horn. During this ceremony they rap the trees with their sticks."
 This is called "wassailing" the trees, and is thought by some to be "a
 relic of the heathen sacrifice to Pomona."
 
 Herrick sings,--
 
     "Wassaile the trees that they may beare
      You many a plum and many a peare;
      For more or less fruits they will bring
      As you so give them wassailing."
 
 Our poets have as yet a better right to sing of cider than of wine; but
 it behooves them to sing better than English Phillips did, else they
 will do no credit to their Muse.
 
 
 
 
 THE WILD APPLE.
 
 
 So much for the more civilized apple-trees (urbaniores, as Pliny calls
 them). I love better to go through the old orchards of ungrafted
 apple-trees, at whatever season of the year,--so irregularly planted:
 sometimes two trees standing close together; and the rows so devious
 that you would think that they not only had grown while the owner was
 sleeping, but had been set out by him in a somnambulic state. The rows
 of grafted fruit will never tempt me to wander amid them like these.
 But I now, alas, speak rather from memory than from any recent
 experience, such ravages have been made!
 
 Some soils, like a rocky tract called the Easterbrooks Country in my
 neighborhood, are so suited to the apple, that it will grow faster in
 them without any care, or if only the ground is broken up once a year,
 than it will in many places with any amount of care. The owners of this
 tract allow that the soil is excellent for fruit, but they say that it
 is so rocky that they have not patience to plough it, and that,
 together with the distance, is the reason why it is not cultivated.
 There are, or were recently, extensive orchards there standing without
 order. Nay, they spring up wild and bear well there in the midst of
 pines, birches, maples, and oaks. I am often surprised to see rising
 amid these trees the rounded tops of apple-trees glowing with red or
 yellow fruit, in harmony with the autumnal tints of the forest.
 
 Going up the side of a cliff about the first of November, I saw a
 vigorous young apple-tree, which, planted by birds or cows, had shot up
 amid the rocks and open woods there, and had now much fruit on it,
 uninjured by the frosts, when all cultivated apples were gathered. It
 was a rank wild growth, with many green leaves on it still, and made an
 impression of thorniness. The fruit was hard and green, but looked as
 if it would be palatable in the winter. Some was dangling on the twigs,
 but more half-buried in the wet leaves under the tree, or rolled far
 down the hill amid the rocks. The owner knows nothing of it. The day
 was not observed when it first blossomed, nor when it first bore fruit,
 unless by the chickadee. There was no dancing on the green beneath it
 in its honor, and now there is no hand to pluck its fruit,--which is
 only gnawed by squirrels, as I perceive. It has done double duty,--not
 only borne this crop, but each twig has grown a foot into the air. And
 this is such fruit! bigger than many berries, we must admit, and
 carried home will be sound and palatable next spring. What care I for
 Iduna's apples so long as I can get these?
 
 When I go by this shrub thus late and hardy, and see its dangling
 fruit, I respect the tree, and I am grateful for Nature's bounty, even
 though I cannot eat it. Here on this rugged and woody hillside has
 grown an apple-tree, not planted by man, no relic of a former orchard,
 but a natural growth, like the pines and oaks. Most fruits which we
 prize and use depend entirely on our care. Corn and grain, potatoes,
 peaches, melons, etc., depend altogether on our planting; but the apple
 emulates man's independence and enterprise. It is not simply carried,
 as I have said, but, like him, to some extent, it has migrated to this
 New World, and is even, here and there, making its way amid the
 aboriginal trees; just as the ox and dog and horse sometimes run wild
 and maintain themselves.
 
 Even the sourest and crabbedest apple, growing in the most unfavorable
 position, suggests such thoughts as these, it is so noble a fruit.
 
 
 
 
 THE CRAB.
 
 
 Nevertheless, our wild apple is wild only like myself, perchance, who
 belong not to the aboriginal race here, but have strayed into the woods
 from the cultivated stock. Wilder still, as I have said, there grows
 elsewhere in this country a native and aboriginal Crab-Apple, "whose
 nature has not yet been modified by cultivation." It is found from
 Western New York to Minnesota and southward. Michaux[7] says that its
 ordinary height "is fifteen or eighteen feet, but it is sometimes found
 twenty-five or thirty feet high," and that the large ones "exactly
 resemble the common apple-tree." "The flowers are white mingled with
 rose-color, and are collected in corymbs." They are remarkable for
 their delicious odor. The fruit, according to him, is about an inch and
 a half in diameter, and is intensely acid. Yet they make fine
 sweet-meats, and also cider of them. He concludes, that "if, on being
 cultivated, it does not yield new and palatable varieties, it will at
 least be celebrated for the beauty of its flowers, and for the
 sweetness of its perfume."
 
 [7] Pronounced mee-sho; a French botanist and traveller.
 
 I never saw the Crab-Apple till May, 1861. I had heard of it through
 Michaux, but more modern botanists, so far as I know, have not treated
 it as of any peculiar importance. Thus it was a half-fabulous tree to
 me. I contemplated a pilgrimage to the "Glades," a portion of
 Pennsylvania, where it was said to grow to perfection. I thought of
 sending to a nursery for it, but doubted if they had it, or would
 distinguish it from European varieties. At last I had occasion to go to
 Minnesota, and on entering Michigan I began to notice from the cars a
 tree with handsome rose-colored flowers. At first I thought it some
 variety of thorn; but it was not long before the truth flashed on me,
 that this was my long-sought Crab-Apple. It was the prevailing
 flowering shrub or tree to be seen from the cars at that season of the
 year,--about the middle of May. But the cars never stopped before one,
 and so I was launched on the bosom of the Mississippi without having
 touched one, experiencing the fate of Tantalus. On arriving at St.
 Anthony's Falls, I was sorry to be told that I was too far north for
 the Crab-Apple. Nevertheless I succeeded in finding it about eight
 miles west of the Falls; touched it and smelled it, and secured a
 lingering corymb of flowers for my herbarium. This must have been near
 its northern limit.
 
 
 
 
 HOW THE WILD APPLE GROWS.
 
 
 But though these are indigenous, like the Indians, I doubt whether they
 are any hardier than those back-woodsmen among the apple-trees, which,
 though descended from cultivated stocks, plant themselves in distant
 fields and forests, where the soil is favorable to them. I know of no
 trees which have more difficulties to contend with, and which more
 sturdily resist their foes. These are the ones whose story we have to
 tell. It oftentimes reads thus:--
 
 Near the beginning of May, we notice little thickets of apple-trees
 just springing up in the pastures where cattle have been,--as the rocky
 ones of our Easter-brooks Country, or the top of Nobscot Hill in
 Sudbury. One or two of these perhaps survive the drought and other
 accidents,--their very birthplace defending them against the
 encroaching grass and some other dangers, at first.
 
     In two years' time 't had thus
      Reached the level of the rocks,
     Admired the stretching world,
      Nor feared the wandering flocks.
 
     But at this tender age
      Its sufferings began:
     There came a browsing ox
      And cut it down a span.
 
 This time, perhaps, the ox does not notice it amid the grass; but the
 next year, when it has grown more stout, he recognizes it for a
 fellow-emigrant from the old country, the flavor of whose leaves and
 twigs he well knows; and though at first he pauses to welcome it, and
 express his surprise, and gets for answer, "The same cause that brought
 you here brought me," he nevertheless browses it again, reflecting, it
 may be, that he has some title to it.
 
 Thus cut down annually, it does not despair; but, putting forth two
 short twigs for every one cut off, it spreads out low along the ground
 in the hollows or between the rocks, growing more stout and scrubby,
 until it forms, not a tree as yet, but a little pyramidal, stiff,
 twiggy mass, almost as solid and impenetrable as a rock. Some of the
 densest and most impenetrable clumps of bushes that I have ever seen,
 as well, on account of the closeness and stubbornness of their branches
 as of their thorns, have been these wild-apple scrubs. They are more
 like the scrubby fir and black spruce on which you stand, and sometimes
 walk, on the tops of mountains, where cold is the demon they contend
 with, than anything else. No wonder they are prompted to grow thorns at
 last, to defend themselves against such foes. In their thorniness,
 however, there is no malice, only some malic acid.
 
 The rocky pastures of the tract I have referred to--for they maintain
 their ground best in a rocky field--are thickly sprinkled with these
 little tufts, reminding you often of some rigid gray mosses or lichens,
 and you see thousands of little trees just springing up between them,
 with the seed still attached to them.
 
 Being regularly clipped all around each year by the cows, as a hedge
 with shears, they are often of a perfect conical or pyramidal form,
 from one to four feet high, and more or less sharp, as if trimmed by
 the gardener's art. In the pastures on Nobscot Hill and its spurs they
 make fine dark shadows when the sun is low. They are also an excellent
 covert from hawks for many small birds that roost and build in them.
 Whole flocks perch in them at night, and I have seen three robins'
 nests in one which was six feet in diameter.
 
 No doubt many of these are already old trees, if you reckon from the
 day they were planted, but infants still when you consider their
 development and the long life before them. I counted the annual rings
 of some which were just one foot high, and as wide as high, and found
 that they were about twelve years old, but quite sound and thrifty!
 They were so low that they were unnoticed by the walker, while many of
 their contemporaries from the nurseries were already bearing
 considerable crops. But what you gain in time is perhaps in this case,
 too, lost in power,--that is, in the vigor of the tree. This is their
 pyramidal state.
 
 The cows continue to browse them thus for twenty years or more, keeping
 them down and compelling them to spread, until at last they are so
 broad that they become their own fence, when some interior shoot, which
 their foes cannot reach, darts upward with joy: for it has not
 forgotten its high calling, and bears its own peculiar fruit in triumph.
 
 Such are the tactics by which it finally defeats its bovine foes. Now,
 if you have watched the progress of a particular shrub, you will see
 that it is no longer a simple pyramid or cone, but out of its apex
 there rises a sprig or two, growing more lustily perchance than an
 orchard-tree, since the plant now devotes the whole of its repressed
 energy to these upright parts. In a short time these become a small
 tree, an inverted pyramid resting on the apex of the other, so that the
 whole has now the form of a vast hour-glass. The spreading bottom,
 having served its purpose, finally disappears, and the generous tree
 permits the now harmless cows to come in and stand in its shade, and
 rub against and redden its trunk, which has grown in spite of them, and
 even to taste a part of its fruit, and so disperse the seed.
 
 Thus the cows create their own shade and food; and the tree, its
 hour-glass being inverted, lives a second life, as it were.
 
 It is an important question with some nowadays, whether you should trim
 young apple-trees as high as your nose or as high as your eyes. The ox
 trims them up as high as he can reach, and that is about the right
 height, I think.
 
 In spite of wandering kine and other adverse circumstance, that
 despised shrub, valued only by small birds as a covert and shelter from
 hawks, has its blossom-week at last, and in course of time its harvest,
 sincere, though small.
 
 By the end of some October, when its leaves have fallen, I frequently
 see such a central sprig, whose progress I have watched, when I thought
 it had forgotten its destiny, as I had, bearing its first crop of small
 green or yellow or rosy fruit, which the cows cannot get at over the
 bushy and thorny hedge which surrounds it; and I make haste to taste
 the new and undescribed variety. We have all heard of the numerous
 varieties of fruit invented by Van Mons[9] and Knight.[10] This is the
 system of Van Cow, and she has invented far more and more memorable
 varieties than both of them.
 
 [9] A Belgian chemist and horticulturist.
 
 [10] An English vegetable physiologist.
 
 Through what hardships it may attain to bear a sweet fruit! Though
 somewhat small, it may prove equal, if not superior, in flavor to that
 which has grown in a garden,--will perchance be all the sweeter and
 more palatable for the very difficulties it has had to contend with.
 Who knows but this chance wild fruit, planted by a cow or a bird on
 some remote and rocky hillside, where it is as yet unobserved by man,
 may be the choicest of all its kind, and foreign potentates shall hear
 of it, and royal societies seek to propagate it, though the virtues of
 the perhaps truly crabbed owner of the soil may never be heard of,--at
 least, beyond the limits of his village? It was thus the Porter and the
 Baldwin grew.
 
 Every wild-apple shrub excites our expectation thus, somewhat as every
 wild child. It is, perhaps, a prince in disguise. What a lesson to man!
 So are human beings, referred to the highest standard, the celestial
 fruit which they suggest and aspire to bear, browsed on by fate; and
 only the most persistent and strongest genius defends itself and
 prevails, sends a tender scion upward at last, and drops its perfect
 fruit on the ungrateful earth. Poets and philosophers and statesmen
 thus spring up in the country pastures, and outlast the hosts of
 unoriginal men.
 
 Such is always the pursuit of knowledge. The celestial fruits, the
 golden apples of the Hesperides, are ever guarded by a hundred-headed
 dragon which never sleeps, so that it is an herculean labor to pluck
 them.
 
 This is one and the most remarkable way in which the wild apple is
 propagated; but commonly it springs up at wide intervals in woods and
 swamps, and by the sides of roads, as the soil may suit it, and grows
 with comparative rapidity. Those which grow in dense woods are very
 tall and slender. I frequently pluck from these trees a perfectly mild
 and tamed fruit. As Palladius says, "And the ground is strewn with the
 fruit of an unbidden apple-tree."
 
 It is an old notion, that, if these wild trees do not bear a valuable
 fruit of their own, they are the best stocks by which to transmit to
 posterity the most highly prized qualities of others. However, I am not
 in search of stocks, but the wild fruit itself, whose fierce gust has
 suffered no "inteneration." It is not my
 
      "highest plot
    To plant the Bergamot."
 
 
 
 
 THE FRUIT, AND ITS FLAVOR.
 
 
 The time for wild apples is the last of October and the first of
 November. They then get to be palatable, for they ripen late, and they
 are still, perhaps, as beautiful as ever. I make a great account of
 these fruits, which the farmers do not think it worth the while to
 gather,--wild flavors of the Muse, vivacious and inspiriting. The
 farmer thinks that he has better in his barrels; but he is mistaken,
 unless he has a walker's appetite and imagination, neither of which can
 he have.
 
 Such as grow quite wild, and are left out till the first of November, I
 presume that the owner does not mean to gather. They belong to children
 as wild as themselves,--to certain active boys that I know,--to the
 wild-eyed woman of the fields, to whom nothing comes amiss, who gleans
 after all the world,--and, moreover, to us walkers. We have met with
 them, and they are ours. These rights, long enough insisted upon, have
 come to be an institution in some old countries, where they have
 learned how to live. I hear that "the custom of grippling, which may be
 called apple-gleaning, is, or was formerly, practised in Herefordshire.
 It consists in leaving a few apples, which are called the gripples, on
 every tree, after the general gathering, for the boys, who go with
 climbing-poles and bags to collect them."
 
 As for those I speak of, I pluck them as a wild fruit, native to this
 quarter of the earth,--fruit of old trees that have been dying ever
 since I was a boy and are not yet dead, frequented only by the
 wood-pecker and the squirrel, deserted now by the owner, who has not
 faith enough to look under their boughs. From the appearance of the
 tree-top, at a little distance, you would expect nothing but lichens to
 drop from it, but your faith is rewarded by finding the ground strewn
 with spirited fruit,--some of it, perhaps, collected at squirrel-holes,
 with the marks of their teeth by which they carried them,--some
 containing a cricket or two silently feeding within, and some,
 especially in damp days, a shelless snail. The very sticks and stones
 lodged in the tree-top might have convinced you of the savoriness of
 the fruit which has been so eagerly sought after in past years.
 
 I have seen no account of these among the "Fruits and Fruit-Trees of
 America," though they are more memorable to my taste than the grafted
 kinds; more racy and wild American flavors do they possess, when
 October and November, when December and January, and perhaps February
 and March even, have assuaged them somewhat. An old farmer in my
 neighborhood, who always selects the right word, says that "they have a
 kind of bow-arrow tang."
 
 Apples for grafting appear to have been selected commonly, not so much
 for their spirited flavor, as for their mildness, their size, and
 bearing qualities,--not so much for their beauty, as for their fairness
 and soundness. Indeed, I have no faith in the selected lists of
 pomological gentlemen. Their "Favorites" and "Non-suches" and
 "Seek-no-farthers," when I have fruited them, commonly turn out very
 tame and forgetable. They are eaten with comparatively little zest, and
 have no real tang nor smack to them.
 
 What if some of these wildings are acrid and puckery, genuine verjuice,
 do they not still belong to the Pomaceae, which are uniformly innocent
 and kind to our race? I still begrudge them to the cider-mill. Perhaps
 they are not fairly ripe yet.
 
 No wonder that these small and high-colored apples are thought to make
 the best cider. Loudon quotes from the Herefordshire Report that
 "apples of a small size are always, if equal in quality, to be
 preferred to those of a larger size, in order that the rind and kernel
 may bear the greatest proportion to the pulp, which affords the weakest
 and most watery juice." And he says, that, "to prove this, Dr. Symonds
 of Hereford, about the year 1800, made one hogshead of cider entirely
 from the rinds and cores of apples, and another from the pulp only,
 when the first was found of extraordinary strength and flavor, while
 the latter was sweet and insipid."
 
 Evelyn[11] says that the "Red-strake" was the favorite cider-apple in
 his day; and he quotes one Dr. Newburg as saying, "In Jersey 't is a
 general observation, as I hear, that the more of red any apple has in
 its rind, the more proper it is for this use. Pale-faced apples they
 exclude as much as may be from their cider-vat." This opinion still
 prevails.
 
 [11] An English writer of the seventeenth century.
 
 All apples are good in November. Those which the farmer leaves out as
 unsalable, and unpalatable to those who frequent the markets, are
 choicest fruit to the walker. But it is remarkable that the wild apple,
 which I praise as so spirited and racy when eaten in the fields or
 woods, being brought into the house, has frequently a harsh and crabbed
 taste. The Saunter-er's Apple not even the saunterer can eat in the
 house. The palate rejects it there, as it does haws and acorns, and
 demands a tamed one; for there you miss the November air, which is the
 sauce it is to be eaten with. Accordingly, when Tityrus, seeing the
 lengthening shadows, invites Meliboeus to go home and pass the night
 with him, he promises him mild apples and soft chestnuts. I frequently
 pluck wild apples of so rich and spicy a flavor that I wonder all
 orchardists do not get a scion from that tree, and I fail not to bring
 home my pockets full. But perchance, when I take one out of my desk and
 taste it in my chamber I find it unexpectedly crude,--sour enough to
 set a squirrel's teeth on edge and make a jay scream.
 
 These apples have hung in the wind and frost and rain till they have
 absorbed the qualities of the weather or season, and thus are highly
 seasoned, and they pierce and sting and permeate us with their spirit.
 They must be eaten in season, accordingly,--that is, out-of-doors.
 
 To appreciate the wild and sharp flavors of these October fruits, it is
 necessary that you be breathing the sharp October or November air. The
 out-door air and exercise which the walker gets give a different tone
 to his palate, and he craves a fruit which the sedentary would call
 harsh and crabbed. They must be eaten in the fields, when your system
 is all aglow with exercise, when the frosty weather nips your fingers,
 the wind rattles the bare boughs or rustles the few remaining leaves,
 and the jay is heard screaming around. What is sour in the house a
 bracing walk makes sweet. Some of these apples might be labelled, "To
 be eaten in the wind."
 
 Of course no flavors are thrown away; they are intended for the taste
 that is up to them. Some apples have two distinct flavors, and perhaps
 one-half of them must be eaten in the house, the other out-doors. One
 Peter Whitney wrote from Northborough in 1782, for the Proceedings of
 the Boston Academy, describing an apple-tree in that town "producing
 fruit of opposite qualities, part of the same apple being frequently
 sour and the other sweet;" also some all sour, and others all sweet,
 and this diversity on all parts of the tree.
 
 There is a wild apple on Nawshawtuck Hill in my town which has to me a
 peculiarly pleasant bitter tang, not perceived till it is
 three-quarters tasted. It remains on the tongue. As you eat it, it
 smells exactly like a squash-bug. It is a sort of triumph to eat and
 relish it.
 
 I hear that the fruit of a kind of plum-tree in Provence is "called
 Prunes sibarelles, because it is impossible to whistle after having
 eaten them, from their sourness." But perhaps they were only eaten in
 the house and in summer, and if tried out-of-doors in a stinging
 atmosphere, who knows but you could whistle an octave higher and
 clearer?
 
 In the fields only are the sours and bitters of Nature appreciated;
 just as the wood-chopper eats his meal in a sunny glade, in the middle
 of a winter day, with content, basks in a sunny ray there, and dreams
 of summer in a degree of cold which, experienced in a chamber, would
 make a student miserable. They who are at work abroad are not cold, but
 rather it is they who sit shivering in houses. As with temperatures, so
 with flavors; as with cold and heat, so with sour and sweet. This
 natural raciness, the sours and bitters which the diseased palate
 refuses, are the true condiments.
 
 Let your condiments be in the condition of your senses. To appreciate
 the flavor of these wild apples requires vigorous and healthy senses,
 papillae[12] firm and erect on the tongue and palate, not easily
 flattened and tamed.
 
 [12] A Latin word, accent on the second syllable, meaning here the
 rough surface of the tongue and palate.
 
 From my experience with wild apples, I can understand that there may be
 reason for a savage's preferring many kinds of food which the civilized
 man rejects. The former has the palate of an outdoor man. It takes a
 savage or wild taste to appreciate a wild fruit.
 
 What a healthy out-of-door appetite it takes to relish the apple of
 life, the apple of the world, then!
 
     "Nor is it every apple I desire,
        Nor that which pleases every palate best;
     'T is not the lasting Deuxan I require,
        Nor yet the red-cheeked Greening I request,
      Nor that which first beshrewed the name of wife,
      Nor that whose beauty caused the golden strife:
      No, no! bring me an apple from the tree of life."
 
 So there is one thought for the field, another for the house. I would
 have my thoughts, like wild apples, to be food for walkers, and will
 not warrant them to be palatable, if tasted in the house.
 
 
 
 
 THEIR BEAUTY.
 
 
 Almost all wild apples are handsome. They cannot be too gnarly and
 crabbed and rusty to look at. The gnarliest will have some redeeming
 traits even to the eye. You will discover some evening redness dashed
 or sprinkled on some protuberance or in some cavity. It is rare that
 the summer lets an apple go without streaking or spotting it on some
 part of its sphere. It will have some red stains, commemorating the
 mornings and evenings it has witnessed; some dark and rusty blotches,
 in memory of the clouds and foggy, mildewy days that have passed over
 it; and a spacious field of green reflecting the general face of
 Nature,--green even as the fields; or a yellow ground, which implies a
 milder flavor,--yellow as the harvest, or russet as the hills.
 
 Apples, these I mean, unspeakably fair,--apples not of Discord, but
 Concord! Yet not so rare but that the homeliest may have a share.
 Painted by the frosts, some a uniform clear bright yellow, or red, or
 crimson, as if their spheres had regularly revolved, and enjoyed the
 influence of the sun on all sides alike,--some with the faintest pink
 blush imaginable,--some brindled with deep red streaks like a cow, or
 with hundreds of fine blood-red rays running regularly from the
 stem-dimple to the blossom-end, like meridional lines, on a
 straw-colored ground,--some touched with a greenish rust, like a fine
 lichen, here and there, with crimson blotches or eyes more or less
 confluent and fiery when wet,--and others gnarly, and freckled or
 peppered all over on the stem side with fine crimson spots on a white
 ground, as if accidentally sprinkled from the brush of Him who paints
 the autumn leaves. Others, again, are sometimes red inside, perfused
 with a beautiful blush, fairy food, too beautiful to eat,--apple of the
 Hesperides, apple of the evening sky! But like shells and pebbles on
 the sea-shore, they must be seen as they sparkle amid the withering
 leaves in some dell in the woods, in the autumnal air, or as they lie
 in the wet grass, and not when they have wilted and faded in the house.
 
 
 
 
 THE NAMING OF THEM.
 
 
 It would be a pleasant pastime to find suitable names for the hundred
 varieties which go to a single heap at the cider-mill. Would it not tax
 a man's invention,--no one to be named after a man, and all in the
 lingua vernacula?[13] Who shall stand god-father at the christening of
 the wild apples? It would exhaust the Latin and Greek languages, if
 they were used, and make the lingua vernacula flag. We should have to
 call in the sunrise and the sunset, the rainbow and the autumn woods
 and the wild flowers, and the woodpecker and the purple finch, and the
 squirrel and the jay and the butterfly, the November traveller and the
 truant boy, to our aid.
 
 [13] Lingua vernacula, common speech.
 
 In 1836 there were in the garden of the London Horticultural Society
 more than fourteen hundred distinct sorts. But here are species which
 they have not in their catalogue, not to mention the varieties which
 our Crab might yield to cultivation. Let us enumerate a few of these. I
 find myself compelled, after all, to give the Latin names of some for
 the benefit of those who live where English is not spoken,--for they
 are likely to have a world-wide reputation.
 
 There is, first of all, the Wood-Apple (Malus sylvatica); the Blue-Jay
 Apple; the Apple which grows in Dells in the Woods (sylvestrivallis),
 also in Hollows in Pastures (campestrivallis); the Apple that grows in
 an old Cellar-Hole (Malus cellaris); the Meadow-Apple; the
 Partridge-Apple; the Truant's Apple (Cessatoris), which no boy will
 ever go by without knocking off some, however late it may be; the
 Saunterer's Apple,--you must lose yourself before you can find the way
 to that; the Beauty of the Air (Decks Aeris); December-Eating; the
 Frozen-Thawed (gelato-soluta), good only in that state; the Concord
 Apple, possibly the same with the Musketa-quidensis; the Assabet Apple;
 the Brindled Apple; Wine of New England; the Chickaree Apple; the Green
 Apple (Malus viridis);--this has many synonyms; in an imperfect state,
 it is the Cholera morbifera aut dysenterifera, puerulis
 dilectissima;[14]--the Apple which Atalanta stopped to pick up; the
 Hedge-Apple (Malus Sepium); the Slug-Apple (limacea); the
 Railroad-Apple, which perhaps came from a core thrown out of the cars;
 the Apple whose Fruit we tasted in our Youth; our Particular Apple, not
 to be found in any catalogue,--Pedestrium Solatium;[15] also the Apple
 where hangs the Forgotten Scythe; Iduna's Apples, and the Apples which
 Loki found in the Wood;[16] and a great many more I have on my list,
 too numerous to mention,--all of them good. As Bodaeus exclaims,
 referring to the culti-vated kinds, and adapting Virgil to his case, so
 I, adapting Bodaeus,--
 
    "Not if I had a hundred tongues, a hundred mouths,
     An iron voice, could I describe all the forms
     And reckon up all the names of these wild apples."
 
 
 [14] The apple that brings the disease of cholera and of dysentery, the
 fruit that small boys like best.
 
 [15] The tramp's comfort.
 
 [16] See p. 172 (Proof readers note: paragraph 25)
 
 
 
 
 THE LAST GLEANING.
 
 
 By the middle of November the wild apples have lost some of their
 brilliancy, and have chiefly fallen. A great part are decayed on the
 ground, and the sound ones are more palatable than before. The note of
 the chickadee sounds now more distinct, as you wander amid the old
 trees, and the autumnal dandelion is half-closed and tearful. But
 still, if you are a skilful gleaner, you may get many a pocket-full
 even of grafted fruit, long after apples are supposed to be gone
 out-of-doors. I know a Blue-Pearmain tree, growing within the edge of a
 swamp, almost as good as wild. You would not suppose that there was any
 fruit left there, on the first survey, but you must look according to
 system. Those which lie exposed are quite brown and rotten now, or
 perchance a few still show one blooming cheek here and there amid the
 wet leaves. Nevertheless, with experienced eyes, I explore amid the
 bare alders and the huckleberry-bushes and the withered sedge, and in
 the crevices of the rocks, which are full of leaves, and pry under the
 fallen and decaying ferns, which, with apple and alder leaves, thickly
 strew the ground. For I know that they lie concealed, fallen into
 hollows long since and covered up by the leaves of the tree itself,--a
 proper kind of packing. From these lurking-places, anywhere within the
 circumference of the tree, I draw forth the fruit, all wet and glossy,
 maybe nibbled by rabbits and hollowed out by crickets and perhaps with
 a leaf or two cemented to it (as Curzon[17] an old manuscript from a
 monastery's mouldy cellar), but still with a rich bloom on it, and at
 least as ripe and well kept, if not better than those in barrels, more
 crisp and lively than they. If these resources fail to yield anything,
 I have learned to look between the bases of the suckers which spring
 thickly from some horizontal limb, for now and then one lodges there,
 or in the very midst of an alder-clump, where they are covered by
 leaves, safe from cows which may have smelled them out. If I am
 sharp-set, for I do not refuse the Blue-Pearmain, I fill my pockets on
 each side; and as I retrace my steps in the frosty eve, being perhaps
 four or five miles from home, I eat one first from this side, and then
 from that, to keep my balance.
 
 [17] Robert Curzon was a traveller who searched for old manuscripts in
 the monasteries of the Levant. See his book, Ancient Monasteries of the
 East.
 
 I learn from Topsell's Gesner, whose authority appears to be Albertus,
 that the following is the way in which the hedgehog collects and
 carries home his apples. He says: "His meat is apples, worms, or
 grapes: when he findeth apples or grapes on the earth, he rolleth
 himself upon them, until he have filled all his prickles, and then
 carrieth them home to his den, never bearing above one in his mouth;
 and if it fortune that one of them fall off by the way, he likewise
 shaketh off all the residue, and walloweth upon them afresh, until they
 be all settled upon his back again. So, forth he goeth, making a noise
 like a cart-wheel; and if he have any young ones in his nest, they pull
 off his load wherewithal he is loaded, eating thereof what they please,
 and laying up the residue for the time to come."
 
 
 
 
 THE "FROZEN-THAWED" APPLE.
 
 
 Toward the end of November, though some of the sound ones are yet more
 mellow and perhaps more edible, they have generally, like the leaves,
 lost their beauty, and are beginning to freeze. It is finger-cold, and
 prudent farmers get in their barrelled apples, and bring you the apples
 and cider which they have engaged; for it is time to put them into the
 cellar. Perhaps a few on the ground show their red cheeks above the
 early snow, and occasionally some even preserve their color and
 soundness under the snow throughout the winter. But generally at the
 beginning of the winter they freeze hard, and soon, though undecayed,
 acquire the color of a baked apple.
 
 Before the end of December, generally, they experience their first
 thawing. Those which a month ago were sour, crabbed, and quite
 unpalatable to the civilized taste, such at least as were frozen while
 sound, let a warmer sun come to thaw them, for they are extremely
 sensitive to its rays, are found to be filled with a rich, sweet cider,
 better than any bottled cider that I know of, and with which I am
 better acquainted than with wine. All apples are good in this state,
 and your jaws are the cider-press. Others, which have more substance,
 are a sweet and luscious food,--in my opinion of more worth than the
 pine-apples which are imported from the West Indies. Those which lately
 even I tasted only to repent of it,--for I am semi-civilized,--which
 the farmer willingly left on the tree, I am now glad to find have the
 property of hanging on like the leaves of the young oaks. It is a way
 to keep cider sweet without boiling. Let the frost come to freeze them
 first, solid as stones, and then the rain or a warm winter day to thaw
 them, and they will seem to have borrowed a flavor from heaven through
 the medium of the air in which they hang. Or perchance you find, when
 you get home, that those which rattled in your pocket have thawed, and
 the ice is turned to cider. But after the third or fourth freezing and
 thawing they will not be found so good.
 
 What are the imported half-ripe fruits of the torrid South to this
 fruit matured by the cold of the frigid North? These are those crabbed
 apples with which I cheated my companion, and kept a smooth face that I
 might tempt him to eat. Now we both greedily fill our pockets with
 them,--bending to drink the cup and save our lappets from the
 overflowing juice,--and grow more social with their wine. Was there one
 that hung so high and sheltered by the tangled branches that our sticks
 could not dislodge it?
 
 It is a fruit never carried to market, that I am aware of,--quite
 distinct from the apple of the markets, as from dried apple and
 cider,--and it is not every winter that produces it in perfection.
 
 "Hear this, ye old men, and give ear, all ye in-habitants of the land!
 Hath this been in your days, or even in the days of your fathers?...
 
 "That which the palmer-worm hath left hath the locust eaten; and that
 which the locust hath left hath the canker-worm eaten; and that which
 the canker-worm hath left hath the caterpillar eaten.
 
 "Awake, ye drunkards, and weep! and howl, all ye drinkers of wine,
 because of the new wine! for it is cut off from your mouth.
 
 "For a nation is come up upon my land, strong, and without number,
 whose teeth are the teeth of a lion, and he hath the cheek-teeth of a
 great lion.
 
 "He hath laid my vine waste, and barked my fig-tree; he hath made it
 clean bare, and cast it away; the branches thereof are made white....
 
 "Be ye ashamed, O ye husbandmen! howl, O ye vine-dressers!...
 
 "The vine is dried up, and the fig-tree languisheth; the
 pomegranate-tree, the palm tree also, and the apple-tree, even all the
 trees of the field, are withered: because joy is withered away from the
 sons of men."[18]
 
 [18] Joel, chapter i., verses 1-12.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
by Henry David Thoreau
 (#6 in our series by Henry David Thoreau)
 
 Copyright laws are changing all over the world. Be sure to check the
 copyright laws for your country before distributing this or any other
 Project Gutenberg file.
 
 We encourage you to keep this file, exactly as it is, on your
 own disk, thereby keeping an electronic path open for future
 readers.  Please do not remove this.
 
 This header should be the first thing seen when anyone starts to
 view the etext. Do not change or edit it without written permission.
 The words are carefully chosen to provide users with the
 information they need to understand what they may and may not
 do with the etext.
 
 
 **Welcome To The World of Free Plain Vanilla Electronic Texts**
 
 **Etexts Readable By Both Humans and By Computers, Since 1971**
 
 *****These Etexts Are Prepared By Thousands of Volunteers!*****
 
 Information on contacting Project Gutenberg to get etexts, and
 further information, is included below.  We need your donations.
 
 The Project Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation is a 501(c)(3)
 organization with EIN [Employee Identification Number] 64-6221541
 
 
 
 Title: A Week on the Concord and Merrimack Rivers
 
 Author: Henry David Thoreau
 
 Release Date: July, 2003  [Etext #4232]
 [Yes, we are more than one year ahead of schedule]
 [This file was first posted on December 12, 2001]
 
 Edition: 10
 
 Language: English
 
 Character set encoding: UTF-8
 
 The Project Gutenberg Etext of A Week on the Concord and Merrimack Rivers
 by Henry David Thoreau
 ******This file should be named 4232-0.txt or 4232-0.zip******
 
 Charles Franks, Carlo Traverso and the Online Distributed Proofreading Team.
 
 Project Gutenberg Etexts are often created from several printed
 editions, all of which are confirmed as Public Domain in the US
 unless a copyright notice is included.  Thus, we usually do not
 keep etexts in compliance with any particular paper edition.
 
 We are now trying to release all our etexts one year in advance
 of the official release dates, leaving time for better editing.
 Please be encouraged to tell us about any error or corrections,
 even years after the official publication date.
 
 Please note neither this listing nor its contents are final til
 midnight of the last day of the month of any such announcement.
 The official release date of all Project Gutenberg Etexts is at
 Midnight, Central Time, of the last day of the stated month.  A
 preliminary version may often be posted for suggestion, comment
 and editing by those who wish to do so.
 
 Most people start at our sites at:
 http://gutenberg.net or
 http://promo.net/pg
 
 These Web sites include award-winning information about Project
 Gutenberg, including how to donate, how to help produce our new
 etexts, and how to subscribe to our email newsletter (free!).
 
 
 Those of you who want to download any Etext before announcement
 can get to them as follows, and just download by date.  This is
 also a good way to get them instantly upon announcement, as the
 indexes our cataloguers produce obviously take a while after an
 announcement goes out in the Project Gutenberg Newsletter.
 
 http://www.ibiblio.org/gutenberg/etext03 or
 ftp://ftp.ibiblio.org/pub/docs/books/gutenberg/etext03
 
 Or /etext02, 01, 00, 99, 98, 97, 96, 95, 94, 93, 92, 92, 91 or 90
 
 Just search by the first five letters of the filename you want,
 as it appears in our Newsletters.
 
 
 Information about Project Gutenberg (one page)
 
 We produce about two million dollars for each hour we work.  The
 time it takes us, a rather conservative estimate, is fifty hours
 to get any etext selected, entered, proofread, edited, copyright
 searched and analyzed, the copyright letters written, etc.   Our
 projected audience is one hundred million readers.  If the value
 per text is nominally estimated at one dollar then we produce $2
 million dollars per hour in 2001 as we release over 50 new Etext
 files per month, or 500 more Etexts in 2000 for a total of 4000+
 If they reach just 1-2% of the world's population then the total
 should reach over 300 billion Etexts given away by year's end.
 
 The Goal of Project Gutenberg is to Give Away One Trillion Etext
 Files by December 31, 2001.  [10,000 x 100,000,000 = 1 Trillion]
 This is ten thousand titles each to one hundred million readers,
 which is only about 4% of the present number of computer users.
 
 At our revised rates of production, we will reach only one-third
 of that goal by the end of 2001, or about 4,000 Etexts.  We need
 funding, as well as continued efforts by volunteers, to maintain
 or increase our production and reach our goals.
 
 The Project Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation has been created
 to secure a future for Project Gutenberg into the next millennium.
 
 We need your donations more than ever!
 
 As of November, 2001, contributions are being solicited from people
 and organizations in: Alabama, Arkansas, Connecticut, Delaware,
 Florida, Georgia, Idaho, Illinois, Indiana, Iowa, Kansas, Kentucky,
 Louisiana, Maine, Michigan, Missouri, Montana, Nebraska, Nevada, New
 Jersey, New Mexico, New York, North Carolina, Oklahoma, Oregon,
 Pennsylvania, Rhode Island, South Carolina, South Dakota, Tennessee,
 Texas, Utah, Vermont, Virginia, Washington, West Virginia, Wisconsin,
 and Wyoming.
 
 *In Progress
 
 We have filed in about 45 states now, but these are the only ones
 that have responded.
 
 As the requirements for other states are met, additions to this list
 will be made and fund raising will begin in the additional states.
 Please feel free to ask to check the status of your state.
 
 In answer to various questions we have received on this:
 
 We are constantly working on finishing the paperwork to legally
 request donations in all 50 states.  If your state is not listed and
 you would like to know if we have added it since the list you have,
 just ask.
 
 While we cannot solicit donations from people in states where we are
 not yet registered, we know of no prohibition against accepting
 donations from donors in these states who approach us with an offer to
 donate.
 
 International donations are accepted, but we don't know ANYTHING about
 how to make them tax-deductible, or even if they CAN be made
 deductible, and don't have the staff to handle it even if there are
 ways.
 
 All donations should be made to:
 
 Project Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation
 PMB 113
 1739 University Ave.
 Oxford, MS 38655-4109
 
 Contact us if you want to arrange for a wire transfer or payment
 method other than by check or money order.
 
 
 The Project Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation has been approved by
 the US Internal Revenue Service as a 501(c)(3) organization with EIN
 [Employee Identification Number] 64-622154.  Donations are
 tax-deductible to the maximum extent permitted by law.  As fundraising
 requirements for other states are met, additions to this list will be
 made and fundraising will begin in the additional states.
 
 We need your donations more than ever!
 
 You can get up to date donation information at:
 
 http://www.gutenberg.net/donation.html
 
 
 ***
 
 If you can't reach Project Gutenberg,
 you can always email directly to:
 
 Michael S. Hart <hart@pobox.com>
 
 Prof. Hart will answer or forward your message.
 
 We would prefer to send you information by email.
 
 
 **The Legal Small Print**
 
 
 (Three Pages)
 
 ***START**THE SMALL PRINT!**FOR PUBLIC DOMAIN ETEXTS**START***
 Why is this "Small Print!" statement here? You know: lawyers.
 They tell us you might sue us if there is something wrong with
 your copy of this etext, even if you got it for free from
 someone other than us, and even if what's wrong is not our
 fault. So, among other things, this "Small Print!" statement
 disclaims most of our liability to you. It also tells you how
 you may distribute copies of this etext if you want to.
 
 *BEFORE!* YOU USE OR READ THIS ETEXT
 By using or reading any part of this PROJECT GUTENBERG-tm
 etext, you indicate that you understand, agree to and accept
 this "Small Print!" statement. If you do not, you can receive
 a refund of the money (if any) you paid for this etext by
 sending a request within 30 days of receiving it to the person
 you got it from. If you received this etext on a physical
 medium (such as a disk), you must return it with your request.
 
 ABOUT PROJECT GUTENBERG-TM ETEXTS
 This PROJECT GUTENBERG-tm etext, like most PROJECT GUTENBERG-tm etexts,
 is a "public domain" work distributed by Professor Michael S. Hart
 through the Project Gutenberg Association (the "Project").
 Among other things, this means that no one owns a United States copyright
 on or for this work, so the Project (and you!) can copy and
 distribute it in the United States without permission and
 without paying copyright royalties. Special rules, set forth
 below, apply if you wish to copy and distribute this etext
 under the "PROJECT GUTENBERG" trademark.
 
 Please do not use the "PROJECT GUTENBERG" trademark to market
 any commercial products without permission.
 
 To create these etexts, the Project expends considerable
 efforts to identify, transcribe and proofread public domain
 works. Despite these efforts, the Project's etexts and any
 medium they may be on may contain "Defects". Among other
 things, Defects may take the form of incomplete, inaccurate or
 corrupt data, transcription errors, a copyright or other
 intellectual property infringement, a defective or damaged
 disk or other etext medium, a computer virus, or computer
 codes that damage or cannot be read by your equipment.
 
 LIMITED WARRANTY; DISCLAIMER OF DAMAGES
 But for the "Right of Replacement or Refund" described below,
 [1] Michael Hart and the Foundation (and any other party you may
 receive this etext from as a PROJECT GUTENBERG-tm etext) disclaims
 all liability to you for damages, costs and expenses, including
 legal fees, and [2] YOU HAVE NO REMEDIES FOR NEGLIGENCE OR
 UNDER STRICT LIABILITY, OR FOR BREACH OF WARRANTY OR CONTRACT,
 INCLUDING BUT NOT LIMITED TO INDIRECT, CONSEQUENTIAL, PUNITIVE
 OR INCIDENTAL DAMAGES, EVEN IF YOU GIVE NOTICE OF THE
 POSSIBILITY OF SUCH DAMAGES.
 
 If you discover a Defect in this etext within 90 days of
 receiving it, you can receive a refund of the money (if any)
 you paid for it by sending an explanatory note within that
 time to the person you received it from. If you received it
 on a physical medium, you must return it with your note, and
 such person may choose to alternatively give you a replacement
 copy. If you received it electronically, such person may
 choose to alternatively give you a second opportunity to
 receive it electronically.
 
 THIS ETEXT IS OTHERWISE PROVIDED TO YOU "AS-IS". NO OTHER
 WARRANTIES OF ANY KIND, EXPRESS OR IMPLIED, ARE MADE TO YOU AS
 TO THE ETEXT OR ANY MEDIUM IT MAY BE ON, INCLUDING BUT NOT
 LIMITED TO WARRANTIES OF MERCHANTABILITY OR FITNESS FOR A
 PARTICULAR PURPOSE.
 
 Some states do not allow disclaimers of implied warranties or
 the exclusion or limitation of consequential damages, so the
 above disclaimers and exclusions may not apply to you, and you
 may have other legal rights.
 
 INDEMNITY
 You will indemnify and hold Michael Hart, the Foundation,
 and its trustees and agents, and any volunteers associated
 with the production and distribution of Project Gutenberg-tm
 texts harmless, from all liability, cost and expense, including
 legal fees, that arise directly or indirectly from any of the
 following that you do or cause:  [1] distribution of this etext,
 [2] alteration, modification, or addition to the etext,
 or [3] any Defect.
 
 DISTRIBUTION UNDER "PROJECT GUTENBERG-tm"
 You may distribute copies of this etext electronically, or by
 disk, book or any other medium if you either delete this
 "Small Print!" and all other references to Project Gutenberg,
 or:
 
 [1]  Only give exact copies of it.  Among other things, this
      requires that you do not remove, alter or modify the
      etext or this "small print!" statement.  You may however,
      if you wish, distribute this etext in machine readable
      binary, compressed, mark-up, or proprietary form,
      including any form resulting from conversion by word
      processing or hypertext software, but only so long as
      *EITHER*:
 
      [*]  The etext, when displayed, is clearly readable, and
           does *not* contain characters other than those
           intended by the author of the work, although tilde
           (~), asterisk (*) and underline (_) characters may
           be used to convey punctuation intended by the
           author, and additional characters may be used to
           indicate hypertext links; OR
 
      [*]  The etext may be readily converted by the reader at
           no expense into plain ASCII, EBCDIC or equivalent
           form by the program that displays the etext (as is
           the case, for instance, with most word processors);
           OR
 
      [*]  You provide, or agree to also provide on request at
           no additional cost, fee or expense, a copy of the
           etext in its original plain ASCII form (or in EBCDIC
           or other equivalent proprietary form).
 
 [2]  Honor the etext refund and replacement provisions of this
      "Small Print!" statement.
 
 [3]  Pay a trademark license fee to the Foundation of 20% of the
      gross profits you derive calculated using the method you
      already use to calculate your applicable taxes.  If you
      don't derive profits, no royalty is due.  Royalties are
      payable to "Project Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation"
      the 60 days following each date you prepare (or were
      legally required to prepare) your annual (or equivalent
      periodic) tax return.  Please contact us beforehand to
      let us know your plans and to work out the details.
 
 WHAT IF YOU *WANT* TO SEND MONEY EVEN IF YOU DON'T HAVE TO?
 Project Gutenberg is dedicated to increasing the number of
 public domain and licensed works that can be freely distributed
 in machine readable form.
 
 The Project gratefully accepts contributions of money, time,
 public domain materials, or royalty free copyright licenses.
 Money should be paid to the:
 "Project Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation."
 
 If you are interested in contributing scanning equipment or
 software or other items, please contact Michael Hart at:
 hart@pobox.com
 
 [Portions of this header are copyright (C) 2001 by Michael S. Hart
 and may be reprinted only when these Etexts are free of all fees.]
 [Project Gutenberg is a TradeMark and may not be used in any sales
 of Project Gutenberg Etexts or other materials be they hardware or
 software or any other related product without express permission.]
 
 *END THE SMALL PRINT! FOR PUBLIC DOMAIN ETEXTS*Ver.10/04/01*END*
 
 
 
 
 Charles Franks, Carlo Traverso and the Online Distributed Proofreading Team.
 
 EDITORIAL NOTES
 
 [page]    page break
 
 _italic_
 ^small caps^
 <greek text>
 
 A paragraph with a margin of two spaces represents a quotation,
 represented in the text by a smaller type.
 
 A series of lines indented three or more spaces represent poetry:
 spaces, end of lines and empty lines should be preserved.
 
 -----------------------------------------
 
 
 
                                  A WEEK
                                  ON THE
                        CONCORD AND MERRIMACK RIVERS.
 
 
 
 [page]
 
 
 
 
                                 A WEEK
 
                                 ON THE
 
                       CONCORD AND MERRIMACK RIVERS
 
 
                            By HENRY D. THOREAU,
 
                         AUTHOR OF "WALDEN," ETC.
 
 
 [page]
 
 
      Where'er thou sail'st who sailed with me,
      Though now thou climbest loftier mounts,
      And fairer rivers dost ascend,
      Be thou my Muse, my Brother--.
 
 
 [page]
 
 
      I am bound, I am bound, for a distant shore,
      By a lonely isle, by a far Azore,
      There it is, there it is, the treasure I seek,
      On the barren sands of a desolate creek.
 
 
 [page]
 
 
      I sailed up a river with a pleasant wind,
      New lands, new people, and new thoughts to find;
      Many fair reaches and headlands appeared,
      And many dangers were there to be feared;
      But when I remember where I have been,
      And the fair landscapes that I have seen,
      ^Thou^ seemest the only permanent shore,
      The cape never rounded, nor wandered o'er.
 
 
 [page]
 
 
      Fluminaque obliquis cinxit declivia ripis;
      Quae, diversa locis, partim sorbentur ab ipsa;
      In mare perveniunt partim, campoque recepta
      Liberioris aquae, pro ripis litora pulsant.
                                  ^Ovid^, Met.  I.  39
 
 
    He confined the rivers within their sloping banks,
    Which in different places are part absorbed by the earth,
    Part reach the sea, and being received within the plain
    Of its freer waters, beat the shore for banks.
 
 
 
 [page]
 
 
                  CONCORD RIVER.
 
      "Beneath low hills, in the broad interval
      Through which at will our Indian rivulet
      Winds mindful still of sannup and of squaw,
      Whose pipe and arrow oft the plough unburies,
      Here, in pine houses, built of new-fallen trees,
      Supplanters of the tribe, the farmers dwell."
 
                                           ^Emerson^.
 
 
 The Musketaquid, or Grass-ground River, though probably as old as
 the Nile or Euphrates, did not begin to have a place in civilized
 history, until the fame of its grassy meadows and its fish
 attracted settlers out of England in 1635, when it received the
 other but kindred name of ^Concord^ from the first plantation on
 its banks, which appears to have been commenced in a spirit of
 peace and harmony.  It will be Grass-ground River as long as grass
 grows and water runs here; it will be Concord River only while
 men lead peaceable lives on its banks.  To an extinct race it was
 grass-ground, where they hunted and fished, and it is still
 perennial grass-ground to Concord farmers, who own the Great
 Meadows, and get the hay from year to year.  "One branch of it,"
 according to the historian of Concord, for I love to quote so
 good authority, "rises in the south part of Hopkinton, and
 another from a pond and a large cedar-swamp in Westborough," and
 flowing between Hopkinton and Southborough, through Framingham,
 and between Sudbury and Wayland, where it is sometimes called
 Sudbury River, it enters Concord at the south part of the town,
 and after receiving the North or Assabeth River, which has its
 source a little farther to the north and west, goes out at the
 northeast angle, and flowing between Bedford and Carlisle, and
 through Billerica, empties into the Merrimack at Lowell.  In
 Concord it is, in summer, from four to fifteen feet deep, and
 from one hundred to three hundred feet wide, but in the spring
 freshets, when it overflows its banks, it is in some places
 nearly a mile wide.  Between Sudbury and Wayland the meadows
 acquire their greatest breadth, and when covered with water, they
 form a handsome chain of shallow vernal lakes, resorted to by
 numerous gulls and ducks.  Just above Sherman's Bridge, between
 these towns, is the largest expanse, and when the wind blows
 freshly in a raw March day, heaving up the surface into dark and
 sober billows or regular swells, skirted as it is in the distance
 with alder-swamps and smoke-like maples, it looks like a smaller
 Lake Huron, and is very pleasant and exciting for a landsman to
 row or sail over.  The farm-houses along the Sudbury shore, which
 rises gently to a considerable height, command fine water
 prospects at this season.  The shore is more flat on the Wayland
 side, and this town is the greatest loser by the flood.  Its
 farmers tell me that thousands of acres are flooded now, since
 the dams have been erected, where they remember to have seen the
 white honeysuckle or clover growing once, and they could go dry
 with shoes only in summer.  Now there is nothing but blue-joint
 and sedge and cut-grass there, standing in water all the year
 round.  For a long time, they made the most of the driest season
 to get their hay, working sometimes till nine o'clock at night,
 sedulously paring with their scythes in the twilight round the
 hummocks left by the ice; but now it is not worth the getting
 when they can come at it, and they look sadly round to their
 wood-lots and upland as a last resource.
 
 It is worth the while to make a voyage up this stream, if you go
 no farther than Sudbury, only to see how much country there is in
 the rear of us; great hills, and a hundred brooks, and
 farm-houses, and barns, and haystacks, you never saw before, and
 men everywhere, Sudbury, that is Southborough men, and Wayland,
 and Nine-Acre-Corner men, and Bound Rock, where four towns bound
 on a rock in the river, Lincoln, Wayland, Sudbury, Concord.  Many
 waves are there agitated by the wind, keeping nature fresh, the
 spray blowing in your face, reeds and rushes waving; ducks by the
 hundred, all uneasy in the surf, in the raw wind, just ready to
 rise, and now going off with a clatter and a whistling like
 riggers straight for Labrador, flying against the stiff gale with
 reefed wings, or else circling round first, with all their
 paddles briskly moving, just over the surf, to reconnoitre you
 before they leave these parts; gulls wheeling overhead, muskrats
 swimming for dear life, wet and cold, with no fire to warm them
 by that you know of; their labored homes rising here and there
 like haystacks; and countless mice and moles and winged titmice
 along the sunny windy shore; cranberries tossed on the waves and
 heaving up on the beach, their little red skiffs beating about
 among the alders;--such healthy natural tumult as proves the last
 day is not yet at hand.  And there stand all around the alders,
 and birches, and oaks, and maples full of glee and sap, holding
 in their buds until the waters subside.  You shall perhaps run
 aground on Cranberry Island, only some spires of last year's
 pipe-grass above water, to show where the danger is, and get as
 good a freezing there as anywhere on the Northwest Coast.  I never
 voyaged so far in all my life.  You shall see men you never heard
 of before, whose names you don't know, going away down through
 the meadows with long ducking-guns, with water-tight boots wading
 through the fowl-meadow grass, on bleak, wintry, distant shores,
 with guns at half-cock, and they shall see teal, blue-winged,
 green-winged, shelldrakes, whistlers, black ducks, ospreys, and
 many other wild and noble sights before night, such as they who
 sit in parlors never dream of.  You shall see rude and sturdy,
 experienced and wise men, keeping their castles, or teaming up
 their summer's wood, or chopping alone in the woods, men fuller
 of talk and rare adventure in the sun and wind and rain, than a
 chestnut is of meat; who were out not only in '75 and 1812, but
 have been out every day of their lives; greater men than Homer,
 or Chaucer, or Shakespeare, only they never got time to say so;
 they never took to the way of writing.  Look at their fields, and
 imagine what they might write, if ever they should put pen to
 paper.  Or what have they not written on the face of the earth
 already, clearing, and burning, and scratching, and harrowing,
 and ploughing, and subsoiling, in and in, and out and out, and
 over and over, again and again, erasing what they had already
 written for want of parchment.
 
 As yesterday and the historical ages are past, as the work of
 to-day is present, so some flitting perspectives, and
 demi-experiences of the life that is in nature are in time
 veritably future, or rather outside to time, perennial, young,
 divine, in the wind and rain which never die.
 
      The respectable folks,--
      Where dwell they?
      They whisper in the oaks,
      And they sigh in the hay;
      Summer and winter, night and day,
      Out on the meadow, there dwell they.
      They never die,
      Nor snivel, nor cry,
      Nor ask our pity
      With a wet eye.
      A sound estate they ever mend
      To every asker readily lend;
      To the ocean wealth,
      To the meadow health,
      To Time his length,
      To the rocks strength,
      To the stars light,
      To the weary night,
      To the busy day,
      To the idle play;
      And so their good cheer never ends,
      For all are their debtors, and all their friends.
 
 Concord River is remarkable for the gentleness of its current,
 which is scarcely perceptible, and some have referred to its
 influence the proverbial moderation of the inhabitants of
 Concord, as exhibited in the Revolution, and on later occasions.
 It has been proposed, that the town should adopt for its coat of
 arms a field verdant, with the Concord circling nine times round.
 I have read that a descent of an eighth of an inch in a mile is
 sufficient to produce a flow.  Our river has, probably, very near
 the smallest allowance.  The story is current, at any rate,
 though I believe that strict history will not bear it out, that
 the only bridge ever carried away on the main branch, within the
 limits of the town, was driven up stream by the wind.  But
 wherever it makes a sudden bend it is shallower and swifter, and
 asserts its title to be called a river.  Compared with the other
 tributaries of the Merrimack, it appears to have been properly
 named Musketaquid, or Meadow River, by the Indians.  For the most
 part, it creeps through broad meadows, adorned with scattered
 oaks, where the cranberry is found in abundance, covering the
 ground like a moss-bed.  A row of sunken dwarf willows borders
 the stream on one or both sides, while at a greater distance the
 meadow is skirted with maples, alders, and other fluviatile
 trees, overrun with the grape-vine, which bears fruit in its
 season, purple, red, white, and other grapes.  Still farther from
 the stream, on the edge of the firm land, are seen the gray and
 white dwellings of the inhabitants.  According to the valuation
 of 1831, there were in Concord two thousand one hundred and
 eleven acres, or about one seventh of the whole territory in
 meadow; this standing next in the list after pasturage and
 unimproved lands, and, judging from the returns of previous
 years, the meadow is not reclaimed so fast as the woods are
 cleared.
 
 Let us here read what old Johnson says of these meadows in his
 "Wonder-working Providence," which gives the account of New
 England from 1628 to 1652, and see how matters looked to him.  He
 says of the Twelfth Church of Christ gathered at Concord: "This
 town is seated upon a fair fresh river, whose rivulets are filled
 with fresh marsh, and her streams with fish, it being a branch of
 that large river of Merrimack.  Allwifes and shad in their season
 come up to this town, but salmon and dace cannot come up, by
 reason of the rocky falls, which causeth their meadows to lie
 much covered with water, the which these people, together with
 their neighbor town, have several times essayed to cut through
 but cannot, yet it may be turned another way with an hundred
 pound charge as it appeared."  As to their farming he says:
 "Having laid out their estate upon cattle at 5 to 20 pound a cow,
 when they came to winter them with inland hay, and feed upon such
 wild fother as was never cut before, they could not hold out the
 winter, but, ordinarily the first or second year after their
 coming up to a new plantation, many of their cattle died." And
 this from the same author "Of the Planting of the 19th Church in
 the Mattachusets' Government, called Sudbury": "This year [does
 he mean 1654] the town and church of Christ at Sudbury began to
 have the first foundation stones laid, taking up her station in
 the inland country, as her elder sister Concord had formerly
 done, lying further up the same river, being furnished with great
 plenty of fresh marsh, but, it lying very low is much indamaged
 with land floods, insomuch that when the summer proves wet they
 lose part of their hay; yet are they so sufficiently provided
 that they take in cattle of other towns to winter."
 
 The sluggish artery of the Concord meadows steals thus unobserved
 through the town, without a murmur or a pulse-beat, its general
 course from southwest to northeast, and its length about fifty
 miles; a huge volume of matter, ceaselessly rolling through the
 plains and valleys of the substantial earth with the moccasoned
 tread of an Indian warrior, making haste from the high places of
 the earth to its ancient reservoir.  The murmurs of many a famous
 river on the other side of the globe reach even to us here, as to
 more distant dwellers on its banks; many a poet's stream floating
 the helms and shields of heroes on its bosom.  The Xanthus or
 Scamander is not a mere dry channel and bed of a mountain
 torrent, but fed by the everflowing springs of fame;--
 
     "And thou Simois, that as an arrowe, clere
      Through Troy rennest, aie downward to the sea";--
 
 and I trust that I may be allowed to associate our muddy but much
 abused Concord River with the most famous in history.
 
     "Sure there are poets which did never dream
      Upon Parnassus, nor did taste the stream
      Of Helicon; we therefore may suppose
      Those made not poets, but the poets those."
 
 The Mississippi, the Ganges, and the Nile, those journeying atoms
 from the Rocky Mountains, the Himmaleh, and Mountains of the
 Moon, have a kind of personal importance in the annals of the
 world.  The heavens are not yet drained over their sources, but
 the Mountains of the Moon still send their annual tribute to the
 Pasha without fail, as they did to the Pharaohs, though he must
 collect the rest of his revenue at the point of the sword.
 Rivers must have been the guides which conducted the footsteps of
 the first travellers.  They are the constant lure, when they flow
 by our doors, to distant enterprise and adventure, and, by a
 natural impulse, the dwellers on their banks will at length
 accompany their currents to the lowlands of the globe, or explore
 at their invitation the interior of continents.  They are the
 natural highways of all nations, not only levelling the ground
 and removing obstacles from the path of the traveller, quenching
 his thirst and bearing him on their bosoms, but conducting him
 through the most interesting scenery, the most populous portions
 of the globe, and where the animal and vegetable kingdoms attain
 their greatest perfection.
 
 I had often stood on the banks of the Concord, watching the lapse
 of the current, an emblem of all progress, following the same law
 with the system, with time, and all that is made; the weeds at
 the bottom gently bending down the stream, shaken by the watery
 wind, still planted where their seeds had sunk, but erelong to
 die and go down likewise; the shining pebbles, not yet anxious to
 better their condition, the chips and weeds, and occasional logs
 and stems of trees that floated past, fulfilling their fate, were
 objects of singular interest to me, and at last I resolved to
 launch myself on its bosom and float whither it would bear me.
 
 
 
 
 [page]
 
 
                        SATURDAY.
 
 
    "Come, come, my lovely fair, and let us try
     Those rural delicacies."
                _Christ's Invitation to the Soul._  ^Quarles^
 
 
 
 [page]
 
 
                       SATURDAY.
 
                         --*--
 
 
 At length, on Saturday, the last day of August, 1839, we two,
 brothers, and natives of Concord, weighed anchor in this river
 port; for Concord, too, lies under the sun, a port of entry and
 departure for the bodies as well as the souls of men; one shore
 at least exempted from all duties but such as an honest man will
 gladly discharge.  A warm drizzling rain had obscured the
 morning, and threatened to delay our voyage, but at length the
 leaves and grass were dried, and it came out a mild afternoon, as
 serene and fresh as if Nature were maturing some greater scheme
 of her own.  After this long dripping and oozing from every pore,
 she began to respire again more healthily than ever.  So with a
 vigorous shove we launched our boat from the bank, while the
 flags and bulrushes courtesied a God-speed, and dropped silently
 down the stream.
 
 Our boat, which had cost us a week's labor in the spring, was in
 form like a fisherman's dory, fifteen feet long by three and a
 half in breadth at the widest part, painted green below, with a
 border of blue, with reference to the two elements in which it
 was to spend its existence.  It had been loaded the evening before
 at our door, half a mile from the river, with potatoes and melons
 from a patch which we had cultivated, and a few utensils, and was
 provided with wheels in order to be rolled around falls, as well
 as with two sets of oars, and several slender poles for shoving
 in shallow places, and also two masts, one of which served for a
 tent-pole at night; for a buffalo-skin was to be our bed, and a
 tent of cotton cloth our roof.  It was strongly built, but heavy,
 and hardly of better model than usual.  If rightly made, a boat
 would be a sort of amphibious animal, a creature of two elements,
 related by one half its structure to some swift and shapely fish,
 and by the other to some strong-winged and graceful bird.  The
 fish shows where there should be the greatest breadth of beam and
 depth in the hold; its fins direct where to set the oars, and the
 tail gives some hint for the form and position of the rudder.  The
 bird shows how to rig and trim the sails, and what form to give
 to the prow that it may balance the boat, and divide the air and
 water best.  These hints we had but partially obeyed.  But the
 eyes, though they are no sailors, will never be satisfied with
 any model, however fashionable, which does not answer all the
 requisitions of art.  However, as art is all of a ship but the
 wood, and yet the wood alone will rudely serve the purpose of a
 ship, so our boat, being of wood, gladly availed itself of the
 old law that the heavier shall float the lighter, and though a
 dull water-fowl, proved a sufficient buoy for our purpose.
 
     "Were it the will of Heaven, an osier bough
      Were vessel safe enough the seas to plough."
 
 Some village friends stood upon a promontory lower down the
 stream to wave us a last farewell; but we, having already
 performed these shore rites, with excusable reserve, as befits
 those who are embarked on unusual enterprises, who behold but
 speak not, silently glided past the firm lands of Concord, both
 peopled cape and lonely summer meadow, with steady sweeps.  And
 yet we did unbend so far as to let our guns speak for us, when at
 length we had swept out of sight, and thus left the woods to ring
 again with their echoes; and it may be many russet-clad children,
 lurking in those broad meadows, with the bittern and the woodcock
 and the rail, though wholly concealed by brakes and hardhack and
 meadow-sweet, heard our salute that afternoon.
 
 We were soon floating past the first regular battle ground of the
 Revolution, resting on our oars between the still visible
 abutments of that "North Bridge," over which in April, 1775,
 rolled the first faint tide of that war, which ceased not, till,
 as we read on the stone on our right, it "gave peace to these
 United States." As a Concord poet has sung:--
 
     "By the rude bridge that arched the flood,
       Their flag to April's breeze unfurled,
     Here once the embattled farmers stood,
       And fired the shot heard round the world.
 
     "The foe long since in silence slept;
       Alike the conqueror silent sleeps;
     And Time the ruined bridge has swept
       Down the dark stream which seaward creeps."
 
 Our reflections had already acquired a historical remoteness from
 the scenes we had left, and we ourselves essayed to sing.
 
     Ah, 't is in vain the peaceful din
       That wakes the ignoble town,
     Not thus did braver spirits win
       A patriot's renown.
 
     There is one field beside this stream,
       Wherein no foot does fall,
     But yet it beareth in my dream
       A richer crop than all.
 
     Let me believe a dream so dear,
      Some heart beat high that day,
     Above the petty Province here,
      And Britain far away;
 
     Some hero of the ancient mould,
      Some arm of knightly worth,
     Of strength unbought, and faith unsold,
      Honored this spot of earth;
 
     Who sought the prize his heart described,
      And did not ask release,
     Whose free-born valor was not bribed
      By prospect of a peace.
 
     The men who stood on yonder height
      That day are long since gone;
     Not the same hand directs the fight
      And monumental stone.
 
     Ye were the Grecian cities then,
      The Romes of modern birth,
     Where the New England husbandmen
      Have shown a Roman worth.
 
     In vain I search a foreign land
      To find our Bunker Hill,
     And Lexington and Concord stand
      By no Laconian rill.
 
 With such thoughts we swept gently by this now peaceful
 pasture-ground, on waves of Concord, in which was long since
 drowned the din of war.
 
     But since we sailed
     Some things have failed,
     And many a dream
     Gone down the stream.
 
     Here then an aged shepherd dwelt,
     Who to his flock his substance dealt,
     And ruled them with a vigorous crook,
     By precept of the sacred Book;
     But he the pierless bridge passed o'er,
     And solitary left the shore.
 
     Anon a youthful pastor came,
     Whose crook was not unknown to fame,
     His lambs he viewed with gentle glance,
     Spread o'er the country's wide expanse,
     And fed with "Mosses from the Manse."
     Here was our Hawthorne in the dale,
     And here the shepherd told his tale.
 
 That slight shaft had now sunk behind the hills, and we had
 floated round the neighboring bend, and under the new North
 Bridge between Ponkawtasset and the Poplar Hill, into the Great
 Meadows, which, like a broad moccason print, have levelled a
 fertile and juicy place in nature.
 
      On Ponkawtasset, since, we took our way,
      Down this still stream to far Billericay,
      A poet wise has settled, whose fine ray
      Doth often shine on Concord's twilight day.
 
      Like those first stars, whose silver beams on high,
      Shining more brightly as the day goes by,
      Most travellers cannot at first descry,
      But eyes that wont to range the evening sky,
 
      And know celestial lights, do plainly see,
      And gladly hail them, numbering two or three;
      For lore that's deep must deeply studied be,
      As from deep wells men read star-poetry.
 
      These stars are never paled, though out of sight,
      But like the sun they shine forever bright;
      Ay, _they_ are suns, though earth must in its flight
      Put out its eyes that it may see their light.
 
      Who would neglect the least celestial sound,
      Or faintest light that falls on earthly ground,
      If he could know it one day would be found
      That star in Cygnus whither we are bound,
      And pale our sun with heavenly radiance round?
 
 Gradually the village murmur subsided, and we seemed to be
 embarked on the placid current of our dreams, floating from past
 to future as silently as one awakes to fresh morning or evening
 thoughts.  We glided noiselessly down the stream, occasionally
 driving a pickerel or a bream from the covert of the pads, and
 the smaller bittern now and then sailed away on sluggish wings
 from some recess in the shore, or the larger lifted itself out of
 the long grass at our approach, and carried its precious legs
 away to deposit them in a place of safety.  The tortoises also
 rapidly dropped into the water, as our boat ruffled the surface
 amid the willows, breaking the reflections of the trees.  The
 banks had passed the height of their beauty, and some of the
 brighter flowers showed by their faded tints that the season was
 verging towards the afternoon of the year; but this sombre tinge
 enhanced their sincerity, and in the still unabated heats they
 seemed like the mossy brink of some cool well.  The narrow-leaved
 willow (_Salix Purshiana_) lay along the surface of the water in
 masses of light green foliage, interspersed with the large balls
 of the button-bush.  The small rose-colored polygonum raised its
 head proudly above the water on either hand, and flowering at
 this season and in these localities, in front of dense fields of
 the white species which skirted the sides of the stream, its
 little streak of red looked very rare and precious.  The pure
 white blossoms of the arrow-head stood in the shallower parts,
 and a few cardinals on the margin still proudly surveyed
 themselves reflected in the water, though the latter, as well
 as the pickerel-weed, was now nearly out of blossom.  The
 snake-head, _Chelone glabra_, grew close to the shore, while a
 kind of coreopsis, turning its brazen face to the sun, full and
 rank, and a tall dull red flower, _Eupatorium purpureum_, or
 trumpet-weed, formed the rear rank of the fluvial array.  The
 bright blue flowers of the soap-wort gentian were sprinkled here
 and there in the adjacent meadows, like flowers which Proserpine
 had dropped, and still farther in the fields or higher on the
 bank were seen the purple Gerardia, the Virginian rhexia, and
 drooping neottia or ladies'-tresses; while from the more distant
 waysides which we occasionally passed, and banks where the sun
 had lodged, was reflected still a dull yellow beam from the ranks
 of tansy, now past its prime.  In short, Nature seemed to have
 adorned herself for our departure with a profusion of fringes and
 curls, mingled with the bright tints of flowers, reflected in the
 water.  But we missed the white water-lily, which is the queen of
 river flowers, its reign being over for this season.  He makes
 his voyage too late, perhaps, by a true water clock who delays so
 long.  Many of this species inhabit our Concord water.  I have
 passed down the river before sunrise on a summer morning between
 fields of lilies still shut in sleep; and when, at length, the
 flakes of sunlight from over the bank fell on the surface of the
 water, whole fields of white blossoms seemed to flash open before
 me, as I floated along, like the unfolding of a banner, so
 sensible is this flower to the influence of the sun's rays.
 
 As we were floating through the last of these familiar meadows,
 we observed the large and conspicuous flowers of the hibiscus,
 covering the dwarf willows, and mingled with the leaves of the
 grape, and wished that we could inform one of our friends behind
 of the locality of this somewhat rare and inaccessible flower
 before it was too late to pluck it; but we were just gliding out
 of sight of the village spire before it occurred to us that the
 farmer in the adjacent meadow would go to church on the morrow,
 and would carry this news for us; and so by the Monday, while we
 should be floating on the Merrimack, our friend would be reaching
 to pluck this blossom on the bank of the Concord.
 
 After a pause at Ball's Hill, the St. Ann's of Concord voyageurs,
 not to say any prayer for the success of our voyage, but to
 gather the few berries which were still left on the hills,
 hanging by very slender threads, we weighed anchor again, and
 were soon out of sight of our native village.  The land seemed to
 grow fairer as we withdrew from it.  Far away to the southwest
 lay the quiet village, left alone under its elms and buttonwoods
 in mid afternoon; and the hills, notwithstanding their blue,
 ethereal faces, seemed to cast a saddened eye on their old
 playfellows; but, turning short to the north, we bade adieu to
 their familiar outlines, and addressed ourselves to new scenes
 and adventures.  Naught was familiar but the heavens, from under
 whose roof the voyageur never passes; but with their countenance,
 and the acquaintance we had with river and wood, we trusted to
 fare well under any circumstances.
 
 From this point, the river runs perfectly straight for a mile or
 more to Carlisle Bridge, which consists of twenty wooden piers,
 and when we looked back over it, its surface was reduced to a
 line's breadth, and appeared like a cobweb gleaming in the sun.
 Here and there might be seen a pole sticking up, to mark the
 place where some fisherman had enjoyed unusual luck, and in
 return had consecrated his rod to the deities who preside over
 these shallows.  It was full twice as broad as before, deep and
 tranquil, with a muddy bottom, and bordered with willows, beyond
 which spread broad lagoons covered with pads, bulrushes, and
 flags.
 
 Late in the afternoon we passed a man on the shore fishing with a
 long birch pole, its silvery bark left on, and a dog at his side,
 rowing so near as to agitate his cork with our oars, and drive
 away luck for a season; and when we had rowed a mile as straight
 as an arrow, with our faces turned towards him, and the bubbles
 in our wake still visible on the tranquil surface, there stood
 the fisher still with his dog, like statues under the other side
 of the heavens, the only objects to relieve the eye in the
 extended meadow; and there would he stand abiding his luck, till
 he took his way home through the fields at evening with his
 fish.  Thus, by one bait or another, Nature allures inhabitants
 into all her recesses.  This man was the last of our townsmen
 whom we saw, and we silently through him bade adieu to our
 friends.
 
 
 The characteristics and pursuits of various ages and races of men
 are always existing in epitome in every neighborhood.  The
 pleasures of my earliest youth have become the inheritance of
 other men.  This man is still a fisher, and belongs to an era in
 which I myself have lived.  Perchance he is not confounded by many
 knowledges, and has not sought out many inventions, but how to
 take many fishes before the sun sets, with his slender birchen
 pole and flaxen line, that is invention enough for him.  It is
 good even to be a fisherman in summer and in winter.  Some men are
 judges these August days, sitting on benches, even till the court
 rises; they sit judging there honorably, between the seasons and
 between meals, leading a civil politic life, arbitrating in the
 case of Spaulding _versus_ Cummings, it may be, from highest noon
 till the red vesper sinks into the west.  The fisherman,
 meanwhile, stands in three feet of water, under the same summer's
 sun, arbitrating in other cases between muckworm and shiner, amid
 the fragrance of water-lilies, mint, and pontederia, leading his
 life many rods from the dry land, within a pole's length of where
 the larger fishes swim.  Human life is to him very much like a
 river,
 
    "renning aie downward to the sea."
 
 This was his observation.  His honor made a great discovery in
 bailments.
 
 I can just remember an old brown-coated man who was the Walton of
 this stream, who had come over from Newcastle, England, with his
 son,--the latter a stout and hearty man who had lifted an anchor
 in his day.  A straight old man he was who took his way in silence
 through the meadows, having passed the period of communication
 with his fellows; his old experienced coat, hanging long and
 straight and brown as the yellow-pine bark, glittering with so
 much smothered sunlight, if you stood near enough, no work of art
 but naturalized at length.  I often discovered him unexpectedly
 amid the pads and the gray willows when he moved, fishing in some
 old country method,--for youth and age then went a fishing
 together,--full of incommunicable thoughts, perchance about his
 own Tyne and Northumberland.  He was always to be seen in serene
 afternoons haunting the river, and almost rustling with the
 sedge; so many sunny hours in an old man's life, entrapping silly
 fish; almost grown to be the sun's familiar; what need had he of
 hat or raiment any, having served out his time, and seen through
 such thin disguises?  I have seen how his coeval fates rewarded
 him with the yellow perch, and yet I thought his luck was not in
 proportion to his years; and I have seen when, with slow steps
 and weighed down with aged thoughts, he disappeared with his fish
 under his low-roofed house on the skirts of the village.  I think
 nobody else saw him; nobody else remembers him now, for he soon
 after died, and migrated to new Tyne streams.  His fishing was
 not a sport, nor solely a means of subsistence, but a sort of
 solemn sacrament and withdrawal from the world, just as the aged
 read their Bibles.
 
 
 Whether we live by the seaside, or by the lakes and rivers, or on
 the prairie, it concerns us to attend to the nature of fishes,
 since they are not phenomena confined to certain localities only,
 but forms and phases of the life in nature universally dispersed.
 The countless shoals which annually coast the shores of Europe
 and America are not so interesting to the student of nature, as
 the more fertile law itself, which deposits their spawn on the
 tops of mountains, and on the interior plains; the fish principle
 in nature, from which it results that they may be found in water
 in so many places, in greater or less numbers.  The natural
 historian is not a fisherman, who prays for cloudy days and good
 luck merely, but as fishing has been styled "a contemplative
 man's recreation," introducing him profitably to woods and water,
 so the fruit of the naturalist's observations is not in new
 genera or species, but in new contemplations still, and science
 is only a more contemplative man's recreation.  The seeds of the
 life of fishes are everywhere disseminated, whether the winds
 waft them, or the waters float them, or the deep earth holds
 them; wherever a pond is dug, straightway it is stocked with this
 vivacious race.  They have a lease of nature, and it is not yet
 out.  The Chinese are bribed to carry their ova from province to
 province in jars or in hollow reeds, or the water-birds to
 transport them to the mountain tarns and interior lakes.  There
 are fishes wherever there is a fluid medium, and even in clouds
 and in melted metals we detect their semblance.  Think how in
 winter you can sink a line down straight in a pasture through
 snow and through ice, and pull up a bright, slippery, dumb,
 subterranean silver or golden fish!  It is curious, also, to
 reflect how they make one family, from the largest to the
 smallest.  The least minnow that lies on the ice as bait for
 pickerel, looks like a huge sea-fish cast up on the shore.  In
 the waters of this town there are about a dozen distinct species,
 though the inexperienced would expect many more.
 
 
 It enhances our sense of the grand security and serenity of
 nature, to observe the still undisturbed economy and content of
 the fishes of this century, their happiness a regular fruit of
 the summer.  The Fresh-Water Sun-Fish, Bream, or Ruff, _Pomotis
 vulgaris_, as it were, without ancestry, without posterity, still
 represents the Fresh-Water Sun-Fish in nature.  It is the most
 common of all, and seen on every urchin's string; a simple and
 inoffensive fish, whose nests are visible all along the shore,
 hollowed in the sand, over which it is steadily poised through
 the summer hours on waving fin.  Sometimes there are twenty or
 thirty nests in the space of a few rods, two feet wide by half a
 foot in depth, and made with no little labor, the weeds being
 removed, and the sand shoved up on the sides, like a bowl.  Here
 it may be seen early in summer assiduously brooding, and driving
 away minnows and larger fishes, even its own species, which would
 disturb its ova, pursuing them a few feet, and circling round
 swiftly to its nest again: the minnows, like young sharks,
 instantly entering the empty nests, meanwhile, and swallowing the
 spawn, which is attached to the weeds and to the bottom, on the
 sunny side.  The spawn is exposed to so many dangers, that a very
 small proportion can ever become fishes, for beside being the
 constant prey of birds and fishes, a great many nests are made so
 near the shore, in shallow water, that they are left dry in a few
 days, as the river goes down.  These and the lamprey's are the
 only fishes' nests that I have observed, though the ova of some
 species may be seen floating on the surface.  The breams are so
 careful of their charge that you may stand close by in the water
 and examine them at your leisure.  I have thus stood over them
 half an hour at a time, and stroked them familiarly without
 frightening them, suffering them to nibble my fingers harmlessly,
 and seen them erect their dorsal fins in anger when my hand
 approached their ova, and have even taken them gently out of the
 water with my hand; though this cannot be accomplished by a
 sudden movement, however dexterous, for instant warning is
 conveyed to them through their denser element, but only by
 letting the fingers gradually close about them as they are poised
 over the palm, and with the utmost gentleness raising them slowly
 to the surface.  Though stationary, they keep up a constant
 sculling or waving motion with their fins, which is exceedingly
 graceful, and expressive of their humble happiness; for unlike
 ours, the element in which they live is a stream which must be
 constantly resisted.  From time to time they nibble the weeds at
 the bottom or overhanging their nests, or dart after a fly or a
 worm.  The dorsal fin, besides answering the purpose of a keel,
 with the anal, serves to keep the fish upright, for in shallow
 water, where this is not covered, they fall on their sides.  As
 you stand thus stooping over the bream in its nest, the edges of
 the dorsal and caudal fins have a singular dusty golden
 reflection, and its eyes, which stand out from the head, are
 transparent and colorless.  Seen in its native element, it is a
 very beautiful and compact fish, perfect in all its parts, and
 looks like a brilliant coin fresh from the mint.  It is a perfect
 jewel of the river, the green, red, coppery, and golden
 reflections of its mottled sides being the concentration of such
 rays as struggle through the floating pads and flowers to the
 sandy bottom, and in harmony with the sunlit brown and yellow
 pebbles.  Behind its watery shield it dwells far from many
 accidents inevitable to human life.
 
 There is also another species of bream found in our river,
 without the red spot on the operculum, which, according to
 M.  Agassiz, is undescribed.
 
 The Common Perch, _Perca flavescens_, which name describes well the
 gleaming, golden reflections of its scales as it is drawn out of
 the water, its red gills standing out in vain in the thin
 element, is one of the handsomest and most regularly formed of
 our fishes, and at such a moment as this reminds us of the fish
 in the picture which wished to be restored to its native element
 until it had grown larger; and indeed most of this species that
 are caught are not half grown.  In the ponds there is a
 light-colored and slender kind, which swim in shoals of many
 hundreds in the sunny water, in company with the shiner,
 averaging not more than six or seven inches in length, while only
 a few larger specimens are found in the deepest water, which prey
 upon their weaker brethren.  I have often attracted these small
 perch to the shore at evening, by rippling the water with my
 fingers, and they may sometimes be caught while attempting to
 pass inside your hands.  It is a tough and heedless fish, biting
 from impulse, without nibbling, and from impulse refraining to
 bite, and sculling indifferently past.  It rather prefers the
 clear water and sandy bottoms, though here it has not much
 choice.  It is a true fish, such as the angler loves to put into
 his basket or hang at the top of his willow twig, in shady
 afternoons along the banks of the stream.  So many unquestionable
 fishes he counts, and so many shiners, which he counts and then
 throws away.  Old Josselyn in his "New England's Rarities,"
 published in 1672, mentions the Perch or River Partridge.
 
 The Chivin, Dace, Roach, Cousin Trout, or whatever else it is
 called, _Leuciscus pulchellus_, white and red, always an unexpected
 prize, which, however, any angler is glad to hook for its
 rarity.  A name that reminds us of many an unsuccessful ramble by
 swift streams, when the wind rose to disappoint the fisher.  It is
 commonly a silvery soft-scaled fish, of graceful, scholarlike,
 and classical look, like many a picture in an English book.  It
 loves a swift current and a sandy bottom, and bites
 inadvertently, yet not without appetite for the bait.  The
 minnows are used as bait for pickerel in the winter.  The red
 chivin, according to some, is still the same fish, only older, or
 with its tints deepened as they think by the darker water it
 inhabits, as the red clouds swim in the twilight atmosphere.  He
 who has not hooked the red chivin is not yet a complete angler.
 Other fishes, methinks, are slightly amphibious, but this is a
 denizen of the water wholly.  The cork goes dancing down the
 swift-rushing stream, amid the weeds and sands, when suddenly, by
 a coincidence never to be remembered, emerges this fabulous
 inhabitant of another element, a thing heard of but not seen, as
 if it were the instant creation of an eddy, a true product of the
 running stream.  And this bright cupreous dolphin was spawned and
 has passed its life beneath the level of your feet in your native
 fields.  Fishes too, as well as birds and clouds, derive their
 armor from the mine.  I have heard of mackerel visiting the copper
 banks at a particular season; this fish, perchance, has its
 habitat in the Coppermine River.  I have caught white chivin of
 great size in the Aboljacknagesic, where it empties into the
 Penobscot, at the base of Mount Ktaadn, but no red ones
 there.  The latter variety seems not to have been sufficiently
 observed.
 
 The Dace, _Leuciscus argenteus_, is a slight silvery minnow, found
 generally in the middle of the stream, where the current is most
 rapid, and frequently confounded with the last named.
 
 The Shiner, _Leuciscus crysoleucas_, is a soft-scaled and tender
 fish, the victim of its stronger neighbors, found in all places,
 deep and shallow, clear and turbid; generally the first nibbler
 at the bait, but, with its small mouth and nibbling propensities,
 not easily caught.  It is a gold or silver bit that passes current
 in the river, its limber tail dimpling the surface in sport or
 flight.  I have seen the fry, when frightened by something thrown
 into the water, leap out by dozens, together with the dace, and
 wreck themselves upon a floating plank.  It is the little
 light-infant of the river, with body armor of gold or silver
 spangles, slipping, gliding its life through with a quirk of the
 tail, half in the water, half in the air, upward and ever upward
 with flitting fin to more crystalline tides, yet still abreast of
 us dwellers on the bank.  It is almost dissolved by the summer
 heats.  A slighter and lighter colored shiner is found in one of
 our ponds.
 
 The Pickerel, _Esox reticulatus_, the swiftest, wariest, and most
 ravenous of fishes, which Josselyn calls the Fresh-Water or River
 Wolf, is very common in the shallow and weedy lagoons along the
 sides of the stream.  It is a solemn, stately, ruminant fish,
 lurking under the shadow of a pad at noon, with still,
 circumspect, voracious eye, motionless as a jewel set in water,
 or moving slowly along to take up its position, darting from time
 to time at such unlucky fish or frog or insect as comes within
 its range, and swallowing it at a gulp.  I have caught one which
 had swallowed a brother pickerel half as large as itself, with
 the tail still visible in its mouth, while the head was already
 digested in its stomach.  Sometimes a striped snake, bound to
 greener meadows across the stream, ends its undulatory progress
 in the same receptacle.  They are so greedy and impetuous that
 they are frequently caught by being entangled in the line the
 moment it is cast.  Fishermen also distinguish the brook pickerel,
 a shorter and thicker fish than the former.
 
 The Horned Pout, _Pimelodus nebulosus_, sometimes called Minister,
 from the peculiar squeaking noise it makes when drawn out of the
 water, is a dull and blundering fellow, and like the eel
 vespertinal in his habits, and fond of the mud.  It bites
 deliberately as if about its business.  They are taken at night
 with a mass of worms strung on a thread, which catches in their
 teeth, sometimes three or four, with an eel, at one pull.  They
 are extremely tenacious of life, opening and shutting their
 mouths for half an hour after their heads have been cut off.  A
 bloodthirsty and bullying race of rangers, inhabiting the fertile
 river bottoms, with ever a lance in rest, and ready to do battle
 with their nearest neighbor.  I have observed them in summer, when
 every other one had a long and bloody scar upon his back, where
 the skin was gone, the mark, perhaps, of some fierce
 encounter.  Sometimes the fry, not an inch long, are seen
 darkening the shore with their myriads.
 
 The Suckers, _Catostomi Bostonienses_ and _tuberculati_, Common and
 Horned, perhaps on an average the largest of our fishes, may be
 seen in shoals of a hundred or more, stemming the current in the
 sun, on their mysterious migrations, and sometimes sucking in the
 bait which the fisherman suffers to float toward them.  The
 former, which sometimes grow to a large size, are frequently
 caught by the hand in the brooks, or like the red chivin, are
 jerked out by a hook fastened firmly to the end of a stick, and
 placed under their jaws.  They are hardly known to the mere
 angler, however, not often biting at his baits, though the
 spearer carries home many a mess in the spring.  To our village
 eyes, these shoals have a foreign and imposing aspect, realizing
 the fertility of the seas.
 
 The Common Eel, too, _Muraena Bostoniensis_, the only species of
 eel known in the State, a slimy, squirming creature, informed of
 mud, still squirming in the pan, is speared and hooked up with
 various success.  Methinks it too occurs in picture, left after
 the deluge, in many a meadow high and dry.
 
 In the shallow parts of the river, where the current is rapid,
 and the bottom pebbly, you may sometimes see the curious circular
 nests of the Lamprey Eel, _Petromyzon Americanus_, the American
 Stone-Sucker, as large as a cart-wheel, a foot or two in height,
 and sometimes rising half a foot above the surface of the
 water.  They collect these stones, of the size of a hen's egg,
 with their mouths, as their name implies, and are said to fashion
 them into circles with their tails.  They ascend falls by clinging
 to the stones, which may sometimes be raised, by lifting the fish
 by the tail.  As they are not seen on their way down the streams,
 it is thought by fishermen that they never return, but waste away
 and die, clinging to rocks and stumps of trees for an indefinite
 period; a tragic feature in the scenery of the river bottoms
 worthy to be remembered with Shakespeare's description of the
 sea-floor.  They are rarely seen in our waters at present, on
 account of the dams, though they are taken in great quantities at
 the mouth of the river in Lowell.  Their nests, which are very
 conspicuous, look more like art than anything in the river.
 
 If we had leisure this afternoon, we might turn our prow up the
 brooks in quest of the classical trout and the minnows.  Of the
 last alone, according to M.  Agassiz, several of the species found
 in this town are yet undescribed.  These would, perhaps, complete
 the list of our finny contemporaries in the Concord waters.
 
 Salmon, Shad, and Alewives were formerly abundant here, and taken
 in weirs by the Indians, who taught this method to the whites, by
 whom they were used as food and as manure, until the dam, and
 afterward the canal at Billerica, and the factories at Lowell,
 put an end to their migrations hitherward; though it is thought
 that a few more enterprising shad may still occasionally be seen
 in this part of the river.  It is said, to account for the
 destruction of the fishery, that those who at that time
 represented the interests of the fishermen and the fishes,
 remembering between what dates they were accustomed to take the
 grown shad, stipulated, that the dams should be left open for
 that season only, and the fry, which go down a month later, were
 consequently stopped and destroyed by myriads.  Others say that
 the fish-ways were not properly constructed.  Perchance, after a
 few thousands of years, if the fishes will be patient, and pass
 their summers elsewhere, meanwhile, nature will have levelled the
 Billerica dam, and the Lowell factories, and the Grass-ground
 River run clear again, to be explored by new migratory shoals,
 even as far as the Hopkinton pond and Westborough swamp.
 
 One would like to know more of that race, now extinct, whose
 seines lie rotting in the garrets of their children, who openly
 professed the trade of fishermen, and even fed their townsmen
 creditably, not skulking through the meadows to a rainy afternoon
 sport.  Dim visions we still get of miraculous draughts of fishes,
 and heaps uncountable by the river-side, from the tales of our
 seniors sent on horseback in their childhood from the neighboring
 towns, perched on saddle-bags, with instructions to get the one
 bag filled with shad, the other with alewives.  At least one
 memento of those days may still exist in the memory of this
 generation, in the familiar appellation of a celebrated
 train-band of this town, whose untrained ancestors stood
 creditably at Concord North Bridge.  Their captain, a man of
 piscatory tastes, having duly warned his company to turn out on a
 certain day, they, like obedient soldiers, appeared promptly on
 parade at the appointed time, but, unfortunately, they went
 undrilled, except in the manuoevres of a soldier's wit and
 unlicensed jesting, that May day; for their captain, forgetting
 his own appointment, and warned only by the favorable aspect of
 the heavens, as he had often done before, went a-fishing that
 afternoon, and his company thenceforth was known to old and
 young, grave and gay, as "The Shad," and by the youths of this
 vicinity this was long regarded as the proper name of all the
 irregular militia in Christendom.  But, alas! no record of these
 fishers' lives remains that we know, unless it be one brief page
 of hard but unquestionable history, which occurs in Day Book
 No.  4, of an old trader of this town, long since dead, which
 shows pretty plainly what constituted a fisherman's stock in
 trade in those days.  It purports to be a Fisherman's Account
 Current, probably for the fishing season of the year 1805, during
 which months he purchased daily rum and sugar, sugar and rum,
 N. E.  and W. I., "one cod line," "one brown mug," and "a line for
 the seine"; rum and sugar, sugar and rum, "good loaf sugar," and
 "good brown," W. I.  and N. E., in short and uniform entries to
 the bottom of the page, all carried out in pounds, shillings, and
 pence, from March 25th to June 5th, and promptly settled by
 receiving "cash in full" at the last date.  But perhaps not so
 settled altogether.  These were the necessaries of life in those
 days; with salmon, shad, and alewives, fresh and pickled, he was
 thereafter independent on the groceries.  Rather a preponderance
 of the fluid elements; but such is the fisherman's nature.  I can
 faintly remember to have seen this same fisher in my earliest
 youth, still as near the river as he could get, with uncertain
 undulatory step, after so many things had gone down stream,
 swinging a scythe in the meadow, his bottle like a serpent hid in
 the grass; himself as yet not cut down by the Great Mower.
 
 Surely the fates are forever kind, though Nature's laws are more
 immutable than any despot's, yet to man's daily life they rarely
 seem rigid, but permit him to relax with license in summer
 weather.  He is not harshly reminded of the things he may not
 do.  She is very kind and liberal to all men of vicious habits,
 and certainly does not deny them quarter; they do not die without
 priest.  Still they maintain life along the way, keeping this side
 the Styx, still hearty, still resolute, "never better in their
 lives"; and again, after a dozen years have elapsed, they start
 up from behind a hedge, asking for work and wages for able-bodied
 men.  Who has not met such
 
        "a beggar on the way,
    Who sturdily could gang? ....
    Who cared neither for wind nor wet,
    In lands where'er he past?"
 
    "That bold adopts each house he views, his own;
    Makes every pulse his checquer, and, at pleasure,
    Walks forth, and taxes all the world, like Caesar";--
 
 as if consistency were the secret of health, while the poor
 inconsistent aspirant man, seeking to live a pure life, feeding
 on air, divided against himself, cannot stand, but pines and dies
 after a life of sickness, on beds of down.
 
 The unwise are accustomed to speak as if some were not sick; but
 methinks the difference between men in respect to health is not
 great enough to lay much stress upon.  Some are reputed sick and
 some are not.  It often happens that the sicker man is the nurse
 to the sounder.
 
 Shad are still taken in the basin of Concord River at Lowell,
 where they are said to be a month earlier than the Merrimack
 shad, on account of the warmth of the water.  Still patiently,
 almost pathetically, with instinct not to be discouraged, not to
 be _reasoned_ with, revisiting their old haunts, as if their
 stern fates would relent, and still met by the Corporation with
 its dam.  Poor shad!  where is thy redress?  When Nature gave thee
 instinct, gave she thee the heart to bear thy fate?  Still
 wandering the sea in thy scaly armor to inquire humbly at the
 mouths of rivers if man has perchance left them free for thee to
 enter.  By countless shoals loitering uncertain meanwhile, merely
 stemming the tide there, in danger from sea foes in spite of thy
 bright armor, awaiting new instructions, until the sands, until
 the water itself, tell thee if it be so or not.  Thus by whole
 migrating nations, full of instinct, which is thy faith, in this
 backward spring, turned adrift, and perchance knowest not where
 men do _not_ dwell, where there are _not_ factories, in these
 days.  Armed with no sword, no electric shock, but mere Shad,
 armed only with innocence and a just cause, with tender dumb
 mouth only forward, and scales easy to be detached.  I for one am
 with thee, and who knows what may avail a crow-bar against that
 Billerica dam?--Not despairing when whole myriads have gone to
 feed those sea monsters during thy suspense, but still brave,
 indifferent, on easy fin there, like shad reserved for higher
 destinies.  Willing to be decimated for man's behoof after the
 spawning season.  Away with the superficial and selfish
 phil-_anthropy_ of men,--who knows what admirable virtue of
 fishes may be below low-water-mark, bearing up against a hard
 destiny, not admired by that fellow-creature who alone can
 appreciate it!  Who hears the fishes when they cry?  It will not
 be forgotten by some memory that we were contemporaries.  Thou
 shalt erelong have thy way up the rivers, up all the rivers of
 the globe, if I am not mistaken.  Yea, even thy dull watery dream
 shall be more than realized.  If it were not so, but thou wert to
 be overlooked at first and at last, then would not I take their
 heaven.  Yes, I say so, who think I know better than thou canst.
 Keep a stiff fin then, and stem all the tides thou mayst meet.
 
 At length it would seem that the interests, not of the fishes
 only, but of the men of Wayland, of Sudbury, of Concord, demand
 the levelling of that dam.  Innumerable acres of meadow are
 waiting to be made dry land, wild native grass to give place to
 English.  The farmers stand with scythes whet, waiting the
 subsiding of the waters, by gravitation, by evaporation or
 otherwise, but sometimes their eyes do not rest, their wheels do
 not roll, on the quaking meadow ground during the haying season
 at all.  So many sources of wealth inaccessible.  They rate the
 loss hereby incurred in the single town of Wayland alone as equal
 to the expense of keeping a hundred yoke of oxen the year
 round.  One year, as I learn, not long ago, the farmers standing
 ready to drive their teams afield as usual, the water gave no
 signs of falling; without new attraction in the heavens, without
 freshet or visible cause, still standing stagnant at an
 unprecedented height.  All hydrometers were at fault; some
 trembled for their English even.  But speedy emissaries revealed
 the unnatural secret, in the new float-board, wholly a foot in
 width, added to their already too high privileges by the dam
 proprietors.  The hundred yoke of oxen, meanwhile, standing
 patient, gazing wishfully meadowward, at that inaccessible waving
 native grass, uncut but by the great mower Time, who cuts so
 broad a swathe, without so much as a wisp to wind about their
 horns.
 
 
 That was a long pull from Ball's Hill to Carlisle Bridge, sitting
 with our faces to the south, a slight breeze rising from the
 north, but nevertheless water still runs and grass grows, for
 now, having passed the bridge between Carlisle and Bedford, we
 see men haying far off in the meadow, their heads waving like the
 grass which they cut.  In the distance the wind seemed to bend all
 alike.  As the night stole over, such a freshness was wafted
 across the meadow that every blade of cut grass seemed to teem
 with life.  Faint purple clouds began to be reflected in the
 water, and the cow-bells tinkled louder along the banks, while,
 like sly water-rats, we stole along nearer the shore, looking for
 a place to pitch our camp.
 
 At length, when we had made about seven miles, as far as
 Billerica, we moored our boat on the west side of a little rising
 ground which in the spring forms an island in the river.  Here we
 found huckleberries still hanging upon the bushes, where they
 seemed to have slowly ripened for our especial use.  Bread and
 sugar, and cocoa boiled in river water, made our repast, and as
 we had drank in the fluvial prospect all day, so now we took a
 draft of the water with our evening meal to propitiate the river
 gods, and whet our vision for the sights it was to behold.  The
 sun was setting on the one hand, while our eminence was
 contributing its shadow to the night, on the other.  It seemed
 insensibly to grow lighter as the night shut in, and a distant
 and solitary farm-house was revealed, which before lurked in the
 shadows of the noon.  There was no other house in sight, nor any
 cultivated field.  To the right and left, as far as the horizon,
 were straggling pine woods with their plumes against the sky, and
 across the river were rugged hills, covered with shrub oaks,
 tangled with grape-vines and ivy, with here and there a gray rock
 jutting out from the maze.  The sides of these cliffs, though a
 quarter of a mile distant, were almost heard to rustle while we
 looked at them, it was such a leafy wilderness; a place for fauns
 and satyrs, and where bats hung all day to the rocks, and at
 evening flitted over the water, and fire-flies husbanded their
 light under the grass and leaves against the night.  When we had
 pitched our tent on the hillside, a few rods from the shore, we
 sat looking through its triangular door in the twilight at our
 lonely mast on the shore, just seen above the alders, and hardly
 yet come to a stand-still from the swaying of the stream; the
 first encroachment of commerce on this land.  There was our port,
 our Ostia.  That straight geometrical line against the water and
 the sky stood for the last refinements of civilized life, and
 what of sublimity there is in history was there symbolized.
 
 For the most part, there was no recognition of human life in the
 night, no human breathing was heard, only the breathing of the
 wind.  As we sat up, kept awake by the novelty of our situation,
 we heard at intervals foxes stepping about over the dead leaves,
 and brushing the dewy grass close to our tent, and once a
 musquash fumbling among the potatoes and melons in our boat, but
 when we hastened to the shore we could detect only a ripple in
 the water ruffling the disk of a star.  At intervals we were
 serenaded by the song of a dreaming sparrow or the throttled cry
 of an owl, but after each sound which near at hand broke the
 stillness of the night, each crackling of the twigs, or rustling
 among the leaves, there was a sudden pause, and deeper and more
 conscious silence, as if the intruder were aware that no life was
 rightfully abroad at that hour.  There was a fire in Lowell, as
 we judged, this night, and we saw the horizon blazing, and heard
 the distant alarm-bells, as it were a faint tinkling music borne
 to these woods.  But the most constant and memorable sound of a
 summer's night, which we did not fail to hear every night
 afterward, though at no time so incessantly and so favorably as
 now, was the barking of the house-dogs, from the loudest and
 hoarsest bark to the faintest aerial palpitation under the eaves
 of heaven, from the patient but anxious mastiff to the timid and
 wakeful terrier, at first loud and rapid, then faint and slow, to
 be imitated only in a whisper; wow-wow-wow-wow--wo--wo--w--w.
 Even in a retired and uninhabited district like this, it was a
 sufficiency of sound for the ear of night, and more impressive
 than any music.  I have heard the voice of a hound, just before
 daylight, while the stars were shining, from over the woods and
 river, far in the horizon, when it sounded as sweet and melodious
 as an instrument.  The hounding of a dog pursuing a fox or other
 animal in the horizon, may have first suggested the notes of the
 hunting-horn to alternate with and relieve the lungs of the dog.
 This natural bugle long resounded in the woods of the ancient
 world before the horn was invented.  The very dogs that sullenly
 bay the moon from farm-yards in these nights excite more heroism
 in our breasts than all the civil exhortations or war sermons of
 the age.  "I would rather be a dog, and bay the moon," than many
 a Roman that I know.  The night is equally indebted to the
 clarion of the cock, with wakeful hope, from the very setting of
 the sun, prematurely ushering in the dawn.  All these sounds, the
 crowing of cocks, the baying of dogs, and the hum of insects at
 noon, are the evidence of nature's health or _sound_ state.  Such
 is the never-failing beauty and accuracy of language, the most
 perfect art in the world; the chisel of a thousand years
 retouches it.
 
 At length the antepenultimate and drowsy hours drew on, and all
 sounds were denied entrance to our ears.
 
      Who sleeps by day and walks by night,
      Will meet no spirit but some sprite.
 
 
 
 
 [page]
 
 
                          SUNDAY.
 
 
            "The river calmly flows,
         Through shining banks, through lonely glen,
      Where the owl shrieks, though ne'er the cheer of men
            Has stirred its mute repose,
      Still if you should walk there, you would go there again."
                                           ^CHANNING.^
 
 
 [page]
 
 
    "The Indians tell us of a beautiful River lying far to the south,
 which they call Merrimack."
 
               ^Sieur de Monts^, _Relations of the jesuits_, 1604.
 
 
 [page]
 
 
 
                         SUNDAY.
 
                         --*--
 
 
 In the morning the river and adjacent country were covered with a
 dense fog, through which the smoke of our fire curled up like a
 still subtiler mist; but before we had rowed many rods, the sun
 arose and the fog rapidly dispersed, leaving a slight steam only
 to curl along the surface of the water.  It was a quiet Sunday
 morning, with more of the auroral rosy and white than of the
 yellow light in it, as if it dated from earlier than the fall of
 man, and still preserved a heathenish integrity:--
 
      An early unconverted Saint,
      Free from noontide or evening taint,
      Heathen without reproach,
      That did upon the civil day encroach,
      And ever since its birth
      Had trod the outskirts of the earth.
 
 But the impressions which the morning makes vanish with its dews,
 and not even the most "persevering mortal" can preserve the
 memory of its freshness to mid-day.  As we passed the various
 islands, or what were islands in the spring, rowing with our
 backs down stream, we gave names to them.  The one on which we had
 camped we called Fox Island, and one fine densely wooded island
 surrounded by deep water and overrun by grape-vines, which looked
 like a mass of verdure and of flowers cast upon the waves, we
 named Grape Island.  From Ball's Hill to Billerica meeting-house,
 the river was still twice as broad as in Concord, a deep, dark,
 and dead stream, flowing between gentle hills and sometimes
 cliffs, and well wooded all the way.  It was a long woodland lake
 bordered with willows.  For long reaches we could see neither
 house nor cultivated field, nor any sign of the vicinity of
 man.  Now we coasted along some shallow shore by the edge of a
 dense palisade of bulrushes, which straightly bounded the water
 as if clipt by art, reminding us of the reed forts of the
 East-Indians, of which we had read; and now the bank slightly
 raised was overhung with graceful grasses and various species of
 brake, whose downy stems stood closely grouped and naked as in a
 vase, while their heads spread several feet on either side.  The
 dead limbs of the willow were rounded and adorned by the climbing
 mikania, _Mikania scandens_, which filled every crevice in the
 leafy bank, contrasting agreeably with the gray bark of its
 supporter and the balls of the button-bush.  The water willow,
 _Salix Purshiana_, when it is of large size and entire, is the most
 graceful and ethereal of our trees.  Its masses of light green
 foliage, piled one upon another to the height of twenty or thirty
 feet, seemed to float on the surface of the water, while the
 slight gray stems and the shore were hardly visible between
 them.  No tree is so wedded to the water, and harmonizes so well
 with still streams.  It is even more graceful than the weeping
 willow, or any pendulous trees, which dip their branches in the
 stream instead of being buoyed up by it.  Its limbs curved outward
 over the surface as if attracted by it.  It had not a New England
 but an Oriental character, reminding us of trim Persian gardens,
 of Haroun Alraschid, and the artificial lakes of the East.
 
 As we thus dipped our way along between fresh masses of foliage
 overrun with the grape and smaller flowering vines, the surface
 was so calm, and both air and water so transparent, that the
 flight of a kingfisher or robin over the river was as distinctly
 seen reflected in the water below as in the air above.  The birds
 seemed to flit through submerged groves, alighting on the
 yielding sprays, and their clear notes to come up from below.  We
 were uncertain whether the water floated the land, or the land
 held the water in its bosom.  It was such a season, in short, as
 that in which one of our Concord poets sailed on its stream, and
 sung its quiet glories.
 
    "There is an inward voice, that in the stream
    Sends forth its spirit to the listening ear,
    And in a calm content it floweth on,
    Like wisdom, welcome with its own respect.
    Clear in its breast lie all these beauteous thoughts,
    It doth receive the green and graceful trees,
    And the gray rocks smile in its peaceful arms."
 
 And more he sung, but too serious for our page.  For every oak and
 birch too growing on the hill-top, as well as for these elms and
 willows, we knew that there was a graceful ethereal and ideal
 tree making down from the roots, and sometimes Nature in high
 tides brings her mirror to its foot and makes it visible.  The
 stillness was intense and almost conscious, as if it were a
 natural Sabbath, and we fancied that the morning was the evening
 of a celestial day.  The air was so elastic and crystalline that
 it had the same effect on the landscape that a glass has on a
 picture, to give it an ideal remoteness and perfection.  The
 landscape was clothed in a mild and quiet light, in which the
 woods and fences checkered and partitioned it with new
 regularity, and rough and uneven fields stretched away with
 lawn-like smoothness to the horizon, and the clouds, finely
 distinct and picturesque, seemed a fit drapery to hang over
 fairy-land.  The world seemed decked for some holiday or prouder
 pageantry, with silken streamers flying, and the course of our
 lives to wind on before us like a green lane into a country maze,
 at the season when fruit-trees are in blossom.
 
 Why should not our whole life and its scenery be actually thus
 fair and distinct?  All our lives want a suitable background.  They
 should at least, like the life of the anchorite, be as impressive
 to behold as objects in the desert, a broken shaft or crumbling
 mound against a limitless horizon.  Character always secures for
 itself this advantage, and is thus distinct and unrelated to near
 or trivial objects, whether things or persons.  On this same
 stream a maiden once sailed in my boat, thus unattended but by
 invisible guardians, and as she sat in the prow there was nothing
 but herself between the steersman and the sky.  I could then say
 with the poet,--
 
          "Sweet falls the summer air
       Over her frame who sails with me;
       Her way like that is beautifully free,
          Her nature far more rare,
    And is her constant heart of virgin purity."
 
 At evening still the very stars seem but this maiden's emissaries
 and reporters of her progress.
 
    Low in the eastern sky
    Is set thy glancing eye;
    And though its gracious light
    Ne'er riseth to my sight,
    Yet every star that climbs
    Above the gnarled limbs
        Of yonder hill,
    Conveys thy gentle will.
 
    Believe I knew thy thought,
    And that the zephyrs brought
    Thy kindest wishes through,
    As mine they bear to you,
    That some attentive cloud
    Did pause amid the crowd
        Over my head,
    While gentle things were said.
 
    Believe the thrushes sung,
    And that the flower-bells rung,
    That herbs exhaled their scent,
    And beasts knew what was meant,
    The trees a welcome waved,
    And lakes their margins laved,
        When thy free mind
    To my retreat did wind.
 
    It was a summer eve,
    The air did gently heave
    While yet a low-hung cloud
    Thy eastern skies did shroud;
    The lightning's silent gleam,
    Startling my drowsy dream,
        Seemed like the flash
    Under thy dark eyelash.
 
    Still will I strive to be
    As if thou wert with me;
    Whatever path I take,
    It shall be for thy sake,
    Of gentle slope and wide,
    As thou wert by my side,
        Without a root
    To trip thy gentle foot.
 
    I 'll walk with gentle pace,
    And choose the smoothest place
    And careful dip the oar,
    And shun the winding shore,
    And gently steer my boat
    Where water-lilies float,
        And cardinal flowers
    Stand in their sylvan bowers.
 
 It required some rudeness to disturb with our boat the
 mirror-like surface of the water, in which every twig and blade
 of grass was so faithfully reflected; too faithfully indeed for
 art to imitate, for only Nature may exaggerate herself.  The
 shallowest still water is unfathomable.  Wherever the trees and
 skies are reflected, there is more than Atlantic depth, and no
 danger of fancy running aground.  We notice that it required a
 separate intention of the eye, a more free and abstracted vision,
 to see the reflected trees and the sky, than to see the river
 bottom merely; and so are there manifold visions in the direction
 of every object, and even the most opaque reflect the heavens
 from their surface.  Some men have their eyes naturally intended
 to the one and some to the other object.
 
          "A man that looks on glass,
             On it may stay his eye,
           Or, if he pleaseth, through it pass,
             And the heavens espy."
 
 Two men in a skiff, whom we passed hereabouts, floating buoyantly
 amid the reflections of the trees, like a feather in mid-air, or
 a leaf which is wafted gently from its twig to the water without
 turning over, seemed still in their element, and to have very
 delicately availed themselves of the natural laws.  Their floating
 there was a beautiful and successful experiment in natural
 philosophy, and it served to ennoble in our eyes the art of
 navigation; for as birds fly and fishes swim, so these men
 sailed.  It reminded us how much fairer and nobler all the actions
 of man might be, and that our life in its whole economy might be
 as beautiful as the fairest works of art or nature.
 
 The sun lodged on the old gray cliffs, and glanced from every
 pad; the bulrushes and flags seemed to rejoice in the delicious
 light and air; the meadows were a-drinking at their leisure; the
 frogs sat meditating, all sabbath thoughts, summing up their
 week, with one eye out on the golden sun, and one toe upon a
 reed, eying the wondrous universe in which they act their part;
 the fishes swam more staid and soberly, as maidens go to church;
 shoals of golden and silver minnows rose to the surface to behold
 the heavens, and then sheered off into more sombre aisles; they
 swept by as if moved by one mind, continually gliding past each
 other, and yet preserving the form of their battalion unchanged,
 as if they were still embraced by the transparent membrane which
 held the spawn; a young band of brethren and sisters trying their
 new fins; now they wheeled, now shot ahead, and when we drove
 them to the shore and cut them off, they dexterously tacked and
 passed underneath the boat.  Over the old wooden bridges no
 traveller crossed, and neither the river nor the fishes avoided
 to glide between the abutments.
 
 Here was a village not far off behind the woods, Billerica,
 settled not long ago, and the children still bear the names of
 the first settlers in this late "howling wilderness"; yet to all
 intents and purposes it is as old as Fernay or as Mantua, an old
 gray town where men grow old and sleep already under moss-grown
 monuments,--outgrow their usefulness.  This is ancient Billerica,
 (Villarica?) now in its dotage, named from the English
 Billericay, and whose Indian name was Shawshine.  I never heard
 that it was young.  See, is not nature here gone to decay, farms
 all run out, meeting-house grown gray and racked with age?  If
 you would know of its early youth, ask those old gray rocks in
 the pasture.  It has a bell that sounds sometimes as far as
 Concord woods; I have heard that,--ay, hear it now.  No wonder
 that such a sound startled the dreaming Indian, and frightened
 his game, when the first bells were swung on trees, and sounded
 through the forest beyond the plantations of the white man.  But
 to-day I like best the echo amid these cliffs and woods.  It is
 no feeble imitation, but rather its original, or as if some rural
 Orpheus played over the strain again to show how it should sound.
 
    Dong, sounds the brass in the east,
    As if to a funeral feast,
    But I like that sound the best
    Out of the fluttering west.
 
    The steeple ringeth a knell,
    But the fairies' silvery bell
    Is the voice of that gentle folk,
    Or else the horizon that spoke.
 
    Its metal is not of brass,
    But air, and water, and glass,
    And under a cloud it is swung,
    And by the wind it is rung.
 
    When the steeple tolleth the noon,
    It soundeth not so soon,
    Yet it rings a far earlier hour,
    And the sun has not reached its tower.
 
 On the other hand, the road runs up to Carlisle, city of the
 woods, which, if it is less civil, is the more natural.  It does
 well hold the earth together.  It gets laughed at because it is a
 small town, I know, but nevertheless it is a place where great
 men may be born any day, for fair winds and foul blow right on
 over it without distinction.  It has a meeting-house and
 horse-sheds, a tavern and a blacksmith's shop, for centre, and a
 good deal of wood to cut and cord yet.  And
 
      "Bedford, most noble Bedford,
      I shall not thee forget."
 
 History has remembered thee; especially that meek and humble
 petition of thy old planters, like the wailing of the Lord's own
 people, "To the gentlemen, the selectmen" of Concord, praying to
 be erected into a separate parish.  We can hardly credit that so
 plaintive a psalm resounded but little more than a century ago
 along these Babylonish waters.  "In the extreme difficult seasons
 of heat and cold," said they, "we were ready to say of the
 Sabbath, Behold what a weariness is it."--"Gentlemen, if our
 seeking to draw off proceed from any disaffection to our present
 Reverend Pastor, or the Christian Society with whom we have taken
 such sweet counsel together, and walked unto the house of God in
 company, then hear us not this day, but we greatly desire, if God
 please, to be eased of our burden on the Sabbath, the travel and
 fatigue thereof, that the word of God may be nigh to us, near to
 our houses and in our hearts, that we and our little ones may
 serve the Lord.  We hope that God, who stirred up the spirit of
 Cyrus to set forward temple work, has stirred us up to ask, and
 will stir you up to grant, the prayer of our petition; so shall
 your humble petitioners ever pray, as in duty bound--" And so the
 temple work went forward here to a happy conclusion.  Yonder in
 Carlisle the building of the temple was many wearisome years
 delayed, not that there was wanting of Shittim wood, or the gold
 of Ophir, but a site therefor convenient to all the worshippers;
 whether on "Buttrick's Plain," or rather on "Poplar Hill."--It
 was a tedious question.
 
 In this Billerica solid men must have lived, select from year to
 year; a series of town clerks, at least; and there are old
 records that you may search.  Some spring the white man came,
 built him a house, and made a clearing here, letting in the sun,
 dried up a farm, piled up the old gray stones in fences, cut down
 the pines around his dwelling, planted orchard seeds brought from
 the old country, and persuaded the civil apple-tree to blossom
 next to the wild pine and the juniper, shedding its perfume in
 the wilderness.  Their old stocks still remain.  He culled the
 graceful elm from out the woods and from the river-side, and so
 refined and smoothed his village plot.  He rudely bridged the
 stream, and drove his team afield into the river meadows, cut the
 wild grass, and laid bare the homes of beaver, otter, muskrat,
 and with the whetting of his scythe scared off the deer and bear.
 He set up a mill, and fields of English grain sprang in the
 virgin soil.  And with his grain he scattered the seeds of the
 dandelion and the wild trefoil over the meadows, mingling his
 English flowers with the wild native ones.  The bristling
 burdock, the sweet-scented catnip, and the humble yarrow planted
 themselves along his woodland road, they too seeking "freedom to
 worship God" in their way.  And thus he plants a town.  The white
 man's mullein soon reigned in Indian cornfields, and
 sweet-scented English grasses clothed the new soil.  Where, then,
 could the Red Man set his foot?  The honey-bee hummed through the
 Massachusetts woods, and sipped the wild-flowers round the
 Indian's wigwam, perchance unnoticed, when, with prophetic
 warning, it stung the Red child's hand, forerunner of that
 industrious tribe that was to come and pluck the wild-flower of
 his race up by the root.
 
 The white man comes, pale as the dawn, with a load of thought,
 with a slumbering intelligence as a fire raked up, knowing well
 what he knows, not guessing but calculating; strong in community,
 yielding obedience to authority; of experienced race; of
 wonderful, wonderful common sense; dull but capable, slow but
 persevering, severe but just, of little humor but genuine; a
 laboring man, despising game and sport; building a house that
 endures, a framed house.  He buys the Indian's moccasins and
 baskets, then buys his hunting-grounds, and at length forgets
 where he is buried and ploughs up his bones.  And here town
 records, old, tattered, time-worn, weather-stained chronicles,
 contain the Indian sachem's mark perchance, an arrow or a beaver,
 and the few fatal words by which he deeded his hunting-grounds
 away.  He comes with a list of ancient Saxon, Norman, and Celtic
 names, and strews them up and down this river,--Framingham,
 Sudbury, Bedford, Carlisle, Billerica, Chelmsford,--and this is
 New Angle-land, and these are the New West Saxons whom the Red
 Men call, not Angle-ish or English, but Yengeese, and so at last
 they are known for Yankees.
 
 When we were opposite to the middle of Billerica, the fields on
 either hand had a soft and cultivated English aspect, the village
 spire being seen over the copses which skirt the river, and
 sometimes an orchard straggled down to the water-side, though,
 generally, our course this forenoon was the wildest part of our
 voyage.  It seemed that men led a quiet and very civil life
 there.  The inhabitants were plainly cultivators of the earth,
 and lived under an organized political government.  The
 school-house stood with a meek aspect, entreating a long truce to
 war and savage life.  Every one finds by his own experience, as
 well as in history, that the era in which men cultivate the
 apple, and the amenities of the garden, is essentially different
 from that of the hunter and forest life, and neither can displace
 the other without loss.  We have all had our day-dreams, as well
 as more prophetic nocturnal vision; but as for farming, I am
 convinced that my genius dates from an older era than the
 agricultural.  I would at least strike my spade into the earth
 with such careless freedom but accuracy as the woodpecker his
 bill into a tree.  There is in my nature, methinks, a singular
 yearning toward all wildness.  I know of no redeeming qualities
 in myself but a sincere love for some things, and when I am
 reproved I fall back on to this ground.  What have I to do with
 ploughs?  I cut another furrow than you see.  Where the off ox
 treads, there is it not, it is farther off; where the nigh ox
 walks, it will not be, it is nigher still.  If corn fails, my
 crop fails not, and what are drought and rain to me?  The rude
 Saxon pioneer will sometimes pine for that refinement and
 artificial beauty which are English, and love to hear the sound
 of such sweet and classical names as the Pentland and Malvern
 Hills, the Cliffs of Dover and the Trosachs, Richmond, Derwent,
 and Winandermere, which are to him now instead of the Acropolis
 and Parthenon, of Baiae, and Athens with its sea-walls, and
 Arcadia and Tempe.
 
      Greece, who am I that should remember thee,
      Thy Marathon and thy Thermopylae?
      Is my life vulgar, my fate mean,
      Which on these golden memories can lean?
 
 We are apt enough to be pleased with such books as Evelyn's
 Sylva, Acetarium, and Kalendarium Hortense, but they imply a
 relaxed nerve in the reader.  Gardening is civil and social, but
 it wants the vigor and freedom of the forest and the outlaw.
 There may be an excess of cultivation as well as of anything
 else, until civilization becomes pathetic.  A highly cultivated
 man,--all whose bones can be bent!  whose heaven-born virtues are
 but good manners!  The young pines springing up in the cornfields
 from year to year are to me a refreshing fact.  We talk of
 civilizing the Indian, but that is not the name for his
 improvement.  By the wary independence and aloofness of his dim
 forest life he preserves his intercourse with his native gods,
 and is admitted from time to time to a rare and peculiar society
 with Nature.  He has glances of starry recognition to which our
 saloons are strangers.  The steady illumination of his genius,
 dim only because distant, is like the faint but satisfying light
 of the stars compared with the dazzling but ineffectual and
 short-lived blaze of candles.  The Society-Islanders had their
 day-born gods, but they were not supposed to be "of equal
 antiquity with the _atua fauau po_, or night-born gods."  It is
 true, there are the innocent pleasures of country life, and it is
 sometimes pleasant to make the earth yield her increase, and
 gather the fruits in their season, but the heroic spirit will not
 fail to dream of remoter retirements and more rugged paths.  It
 will have its garden-plots and its _parterres_ elsewhere than on
 the earth, and gather nuts and berries by the way for its
 subsistence, or orchard fruits with such heedlessness as berries.
 We would not always be soothing and taming nature, breaking the
 horse and the ox, but sometimes ride the horse wild and chase the
 buffalo.  The Indian's intercourse with Nature is at least such
 as admits of the greatest independence of each.  If he is
 somewhat of a stranger in her midst, the gardener is too much of
 a familiar.  There is something vulgar and foul in the latter's
 closeness to his mistress, something noble and cleanly in the
 former's distance.  In civilization, as in a southern latitude,
 man degenerates at length, and yields to the incursion of more
 northern tribes,
 
      "Some nation yet shut in
         With hills of ice."
 
 There are other, savager, and more primeval aspects of nature
 than our poets have sung.  It is only white man's poetry.  Homer
 and Ossian even can never revive in London or Boston.  And yet
 behold how these cities are refreshed by the mere tradition, or
 the imperfectly transmitted fragrance and flavor of these wild
 fruits.  If we could listen but for an instant to the chant of the
 Indian muse, we should understand why he will not exchange his
 savageness for civilization.  Nations are not whimsical.  Steel
 and blankets are strong temptations; but the Indian does well to
 continue Indian.
 
 After sitting in my chamber many days, reading the poets, I have
 been out early on a foggy morning, and heard the cry of an owl in
 a neighboring wood as from a nature behind the common, unexplored
 by science or by literature.  None of the feathered race has yet
 realized my youthful conceptions of the woodland depths.  I had
 seen the red Election-bird brought from their recesses on my
 comrades' string, and fancied that their plumage would assume
 stranger and more dazzling colors, like the tints of evening, in
 proportion as I advanced farther into the darkness and solitude
 of the forest.  Still less have I seen such strong and wilderness
 tints on any poet's string.
 
 These modern ingenious sciences and arts do not affect me as
 those more venerable arts of hunting and fishing, and even of
 husbandry in its primitive and simple form; as ancient and
 honorable trades as the sun and moon and winds pursue, coeval
 with the faculties of man, and invented when these were invented.
 We do not know their John Gutenberg, or Richard Arkwright, though
 the poets would fain make them to have been gradually learned and
 taught.  According to Gower,--
 
      "And Iadahel, as saith the boke,
        Firste made nette, and fishes toke.
      Of huntyng eke he fond the chace,
      Whiche nowe is knowe in many place;
      A tent of clothe, with corde and stake,
      He sette up first, and did it make."
 
 Also, Lydgate says:--
 
      "Jason first sayled, in story it is tolde,
      Toward Colchos, to wynne the flees of golde,
      Ceres the Goddess fond first the tilthe of londe;
            *        *       *       *      *
      Also, Aristeus fonde first the usage
      Of mylke, and cruddis, and of honey swote;
      Peryodes, for grete avauntage,
      From flyntes smote fuyre, daryng in the roote."
 
 We read that Aristeus "obtained of Jupiter and Neptune, that the
 pestilential heat of the dog-days, wherein was great mortality,
 should be mitigated with wind." This is one of those dateless
 benefits conferred on man, which have no record in our vulgar
 day, though we still find some similitude to them in our dreams,
 in which we have a more liberal and juster apprehension of
 things, unconstrained by habit, which is then in some measure put
 off, and divested of memory, which we call history.
 
 According to fable, when the island of AEgina was depopulated by
 sickness, at the instance of AEacus, Jupiter turned the ants into
 men, that is, as some think, he made men of the inhabitants who
 lived meanly like ants.  This is perhaps the fullest history of
 those early days extant.
 
 
 The fable which is naturally and truly composed, so as to satisfy
 the imagination, ere it addresses the understanding, beautiful
 though strange as a wild-flower, is to the wise man an apothegm,
 and admits of his most generous interpretation.  When we read
 that Bacchus made the Tyrrhenian mariners mad, so that they leapt
 into the sea, mistaking it for a meadow full of flowers, and so
 became dolphins, we are not concerned about the historical truth
 of this, but rather a higher poetical truth.  We seem to hear the
 music of a thought, and care not if the understanding be not
 gratified.  For their beauty, consider the fables of Narcissus,
 of Endymion, of Memnon son of Morning, the representative of all
 promising youths who have died a premature death, and whose
 memory is melodiously prolonged to the latest morning; the
 beautiful stories of Phaeton, and of the Sirens whose isle shone
 afar off white with the bones of unburied men; and the pregnant
 ones of Pan, Prometheus, and the Sphinx; and that long list of
 names which have already become part of the universal language of
 civilized men, and from proper are becoming common names or
 nouns,--the Sibyls, the Eumenides, the Parcae, the Graces, the
 Muses, Nemesis, &c.
 
 It is interesting to observe with what singular unanimity the
 farthest sundered nations and generations consent to give
 completeness and roundness to an ancient fable, of which they
 indistinctly appreciate the beauty or the truth.  By a faint and
 dream-like effort, though it be only by the vote of a scientific
 body, the dullest posterity slowly add some trait to the mythus.
 As when astronomers call the lately discovered planet Neptune; or
 the asteroid Astraea, that the Virgin who was driven from earth
 to heaven at the end of the golden age, may have her local
 habitation in the heavens more distinctly assigned her,--for the
 slightest recognition of poetic worth is significant.  By such
 slow aggregation has mythology grown from the first.  The very
 nursery tales of this generation, were the nursery tales of
 primeval races.  They migrate from east to west, and again from
 west to east; now expanded into the "tale divine" of bards, now
 shrunk into a popular rhyme.  This is an approach to that
 universal language which men have sought in vain.  This fond
 reiteration of the oldest expressions of truth by the latest
 posterity, content with slightly and religiously retouching the
 old material, is the most impressive proof of a common humanity.
 
 All nations love the same jests and tales, Jews, Christians, and
 Mahometans, and the same translated suffice for all.  All men are
 children, and of one family.  The same tale sends them all to
 bed, and wakes them in the morning.  Joseph Wolff, the
 missionary, distributed copies of Robinson Crusoe, translated
 into Arabic, among the Arabs, and they made a great sensation.
 "Robinson Crusoe's adventures and wisdom," says he, "were read by
 Mahometans in the market-places of Sanaa, Hodyeda, and Loheya,
 and admired and believed!" On reading the book, the Arabians
 exclaimed, "O, that Robinson Crusoe must have been a great
 prophet!"
 
 To some extent, mythology is only the most ancient history and
 biography.  So far from being false or fabulous in the common
 sense, it contains only enduring and essential truth, the I and
 you, the here and there, the now and then, being omitted.  Either
 time or rare wisdom writes it.  Before printing was discovered, a
 century was equal to a thousand years.  The poet is he who can
 write some pure mythology to-day without the aid of posterity.
 In how few words, for instance, the Greeks would have told the
 story of Abelard and Heloise, making but a sentence for our
 classical dictionary,--and then, perchance, have stuck up their
 names to shine in some corner of the firmament.  We moderns, on
 the other hand, collect only the raw materials of biography and
 history, "memoirs to serve for a history," which itself is but
 materials to serve for a mythology.  How many volumes folio would
 the Life and Labors of Prometheus have filled, if perchance it
 had fallen, as perchance it did first, in days of cheap printing!
 Who knows what shape the fable of Columbus will at length assume,
 to be confounded with that of Jason and the expedition of the
 Argonauts.  And Franklin,--there may be a line for him in the
 future classical dictionary, recording what that demigod did, and
 referring him to some new genealogy.  "Son of----and----.  He
 aided the Americans to gain their independence, instructed
 mankind in economy, and drew down lightning from the clouds."
 
 The hidden significance of these fables which is sometimes
 thought to have been detected, the ethics running parallel to the
 poetry and history, are not so remarkable as the readiness with
 which they may be made to express a variety of truths.  As if
 they were the skeletons of still older and more universal truths
 than any whose flesh and blood they are for the time made to
 wear.  It is like striving to make the sun, or the wind, or the
 sea symbols to signify exclusively the particular thoughts of our
 day.  But what signifies it?  In the mythus a superhuman
 intelligence uses the unconscious thoughts and dreams of men as
 its hieroglyphics to address men unborn.  In the history of the
 human mind, these glowing and ruddy fables precede the noonday
 thoughts of men, as Aurora the sun's rays.  The matutine
 intellect of the poet, keeping in advance of the glare of
 philosophy, always dwells in this auroral atmosphere.
 
 
 As we said before, the Concord is a dead stream, but its scenery
 is the more suggestive to the contemplative voyager, and this day
 its water was fuller of reflections than our pages even.  Just
 before it reaches the falls in Billerica, it is contracted, and
 becomes swifter and shallower, with a yellow pebbly bottom,
 hardly passable for a canal-boat, leaving the broader and more
 stagnant portion above like a lake among the hills.  All through
 the Concord, Bedford, and Billerica meadows we had heard no
 murmur from its stream, except where some tributary runnel
 tumbled in,--
 
      Some tumultuous little rill,
        Purling round its storied pebble,
      Tinkling to the selfsame tune,
      From September until June,
        Which no drought doth e'er enfeeble.
 
      Silent flows the parent stream,
        And if rocks do lie below,
      Smothers with her waves the din,
      As it were a youthful sin,
        Just as still, and just as slow.
 
 But now at length we heard this staid and primitive river rushing
 to her fall, like any rill.  We here left its channel, just above
 the Billerica Falls, and entered the canal, which runs, or rather
 is conducted, six miles through the woods to the Merrimack, at
 Middlesex, and as we did not care to loiter in this part of our
 voyage, while one ran along the tow-path drawing the boat by a
 cord, the other kept it off the shore with a pole, so that we
 accomplished the whole distance in little more than an hour.
 This canal, which is the oldest in the country, and has even an
 antique look beside the more modern railroads, is fed by the
 Concord, so that we were still floating on its familiar waters.
 It is so much water which the river _lets_ for the advantage of
 commerce.  There appeared some want of harmony in its scenery,
 since it was not of equal date with the woods and meadows through
 which it is led, and we missed the conciliatory influence of time
 on land and water; but in the lapse of ages, Nature will recover
 and indemnify herself, and gradually plant fit shrubs and flowers
 along its borders.  Already the kingfisher sat upon a pine over
 the water, and the bream and pickerel swam below.  Thus all works
 pass directly out of the hands of the architect into the hands of
 Nature, to be perfected.
 
 It was a retired and pleasant route, without houses or
 travellers, except some young men who were lounging upon a bridge
 in Chelmsford, who leaned impudently over the rails to pry into
 our concerns, but we caught the eye of the most forward, and
 looked at him till he was visibly discomfited.  Not that there
 was any peculiar efficacy in our look, but rather a sense of
 shame left in him which disarmed him.
 
 It is a very true and expressive phrase, "He looked daggers at
 me," for the first pattern and prototype of all daggers must have
 been a glance of the eye.  First, there was the glance of Jove's
 eye, then his fiery bolt, then, the material gradually hardening,
 tridents, spears, javelins, and finally, for the convenience of
 private men, daggers, krisses, and so forth, were invented.  It
 is wonderful how we get about the streets without being wounded
 by these delicate and glancing weapons, a man can so nimbly whip
 out his rapier, or without being noticed carry it unsheathed.
 Yet it is rare that one gets seriously looked at.
 
 As we passed under the last bridge over the canal, just before
 reaching the Merrimack, the people coming out of church paused to
 look at us from above, and apparently, so strong is custom,
 indulged in some heathenish comparisons; but we were the truest
 observers of this sunny day.  According to Hesiod,
 
               "The seventh is a holy day,
    For then Latona brought forth golden-rayed Apollo,"
 
 and by our reckoning this was the seventh day of the week, and
 not the first.  I find among the papers of an old Justice of the
 Peace and Deacon of the town of Concord, this singular
 memorandum, which is worth preserving as a relic of an ancient
 custom.  After reforming the spelling and grammar, it runs as
 follows: "Men that travelled with teams on the Sabbath,
 Dec. 18th, 1803, were Jeremiah Richardson and Jonas Parker, both
 of Shirley.  They had teams with rigging such as is used to carry
 barrels, and they were travelling westward.  Richardson was
 questioned by the Hon. Ephraim Wood, Esq., and he said that Jonas
 Parker was his fellow-traveller, and he further said that a
 Mr. Longley was his employer, who promised to bear him out."  We
 were the men that were gliding northward, this Sept. 1st, 1839,
 with still team, and rigging not the most convenient to carry
 barrels, unquestioned by any Squire or Church Deacon and ready to
 bear ourselves out if need were.  In the latter part of the
 seventeenth century, according to the historian of Dunstable,
 "Towns were directed to erect '_a cage_' near the meeting-house,
 and in this all offenders against the sanctity of the Sabbath
 were confined."  Society has relaxed a little from its
 strictness, one would say, but I presume that there is not less
 _religion_ than formerly.  If the _ligature_ is found to be
 loosened in one part, it is only drawn the tighter in another.
 
 You can hardly convince a man of an error in a lifetime, but must
 content yourself with the reflection that the progress of science
 is slow.  If he is not convinced, his grandchildren may be.  The
 geologists tell us that it took one hundred years to prove that
 fossils are organic, and one hundred and fifty more, to prove
 that they are not to be referred to the Noachian deluge.  I am
 not sure but I should betake myself in extremities to the liberal
 divinities of Greece, rather than to my country's God.  Jehovah,
 though with us he has acquired new attributes, is more absolute
 and unapproachable, but hardly more divine, than Jove.  He is not
 so much of a gentleman, not so gracious and catholic, he does not
 exert so intimate and genial an influence on nature, as many a
 god of the Greeks.  I should fear the infinite power and
 inflexible justice of the almighty mortal, hardly as yet
 apotheosized, so wholly masculine, with no Sister Juno, no
 Apollo, no Venus, nor Minerva, to intercede for me, <thum_o*i
 phyle'ousa' te, k_edome'n_e te>.  The Grecian are youthful and
 erring and fallen gods, with the vices of men, but in many
 important respects essentially of the divine race.  In my
 Pantheon, Pan still reigns in his pristine glory, with his ruddy
 face, his flowing beard, and his shaggy body, his pipe and his
 crook, his nymph Echo, and his chosen daughter Iambe; for the
 great god Pan is not dead, as was rumored.  No god ever dies.
 Perhaps of all the gods of New England and of ancient Greece, I
 am most constant at his shrine.
 
 It seems to me that the god that is commonly worshipped in
 civilized countries is not at all divine, though he bears a
 divine name, but is the overwhelming authority and respectability
 of mankind combined.  Men reverence one another, not yet God.  If
 I thought that I could speak with discrimination and impartiality
 of the nations of Christendom, I should praise them, but it tasks
 me too much.  They seem to be the most civil and humane, but I
 may be mistaken.  Every people have gods to suit their
 circumstances; the Society Islanders had a god called Toahitu,
 "in shape like a dog; he saved such as were in danger of falling
 from rocks and trees."  I think that we can do without him, as we
 have not much climbing to do.  Among them a man could make
 himself a god out of a piece of wood in a few minutes, which
 would frighten him out of his wits.
 
 I fancy that some indefatigable spinster of the old school, who
 had the supreme felicity to be born in "days that tried men's
 souls," hearing this, may say with Nestor, another of the old
 school, "But you are younger than I.  For time was when I
 conversed with greater men than you.  For not at any time have I
 seen such men, nor shall see them, as Perithous, and Dryas, and
 <poimena la_on>," that is probably Washington, sole "Shepherd of
 the People." And when Apollo has now six times rolled westward,
 or seemed to roll, and now for the seventh time shows his face in
 the east, eyes wellnigh glazed, long glassed, which have
 fluctuated only between lamb's wool and worsted, explore
 ceaselessly some good sermon book.  For six days shalt thou labor
 and do all thy knitting, but on the seventh, forsooth, thy
 reading.  Happy we who can bask in this warm September sun, which
 illumines all creatures, as well when they rest as when they
 toil, not without a feeling of gratitude; whose life is as
 blameless, how blameworthy soever it may be, on the Lord's
 Mona-day as on his Suna-day.
 
 There are various, nay, incredible faiths; why should we be
 alarmed at any of them?  What man believes, God believes.  Long
 as I have lived, and many blasphemers as I have heard and seen, I
 have never yet heard or witnessed any direct and conscious
 blasphemy or irreverence; but of indirect and habitual, enough.
 Where is the man who is guilty of direct and personal insolence
 to Him that made him?
 
 One memorable addition to the old mythology is due to this
 era,--the Christian fable.  With what pains, and tears, and blood
 these centuries have woven this and added it to the mythology of
 mankind.  The new Prometheus.  With what miraculous consent, and
 patience, and persistency has this mythus been stamped on the
 memory of the race!  It would seem as if it were in the progress
 of our mythology to dethrone Jehovah, and crown Christ in his
 stead.
 
 If it is not a tragical life we live, then I know not what to
 call it.  Such a story as that of Jesus Christ,--the history of
 Jerusalem, say, being a part of the Universal History.  The
 naked, the embalmed, unburied death of Jerusalem amid its
 desolate hills,--think of it.  In Tasso's poem I trust some
 things are sweetly buried.  Consider the snappish tenacity with
 which they preach Christianity still.  What are time and space to
 Christianity, eighteen hundred years, and a new world?--that the
 humble life of a Jewish peasant should have force to make a New
 York bishop so bigoted.  Forty-four lamps, the gift of kings, now
 burning in a place called the Holy Sepulchre;--a church-bell
 ringing;--some unaffected tears shed by a pilgrim on Mount
 Calvary within the week.--
 
 "Jerusalem, Jerusalem, when I forget thee, may my right hand
 forget her cunning."
 
 "By the waters of Babylon there we sat down, and we wept when we
 remembered Zion."
 
 I trust that some may be as near and dear to Buddha, or Christ,
 or Swedenborg, who are without the pale of their churches.  It is
 necessary not to be Christian to appreciate the beauty and
 significance of the life of Christ.  I know that some will have
 hard thoughts of me, when they hear their Christ named beside my
 Buddha, yet I am sure that I am willing they should love their
 Christ more than my Buddha, for the love is the main thing, and I
 like him too.  "God is the letter Ku, as well as Khu."  Why need
 Christians be still intolerant and superstitious?  The
 simple-minded sailors were unwilling to cast overboard Jonah at
 his own request.--
 
    "Where is this love become in later age?
    Alas! 'tis gone in endless pilgrimage
    From hence, and never to return, I doubt,
    Till revolution wheel those times about."
 
 One man says,--
 
    "The world's a popular disease, that reigns
    Within the froward heart and frantic brains
    Of poor distempered mortals."
 
 Another, that
 
               "all the world's a stage,
    And all the men and women merely players."
 
 The world is a strange place for a playhouse to stand within it.
 Old Drayton thought that a man that lived here, and would be a
 poet, for instance, should have in him certain "brave,
 translunary things," and a "fine madness" should possess his
 brain.  Certainly it were as well, that he might be up to the
 occasion.  That is a superfluous wonder, which Dr.  Johnson
 expresses at the assertion of Sir Thomas Browne that "his life
 has been a miracle of thirty years, which to relate, were not
 history but a piece of poetry, and would sound like a fable." The
 wonder is, rather, that all men do not assert as much.  That
 would be a rare praise, if it were true, which was addressed to
 Francis Beaumont,--"Spectators sate part in your tragedies."
 
 Think what a mean and wretched place this world is; that half the
 time we have to light a lamp that we may see to live in it.  This
 is half our life.  Who would undertake the enterprise if it were
 all?  And, pray, what more has day to offer?  A lamp that burns
 more clear, a purer oil, say winter-strained, that so we may
 pursue our idleness with less obstruction.  Bribed with a little
 sunlight and a few prismatic tints, we bless our Maker, and stave
 off his wrath with hymns.
 
    I make ye an offer,
    Ye gods, hear the scoffer,
    The scheme will not hurt you,
    If ye will find goodness, I will find virtue.
    Though I am your creature,
    And child of your nature,
    I have pride still unbended,
    And blood undescended,
    Some free independence,
    And my own descendants.
    I cannot toil blindly,
    Though ye behave kindly,
    And I swear by the rood,
    I'll be slave to no God.
    If ye will deal plainly,
    I will strive mainly,
    If ye will discover,
    Great plans to your lover,
    And give him a sphere
    Somewhat larger than here.
 
 "Verily, my angels! I was abashed on account of my servant, who
 had no Providence but me; therefore did I pardon him."--_The
 Gulistan of Sadi._
 
 
 Most people with whom I talk, men and women even of some
 originality and genius, have their scheme of the universe all cut
 and dried,--very _dry_, I assure you, to hear, dry enough to
 burn, dry-rotted and powder-post, methinks,--which they set up
 between you and them in the shortest intercourse; an ancient and
 tottering frame with all its boards blown off.  They do not walk
 without their bed.  Some, to me, seemingly very unimportant and
 unsubstantial things and relations, are for them everlastingly
 settled,--as Father, Son, and Holy Ghost, and the like.  These
 are like the everlasting hills to them.  But in all my wanderings
 I never came across the least vestige of authority for these
 things.  They have not left so distinct a trace as the delicate
 flower of a remote geological period on the coal in my grate.
 The wisest man preaches no doctrines; he has no scheme; he sees
 no rafter, not even a cobweb, against the heavens.  It is clear
 sky.  If I ever see more clearly at one time than at another, the
 medium through which I see is clearer.  To see from earth to
 heaven, and see there standing, still a fixture, that old Jewish
 scheme!  What right have you to hold up this obstacle to my
 understanding you, to your understanding me!  You did not invent
 it; it was imposed on you.  Examine your authority.  Even Christ,
 we fear, had his scheme, his conformity to tradition, which
 slightly vitiates his teaching.  He had not swallowed all
 formulas.  He preached some mere doctrines.  As for me, Abraham,
 Isaac, and Jacob are now only the subtilest imaginable essences,
 which would not stain the morning sky.  Your scheme must be the
 framework of the universe; all other schemes will soon be ruins.
 The perfect God in his revelations of himself has never got to
 the length of one such proposition as you, his prophets, state.
 Have you learned the alphabet of heaven and can count three?  Do
 you know the number of God's family?  Can you put mysteries into
 words?  Do you presume to fable of the ineffable?  Pray, what
 geographer are you, that speak of heaven's topography?  Whose
 friend are you that speak of God's personality?  Do you, Miles
 Howard, think that he has made you his confidant?  Tell me of the
 height of the mountains of the moon, or of the diameter of space,
 and I may believe you, but of the secret history of the Almighty,
 and I shall pronounce thee mad.  Yet we have a sort of family
 history of our God,--so have the Tahitians of theirs,--and some
 old poet's grand imagination is imposed on us as adamantine
 everlasting truth, and God's own word!  Pythagoras says, truly
 enough, "A true assertion respecting God, is an assertion of
 God"; but we may well doubt if there is any example of this in
 literature.
 
 The New Testament is an invaluable book, though I confess to
 having been slightly prejudiced against it in my very early days
 by the church and the Sabbath school, so that it seemed, before I
 read it, to be the yellowest book in the catalogue.  Yet I early
 escaped from their meshes.  It was hard to get the commentaries
 out of one's head and taste its true flavor.--I think that
 Pilgrim's Progress is the best sermon which has been preached
 from this text; almost all other sermons that I have heard, or
 heard of, have been but poor imitations of this.--It would be a
 poor story to be prejudiced against the Life of Christ because
 the book has been edited by Christians.  In fact, I love this
 book rarely, though it is a sort of castle in the air to me,
 which I am permitted to dream.  Having come to it so recently and
 freshly, it has the greater charm, so that I cannot find any to
 talk with about it.  I never read a novel, they have so little
 real life and thought in them.  The reading which I love best is
 the scriptures of the several nations, though it happens that I
 am better acquainted with those of the Hindoos, the Chinese, and
 the Persians, than of the Hebrews, which I have come to last.
 Give me one of these Bibles and you have silenced me for a while.
 When I recover the use of my tongue, I am wont to worry my
 neighbors with the new sentences; but commonly they cannot see
 that there is any wit in them.  Such has been my experience with
 the New Testament.  I have not yet got to the crucifixion, I have
 read it over so many times.  I should love dearly to read it
 aloud to my friends, some of whom are seriously inclined; it is
 so good, and I am sure that they have never heard it, it fits
 their case exactly, and we should enjoy it so much together,--but
 I instinctively despair of getting their ears.  They soon show,
 by signs not to be mistaken, that it is inexpressibly wearisome
 to them.  I do not mean to imply that I am any better than my
 neighbors; for, alas!  I know that I am only as good, though I
 love better books than they.
 
 It is remarkable that, notwithstanding the universal favor with
 which the New Testament is outwardly received, and even the
 bigotry with which it is defended, there is no hospitality shown
 to, there is no appreciation of, the order of truth with which it
 deals.  I know of no book that has so few readers.  There is none
 so truly strange, and heretical, and unpopular.  To Christians,
 no less than Greeks and Jews, it is foolishness and a
 stumbling-block.  There are, indeed, severe things in it which no
 man should read aloud more than once.--"Seek first the kingdom of
 heaven."--"Lay not up for yourselves treasures on earth."--"If
 thou wilt be perfect, go and sell that thou hast, and give to the
 poor, and thou shalt have treasure in heaven."--"For what is a
 man profited, if he shall gain the whole world, and lose his own
 soul?  or what shall a man give in exchange for his soul?"--Think
 of this, Yankees!--"Verily, I say unto you, if ye have faith as a
 grain of mustard seed, ye shall say unto this mountain, Remove
 hence to yonder place; and it shall remove; and nothing shall be
 impossible unto you."--Think of repeating these things to a New
 England audience!  thirdly, fourthly, fifteenthly, till there are
 three barrels of sermons!  Who, without cant, can read them
 aloud?  Who, without cant, can hear them, and not go out of the
 meeting-house?  They never _were_ read, they never _were_ heard.
 Let but one of these sentences be rightly read, from any pulpit
 in the land, and there would not be left one stone of that
 meeting-house upon another.
 
 Yet the New Testament treats of man and man's so-called spiritual
 affairs too exclusively, and is too constantly moral and
 personal, to alone content me, who am not interested solely in
 man's religious or moral nature, or in man even.  I have not the
 most definite designs on the future.  Absolutely speaking, Do
 unto others as you would that they should do unto you, is by no
 means a golden rule, but the best of current silver.  An honest
 man would have but little occasion for it.  It is golden not to
 have any rule at all in such a case.  The book has never been
 written which is to be accepted without any allowance.  Christ
 was a sublime actor on the stage of the world.  He knew what he
 was thinking of when he said, "Heaven and earth shall pass away,
 but my words shall not pass away." I draw near to him at such a
 time.  Yet he taught mankind but imperfectly how to live; his
 thoughts were all directed toward another world.  There is
 another kind of success than his.  Even here we have a sort of
 living to get, and must buffet it somewhat longer.  There are
 various tough problems yet to solve, and we must make shift to
 live, betwixt spirit and matter, such a human life as we can.
 
 A healthy man, with steady employment, as wood-chopping at fifty
 cents a cord, and a camp in the woods, will not be a good subject
 for Christianity.  The New Testament may be a choice book to him
 on some, but not on all or most of his days.  He will rather go
 a-fishing in his leisure hours.  The Apostles, though they were
 fishers too, were of the solemn race of sea-fishers, and never
 trolled for pickerel on inland streams.
 
 Men have a singular desire to be good without being good for
 anything, because, perchance, they think vaguely that so it will
 be good for them in the end.  The sort of morality which the
 priests inculcate is a very subtle policy, far finer than the
 politicians, and the world is very successfully ruled by them as
 the policemen.  It is not worth the while to let our imperfections
 disturb us always.  The conscience really does not, and ought not
 to monopolize the whole of our lives, any more than the heart or
 the head.  It is as liable to disease as any other part.  I have
 seen some whose consciences, owing undoubtedly to former
 indulgence, had grown to be as irritable as spoilt children, and
 at length gave them no peace.  They did not know when to swallow
 their cud, and their lives of course yielded no milk.
 
     Conscience is instinct bred in the house,
     Feeling and Thinking propagate the sin
     By an unnatural breeding in and in.
     I say, Turn it out doors,
     Into the moors.
     I love a life whose plot is simple,
     And does not thicken with every pimple,
     A soul so sound no sickly conscience binds it,
     That makes the universe no worse than 't finds it.
     I love an earnest soul,
     Whose mighty joy and sorrow
     Are not drowned in a bowl,
     And brought to life to-morrow;
     That lives one tragedy,
     And not seventy;
     A conscience worth keeping,
     Laughing not weeping;
     A conscience wise and steady,
     And forever ready;
     Not changing with events,
     Dealing in compliments;
     A conscience exercised about
     Large things, where one _may_ doubt.
     I love a soul not all of wood,
     Predestinated to be good,
     But true to the backbone
     Unto itself alone,
     And false to none;
     Born to its own affairs,
     Its own joys and own cares;
     By whom the work which God begun
     Is finished, and not undone;
     Taken up where he left off,
     Whether to worship or to scoff;
     If not good, why then evil,
     If not good god, good devil.
     Goodness!--you hypocrite, come out of that,
     Live your life, do your work, then take your hat.
     I have no patience towards
     Such conscientious cowards.
     Give me simple laboring folk,
     Who love their work,
     Whose virtue is a song
     To cheer God along.
 
 I was once reproved by a minister who was driving a poor beast to
 some meeting-house horse-sheds among the hills of New Hampshire,
 because I was bending my steps to a mountain-top on the Sabbath,
 instead of a church, when I would have gone farther than he to
 hear a true word spoken on that or any day.  He declared that I
 was "breaking the Lord's fourth commandment," and proceeded to
 enumerate, in a sepulchral tone, the disasters which had befallen
 him whenever he had done any ordinary work on the Sabbath.  He
 really thought that a god was on the watch to trip up those men
 who followed any secular work on this day, and did not see that
 it was the evil conscience of the workers that did it.  The
 country is full of this superstition, so that when one enters a
 village, the church, not only really but from association, is the
 ugliest looking building in it, because it is the one in which
 human nature stoops the lowest and is most disgraced.  Certainly,
 such temples as these shall erelong cease to deform the
 landscape.  There are few things more disheartening and disgusting
 than when you are walking the streets of a strange village on the
 Sabbath, to hear a preacher shouting like a boatswain in a gale
 of wind, and thus harshly profaning the quiet atmosphere of the
 day.  You fancy him to have taken off his coat, as when men are
 about to do hot and dirty work.
 
 If I should ask the minister of Middlesex to let me speak in his
 pulpit on a Sunday, he would object, because I do not _pray_ as
 he does, or because I am not _ordained_.  What under the sun are
 these things?
 
 Really, there is no infidelity, now-a-days, so great as that
 which prays, and keeps the Sabbath, and rebuilds the churches.
 The sealer of the South Pacific preaches a truer doctrine.  The
 church is a sort of hospital for men's souls, and as full of
 quackery as the hospital for their bodies.  Those who are taken
 into it live like pensioners in their Retreat or Sailor's Sung
 Harbor, where you may see a row of religious cripples sitting
 outside in sunny weather.  Let not the apprehension that he may
 one day have to occupy a ward therein, discourage the cheerful
 labors of the able-souled man.  While he remembers the sick in
 their extremities, let him not look thither as to his goal.  One
 is sick at heart of this pagoda worship.  It is like the beating
 of gongs in a Hindoo subterranean temple.  In dark places and
 dungeons the preacher's words might perhaps strike root and grow,
 but not in broad daylight in any part of the world that I know.
 The sound of the Sabbath bell far away, now breaking on these
 shores, does not awaken pleasing associations, but melancholy and
 sombre ones rather.  One involuntarily rests on his oar, to humor
 his unusually meditative mood.  It is as the sound of many
 catechisms and religious books twanging a canting peal round the
 earth, seeming to issue from some Egyptian temple and echo along
 the shore of the Nile, right opposite to Pharaoh's palace and
 Moses in the bulrushes, startling a multitude of storks and
 alligators basking in the sun.
 
 Everywhere "good men" sound a retreat, and the word has gone
 forth to fall back on innocence.  Fall forward rather on to
 whatever there is there.  Christianity only hopes.  It has hung
 its harp on the willows, and cannot sing a song in a strange
 land.  It has dreamed a sad dream, and does not yet welcome the
 morning with joy.  The mother tells her falsehoods to her child,
 but, thank Heaven, the child does not grow up in its parent's
 shadow.  Our mother's faith has not grown with her experience.
 Her experience has been too much for her.  The lesson of life was
 too hard for her to learn.
 
 It is remarkable, that almost all speakers and writers feel it to
 be incumbent on them, sooner or later, to prove or to acknowledge
 the personality of God.  Some Earl of Bridgewater, thinking it
 better late than never, has provided for it in his will.  It is a
 sad mistake.  In reading a work on agriculture, we have to skip
 the author's moral reflections, and the words "Providence" and
 "He" scattered along the page, to come at the profitable level of
 what he has to say.  What he calls his religion is for the most
 part offensive to the nostrils.  He should know better than
 expose himself, and keep his foul sores covered till they are
 quite healed.  There is more religion in men's science than there
 is science in their religion.  Let us make haste to the report of
 the committee on swine.
 
 A man's real faith is never contained in his creed, nor is his
 creed an article of his faith.  The last is never adopted.  This
 it is that permits him to smile ever, and to live even as bravely
 as he does.  And yet he clings anxiously to his creed, as to a
 straw, thinking that that does him good service because his sheet
 anchor does not drag.
 
 In most men's religion, the ligature, which should be its
 umbilical cord connecting them with divinity, is rather like that
 thread which the accomplices of Cylon held in their hands when
 they went abroad from the temple of Minerva, the other end being
 attached to the statue of the goddess.  But frequently, as in
 their case, the thread breaks, being stretched, and they are left
 without an asylum.
 
   "A good and pious man reclined his head on the bosom of
   contemplation, and was absorbed in the ocean of a revery.  At
   the instant when he awaked from his vision, one of his friends,
   by way of pleasantry, said, What rare gift have you brought us
   from that garden, where you have been recreating?  He replied,
   I fancied to myself and said, when I can reach the rose-bower,
   I will fill my lap with the flowers, and bring them as a
   present to my friends; but when I got there, the fragrance of
   the roses so intoxicated me, that the skirt dropped from my
   hands.----`O bird of dawn! learn the warmth of affection from
   the moth; for that scorched creature gave up the ghost, and
   uttered not a groan: These vain pretenders are ignorant of him
   they seek after; for of him that knew him we never heard
   again:--O thou! who towerest above the flights of conjecture,
   opinion, and comprehension; whatever has been reported of thee
   we have heard and read; the congregation is dismissed, and life
   drawn to a close; and we still rest at our first encomium of
   thee!'"--_Sadi_.
 
 By noon we were let down into the Merrimack through the locks at
 Middlesex, just above Pawtucket Falls, by a serene and
 liberal-minded man, who came quietly from his book, though his
 duties, we supposed, did not require him to open the locks on
 Sundays.  With him we had a just and equal encounter of the eyes,
 as between two honest men.
 
 The movements of the eyes express the perpetual and unconscious
 courtesy of the parties.  It is said, that a rogue does not look
 you in the face, neither does an honest man look at you as if he
 had his reputation to establish.  I have seen some who did not
 know when to turn aside their eyes in meeting yours.  A truly
 confident and magnanimous spirit is wiser than to contend for the
 mastery in such encounters.  Serpents alone conquer by the
 steadiness of their gaze.  My friend looks me in the face and
 sees me, that is all.
 
 The best relations were at once established between us and this
 man, and though few words were spoken, he could not conceal a
 visible interest in us and our excursion.  He was a lover of the
 higher mathematics, as we found, and in the midst of some vast
 sunny problem, when we overtook him and whispered our conjectures.
 By this man we were presented with the freedom of the Merrimack.
 We now felt as if we were fairly launched on the ocean-stream of
 our voyage, and were pleased to find that our boat would float on
 Merrimack water.  We began again busily to put in practice those
 old arts of rowing, steering, and paddling.  It seemed a strange
 phenomenon to us that the two rivers should mingle their waters
 so readily, since we had never associated them in our thoughts.
 
 As we glided over the broad bosom of the Merrimack, between
 Chelmsford and Dracut, at noon, here a quarter of a mile wide,
 the rattling of our oars was echoed over the water to those
 villages, and their slight sounds to us.  Their harbors lay as
 smooth and fairy-like as the Lido, or Syracuse, or Rhodes, in our
 imagination, while, like some strange roving craft, we flitted
 past what seemed the dwellings of noble home-staying men, seemingly
 as conspicuous as if on an eminence, or floating upon a tide
 which came up to those villagers' breasts.  At a third of a mile
 over the water we heard distinctly some children repeating their
 catechism in a cottage near the shore, while in the broad
 shallows between, a herd of cows stood lashing their sides, and
 waging war with the flies.
 
 Two hundred years ago other catechizing than this was going on
 here; for here came the Sachem Wannalancet, and his people, and
 sometimes Tahatawan, our Concord Sachem, who afterwards had a
 church at home, to catch fish at the falls; and here also came
 John Eliot, with the Bible and Catechism, and Baxter's Call to
 the Unconverted, and other tracts, done into the Massachusetts
 tongue, and taught them Christianity meanwhile.  "This place,"
 says Gookin, referring to Wamesit,
 
   "being an ancient and capital seat of Indians, they come to
   fish; and this good man takes this opportunity to spread the
   net of the gospel, to fish for their souls."--"May 5th, 1674,"
   he continues, "according to our usual custom, Mr. Eliot and
   myself took our journey to Wamesit, or Pawtuckett; and arriving
   there that evening, Mr. Eliot preached to as many of them as
   could be got together, out of Matt.  xxii.  1-14, the parable
   of the marriage of the king's son.  We met at the wigwam of one
   called Wannalancet, about two miles from the town, near
   Pawtuckett falls, and bordering upon Merrimak river.  This
   person, Wannalancet, is the eldest son of old Pasaconaway, the
   chiefest sachem of Pawtuckett.  He is a sober and grave person,
   and of years, between fifty and sixty.  He hath been always
   loving and friendly to the English."  As yet, however, they had
   not prevailed on him to embrace the Christian religion.  "But
   at this time," says Gookin, "May 6, 1674,"--"after some
   deliberation and serious pause, he stood up, and made a speech
   to this effect:--`I must acknowledge I have, all my days, used
   to pass in an old canoe, (alluding to his frequent custom to
   pass in a canoe upon the river,) and now you exhort me to
   change and leave my old canoe, and embark in a new canoe, to
   which I have hitherto been unwilling; but now I yield up myself
   to your advice, and enter into a new canoe, and do engage to
   pray to God hereafter.'"  One "Mr. Richard Daniel, a gentleman
   that lived in Billerica," who with other "persons of quality"
   was present, "desired brother Eliot to tell the sachem from
   him, that it may be, while he went in his old canoe, he passed
   in a quiet stream; but the end thereof was death and
   destruction to soul and body.  But now he went into a new
   canoe, perhaps he would meet with storms and trials, but yet he
   should be encouraged to persevere, for the end of his voyage
   would be everlasting rest."--"Since that time, I hear this
   sachem doth persevere, and is a constant and diligent hearer of
   God's word, and sanctifieth the Sabbath, though he doth travel
   to Wamesit meeting every Sabbath, which is above two miles; and
   though sundry of his people have deserted him, since he
   subjected to the gospel, yet he continues and   persists."--
   _Gookin's Hist. Coll. of the Indians in New England_, 1674.
 
 Already, as appears from the records, "At a General Court
 held at Boston in New England, the 7th of the first month,
 1643-4."--"Wassamequin, Nashoonon, Kutchamaquin, Massaconomet,
 and Squaw Sachem, did voluntarily submit themselves" to the
 English; and among other things did "promise to be willing from
 time to time to be instructed in the knowledge of God." Being
 asked "Not to do any unnecessary work on the Sabbath day,
 especially within the gates of Christian towns," they answered,
 "It is easy to them; they have not much to do on any day, and
 they can well take their rest on that day."--"So," says Winthrop,
 in his Journal, "we causing them to understand the articles, and
 all the ten commandments of God, and they freely assenting to
 all, they were solemnly received, and then presented the Court
 with twenty-six fathom more of wampom; and the Court gave each of
 them a coat of two yards of cloth, and their dinner; and to them
 and their men, every of them, a cup of sack at their departure;
 so they took leave and went away."
 
 What journeyings on foot and on horseback through the wilderness,
 to preach the Gospel to these minks and muskrats! who first, no
 doubt, listened with their red ears out of a natural hospitality
 and courtesy, and afterward from curiosity or even interest, till
 at length there were "praying Indians," and, as the General Court
 wrote to Cromwell, the "work is brought to this perfection, that
 some of the Indians themselves can pray and prophesy in a
 comfortable manner."
 
 It was in fact an old battle and hunting ground through which we
 had been floating, the ancient dwelling-place of a race of
 hunters and warriors.  Their weirs of stone, their arrowheads and
 hatchets, their pestles, and the mortars in which they pounded
 Indian corn before the white man had tasted it, lay concealed in
 the mud of the river bottom.  Tradition still points out the
 spots where they took fish in the greatest numbers, by such arts
 as they possessed.  It is a rapid story the historian will have
 to put together.  Miantonimo,--Winthrop,--Webster.  Soon he comes
 from Montaup to Bunker Hill, from bear-skins, parched corn, bows
 and arrows, to tiled roofs, wheat-fields, guns and swords.
 Pawtucket and Wamesit, where the Indians resorted in the fishing
 season, are now Lowell, the city of spindles and Manchester of
 America, which sends its cotton cloth round the globe.  Even we
 youthful voyagers had spent a part of our lives in the village of
 Chelmsford, when the present city, whose bells we heard, was its
 obscure north district only, and the giant weaver was not yet
 fairly born.  So old are we; so young is it.
 
 
 We were thus entering the State of New Hampshire on the bosom of
 the flood formed by the tribute of its innumerable valleys.  The
 river was the only key which could unlock its maze, presenting
 its hills and valleys, its lakes and streams, in their natural
 order and position.  The MERRIMACK, or Sturgeon River, is formed
 by the confluence of the Pemigewasset, which rises near the Notch
 of the White Mountains, and the Winnipiseogee, which drains the
 lake of the same name, signifying "The Smile of the Great
 Spirit." From their junction it runs south seventy-eight miles to
 Massachusetts, and thence east thirty-five miles to the sea.  I
 have traced its stream from where it bubbles out of the rocks of
 the White Mountains above the clouds, to where it is lost amid
 the salt billows of the ocean on Plum Island beach.  At first it
 comes on murmuring to itself by the base of stately and retired
 mountains, through moist primitive woods whose juices it
 receives, where the bear still drinks it, and the cabins of
 settlers are far between, and there are few to cross its stream;
 enjoying in solitude its cascades still unknown to fame; by long
 ranges of mountains of Sandwich and of Squam, slumbering like
 tumuli of Titans, with the peaks of Moosehillock, the Haystack,
 and Kearsarge reflected in its waters; where the maple and the
 raspberry, those lovers of the hills, flourish amid temperate
 dews;--flowing long and full of meaning, but untranslatable as
 its name Pemigewasset, by many a pastured Pelion and Ossa, where
 unnamed muses haunt, tended by Oreads, Dryads, Naiads, and
 receiving the tribute of many an untasted Hippocrene.  There are
 earth, air, fire, and water,--very well, this is water, and down
 it comes.
 
    Such water do the gods distil,
    And pour down every hill
       For their New England men;
    A draught of this wild nectar bring,
    And I'll not taste the spring
       Of Helicon again.
 
 Falling all the way, and yet not discouraged by the lowest fall.
 By the law of its birth never to become stagnant, for it has come
 out of the clouds, and down the sides of precipices worn in the
 flood, through beaver-dams broke loose, not splitting but
 splicing and mending itself, until it found a breathing-place in
 this low land.  There is no danger now that the sun will steal it
 back to heaven again before it reach the sea, for it has a
 warrant even to recover its own dews into its bosom again with
 interest at every eve.
 
 It was already the water of Squam and Newfound Lake and
 Winnipiseogee, and White Mountain snow dissolved, on which we
 were floating, and Smith's and Baker's and Mad Rivers, and Nashua
 and Souhegan and Piscataquoag, and Suncook and Soucook and
 Contoocook, mingled in incalculable proportions, still fluid,
 yellowish, restless all, with an ancient, ineradicable
 inclination to the sea.
 
 So it flows on down by Lowell and Haverhill, at which last place
 it first suffers a sea change, and a few masts betray the
 vicinity of the ocean.  Between the towns of Amesbury and Newbury
 it is a broad commercial river, from a third to half a mile in
 width, no longer skirted with yellow and crumbling banks, but
 backed by high green hills and pastures, with frequent white
 beaches on which the fishermen draw up their nets.  I have passed
 down this portion of the river in a steamboat, and it was a
 pleasant sight to watch from its deck the fishermen dragging
 their seines on the distant shore, as in pictures of a foreign
 strand.  At intervals you may meet with a schooner laden with
 lumber, standing up to Haverhill, or else lying at anchor or
 aground, waiting for wind or tide; until, at last, you glide
 under the famous Chain Bridge, and are landed at Newburyport.
 Thus she who at first was "poore of waters, naked of renowne,"
 having received so many fair tributaries, as was said of the
 Forth,
 
    "Doth grow the greater still, the further downe;
       Till that abounding both in power and fame,
       She long doth strive to give the sea her name";
 
 or if not her name, in this case, at least the impulse of her
 stream.  From the steeples of Newburyport you may review this
 river stretching far up into the country, with many a white sail
 glancing over it like an inland sea, and behold, as one wrote who
 was born on its head-waters, "Down out at its mouth, the dark
 inky main blending with the blue above.  Plum Island, its sand
 ridges scolloping along the horizon like the sea-serpent, and the
 distant outline broken by many a tall ship, leaning, _still_,
 against the sky."
 
 Rising at an equal height with the Connecticut, the Merrimack
 reaches the sea by a course only half as long, and hence has no
 leisure to form broad and fertile meadows, like the former, but
 is hurried along rapids, and down numerous falls, without long
 delay.  The banks are generally steep and high, with a narrow
 interval reaching back to the hills, which is only rarely or
 partially overflown at present, and is much valued by the
 farmers.  Between Chelmsford and Concord, in New Hampshire, it
 varies from twenty to seventy-five rods in width.  It is probably
 wider than it was formerly, in many places, owing to the trees
 having been cut down, and the consequent wasting away of its
 banks.  The influence of the Pawtucket Dam is felt as far up as
 Cromwell's Falls, and many think that the banks are being abraded
 and the river filled up again by this cause.  Like all our
 rivers, it is liable to freshets, and the Pemigewasset has been
 known to rise twenty-five feet in a few hours.  It is navigable
 for vessels of burden about twenty miles; for canal-boats, by
 means of locks, as far as Concord in New Hampshire, about
 seventy-five miles from its mouth; and for smaller boats to
 Plymouth, one hundred and thirteen miles.  A small steamboat once
 plied between Lowell and Nashua, before the railroad was built,
 and one now runs from Newburyport to Haverhill.
 
 Unfitted to some extent for the purposes of commerce by the
 sand-bar at its mouth, see how this river was devoted from the
 first to the service of manufactures.  Issuing from the iron
 region of Franconia, and flowing through still uncut forests, by
 inexhaustible ledges of granite, with Squam, and Winnipiseogee,
 and Newfound, and Massabesic Lakes for its mill-ponds, it falls
 over a succession of natural dams, where it has been offering its
 _privileges_ in vain for ages, until at last the Yankee race came
 to _improve_ them.  Standing at its mouth, look up its sparkling
 stream to its source,--a silver cascade which falls all the way
 from the White Mountains to the sea,--and behold a city on each
 successive plateau, a busy colony of human beaver around every
 fall.  Not to mention Newburyport and Haverhill, see Lawrence,
 and Lowell, and Nashua, and Manchester, and Concord, gleaming one
 above the other.  When at length it has escaped from under the
 last of the factories, it has a level and unmolested passage to
 the sea, a mere _waste water_, as it were, bearing little with it
 but its fame; its pleasant course revealed by the morning fog
 which hangs over it, and the sails of the few small vessels which
 transact the commerce of Haverhill and Newburyport.  But its real
 vessels are railroad cars, and its true and main stream, flowing
 by an iron channel farther south, may be traced by a long line of
 vapor amid the hills, which no morning wind ever disperses, to
 where it empties into the sea at Boston.  This side is the louder
 murmur now.  Instead of the scream of a fish-hawk scaring the
 fishes, is heard the whistle of the steam-engine, arousing a
 country to its progress.
 
 
 This river too was at length discovered by the white man,
 "trending up into the land," he knew not how far, possibly an
 inlet to the South Sea.  Its valley, as far as the Winnipiseogee,
 was first surveyed in 1652.  The first settlers of Massachusetts
 supposed that the Connecticut, in one part of its course, ran
 northwest, "so near the great lake as the Indians do pass their
 canoes into it over land."  From which lake and the "hideous
 swamps" about it, as they supposed, came all the beaver that was
 traded between Virginia and Canada,--and the Potomac was thought
 to come out of or from very near it.  Afterward the Connecticut
 came so near the course of the Merrimack that, with a little
 pains, they expected to divert the current of the trade into the
 latter river, and its profits from their Dutch neighbors into
 their own pockets.
 
 Unlike the Concord, the Merrimack is not a dead but a living
 stream, though it has less life within its waters and on its
 banks.  It has a swift current, and, in this part of its course,
 a clayey bottom, almost no weeds, and comparatively few fishes.
 We looked down into its yellow water with the more curiosity, who
 were accustomed to the Nile-like blackness of the former river.
 Shad and alewives are taken here in their season, but salmon,
 though at one time more numerous than shad, are now more rare.
 Bass, also, are taken occasionally; but locks and dams have
 proved more or less destructive to the fisheries.  The shad make
 their appearance early in May, at the same time with the blossoms
 of the pyrus, one of the most conspicuous early flowers, which is
 for this reason called the shad-blossom.  An insect called the
 shad-fly also appears at the same time, covering the houses and
 fences.  We are told that "their greatest run is when the
 apple-trees are in full blossom.  The old shad return in August;
 the young, three or four inches long, in September.  These are
 very fond of flies." A rather picturesque and luxurious mode of
 fishing was formerly practised on the Connecticut, at Bellows
 Falls, where a large rock divides the stream.  "On the steep
 sides of the island rock," says Belknap, "hang several
 arm-chairs, fastened to ladders, and secured by a counterpoise,
 in which fishermen sit to catch salmon and shad with dipping
 nets." The remains of Indian weirs, made of large stones, are
 still to be seen in the Winnipiseogee, one of the head-waters of
 this river.
 
 It cannot but affect our philosophy favorably to be reminded of
 these shoals of migratory fishes, of salmon, shad, alewives,
 marsh-bankers, and others, which penetrate up the innumerable
 rivers of our coast in the spring, even to the interior lakes,
 their scales gleaming in the sun; and again, of the fry which in
 still greater numbers wend their way downward to the sea.  "And
 is it not pretty sport," wrote Captain John Smith, who was on
 this coast as early as 1614, "to pull up twopence, sixpence, and
 twelvepence, as fast as you can haul and veer a line?"--"And what
 sport doth yield a more pleasing content, and less hurt or
 charge, than angling with a hook, and crossing the sweet air from
 isle to isle, over the silent streams of a calm sea."
 
 
 On the sandy shore, opposite the Glass-house village in
 Chelmsford, at the Great Bend where we landed to rest us and
 gather a few wild plums, we discovered the _Campanula
 rotundifolia_, a new flower to us, the harebell of the poets,
 which is common to both hemispheres, growing close to the water.
 Here, in the shady branches of an apple-tree on the sand, we took
 our nooning, where there was not a zephyr to disturb the repose
 of this glorious Sabbath day, and we reflected serenely on the
 long past and successful labors of Latona.
 
      "So silent is the cessile air,
         That every cry and call,
      The hills, and dales, and forest fair
         Again repeats them all.
 
      "The herds beneath some leafy trees,
         Amidst the flowers they lie,
      The stable ships upon the seas
         Tend up their sails to dry."
 
 As we thus rested in the shade, or rowed leisurely along, we had
 recourse, from time to time, to the Gazetteer, which was our
 Navigator, and from its bald natural facts extracted the pleasure
 of poetry.  Beaver River comes in a little lower down, draining
 the meadows of Pelham, Windham, and Londonderry.  The Scotch-Irish
 settlers of the latter town, according to this authority, were
 the first to introduce the potato into New England, as well as
 the manufacture of linen cloth.
 
 Everything that is printed and bound in a book contains some echo
 at least of the best that is in literature.  Indeed, the best
 books have a use, like sticks and stones, which is above or
 beside their design, not anticipated in the preface, nor
 concluded in the appendix.  Even Virgil's poetry serves a very
 different use to me to-day from what it did to his contemporaries.
 It has often an acquired and accidental value merely, proving
 that man is still man in the world.  It is pleasant to meet with
 such still lines as,
 
     "Jam laeto turgent in palmite gemmae";
      Now the buds swell on the joyful stem.
 
     "Strata jacent passim sua quaeque sub arbore poma";
      The apples lie scattered everywhere, each under its tree.
 
 In an ancient and dead language, any recognition of living nature
 attracts us.  These are such sentences as were written while grass
 grew and water ran.  It is no small recommendation when a book
 will stand the test of mere unobstructed sunshine and daylight.
 
 What would we not give for some great poem to read now, which
 would be in harmony with the scenery,--for if men read aright,
 methinks they would never read anything but poems.  No history nor
 philosophy can supply their place.
 
 The wisest definition of poetry the poet will instantly prove
 false by setting aside its requisitions.  We can, therefore,
 publish only our advertisement of it.
 
 There is no doubt that the loftiest written wisdom is either
 rhymed, or in some way musically measured,--is, in form as well
 as substance, poetry; and a volume which should contain the
 condensed wisdom of mankind need not have one rhythmless line.
 
 Yet poetry, though the last and finest result, is a natural
 fruit.  As naturally as the oak bears an acorn, and the vine a
 gourd, man bears a poem, either spoken or done.  It is the chief
 and most memorable success, for history is but a prose narrative
 of poetic deeds.  What else have the Hindoos, the Persians, the
 Babylonians, the Egyptians done, that can be told?  It is the
 simplest relation of phenomena, and describes the commonest
 sensations with more truth than science does, and the latter at a
 distance slowly mimics its style and methods.  The poet sings how
 the blood flows in his veins.  He performs his functions, and is
 so well that he needs such stimulus to sing only as plants to put
 forth leaves and blossoms.  He would strive in vain to modulate
 the remote and transient music which he sometimes hears, since
 his song is a vital function like breathing, and an integral
 result like weight.  It is not the overflowing of life but its
 subsidence rather, and is drawn from under the feet of the poet.
 It is enough if Homer but say the sun sets.  He is as serene as
 nature, and we can hardly detect the enthusiasm of the bard.  It
 is as if nature spoke.  He presents to us the simplest pictures
 of human life, so the child itself can understand them, and the
 man must not think twice to appreciate his naturalness.  Each
 reader discovers for himself that, with respect to the simpler
 features of nature, succeeding poets have done little else than
 copy his similes.  His more memorable passages are as naturally
 bright as gleams of sunshine in misty weather.  Nature furnishes
 him not only with words, but with stereotyped lines and sentences
 from her mint.
 
    "As from the clouds appears the full moon,
    All shining, and then again it goes behind the shadowy clouds,
    So Hector, at one time appeared among the foremost,
    And at another in the rear, commanding; and all with brass
    He shone, like to the lightning of aegis-bearing Zeus."
 
 He conveys the least information, even the hour of the day, with
 such magnificence and vast expense of natural imagery, as if it
 were a message from the gods.
 
    "While it was dawn, and sacred day was advancing,
    For that space the weapons of both flew fast, and the people fell;
    But when now the woodcutter was preparing his morning meal,
    In the recesses of the mountain, and had wearied his hands
    With cutting lofty trees, and satiety came to his mind,
    And the desire of sweet food took possession of his thoughts;
    Then the Danaans, by their valor, broke the phalanxes,
    Shouting to their companions from rank to rank."
 
 When the army of the Trojans passed the night under arms, keeping
 watch lest the enemy should re-embark under cover of the dark,
 
    "They, thinking great things, upon the neutral ground of war
    Sat all the night; and many fires burned for them.
    As when in the heavens the stars round the bright moon
    Appear beautiful, and the air is without wind;
    And all the heights, and the extreme summits,
    And the wooded sides of the mountains appear; and from the
         heavens an Infinite ether is diffused,
    And all the stars are seen, and the shepherd rejoices in his heart;
    So between the ships and the streams of Xanthus
    Appeared the fires of the Trojans before Ilium.
    A thousand fires burned on the plain, and by each
    Sat fifty, in the light of the blazing fire;
    And horses eating white barley and corn,
    Standing by the chariots, awaited fair-throned Aurora."
 
 
 The "white-armed goddess Juno," sent by the Father of gods and
 men for Iris and Apollo,
 
 
    "Went down the Idaean mountains to far Olympus,
    As when the mind of a man, who has come over much earth,
    Sallies forth, and he reflects with rapid thoughts,
    There was I, and there, and remembers many things;
    So swiftly the august Juno hastening flew through the air,
    And came to high Olympus."
 
 His scenery is always true, and not invented.  He does not leap in
 imagination from Asia to Greece, through mid air,
 
    <epei_e` ma'la polla` metaxy'
     Ourea' te skioe'nta, thala'ssa te _ech_e'essa.>
 
         for there are very many
    Shady mountains and resounding seas between.
 
 If his messengers repair but to the tent of Achilles, we do not
 wonder how they got there, but accompany them step by step along
 the shore of the resounding sea.  Nestor's account of the march
 of the Pylians against the Epeians is extremely lifelike:--
 
    "Then rose up to them sweet-worded Nestor, the shrill orator
        of the Pylians,
    And words sweeter than honey flowed from his tongue."
 
 This time, however, he addresses Patroclus alone: "A certain
 river, Minyas by name, leaps seaward near to Arene, where we
 Pylians wait the dawn, both horse and foot.  Thence with all
 haste we sped us on the morrow ere 't was noonday, accoutred for
 the fight, even to Alpheus's sacred source," &c.  We fancy that
 we hear the subdued murmuring of the Minyas discharging its
 waters into the main the livelong night, and the hollow sound of
 the waves breaking on the shore,--until at length we are cheered
 at the close of a toilsome march by the gurgling fountains of
 Alpheus.
 
 There are few books which are fit to be remembered in our wisest
 hours, but the Iliad is brightest in the serenest days, and
 embodies still all the sunlight that fell on Asia Minor.  No
 modern joy or ecstasy of ours can lower its height or dim its
 lustre, but there it lies in the east of literature, as it were
 the earliest and latest production of the mind.  The ruins of
 Egypt oppress and stifle us with their dust, foulness preserved
 in cassia and pitch, and swathed in linen; the death of that
 which never lived.  But the rays of Greek poetry struggle down to
 us, and mingle with the sunbeams of the recent day.  The statue
 of Memnon is cast down, but the shaft of the Iliad still meets
 the sun in his rising.
 
      "Homer is gone; and where is Jove? and where
       The rival cities seven?  His song outlives
       Time, tower, and god,--all that then was, save Heaven."
 
 So too, no doubt, Homer had his Homer, and Orpheus his Orpheus,
 in the dim antiquity which preceded them.  The mythological
 system of the ancients, and it is still the mythology of the
 moderns, the poem of mankind, interwoven so wonderfully with
 their astronomy, and matching in grandeur and harmony the
 architecture of the heavens themselves, seems to point to a time
 when a mightier genius inhabited the earth.  But, after all, man
 is the great poet, and not Homer nor Shakespeare; and our
 language itself, and the common arts of life, are his work.
 Poetry is so universally true and independent of experience, that
 it does not need any particular biography to illustrate it, but
 we refer it sooner or later to some Orpheus or Linus, and after
 ages to the genius of humanity and the gods themselves.
 
 
 It would be worth the while to select our reading, for books are
 the society we keep; to read only the serenely true; never
 statistics, nor fiction, nor news, nor reports, nor periodicals,
 but only great poems, and when they failed, read them again, or
 perchance write more.  Instead of other sacrifice, we might offer
 up our perfect (<telei'a>) thoughts to the gods daily, in hymns or
 psalms.  For we should be at the helm at least once a day.  The
 whole of the day should not be daytime; there should be one hour,
 if no more, which the day did not bring forth.  Scholars are wont
 to sell their birthright for a mess of learning.  But is it
 necessary to know what the speculator prints, or the thoughtless
 study, or the idle read, the literature of the Russians and the
 Chinese, or even French philosophy and much of German criticism.
 Read the best books first, or you may not have a chance to read
 them at all.  "There are the worshippers with offerings, and the
 worshippers with mortifications; and again the worshippers with
 enthusiastic devotion; so there are those the wisdom of whose
 reading is their worship, men of subdued passions and severe
 manners;--This world is not for him who doth not worship; and
 where, O Arjoon, is there another?"  Certainly, we do not need to
 be soothed and entertained always like children.  He who resorts
 to the easy novel, because he is languid, does no better than if
 he took a nap.  The front aspect of great thoughts can only be
 enjoyed by those who stand on the side whence they arrive.
 Books, not which afford us a cowering enjoyment, but in which
 each thought is of unusual daring; such as an idle man cannot
 read, and a timid one would not be entertained by, which even
 make us dangerous to existing institutions,--such call I good
 books.
 
 All that are printed and bound are not books; they do not
 necessarily belong to letters, but are oftener to be ranked with
 the other luxuries and appendages of civilized life.  Base wares
 are palmed off under a thousand disguises.  "The way to trade,"
 as a pedler once told me, "is to _put it right through_," no
 matter what it is, anything that is agreed on.
 
     "You grov'ling worldlings, you whose wisdom trades
      Where light ne'er shot his golden ray."
 
 By dint of able writing and pen-craft, books are cunningly
 compiled, and have their run and success even among the learned,
 as if they were the result of a new man's thinking, and their
 birth were attended with some natural throes.  But in a little
 while their covers fall off, for no binding will avail, and it
 appears that they are not Books or Bibles at all.  There are new
 and patented inventions in this shape, purporting to be for the
 elevation of the race, which many a pure scholar and genius who
 has learned to read is for a moment deceived by, and finds
 himself reading a horse-rake, or spinning-jenny, or wooden
 nutmeg, or oak-leaf cigar, or steam-power press, or kitchen
 range, perchance, when he was seeking serene and biblical truths.
 
                           "Merchants, arise,
      And mingle conscience with your merchandise."
 
 Paper is cheap, and authors need not now erase one book before
 they write another.  Instead of cultivating the earth for wheat
 and potatoes, they cultivate literature, and fill a place in the
 Republic of Letters.  Or they would fain write for fame merely,
 as others actually raise crops of grain to be distilled into
 brandy.  Books are for the most part wilfully and hastily
 written, as parts of a system, to supply a want real or imagined.
 Books of natural history aim commonly to be hasty schedules, or
 inventories of God's property, by some clerk.  They do not in the
 least teach the divine view of nature, but the popular view, or
 rather the popular method of studying nature, and make haste to
 conduct the persevering pupil only into that dilemma where the
 professors always dwell.
 
     "To Athens gowned he goes, and from that school
      Returns unsped, a more instructed fool."
 
 They teach the elements really of ignorance, not of knowledge,
 for, to speak deliberately and in view of the highest truths, it
 is not easy to distinguish elementary knowledge.  There is a
 chasm between knowledge and ignorance which the arches of science
 can never span.  A book should contain pure discoveries, glimpses
 of _terra firma_, though by shipwrecked mariners, and not the art
 of navigation by those who have never been out of sight of land.
 _They_ must not yield wheat and potatoes, but must themselves be
 the unconstrained and natural harvest of their author's lives.
 
     "What I have learned is mine; I've had my thought,
      And me the Muses noble truths have taught."
 
 We do not learn much from learned books, but from true, sincere,
 human books, from frank and honest biographies.  The life of a
 good man will hardly improve us more than the life of a
 freebooter, for the inevitable laws appear as plainly in the
 infringement as in the observance, and our lives are sustained by
 a nearly equal expense of virtue of some kind.  The decaying
 tree, while yet it lives, demands sun, wind, and rain no less
 than the green one.  It secretes sap and performs the functions
 of health.  If we choose, we may study the alburnum only.  The
 gnarled stump has as tender a bud as the sapling.
 
 At least let us have healthy books, a stout horse-rake or a
 kitchen range which is not cracked.  Let not the poet shed tears
 only for the public weal.  He should be as vigorous as a
 sugar-maple, with sap enough to maintain his own verdure, beside
 what runs into the troughs, and not like a vine, which being cut
 in the spring bears no fruit, but bleeds to death in the endeavor
 to heal its wounds.  The poet is he that hath fat enough, like
 bears and marmots, to suck his claws all winter.  He hibernates
 in this world, and feeds on his own marrow.  We love to think in
 winter, as we walk over the snowy pastures, of those happy
 dreamers that lie under the sod, of dormice and all that race of
 dormant creatures, which have such a superfluity of life
 enveloped in thick folds of fur, impervious to cold.  Alas, the
 poet too is, in one sense, a sort of dormouse gone into winter
 quarters of deep and serene thoughts, insensible to surrounding
 circumstances; his words are the relation of his oldest and
 finest memory, a wisdom drawn from the remotest experience.
 Other men lead a starved existence, meanwhile, like hawks, that
 would fain keep on the wing, and trust to pick up a sparrow now
 and then.
 
 
 There are already essays and poems, the growth of this land,
 which are not in vain, all which, however, we could conveniently
 have stowed in the till of our chest.  If the gods permitted
 their own inspiration to be breathed in vain, these might be
 overlooked in the crowd, but the accents of truth are as sure to
 be heard at last on earth as in heaven.  They already seem
 ancient, and in some measure have lost the traces of their modern
 birth.  Here are they who
 
    "ask for that which is our whole life's light,
    For the perpetual, true and clear insight."
 
 I remember a few sentences which spring like the sward in its
 native pasture, where its roots were never disturbed, and not as
 if spread over a sandy embankment; answering to the poet's
 prayer,
 
                 "Let us set so just
    A rate on knowledge, that the world may trust
    The poet's sentence, and not still aver
    Each art is to itself a flatterer."
 
 But, above all, in our native port, did we not frequent the
 peaceful games of the Lyceum, from which a new era will be dated
 to New England, as from the games of Greece.  For if Herodotus
 carried his history to Olympia to read, after the cestus and the
 race, have we not heard such histories recited there, which since
 our countrymen have read, as made Greece sometimes to be
 forgotten?--Philosophy, too, has there her grove and portico, not
 wholly unfrequented in these days.
 
 Lately the victor, whom all Pindars praised, has won another
 palm, contending with
 
    "Olympian bards who sung
    Divine ideas below,
    Which always find us young,
    And always keep us so."
 
 What earth or sea, mountain or stream, or Muses' spring or grove,
 is safe from his all-searching ardent eye, who drives off
 Phoebus' beaten track, visits unwonted zones, makes the gelid
 Hyperboreans glow, and the old polar serpent writhe, and many a
 Nile flow back and hide his head!
 
    That Phaeton of our day,
    Who'd make another milky way,
    And burn the world up with his ray;
 
    By us an undisputed seer,--
    Who'd drive his flaming car so near
    Unto our shuddering mortal sphere,
 
    Disgracing all our slender worth,
    And scorching up the living earth,
    To prove his heavenly birth.
 
    The silver spokes, the golden tire,
    Are glowing with unwonted fire,
    And ever nigher roll and nigher;
 
    The pins and axle melted are,
    The silver radii fly afar,
    Ah, he will spoil his Father's car!
 
    Who let him have the steeds he cannot steer?
    Henceforth the sun will not shine for a year;
    And we shall Ethiops all appear.
 
 From _his_
 
            "lips of cunning fell
    The thrilling Delphic oracle."
 
 And yet, sometimes,
 
    We should not mind if on our ear there fell
    Some less of cunning, more of oracle.
 
 It is Apollo shining in your face.  O rare Contemporary, let us
 have far-off heats.  Give us the subtler, the heavenlier though
 fleeting beauty, which passes through and through, and dwells not
 in the verse; even pure water, which but reflects those tints
 which wine wears in its grain.  Let epic trade-winds blow, and
 cease this waltz of inspirations.  Let us oftener feel even the
 gentle southwest wind upon our cheeks blowing from the Indian's
 heaven.  What though we lose a thousand meteors from the sky, if
 skyey depths, if star-dust and undissolvable nebulae remain?
 What though we lose a thousand wise responses of the oracle, if
 we may have instead some natural acres of Ionian earth?
 
 Though we know well,
 
    "That't is not in the power of kings [or presidents] to raise
     A spirit for verse that is not born thereto,
     Nor are they born in every prince's days";
 
 yet spite of all they sang in praise of their "Eliza's reign," we
 have evidence that poets may be born and sing in _our_ day, in
 the presidency of James K.  Polk,
 
     "And that the utmost powers of English rhyme,"
     _Were not_ "within _her_ peaceful reign confined."
 
 The prophecy of the poet Daniel is already how much more than
 fulfilled!
 
     "And who in time knows whither we may vent
     The treasure of our tongue?  To what strange shores
     This gain of our best glory shall be sent,
     T' enrich unknowing nations with our stores?
     What worlds in th' yet unformed occident,
     May come refined with the accents that are ours."
 
 Enough has been said in these days of the charm of fluent
 writing.  We hear it complained of some works of genius, that
 they have fine thoughts, but are irregular and have no flow.  But
 even the mountain peaks in the horizon are, to the eye of
 science, parts of one range.  We should consider that the flow of
 thought is more like a tidal wave than a prone river, and is the
 result of a celestial influence, not of any declivity in its
 channel.  The river flows because it runs down hill, and flows
 the faster the faster it descends.  The reader who expects to
 float down stream for the whole voyage, may well complain of
 nauseating swells and choppings of the sea when his frail
 shore-craft gets amidst the billows of the ocean stream, which
 flows as much to sun and moon as lesser streams to it.  But if we
 would appreciate the flow that is in these books, we must expect
 to feel it rise from the page like an exhalation, and wash away
 our critical brains like burr millstones, flowing to higher
 levels above and behind ourselves.  There is many a book which
 ripples on like a freshet, and flows as glibly as a mill-stream
 sucking under a causeway; and when their authors are in the full
 tide of their discourse, Pythagoras and Plato and Jamblichus halt
 beside them.  Their long, stringy, slimy sentences are of that
 consistency that they naturally flow and run together.  They read
 as if written for military men, for men of business, there is
 such a despatch in them.  Compared with these, the grave thinkers
 and philosophers seem not to have got their swaddling-clothes
 off; they are slower than a Roman army in its march, the rear
 camping to-night where the van camped last night.  The wise
 Jamblichus eddies and gleams like a watery slough.
 
     "How many thousands never heard the name
     Of Sidney, or of Spenser, or their books?
     And yet brave fellows, and presume of fame,
     And seem to bear down all the world with looks."
 
 The ready writer seizes the pen, and shouts, Forward!  Alamo and
 Fanning!  and after rolls the tide of war.  The very walls and
 fences seem to travel.  But the most rapid trot is no flow after
 all; and thither, reader, you and I, at least, will not follow.
 
 A perfectly healthy sentence, it is true, is extremely rare.  For
 the most part we miss the hue and fragrance of the thought; as if
 we could be satisfied with the dews of the morning or evening
 without their colors, or the heavens without their azure.  The
 most attractive sentences are, perhaps, not the wisest, but the
 surest and roundest.  They are spoken firmly and conclusively, as
 if the speaker had a right to know what he says, and if not wise,
 they have at least been well learned.  Sir Walter Raleigh might
 well be studied if only for the excellence of his style, for he
 is remarkable in the midst of so many masters.  There is a
 natural emphasis in his style, like a man's tread, and a
 breathing space between the sentences, which the best of modern
 writing does not furnish.  His chapters are like English parks,
 or say rather like a Western forest, where the larger growth
 keeps down the underwood, and one may ride on horseback through
 the openings.  All the distinguished writers of that period
 possess a greater vigor and naturalness than the more
 modern,--for it is allowed to slander our own time,--and when we
 read a quotation from one of them in the midst of a modern
 author, we seem to have come suddenly upon a greener ground, a
 greater depth and strength of soil.  It is as if a green bough
 were laid across the page, and we are refreshed as by the sight
 of fresh grass in midwinter or early spring.  You have constantly
 the warrant of life and experience in what you read.  The little
 that is said is eked out by implication of the much that was
 done.  The sentences are verdurous and blooming as evergreen and
 flowers, because they are rooted in fact and experience, but our
 false and florid sentence have only the tints of flowers without
 their sap or roots.  All men are really most attracted by the
 beauty of plain speech, and they even write in a florid style in
 imitation of this.  They prefer to be misunderstood rather than
 to come short of its exuberance.  Hussein Effendi praised the
 epistolary style of Ibrahim Pasha to the French traveller Botta,
 because of "the difficulty of understanding it; there was," he
 said, "but one person at Jidda, who was capable of understanding
 and explaining the Pasha's correspondence." A man's whole life is
 taxed for the least thing well done.  It is its net result.
 Every sentence is the result of a long probation.  Where shall we
 look for standard English, but to the words of a standard man?
 The word which is best said came nearest to not being spoken at
 all, for it is cousin to a deed which the speaker could have
 better done.  Nay, almost it must have taken the place of a deed
 by some urgent necessity, even by some misfortune, so that the
 truest writer will be some captive knight, after all.  And
 perhaps the fates had such a design, when, having stored Raleigh
 so richly with the substance of life and experience, they made
 him a fast prisoner, and compelled him to make his words his
 deeds, and transfer to his expression the emphasis and sincerity
 of his action.
 
 Men have a respect for scholarship and learning greatly out of
 proportion to the use they commonly serve.  We are amused to read
 how Ben Jonson engaged, that the dull masks with which the royal
 family and nobility were to be entertained should be "grounded
 upon antiquity and solid learning." Can there be any greater
 reproach than an idle learning?  Learn to split wood, at least.
 The necessity of labor and conversation with many men and things,
 to the scholar is rarely well remembered; steady labor with the
 hands, which engrosses the attention also, is unquestionably the
 best method of removing palaver and sentimentality out of one's
 style, both of speaking and writing.  If he has worked hard from
 morning till night, though he may have grieved that he could not
 be watching the train of his thoughts during that time, yet the
 few hasty lines which at evening record his day's experience will
 be more musical and true than his freest but idle fancy could
 have furnished.  Surely the writer is to address a world of
 laborers, and such therefore must be his own discipline.  He will
 not idly dance at his work who has wood to cut and cord before
 nightfall in the short days of winter; but every stroke will be
 husbanded, and ring soberly through the wood; and so will the
 strokes of that scholar's pen, which at evening record the story
 of the day, ring soberly, yet cheerily, on the ear of the reader,
 long after the echoes of his axe have died away.  The scholar may
 be sure that he writes the tougher truth for the calluses on his
 palms.  They give firmness to the sentence.  Indeed, the mind
 never makes a great and successful effort, without a
 corresponding energy of the body.  We are often struck by the
 force and precision of style to which hard-working men,
 unpractised in writing, easily attain when required to make the
 effort.  As if plainness, and vigor, and sincerity, the ornaments
 of style, were better learned on the farm and in the workshop,
 than in the schools.  The sentences written by such rude hands
 are nervous and tough, like hardened thongs, the sinews of the
 deer, or the roots of the pine.  As for the graces of expression,
 a great thought is never found in a mean dress; but though it
 proceed from the lips of the Woloffs, the nine Muses and the
 three Graces will have conspired to clothe it in fit phrase.  Its
 education has always been liberal, and its implied wit can endow
 a college.  The world, which the Greeks called Beauty, has been
 made such by being gradually divested of every ornament which was
 not fitted to endure.  The Sibyl, "speaking with inspired mouth,
 smileless, inornate, and unperfumed, pierces through centuries by
 the power of the god."  The scholar might frequently emulate the
 propriety and emphasis of the farmer's call to his team, and
 confess that if that were written it would surpass his labored
 sentences.  Whose are the truly _labored_ sentences?  From the
 weak and flimsy periods of the politician and literary man, we
 are glad to turn even to the description of work, the simple
 record of the month's labor in the farmer's almanac, to restore
 our tone and spirits.  A sentence should read as if its author,
 had he held a plough instead of a pen, could have drawn a furrow
 deep and straight to the end.  The scholar requires hard and
 serious labor to give an impetus to his thought.  He will learn
 to grasp the pen firmly so, and wield it gracefully and
 effectively, as an axe or a sword.  When we consider the weak and
 nerveless periods of some literary men, who perchance in feet and
 inches come up to the standard of their race, and are not
 deficient in girth also, we are amazed at the immense sacrifice
 of thews and sinews.  What! these proportions,--these bones,--and
 this their work!  Hands which could have felled an ox have hewed
 this fragile matter which would not have tasked a lady's fingers!
 Can this be a stalwart man's work, who has a marrow in his back
 and a tendon Achilles in his heel?  They who set up the blocks of
 Stonehenge did somewhat, if they only laid out their strength for
 once, and stretched themselves.
 
 Yet, after all, the truly efficient laborer will not crowd his
 day with work, but will saunter to his task surrounded by a wide
 halo of ease and leisure, and then do but what he loves best.  He
 is anxious only about the fruitful kernels of time.  Though the
 hen should sit all day, she could lay only one egg, and, besides,
 would not have picked up materials for another.  Let a man take
 time enough for the most trivial deed, though it be but the
 paring of his nails.  The buds swell imperceptibly, without hurry
 or confusion, as if the short spring days were an eternity.
 
      Then spend an age in whetting thy desire,
      Thou needs't not _hasten_ if thou dost _stand fast_.
 
 Some hours seem not to be occasion for any deed, but for resolves
 to draw breath in.  We do not directly go about the execution of
 the purpose that thrills us, but shut our doors behind us and
 ramble with prepared mind, as if the half were already done.  Our
 resolution is taking root or hold on the earth then, as seeds
 first send a shoot downward which is fed by their own albumen,
 ere they send one upward to the light.
 
 
 There is a sort of homely truth and naturalness in some books
 which is very rare to find, and yet looks cheap enough.  There
 may be nothing lofty in the sentiment, or fine in the expression,
 but it is careless country talk.  Homeliness is almost as great a
 merit in a book as in a house, if the reader would abide there.
 It is next to beauty, and a very high art.  Some have this merit
 only.  The scholar is not apt to make his most familiar
 experience come gracefully to the aid of his expression.  Very
 few men can speak of Nature, for instance, with any truth.  They
 overstep her modesty, somehow or other, and confer no favor.
 They do not speak a good word for her.  Most cry better than they
 speak, and you can get more nature out of them by pinching than
 by addressing them.  The surliness with which the woodchopper
 speaks of his woods, handling them as indifferently as his axe,
 is better than the mealy-mouthed enthusiasm of the lover of
 nature.  Better that the primrose by the river's brim be a yellow
 primrose, and nothing more, than that it be something less.
 Aubrey relates of Thomas Fuller that his was "a very working
 head, insomuch that, walking and meditating before dinner, he
 would eat up a penny loaf, not knowing that he did it.  His
 natural memory was very great, to which he added the art of
 memory.  He would repeat to you forwards and backwards all the
 signs from Ludgate to Charing Cross." He says of Mr. John Hales,
 that, "He loved Canarie," and was buried "under an altar monument
 of black marble--------with a too long epitaph"; of Edmund
 Halley, that he "at sixteen could make a dial, and then, he said,
 he thought himself a brave fellow"; of William Holder, who wrote
 a book upon his curing one Popham who was deaf and dumb, "he was
 beholding to no author; did only consult with nature." For the
 most part, an author consults only with all who have written
 before him upon a subject, and his book is but the advice of so
 many.  But a good book will never have been forestalled, but the
 topic itself will in one sense be new, and its author, by
 consulting with nature, will consult not only with those who have
 gone before, but with those who may come after.  There is always
 room and occasion enough for a true book on any subject; as there
 is room for more light the brightest day and more rays will not
 interfere with the first.
 
 We thus worked our way up this river, gradually adjusting our
 thoughts to novelties, beholding from its placid bosom a new
 nature and new works of men, and, as it were with increasing
 confidence, finding nature still habitable, genial, and
 propitious to us; not following any beaten path, but the windings
 of the river, as ever the nearest way for us.  Fortunately we had
 no business in this country.  The Concord had rarely been a
 river, or _rivus_, but barely _fluvius_, or between _fluvius_ and
 _lacus_.  This Merrimack was neither _rivus_ nor _fluvius_ nor
 _lacus_, but rather _amnis_ here, a gently swelling and stately
 rolling flood approaching the sea.  We could even sympathize with
 its buoyant tide, going to seek its fortune in the ocean, and,
 anticipating the time when "being received within the plain of
 its freer water," it should "beat the shores for banks,"--
 
    "campoque recepta
    Liberioris aquae, pro ripis litora pulsant."
 
 At length we doubled a low shrubby islet, called Rabbit Island,
 subjected alternately to the sun and to the waves, as desolate as
 if it lay some leagues within the icy sea, and found ourselves in
 a narrower part of the river, near the sheds and yards for
 picking the stone known as the Chelmsford granite, which is
 quarried in Westford and the neighboring towns.  We passed
 Wicasuck Island, which contains seventy acres or more, on our
 right, between Chelmsford and Tyngsborough.  This was a favorite
 residence of the Indians.  According to the History of Dunstable,
 "About 1663, the eldest son of Passaconaway [Chief of the
 Penacooks] was thrown into jail for a debt of 45, due to John
 Tinker, by one of his tribe, and which he had promised verbally
 should be paid.  To relieve him from his imprisonment, his
 brother Wannalancet and others, who owned Wicasuck Island, sold
 it and paid the debt." It was, however, restored to the Indians
 by the General Court in 1665.  After the departure of the Indians
 in 1683, it was granted to Jonathan Tyng in payment for his
 services to the colony, in maintaining a garrison at his house.
 Tyng's house stood not far from Wicasuck Falls.  Gookin, who, in
 his Epistle Dedicatory to Robert Boyle, apologizes for presenting
 his "matter clothed in a wilderness dress," says that on the
 breaking out of Philip's war in 1675, there were taken up by the
 Christian Indians and the English in Marlborough, and sent to
 Cambridge, seven "Indians belonging to Narragansett, Long Island,
 and Pequod, who had all been at work about seven weeks with one
 Mr. Jonathan Tyng, of Dunstable, upon Merrimack River; and,
 hearing of the war, they reckoned with their master, and getting
 their wages, conveyed themselves away without his privity, and,
 being afraid, marched secretly through the woods, designing to go
 to their own country." However, they were released soon after.
 Such were the hired men in those days.  Tyng was the first
 permanent settler of Dunstable, which then embraced what is now
 Tyngsborough and many other towns.  In the winter of 1675, in
 Philip's war, every other settler left the town, but "he," says
 the historian of Dunstable, "fortified his house; and, although
 `obliged to send to Boston for his food,' sat himself down in the
 midst of his savage enemies, alone, in the wilderness, to defend
 his home.  Deeming his position an important one for the defence
 of the frontiers, in February, 1676, he petitioned the Colony for
 aid, "humbly showing, as his petition runs, that, as he lived "in
 the uppermost house on Merrimac river, lying open to ye enemy,
 yet being so seated that it is, as it were, a watch-house to the
 neighboring towns, "he could render important service to his
 country if only he had some assistance," there being, "he said,"
 never an inhabitant left in the town but myself." Wherefore he
 requests that their "Honors would be pleased to order him _three
 or four men_ to help garrison his said house," which they did.
 But methinks that such a garrison would be weakened by the
 addition of a man.
 
     "Make bandog thy scout watch to bark at a thief,
      Make courage for life, to be capitain chief;
      Make trap-door thy bulwark, make bell to begin,
      Make gunstone and arrow show who is within."
 
 Thus he earned the title of first permanent settler.  In 1694 a
 law was passed "that every settler who deserted a town for fear
 of the Indians should forfeit all his rights therein." But now,
 at any rate, as I have frequently observed, a man may desert the
 fertile frontier territories of truth and justice, which are the
 State's best lands, for fear of far more insignificant foes,
 without forfeiting any of his civil rights therein.  Nay,
 townships are granted to deserters, and the General Court, as I
 am sometimes inclined to regard it, is but a deserters' camp
 itself.
 
 As we rowed along near the shore of Wicasuck Island, which was
 then covered with wood, in order to avoid the current, two men,
 who looked as if they had just run out of Lowell, where they had
 been waylaid by the Sabbath, meaning to go to Nashua, and who now
 found themselves in the strange, natural, uncultivated, and
 unsettled part of the globe which intervenes, full of walls and
 barriers, a rough and uncivil place to them, seeing our boat
 moving so smoothly up the stream, called out from the high bank
 above our heads to know if we would take them as passengers, as
 if this were the street they had missed; that they might sit and
 chat and drive away the time, and so at last find themselves in
 Nashua.  This smooth way they much preferred.  But our boat was
 crowded with necessary furniture, and sunk low in the water, and
 moreover required to be worked, for even _it_ did not progress
 against the stream without effort; so we were obliged to deny
 them passage.  As we glided away with even sweeps, while the
 fates scattered oil in our course, the sun now sinking behind the
 alders on the distant shore, we could still see them far off over
 the water, running along the shore and climbing over the rocks
 and fallen trees like insects,--for they did not know any better
 than we that they were on an island,--the unsympathizing river
 ever flowing in an opposite direction; until, having reached the
 entrance of the island brook, which they had probably crossed
 upon the locks below, they found a more effectual barrier to
 their progress.  They seemed to be learning much in a little
 time.  They ran about like ants on a burning brand, and once more
 they tried the river here, and once more there, to see if water
 still indeed was not to be walked on, as if a new thought
 inspired them, and by some peculiar disposition of the limbs they
 could accomplish it.  At length sober common sense seemed to have
 resumed its sway, and they concluded that what they had so long
 heard must be true, and resolved to ford the shallower stream.
 When nearly a mile distant we could see them stripping off their
 clothes and preparing for this experiment; yet it seemed likely
 that a new dilemma would arise, they were so thoughtlessly
 throwing away their clothes on the wrong side of the stream, as
 in the case of the countryman with his corn, his fox, and his
 goose, which had to be transported one at a time.  Whether they
 got safely through, or went round by the locks, we never learned.
 We could not help being struck by the seeming, though innocent
 indifference of Nature to these men's necessities, while
 elsewhere she was equally serving others.  Like a true
 benefactress, the secret of her service is unchangeableness.
 Thus is the busiest merchant, though within sight of his Lowell,
 put to pilgrim's shifts, and soon comes to staff and scrip and
 scallop shell.
 
 We, too, who held the middle of the stream, came near
 experiencing a pilgrim's fate, being tempted to pursue what
 seemed a sturgeon or larger fish, for we remembered that this was
 the Sturgeon River, its dark and monstrous back alternately
 rising and sinking in mid-stream.  We kept falling behind, but
 the fish kept his back well out, and did not dive, and seemed to
 prefer to swim against the stream, so, at any rate, he would not
 escape us by going out to sea.  At length, having got as near as
 was convenient, and looking out not to get a blow from his tail,
 now the bow-gunner delivered his charge, while the stern-man held
 his ground.  But the halibut-skinned monster, in one of these
 swift-gliding pregnant moments, without ever ceasing his bobbing
 up and down, saw fit, without a chuckle or other prelude, to
 proclaim himself a huge imprisoned spar, placed there as a buoy,
 to warn sailors of sunken rocks.  So, each casting some blame
 upon the other, we withdrew quickly to safer waters.
 
 The Scene-shifter saw fit here to close the drama, of this day,
 without regard to any unities which we mortals prize.  Whether it
 might have proved tragedy, or comedy, or tragi-comedy, or
 pastoral, we cannot tell.  This Sunday ended by the going down of
 the sun, leaving us still on the waves.  But they who are on the
 water enjoy a longer and brighter twilight than they who are on
 the land, for here the water, as well as the atmosphere, absorbs
 and reflects the light, and some of the day seems to have sunk
 down into the waves.  The light gradually forsook the deep water,
 as well as the deeper air, and the gloaming came to the fishes as
 well as to us, and more dim and gloomy to them, whose day is a
 perpetual twilight, though sufficiently bright for their weak and
 watery eyes.  Vespers had already rung in many a dim and watery
 chapel down below, where the shadows of the weeds were extended
 in length over the sandy floor.  The vespertinal pout had already
 begun to flit on leathern fin, and the finny gossips withdrew
 from the fluvial street to creeks and coves, and other private
 haunts, excepting a few of stronger fin, which anchored in the
 stream, stemming the tide even in their dreams.  Meanwhile, like
 a dark evening cloud, we were wafted over the cope of their sky,
 deepening the shadows on their deluged fields.
 
 Having reached a retired part of the river where it spread out to
 sixty rods in width, we pitched our tent on the east side, in
 Tyngsborough, just above some patches of the beach plum, which
 was now nearly ripe, where the sloping bank was a sufficient
 pillow, and with the bustle of sailors making the land, we
 transferred such stores as were required from boat to tent, and
 hung a lantern to the tent-pole, and so our house was ready.
 With a buffalo spread on the grass, and a blanket for our
 covering our bed was soon made.  A fire crackled merrily before
 the entrance, so near that we could tend it without stepping
 abroad, and when we had supped, we put out the blaze, and closed
 the door, and with the semblance of domestic comfort, sat up to
 read the Gazetteer, to learn our latitude and longitude, and
 write the journal of the voyage, or listened to the wind and the
 rippling of the river till sleep overtook us.  There we lay under
 an oak on the bank of the stream, near to some farmer's
 cornfield, getting sleep, and forgetting where we were; a great
 blessing, that we are obliged to forget our enterprises every
 twelve hours.  Minks, muskrats, meadow-mice, woodchucks,
 squirrels, skunks, rabbits, foxes, and weasels, all inhabit near,
 but keep very close while you are there.  The river sucking and
 eddying away all night down toward the marts and the seaboard, a
 great wash and freshet, and no small enterprise to reflect on.
 Instead of the Scythian vastness of the Billerica night, and its
 wild musical sounds, we were kept awake by the boisterous sport
 of some Irish laborers on the railroad, wafted to us over the
 water, still unwearied and unresting on this seventh day, who
 would not have done with whirling up and down the track with ever
 increasing velocity and still reviving shouts, till late in the
 night.
 
 One sailor was visited in his dreams this night by the Evil
 Destinies, and all those powers that are hostile to human life,
 which constrain and oppress the minds of men, and make their path
 seem difficult and narrow, and beset with dangers, so that the
 most innocent and worthy enterprises appear insolent and a
 tempting of fate, and the gods go not with us.  But the other
 happily passed a serene and even ambrosial or immortal night, and
 his sleep was dreamless, or only the atmosphere of pleasant
 dreams remained, a happy natural sleep until the morning; and his
 cheerful spirit soothed and reassured his brother, for whenever
 they meet, the Good Genius is sure to prevail.
 
 
 
 
 [page]
 
 
                         MONDAY.
 
 
        "I thynke for to touche also
        The worlde whiche neweth everie daie,
        So as I can, so as I maie."
 
                           ^Gower^.
 
 
           "The hye sheryfe of Notynghame,
             Hym holde in your mynd."
                        _Robin Hood Ballads_.
 
 
 [page]
 
 
             "His shoote it was but loosely shott,
               Yet flewe not the arrowe in vaine,
              For it mett one of the sheriffe's men,
               And William a Trent was slaine."
                                      _Robin Hood Ballads_
 
     "Gazed on the heavens for what he missed on Earth."
                                    _Britania's Pastorale_
 
 
 [page]
 
 
 
                        MONDAY.
 
                         --*--
 
 
 When the first light dawned on the earth and the birds, awoke,
 and the brave river was heard rippling confidently seaward, and
 the nimble early rising wind rustled the oak leaves about our
 tent, all men having reinforced their bodies and their souls with
 sleep, and cast aside doubt and fear, were invited to unattempted
 adventures.
 
      "All courageous knichtis
       Agains the day dichtis
       The breest-plate that bricht is,
            To feght with their foue.
       The stoned steed stampis
       Throw curage and crampis,
       Syne on the land lampis;
            The night is neir gone."
 
 One of us took the boat over to the opposite shore, which was
 flat and accessible, a quarter of a mile distant, to empty it of
 water and wash out the clay, while the other kindled a fire and
 got breakfast ready.  At an early hour we were again on our way,
 rowing through the fog as before, the river already awake, and a
 million crisped waves come forth to meet the sun when he should
 show himself.  The countrymen, recruited by their day of rest,
 were already stirring, and had begun to cross the ferry on the
 business of the week.  This ferry was as busy as a beaver dam,
 and all the world seemed anxious to get across the Merrimack
 River at this particular point, waiting to get set over,--children
  with their two cents done up in paper, jail-birds broke loose
 and constable with warrant, travellers from distant lands to
 distant lands, men and women to whom the Merrimack River was a
 bar.  There stands a gig in the gray morning, in the mist, the
 impatient traveller pacing the wet shore with whip in hand, and
 shouting through the fog after the regardless Charon and his
 retreating ark, as if he might throw that passenger overboard and
 return forthwith for himself; he will compensate him.  He is to
 break his fast at some unseen place on the opposite side.  It may
 be Ledyard or the Wandering Jew.  Whence, pray, did he come out
 of the foggy night?  and whither through the sunny day will he
 go?  We observe only his transit; important to us, forgotten by
 him, transiting all day.  There are two of them.  May be, they
 are Virgil and Dante.  But when they crossed the Styx, none were
 seen bound up or down the stream, that I remember.  It is only a
 _transjectus_, a transitory voyage, like life itself, none but
 the long-lived gods bound up or down the stream.  Many of these
 Monday men are ministers, no doubt, reseeking their parishes with
 hired horses, with sermons in their valises all read and gutted,
 the day after never with them.  They cross each other's routes
 all the country over like woof and warp, making a garment of
 loose texture; vacation now for six days.  They stop to pick nuts
 and berries, and gather apples by the wayside at their leisure.
 Good religious men, with the love of men in their hearts, and the
 means to pay their toll in their pockets.  We got over this ferry
 chain without scraping, rowing athwart the tide of travel,--no
 toll for us that day.
 
 The fog dispersed and we rowed leisurely along through
 Tyngsborough, with a clear sky and a mild atmosphere, leaving
 the habitations of men behind and penetrating yet farther into
 the territory of ancient Dunstable.  It was from Dunstable, then
 a frontier town, that the famous Captain Lovewell, with his
 company, marched in quest of the Indians on the 18th of April,
 1725.  He was the son of "an ensign in the army of Oliver
 Cromwell, who came to this country, and settled at Dunstable,
 where he died at the great age of one hundred and twenty years."
 In the words of the old nursery tale, sung about a hundred years
 ago,--
 
      "He and his valiant soldiers did range the woods full wide,
       And hardships they endured to quell the Indian's pride."
 
 In the shaggy pine forest of Pequawket they met the "rebel
 Indians," and prevailed, after a bloody fight, and a remnant
 returned home to enjoy the fame of their victory.  A township
 called Lovewell's Town, but now, for some reason, or perhaps
 without reason, Pembroke, was granted them by the State.
 
      "Of all our valiant English, there were but thirty-four,
       And of the rebel Indians, there were about four-score;
       And sixteen of our English did safely home return,
       The rest were killed and wounded, for which we all must mourn.
 
      "Our worthy Capt.  Lovewell among them there did die,
       They killed Lieut.  Robbins, and wounded good young Frye,
       Who was our English Chaplin; he many Indians slew,
       And some of them he scalped while bullets round him flew."
 
 Our brave forefathers have exterminated all the Indians, and
 their degenerate children no longer dwell in garrisoned houses
 nor hear any war-whoop in their path.  It would be well,
 perchance, if many an "English Chaplin" in these days could
 exhibit as unquestionable trophies of his valor as did "good
 young Frye."  We have need to be as sturdy pioneers still as
 Miles Standish, or Church, or Lovewell.  We are to follow on
 another trail, it is true, but one as convenient for ambushes.
 What if the Indians are exterminated, are not savages as grim
 prowling about the clearings to-day?--
 
      "And braving many dangers and hardships in the way,
      They safe arrived at Dunstable the thirteenth (?) day of May."
 
 But they did not all "safe arrive in Dunstable the thirteenth,"
 or the fifteenth, or the thirtieth "day of May."  Eleazer Davis
 and Josiah Jones, both of Concord, for our native town had seven
 men in this fight, Lieutenant Farwell, of Dunstable, and Jonathan
 Frye, of Andover, who were all wounded, were left behind,
 creeping toward the settlements.  "After travelling several
 miles, Frye was left and lost," though a more recent poet has
 assigned him company in his last hours.
 
      "A man he was of comely form,
        Polished and brave, well learned and kind;
      Old Harvard's learned halls he left
        Far in the wilds a grave to find.
 
      "Ah! now his blood-red arm he lifts;
        His closing lids he tries to raise;
      And speak once more before he dies,
        In supplication and in praise.
 
      "He prays kind Heaven to grant success,
        Brave Lovewell's men to guide and bless,
      And when they've shed their heart-blood true,
        To raise them all to happiness."
            *   *   *   *   *
      "Lieutenant Farwell took his hand,
        His arm around his neck he threw,
      And said, `Brave Chaplain, I could wish
        That Heaven had made me die for you.'"
            *   *   *   *   *
 
 
 Farwell held out eleven days.  "A tradition says," as we learn
 from the History of Concord, "that arriving at a pond with
 Lieut. Farwell, Davis pulled off one of his moccasins, cut it in
 strings, on which he fastened a hook, caught some fish, fried and
 ate them.  They refreshed him, but were injurious to Farwell, who
 died soon after."  Davis had a ball lodged in his body, and his
 right hand shot off; but on the whole, he seems to have been less
 damaged than his companion.  He came into Berwick after being out
 fourteen days.  Jones also had a ball lodged in his body, but he
 likewise got into Saco after fourteen days, though not in the
 best condition imaginable.  "He had subsisted," says an old
 journal, "on the spontaneous vegetables of the forest; and
 cranberries which he had eaten came out of wounds he had received
 in his body."  This was also the case with Davis.  The last two
 reached home at length, safe if not sound, and lived many years
 in a crippled state to enjoy their pension.
 
 But alas! of the crippled Indians, and their adventures in the
 woods,--
 
      "For as we are informed, so thick and fast they fell,
      Scarce twenty of their number at night did get home well,"--
 
 how many balls lodged with them, how fared their cranberries,
 what Berwick or Saco they got into, and finally what pension or
 township was granted them, there is no journal to tell.
 
 It is stated in the History of Dunstable, that just before his
 last march, Lovewell was warned to beware of the ambuscades of
 the enemy, but "he replied, `that he did not care for them,' and
 bending down a small elm beside which he was standing into a bow,
 declared `that he would treat the Indians in the same way.' This
 elm is still standing [in Nashua], a venerable and magnificent
 tree."
 
 
 Meanwhile, having passed the Horseshoe Interval in Tyngsborough,
 where the river makes a sudden bend to the northwest,--for our
 reflections have anticipated our progress somewhat,--we were
 advancing farther into the country and into the day, which last
 proved almost as golden as the preceding, though the slight
 bustle and activity of the Monday seemed to penetrate even to
 this scenery.  Now and then we had to muster all our energy to get
 round a point, where the river broke rippling over rocks, and the
 maples trailed their branches in the stream, but there was
 generally a backwater or eddy on the side, of which we took
 advantage.  The river was here about forty rods wide and fifteen
 feet deep.  Occasionally one ran along the shore, examining the
 country, and visiting the nearest farm-houses, while the other
 followed the windings of the stream alone, to meet his companion
 at some distant point, and hear the report of his adventures; how
 the farmer praised the coolness of his well, and his wife offered
 the stranger a draught of milk, or the children quarrelled for
 the only transparency in the window that they might get sight of
 the man at the well.  For though the country seemed so new, and no
 house was observed by us, shut in between the banks that sunny
 day, we did not have to travel far to find where men inhabited,
 like wild bees, and had sunk wells in the loose sand and loam of
 the Merrimack.  There dwelt the subject of the Hebrew scriptures,
 and the Esprit des Lois, where a thin vaporous smoke curled up
 through the noon.  All that is told of mankind, of the inhabitants
 of the Upper Nile, and the Sunderbunds, and Timbuctoo, and the
 Orinoko, was experience here.  Every race and class of men was
 represented.  According to Belknap, the historian of New Hampshire,
 who wrote sixty years ago, here too, perchance, dwelt "new lights,"
 and free thinking men even then.  "The people in general throughout
 the State," it is written, "are professors of the Christian
 religion in some form or other.  There is, however, a sort of
 _wise men_ who pretend to reject it; but they have not yet been
 able to substitute a better in its place."
 
 The other voyageur, perhaps, would in the mean while have seen
 a brown hawk, or a woodchuck, or a musquash creeping under the
 alders.
 
 We occasionally rested in the shade of a maple or a willow, and
 drew forth a melon for our refreshment, while we contemplated at
 our leisure the lapse of the river and of human life; and as that
 current, with its floating twigs and leaves, so did all things
 pass in review before us, while far away in cities and marts on
 this very stream, the old routine was proceeding still.  There
 is, indeed, a tide in the affairs of men, as the poet says, and
 yet as things flow they circulate, and the ebb always balances
 the flow.  All streams are but tributary to the ocean, which
 itself does not stream, and the shores are unchanged, but in
 longer periods than man can measure.  Go where we will, we
 discover infinite change in particulars only, not in generals.
 When I go into a museum and see the mummies wrapped in their
 linen bandages, I see that the lives of men began to need reform
 as long ago as when they walked the earth.  I come out into the
 streets, and meet men who declare that the time is near at hand
 for the redemption of the race.  But as men lived in Thebes, so
 do they live in Dunstable to-day.  "Time drinketh up the essence
 of every great and noble action which ought to be performed, and
 is delayed in the execution." So says Veeshnoo Sarma; and we
 perceive that the schemers return again and again to common sense
 and labor.  Such is the evidence of history.
 
    "Yet I doubt not through the ages one increasing purpose runs,
    And the thoughts of men are widened with the process of the Suns."
 
 There are secret articles in our treaties with the gods, of more
 importance than all the rest, which the historian can never know.
 
 There are many skilful apprentices, but few master workmen.  On
 every hand we observe a truly wise practice, in education, in
 morals, and in the arts of life, the embodied wisdom of many an
 ancient philosopher.  Who does not see that heresies have some
 time prevailed, that reforms have already taken place?  All this
 worldly wisdom might be regarded as the once unamiable heresy of
 some wise man.  Some interests have got a footing on the earth
 which we have not made sufficient allowance for.  Even they who
 first built these barns and cleared the land thus, had some
 valor.  The abrupt epochs and chasms are smoothed down in history
 as the inequalities of the plain are concealed by distance.  But
 unless we do more than simply learn the trade of our time, we are
 but apprentices, and not yet masters of the art of life.
 
 Now that we are casting away these melon seeds, how can we help
 feeling reproach?  He who eats the fruit, should at least plant
 the seed; aye, if possible, a better seed than that whose fruit
 he has enjoyed.  Seeds!  there are seeds enough which need only
 to be stirred in with the soil where they lie, by an inspired
 voice or pen, to bear fruit of a divine flavor.  O thou
 spendthrift!  Defray thy debt to the world; eat not the seed of
 institutions, as the luxurious do, but plant it rather, while
 thou devourest the pulp and tuber for thy subsistence; that so,
 perchance, one variety may at last be found worthy of
 preservation.
 
 There are moments when all anxiety and stated toil are becalmed
 in the infinite leisure and repose of nature.  All laborers must
 have their nooning, and at this season of the day, we are all,
 more or less, Asiatics, and give over all work and reform.  While
 lying thus on our oars by the side of the stream, in the heat of
 the day, our boat held by an osier put through the staple in its
 prow, and slicing the melons, which are a fruit of the East, our
 thoughts reverted to Arabia, Persia, and Hindostan, the lands of
 contemplation and dwelling-places of the ruminant nations.  In
 the experience of this noontide we could find some apology even
 for the instinct of the opium, betel, and tobacco chewers.  Mount
 Saber, according to the French traveller and naturalist, Botta,
 is celebrated for producing the Kat-tree, of which "the soft tops
 of the twigs and tender leaves are eaten," says his reviewer,
 "and produce an agreeable soothing excitement, restoring from
 fatigue, banishing sleep, and disposing to the enjoyment of
 conversation."  We thought that we might lead a dignified
 Oriental life along this stream as well, and the maple and alders
 would be our Kat-trees.
 
 It is a great pleasure to escape sometimes from the restless
 class of Reformers.  What if these grievances exist?  So do you
 and I.  Think you that sitting hens are troubled with ennui these
 long summer days, sitting on and on in the crevice of a hay-loft,
 without active employment?  By the faint cackling in distant
 barns, I judge that dame Nature is interested still to know how
 many eggs her hens lay.  The Universal Soul, as it is called, has
 an interest in the stacking of hay, the foddering of cattle, and
 the draining of peat-meadows.  Away in Scythia, away in India, it
 makes butter and cheese.  Suppose that all farms _are_ run out,
 and we youths must buy old land and bring it to, still everywhere
 the relentless opponents of reform bear a strange resemblance to
 ourselves; or, perchance, they are a few old maids and bachelors,
 who sit round the kitchen hearth and listen to the singing of the
 kettle.  "The oracles often give victory to our choice, and not
 to the order alone of the mundane periods.  As, for instance,
 when they say that our voluntary sorrows germinate in us as the
 growth of the particular life we lead." The reform which you talk
 about can be undertaken any morning before unbarring our doors.
 We need not call any convention.  When two neighbors begin to eat
 corn bread, who before ate wheat, then the gods smile from ear to
 ear, for it is very pleasant to them.  Why do you not try it?
 Don't let me hinder you.
 
 There are theoretical reformers at all times, and all the world
 over, living on anticipation.  Wolff, travelling in the deserts
 of Bokhara, says, "Another party of derveeshes came to me and
 observed, `The time will come when there shall be no difference
 between rich and poor, between high and low, when property will
 be in common, even wives and children.'" But forever I ask of
 such, What then?  The derveeshes in the deserts of Bokhara and
 the reformers in Marlboro' Chapel sing the same song.  "There's a
 good time coming, boys," but, asked one of the audience, in good
 faith, "Can you fix the date?" Said I, "Will you help it along?"
 
 The nonchalance and _dolce-far-niente_ air of nature and society
 hint at infinite periods in the progress of mankind.  The States
 have leisure to laugh from Maine to Texas at some newspaper joke,
 and New England shakes at the double-entendres of Australian
 circles, while the poor reformer cannot get a hearing.
 
 Men do not fail commonly for want of knowledge, but for want of
 prudence to give wisdom the preference.  What we need to know in
 any case is very simple.  It is but too easy to establish another
 durable and harmonious routine.  Immediately all parts of nature
 consent to it.  Only make something to take the place of something,
 and men will behave as if it was the very thing they wanted.
 They _must_ behave, at any rate, and will work up any material.
 There is always a present and extant life, be it better or worse,
 which all combine to uphold.  We should be slow to mend, my
 friends, as slow to require mending, "Not hurling, according to
 the oracle, a transcendent foot towards piety."  The language of
 excitement is at best picturesque merely.  You must be calm
 before you can utter oracles.  What was the excitement of the
 Delphic priestess compared with the calm wisdom of Socrates?--or
 whoever it was that was wise.--Enthusiasm is a supernatural
 serenity.
 
      "Men find that action is another thing
        Than what they in discoursing papers read;
      The world's affairs require in managing
        More arts than those wherein you clerks proceed."
 
 As in geology, so in social institutions, we may discover the
 causes of all past change in the present invariable order of
 society.  The greatest appreciable physical revolutions are the
 work of the light-footed air, the stealthy-paced water, and the
 subterranean fire.  Aristotle said, "As time never fails, and the
 universe is eternal, neither the Tanais nor the Nile can have
 flowed forever." We are independent of the change we detect.
 The longer the lever the less perceptible its motion.  It is the
 slowest pulsation which is the most vital.  The hero then will
 know how to wait, as well as to make haste.  All good abides with
 him who waiteth _wisely_; we shall sooner overtake the dawn by
 remaining here than by hurrying over the hills of the west.  Be
 assured that every man's success is in proportion to his
 _average_ ability.  The meadow flowers spring and bloom where the
 waters annually deposit their slime, not where they reach in some
 freshet only.  A man is not his hope, nor his despair, nor yet
 his past deed.  We know not yet what we have done, still less
 what we are doing.  Wait till evening, and other parts of our
 day's work will shine than we had thought at noon, and we shall
 discover the real purport of our toil.  As when the farmer has
 reached the end of the furrow and looks back, he can tell best
 where the pressed earth shines most.
 
 
 To one who habitually endeavors to contemplate the true state
 of things, the political state can hardly be said to have any
 existence whatever.  It is unreal, incredible, and insignificant
 to him, and for him to endeavor to extract the truth from such
 lean material is like making sugar from linen rags, when
 sugar-cane may be had.  Generally speaking, the political news,
 whether domestic or foreign, might be written to-day for the next
 ten years, with sufficient accuracy.  Most revolutions in society
 have not power to interest, still less alarm us; but tell me that
 our rivers are drying up, or the genus pine dying out in the
 country, and I might attend.  Most events recorded in history are
 more remarkable than important, like eclipses of the sun and
 moon, by which all are attracted, but whose effects no one takes
 the trouble to calculate.
 
 But will the government never be so well administered, inquired
 one, that we private men shall hear nothing about it?  "The king
 answered: At all events, I require a prudent and able man, who
 is capable of managing the state affairs of my kingdom.  The
 ex-minister said: The criterion, O Sire! of a wise and competent
 man is, that he will not meddle with such like matters."  Alas
 that the ex-minister should have been so nearly right!
 
 In my short experience of human life, the _outward_ obstacles,
 if there were any such, have not been living men, but the
 institutions of the dead.  It is grateful to make one's way
 through this latest generation as through dewy grass.  Men are
 as innocent as the morning to the unsuspicious.
 
      "And round about good morrows fly,
      As if day taught humanity."
 
 Not being Reve of this Shire,
 
      "The early pilgrim blithe he hailed,
      That o'er the hills did stray,
      And many an early husbandman,
      That he met on the way";--
 
 thieves and robbers all, nevertheless.  I have not so surely
 foreseen that any Cossack or Chippeway would come to disturb the
 honest and simple commonwealth, as that some monster institution
 would at length embrace and crush its free members in its scaly
 folds; for it is not to be forgotten, that while the law holds
 fast the thief and murderer, it lets itself go loose.  When I
 have not paid the tax which the State demanded for that
 protection which I did not want, itself has robbed me; when I
 have asserted the liberty it presumed to declare, itself has
 imprisoned me.  Poor creature! if it knows no better I will not
 blame it.  If it cannot live but by these means, I can.  I do not
 wish, it happens, to be associated with Massachusetts, either in
 holding slaves or in conquering Mexico.  I am a little better
 than herself in these respects.--As for Massachusetts, that huge
 she Briareus, Argus and Colchian Dragon conjoined, set to watch
 the Heifer of the Constitution and the Golden Fleece, we would
 not warrant our respect for her, like some compositions, to
 preserve its qualities through all weathers.--Thus it has
 happened, that not the Arch Fiend himself has been in my way, but
 these toils which tradition says were originally spun to obstruct
 him.  They are cobwebs and trifling obstacles in an earnest man's
 path, it is true, and at length one even becomes attached to his
 unswept and undusted garret.  I love man--kind, but I hate the
 institutions of the dead un-kind.  Men execute nothing so
 faithfully as the wills of the dead, to the last codicil and
 letter.  _They_ rule this world, and the living are but their
 executors.  Such foundation too have our lectures and our
 sermons, commonly.  They are all _Dudleian;_ and piety derives
 its origin still from that exploit of _pius Aeneas_, who bore his
 father, Anchises, on his shoulders from the ruins of Troy.  Or
 rather, like some Indian tribes, we bear about with us the
 mouldering relics of our ancestors on our shoulders.  If, for
 instance, a man asserts the value of individual liberty over the
 merely political commonweal, his neighbor still tolerates him,
 that he who is _living near_ him, sometimes even sustains him,
 but never the State.  Its officer, as a living man, may have
 human virtues and a thought in his brain, but as the tool of an
 institution, a jailer or constable it may be, he is not a whit
 superior to his prison key or his staff.  Herein is the tragedy;
 that men doing outrage to their proper natures, even those called
 wise and good, lend themselves to perform the office of inferior
 and brutal ones.  Hence come war and slavery in; and what else
 may not come in by this opening?  But certainly there are modes
 by which a man may put bread into his mouth which will not
 prejudice him as a companion and neighbor.
 
      "Now turn again, turn again, said the pinder,
      For a wrong way you have gone,
      For you have forsaken the king's highway,
      And made a path over the corn."
 
 Undoubtedly, countless reforms are called for, because society is
 not animated, or instinct enough with life, but in the condition
 of some snakes which I have seen in early spring, with alternate
 portions of their bodies torpid and flexible, so that they could
 wriggle neither way.  All men are partially buried in the grave
 of custom, and of some we see only the crown of the head above
 ground.  Better are the physically dead, for they more lively
 rot.  Even virtue is no longer such if it be stagnant.  A man's
 life should be constantly as fresh as this river.  It should be
 the same channel, but a new water every instant.
 
                "Virtues as rivers pass,
      But still remains that virtuous man there was."
 
 Most men have no inclination, no rapids, no cascades, but
 marshes, and alligators, and miasma instead.  We read that when
 in the expedition of Alexander, Onesicritus was sent forward to
 meet certain of the Indian sect of Gymnosophists, and he had told
 them of those new philosophers of the West, Pythagoras, Socrates,
 and Diogenes, and their doctrines, one of them named Dandamis
 answered, that "They appeared to him to have been men of genius,
 but to have lived with too passive a regard for the laws." The
 philosophers of the West are liable to this rebuke still.  "They
 say that Lieou-hia-hoei, and Chao-lien did not sustain to the end
 their resolutions, and that they dishonored their character.
 Their language was in harmony with reason and justice; while
 their acts were in harmony with the sentiments of men."
 
 Chateaubriand said: "There are two things which grow stronger in
 the breast of man, in proportion as he advances in years: the
 love of country and religion.  Let them be never so much
 forgotten in youth, they sooner or later present themselves to us
 arrayed in all their charms, and excite in the recesses of our
 hearts an attachment justly due to their beauty." It may be so.
 But even this infirmity of noble minds marks the gradual decay of
 youthful hope and faith.  It is the allowed infidelity of age.
 There is a saying of the Yoloffs, "He who was born first has the
 greatest number of old clothes," consequently M.  Chateaubriand
 has more old clothes than I have.  It is comparatively a faint
 and reflected beauty that is admired, not an essential and
 intrinsic one.  It is because the old are weak, feel their
 mortality, and think that they have measured the strength of man.
 They will not boast; they will be frank and humble.  Well, let
 them have the few poor comforts they can keep.  Humility is still
 a very human virtue.  They look back on life, and so see not into
 the future.  The prospect of the young is forward and unbounded,
 mingling the future with the present.  In the declining day the
 thoughts make haste to rest in darkness, and hardly look forward
 to the ensuing morning.  The thoughts of the old prepare for
 night and slumber.  The same hopes and prospects are not for him
 who stands upon the rosy mountain-tops of life, and him who
 expects the setting of his earthly day.
 
 I must conclude that Conscience, if that be the name of it, was
 not given us for no purpose, or for a hinderance.  However
 flattering order and expediency may look, it is but the repose of
 a lethargy, and we will choose rather to be awake, though it be
 stormy, and maintain ourselves on this earth and in this life, as
 we may, without signing our death-warrant.  Let us see if we
 cannot stay here, where He has put us, on his own
 conditions.  Does not his law reach as far as his light?  The
 expedients of the nations clash with one another, only the
 absolutely right is expedient for all.
 
 There are some passages in the Antigone of Sophocles, well known
 to scholars, of which I am reminded in this connection.  Antigone
 has resolved to sprinkle sand on the dead body of her brother
 Polynices, notwithstanding the edict of King Creon condemning to
 death that one who should perform this service, which the Greeks
 deemed so important, for the enemy of his country; but Ismene,
 who is of a less resolute and noble spirit, declines taking part
 with her sister in this work, and says,--
 
 "I, therefore, asking those under the earth to consider me, that
 I am compelled to do thus, will obey those who are placed in
 office; for to do extreme things is not wise."
 
                            ANTIGONE
 
 "I would not ask you, nor would you, if you still wished, do it
 joyfully with me.  Be such as seems good to you.  But I will bury
 him.  It is glorious for me doing this to die.  I beloved will
 lie with him beloved, having, like a criminal, done what is holy;
 since the time is longer which it is necessary for me to please
 those below, than those here, for there I shall always lie.  But
 if it seems good to you, hold in dishonor things which are
 honored by the gods."
 
 
                             ISMENE
 
 "I indeed do not hold them in dishonor; but to act in opposition
 to the citizens I am by nature unable."
 
 
 Antigone being at length brought before King Creon, he asks,--
 
 
 "Did you then dare to transgress these laws?"
 
 
                             ANTIGONE
 
 "For it was not Zeus who proclaimed these to me, nor Justice who
 dwells with the gods below; it was not they who established these
 laws among men.  Nor did I think that your proclamations were so
 strong, as, being a mortal, to be able to transcend the unwritten
 and immovable laws of the gods.  For not something now and
 yesterday, but forever these live, and no one knows from what
 time they appeared.  I was not about to pay the penalty of
 violating these to the gods, fearing the presumption of any man.
 For I well knew that I should die, and why not? even if you had
 not proclaimed it."
 
 This was concerning the burial of a dead body.
 
 
 The wisest conservatism is that of the Hindoos.  "Immemorial
 custom is transcendent law," says Menu.  That is, it was the
 custom of the gods before men used it.  The fault of our New
 England custom is that it is memorial.  What is morality but
 immemorial custom?  Conscience is the chief of conservatives.
 "Perform the settled functions," says Kreeshna in the
 Bhagvat-Geeta; "action is preferable to inaction.  The journey of
 thy mortal frame may not succeed from inaction."--"A man's own
 calling with all its faults, ought not to be forsaken.  Every
 undertaking is involved in its faults as the fire in its
 smoke."--"The man who is acquainted with the whole, should not
 drive those from their works who are slow of comprehension, and
 less experienced than himself."--"Wherefore, O Arjoon, resolve to
 fight," is the advice of the God to the irresolute soldier who
 fears to slay his best friends.  It is a sublime conservatism; as
 wide as the world, and as unwearied as time; preserving the
 universe with Asiatic anxiety, in that state in which it appeared
 to their minds.  These philosophers dwell on the inevitability
 and unchangeableness of laws, on the power of temperament and
 constitution, the three goon or qualities, and the circumstances
 of birth and affinity.  The end is an immense consolation;
 eternal absorption in Brahma.  Their speculations never venture
 beyond their own table-lands, though they are high and vast as
 they.  Buoyancy, freedom, flexibility, variety, possibility,
 which also are qualities of the Unnamed, they deal not with.  The
 undeserved reward is to be earned by an everlasting moral
 drudgery; the incalculable promise of the morrow is, as it were,
 weighed.  And who will say that their conservatism has not been
 effectual?  "Assuredly," says a French translator, speaking of
 the antiquity and durability of the Chinese and Indian nations,
 and of the wisdom of their legislators, "there are there some
 vestiges of the eternal laws which govern the world."
 
 Christianity, on the other hand, is humane, practical, and, in a
 large sense, radical.  So many years and ages of the gods those
 Eastern sages sat contemplating Brahm, uttering in silence the
 mystic "Om," being absorbed into the essence of the Supreme
 Being, never going out of themselves, but subsiding farther and
 deeper within; so infinitely wise, yet infinitely stagnant;
 until, at last, in that same Asia, but in the western part of it,
 appeared a youth, wholly unforetold by them,--not being absorbed
 into Brahm, but bringing Brahm down to earth and to mankind; in
 whom Brahm had awaked from his long sleep, and exerted himself,
 and the day began,--a new avatar.  The Brahman had never thought
 to be a brother of mankind as well as a child of God.  Christ is
 the prince of Reformers and Radicals.  Many expressions in the
 New Testament come naturally to the lips of all Protestants, and
 it furnishes the most pregnant and practical texts.  There is no
 harmless dreaming, no wise speculation in it, but everywhere a
 substratum of good sense.  It never _reflects_, but it _repents_.
 There is no poetry in it, we may say nothing regarded in the
 light of beauty merely, but moral truth is its object.  All
 mortals are convicted by its conscience.
 
 The New Testament is remarkable for its pure morality; the best
 of the Hindo Scripture, for its pure intellectuality.  The reader
 is nowhere raised into and sustained in a higher, purer, or _rarer_
 region of thought than in the Bhagvat-Geeta.  Warren Hastings, in
 his sensible letter recommending the translation of this book to
 the Chairman of the East India Company, declares the original to
 be "of a sublimity of conception, reasoning, and diction almost
 unequalled," and that the writings of the Indian philosophers
 "will survive when the British dominion in India shall have long
 ceased to exist, and when the sources which it once yielded of
 wealth and power are lost to remembrance." It is unquestionably
 one of the noblest and most sacred scriptures which have come
 down to us.  Books are to be distinguished by the grandeur of
 their topics, even more than by the manner in which they are
 treated.  The Oriental philosophy approaches, easily, loftier
 themes than the modern aspires to; and no wonder if it sometimes
 prattle about them.  _It_ only assigns their due rank respectively
 to Action and Contemplation, or rather does full justice to the
 latter.  Western philosophers have not conceived of the
 significance of Contemplation in their sense.  Speaking of the
 spiritual discipline to which the Brahmans subjected themselves,
 and the wonderful power of abstraction to which they attained,
 instances of which had come under his notice, Hastings says:--
 
   "To those who have never been accustomed to the separation of
   the mind from the notices of the senses, it may not be easy to
   conceive by what means such a power is to be attained; since
   even the most studious men of our hemisphere will find it
   difficult so to restrain their attention, but that it will
   wander to some object of present sense or recollection; and
   even the buzzing of a fly will sometimes have the power to
   disturb it.  But if we are told that there have been men who
   were successively, for ages past, in the daily habit of
   abstracted contemplation, begun in the earliest period of
   youth, and continued in many to the maturity of age, each
   adding some portion of knowledge to the store accumulated by
   his predecessors; it is not assuming too much to conclude, that
   as the mind ever gathers strength, like the body, by exercise,
   so in such an exercise it may in each have acquired the faculty
   to which they aspired, and that their collective studies may
   have led them to the discovery of new tracts and combinations
   of sentiment, totally different from the doctrines with which
   the learned of other nations are acquainted; doctrines which,
   however speculative and subtle, still as they possess the
   advantage of being derived from a source so free from every
   adventitious mixture, may be equally founded in truth with the
   most simple of our own."
 
 "The forsaking of works" was taught by Kreeshna to the most
 ancient of men, and handed down from age to age,
 
   "until at length, in the course of time, the mighty art was lost.
 
   "In wisdom is to be found every work without exception," says
   Kreeshna.
 
   "Although thou wert the greatest of all offenders, thou shalt
   be able to cross the gulf of sin with the bark of wisdom."
 
   "There is not anything in this world to be compared with wisdom
   for purity."
 
   "The action stands at a distance inferior to the application of
   wisdom."
 
   The wisdom of a Moonee "is confirmed, when, like the tortoise,
   he can draw in all his members, and restrain them from their
   wonted purposes."
 
   "Children only, and not the learned, speak of the speculative
   and the practical doctrines as two.  They are but one.  For
   both obtain the selfsame end, and the place which is gained by
   the followers of the one is gained by the followers of the
   other."
 
   "The man enjoyeth not freedom from action, from the
   non-commencement of that which he hath to do; nor doth he
   obtain happiness from a total inactivity.  No one ever resteth
   a moment inactive.  Every man is involuntarily urged to act by
   those principles which are inherent in his nature.  The man who
   restraineth his active faculties, and sitteth down with his
   mind attentive to the objects of his senses, is called one of
   an astrayed soul, and the practiser of deceit.  So the man is
   praised, who, having subdued all his passions, performeth with
   his active faculties all the functions of life, unconcerned
   about the event."
 
   "Let the motive be in the deed and not in the event.  Be not
   one whose motive for action is the hope of reward.  Let not thy
   life be spent in inaction."
 
   "For the man who doeth that which he hath to do, without
   affection, obtaineth the Supreme."
 
   "He who may behold, as it were inaction in action, and action
   in inaction, is wise amongst mankind.  He is a perfect
   performer of all duty."
 
   "Wise men call him a _Pandeet_, whose every undertaking is free
   from the idea of desire, and whose actions are consumed by the
   fire of wisdom.  He abandoneth the desire of a reward of his
   actions; he is always contented and independent; and although
   he may be engaged in a work, he, as it were, doeth nothing."
 
   "He is both a Yogee and a Sannyasee who performeth that which
   he hath to do independent of the fruit thereof; not he who
   liveth without the sacrificial fire and without action."
 
   "He who enjoyeth but the Amreeta which is left of his
   offerings, obtaineth the eternal spirit of Brahm, the Supreme."
 
 
 What, after all, does the practicalness of life amount to?  The
 things immediate to be done are very trivial.  I could postpone
 them all to hear this locust sing.  The most glorious fact in my
 experience is not anything that I have done or may hope to do,
 but a transient thought, or vision, or dream, which I have had.
 I would give all the wealth of the world, and all the deeds of
 all the heroes, for one true vision.  But how can I communicate
 with the gods who am a pencil-maker on the earth, and not be
 insane?
 
   "I am the same to all mankind," says Kreeshna; "there is not
   one who is worthy of my love or hatred."
 
 This teaching is not practical in the sense in which the New
 Testament is.  It is not always sound sense inpractice.  The
 Brahman never proposes courageously to assault evil, but
 patiently to starve it out.  His active faculties are paralyzed
 by the idea of cast, of impassable limits, of destiny and the
 tyranny of time.  Kreeshna's argument, it must be allowed, is
 defective.  No sufficient reason is given why Arjoon should
 fight.  Arjoon may be convinced, but the reader is not, for his
 judgment is _not_ "formed upon the speculative doctrines of the
 _Sankhya Sastra_."  "Seek an asylum in wisdom alone"; but what is
 wisdom to a Western mind?  The duty of which he speaks is an
 arbitrary one.  When was it established?  The Brahman's virtue
 consists in doing, not right, but arbitrary things.  What is that
 which a man "hath to do"?  What is "action"?  What are the
 "settled functions"?  What is "a man's own religion," which is so
 much better than another's?  What is "a man's own particular
 calling"?  What are the duties which are appointed by one's
 birth?  It is a defence of the institution of casts, of what is
 called the "natural duty" of the Kshetree, or soldier, "to attach
 himself to the discipline," "not to flee from the field," and the
 like.  But they who are unconcerned about the consequences of
 their actions are not therefore unconcerned about their actions.
 
 Behold the difference between the Oriental and the Occidental.
 The former has nothing to do in this world; the latter is full of
 activity.  The one looks in the sun till his eyes are put out;
 the other follows him prone in his westward course.  There is
 such a thing as caste, even in the West; but it is comparatively
 faint; it is conservatism here.  It says, forsake not your
 calling, outrage no institution, use no violence, rend no bonds;
 the State is thy parent.  Its virtue or manhood is wholly filial.
 There is a struggle between the Oriental and Occidental in every
 nation; some who would be forever contemplating the sun, and some
 who are hastening toward the sunset.  The former class says to
 the latter, When you have reached the sunset, you will be no
 nearer to the sun.  To which the latter replies, But we so
 prolong the day.  The former "walketh but in that night, when all
 things go to rest the night of _time_.  The contemplative Moonee
 sleepeth but in the day of _time_, when all things wake."
 
 To conclude these extracts, I can say, in the words of Sanjay,
 "As, O mighty Prince!  I recollect again and again this holy and
 wonderful dialogue of Kreeshna and Arjoon, I continue more and
 more to rejoice; and as I recall to my memory the more than
 miraculous form of Haree, my astonishment is great, and I marvel
 and rejoice again and again!  Wherever Kreeshna the God of
 devotion may be, wherever Arjoon the mighty bowman may be, there
 too, without doubt, are fortune, riches, victory, and good
 conduct.  This is my firm belief."
 
 I would say to the readers of Scriptures, if they wish for a good
 book, read the Bhagvat-Geeta, an episode to the Mahabharat, said
 to have been written by Kreeshna Dwypayen Veias,--known to have
 been written by----, more than four thousand years ago,--it
 matters not whether three or four, or when,--translated by
 Charles Wilkins.  It deserves to be read with reverence even by
 Yankees, as a part of the sacred writings of a devout people; and
 the intelligent Hebrew will rejoice to find in it a moral
 grandeur and sublimity akin to those of his own Scriptures.
 
 To an American reader, who, by the advantage of his position, can
 see over that strip of Atlantic coast to Asia and the Pacific,
 who, as it were, sees the shore slope upward over the Alps to the
 Himmaleh Mountains, the comparatively recent literature of Europe
 often appears partial and clannish, and, notwithstanding the
 limited range of his own sympathies and studies, the European
 writer who presumes that he is speaking for the world, is
 perceived by him to speak only for that corner of it which he
 inhabits.  One of the rarest of England's scholars and critics,
 in his classification of the worthies of the world, betrays the
 narrowness of his European culture and the exclusiveness of his
 reading.  None of her children has done justice to the poets and
 philosophers of Persia or of India.  They have even been better
 known to her merchant scholars than to her poets and thinkers by
 profession.  You may look in vain through English poetry for a
 single memorable verse inspired by these themes.  Nor is Germany
 to be excepted, though her philological industry is indirectly
 serving the cause of philosophy and poetry.  Even Goethe wanted
 that universality of genius which could have appreciated the
 philosophy of India, if he had more nearly approached it.  His
 genius was more practical, dwelling much more in the regions of
 the understanding, and was less native to contemplation than the
 genius of those sages.  It is remarkable that Homer and a few
 Hebrews are the most Oriental names which modern Europe, whose
 literature has taken its rise since the decline of the Persian,
 has admitted into her list of Worthies, and perhaps the _worthiest_
 of mankind, and the fathers of modern thinking,--for the
 contemplations of those Indian sages have influenced, and still
 influence, the intellectual development of mankind,--whose works
 even yet survive in wonderful completeness, are, for the most
 part, not recognized as ever having existed.  If the lions had
 been the painters it would have been otherwise.  In every one's
 youthful dreams philosophy is still vaguely but inseparably, and
 with singular truth, associated with the East, nor do after years
 discover its local habitation in the Western world.  In comparison
 with the philosophers of the East, we may say that modern Europe
 has yet given birth to none.  Beside the vast and cosmogonal
 philosophy of the Bhagvat-Geeta, even our Shakespeare seems
 sometimes youthfully green and practical merely.  Some of these
 sublime sentences, as the Chaldaean oracles of Zoroaster, still
 surviving after a thousand revolutions and translations, alone
 make us doubt if the poetic form and dress are not transitory,
 and not essential to the most effective and enduring expression
 of thought.  _Ex oriente lux_ may still be the motto of scholars,
 for the Western world has not yet derived from the East all the
 light which it is destined to receive thence.
 
 It would be worthy of the age to print together the collected
 Scriptures or Sacred Writings of the several nations, the
 Chinese, the Hindoos, the Persians, the Hebrews, and others, as
 the Scripture of mankind.  The New Testament is still, perhaps,
 too much on the lips and in the hearts of men to be called a
 Scripture in this sense.  Such a juxtaposition and comparison
 might help to liberalize the faith of men.  This is a work which
 Time will surely edit, reserved to crown the labors of the
 printing-press.  This would be the Bible, or Book of Books, which
 let the missionaries carry to the uttermost parts of the earth.
 
 
 While engaged in these reflections, thinking ourselves the only
 navigators of these waters, suddenly a canal-boat, with its sail
 set, glided round a point before us, like some huge river beast,
 and changed the scene in an instant; and then another and another
 glided into sight, and we found ourselves in the current of
 commerce once more.  So we threw our rinds in the water for the
 fishes to nibble, and added our breath to the life of living men.
 Little did we think, in the distant garden in which we had
 planted the seed and reared this fruit, where it would be eaten.
 Our melons lay at home on the sandy bottom of the Merrimack, and
 our potatoes in the sun and water at the bottom of the boat
 looked like a fruit of the country.  Soon, however, we were
 delivered from this fleet of junks, and possessed the river in
 solitude, once more rowing steadily upward through the noon,
 between the territories of Nashua on the one hand, and Hudson,
 once Nottingham, on the other.  From time to time we scared up a
 kingfisher or a summer duck, the former flying rather by vigorous
 impulses than by steady and patient steering with that short
 rudder of his, sounding his rattle along the fluvial street.
 
 Erelong another scow hove in sight, creeping down the river; and
 hailing it, we attached ourselves to its side, and floated back
 in company, chatting with the boatmen, and obtaining a draught of
 cooler water from their jug.  They appeared to be green hands
 from far among the hills, who had taken this means to get to the
 seaboard, and see the world; and would possibly visit the
 Falkland Isles, and the China seas, before they again saw the
 waters of the Merrimack, or, perchance, they would not return
 this way forever.  They had already embarked the private
 interests of the landsman in the larger venture of the race, and
 were ready to mess with mankind, reserving only the till of a
 chest to themselves.  But they too were soon lost behind a point,
 and we went croaking on our way alone.  What grievance has its
 root among the New Hampshire hills? we asked; what is wanting to
 human life here, that these men should make such haste to the
 antipodes?  We prayed that their bright anticipations might not
 be rudely disappointed.
 
      Though all the fates should prove unkind,
      Leave not your native land behind.
      The ship, becalmed, at length stands still;
      The steed must rest beneath the hill;
      But swiftly still our fortunes pace
      To find us out in every place.
 
      The vessel, though her masts be firm,
      Beneath her copper bears a worm;
      Around the cape, across the line,
      Till fields of ice her course confine;
      It matters not how smooth the breeze,
      How shallow or how deep the seas,
      Whether she bears Manilla twine,
      Or in her hold Madeira wine,
      Or China teas, or Spanish hides,
      In port or quarantine she rides;
      Far from New England's blustering shore,
      New England's worm her hulk shall bore,
      And sink her in the Indian seas,
      Twine, wine, and hides, and China teas.
 
 We passed a small desert here on the east bank, between
 Tyngsborough and Hudson, which was interesting and even
 refreshing to our eyes in the midst of the almost universal
 greenness.  This sand was indeed somewhat impressive and
 beautiful to us.  A very old inhabitant, who was at work in a
 field on the Nashua side, told us that he remembered when corn
 and grain grew there, and it was a cultivated field.  But at
 length the fishermen, for this was a fishing place, pulled up the
 bushes on the shore, for greater convenience in hauling their
 seines, and when the bank was thus broken, the wind began to blow
 up the sand from the shore, until at length it had covered about
 fifteen acres several feet deep.  We saw near the river, where
 the sand was blown off down to some ancient surface, the
 foundation of an Indian wigwam exposed, a perfect circle of burnt
 stones, four or five feet in diameter, mingled with fine
 charcoal, and the bones of small animals which had been preserved
 in the sand.  The surrounding sand was sprinkled with other burnt
 stones on which their fires had been built, as well as with
 flakes of arrow-head stone, and we found one perfect arrow-head.
 In one place we noticed where an Indian had sat to manufacture
 arrow-heads out of quartz, and the sand was sprinkled with a
 quart of small glass-like chips about as big as a fourpence,
 which he had broken off in his work.  Here, then, the Indians
 must have fished before the whites arrived.  There was another
 similar sandy tract about half a mile above this.
 
 
 Still the noon prevailed, and we turned the prow aside to bathe,
 and recline ourselves under some buttonwoods, by a ledge of
 rocks, in a retired pasture sloping to the water's edge, and
 skirted with pines and hazels, in the town of Hudson.  Still had
 India, and that old noontide philosophy, the better part of our
 thoughts.
 
 It is always singular, but encouraging, to meet with common sense
 in very old books, as the Heetopades of Veeshnoo Sarma; a playful
 wisdom which has eyes behind as well as before, and oversees
 itself.  It asserts their health and independence of the
 experience of later times.  This pledge of sanity cannot be
 spared in a book, that it sometimes pleasantly reflect upon
 itself.  The story and fabulous portion of this book winds
 loosely from sentence to sentence as so many oases in a desert,
 and is as indistinct as a camel's track between Mourzouk and
 Darfour.  It is a comment on the flow and freshet of modern
 books.  The reader leaps from sentence to sentence, as from one
 stepping-stone to another, while the stream of the story rushes
 past unregarded.  The Bhagvat-Geeta is less sententious and
 poetic, perhaps, but still more wonderfully sustained and
 developed.  Its sanity and sublimity have impressed the minds
 even of soldiers and merchants.  It is the characteristic of
 great poems that they will yield of their sense in due proportion
 to the hasty and the deliberate reader.  To the practical they
 will be common sense, and to the wise wisdom; as either the
 traveller may wet his lips, or an army may fill its water-casks
 at a full stream.
 
 One of the most attractive of those ancient books that I have met
 with is the Laws of Menu.  According to Sir William Jones,
 "Vyasa, the son of Parasara, has decided that the Veda, with its
 Angas, or the six compositions deduced from it, the revealed
 system of medicine, the Puranas or sacred histories, and the code
 of Menu, were four works of supreme authority, which ought never
 to be shaken by arguments merely human." The last is believed by
 the Hindoos "to have been promulged in the beginning of time, by
 Menu, son or grandson of Brahma," and "first of created beings";
 and Brahma is said to have "taught his laws to Menu in a hundred
 thousand verses, which Menu explained to the primitive world in
 the very words of the book now translated." Others affirm that
 they have undergone successive abridgments for the convenience of
 mortals, "while the gods of the lower heaven and the band of
 celestial musicians are engaged in studying the primary
 code."--"A number of glosses or comments on Menu were composed by
 the Munis, or old philosophers, whose treatises, together with
 that before us, constitute the Dherma Sastra, in a collective
 sense, or Body of Law." Culluca Bhatta was one of the more modern
 of these.
 
 Every sacred book, successively, has been accepted in the faith
 that it was to be the final resting-place of the sojourning soul;
 but after all, it was but a caravansary which supplied refreshment
 to the traveller, and directed him farther on his way to Isphahan
 or Bagdat.  Thank God, no Hindoo tyranny prevailed at the framing
 of the world, but we are freemen of the universe, and not
 sentenced to any caste.
 
 I know of no book which has come down to us with grander
 pretensions than this, and it is so impersonal and sincere that
 it is never offensive nor ridiculous.  Compare the modes in which
 modern literature is advertised with the prospectus of this book,
 and think what a reading public it addresses, what criticism it
 expects.  It seems to have been uttered from some eastern summit,
 with a sober morning prescience in the dawn of time, and you
 cannot read a sentence without being elevated as upon the
 table-land of the Ghauts.  It has such a rhythm as the winds of
 the desert, such a tide as the Ganges, and is as superior to
 criticism as the Himmaleh Mountains.  Its tone is of such
 unrelaxed fibre, that even at this late day, unworn by time, it
 wears the English and the Sanscrit dress indifferently; and its
 fixed sentences keep up their distant fires still, like the
 stars, by whose dissipated rays this lower world is illumined.
 The whole book by noble gestures and inclinations renders many
 words unnecessary.  English sense has toiled, but Hindoo wisdom
 never perspired.  Though the sentences open as we read them,
 unexpensively, and at first almost unmeaningly, as the petals of
 a flower, they sometimes startle us with that rare kind of wisdom
 which could only have been learned from the most trivial
 experience; but it comes to us as refined as the porcelain earth
 which subsides to the bottom of the ocean.  They are clean and
 dry as fossil truths, which have been exposed to the elements for
 thousands of years, so impersonally and scientifically true that
 they are the ornament of the parlor and the cabinet.  Any _moral_
 philosophy is exceedingly rare.  This of Menu addresses our
 privacy more than most.  It is a more private and familiar, and,
 at the same time, a more public and universal word, than is
 spoken in parlor or pulpit now-a-days.  As our domestic fowls are
 said to have their original in the wild pheasant of India, so our
 domestic thoughts have their prototypes in the thoughts of her
 philosophers.  We are dabbling in the very elements of our
 present conventional and actual life; as if it were the primeval
 conventicle where how to eat, and to drink, and to sleep, and
 maintain life with adequate dignity and sincerity, were the
 questions to be decided.  It is later and more intimate with us
 even than the advice of our nearest friends.  And yet it is true
 for the widest horizon, and read out of doors has relation to the
 dim mountain line, and is native and aboriginal there.  Most
 books belong to the house and street only, and in the fields
 their leaves feel very thin.  They are bare and obvious, and have
 no halo nor haze about them.  Nature lies far and fair behind
 them all.  But this, as it proceeds from, so it addresses, what
 is deepest and most abiding in man.  It belongs to the noontide
 of the day, the midsummer of the year, and after the snows have
 melted, and the waters evaporated in the spring, still its truth
 speaks freshly to our experience.  It helps the sun to shine, and
 his rays fall on its page to illustrate it.  It spends the
 mornings and the evenings, and makes such an impression on us
 overnight as to awaken us before dawn, and its influence lingers
 around us like a fragrance late into the day.  It conveys a new
 gloss to the meadows and the depths of the wood, and its spirit,
 like a more subtile ether, sweeps along with the prevailing winds
 of a country.  The very locusts and crickets of a summer day are
 but later or earlier glosses on the Dherma Sastra of the Hindoos,
 a continuation of the sacred code.  As we have said, there is an
 orientalism in the most restless pioneer, and the farthest west
 is but the farthest east.  While we are reading these sentences,
 this fair modern world seems only a reprint of the Laws of Menu
 with the gloss of Culluca.  Tried by a New England eye, or the
 mere practical wisdom of modern times, they are the oracles of a
 race already in its dotage, but held up to the sky, which is the
 only impartial and incorruptible ordeal, they are of a piece with
 its depth and serenity, and I am assured that they will have a
 place and significance as long as there is a sky to test them by.
 
 Give me a sentence which no intelligence can understand.  There
 must be a kind of life and palpitation to it, and under its words
 a kind of blood must circulate forever.  It is wonderful that
 this sound should have come down to us from so far, when the
 voice of man can be heard so little way, and we are not now
 within ear-shot of any contemporary.  The woodcutters have here
 felled an ancient pine forest, and brought to light to these
 distant hills a fair lake in the southwest; and now in an instant
 it is distinctly shown to these woods as if its image had
 travelled hither from eternity.  Perhaps these old stumps upon
 the knoll remember when anciently this lake gleamed in the
 horizon.  One wonders if the bare earth itself did not experience
 emotion at beholding again so fair a prospect.  That fair water
 lies there in the sun thus revealed, so much the prouder and
 fairer because its beauty needed not to be seen.  It seems yet
 lonely, sufficient to itself, and superior to observation.--So
 are these old sentences like serene lakes in the southwest, at
 length revealed to us, which have so long been reflecting our own
 sky in their bosom.
 
 The great plain of India lies as in a cup between the Himmaleh and
 the ocean on the north and south, and the Brahmapootra and Indus,
 on the east and west, wherein the primeval race was received.
 We will not dispute the story.  We are pleased to read in the
 natural history of the country, of the "pine, larch, spruce, and
 silver fir," which cover the southern face of the Himmaleh range;
 of the "gooseberry, raspberry, strawberry," which from an
 imminent temperate zone overlook the torrid plains.  So did this
 active modern life have even then a foothold and lurking-place in
 the midst of the stateliness and contemplativeness of those
 Eastern plains.  In another era the "lily of the valley, cowslip,
 dandelion," were to work their way down into the plain, and bloom
 in a level zone of their own reaching round the earth.  Already
 has the era of the temperate zone arrived, the era of the pine
 and the oak, for the palm and the banian do not supply the wants
 of this age.  The lichens on the summits of the rocks will
 perchance find their level erelong.
 
 As for the tenets of the Brahmans, we are not so much concerned
 to know what doctrines they held, as that they were held by any.
 We can tolerate all philosophies, Atomists, Pneumatologists,
 Atheists, Theists,--Plato, Aristotle, Leucippus, Democritus,
 Pythagoras, Zoroaster, and Confucius.  It is the attitude of
 these men, more than any communication which they make, that
 attracts us.  Between them and their commentators, it is true,
 there is an endless dispute.  But if it comes to this, that you
 compare notes, then you are all wrong.  As it is, each takes us
 up into the serene heavens, whither the smallest bubble rises as
 surely as the largest, and paints earth and sky for us.  Any
 sincere thought is irresistible.  The very austerity of the
 Brahmans is tempting to the devotional soul, as a more refined
 and nobler luxury.  Wants so easily and gracefully satisfied seem
 like a more refined pleasure.  Their conception of creation is
 peaceful as a dream.  "When that power awakes, then has this
 world its full expansion; but when he slumbers with a tranquil
 spirit, then the whole system fades away."  In the very
 indistinctness of their theogony a sublime truth is implied.  It
 hardly allows the reader to rest in any supreme first cause, but
 directly it hints at a supremer still which created the last, and
 the Creator is still behind increate.
 
 Nor will we disturb the antiquity of this Scripture; "From fire,
 from air, and from the sun," it was "milked out." One might as
 well investigate the chronology of light and heat.  Let the sun
 shine.  Menu understood this matter best, when he said, "Those
 best know the divisions of days and nights who understand that
 the day of Brahma, which endures to the end of a thousand such
 ages, [infinite ages, nevertheless, according to mortal
 reckoning,] gives rise to virtuous exertions; and that his night
 endures as long as his day." Indeed, the Mussulman and Tartar
 dynasties are beyond all dating.  Methinks I have lived under
 them myself.  In every man's brain is the Sanscrit.  The Vedas
 and their Angas are not so ancient as serene contemplation.  Why
 will we be imposed on by antiquity?  Is the babe young?  When I
 behold it, it seems more venerable than the oldest man; it is
 more ancient than Nestor or the Sibyls, and bears the wrinkles of
 father Saturn himself.  And do we live but in the present?  How
 broad a line is that?  I sit now on a stump whose rings number
 centuries of growth.  If I look around I see that the soil is
 composed of the remains of just such stumps, ancestors to this.
 The earth is covered with mould.  I thrust this stick many aeons
 deep into its surface, and with my heel make a deeper furrow than
 the elements have ploughed here for a thousand years.  If I
 listen, I hear the peep of frogs which is older than the slime of
 Egypt, and the distant drumming of a partridge on a log, as if it
 were the pulse-beat of the summer air.  I raise my fairest and
 freshest flowers in the old mould.  Why, what we would fain call
 new is not skin deep; the earth is not yet stained by it.  It is
 not the fertile ground which we walk on, but the leaves which
 flutter over our heads.  The newest is but the oldest made
 visible to our senses.  When we dig up the soil from a thousand
 feet below the surface, we call it new, and the plants which
 spring from it; and when our vision pierces deeper into space,
 and detects a remoter star, we call that new also.  The place
 where we sit is called Hudson,--once it was Nottingham,--once --
 
 
 We should read history as little critically as we consider the
 landscape, and be more interested by the atmospheric tints and
 various lights and shades which the intervening spaces create,
 than by its groundwork and composition.  It is the morning now
 turned evening and seen in the west,--the same sun, but a new
 light and atmosphere.  Its beauty is like the sunset; not a
 fresco painting on a wall, flat and bounded, but atmospheric and
 roving or free.  In reality, history fluctuates as the face of
 the landscape from morning to evening.  What is of moment is its
 hue and color.  Time hides no treasures; we want not its _then_,
 but its _now_.  We do not complain that the mountains in the
 horizon are blue and indistinct; they are the more like the
 heavens.
 
 Of what moment are facts that can be lost,--which need to be
 commemorated?  The monument of death will outlast the memory of
 the dead.  The pyramids do not tell the tale which was confided
 to them; the living fact commemorates itself.  Why look in the
 dark for light?  Strictly speaking, the historical societies have
 not recovered one fact from oblivion, but are themselves, instead
 of the fact, that is lost.  The researcher is more memorable than
 the researched.  The crowd stood admiring the mist and the dim
 outlines of the trees seen through it, when one of their number
 advanced to explore the phenomenon, and with fresh admiration all
 eyes were turned on his dimly retreating figure.  It is astonishing
 with how little co-operation of the societies the past is remembered.
 Its story has indeed had another muse than has been assigned it.
 There is a good instance of the manner in which all history
 began, in Alwakidis' Arabian Chronicle: "I was informed by _Ahmed
 Almatin Aljorhami_, who had it from _Rephaa Ebn Kais Alamiri_,
 who had it from _Saiph Ebn Fabalah Alchatquarmi_, who had it from
 _Thabet Ebn Alkamah_, who said he was present at the action."
 These fathers of history were not anxious to preserve, but to
 learn the fact; and hence it was not forgotten.  Critical acumen
 is exerted in vain to uncover the past; the _past_ cannot be
 _presented_; we cannot know what we are not.  But one veil hangs
 over past, present, and future, and it is the province of the
 historian to find out, not what was, but what is.  Where a battle
 has been fought, you will find nothing but the bones of men and
 beasts; where a battle is being fought, there are hearts beating.
 We will sit on a mound and muse, and not try to make these
 skeletons stand on their legs again.  Does Nature remember, think
 you, that they _were_ men, or not rather that they _are_ bones?
 
 Ancient history has an air of antiquity.  It should be more
 modern.  It is written as if the spectator should be thinking of
 the backside of the picture on the wall, or as if the author
 expected that the dead would be his readers, and wished to detail
 to them their own experience.  Men seem anxious to accomplish an
 orderly retreat through the centuries, earnestly rebuilding the
 works behind, as they are battered down by the encroachments of
 time; but while they loiter, they and their works both fall a
 prey to the arch enemy.  History has neither the venerableness of
 antiquity, nor the freshness of the modern.  It does as if it
 would go to the beginning of things, which natural history might
 with reason assume to do; but consider the Universal History, and
 then tell us,--when did burdock and plantain sprout first?  It
 has been so written for the most part, that the times it
 describes are with remarkable propriety called _dark ages_.  They
 are dark, as one has observed, because we are so in the dark
 about them.  The sun rarely shines in history, what with the dust
 and confusion; and when we meet with any cheering fact which
 implies the presence of this luminary, we excerpt and modernize
 it.  As when we read in the history of the Saxons that Edwin of
 Northumbria "caused stakes to be fixed in the highways where he
 had seen a clear spring," and "brazen dishes were chained to them
 to refresh the weary sojourner, whose fatigues Edwin had himself
 experienced."  This is worth all Arthur's twelve battles.
 
    "Through the shadow of the world we sweep into the younger day:
     Better fifty years of Europe than a cycle of Cathay."
     Than fifty years of Europe better one New England ray!
 
 Biography, too, is liable to the same objection; it should be
 autobiography.  Let us not, as the Germans advise, endeavor to go
 abroad and vex our bowels that we may be somebody else to explain
 him.  If I am not I, who will be?
 
 But it is fit that the Past should be dark; though the darkness
 is not so much a quality of the past as of tradition.  It is not
 a distance of time, but a distance of relation, which makes thus
 dusky its memorials.  What is near to the heart of this
 generation is fair and bright still.  Greece lies outspread fair
 and sunshiny in floods of light, for there is the sun and
 daylight in her literature and art.  Homer does not allow us to
 forget that the sun shone,--nor Phidias, nor the Parthenon.  Yet
 no era has been wholly dark, nor will we too hastily submit to
 the historian, and congratulate ourselves on a blaze of light.
 If we could pierce the obscurity of those remote years, we should
 find it light enough; only _there_ is not our day.  Some
 creatures are made to see in the dark.  There has always been the
 same amount of light in the world.  The new and missing stars,
 the comets and eclipses, do not affect the general illumination,
 for only our glasses appreciate them.  The eyes of the oldest
 fossil remains, they tell us, indicate that the same laws of
 light prevailed then as now.  Always the laws of light are the
 same, but the modes and degrees of seeing vary.  The gods are
 partial to no era, but steadily shines their light in the
 heavens, while the eye of the beholder is turned to stone.  There
 was but the sun and the eye from the first.  The ages have not
 added a new ray to the one, nor altered a fibre of the other.
 
 If we will admit time into our thoughts at all, the mythologies,
 those vestiges of ancient poems, wrecks of poems, so to speak,
 the world's inheritance, still reflecting some of their original
 splendor, like the fragments of clouds tinted by the rays of the
 departed sun; reaching into the latest summer day, and allying
 this hour to the morning of creation; as the poet sings:--
 
      "Fragments of the lofty strain
        Float down the tide of years,
      As buoyant on the stormy main
        A parted wreck appears."
 
 These are the materials and hints for a history of the rise and
 progress of the race; how, from the condition of ants, it arrived
 at the condition of men, and arts were gradually invented.  Let a
 thousand surmises shed some light on this story.  We will not be
 confined by historical, even geological periods which would allow
 us to doubt of a progress in human affairs.  If we rise above
 this wisdom for the day, we shall expect that this morning of the
 race, in which it has been supplied with the simplest necessaries,
 with corn, and wine, and honey, and oil, and fire, and articulate
 speech, and agricultural and other arts, reared up by degrees
 from the condition of ants to men, will be succeeded by a day of
 equally progressive splendor; that, in the lapse of the divine
 periods, other divine agents and godlike men will assist to
 elevate the race as much above its present condition.
 
 But we do not know much about it.
 
 
 Thus did one voyageur waking dream, while his companion slumbered
 on the bank.  Suddenly a boatman's horn was heard echoing from
 shore to shore, to give notice of his approach to the farmer's
 wife with whom he was to take his dinner, though in that place
 only muskrats and kingfishers seemed to hear.  The current of our
 reflections and our slumbers being thus disturbed, we weighed
 anchor once more.
 
 As we proceeded on our way in the afternoon, the western bank
 became lower, or receded farther from the channel in some places,
 leaving a few trees only to fringe the water's edge; while the
 eastern rose abruptly here and there into wooded hills fifty or
 sixty feet high.  The bass, _Tilia Americana_, also called the
 lime or linden, which was a new tree to us, overhung the water
 with its broad and rounded leaf, interspersed with clusters of
 small hard berries now nearly ripe, and made an agreeable shade
 for us sailors.  The inner bark of this genus is the bast, the
 material of the fisherman's matting, and the ropes and peasant's
 shoes of which the Russians make so much use, and also of nets
 and a coarse cloth in some places.  According to poets, this was
 once Philyra, one of the Oceanides.  The ancients are said to
 have used its bark for the roofs of cottages, for baskets, and
 for a kind of paper called Philyra.  They also made bucklers of
 its wood, "on account of its flexibility, lightness, and
 resiliency."  It was once much used for carving, and is still in
 demand for sounding-boards of piano-fortes and panels of
 carriages, and for various uses for which toughness and
 flexibility are required.  Baskets and cradles are made of the
 twigs.  Its sap affords sugar, and the honey made from its
 flowers is said to be preferred to any other.  Its leaves are in
 some countries given to cattle, a kind of chocolate has been made
 of its fruit, a medicine has been prepared from an infusion of
 its flowers, and finally, the charcoal made of its wood is
 greatly valued for gunpowder.
 
 The sight of this tree reminded us that we had reached a strange
 land to us.  As we sailed under this canopy of leaves we saw the
 sky through its chinks, and, as it were, the meaning and idea of
 the tree stamped in a thousand hieroglyphics on the heavens.  The
 universe is so aptly fitted to our organization that the eye
 wanders and reposes at the same time.  On every side there is
 something to soothe and refresh this sense.  Look up at the
 tree-tops and see how finely Nature finishes off her work there.
 See how the pines spire without end higher and higher, and make a
 graceful fringe to the earth.  And who shall count the finer
 cobwebs that soar and float away from their utmost tops, and the
 myriad insects that dodge between them.  Leaves are of more
 various forms than the alphabets of all languages put together;
 of the oaks alone there are hardly two alike, and each expresses
 its own character.
 
 In all her products Nature only develops her simplest germs.  One
 would say that it was no great stretch of invention to create
 birds.  The hawk, which now takes his flight over the top of the
 wood, was at first, perchance, only a leaf which fluttered in its
 aisles.  From rustling leaves she came in the course of ages to
 the loftier flight and clear carol of the bird.
 
 Salmon Brook comes in from the west under the railroad, a mile
 and a half below the village of Nashua.  We rowed up far enough
 into the meadows which border it to learn its piscatorial history
 from a haymaker on its banks.  He told us that the silver eel was
 formerly abundant here, and pointed to some sunken creels at its
 mouth.  This man's memory and imagination were fertile in
 fishermen's tales of floating isles in bottomless ponds, and of
 lakes mysteriously stocked with fishes, and would have kept us
 till nightfall to listen, but we could not afford to loiter in
 this roadstead, and so stood out to our sea again.  Though we
 never trod in those meadows, but only touched their margin with
 our hands, we still retain a pleasant memory of them.
 
 Salmon Brook, whose name is said to be a translation from the
 Indian, was a favorite haunt of the aborigines.  Here, too, the
 first white settlers of Nashua planted, and some dents in the
 earth where their houses stood and the wrecks of ancient
 apple-trees are still visible.  About one mile up this stream
 stood the house of old John Lovewell, who was an ensign in the
 army of Oliver Cromwell, and the father of "famous Captain
 Lovewell."  He settled here before 1690, and died about 1754, at
 the age of one hundred and twenty years.  He is thought to have
 been engaged in the famous Narragansett swamp fight, which took
 place in 1675, before he came here.  The Indians are said to have
 spared him in succeeding wars on account of his kindness to them.
 Even in 1700 he was so old and gray-headed that his scalp was
 worth nothing, since the French Governor offered no bounty for
 such.  I have stood in the dent of his cellar on the bank of the
 brook, and talked there with one whose grandfather had, whose
 father might have, talked with Lovewell.  Here also he had a mill
 in his old age, and kept a small store.  He was remembered by
 some who were recently living, as a hale old man who drove the
 boys out of his orchard with his cane.  Consider the triumphs of
 the mortal man, and what poor trophies it would have to show, to
 wit:--He cobbled shoes without glasses at a hundred, and cut a
 handsome swath at a hundred and five!  Lovewell's house is said
 to have been the first which Mrs.  Dustan reached on her escape
 from the Indians.  Here probably the hero of Pequawket was born
 and bred.  Close by may be seen the cellar and the gravestone of
 Joseph Hassell, who, as is elsewhere recorded, with his wife
 Anna, and son Benjamin, and Mary Marks, "were slain by our Indian
 enemies on September 2d, [1691,] in the evening." As Gookin
 observed on a previous occasion, "The Indian rod upon the English
 backs had not yet done God's errand." Salmon Brook near its mouth
 is still a solitary stream, meandering through woods and meadows,
 while the then uninhabited mouth of the Nashua now resounds with
 the din of a manufacturing town.
 
 A stream from Otternic Pond in Hudson comes in just above Salmon
 Brook, on the opposite side.  There was a good view of Uncannunuc,
 the most conspicuous mountain in these parts, from the bank here,
 seen rising over the west end of the bridge above.  We soon after
 passed the village of Nashua, on the river of the same name,
 where there is a covered bridge over the Merrimack.  The Nashua,
 which is one of the largest tributaries, flows from Wachusett
 Mountain, through Lancaster, Groton, and other towns, where it
 has formed well-known elm-shaded meadows, but near its mouth it
 is obstructed by falls and factories, and did not tempt us to
 explore it.
 
 Far away from here, in Lancaster, with another companion, I have
 crossed the broad valley of the Nashua, over which we had so long
 looked westward from the Concord hills without seeing it to the
 blue mountains in the horizon.  So many streams, so many meadows
 and woods and quiet dwellings of men had lain concealed between
 us and those Delectable Mountains;--from yonder hill on the road
 to Tyngsborough you may get a good view of them.  There where it
 seemed uninterrupted forest to our youthful eyes, between two
 neighboring pines in the horizon, lay the valley of the Nashua,
 and this very stream was even then winding at its bottom, and
 then, as now, it was here silently mingling its waters with the
 Merrimack.  The clouds which floated over its meadows and were
 born there, seen far in the west, gilded by the rays of the
 setting sun, had adorned a thousand evening skies for us.  But as
 it were, by a turf wall this valley was concealed, and in our
 journey to those hills it was first gradually revealed to us.
 Summer and winter our eyes had rested on the dim outline of the
 mountains, to which distance and indistinctness lent a grandeur
 not their own, so that they served to interpret all the allusions
 of poets and travellers.  Standing on the Concord Cliffs we thus
 spoke our mind to them:--
 
      With frontier strength ye stand your ground,
      With grand content ye circle round,
      Tumultuous silence for all sound,
      Ye distant nursery of rills,
      Monadnock and the Peterborough Hills;--
      Firm argument that never stirs,
      Outcircling the philosophers,--
      Like some vast fleet,
      Sailing through rain and sleet,
      Through winter's cold and summer's heat;
      Still holding on upon your high emprise,
      Until ye find a shore amid the skies;
      Not skulking close to land,
      With cargo contraband,
      For they who sent a venture out by ye
      Have set the Sun to see
      Their honesty.
      Ships of the line, each one,
      Ye westward run,
      Convoying clouds,
      Which cluster in your shrouds,
      Always before the gale,
      Under a press of sail,
      With weight of metal all untold,--
      I seem to feel ye in my firm seat here,
      Immeasurable depth of hold,
      And breadth of beam, and length of running gear
 
      Methinks ye take luxurious pleasure
      In your novel western leisure;
      So cool your brows and freshly blue,
      As Time had naught for ye to do;
      For  ye lie at your length,
      An unappropriated strength,
      Unhewn primeval timber,
      For knees so stiff, for masts so limber;
      The stock of which new earths are made,
      One day to be our _western_ trade,
      Fit for the stanchions of a world
      Which through the seas of space is hurled.
 
      While we enjoy a lingering ray,
      Ye still o'ertop the western day,
      Reposing yonder on God's croft
      Like solid stacks of hay;
      So bold a line as ne'er was writ
      On any page by human wit;
      The forest glows as if
      An enemy's camp-fires shone
      Along the horizon,
      Or the day's funeral pyre
      Were lighted there;
      Edged with silver and with gold,
      The clouds hang o'er in damask fold,
      And with such depth of amber light
      The west is dight,
      Where still a few rays slant,
      That even Heaven seems extravagant.
      Watatic Hill
      Lies on the horizon's sill
      Like a child's toy left overnight,
      And other duds to left and right,
      On the earth's edge, mountains and trees
      Stand as they were on air graven,
      Or as the vessels in a haven
      Await the morning breeze.
      I fancy even
      Through your defiles windeth the way to heaven;
      And yonder still, in spite of history's page,
      Linger the golden and the silver age;
      Upon the laboring gale
      The news of future centuries is brought,
      And of new dynasties of thought,
      From your remotest vale.
 
      But special I remember thee,
      Wachusett, who like me
      Standest alone without society.
      Thy far blue eye,
      A remnant of the sky,
      Seen through the clearing or the gorge,
      Or from the windows of the forge,
      Doth leaven all it passes by.
      Nothing is true
      But stands 'tween me and you,
      Thou western pioneer,
      Who know'st not shame nor fear,
      By venturous spirit driven
      Under the eaves of heaven;
      And canst expand thee there,
      And breathe enough of air?
      Even beyond the West
      Thou migratest,
      Into unclouded tracts,
      Without a pilgrim's axe,
      Cleaving thy road on high
      With thy well-tempered brow,
      And mak'st thyself a clearing in the sky.
      Upholding heaven, holding down earth,
      Thy pastime from thy birth;
      Not steadied by the one, nor leaning on the other,
      May I approve myself thy worthy brother!
 
 At length, like Rasselas and other inhabitants of happy valleys,
 we had resolved to scale the blue wall which bounded the western
 horizon, though not without misgivings that thereafter no visible
 fairy-land would exist for us.  But it would be long to tell of
 our adventures, and we have no time this afternoon, transporting
 ourselves in imagination up this hazy Nashua valley, to go over
 again that pilgrimage.  We have since made many similar
 excursions to the principal mountains of New England and New
 York, and even far in the wilderness, and have passed a night on
 the summit of many of them.  And now, when we look again westward
 from our native hills, Wachusett and Monadnock have retreated
 once more among the blue and fabulous mountains in the horizon,
 though our eyes rest on the very rocks on both of them, where we
 have pitched our tent for a night, and boiled our hasty-pudding
 amid the clouds.
 
 
 As late as 1724 there was no house on the north side of the
 Nashua, but only scattered wigwams and grisly forests between
 this frontier and Canada.  In September of that year, two men who
 were engaged in making turpentine on that side, for such were the
 first enterprises in the wilderness, were taken captive and
 carried to Canada by a party of thirty Indians.  Ten of the
 inhabitants of Dunstable, going to look for them, found the hoops
 of their barrel cut, and the turpentine spread on the ground.  I
 have been told by an inhabitant of Tyngsborough, who had the
 story from his ancestors, that one of these captives, when the
 Indians were about to upset his barrel of turpentine, seized a
 pine knot and flourishing it, swore so resolutely that he would
 kill the first who touched it, that they refrained, and when at
 length he returned from Canada he found it still standing.
 Perhaps there was more than one barrel.  However this may have
 been, the scouts knew by marks on the trees, made with coal mixed
 with grease, that the men were not killed, but taken prisoners.
 One of the company, named Farwell, perceiving that the turpentine
 had not done spreading, concluded that the Indians had been gone
 but a short time, and they accordingly went in instant pursuit.
 Contrary to the advice of Farwell, following directly on their
 trail up the Merrimack, they fell into an ambuscade near
 Thornton's Ferry, in the present town of Merrimack, and nine were
 killed, only one, Farwell, escaping after a vigorous pursuit.
 The men of Dunstable went out and picked up their bodies, and
 carried them all down to Dunstable and buried them.  It is almost
 word for word as in the Robin Hood ballad:--
 
      "They carried these foresters into fair Nottingham,
        As many there did know,
      They digged them graves in their churchyard,
        And they buried them all a-row."
 
 Nottingham is only the other side of the river, and they were not
 exactly all a-row.  You may read in the churchyard at Dunstable,
 under the "Memento Mori," and the name of one of them, how they
 "departed this life," and
 
       "This man with seven more that lies in
       this grave was slew all in a day by
                     the Indians."
 
 The stones of some others of the company stand around the common
 grave with their separate inscriptions.  Eight were buried here,
 but nine were killed, according to the best authorities.
 
      "Gentle river, gentle river,
        Lo, thy streams are stained with gore,
      Many a brave and noble captain
        Floats along thy willowed shore.
 
      "All beside thy limpid waters,
        All beside thy sands so bright,
      _Indian_ Chiefs and Christian warriors
        Joined in fierce and mortal fight."
 
 It is related in the History of Dunstable, that on the return of
 Farwell the Indians were engaged by a fresh party which they
 compelled to retreat, and pursued as far as the Nashua, where
 they fought across the stream at its mouth.  After the departure
 of the Indians, the figure of an Indian's head was found carved
 by them on a large tree by the shore, which circumstance has
 given its name to this part of the village of Nashville,--the
 "Indian Head."  "It was observed by some judicious," says Gookin,
 referring to Philip's war, "that at the beginning of the war the
 English soldiers made a nothing of the Indians, and many spake
 words to this effect: that one Englishman was sufficient to chase
 ten Indians; many reckoned it was no other but _Veni, vidi,
 vici._" But we may conclude that the judicious would by this time
 have made a different observation.
 
 Farwell appears to have been the only one who had studied his
 profession, and understood the business of hunting Indians.  He
 lived to fight another day, for the next year he was Lovewell's
 lieutenant at Pequawket, but that time, as we have related, he
 left his bones in the wilderness.  His name still reminds us of
 twilight days and forest scouts on Indian trails, with an uneasy
 scalp;--an indispensable hero to New England.  As the more recent
 poet of Lovewell's fight has sung, halting a little but bravely
 still:--
 
      "Then did the crimson streams that flowed
        Seem like the waters of the brook,
      That brightly shine, that loudly dash,
        Far down the cliffs of Agiochook."
 
 These battles sound incredible to us.  I think that posterity
 will doubt if such things ever were; if our bold ancestors who
 settled this land were not struggling rather with the forest
 shadows, and not with a copper-colored race of men.  They were
 vapors, fever and ague of the unsettled woods.  Now, only a few
 arrow-heads are turned up by the plough.  In the Pelasgic, the
 Etruscan, or the British story, there is nothing so shadowy and
 unreal.
 
 It is a wild and antiquated looking graveyard, overgrown with
 bushes, on the high-road, about a quarter of a mile from and
 overlooking the Merrimack, with a deserted mill-stream bounding
 it on one side, where lie the earthly remains of the ancient
 inhabitants of Dunstable.  We passed it three or four miles below
 here.  You may read there the names of Lovewell, Farwell, and
 many others whose families were distinguished in Indian warfare.
 We noticed there two large masses of granite more than a foot
 thick and rudely squared, lying flat on the ground over the
 remains of the first pastor and his wife.
 
 
 It is remarkable that the dead lie everywhere under stones,--
 
      "Strata jacent passim _suo_ quseque sub" _lapide_--
 
 _corpora_, we might say, if the measure allowed.  When the stone
 is a slight one, it does not oppress the spirits of the traveller
 to meditate by it; but these did seem a little heathenish to us;
 and so are all large monuments over men's bodies, from the
 pyramids down.  A monument should at least be "star-y-pointing,"
 to indicate whither the spirit is gone, and not prostrate, like
 the body it has deserted.  There have been some nations who could
 do nothing but construct tombs, and these are the only traces
 which they have left.  They are the heathen.  But why these
 stones, so upright and emphatic, like exclamation-points?  What
 was there so remarkable that lived?  Why should the monument be
 so much more enduring than the fame which it is designed to
 perpetuate,--a stone to a bone?  "Here lies,"--"Here lies";--why
 do they not sometimes write, There rises?  Is it a monument to
 the body only that is intended?  "Having reached the term of his
 _natural_ life";--would it not be truer to say, Having reached
 the term of his _unnatural_ life?  The rarest quality in an
 epitaph is truth.  If any character is given, it should be as
 severely true as the decision of the three judges below, and not
 the partial testimony of friends.  Friends and contemporaries
 should supply only the name and date, and leave it to posterity
 to write the epitaph.
 
                Here lies an honest man,
                Rear-Admiral Van.
 
                       -------
 
                Faith, then ye have
                Two in one grave,
                For in his favor,
                Here too lies the Engraver.
 
 Fame itself is but an epitaph; as late, as false, as true.  But
 they only are the true epitaphs which Old Mortality retouches.
 
 A man might well pray that he may not taboo or curse any portion
 of nature by being buried in it.  For the most part, the best
 man's spirit makes a fearful sprite to haunt his grave, and it is
 therefore much to the credit of Little John, the famous follower
 of Robin Hood, and reflecting favorably on his character, that
 his grave was "long celebrous for the yielding of excellent
 whetstones."  I confess that I have but little love for such
 collections as they have at the Catacombs, Pere la Chaise, Mount
 Auburn, and even this Dunstable graveyard.  At any rate, nothing
 but great antiquity can make graveyards interesting to me.  I
 have no friends there.  It may be that I am not competent to
 write the poetry of the grave.  The farmer who has skimmed his
 farm might perchance leave his body to Nature to be ploughed in,
 and in some measure restore its fertility.  We should not retard
 but forward her economies.
 
 Soon the village of Nashua was out of sight, and the woods were
 gained again, and we rowed slowly on before sunset, looking for a
 solitary place in which to spend the night.  A few evening clouds
 began to be reflected in the water and the surface was dimpled
 only here and there by a muskrat crossing the stream.  We camped
 at length near Penichook Brook, on the confines of what is now
 Nashville, by a deep ravine, under the skirts of a pine wood,
 where the dead pine-leaves were our carpet, and their tawny
 boughs stretched overhead.  But fire and smoke soon tamed the
 scene; the rocks consented to be our walls, and the pines our
 roof.  A woodside was already the fittest locality for us.
 
 The wilderness is near as well as dear to every man.  Even the
 oldest villages are indebted to the border of wild wood which
 surrounds them, more than to the gardens of men.  There is
 something indescribably inspiriting and beautiful in the aspect
 of the forest skirting and occasionally jutting into the midst of
 new towns, which, like the sand-heaps of fresh fox-burrows, have
 sprung up in their midst.  The very uprightness of the pines and
 maples asserts the ancient rectitude and vigor of nature.  Our
 lives need the relief of such a background, where the pine
 flourishes and the jay still screams.
 
 We had found a safe harbor for our boat, and as the sun was
 setting carried up our furniture, and soon arranged our house
 upon the bank, and while the kettle steamed at the tent door, we
 chatted of distant friends and of the sights which we were to
 behold, and wondered which way the towns lay from us.  Our cocoa
 was soon boiled, and supper set upon our chest, and we lengthened
 out this meal, like old voyageurs, with our talk.  Meanwhile we
 spread the map on the ground, and read in the Gazetteer when the
 first settlers came here and got a township granted.  Then, when
 supper was done and we had written the journal of our voyage, we
 wrapped our buffaloes about us and lay down with our heads
 pillowed on our arms listening awhile to the distant baying of a
 dog, or the murmurs of the river, or to the wind, which had not
 gone to rest:--
 
      The western wind came lumbering in,
      Bearing a faint Pacific din,
      Our evening mail, swift at the call
      Of its Postmaster General;
      Laden with news from Californ',
      Whate'er transpired hath since morn,
      How wags the world by brier and brake
      From hence to Athabasca Lake;--
 
 or half awake and half asleep, dreaming of a star which glimmered
 through our cotton roof.  Perhaps at midnight one was awakened by
 a cricket shrilly singing on his shoulder, or by a hunting spider
 in his eye, and was lulled asleep again by some streamlet purling
 its way along at the bottom of a wooded and rocky ravine in our
 neighborhood.  It was pleasant to lie with our heads so low in
 the grass, and hear what a tinkling ever-busy laboratory it was.
 A thousand little artisans beat on their anvils all night long.
 
 Far in the night as we were falling asleep on the bank of the
 Merrimack, we heard some tyro beating a drum incessantly, in
 preparation for a country muster, as we learned, and we thought
 of the line,--
 
      "When the drum beat at dead of night."
 
 We could have assured him that his beat would be answered, and
 the forces be mustered.  Fear not, thou drummer of the night, we
 too will be there.  And still he drummed on in the silence and
 the dark.  This stray sound from a far-off sphere came to our
 ears from time to time, far, sweet, and significant, and we
 listened with such an unprejudiced sense as if for the first time
 we heard at all.  No doubt he was an insignificant drummer
 enough, but his music afforded us a prime and leisure hour, and
 we felt that we were in season wholly.  These simple sounds
 related us to the stars.  Ay, there was a logic in them so
 convincing that the combined sense of mankind could never make me
 doubt their conclusions.  I stop my habitual thinking, as if the
 plough had suddenly run deeper in its furrow through the crust of
 the world.  How can I go on, who have just stepped over such a
 bottomless skylight in the bog of my life.  Suddenly old Time
 winked at me,--Ah, you know me, you rogue,--and news had come
 that IT was well.  That ancient universe is in such capital
 health, I think undoubtedly it will never die.  Heal yourselves,
 doctors; by God, I live.
 
                 Then idle Time ran gadding by
                 And left me with Eternity alone;
             I hear beyond the range of sound,
             I see beyond the verge of sight,--
 
 I see, smell, taste, hear, feel, that everlasting Something to
 which we are allied, at once our maker, our abode, our destiny,
 our very Selves; the one historic truth, the most remarkable fact
 which can become the distinct and uninvited subject of our
 thought, the actual glory of the universe; the only fact which a
 human being cannot avoid recognizing, or in some way forget or
 dispense with.
 
            It doth expand my privacies
        To all, and leave me single in the crowd.
 
 I have seen how the foundations of the world are laid, and I have
 not the least doubt that it will stand a good while.
 
          Now chiefly is my natal hour,
          And only now my prime of life.
          I will not doubt the love untold,
          Which not my worth nor want hath bought,
          Which wooed me young and wooes me old,
          And to this evening hath me brought.
 
 What are ears? what is Time? that this particular series of
 sounds called a strain of music, an invisible and fairy troop
 which never brushed the dew from any mead, can be wafted down
 through the centuries from Homer to me, and he have been
 conversant with that same aerial and mysterious charm which now
 so tingles my ears?  What a fine communication from age to age,
 of the fairest and noblest thoughts, the aspirations of ancient
 men, even such as were never communicated by speech, is music!
 It is the flower of language, thought colored and curved, fluent
 and flexible, its crystal fountain tinged with the sun's rays,
 and its purling ripples reflecting the grass and the clouds.  A
 strain of music reminds me of a passage of the Vedas, and I
 associate with it the idea of infinite remoteness, as well as of
 beauty and serenity, for to the senses that is farthest from us
 which addresses the greatest depth within us.  It teaches us
 again and again to trust the remotest and finest as the divinest
 instinct, and makes a dream our only real experience.  We feel a
 sad cheer when we hear it, perchance because we that hear are not
 one with that which is heard.
 
         Therefore a torrent of sadness deep,
         Through the strains of thy triumph is heard to sweep.
 
 The sadness is ours.  The Indian poet Calidas says in the
 Sacontala: "Perhaps the sadness of men on seeing beautiful forms
 and hearing sweet music arises from some faint remembrance of
 past joys, and the traces of connections in a former state of
 existence." As polishing expresses the vein in marble, and grain
 in wood, so music brings out what of heroic lurks anywhere.  The
 hero is the sole patron of music.  That harmony which exists
 naturally between the hero's moods and the universe the soldier
 would fain imitate with drum and trumpet.  When we are in health
 all sounds fife and drum for us; we hear the notes of music in
 the air, or catch its echoes dying away when we awake in the
 dawn.  Marching is when the pulse of the hero beats in unison
 with the pulse of Nature, and he steps to the measure of the
 universe; then there is true courage and invincible strength.
 
 Plutarch says that "Plato thinks the gods never gave men music,
 the science of melody and harmony, for mere delectation or to
 tickle the ear; but that the discordant parts of the circulations
 and beauteous fabric of the soul, and that of it that roves about
 the body, and many times, for want of tune and air, breaks forth
 into many extravagances and excesses, might be sweetly recalled
 and artfully wound up to their former consent and agreement."
 
 Music is the sound of the universal laws promulgated.  It is the
 only assured tone.  There are in it such strains as far surpass
 any man's faith in the loftiness of his destiny.  Things are to
 be learned which it will be worth the while to learn.  Formerly I
 heard these
 
          ^Rumors from an Aeolian Harp^.
 
       There is a vale which none hath seen,
       Where foot of man has never been,
       Such as here lives with toil and strife,
       An anxious and a sinful life.
 
      There every virtue has its birth,
      Ere it descends upon the earth,
      And thither every deed returns,
      Which in the generous bosom burns.
 
      There love is warm, and youth is young,
      And poetry is yet unsung,
      For Virtue still adventures there,
      And freely breathes her native air.
 
      And ever, if you hearken well,
      You still may hear its vesper bell,
      And tread of high-souled men go by,
      Their thoughts conversing with the sky.
 
 According to Jamblichus, "Pythagoras did not procure for himself
 a thing of this kind through instruments or the voice, but
 employing a certain ineffable divinity, and which it is difficult
 to apprehend, he extended his ears and fixed his intellect in the
 sublime symphonies of the world, he alone hearing and
 understanding, as it appears, the universal harmony and
 consonance of the spheres, and the stars that are moved through
 them, and which produce a fuller and more intense melody than
 anything effected by mortal sounds."
 
 Travelling on foot very early one morning due east from here
 about twenty miles, from Caleb Harriman's tavern in Hampstead
 toward Haverhill, when I reached the railroad in Plaistow, I
 heard at some distance a faint music in the air like an Aeolian
 harp, which I immediately suspected to proceed from the cord of
 the telegraph vibrating in the just awakening morning wind, and
 applying my ear to one of the posts I was convinced that it was
 so.  It was the telegraph harp singing its message through the
 country, its message sent not by men, but by gods.  Perchance,
 like the statue of Memnon, it resounds only in the morning, when
 the first rays of the sun fall on it.  It was like the first lyre
 or shell heard on the sea-shore,--that vibrating cord high in the
 air over the shores of earth.  So have all things their higher
 and their lower uses.  I heard a fairer news than the journals
 ever print.  It told of things worthy to hear, and worthy of the
 electric fluid to carry the news of, not of the price of cotton
 and flour, but it hinted at the price of the world itself and of
 things which are priceless, of absolute truth and beauty.
 
 Still the drum rolled on, and stirred our blood to fresh
 extravagance that night.  The clarion sound and clang of corselet
 and buckler were heard from many a hamlet of the soul, and many a
 knight was arming for the fight behind the encamped stars.
 
                                 "Before each van
          Prick forth the aery knights, and couch their spears
          Till thickest legions close; with feats of arms
          From either end of Heaven the welkin burns."
 
                      --------------
 
 
            Away! away! away! away!
              Ye have not kept your secret well,
            I will abide that other day,
              Those other lands ye tell.
 
            Has time no leisure left for these,
              The acts that ye rehearse?
            Is not eternity a lease
              For better deeds than verse?
 
            'T is sweet to hear of heroes dead,
              To know them still alive,
            But sweeter if we earn their bread,
               And in us they survive.
 
            Our life should feed the springs of fame
               With a perennial wave.
            As ocean feeds the babbling founts
               Which find in it their grave.
 
           Ye skies drop gently round my breast,
             And be my corselet blue,
           Ye earth receive my lance in rest,
             My faithful charger you;
 
           Ye stars my spear-heads in the sky,
             My arrow-tips ye are;
           I see the routed foemen fly,
             My bright spears fixed are.
 
           Give me an angel for a foe,
             Fix now the place and time,
           And straight to meet him I will go
             Above the starry chime.
 
           And with our clashing bucklers' clang
             The heavenly spheres shall ring,
           While bright the northern lights shall hang
             Beside our tourneying.
 
           And if she lose her champion true,
             Tell Heaven not despair,
           For I will be her champion new,
             Her fame I will repair.
 
 There was a high wind this night, which we afterwards learned had
 been still more violent elsewhere, and had done much injury to
 the cornfields far and near; but we only heard it sigh from time
 to time, as if it had no license to shake the foundations of our
 tent; the pines murmured, the water rippled, and the tent rocked
 a little, but we only laid our ears closer to the ground, while
 the blast swept on to alarm other men, and long before sunrise we
 were ready to pursue our voyage as usual.
 
 
 
 
 [page]
 
 
                        TUESDAY.
 
 
             "On either side the river lie
              Long fields of barley and of rye,
              That clothe the wold and meet the sky;
              And through the fields the road runs by
                           To many-towered Camelot."
                                             ^Tennyson.^
 
 
 [page]
 
 
 
                        TUESDAY.
 
                         --*--
 
 
 Long before daylight we ranged abroad, hatchet in hand, in search
 of fuel, and made the yet slumbering and dreaming wood resound
 with our blows.  Then with our fire we burned up a portion of the
 loitering night, while the kettle sang its homely strain to the
 morning star.  We tramped about the shore, waked all the
 muskrats, and scared up the bittern and birds that were asleep
 upon their roosts; we hauled up and upset our boat and washed it
 and rinsed out the clay, talking aloud as if it were broad day,
 until at length, by three o'clock, we had completed our
 preparations and were ready to pursue our voyage as usual; so,
 shaking the clay from our feet, we pushed into the fog.
 
 Though we were enveloped in mist as usual, we trusted that there
 was a bright day behind it.
 
      Ply the oars! away! away!
      In each dew-drop of the morning
      Lies the promise of a day.
 
      Rivers from the sunrise flow,
      Springing with the dewy morn;
      Voyageurs 'gainst time do row,
      Idle noon nor sunset know,
      Ever even with the dawn.
 
 Belknap, the historian of this State, says that, "In the
 neighborhood of fresh rivers and ponds, a whitish fog in the
 morning lying over the water is a sure indication of fair weather
 for that day; and when no fog is seen, rain is expected before
 night." That which seemed to us to invest the world was only a
 narrow and shallow wreath of vapor stretched over the channel of
 the Merrimack from the seaboard to the mountains.  More extensive
 fogs, however, have their own limits.  I once saw the day break
 from the top of Saddle-back Mountain in Massachusetts, above the
 clouds.  As we cannot distinguish objects through this dense fog,
 let me tell this story more at length.
 
 
 I had come over the hills on foot and alone in serene summer
 days, plucking the raspberries by the wayside, and occasionally
 buying a loaf of bread at a farmer's house, with a knapsack on my
 back which held a few traveller's books and a change of clothing,
 and a staff in my hand.  I had that morning looked down from the
 Hoosack Mountain, where the road crosses it, on the village of
 North Adams in the valley three miles away under my feet, showing
 how uneven the earth may sometimes be, and making it seem an
 accident that it should ever be level and convenient for the feet
 of man.  Putting a little rice and sugar and a tin cup into my
 knapsack at this village, I began in the afternoon to ascend the
 mountain, whose summit is three thousand six hundred feet above
 the level of the sea, and was seven or eight miles distant by the
 path.  My route lay up a long and spacious valley called the
 Bellows, because the winds rush up or down it with violence in
 storms, sloping up to the very clouds between the principal range
 and a lower mountain.  There were a few farms scattered along at
 different elevations, each commanding a fine prospect of the
 mountains to the north, and a stream ran down the middle of the
 valley on which near the head there was a mill.  It seemed a road
 for the pilgrim to enter upon who would climb to the gates of
 heaven.  Now I crossed a hay-field, and now over the brook on a
 slight bridge, still gradually ascending all the while with a
 sort of awe, and filled with indefinite expectations as to what
 kind of inhabitants and what kind of nature I should come to at
 last.  It now seemed some advantage that the earth was uneven,
 for one could not imagine a more noble position for a farm-house
 than this vale afforded, farther from or nearer to its head, from
 a glen-like seclusion overlooking the country at a great
 elevation between these two mountain walls.
 
 It reminded me of the homesteads of the Huguenots, on Staten
 Island, off the coast of New Jersey.  The hills in the interior
 of this island, though comparatively low, are penetrated in
 various directions by similar sloping valleys on a humble scale,
 gradually narrowing and rising to the centre, and at the head of
 these the Huguenots, who were the first settlers, placed their
 houses quite within the land, in rural and sheltered places, in
 leafy recesses where the breeze played with the poplar and the
 gum-tree, from which, with equal security in calm and storm, they
 looked out through a widening vista, over miles of forest and
 stretching salt marsh, to the Huguenot's Tree, an old elm on the
 shore at whose root they had landed, and across the spacious
 outer bay of New York to Sandy Hook and the Highlands of
 Neversink, and thence over leagues of the Atlantic, perchance to
 some faint vessel in the horizon, almost a day's sail on her
 voyage to that Europe whence they had come.  When walking in the
 interior there, in the midst of rural scenery, where there was as
 little to remind me of the ocean as amid the New Hampshire hills,
 I have suddenly, through a gap, a cleft or "clove road," as the
 Dutch settlers called it, caught sight of a ship under full sail,
 over a field of corn, twenty or thirty miles at sea.  The effect
 was similar, since I had no means of measuring distances, to
 seeing a painted ship passed backwards and forwards through a
 magic-lantern.
 
 But to return to the mountain.  It seemed as if he must be the
 most singular and heavenly minded man whose dwelling stood
 highest up the valley.  The thunder had rumbled at my heels all
 the way, but the shower passed off in another direction, though
 if it had not, I half believed that I should get above it.  I at
 length reached the last house but one, where the path to the
 summit diverged to the right, while the summit itself rose
 directly in front.  But I determined to follow up the valley to
 its head, and then find my own route up the steep as the shorter
 and more adventurous way.  I had thoughts of returning to this
 house, which was well kept and so nobly placed, the next day, and
 perhaps remaining a week there, if I could have entertainment.
 Its mistress was a frank and hospitable young woman, who stood
 before me in a dishabille, busily and unconcernedly combing her
 long black hair while she talked, giving her head the necessary
 toss with each sweep of the comb, with lively, sparkling eyes,
 and full of interest in that lower world from which I had come,
 talking all the while as familiarly as if she had known me for
 years, and reminding me of a cousin of mine.  She at first had
 taken me for a student from Williamstown, for they went by in
 parties, she said, either riding or walking, almost every
 pleasant day, and were a pretty wild set of fellows; but they
 never went by the way I was going.  As I passed the last house, a
 man called out to know what I had to sell, for seeing my
 knapsack, he thought that I might be a pedler who was taking this
 unusual route over the ridge of the valley into South Adams.  He
 told me that it was still four or five miles to the summit by the
 path which I had left, though not more than two in a straight
 line from where I was, but that nobody ever went this way; there
 was no path, and I should find it as steep as the roof of a
 house.  But I knew that I was more used to woods and mountains
 than he, and went along through his cow-yard, while he, looking
 at the sun, shouted after me that I should not get to the top
 that night.  I soon reached the head of the valley, but as I
 could not see the summit from this point, I ascended a low
 mountain on the opposite side, and took its bearing with my
 compass.  I at once entered the woods, and began to climb the
 steep side of the mountain in a diagonal direction, taking the
 bearing of a tree every dozen rods.  The ascent was by no means
 difficult or unpleasant, and occupied much less time than it
 would have taken to follow the path.  Even country people, I have
 observed, magnify the difficulty of travelling in the forest, and
 especially among mountains.  They seem to lack their usual common
 sense in this.  I have climbed several higher mountains without
 guide or path, and have found, as might be expected, that it
 takes only more time and patience commonly than to travel the
 smoothest highway.  It is very rare that you meet with obstacles
 in this world which the humblest man has not faculties to
 surmount.  It is true we may come to a perpendicular precipice,
 but we need not jump off nor run our heads against it.  A man may
 jump down his own cellar stairs or dash his brains out against
 his chimney, if he is mad.  So far as my experience goes,
 travellers generally exaggerate the difficulties of the way.
 Like most evil, the difficulty is imaginary; for what's the
 hurry?  If a person lost would conclude that after all he is not
 lost, he is not beside himself, but standing in his own old shoes
 on the very spot where he is, and that for the time being he will
 live there; but the places that have known him, _they_ are
 lost,--how much anxiety and danger would vanish.  I am not alone
 if I stand by myself.  Who knows where in space this globe is
 rolling?  Yet we will not give ourselves up for lost, let it go
 where it will.
 
 I made my way steadily upward in a straight line through a dense
 undergrowth of mountain laurel, until the trees began to have a
 scraggy and infernal look, as if contending with frost goblins,
 and at length I reached the summit, just as the sun was setting.
 Several acres here had been cleared, and were covered with rocks
 and stumps, and there was a rude observatory in the middle which
 overlooked the woods.  I had one fair view of the country before
 the sun went down, but I was too thirsty to waste any light in
 viewing the prospect, and set out directly to find water.  First,
 going down a well-beaten path for half a mile through the low
 scrubby wood, till I came to where the water stood in the tracks
 of the horses which had carried travellers up, I lay down flat,
 and drank these dry, one after another, a pure, cold, spring-like
 water, but yet I could not fill my dipper, though I contrived
 little siphons of grass-stems, and ingenious aqueducts on a small
 scale; it was too slow a process.  Then remembering that I had
 passed a moist place near the top, on my way up, I returned to
 find it again, and here, with sharp stones and my hands, in the
 twilight, I made a well about two feet deep, which was soon
 filled with pure cold water, and the birds too came and drank at
 it.  So I filled my dipper, and, making my way back to the
 observatory, collected some dry sticks, and made a fire on some
 flat stones which had been placed on the floor for that purpose,
 and so I soon cooked my supper of rice, having already whittled a
 wooden spoon to eat it with.
 
 I sat up during the evening, reading by the light of the fire the
 scraps of newspapers in which some party had wrapped their
 luncheon; the prices current in New York and Boston, the
 advertisements, and the singular editorials which some had seen
 fit to publish, not foreseeing under what critical circumstances
 they would be read.  I read these things at a vast advantage
 there, and it seemed to me that the advertisements, or what is
 called the business part of a paper, were greatly the best, the
 most useful, natural, and respectable.  Almost all the opinions
 and sentiments expressed were so little considered, so shallow
 and flimsy, that I thought the very texture of the paper must be
 weaker in that part and tear the more easily.  The advertisements
 and the prices current were more closely allied to nature, and
 were respectable in some measure as tide and meteorological
 tables are; but the reading-matter, which I remembered was most
 prized down below, unless it was some humble record of science,
 or an extract from some old classic, struck me as strangely
 whimsical, and crude, and one-idea'd, like a school-boy's theme,
 such as youths write and after burn.  The opinions were of that
 kind that are doomed to wear a different aspect to-morrow, like
 last year's fashions; as if mankind were very green indeed, and
 would be ashamed of themselves in a few years, when they had
 outgrown this verdant period.  There was, moreover, a singular
 disposition to wit and humor, but rarely the slightest real
 success; and the apparent success was a terrible satire on the
 attempt; the Evil Genius of man laughed the loudest at his best
 jokes.  The advertisements, as I have said, such as were serious,
 and not of the modern quack kind, suggested pleasing and poetic
 thoughts; for commerce is really as interesting as nature.  The
 very names of the commodities were poetic, and as suggestive as
 if they had been inserted in a pleasing poem,--Lumber, Cotton,
 Sugar, Hides, Guano, Logwood.  Some sober, private, and original
 thought would have been grateful to read there, and as much in
 harmony with the circumstances as if it had been written on a
 mountain-top; for it is of a fashion which never changes, and as
 respectable as hides and logwood, or any natural product.  What
 an inestimable companion such a scrap of paper would have been,
 containing some fruit of a mature life.  What a relic!  What a
 recipe!  It seemed a divine invention, by which not mere shining
 coin, but shining and current thoughts, could be brought up and
 left there.
 
 As it was cold, I collected quite a pile of wood and lay down on
 a board against the side of the building, not having any blanket
 to cover me, with my head to the fire, that I might look after
 it, which is not the Indian rule.  But as it grew colder towards
 midnight, I at length encased myself completely in boards,
 managing even to put a board on top of me, with a large stone on
 it, to keep it down, and so slept comfortably.  I was reminded,
 it is true, of the Irish children, who inquired what their
 neighbors did who had no door to put over them in winter nights
 as they had; but I am convinced that there was nothing very
 strange in the inquiry.  Those who have never tried it can have
 no idea how far a door, which keeps the single blanket down, may
 go toward making one comfortable.  We are constituted a good deal
 like chickens, which taken from the hen, and put in a basket of
 cotton in the chimney-corner, will often peep till they die,
 nevertheless, but if you put in a book, or anything heavy, which
 will press down the cotton, and feel like the hen, they go to
 sleep directly.  My only companions were the mice, which came to
 pick up the crumbs that had been left in those scraps of paper;
 still, as everywhere, pensioners on man, and not unwisely
 improving this elevated tract for their habitation.  They nibbled
 what was for them; I nibbled what was for me.  Once or twice in
 the night, when I looked up, I saw a white cloud drifting through
 the windows, and filling the whole upper story.
 
 This observatory was a building of considerable size, erected by
 the students of Williamstown College, whose buildings might be
 seen by daylight gleaming far down in the valley.  It would be no
 small advantage if every college were thus located at the base of
 a mountain, as good at least as one well-endowed professorship.
 It were as well to be educated in the shadow of a mountain as in
 more classical shades.  Some will remember, no doubt, not only
 that they went to the college, but that they went to the
 mountain.  Every visit to its summit would, as it were,
 generalize the particular information gained below, and subject
 it to more catholic tests.
 
 I was up early and perched upon the top of this tower to see the
 daybreak, for some time reading the names that had been engraved
 there, before I could distinguish more distant objects.  An
 "untamable fly" buzzed at my elbow with the same nonchalance as
 on a molasses hogshead at the end of Long Wharf.  Even there I
 must attend to his stale humdrum.  But now I come to the pith of
 this long digression.--As the light increased I discovered around
 me an ocean of mist, which by chance reached up exactly to the
 base of the tower, and shut out every vestige of the earth, while
 I was left floating on this fragment of the wreck of a world, on
 my carved plank, in cloudland; a situation which required no aid
 from the imagination to render it impressive.  As the light in
 the east steadily increased, it revealed to me more clearly the
 new world into which I had risen in the night, the new _terra
 firma_ perchance of my future life.  There was not a crevice left
 through which the trivial places we name Massachusetts or Vermont
 or New York could be seen, while I still inhaled the clear
 atmosphere of a July morning,--if it were July there.  All around
 beneath me was spread for a hundred miles on every side, as far
 as the eye could reach, an undulating country of clouds,
 answering in the varied swell of its surface to the terrestrial
 world it veiled.  It was such a country as we might see in
 dreams, with all the delights of paradise.  There were immense
 snowy pastures, apparently smooth-shaven and firm, and shady
 vales between the vaporous mountains; and far in the horizon I
 could see where some luxurious misty timber jutted into the
 prairie, and trace the windings of a water-course, some
 unimagined Amazon or Orinoko, by the misty trees on its brink.
 As there was wanting the symbol, so there was not the substance
 of impurity, no spot nor stain.  It was a favor for which to be
 forever silent to be shown this vision.  The earth beneath had
 become such a flitting thing of lights and shadows as the clouds
 had been before.  It was not merely veiled to me, but it had
 passed away like the phantom of a shadow, <skia's o'nar>, and
 this new platform was gained.  As I had climbed above storm and
 cloud, so by successive days' journeys I might reach the region
 of eternal day, beyond the tapering shadow of the earth; ay,
 
              "Heaven itself shall slide,
         And roll away, like melting stars that glide
         Along their oily threads."
 
 But when its own sun began to rise on this pure world, I found
 myself a dweller in the dazzling halls of Aurora, into which
 poets have had but a partial glance over the eastern hills,
 drifting amid the saffron-colored clouds, and playing with the
 rosy fingers of the Dawn, in the very path of the Sun's chariot,
 and sprinkled with its dewy dust, enjoying the benignant smile,
 and near at hand the far-darting glances of the god.  The
 inhabitants of earth behold commonly but the dark and shadowy
 under-side of heaven's pavement; it is only when seen at a
 favorable angle in the horizon, morning or evening, that some
 faint streaks of the rich lining of the clouds are revealed.  But
 my muse would fail to convey an impression of the gorgeous
 tapestry by which I was surrounded, such as men see faintly
 reflected afar off in the chambers of the east.  Here, as on
 earth, I saw the gracious god
 
         "Flatter the mountain-tops with sovereign eye,
              .      .      .      .      .      .
           Gilding pale streams with heavenly alchemy."
 
 But never here did "Heaven's sun" stain himself.
 
 But, alas, owing, as I think, to some unworthiness in myself, my
 private sun did stain himself, and
 
              "Anon permit the basest clouds to ride
               With ugly wrack on his celestial face,"--
 
 for before the god had reached the zenith the heavenly pavement
 rose and embraced my wavering virtue, or rather I sank down again
 into that "forlorn world," from which the celestial sun had hid
 his visage,--
 
       "How may a worm that crawls along the dust,
        Clamber the azure mountains, thrown so high,
        And fetch from thence thy fair idea just,
        That in those sunny courts doth hidden lie,
        Clothed with such light as blinds the angel's eye?
           How may weak mortal ever hope to file
           His unsmooth tongue, and his deprostrate style?
        O, raise thou from his corse thy now entombed exile!"
 
 In the preceding evening I had seen the summits of new and yet
 higher mountains, the Catskills, by which I might hope to climb
 to heaven again, and had set my compass for a fair lake in the
 southwest, which lay in my way, for which I now steered,
 descending the mountain by my own route, on the side opposite to
 that by which I had ascended, and soon found myself in the region
 of cloud and drizzling rain, and the inhabitants affirmed that it
 had been a cloudy and drizzling day wholly.
 
 But now we must make haste back before the fog disperses to the
 blithe Merrimack water.
 
       Since that first "Away! away!"
            Many a lengthy reach we've rowed,
       Still the sparrow on the spray
       Hastes to usher in the day
            With her simple stanza'd ode.
 
 We passed a canal-boat before sunrise, groping its way to the
 seaboard, and, though we could not see it on account of the fog,
 the few dull, thumping, stertorous sounds which we heard,
 impressed us with a sense of weight and irresistible motion.  One
 little rill of commerce already awake on this distant New
 Hampshire river.  The fog, as it required more skill in the
 steering, enhanced the interest of our early voyage, and made the
 river seem indefinitely broad.  A slight mist, through which
 objects are faintly visible, has the effect of expanding even
 ordinary streams, by a singular mirage, into arms of the sea or
 inland lakes.  In the present instance it was even fragrant and
 invigorating, and we enjoyed it as a sort of earlier sunshine, or
 dewy and embryo light.
 
          Low-anchored cloud,
          Newfoundland air,
          Fountain-head and source of rivers,
          Dew-cloth, dream drapery,
          And napkin spread by fays;
          Drifting meadow of the air,
          Where bloom the daisied banks and violets,
          And in whose fenny labyrinth
          The bittern booms and heron wades;
          Spirit of lakes and seas and rivers,
          Bear only perfumes and the scent
          Of healing herbs to just men's fields!
 
 The same pleasant and observant historian whom we quoted above
 says, that, "In the mountainous parts of the country, the ascent
 of vapors, and their formation into clouds, is a curious and
 entertaining object.  The vapors are seen rising in small columns
 like smoke from many chimneys.  When risen to a certain height,
 they spread, meet, condense, and are attracted to the mountains,
 where they either distil in gentle dews, and replenish the
 springs, or descend in showers, accompanied with thunder.  After
 short intermissions, the process is repeated many times in the
 course of a summer day, affording to travellers a lively
 illustration of what is observed in the Book of Job, `They are
 wet with the showers of the mountains.'"
 
 Fogs and clouds which conceal the overshadowing mountains lend
 the breadth of the plains to mountain vales.  Even a
 small-featured country acquires some grandeur in stormy weather
 when clouds are seen drifting between the beholder and the
 neighboring hills.  When, in travelling toward Haverhill through
 Hampstead in this State, on the height of land between the
 Merrimack and the Piscataqua or the sea, you commence the descent
 eastward, the view toward the coast is so distant and unexpected,
 though the sea is invisible, that you at first suppose the
 unobstructed atmosphere to be a fog in the lowlands concealing
 hills of corresponding elevation to that you are upon; but it is
 the mist of prejudice alone, which the winds will not disperse.
 The most stupendous scenery ceases to be sublime when it becomes
 distinct, or in other words limited, and the imagination is no
 longer encouraged to exaggerate it.  The actual height and
 breadth of a mountain or a waterfall are always ridiculously
 small; they are the imagined only that content us.  Nature is not
 made after such a fashion as we would have her.  We piously
 exaggerate her wonders, as the scenery around our home.
 
 Such was the heaviness of the dews along this river that we were
 generally obliged to leave our tent spread over the bows of the
 boat till the sun had dried it, to avoid mildew.  We passed the
 mouth of Penichook Brook, a wild salmon-stream, in the fog,
 without seeing it.  At length the sun's rays struggled through
 the mist and showed us the pines on shore dripping with dew, and
 springs trickling from the moist banks,--
 
       "And now the taller sons, whom Titan warms,
        Of unshorn mountains blown with easy winds,
        Dandle the morning's childhood in their arms,
        And, if they chanced to slip the prouder pines,
        The under corylets did catch their shines,
        To gild their leaves."
 
 We rowed for some hours between glistening banks before the sun
 had dried the grass and leaves, or the day had established its
 character.  Its serenity at last seemed the more profound and
 secure for the denseness of the morning's fog.  The river became
 swifter, and the scenery more pleasing than before.  The banks
 were steep and clayey for the most part, and trickling with
 water, and where a spring oozed out a few feet above the river
 the boatmen had cut a trough out of a slab with their axes, and
 placed it so as to receive the water and fill their jugs
 conveniently.  Sometimes this purer and cooler water, bursting
 out from under a pine or a rock, was collected into a basin close
 to the edge of and level with the river, a fountain-head of the
 Merrimack.  So near along life's stream are the fountains of
 innocence and youth making fertile its sandy margin; and the
 voyageur will do well to replenish his vessels often at these
 uncontaminated sources.  Some youthful spring, perchance, still
 empties with tinkling music into the oldest river, even when it
 is falling into the sea, and we imagine that its music is
 distinguished by the river-gods from the general lapse of the
 stream, and falls sweeter on their ears in proportion as it is
 nearer to the ocean.  As the evaporations of the river feed thus
 these unsuspected springs which filter through its banks, so,
 perchance, our aspirations fall back again in springs on the
 margin of life's stream to refresh and purify it.  The yellow and
 tepid river may float his scow, and cheer his eye with its
 reflections and its ripples, but the boatman quenches his thirst
 at this small rill alone.  It is this purer and cooler element
 that chiefly sustains his life.  The race will long survive that
 is thus discreet.
 
 Our course this morning lay between the territories of Merrimack,
 on the west, and Litchfield, once called Brenton's Farm, on the
 east, which townships were anciently the Indian Naticook.
 Brenton was a fur-trader among the Indians, and these lands were
 granted to him in 1656.  The latter township contains about five
 hundred inhabitants, of whom, however, we saw none, and but few
 of their dwellings.  Being on the river, whose banks are always
 high and generally conceal the few houses, the country appeared
 much more wild and primitive than to the traveller on the
 neighboring roads.  The river is by far the most attractive
 highway, and those boatmen who have spent twenty or twenty-five
 years on it must have had a much fairer, more wild, and memorable
 experience than the dusty and jarring one of the teamster who has
 driven, during the same time, on the roads which run parallel
 with the stream.  As one ascends the Merrimack he rarely sees a
 village, but for the most part alternate wood and pasture lands,
 and sometimes a field of corn or potatoes, of rye or oats or
 English grass, with a few straggling apple-trees, and, at still
 longer intervals, a farmer's house.  The soil, excepting the best
 of the interval, is commonly as light and sandy as a patriot
 could desire.  Sometimes this forenoon the country appeared in
 its primitive state, and as if the Indian still inhabited it,
 and, again, as if many free, new settlers occupied it, their
 slight fences straggling down to the water's edge; and the
 barking of dogs, and even the prattle of children, were heard,
 and smoke was seen to go up from some hearthstone, and the banks
 were divided into patches of pasture, mowing, tillage, and
 woodland.  But when the river spread out broader, with an
 uninhabited islet, or a long, low sandy shore which ran on single
 and devious, not answering to its opposite, but far off as if it
 were sea-shore or single coast, and the land no longer nursed the
 river in its bosom, but they conversed as equals, the rustling
 leaves with rippling waves, and few fences were seen, but high
 oak woods on one side, and large herds of cattle, and all tracks
 seemed a point to one centre behind some statelier grove,--we
 imagined that the river flowed through an extensive manor, and
 that the few inhabitants were retainers to a lord, and a feudal
 state of things prevailed.
 
 When there was a suitable reach, we caught sight of the Goffstown
 mountain, the Indian Uncannunuc, rising before us on the west
 side.  It was a calm and beautiful day, with only a slight zephyr
 to ripple the surface of the water, and rustle the woods on
 shore, and just warmth enough to prove the kindly disposition of
 Nature to her children.  With buoyant spirits and vigorous
 impulses we tossed our boat rapidly along into the very middle of
 this forenoon.  The fish-hawk sailed and screamed overhead.  The
 chipping or striped squirrel, _Sciurus striatus_ (_Tamias
 Lysteri_, Aud.), sat upon the end of some Virginia fence or rider
 reaching over the stream, twirling a green nut with one paw, as
 in a lathe, while the other held it fast against its incisors as
 chisels.  Like an independent russet leaf, with a will of its
 own, rustling whither it could; now under the fence, now over it,
 now peeping at the voyageurs through a crack with only its tail
 visible, now at its lunch deep in the toothsome kernel, and now a
 rod off playing at hide-and-seek, with the nut stowed away in its
 chops, where were half a dozen more besides, extending its cheeks
 to a ludicrous breadth,--as if it were devising through what safe
 valve of frisk or somerset to let its superfluous life escape;
 the stream passing harmlessly off, even while it sits, in
 constant electric flashes through its tail.  And now with a
 chuckling squeak it dives into the root of a hazel, and we see no
 more of it.  Or the larger red squirrel or chickaree, sometimes
 called the Hudson Bay squirrel (_Scriurus Hudsonius_), gave
 warning of our approach by that peculiar alarum of his, like the
 winding up of some strong clock, in the top of a pine-tree, and
 dodged behind its stem, or leaped from tree to tree with such
 caution and adroitness, as if much depended on the fidelity of
 his scout, running along the white-pine boughs sometimes twenty
 rods by our side, with such speed, and by such unerring routes,
 as if it were some well-worn familiar path to him; and presently,
 when we have passed, he returns to his work of cutting off the
 pine-cones, and letting them fall to the ground.
 
 We passed Cromwell's Falls, the first we met with on this river,
 this forenoon, by means of locks, without using our wheels.
 These falls are the Nesenkeag of the Indians.  Great Nesenkeag
 Stream comes in on the right just above, and Little Nesenkeag
 some distance below, both in Litchfield.  We read in the
 Gazetteer, under the head of Merrimack, that "The first house in
 this town was erected on the margin of the river [soon after
 1665] for a house of traffic with the Indians.  For some time one
 Cromwell carried on a lucrative trade with them, weighing their
 furs with his foot, till, enraged at his supposed or real
 deception, they formed the resolution to murder him.  This
 intention being communicated to Cromwell, he buried his wealth
 and made his escape.  Within a few hours after his flight, a
 party of the Penacook tribe arrived, and, not finding the object
 of their resentment, burnt his habitation." Upon the top of the
 high bank here, close to the river, was still to be seen his
 cellar, now overgrown with trees.  It was a convenient spot for
 such a traffic, at the foot of the first falls above the
 settlements, and commanding a pleasant view up the river, where
 he could see the Indians coming down with their furs.  The
 lock-man told us that his shovel and tongs had been ploughed up
 here, and also a stone with his name on it.  But we will not
 vouch for the truth of this story.  In the New Hampshire
 Historical Collections for 1815 it says, "Some time after pewter
 was found in the well, and an iron pot and trammel in the sand;
 the latter are preserved."  These were the traces of the white
 trader.  On the opposite bank, where it jutted over the stream
 cape-wise, we picked up four arrow-heads and a small Indian tool
 made of stone, as soon as we had climbed it, where plainly there
 had once stood a wigwam of the Indians with whom Cromwell traded,
 and who fished and hunted here before he came.
 
 As usual the gossips have not been silent respecting Cromwell's
 buried wealth, and it is said that some years ago a farmer's
 plough, not far from here, slid over a flat stone which emitted a
 hollow sound, and, on its being raised, a small hole six inches
 in diameter was discovered, stoned about, from which a sum of
 money was taken.  The lock-man told us another similar story about
 a farmer in a neighboring town, who had been a poor man, but who
 suddenly bought a good farm, and was well to do in the world,
 and, when he was questioned, did not give a satisfactory account
 of the matter; how few, alas, could!  This caused his hired man to
 remember that one day, as they were ploughing together, the
 plough struck something, and his employer, going back to look,
 concluded not to go round again, saying that the sky looked
 rather lowering, and so put up his team.  The like urgency has
 caused many things to be remembered which never transpired.  The
 truth is, there is money buried everywhere, and you have only to
 go to work to find it.
 
 Not far from these falls stands an oak-tree, on the interval,
 about a quarter of a mile from the river, on the farm of a
 Mr. Lund, which was pointed out to us as the spot where French,
 the leader of the party which went in pursuit of the Indians from
 Dunstable, was killed.  Farwell dodged them in the thick woods
 near.  It did not look as if men had ever had to run for their
 lives on this now open and peaceful interval.
 
 Here too was another extensive desert by the side of the road in
 Litchfield, visible from the bank of the river.  The sand was
 blown off in some places to the depth of ten or twelve feet,
 leaving small grotesque hillocks of that height, where there was
 a clump of bushes firmly rooted.  Thirty or forty years ago, as
 we were told, it was a sheep-pasture, but the sheep, being
 worried by the fleas, began to paw the ground, till they broke
 the sod, and so the sand began to blow, till now it had extended
 over forty or fifty acres.  This evil might easily have been
 remedied, at first, by spreading birches with their leaves on
 over the sand, and fastening them down with stakes, to break the
 wind.  The fleas bit the sheep, and the sheep bit the ground, and
 the sore had spread to this extent.  It is astonishing what a
 great sore a little scratch breedeth.  Who knows but Sahara,
 where caravans and cities are buried, began with the bite of an
 African flea?  This poor globe, how it must itch in many places!
 Will no god be kind enough to spread a salve of birches over its
 sores?  Here too we noticed where the Indians had gathered a heap
 of stones, perhaps for their council-fire, which, by their weight
 having prevented the sand under them from blowing away, were left
 on the summit of a mound.  They told us that arrow-heads, and
 also bullets of lead and iron, had been found here.  We noticed
 several other sandy tracts in our voyage; and the course of the
 Merrimack can be traced from the nearest mountain by its yellow
 sandbanks, though the river itself is for the most part invisible.
 Lawsuits, as we hear, have in some cases grown out of these causes.
 Railroads have been made through certain irritable districts,
 breaking their sod, and so have set the sand to blowing, till it
 has converted fertile farms into deserts, and the company has had
 to pay the damages.
 
 This sand seemed to us the connecting link between land and
 water.  It was a kind of water on which you could walk, and you
 could see the ripple-marks on its surface, produced by the winds,
 precisely like those at the bottom of a brook or lake.  We had
 read that Mussulmen are permitted by the Koran to perform their
 ablutions in sand when they cannot get water, a necessary
 indulgence in Arabia, and we now understood the propriety of this
 provision.
 
 Plum Island, at the mouth of this river, to whose formation,
 perhaps, these very banks have sent their contribution, is a
 similar desert of drifting sand, of various colors, blown into
 graceful curves by the wind.  It is a mere sand-bar exposed,
 stretching nine miles parallel to the coast, and, exclusive of
 the marsh on the inside, rarely more than half a mile wide.
 There are but half a dozen houses on it, and it is almost without
 a tree, or a sod, or any green thing with which a countryman is
 familiar.  The thin vegetation stands half buried in sand, as in
 drifting snow.  The only shrub, the beach-plum, which gives the
 island its name, grows but a few feet high; but this is so
 abundant that parties of a hundred at once come from the
 main-land and down the Merrimack, in September, pitch their
 tents, and gather the plums, which are good to eat raw and to
 preserve.  The graceful and delicate beach-pea, too, grows
 abundantly amid the sand, and several strange, moss-like and
 succulent plants.  The island for its whole length is scalloped
 into low hills, not more than twenty feet high, by the wind, and,
 excepting a faint trail on the edge of the marsh, is as trackless
 as Sahara.  There are dreary bluffs of sand and valleys ploughed
 by the wind, where you might expect to discover the bones of a
 caravan.  Schooners come from Boston to load with the sand for
 masons' uses, and in a few hours the wind obliterates all traces
 of their work.  Yet you have only to dig a foot or two anywhere
 to come to fresh water; and you are surprised to learn that
 woodchucks abound here, and foxes are found, though you see not
 where they can burrow or hide themselves.  I have walked down the
 whole length of its broad beach at low tide, at which time alone
 you can find a firm ground to walk on, and probably Massachusetts
 does not furnish a more grand and dreary walk.  On the seaside
 there are only a distant sail and a few coots to break the grand
 monotony.  A solitary stake stuck up, or a sharper sand-hill than
 usual, is remarkable as a landmark for miles; while for music you
 hear only the ceaseless sound of the surf, and the dreary peep of
 the beach-birds.
 
 
 There were several canal-boats at Cromwell's Falls passing
 through the locks, for which we waited.  In the forward part of
 one stood a brawny New Hampshire man, leaning on his pole,
 bareheaded and in shirt and trousers only, a rude Apollo of a
 man, coming down from that "vast uplandish country" to the main;
 of nameless age, with flaxen hair, and vigorous, weather-bleached
 countenance, in whose wrinkles the sun still lodged, as little
 touched by the heats and frosts and withering cares of life as a
 maple of the mountain; an undressed, unkempt, uncivil man, with
 whom we parleyed awhile, and parted not without a sincere
 interest in one another.  His humanity was genuine and
 instinctive, and his rudeness only a manner.  He inquired, just
 as we were passing out of earshot, if we had killed anything, and
 we shouted after him that we had shot a _buoy_, and could see him
 for a long while scratching his head in vain to know if he had
 heard aright.
 
 There is reason in the distinction of civil and uncivil.  The
 manners are sometimes so rough a rind that we doubt whether they
 cover any core or sap-wood at all.  We sometimes meet uncivil
 men, children of Amazons, who dwell by mountain paths, and are
 said to be inhospitable to strangers; whose salutation is as rude
 as the grasp of their brawny hands, and who deal with men as
 unceremoniously as they are wont to deal with the elements.  They
 need only to extend their clearings, and let in more sunlight, to
 seek out the southern slopes of the hills, from which they may
 look down on the civil plain or ocean, and temper their diet duly
 with the cereal fruits, consuming less wild meat and acorns, to
 become like the inhabitants of cities.  A true politeness does
 not result from any hasty and artificial polishing, it is true,
 but grows naturally in characters of the right grain and quality,
 through a long fronting of men and events, and rubbing on good
 and bad fortune.  Perhaps I can tell a tale to the purpose while
 the lock is filling,--for our voyage this forenoon furnishes but
 few incidents of importance.
 
 
 Early one summer morning I had left the shores of the
 Connecticut, and for the livelong day travelled up the bank of a
 river, which came in from the west; now looking down on the
 stream, foaming and rippling through the forest a mile off, from
 the hills over which the road led, and now sitting on its rocky
 brink and dipping my feet in its rapids, or bathing adventurously
 in mid-channel.  The hills grew more and more frequent, and
 gradually swelled into mountains as I advanced, hemming in the
 course of the river, so that at last I could not see where it
 came from, and was at liberty to imagine the most wonderful
 meanderings and descents.  At noon I slept on the grass in the
 shade of a maple, where the river had found a broader channel
 than usual, and was spread out shallow, with frequent sand-bars
 exposed.  In the names of the towns I recognized some which I had
 long ago read on teamsters' wagons, that had come from far up
 country; quiet, uplandish towns, of mountainous fame.  I walked
 along, musing and enchanted, by rows of sugar-maples, through the
 small and uninquisitive villages, and sometimes was pleased with
 the sight of a boat drawn up on a sand-bar, where there appeared
 no inhabitants to use it.  It seemed, however, as essential to
 the river as a fish, and to lend a certain dignity to it.  It was
 like the trout of mountain streams to the fishes of the sea, or
 like the young of the land-crab born far in the interior, who
 have never yet heard the sound of the ocean's surf.  The hills
 approached nearer and nearer to the stream, until at last they
 closed behind me, and I found myself just before nightfall in a
 romantic and retired valley, about half a mile in length, and
 barely wide enough for the stream at its bottom.  I thought that
 there could be no finer site for a cottage among mountains.  You
 could anywhere run across the stream on the rocks, and its
 constant murmuring would quiet the passions of mankind forever.
 Suddenly the road, which seemed aiming for the mountain-side,
 turned short to the left, and another valley opened, concealing
 the former, and of the same character with it.  It was the most
 remarkable and pleasing scenery I had ever seen.  I found here a
 few mild and hospitable inhabitants, who, as the day was not
 quite spent, and I was anxious to improve the light, directed me
 four or five miles farther on my way to the dwelling of a man
 whose name was Rice, who occupied the last and highest of the
 valleys that lay in my path, and who, they said, was a rather
 rude and uncivil man.  But "what is a foreign country to those
 who have science?  Who is a stranger to those who have the habit
 of speaking kindly?"
 
 At length, as the sun was setting behind the mountains in a still
 darker and more solitary vale, I reached the dwelling of this
 man.  Except for the narrowness of the plain, and that the stones
 were solid granite, it was the counterpart of that retreat to
 which Belphoebe bore the wounded Timias,--
 
                         "In a pleasant glade,
      With mountains round about environed,
      And mighty woods, which did the valley shade,
      And like a stately theatre it made,
      Spreading itself into a spacious plain;
      And in the midst a little river played
      Amongst the pumy stones which seemed to plain,
      With gentle murmur, that his course they did restrain."
 
 I observed, as I drew near, that he was not so rude as I had
 anticipated, for he kept many cattle, and dogs to watch them, and
 I saw where he had made maple-sugar on the sides of the
 mountains, and above all distinguished the voices of children
 mingling with the murmur of the torrent before the door.  As I
 passed his stable I met one whom I supposed to be a hired man,
 attending to his cattle, and I inquired if they entertained
 travellers at that house.  "Sometimes we do," he answered,
 gruffly, and immediately went to the farthest stall from me, and
 I perceived that it was Rice himself whom I had addressed.  But
 pardoning this incivility to the wildness of the scenery, I bent
 my steps to the house.  There was no sign-post before it, nor any
 of the usual invitations to the traveller, though I saw by the
 road that many went and came there, but the owner's name only was
 fastened to the outside; a sort of implied and sullen invitation,
 as I thought.  I passed from room to room without meeting any
 one, till I came to what seemed the guests' apartment, which was
 neat, and even had an air of refinement about it, and I was glad
 to find a map against the wall which would direct me on my
 journey on the morrow.  At length I heard a step in a distant
 apartment, which was the first I had entered, and went to see if
 the landlord had come in; but it proved to be only a child, one
 of those whose voices I had heard, probably his son, and between
 him and me stood in the doorway a large watch-dog, which growled
 at me, and looked as if he would presently spring, but the boy
 did not speak to him; and when I asked for a glass of water, he
 briefly said, "It runs in the corner." So I took a mug from the
 counter and went out of doors, and searched round the corner of
 the house, but could find neither well nor spring, nor any water
 but the stream which ran all along the front.  I came back,
 therefore, and, setting down the mug, asked the child if the
 stream was good to drink; whereupon he seized the mug, and, going
 to the corner of the room, where a cool spring which issued from
 the mountain behind trickled through a pipe into the apartment,
 filled it, and drank, and gave it to me empty again, and, calling
 to the dog, rushed out of doors.  Erelong some of the hired men
 made their appearance, and drank at the spring, and lazily washed
 themselves and combed their hair in silence, and some sat down as
 if weary, and fell asleep in their seats.  But all the while I
 saw no women, though I sometimes heard a bustle in that part of
 the house from which the spring came.
 
 At length Rice himself came in, for it was now dark, with an
 ox-whip in his hand, breathing hard, and he too soon settled down
 into his seat not far from me, as if, now that his day's work was
 done, he had no farther to travel, but only to digest his supper
 at his leisure.  When I asked him if he could give me a bed, he
 said there was one ready, in such a tone as implied that I ought
 to have known it, and the less said about that the better.  So
 far so good.  And yet he continued to look at me as if he would
 fain have me say something further like a traveller.  I remarked,
 that it was a wild and rugged country he inhabited, and worth
 coming many miles to see.  "Not so very rough neither," said he,
 and appealed to his men to bear witness to the breadth and
 smoothness of his fields, which consisted in all of one small
 interval, and to the size of his crops; "and if we have some
 hills," added he, "there's no better pasturage anywhere." I then
 asked if this place was the one I had heard of, calling it by a
 name I had seen on the map, or if it was a certain other; and he
 answered, gruffly, that it was neither the one nor the other;
 that he had settled it and cultivated it, and made it what it
 was, and I could know nothing about it.  Observing some guns and
 other implements of hunting hanging on brackets around the room,
 and his hounds now sleeping on the floor, I took occasion to
 change the discourse, and inquired if there was much game in that
 country, and he answered this question more graciously, having
 some glimmering of my drift; but when I inquired if there were
 any bears, he answered impatiently that he was no more in danger
 of losing his sheep than his neighbors; he had tamed and
 civilized that region.  After a pause, thinking of my journey on
 the morrow, and the few hours of daylight in that hollow and
 mountainous country, which would require me to be on my way
 betimes, I remarked that the day must be shorter by an hour there
 than on the neighboring plains; at which he gruffly asked what I
 knew about it, and affirmed that he had as much daylight as his
 neighbors; he ventured to say, the days were longer there than
 where I lived, as I should find if I stayed; that in some way, I
 could not be expected to understand how, the sun came over the
 mountains half an hour earlier, and stayed half an hour later
 there than on the neighboring plains.  And more of like sort he
 said.  He was, indeed, as rude as a fabled satyr.  But I suffered
 him to pass for what he was,--for why should I quarrel with
 nature?--and was even pleased at the discovery of such a singular
 natural phenomenon.  I dealt with him as if to me all manners
 were indifferent, and he had a sweet, wild way with him.  I would
 not question nature, and I would rather have him as he was than
 as I would have him.  For I had come up here not for sympathy, or
 kindness, or society, but for novelty and adventure, and to see
 what nature had produced here.  I therefore did not repel his
 rudeness, but quite innocently welcomed it all, and knew how to
 appreciate it, as if I were reading in an old drama a part well
 sustained.  He was indeed a coarse and sensual man, and, as I
 have said, uncivil, but he had his just quarrel with nature and
 mankind, I have no doubt, only he had no artificial covering to
 his ill-humors.  He was earthy enough, but yet there was good
 soil in him, and even a long-suffering Saxon probity at bottom.
 If you could represent the case to him, he would not let the race
 die out in him, like a red Indian.
 
 At length I told him that he was a fortunate man, and I trusted
 that he was grateful for so much light; and, rising, said I would
 take a lamp, and that I would pay him then for my lodging, for I
 expected to recommence my journey even as early as the sun rose
 in his country; but he answered in haste, and this time civilly,
 that I should not fail to find some of his household stirring,
 however early, for they were no sluggards, and I could take my
 breakfast with them before I started, if I chose; and as he
 lighted the lamp I detected a gleam of true hospitality and
 ancient civility, a beam of pure and even gentle humanity, from
 his bleared and moist eyes.  It was a look more intimate with me,
 and more explanatory, than any words of his could have been if he
 had tried to his dying day.  It was more significant than any
 Rice of those parts could even comprehend, and long anticipated
 this man's culture,--a glance of his pure genius, which did not
 much enlighten him, but did impress and rule him for the moment,
 and faintly constrain his voice and manner.  He cheerfully led
 the way to my apartment, stepping over the limbs of his men, who
 were asleep on the floor in an intervening chamber, and showed me
 a clean and comfortable bed.  For many pleasant hours after the
 household was asleep I sat at the open window, for it was a
 sultry night, and heard the little river
 
    "Amongst the pumy stones, which seemed to plain,
      With gentle murmur, that his course they did restrain."
 
 But I arose as usual by starlight the next morning, before my
 host, or his men, or even his dogs, were awake; and, having left
 a ninepence on the counter, was already half-way over the
 mountain with the sun before they had broken their fast.
 
 Before I had left the country of my host, while the first rays of
 the sun slanted over the mountains, as I stopped by the wayside
 to gather some raspberries, a very old man, not far from a
 hundred, came along with a milking-pail in his hand, and turning
 aside began to pluck the berries near me:--
 
           "His reverend locks
      In comelye curles did wave;
      And on his aged temples grew
         The blossoms of the grave."
 
 But when I inquired the way, he answered in a low, rough voice,
 without looking up or seeming to regard my presence, which I
 imputed to his years; and presently, muttering to himself, he
 proceeded to collect his cows in a neighboring pasture; and when
 he had again returned near to the wayside, he suddenly stopped,
 while his cows went on before, and, uncovering his head, prayed
 aloud in the cool morning air, as if he had forgotten this
 exercise before, for his daily bread, and also that He who
 letteth his rain fall on the just and on the unjust, and without
 whom not a sparrow falleth to the ground, would not neglect the
 stranger (meaning me), and with even more direct and personal
 applications, though mainly according to the long-established
 formula common to lowlanders and the inhabitants of mountains.
 When he had done praying, I made bold to ask him if he had any
 cheese in his hut which he would sell me, but he answered without
 looking up, and in the same low and repulsive voice as before,
 that they did not make any, and went to milking.  It is written,
 "The stranger who turneth away from a house with disappointed
 hopes, leaveth there his own offences, and departeth, taking with
 him all the good actions of the owner."
 
 
 Being now fairly in the stream of this week's commerce, we began
 to meet with boats more frequently, and hailed them from time to
 time with the freedom of sailors.  The boatmen appeared to lead
 an easy and contented life, and we thought that we should prefer
 their employment ourselves to many professions which are much
 more sought after.  They suggested how few circumstances are
 necessary to the well-being and serenity of man, how indifferent
 all employments are, and that any may seem noble and poetic to
 the eyes of men, if pursued with sufficient buoyancy and freedom.
 With liberty and pleasant weather, the simplest occupation, any
 unquestioned country mode of life which detains us in the open
 air, is alluring.  The man who picks peas steadily for a living
 is more than respectable, he is even envied by his shop-worn
 neighbors.  We are as happy as the birds when our Good Genius
 permits us to pursue any out-door work, without a sense of
 dissipation.  Our penknife glitters in the sun; our voice is
 echoed by yonder wood; if an oar drops, we are fain to let it
 drop again.
 
 The canal-boat is of very simple construction, requiring but
 little ship-timber, and, as we were told, costs about two hundred
 dollars.  They are managed by two men.  In ascending the stream
 they use poles fourteen or fifteen feet long, pointed with iron,
 walking about one third the length of the boat from the forward
 end.  Going down, they commonly keep in the middle of the stream,
 using an oar at each end; or if the wind is favorable they raise
 their broad sail, and have only to steer.  They commonly carry
 down wood or bricks,--fifteen or sixteen cords of wood, and as
 many thousand bricks, at a time,--and bring back stores for the
 country, consuming two or three days each way between Concord and
 Charlestown.  They sometimes pile the wood so as to leave a
 shelter in one part where they may retire from the rain.  One can
 hardly imagine a more healthful employment, or one more favorable
 to contemplation and the observation of nature.  Unlike the
 mariner, they have the constantly varying panorama of the shore
 to relieve the monotony of their labor, and it seemed to us that
 as they thus glided noiselessly from town to town, with all their
 furniture about them, for their very homestead is a movable, they
 could comment on the character of the inhabitants with greater
 advantage and security to themselves than the traveller in a
 coach, who would be unable to indulge in such broadsides of wit
 and humor in so small a vessel for fear of the recoil.  They are
 not subject to great exposure, like the lumberers of Maine, in
 any weather, but inhale the healthfullest breezes, being slightly
 encumbered with clothing, frequently with the head and feet bare.
 When we met them at noon as they were leisurely descending the
 stream, their busy commerce did not look like toil, but rather
 like some ancient Oriental game still played on a large scale, as
 the game of chess, for instance, handed down to this generation.
 From morning till night, unless the wind is so fair that his
 single sail will suffice without other labor than steering, the
 boatman walks backwards and forwards on the side of his boat, now
 stooping with his shoulder to the pole, then drawing it back
 slowly to set it again, meanwhile moving steadily forward through
 an endless valley and an everchanging scenery, now distinguishing
 his course for a mile or two, and now shut in by a sudden turn of
 the river in a small woodland lake.  All the phenomena which
 surround him are simple and grand, and there is something
 impressive, even majestic, in the very motion he causes, which
 will naturally be communicated to his own character, and he feels
 the slow, irresistible movement under him with pride, as if it
 were his own energy.
 
 The news spread like wildfire among us youths, when formerly,
 once in a year or two, one of these boats came up the Concord
 River, and was seen stealing mysteriously through the meadows and
 past the village.  It came and departed as silently as a cloud,
 without noise or dust, and was witnessed by few.  One summer day
 this huge traveller might be seen moored at some meadow's wharf,
 and another summer day it was not there.  Where precisely it came
 from, or who these men were who knew the rocks and soundings
 better than we who bathed there, we could never tell.  We knew
 some river's bay only, but they took rivers from end to end.
 They were a sort of fabulous river-men to us.  It was
 inconceivable by what sort of mediation any mere landsman could
 hold communication with them.  Would they heave to, to gratify
 his wishes?  No, it was favor enough to know faintly of their
 destination, or the time of their possible return.  I have seen
 them in the summer when the stream ran low, mowing the weeds in
 mid-channel, and with hayers' jests cutting broad swaths in three
 feet of water, that they might make a passage for their scow,
 while the grass in long windrows was carried down the stream,
 undried by the rarest hay-weather.  We admired unweariedly how
 their vessel would float, like a huge chip, sustaining so many
 casks of lime, and thousands of bricks, and such heaps of iron
 ore, with wheelbarrows aboard, and that, when we stepped on it,
 it did not yield to the pressure of our feet.  It gave us
 confidence in the prevalence of the law of buoyancy, and we
 imagined to what infinite uses it might be put.  The men appeared
 to lead a kind of life on it, and it was whispered that they
 slept aboard.  Some affirmed that it carried sail, and that such
 winds blew here as filled the sails of vessels on the ocean;
 which again others much doubted.  They had been seen to sail
 across our Fair Haven bay by lucky fishers who were out, but
 unfortunately others were not there to see.  We might then say
 that our river was navigable,--why not?  In after-years I read in
 print, with no little satisfaction, that it was thought by some
 that, with a little expense in removing rocks and deepening the
 channel, "there might be a profitable inland navigation." _I_
 then lived some-where to tell of.
 
 Such is Commerce, which shakes the cocoa-nut and bread-fruit tree
 in the remotest isle, and sooner or later dawns on the duskiest
 and most simple-minded savage.  If we may be pardoned the
 digression, who can help being affected at the thought of the
 very fine and slight, but positive relation, in which the savage
 inhabitants of some remote isle stand to the mysterious white
 mariner, the child of the sun?--as if _we_ were to have dealings
 with an animal higher in the scale of being than ourselves.  It
 is a barely recognized fact to the natives that he exists, and
 has his home far away somewhere, and is glad to buy their fresh
 fruits with his superfluous commodities.  Under the same catholic
 sun glances his white ship over Pacific waves into their smooth
 bays, and the poor savage's paddle gleams in the air.
 
      Man's little acts are grand,
      Beheld from land to land,
      There as they lie in time,
      Within their native clime
           Ships with the noontide weigh,
           And glide before its ray
           To some retired bay,
           Their haunt,
           Whence, under tropic sun,
           Again they run,
           Bearing gum Senegal and Tragicant.
      For this was ocean meant,
      For this the sun was sent,
      And moon was lent,
      And winds in distant caverns pent.
 
 Since our voyage the railroad on the bank has been extended, and
 there is now but little boating on the Merrimack.  All kinds of
 produce and stores were formerly conveyed by water, but now
 nothing is carried up the stream, and almost wood and bricks
 alone are carried down, and these are also carried on the
 railroad.  The locks are fast wearing out, and will soon be
 impassable, since the tolls will not pay the expense of repairing
 them, and so in a few years there will be an end of boating on
 this river.  The boating at present is principally between
 Merrimack and Lowell, or Hooksett and Manchester.  They make two
 or three trips in a week, according to wind and weather, from
 Merrimack to Lowell and back, about twenty-five miles each way.
 The boatman comes singing in to shore late at night, and moors
 his empty boat, and gets his supper and lodging in some house
 near at hand, and again early in the morning, by starlight
 perhaps, he pushes away up stream, and, by a shout, or the
 fragment of a song, gives notice of his approach to the lock-man,
 with whom he is to take his breakfast.  If he gets up to his
 wood-pile before noon he proceeds to load his boat, with the help
 of his single "hand," and is on his way down again before night.
 When he gets to Lowell he unloads his boat, and gets his receipt
 for his cargo, and, having heard the news at the public house at
 Middlesex or elsewhere, goes back with his empty boat and his
 receipt in his pocket to the owner, and to get a new load.  We
 were frequently advertised of their approach by some faint sound
 behind us, and looking round saw them a mile off, creeping
 stealthily up the side of the stream like alligators.  It was
 pleasant to hail these sailors of the Merrimack from time to
 time, and learn the news which circulated with them.  We imagined
 that the sun shining on their bare heads had stamped a liberal
 and public character on their most private thoughts.
 
 The open and sunny interval still stretched away from the river
 sometimes by two or more terraces, to the distant hill-country,
 and when we climbed the bank we commonly found an irregular
 copse-wood skirting the river, the primitive having floated
 down-stream long ago to----the "King's navy." Sometimes we saw
 the river-road a quarter or half a mile distant, and the
 particolored Concord stage, with its cloud of dust, its van of
 earnest travelling faces, and its rear of dusty trunks, reminding
 us that the country had its places of rendezvous for restless
 Yankee men.  There dwelt along at considerable distances on this
 interval a quiet agricultural and pastoral people, with every
 house its well, as we sometimes proved, and every household,
 though never so still and remote it appeared in the noontide, its
 dinner about these times.  There they lived on, those New England
 people, farmer lives, father and grandfather and great-grandfather,
 on and on without noise, keeping up tradition, and expecting,
 beside fair weather and abundant harvests, we did not learn what.
 They were contented to live, since it was so contrived for them,
 and where their lines had fallen.
 
      Our uninquiring corpses lie more low
      Than our life's curiosity doth go.
 
 Yet these men had no need to travel to be as wise as Solomon in
 all his glory, so similar are the lives of men in all countries,
 and fraught with the same homely experiences.  One half the world
 _knows_ how the other half lives.
 
 About noon we passed a small village in Merrimack at Thornton's
 Ferry, and tasted of the waters of Naticook Brook on the same
 side, where French and his companions, whose grave we saw in
 Dunstable, were ambuscaded by the Indians.  The humble village of
 Litchfield, with its steepleless meeting-house, stood on the
 opposite or east bank, near where a dense grove of willows
 backed by maples skirted the shore.  There also we noticed some
 shagbark-trees, which, as they do not grow in Concord, were as
 strange a sight to us as the palm would be, whose fruit only we
 have seen.  Our course now curved gracefully to the north,
 leaving a low, flat shore on the Merrimack side, which forms a
 sort of harbor for canal-boats.  We observed some fair elms
 and particularly large and handsome white-maples standing
 conspicuously on this interval; and the opposite shore, a quarter
 of a mile below, was covered with young elms and maples six
 inches high, which had probably sprung from the seeds which had
 been washed across.
 
 Some carpenters were at work here mending a scow on the green and
 sloping bank.  The strokes of their mallets echoed from shore to
 shore, and up and down the river, and their tools gleamed in the
 sun a quarter of a mile from us, and we realized that boat-building
 was as ancient and honorable an art as agriculture, and that
 there might be a naval as well as a pastoral life.  The whole
 history of commerce was made manifest in that scow turned bottom
 upward on the shore.  Thus did men begin to go down upon the sea
 in ships; _quaeque diu steterant in montibus altis, Fluctibus
 ignotis insultavere carinae;_ "and keels which had long stood on
 high mountains careered insultingly (_insultavere_) over unknown
 waves." (Ovid, Met.  I. 133.) We thought that it would be well
 for the traveller to build his boat on the bank of a stream,
 instead of finding a ferry or a bridge.  In the Adventures of
 Henry the fur-trader, it is pleasant to read that when with his
 Indians he reached the shore of Ontario, they consumed two days
 in making two canoes of the bark of the elm-tree, in which to
 transport themselves to Fort Niagara.  It is a worthy incident in
 a journey, a delay as good as much rapid travelling.  A good
 share of our interest in Xenophon's story of his retreat is in
 the manoeuvres to get the army safely over the rivers, whether on
 rafts of logs or fagots, or sheep-skins blown up.  And where
 could they better afford to tarry meanwhile than on the banks of
 a river?
 
 As we glided past at a distance, these out-door workmen appeared
 to have added some dignity to their labor by its very publicness.
 It was a part of the industry of nature, like the work of hornets
 and mud-wasps.
 
       The waves slowly beat,
       Just to keep the noon sweet,
       And no sound is floated o'er,
       Save the mallet on shore,
       Which echoing on high
       Seems a-calking the sky.
 
 The haze, the sun's dust of travel, had a Lethean influence on
 the land and its inhabitants, and all creatures resigned
 themselves to float upon the inappreciable tides of nature.
 
      Woof of the sun, ethereal gauze,
      Woven of Nature's richest stuffs,
      Visible heat, air-water, and dry sea,
      Last conquest of the eye;
      Toil of the day displayed sun-dust,
      Aerial surf upon the shores of earth.
      Ethereal estuary, frith of light,
      Breakers of air, billows of heat
      Fine summer spray on inland seas;
      Bird of the sun, transparent-winged
      Owlet of noon, soft-pinioned,
      From heath or stubble rising without song;
      Establish thy serenity o'er the fields
 
 The routine which is in the sunshine and the finest days, as that
 which has conquered and prevailed, commends itself to us by its
 very antiquity and apparent solidity and necessity.  Our weakness
 needs it, and our strength uses it.  We cannot draw on our boots
 without bracing ourselves against it.  If there were but one
 erect and solid standing tree in the woods, all creatures would
 go to rub against it and make sure of their footing.  During the
 many hours which we spend in this waking sleep, the hand stands
 still on the face of the clock, and we grow like corn in the
 night.  Men are as busy as the brooks or bees, and postpone
 everything to their business; as carpenters discuss politics
 between the strokes of the hammer while they are shingling a
 roof.
 
 
 This noontide was a fit occasion to make some pleasant harbor,
 and there read the journal of some voyageur like ourselves, not
 too moral nor inquisitive, and which would not disturb the noon;
 or else some old classic, the very flower of all reading, which
 we had postponed to such a season
 
      "Of Syrian peace, immortal leisure."
 
 But, alas, our chest, like the cabin of a coaster, contained only
 its well-thumbed "Navigator" for all literature, and we were
 obliged to draw on our memory for these things.
 
 We naturally remembered Alexander Henry's Adventures here, as a
 sort of classic among books of American travel.  It contains
 scenery and rough sketching of men and incidents enough to
 inspire poets for many years, and to my fancy is as full of
 sounding names as any page of history,--Lake Winnipeg, Hudson
 Bay, Ottaway, and portages innumerable; Chipeways, Gens de
 Terres, Les Pilleurs, The Weepers; with reminiscences of Hearne's
 journey, and the like; an immense and shaggy but sincere country,
 summer and winter, adorned with chains of lakes and rivers,
 covered with snows, with hemlocks, and fir-trees.  There is a
 naturalness, an unpretending and cold life in this traveller, as
 in a Canadian winter, what life was preserved through low
 temperatures and frontier dangers by furs within a stout heart.
 He has truth and moderation worthy of the father of history,
 which belong only to an intimate experience, and he does not
 defer too much to literature.  The unlearned traveller may quote
 his single line from the poets with as good right as the scholar.
 He too may speak of the stars, for he sees them shoot perhaps
 when the astronomer does not.  The good sense of this author is
 very conspicuous.  He is a traveller who does not exaggerate, but
 writes for the information of his readers, for science, and for
 history.  His story is told with as much good faith and
 directness as if it were a report to his brother traders, or the
 Directors of the Hudson Bay Company, and is fitly dedicated to
 Sir Joseph Banks.  It reads like the argument to a great poem on
 the primitive state of the country and its inhabitants, and the
 reader imagines what in each case, with the invocation of the
 Muse, might be sung, and leaves off with suspended interest, as
 if the full account were to follow.  In what school was this
 fur-trader educated?  He seems to travel the immense snowy
 country with such purpose only as the reader who accompanies him,
 and to the latter's imagination, it is, as it were, momentarily
 created to be the scene of his adventures.  What is most
 interesting and valuable in it, however, is not the materials for
 the history of Pontiac, or Braddock, or the Northwest, which it
 furnishes; not the _annals_ of the country, but the natural
 facts, or _perennials_, which are ever without date.  When out of
 history the truth shall be extracted, it will have shed its dates
 like withered leaves.
 
 
 The Souhegan, or _Crooked_ River, as some translate it, comes in
 from the west about a mile and a half above Thornton's Ferry.
 Babboosuck Brook empties into it near its mouth.  There are said
 to be some of the finest water privileges in the country still
 unimproved on the former stream, at a short distance from the
 Merrimack.  One spring morning, March 22, in the year 1677, an
 incident occurred on the banks of the river here, which is
 interesting to us as a slight memorial of an interview between
 two ancient tribes of men, one of which is now extinct, while the
 other, though it is still represented by a miserable remnant, has
 long since disappeared from its ancient hunting-grounds.  A
 Mr. James Parker, at "Mr. Hinchmanne's farme ner Meremack," wrote
 thus "to the Honred Governer and Council at Bostown, _Hast, Post
 Hast":_--
 
   "Sagamore Wanalancet come this morning to informe me, and then
   went to Mr. Tyng's to informe him, that his son being on ye
   other sid of Meremack river over against Souhegan upon the 22
   day of this instant, about tene of the clock in the morning, he
   discovered 15 Indians on this sid the river, which he soposed
   to be Mohokes by ther spech.  He called to them; they answered,
   but he could not understand ther spech; and he having a conow
   ther in the river, he went to breck his conow that they might
   not have ani ues of it.  In the mean time they shot about
   thirty guns at him, and he being much frighted fled, and come
   home forthwith to Nahamcock [Pawtucket Falls or Lowell], wher
   ther wigowames now stand."
 
 Penacooks and Mohawks! _ubique gentium sunt?_ In the year 1670, a
 Mohawk warrior scalped a Naamkeak or else a Wamesit Indian maiden
 near where Lowell now stands.  She, however, recovered.  Even as
 late as 1685, John Hogkins, a Penacook Indian, who describes his
 grandfather as having lived "at place called Malamake rever,
 other name chef Natukkog and Panukkog, that one rever great many
 names," wrote thus to the governor:--
 
                                                  "May 15th, 1685.
 
   "Honor governor my friend,--
 
   "You my friend I desire your worship and your power, because I
   hope you can do som great matters this one.  I am poor and
   naked and I have no men at my place because I afraid allwayes
   Mohogs he will kill me every day and night.  If your worship
   when please pray help me you no let Mohogs kill me at my place
   at Malamake river called Pannukkog and Natukkog, I will submit
   your worship and your power.  And now I want pouder and such
   alminishon shatt and guns, because I have forth at my hom and I
   plant theare.
 
   "This all Indian hand, but pray you do consider your humble
   servant,
 
                                                 ^John Hogkins^."
 
   Signed also by Simon Detogkom, King Hary, Sam Linis, Mr. Jorge
   Rodunnonukgus, John Owamosimmin, and nine other Indians, with
   their marks against their names.
 
 But now, one hundred and fifty-four years having elapsed since
 the date of this letter, we went unalarmed on our way without
 "brecking" our "conow," reading the New England Gazetteer, and
 seeing no traces of "Mohogs" on the banks.
 
 The Souhegan, though a rapid river, seemed to-day to have
 borrowed its character from the noon.
 
      Where gleaming fields of haze
      Meet the voyageur's gaze,
      And above, the heated air
      Seems to make a river there,
      The pines stand up with pride
      By the Souhegan's side,
      And the hemlock and the larch
      With their triumphal arch
      Are waving o'er its march
         To the sea.
      No wind stirs its waves,
      But the spirits of the braves
         Hov'ring o'er,
      Whose antiquated graves
      Its still water laves
         On the shore.
      With an Indian's stealthy tread
      It goes sleeping in its bed,
      Without joy or grief,
      Or the rustle of a leaf,
      Without a ripple or a billow,
      Or the sigh of a willow,
      From the Lyndeboro' hills
      To the Merrimack mills.
      With a louder din
      Did its current begin,
      When melted the snow
      On the far mountain's brow,
      And the drops came together
      In that rainy weather.
      Experienced river,
      Hast thou flowed forever?
      Souhegan soundeth old,
      But the half is not told,
      What names hast thou borne,
      In the ages far gone,
      When the Xanthus and Meander
      Commenced to wander,
      Ere the black bear haunted
         Thy red forest-floor,
      Or Nature had planted
         The pines by thy shore?
 
 During the heat of the day, we rested on a large island a mile
 above the mouth of this river, pastured by a herd of cattle, with
 steep banks and scattered elms and oaks, and a sufficient channel
 for canal-boats on each side.  When we made a fire to boil some
 rice for our dinner, the flames spreading amid the dry grass, and
 the smoke curling silently upward and casting grotesque shadows
 on the ground, seemed phenomena of the noon, and we fancied that
 we progressed up the stream without effort, and as naturally as
 the wind and tide went down, not outraging the calm days by
 unworthy bustle or impatience.  The woods on the neighboring
 shore were alive with pigeons, which were moving south, looking
 for mast, but now, like ourselves, spending their noon in the
 shade.  We could hear the slight, wiry, winnowing sound of their
 wings as they changed their roosts from time to time, and their
 gentle and tremulous cooing.  They sojourned with us during the
 noontide, greater travellers far than we.  You may frequently
 discover a single pair sitting upon the lower branches of the
 white-pine in the depths of the wood, at this hour of the day, so
 silent and solitary, and with such a hermit-like appearance, as
 if they had never strayed beyond its skirts, while the acorn
 which was gathered in the forests of Maine is still undigested in
 their crops.  We obtained one of these handsome birds, which
 lingered too long upon its perch, and plucked and broiled it here
 with some other game, to be carried along for our supper; for,
 beside the provisions which we carried with us, we depended
 mainly on the river and forest for our supply.  It is true, it
 did not seem to be putting this bird to its right use to pluck
 off its feathers, and extract its entrails, and broil its carcass
 on the coals; but we heroically persevered, nevertheless, waiting
 for further information.  The same regard for Nature which
 excited our sympathy for her creatures nerved our hands to carry
 through what we had begun.  For we would be honorable to the
 party we deserted; we would fulfil fate, and so at length,
 perhaps, detect the secret innocence of these incessant tragedies
 which Heaven allows.
 
      "Too quick resolves do resolution wrong,
      What, part so soon to be divorced so long?
      Things to be done are long to be debated;
      Heaven is not day'd, Repentance is not dated."
 
 We are double-edged blades, and every time we whet our virtue the
 return stroke straps our vice.  Where is the skilful swordsman who
 can give clean wounds, and not rip up his work with the other
 edge?
 
 Nature herself has not provided the most graceful end for her
 creatures.  What becomes of all these birds that people the air
 and forest for our solacement?  The sparrows seem always
 _chipper_, never infirm.  We do not see their bodies lie about.
 Yet there is a tragedy at the end of each one of their lives.
 They must perish miserably; not one of them is translated.  True,
 "not a sparrow falleth to the ground without our Heavenly
 Father's knowledge," but they do fall, nevertheless.
 
 The carcasses of some poor squirrels, however, the same that
 frisked so merrily in the morning, which we had skinned and
 embowelled for our dinner, we abandoned in disgust, with tardy
 humanity, as too wretched a resource for any but starving men.
 It was to perpetuate the practice of a barbarous era.  If they
 had been larger, our crime had been less.  Their small red
 bodies, little bundles of red tissue, mere gobbets of venison,
 would not have "fattened fire." With a sudden impulse we threw
 them away, and washed our hands, and boiled some rice for our
 dinner.  "Behold the difference between the one who eateth flesh,
 and him to whom it belonged!  The first hath a momentary
 enjoyment, whilst the latter is deprived of existence!" "Who
 would commit so great a crime against a poor animal, who is fed
 only by the herbs which grow wild in the woods, and whose belly
 is burnt up with hunger?" We remembered a picture of mankind in
 the hunter age, chasing hares down the mountains; O me miserable!
 Yet sheep and oxen are but larger squirrels, whose hides are
 saved and meat is salted, whose souls perchance are not so large
 in proportion to their bodies.
 
 There should always be some flowering and maturing of the fruits
 of nature in the cooking process.  Some simple dishes recommend
 themselves to our imaginations as well as palates.  In parched
 corn, for instance, there is a manifest sympathy between the
 bursting seed and the more perfect developments of vegetable
 life.  It is a perfect flower with its petals, like the houstonia
 or anemone.  On my warm hearth these cerealian blossoms expanded;
 here is the bank whereon they grew.  Perhaps some such visible
 blessing would always attend the simple and wholesome repast.
 
 Here was that "pleasant harbor" which we had sighed for, where
 the weary voyageur could read the journal of some other sailor,
 whose bark had ploughed, perchance, more famous and classic seas.
 At the tables of the gods, after feasting follow music and song;
 we will recline now under these island trees, and for our
 minstrel call on
 
                             ANACREON.
 
      "Nor has he ceased his charming song, for still that lyre,
      Though he is dead, sleeps not in Hades."
                                 _Simonides' Epigram on Anacreon._
 
 I lately met with an old volume from a London bookshop, containing
 the Greek Minor Poets, and it was a pleasure to read once more
 only the words, Orpheus, Linus, Musaeus,--those faint poetic
 sounds and echoes of a name, dying away on the ears of us modern
 men; and those hardly more substantial sounds, Mimnermus, Ibycus,
 Alcaeus, Stesichorus, Menander.  They lived not in vain.  We can
 converse with these bodiless fames without reserve or
 personality.
 
 I know of no studies so composing as those of the classical
 scholar.  When we have sat down to them, life seems as still
 and serene as if it were very far off, and I believe it is
 not habitually seen from any common platform so truly and
 unexaggerated as in the light of literature.  In serene hours we
 contemplate the tour of the Greek and Latin authors with more
 pleasure than the traveller does the fairest scenery of Greece or
 Italy.  Where shall we find a more refined society?  That highway
 down from Homer and Hesiod to Horace and Juvenal is more attractive
 than the Appian.  Reading the classics, or conversing with those
 old Greeks and Latins in their surviving works, is like walking
 amid the stars and constellations, a high and by way serene to
 travel.  Indeed, the true scholar will be not a little of an
 astronomer in his habits.  Distracting cares will not be allowed
 to obstruct the field of his vision, for the higher regions of
 literature, like astronomy, are above storm and darkness.
 
 But passing by these rumors of bards, let us pause for a moment
 at the Teian poet.
 
 There is something strangely modern about him.  He is very easily
 turned into English.  Is it that our lyric poets have resounded
 but that lyre, which would sound only light subjects, and which
 Simonides tells us does not sleep in Hades?  His odes are like
 gems of pure ivory.  They possess an ethereal and evanescent
 beauty like summer evenings, <ho chr_e' se noei~n no'ou
 a'nthei,>--_which you must perceive with the flower of the
 mind_,--and show how slight a beauty could be expressed.  You
 have to consider them, as the stars of lesser magnitude, with the
 side of the eye, and look aside from them to behold them.  They
 charm us by their serenity and freedom from exaggeration and
 passion, and by a certain flower-like beauty, which does not
 propose itself, but must be approached and studied like a natural
 object.  But perhaps their chief merit consists in the lightness
 and yet security of their tread;
 
      "The young and tender stalk
      Ne'er bends when _they_ do walk."
 
 True, our nerves are never strung by them; it is too constantly
 the sound of the lyre, and never the note of the trumpet; but
 they are not gross, as has been presumed, but always elevated
 above the sensual.
 
 These are some of the best that have come down to us.
 
 
      ON HIS LYRE.
 
      I wish to sing the Atridae,
      And Cadmus I wish to sing;
      But my lyre sounds
      Only love with its chords.
      Lately I changed the strings
      And all the lyre;
      And I began to sing the labors
      Of Hercules; but my lyre
      Resounded loves.
      Farewell, henceforth, for me,
      Heroes! for my lyre
      Sings only loves.
 
      TO A SWALLOW.
 
      Thou indeed, dear swallow,
      Yearly going and coming,
      In summer weavest thy nest,
      And in winter go'st disappearing
      Either to Nile or to Memphis.
      But Love always weaveth
      His nest in my heart....
 
      ON A SILVER CUP.
 
      Turning the silver,
      Vulcan, make for me,
      Not indeed a panoply,
      For what are battles to me?
      But a hollow cup,
      As deep as thou canst
      And make for me in it
      Neither stars, nor wagons,
      Nor sad Orion;
      What are the Pleiades to me?
      What the shining Bootes?
      Make vines for me,
      And clusters of grapes in it,
      And of gold Love and Bathyllus
      Treading the grapes
      With the fair Lyaeus
 
      ON HIMSELF.
 
      Thou sing'st the affairs of Thebes,
      And he the battles of Troy,
      But I of my own defeats.
      No horse have wasted me,
      Nor foot, nor ships;
      But a new and different host,
      From eyes smiting me.
 
 
      TO A DOVE
 
      Lovely dove,
      Whence, whence dost thou fly?
      Whence, running on air,
      Dost thou waft and diffuse
      So many sweet ointments?
      Who art? What thy errand?--
      Anacreon sent me
      To a boy, to Bathyllus,
      Who lately is ruler and tyrant of all.
      Cythere has sold me
      For one little song,
      And I'm doing this service
      For Anacreon.
      And now, as you see,
      I bear letters from him.
      And he says that directly
      He'll make me free,
      But though he release me,
      His slave I will tarry with him.
      For why should I fly
      Over mountains and fields,
      And perch upon trees,
      Eating some wild thing?
      Now indeed I eat bread,
      Plucking it from the hands
      Of Anacreon himself;
      And he gives me to drink
      The wine which he tastes,
      And drinking, I dance,
      And shadow my master's
      Face with my wings;
      And, going to rest,
      On the lyre itself I sleep.
      That is all; get thee gone.
      Thou hast made me more talkative,
      Man, than a crow.
 
      ON LOVE.
 
      Love walking swiftly,
      With hyacinthine staff,
      Bade me to take a run with him;
      And hastening through swift torrents,
      And woody places, and over precipices,
      A water-snake stung me.
      And my heart leaped up to
      My mouth, and I should have fainted;
      But Love fanning my brows
      With his soft wings, said,
      Surely, thou art not able to love.
 
      ON WOMEN.
 
      Nature has given horns
      To bulls, and hoofs to horses,
      Swiftness to hares,
      To lions yawning teeth,
      To fishes swimming,
      To birds flight,
      To men wisdom.
      For woman she had nothing beside;
      What then does she give? Beauty,--
      Instead of all sheilds,
      Instead of all  spears;
      And she conquers even iron
      And fire, who is beautiful.
 
      ON LOVERS.
 
      Horses have the mark
      Of fire on their sides,
      And some have distinguished
      The Parthian men by their crests;
      So I, seeing lovers,
      Know them at once,
      For they have a certain slight
      Brand on their hearts.
 
      TO A SWALLOW.
 
      What dost thou wish me to do to thee,--
      What, thou loquacious swallow?
      Dost thou wish me taking thee
      Thy light pinions to clip?
      Or rather to pluck out
      Thy tongue from within,
      As that Tereus did?
      Why with thy notes in the dawn
      Hast thou plundered Bathyllus
      From my beautiful dreams?
 
      TO A COLT.
 
      Thracian colt, why at me
      Looking aslant with thy eyes,
      Dost thou cruelly flee,
      And think that I know nothing wise?
      Know I could well
      Put the bridle on thee,
      And holding the reins, turn
      Round the bounds of the course.
      But now thou browsest the meads,
      And gambolling lightly dost play,
      For thou hast no skilful horseman
      Mounted upon thy back.
 
      CUPID WOUNDED.
 
      Love once among roses
      Saw not
      A sleeping bee, but was stung;
      And being wounded in the finger
      Of his hand, cried for pain.
      Running as well as flying
      To the beautiful Venus,
      I am killed, mother, said he,
      I am killed, and I die.
      A little serpent has stung me,
      Winged, which they call
      A bee,--the husbandmen.
      And she said, If the sting
      Of a bee afflicts you,
      How, think you, are they afflicted,
      Love, whom you smite?
 
 
             -----------
 
 
 Late in the afternoon, for we had lingered long on the island, we
 raised our sail for the first time, and for a short hour the
 southwest wind was our ally; but it did not please Heaven to abet
 us along.  With one sail raised we swept slowly up the eastern
 side of the stream, steering clear of the rocks, while, from the
 top of a hill which formed the opposite bank, some lumberers were
 rolling down timber to be rafted down the stream.  We could see
 their axes and levers gleaming in the sun, and the logs came down
 with a dust and a rumbling sound, which was reverberated through
 the woods beyond us on our side, like the roar of artillery.  But
 Zephyr soon took us out of sight and hearing of this commerce.
 Having passed Read's Ferry, and another island called McGaw's
 Island, we reached some rapids called Moore's Falls, and entered
 on "that section of the river, nine miles in extent, converted,
 by law, into the Union Canal, comprehending in that space six
 distinct falls; at each of which, and at several intermediate
 places, work has been done."  After passing Moore's Falls by
 means of locks, we again had recourse to our oars, and went
 merrily on our way, driving the small sandpiper from rock to rock
 before us, and sometimes rowing near enough to a cottage on the
 bank, though they were few and far between, to see the sunflowers,
 and the seed vessels of the poppy, like small goblets filled with
 the water of Lethe, before the door, but without disturbing the
 sluggish household behind.  Thus we held on, sailing or dipping
 our way along with the paddle up this broad river, smooth and
 placid, flowing over concealed rocks, where we could see the
 pickerel lying low in the transparent water, eager to double some
 distant cape, to make some great bend as in the life of man, and
 see what new perspective would open; looking far into a new
 country, broad and serene, the cottages of settlers seen afar for
 the first time, yet with the moss of a century on their roofs,
 and the third or fourth generation in their shadows.  Strange was
 it to consider how the sun and the summer, the buds of spring and
 the seared leaves of autumn, were related to these cabins along
 the shore; how all the rays which paint the landscape radiate
 from them, and the flight of the crow and the gyrations of the
 hawk have reference to their roofs.  Still the ever rich and
 fertile shores accompanied us, fringed with vines and alive with
 small birds and frisking squirrels, the edge of some farmer's
 field or widow's wood-lot, or wilder, perchance, where the
 muskrat, the little medicine of the river, drags itself along
 stealthily over the alder-leaves and muscle-shells, and man and
 the memory of man are banished far.
 
 At length the unwearied, never-sinking shore, still holding on
 without break, with its cool copses and serene pasture-grounds,
 tempted us to disembark; and we adventurously landed on this
 remote coast, to survey it, without the knowledge of any human
 inhabitant probably to this day.  But we still remember the
 gnarled and hospitable oaks which grew even there for our
 entertainment, and were no strangers to us, the lonely horse in
 his pasture, and the patient cows, whose path to the river, so
 judiciously chosen to overcome the difficulties of the way, we
 followed, and disturbed their ruminations in the shade; and,
 above all, the cool, free aspect of the wild apple-trees,
 generously proffering their fruit to us, though still green and
 crude,--the hard, round, glossy fruit, which, if not ripe, still
 was not poison, but New-English too, brought hither its ancestors
 by ours once.  These gentler trees imparted a half-civilized and
 twilight aspect to the otherwise barbarian land.  Still farther
 on we scrambled up the rocky channel of a brook, which had long
 served nature for a sluice there, leaping like it from rock to
 rock through tangled woods, at the bottom of a ravine, which grew
 darker and darker, and more and more hoarse the murmurs of the
 stream, until we reached the ruins of a mill, where now the ivy
 grew, and the trout glanced through the crumbling flume; and
 there we imagined what had been the dreams and speculations of
 some early settler.  But the waning day compelled us to embark
 once more, and redeem this wasted time with long and vigorous
 sweeps over the rippling stream.
 
 It was still wild and solitary, except that at intervals of a
 mile or two the roof of a cottage might be seen over the bank.
 This region, as we read, was once famous for the manufacture of
 straw bonnets of the Leghorn kind, of which it claims the
 invention in these parts; and occasionally some industrious
 damsel tripped down to the water's edge, to put her straw a-soak,
 as it appeared, and stood awhile to watch the retreating
 voyageurs, and catch the fragment of a boat-song which we had
 made, wafted over the water.
 
    Thus, perchance, the Indian hunter,
      Many a lagging year agone,
    Gliding o'er thy rippling waters,
      Lowly hummed a natural song.
 
    Now the sun's behind the willows,
      Now he gleams along the waves,
    Faintly o'er the wearied billows
      Come the spirits of the braves.
 
 Just before sundown we reached some more falls in the town of
 Bedford, where some stone-masons were employed repairing the
 locks in a solitary part of the river.  They were interested in
 our adventure, especially one young man of our own age, who
 inquired at first if we were bound up to "'Skeag"; and when he
 had heard our story, and examined our outfit, asked us other
 questions, but temperately still, and always turning to his work
 again, though as if it were become his duty.  It was plain that
 he would like to go with us, and, as he looked up the river, many
 a distant cape and wooded shore were reflected in his eye, as
 well as in his thoughts.  When we were ready he left his work,
 and helped us through the locks with a sort of quiet enthusiasm,
 telling us that we were at Coos Falls, and we could still
 distinguish the strokes of his chisel for many sweeps after we
 had left him.
 
 We wished to camp this night on a large rock in the middle of the
 stream, just above these falls, but the want of fuel, and the
 difficulty of fixing our tent firmly, prevented us; so we made
 our bed on the main-land opposite, on the west bank, in the town
 of Bedford, in a retired place, as we supposed, there being no
 house in sight.
 
 
 
 
 [page]
 
 
                       WEDNESDAY
 
 
              _"Man is man's foe and destiny."_
                                        ^Cotton.^
 
 
 
 [page]
 
 
                       WEDNESDAY.
 
                         --*--
 
 
 Early this morning, as we were rolling up our buffaloes and
 loading our boat amid the dew, while our embers were still
 smoking, the masons who worked at the locks, and whom we had seen
 crossing the river in their boat the evening before while we were
 examining the rock, came upon us as they were going to their
 work, and we found that we had pitched our tent directly in the
 path to their boat.  This was the only time that we were observed
 on our camping-ground.  Thus, far from the beaten highways and
 the dust and din of travel, we beheld the country privately, yet
 freely, and at our leisure.  Other roads do some violence to
 Nature, and bring the traveller to stare at her, but the river
 steals into the scenery it traverses without intrusion, silently
 creating and adorning it, and is as free to come and go as the
 zephyr.
 
 As we shoved away from this rocky coast, before sunrise, the
 smaller bittern, the genius of the shore, was moping along its
 edge, or stood probing the mud for its food, with ever an eye on
 us, though so demurely at work, or else he ran along over the wet
 stones like a wrecker in his storm-coat, looking out for wrecks
 of snails and cockles.  Now away he goes, with a limping flight,
 uncertain where he will alight, until a rod of clear sand amid
 the alders invites his feet; and now our steady approach compels
 him to seek a new retreat.  It is a bird of the oldest Thalesian
 school, and no doubt believes in the priority of water to the
 other elements; the relic of a twilight antediluvian age which
 yet inhabits these bright American rivers with us Yankees.  There
 is something venerable in this melancholy and contemplative race
 of birds, which may have trodden the earth while it was yet in a
 slimy and imperfect state.  Perchance their tracks too are still
 visible on the stones.  It still lingers into our glaring
 summers, bravely supporting its fate without sympathy from man,
 as if it looked forward to some second advent of which _he_ has
 no assurance.  One wonders if, by its patient study by rocks and
 sandy capes, it has wrested the whole of her secret from Nature
 yet.  What a rich experience it must have gained, standing on one
 leg and looking out from its dull eye so long on sunshine and
 rain, moon and stars!  What could it tell of stagnant pools and
 reeds and dank night-fogs!  It would be worth the while to look
 closely into the eye which has been open and seeing at such
 hours, and in such solitudes, its dull, yellowish, greenish eye.
 Methinks my own soul must be a bright invisible green.  I have
 seen these birds stand by the half-dozen together in the
 shallower water along the shore, with their bills thrust into the
 mud at the bottom, probing for food, the whole head being
 concealed, while the neck and body formed an arch above the
 water.
 
 Cohass Brook, the outlet of Massabesic Pond,--which last is five
 or six miles distant, and contains fifteen hundred acres, being
 the largest body of fresh water in Rockingham County,--comes in
 near here from the east.  Rowing between Manchester and Bedford,
 we passed, at an early hour, a ferry and some falls, called
 Goff's Falls, the Indian Cohasset, where there is a small
 village, and a handsome green islet in the middle of the stream.
 From Bedford and Merrimack have been boated the bricks of which
 Lowell is made.  About twenty years before, as they told us, one
 Moore, of Bedford, having clay on his farm, contracted to furnish
 eight millions of bricks to the founders of that city within two
 years.  He fulfilled his contract in one year, and since then
 bricks have been the principal export from these towns.  The
 farmers found thus a market for their wood, and when they had
 brought a load to the kilns, they could cart a load of bricks to
 the shore, and so make a profitable day's work of it.  Thus all
 parties were benefited.  It was worth the while to see the place
 where Lowell was "dug out."  So likewise Manchester is being
 built of bricks made still higher up the river at Hooksett.
 
 There might be seen here on the bank of the Merrimack, near
 Goff's Falls, in what is now the town of Bedford, famous "for
 hops and for its fine domestic manufactures," some graves of the
 aborigines.  The land still bears this scar here, and time is
 slowly crumbling the bones of a race.  Yet, without fail, every
 spring, since they first fished and hunted here, the brown
 thrasher has heralded the morning from a birch or alder spray,
 and the undying race of reed-birds still rustles through the
 withering grass.  But these bones rustle not.  These mouldering
 elements are slowly preparing for another metamorphosis, to serve
 new masters, and what was the Indian's will erelong be the white
 man's sinew.
 
 We learned that Bedford was not so famous for hops as formerly,
 since the price is fluctuating, and poles are now scarce.  Yet if
 the traveller goes back a few miles from the river, the hop-kilns
 will still excite his curiosity.
 
 There were few incidents in our voyage this forenoon, though the
 river was now more rocky and the falls more frequent than before.
 It was a pleasant change, after rowing incessantly for many
 hours, to lock ourselves through in some retired place,--for
 commonly there was no lock-man at hand,--one sitting in the boat,
 while the other, sometimes with no little labor and heave-yo-ing,
 opened and shut the gates, waiting patiently to see the locks
 fill.  We did not once use the wheels which we had provided.
 Taking advantage of the eddy, we were sometimes floated up to the
 locks almost in the face of the falls; and, by the same cause,
 any floating timber was carried round in a circle and repeatedly
 drawn into the rapids before it finally went down the stream.
 These old gray structures, with their quiet arms stretched over
 the river in the sun, appeared like natural objects in the
 scenery, and the kingfisher and sandpiper alighted on them as
 readily as on stakes or rocks.
 
 We rowed leisurely up the stream for several hours, until the sun
 had got high in the sky, our thoughts monotonously beating time
 to our oars.  For outward variety there was only the river and
 the receding shores, a vista continually opening behind and
 closing before us, as we sat with our backs up-stream; and, for
 inward, such thoughts as the muses grudgingly lent us.  We were
 always passing some low, inviting shore, or some overhanging
 bank, on which, however, we never landed.
 
      Such near aspects had we
      Of our life's scenery.
 
 It might be seen by what tenure men held the earth.  The smallest
 stream is _mediterranean_ sea, a smaller ocean creek within the
 land, where men may steer by their farm-bounds and cottage-lights.
 For my own part, but for the geographers, I should hardly have
 known how large a portion of our globe is water, my life has
 chiefly passed within so deep a cove.  Yet I have sometimes
 ventured as far as to the mouth of my Snug Harbor.  From an old
 ruined fort on Staten Island, I have loved to watch all day some
 vessel whose name I had read in the morning through the
 telegraph-glass, when she first came upon the coast, and her hull
 heaved up and glistened in the sun, from the moment when the
 pilot and most adventurous news-boats met her, past the Hook, and
 up the narrow channel of the wide outer bay, till she was boarded
 by the health-officer, and took her station at Quarantine, or
 held on her unquestioned course to the wharves of New York.  It
 was interesting, too, to watch the less adventurous newsman, who
 made his assault as the vessel swept through the Narrows, defying
 plague and quarantine law, and, fastening his little cockboat to
 her huge side, clambered up and disappeared in the cabin.  And
 then I could imagine what momentous news was being imparted by
 the captain, which no American ear had ever heard, that Asia,
 Africa, Europe--were all sunk; for which at length he pays the
 price, and is seen descending the ship's side with his bundle of
 newspapers, but not where he first got up, for these arrivers do
 not stand still to gossip; and he hastes away with steady sweeps
 to dispose of his wares to the highest bidder, and we shall
 erelong read something startling,--"By the latest arrival,"--"by
 the good ship----." On Sunday I beheld, from some interior hill,
 the long procession of vessels getting to sea, reaching from the
 city wharves through the Narrows, and past the Hook, quite to the
 ocean stream, far as the eye could reach, with stately march and
 silken sails, all counting on lucky voyages, but each time some
 of the number, no doubt, destined to go to Davy's locker, and
 never come on this coast again.  And, again, in the evening of a
 pleasant day, it was my amusement to count the sails in sight.
 But as the setting sun continually brought more and more to
 light, still farther in the horizon, the last count always had
 the advantage, till, by the time the last rays streamed over the
 sea, I had doubled and trebled my first number; though I could no
 longer class them all under the several heads of ships, barks,
 brigs, schooners, and sloops, but most were faint generic
 _vessels_ only.  And then the temperate twilight light, perchance,
 revealed the floating home of some sailor whose thoughts were
 already alienated from this American coast, and directed towards
 the Europe of our dreams.  I have stood upon the same hill-top
 when a thunder-shower, rolling down from the Catskills and
 Highlands, passed over the island, deluging the land; and, when
 it had suddenly left us in sunshine, have seen it overtake
 successively, with its huge shadow and dark, descending wall of
 rain, the vessels in the bay.  Their bright sails were suddenly
 drooping and dark, like the sides of barns, and they seemed to
 shrink before the storm; while still far beyond them on the sea,
 through this dark veil, gleamed the sunny sails of those vessels
 which the storm had not yet reached.  And at midnight, when all
 around and overhead was darkness, I have seen a field of
 trembling, silvery light far out on the sea, the reflection of
 the moonlight from the ocean, as if beyond the precincts of our
 night, where the moon traversed a cloudless heaven,--and
 sometimes a dark speck in its midst, where some fortunate vessel
 was pursuing its happy voyage by night.
 
 But to us river sailors the sun never rose out of ocean waves,
 but from some green coppice, and went down behind some dark
 mountain line.  We, too, were but dwellers on the shore, like the
 bittern of the morning; and our pursuit, the wrecks of snails and
 cockles.  Nevertheless, we were contented to know the better one
 fair particular shore.
 
       My life is like a stroll upon the beach,
           As near the ocean's edge as I can go,
       My tardy steps its waves sometimes o'erreach,
           Sometimes I stay to let them overflow.
 
       My sole employment 't is, and scrupulous care,
           To place my gains beyond the reach of tides,
       Each smoother pebble, and each shell more rare,
           Which ocean kindly to my hand confides.
 
       I have but few companions on the shore,
           They scorn the strand who sail upon the sea,
       Yet oft I think the ocean they've sailed o'er
           Is deeper known upon the strand to me.
 
       The middle sea contains no crimson dulse,
           Its deeper waves cast up no pearls to view,
       Along the shore my hand is on its pulse,
           And I converse with many a shipwrecked crew.
 
 The small houses which were scattered along the river at
 intervals of a mile or more were commonly out of sight to us, but
 sometimes, when we rowed near the shore, we heard the peevish
 note of a hen, or some slight domestic sound, which betrayed
 them.  The lock-men's houses were particularly well placed,
 retired, and high, always at falls or rapids, and commanding the
 pleasantest reaches of the river,--for it is generally wider and
 more lake-like just above a fall,--and there they wait for boats.
 These humble dwellings, homely and sincere, in which a hearth was
 still the essential part, were more pleasing to our eyes than
 palaces or castles would have been.  In the noon of these days,
 as we have said, we occasionally climbed the banks and approached
 these houses, to get a glass of water and make acquaintance with
 their inhabitants.  High in the leafy bank, surrounded commonly
 by a small patch of corn and beans, squashes and melons, with
 sometimes a graceful hop-yard on one side, and some running vine
 over the windows, they appeared like beehives set to gather honey
 for a summer.  I have not read of any Arcadian life which
 surpasses the actual luxury and serenity of these New England
 dwellings.  For the outward gilding, at least, the age is golden
 enough.  As you approach the sunny doorway, awakening the echoes
 by your steps, still no sound from these barracks of repose, and
 you fear that the gentlest knock may seem rude to the Oriental
 dreamers.  The door is opened, perchance, by some Yankee-Hindoo
 woman, whose small-voiced but sincere hospitality, out of the
 bottomless depths of a quiet nature, has travelled quite round to
 the opposite side, and fears only to obtrude its kindness.  You
 step over the white-scoured floor to the bright "dresser"
 lightly, as if afraid to disturb the devotions of the
 household,--for Oriental dynasties appear to have passed away
 since the dinner-table was last spread here,--and thence to the
 frequented curb, where you see your long-forgotten, unshaven face
 at the bottom, in juxtaposition with new-made butter and the
 trout in the well.  "Perhaps you would like some molasses and
 ginger," suggests the faint noon voice.  Sometimes there sits the
 brother who follows the sea, their representative man; who knows
 only how far it is to the nearest port, no more distances, all
 the rest is sea and distant capes,--patting the dog, or dandling
 the kitten in arms that were stretched by the cable and the oar,
 pulling against Boreas or the trade-winds.  He looks up at the
 stranger, half pleased, half astonished, with a mariner's eye, as
 if he were a dolphin within cast.  If men will believe it, _sua
 si bona norint_, there are no more quiet Tempes, nor more poetic
 and Arcadian lives, than may be lived in these New England
 dwellings.  We thought that the employment of their inhabitants
 by day would be to tend the flowers and herds, and at night, like
 the shepherds of old, to cluster and give names to the stars from
 the river banks.
 
 We passed a large and densely wooded island this forenoon,
 between Short's and Griffith's Falls, the fairest which we had
 met with, with a handsome grove of elms at its head.  If it had
 been evening we should have been glad to camp there.  Not long
 after, one or two more were passed.  The boatmen told us that the
 current had recently made important changes here.  An island
 always pleases my imagination, even the smallest, as a small
 continent and integral portion of the globe.  I have a fancy for
 building my hut on one.  Even a bare, grassy isle, which I can
 see entirely over at a glance, has some undefined and mysterious
 charm for me.  There is commonly such a one at the junction of
 two rivers, whose currents bring down and deposit their
 respective sands in the eddy at their confluence, as it were the
 womb of a continent.  By what a delicate and far-stretched
 contribution every island is made!  What an enterprise of Nature
 thus to lay the foundations of and to build up the future
 continent, of golden and silver sands and the ruins of forests,
 with ant-like industry!  Pindar gives the following account of
 the origin of Thera, whence, in after times, Libyan Cyrene was
 settled by Battus.  Triton, in the form of Eurypylus, presents a
 clod to Euphemus, one of the Argonauts, as they are about to
 return home.
 
                         "He knew of our haste,
      And immediately seizing a clod
      With his right hand, strove to give it
      As a chance stranger's gift.
      Nor did the hero disregard him, but leaping on the shore,
      Stretching hand to hand,
      Received the mystic clod.
      But I hear it sinking from the deck,
      Go with the sea brine
      At evening, accompanying the watery sea.
      Often indeed I urged the careless
      Menials to guard it, but their minds forgot.
      And now in this island the imperishable seed of spacious Libya
      Is spilled before its hour."
 
 It is a beautiful fable, also related by Pindar, how Helius, or
 the Sun, looked down into the sea one day,--when perchance his
 rays were first reflected from some increasing glittering
 sandbar,--and saw the fair and fruitful island of Rhodes
 
                 "springing up from the bottom,
      Capable of feeding many men, and suitable for flocks;
 
 and at the nod of Zeus,
 
              "The island sprang from the watery
      Sea; and the genial Father of penetrating beams,
      Ruler of fire-breathing horses, has it."
 
 The shifting islands! who would not be willing that his house
 should be undermined by such a foe!  The inhabitant of an island
 can tell what currents formed the land which he cultivates; and
 his earth is still being created or destroyed.  There before his
 door, perchance, still empties the stream which brought down the
 material of his farm ages before, and is still bringing it down
 or washing it away,--the graceful, gentle robber!
 
 Not long after this we saw the Piscataquoag, or Sparkling Water,
 emptying in on our left, and heard the Falls of Amoskeag above.
 Large quantities of lumber, as we read in the Gazetteer, were
 still annually floated down the Piscataquoag to the Merrimack,
 and there are many fine mill privileges on it.  Just above the
 mouth of this river we passed the artificial falls where the
 canals of the Manchester Manufacturing Company discharge
 themselves into the Merrimack.  They are striking enough to have
 a name, and, with the scenery of a Bashpish, would be visited
 from far and near.  The water falls thirty or forty feet over
 seven or eight steep and narrow terraces of stone, probably to
 break its force, and is converted into one mass of foam.  This
 canal-water did not seem to be the worse for the wear, but foamed
 and fumed as purely, and boomed as savagely and impressively, as
 a mountain torrent, and, though it came from under a factory, we
 saw a rainbow here.  These are now the Amoskeag Falls, removed a
 mile down-stream.  But we did not tarry to examine them minutely,
 making haste to get past the village here collected, and out of
 hearing of the hammer which was laying the foundation of another
 Lowell on the banks.  At the time of our voyage Manchester was a
 village of about two thousand inhabitants, where we landed for a
 moment to get some cool water, and where an inhabitant told us
 that he was accustomed to go across the river into Goffstown for
 his water.  But now, as I have been told, and indeed have
 witnessed, it contains fourteen thousand inhabitants.  From a
 hill on the road between Goffstown and Hooksett, four miles
 distant, I have seen a thunder-shower pass over, and the sun
 break out and shine on a city there, where I had landed nine
 years before in the fields; and there was waving the flag of its
 Museum, where "the only perfect skeleton of a Greenland or river
 whale in the United States" was to be seen, and I also read in
 its directory of a "Manchester Athenaeum and Gallery of the Fine
 Arts."
 
 According to the Gazetteer, the descent of Amoskeag Falls, which
 are the most considerable in the Merrimack, is fifty-four feet in
 half a mile.  We locked ourselves through here with much ado,
 surmounting the successive watery steps of this river's staircase
 in the midst of a crowd of villagers, jumping into the canal to
 their amusement, to save our boat from upsetting, and consuming
 much river-water in our service.  Amoskeag, or Namaskeak, is said
 to mean "great fishing-place." It was hereabouts that the Sachem
 Wannalancet resided.  Tradition says that his tribe, when at war
 with the Mohawks, concealed their provisions in the cavities of
 the rocks in the upper part of these falls.  The Indians, who hid
 their provisions in these holes, and affirmed "that God had cut
 them out for that purpose," understood their origin and use
 better than the Royal Society, who in their Transactions, in the
 last century, speaking of these very holes, declare that "they
 seem plainly to be artificial."  Similar "pot-holes" may be seen
 at the Stone Flume on this river, on the Ottaway, at Bellows'
 Falls on the Connecticut, and in the limestone rock at Shelburne
 Falls on Deerfield River in Massachusetts, and more or less
 generally about all falls.  Perhaps the most remarkable curiosity
 of this kind in New England is the well-known Basin on the
 Pemigewasset, one of the head-waters of this river, twenty by
 thirty feet in extent and proportionably deep, with a smooth and
 rounded brim, and filled with a cold, pellucid, and greenish
 water.  At Amoskeag the river is divided into many separate
 torrents and trickling rills by the rocks, and its volume is so
 much reduced by the drain of the canals that it does not fill its
 bed.  There are many pot-holes here on a rocky island which the
 river washes over in high freshets.  As at Shelburne Falls, where
 I first observed them, they are from one foot to four or five in
 diameter, and as many in depth, perfectly round and regular, with
 smooth and gracefully curved brims, like goblets.  Their origin
 is apparent to the most careless observer.  A stone which the
 current has washed down, meeting with obstacles, revolves as on a
 pivot where it lies, gradually sinking in the course of centuries
 deeper and deeper into the rock, and in new freshets receiving
 the aid of fresh stones, which are drawn into this trap and
 doomed to revolve there for an indefinite period, doing
 Sisyphus-like penance for stony sins, until they either wear out,
 or wear through the bottom of their prison, or else are released
 by some revolution of nature.  There lie the stones of various
 sizes, from a pebble to a foot or two in diameter, some of which
 have rested from their labor only since the spring, and some
 higher up which have lain still and dry for ages,--we noticed
 some here at least sixteen feet above the present level of the
 water,--while others are still revolving, and enjoy no respite at
 any season.  In one instance, at Shelburne Falls, they have worn
 quite through the rock, so that a portion of the river leaks
 through in anticipation of the fall.  Some of these pot-holes at
 Amoskeag, in a very hard brown-stone, had an oblong, cylindrical
 stone of the same material loosely fitting them.  One, as much as
 fifteen feet deep and seven or eight in diameter, which was worn
 quite through to the water, had a huge rock of the same material,
 smooth but of irregular form, lodged in it.  Everywhere there
 were the rudiments or the wrecks of a dimple in the rock; the
 rocky shells of whirlpools.  As if by force of example and
 sympathy after so many lessons, the rocks, the hardest material,
 had been endeavoring to whirl or flow into the forms of the most
 fluid.  The finest workers in stone are not copper or steel
 tools, but the gentle touches of air and water working at their
 leisure with a liberal allowance of time.
 
 Not only have some of these basins been forming for countless
 ages, but others exist which must have been completed in a former
 geological period.  In deepening the Pawtucket Canal, in 1822,
 the workmen came to ledges with pot-holes in them, where probably
 was once the bed of the river, and there are some, we are told,
 in the town of Canaan in this State, with the stones still in
 them, on the height of land between the Merrimack and
 Connecticut, and nearly a thousand feet above these rivers,
 proving that the mountains and the rivers have changed places.
 There lie the stones which completed their revolutions perhaps
 before thoughts began to revolve in the brain of man.  The
 periods of Hindoo and Chinese history, though they reach back to
 the time when the race of mortals is confounded with the race of
 gods, are as nothing compared with the periods which these stones
 have inscribed.  That which commenced a rock when time was young,
 shall conclude a pebble in the unequal contest.  With such
 expense of time and natural forces are our very paving-stones
 produced.  They teach us lessons, these dumb workers; verily
 there are "sermons in stones, and books in the running streams."
 In these very holes the Indians hid their provisions; but now
 there is no bread, but only its old neighbor stones at the
 bottom.  Who knows how many races they have served thus?  By as
 simple a law, some accidental by-law, perchance, our system
 itself was made ready for its inhabitants.
 
 These, and such as these, must be our antiquities, for lack of
 human vestiges.  The monuments of heroes and the temples of the
 gods which may once have stood on the banks of this river are
 now, at any rate, returned to dust and primitive soil.  The
 murmur of unchronicled nations has died away along these shores,
 and once more Lowell and Manchester are on the trail of the
 Indian.
 
 The fact that Romans once inhabited her reflects no little
 dignity on Nature herself; that from some particular hill the
 Roman once looked out on the sea.  She need not be ashamed of the
 vestiges of her children.  How gladly the antiquary informs us
 that their vessels penetrated into this frith, or up that river
 of some remote isle!  Their military monuments still remain on
 the hills and under the sod of the valleys.  The oft-repeated
 Roman story is written in still legible characters in every
 quarter of the Old World, and but to-day, perchance, a new coin
 is dug up whose inscription repeats and confirms their fame.
 Some "_Judaea Capta_" with a woman mourning under a palm-tree,
 with silent argument and demonstration confirms the pages of
 history.
 
    "Rome living was the world's sole ornament;
     And dead is now the world's sole monument.
        .        .        .       .       .
     With her own weight down pressed now she lies,
     And by her heaps her hugeness testifies."
 
 If one doubts whether Grecian valor and patriotism are not a
 fiction of the poets, he may go to Athens and see still upon the
 walls of the temple of Minerva the circular marks made by the
 shields taken from the enemy in the Persian war, which were
 suspended there.  We have not far to seek for living and
 unquestionable evidence.  The very dust takes shape and confirms
 some story which we had read.  As Fuller said, commenting on the
 zeal of Camden, "A broken urn is a whole evidence; or an old gate
 still surviving out of which the city is run out."  When Solon
 endeavored to prove that Salamis had formerly belonged to the
 Athenians, and not to the Megareans, he caused the tombs to be
 opened, and showed that the inhabitants of Salamis turned the
 faces of their dead to the same side with the Athenians, but the
 Megareans to the opposite side.  There they were to be
 interrogated.
 
 Some minds are as little logical or argumentative as nature; they
 can offer no reason or "guess," but they exhibit the solemn and
 incontrovertible fact.  If a historical question arises, they
 cause the tombs to be opened.  Their silent and practical logic
 convinces the reason and the understanding at the same time.  Of
 such sort is always the only pertinent question and the only
 satisfactory reply.
 
 Our own country furnishes antiquities as ancient and durable, and
 as useful, as any; rocks at least as well covered with lichens,
 and a soil which, if it is virgin, is but virgin mould, the very
 dust of nature.  What if we cannot read Rome, or Greece, Etruria,
 or Carthage, or Egypt, or Babylon, on these; are our cliffs bare?
 The lichen on the rocks is a rude and simple shield which
 beginning and imperfect Nature suspended there.  Still hangs her
 wrinkled trophy.  And here too the poet's eye may still detect
 the brazen nails which fastened Time's inscriptions, and if he
 has the gift, decipher them by this clew.  The walls that fence
 our fields, as well as modern Rome, and not less the Parthenon
 itself, are all built of _ruins_.  Here may be heard the din of
 rivers, and ancient winds which have long since lost their names
 sough through our woods;--the first faint sounds of spring, older
 than the summer of Athenian glory, the titmouse lisping in the
 wood, the jay's scream, and blue-bird's warble, and the hum of
 
      "bees that fly
      About the laughing blossoms of sallowy."
 
 Here is the gray dawn for antiquity, and our to-morrow's future
 should be at least paulo-post to theirs which we have put behind
 us.  There are the red-maple and birchen leaves, old runes which
 are not yet deciphered; catkins, pine-cones, vines, oak-leaves,
 and acorns; the very things themselves, and not their forms in
 stone,--so much the more ancient and venerable.  And even to the
 current summer there has come down tradition of a hoary-headed
 master of all art, who once filled every field and grove with
 statues and god-like architecture, of every design which Greece
 has lately copied; whose ruins are now mingled with the dust, and
 not one block remains upon another.  The century sun and
 unwearied rain have wasted them, till not one fragment from that
 quarry now exists; and poets perchance will feign that gods sent
 down the material from heaven.
 
 What though the traveller tell us of the ruins of Egypt, are we
 so sick or idle, that we must sacrifice our America and to-day to
 some man's ill-remembered and indolent story?  Carnac and Luxor
 are but names, or if their skeletons remain, still more desert
 sand, and at length a wave of the Mediterranean Sea are needed to
 wash away the filth that attaches to their grandeur.  Carnac!
 Carnac! here is Carnac for me.  I behold the columns of a larger
 and purer temple.
 
      This is my Carnac, whose unmeasured dome
      Shelters the measuring art and measurer's home.
      Behold these flowers, let us be up with time,
      Not dreaming of three thousand years ago,
      Erect ourselves and let those columns lie,
      Not stoop to raise a foil against the sky.
      Where is the spirit of that time but in
      This present day, perchance the present line?
      Three thousand years ago are not agone,
      They are still lingering in this summer morn,
      And Memnon's Mother sprightly greets us now,
      Wearing her youthful radiance on her brow.
      If Carnac's columns still stand on the plain,
      To enjoy our opportunities they remain.
 
 In these parts dwelt the famous Sachem Pasaconaway, who was seen
 by Gookin "at Pawtucket, when he was about one hundred and twenty
 years old."  He was reputed a wise man and a powwow, and
 restrained his people from going to war with the English.  They
 believed "that he could make water burn, rocks move, and trees
 dance, and metamorphose himself into a flaming man; that in
 winter he could raise a green leaf out of the ashes of a dry one,
 and produce a living snake from the skin of a dead one, and many
 similar miracles." In 1660, according to Gookin, at a great feast
 and dance, he made his farewell speech to his people, in which he
 said, that as he was not likely to see them met together again,
 he would leave them this word of advice, to take heed how they
 quarrelled with their English neighbors, for though they might do
 them much mischief at first, it would prove the means of their
 own destruction.  He himself, he said, had been as much an enemy
 to the English at their first coming as any, and had used all his
 arts to destroy them, or at least to prevent their settlement,
 but could by no means effect it.  Gookin thought that he
 "possibly might have such a kind of spirit upon him as was upon
 Balaam, who in xxiii.  Numbers, 23, said `Surely, there is no
 enchantment against Jacob, neither is there any divination
 against Israel.'"  His son Wannalancet carefully followed his
 advice, and when Philip's War broke out, he withdrew his
 followers to Penacook, now Concord in New Hampshire, from the
 scene of the war.  On his return afterwards, he visited the
 minister of Chelmsford, and, as is stated in the history of that
 town, "wished to know whether Chelmsford had suffered much during
 the war; and being informed that it had not, and that God should
 be thanked for it, Wannalancet replied, `Me next.'"
 
 Manchester was the residence of John Stark, a hero of two wars,
 and survivor of a third, and at his death the last but one of the
 American generals of the Revolution.  He was born in the
 adjoining town of Londonderry, then Nutfield, in 1728.  As early
 as 1752, he was taken prisoner by the Indians while hunting in
 the wilderness near Baker's River; he performed notable service
 as a captain of rangers in the French war; commanded a regiment
 of the New Hampshire militia at the battle of Bunker Hill; and
 fought and won the battle of Bennington in 1777.  He was past
 service in the last war, and died here in 1822, at the age of 94.
 His monument stands upon the second bank of the river, about a
 mile and a half above the falls, and commands a prospect several
 miles up and down the Merrimack.  It suggested how much more
 impressive in the landscape is the tomb of a hero than the
 dwellings of the inglorious living.  Who is most dead,--a hero by
 whose monument you stand, or his descendants of whom you have
 never heard?
 
 The graves of Pasaconaway and Wannalancet are marked by no
 monument on the bank of their native river.
 
 Every town which we passed, if we may believe the Gazetteer, had
 been the residence of some great man.  But though we knocked at
 many doors, and even made particular inquiries, we could not find
 that there were any now living.  Under the head of Litchfield we
 read:--
 
   "The Hon.  Wyseman Clagett closed his life in this town."
   According to another, "He was a classical scholar, a good
   lawyer, a wit, and a poet." We saw his old gray house just
   below Great Nesenkeag Brook.--Under the head of Merrimack:
   "Hon.  Mathew Thornton, one of the signers of the Declaration
   of American Independence, resided many years in this town." His
   house too we saw from the river.--"Dr.  Jonathan Gove, a man
   distinguished for his urbanity, his talents and professional
   skill, resided in this town [Goffstown].  He was one of the
   oldest practitioners of medicine in the county.  He was many
   years an active member of the legislature."--"Hon.  Robert
   Means, who died Jan. 24, 1823, at the age of 80, was for a long
   period a resident in Amherst.  He was a native of Ireland.  In
   1764 he came to this country, where, by his industry and
   application to business, he acquired a large property, and
   great respect."--"William Stinson [one of the first settlers of
   Dunbarton], born in Ireland, came to Londonderry with his
   father.  He was much respected and was a useful man.  James
   Rogers was from Ireland, and father to Major Robert Rogers.  He
   was shot in the woods, being mistaken for a bear."--"Rev.
   Matthew Clark, second minister of Londonderry, was a native of
   Ireland, who had in early life been an officer in the army, and
   distinguished himself in the defence of the city of
   Londonderry, when besieged by the army of King James II.  A.
   D.  1688-9.  He afterwards relinquished a military life for the
   clerical profession.  He possessed a strong mind, marked by a
   considerable degree of eccentricity.  He died Jan. 25, 1735,
   and was borne to the grave, at his particular request, by his
   former companions in arms, of whom there were a considerable
   number among the early settlers of this town; several of them
   had been made free from taxes throughout the British dominions
   by King William, for their bravery in that memorable
   siege."--Col.  George Reid and Capt. David M'Clary, also
   citizens of Londonderry, were "distinguished and brave"
   officers.--"Major Andrew M'Clary, a native of this town
   [Epsom], fell at the battle of Breed's Hill ."--Many of these
   heroes, like the illustrious Roman, were ploughing when the
   news of the massacre at Lexington arrived, and straightway left
   their ploughs in the furrow, and repaired to the scene of
   action.  Some miles from where we now were, there once stood a
   guide-post on which were the words, "3 miles to Squire
   MacGaw's."
 
 But generally speaking, the land is now, at any rate, very barren
 of men, and we doubt if there are as many hundreds as we read
 of.  It may be that we stood too near.
 
 Uncannunuc Mountain in Goffstown was visible from Amoskeag, five
 or six miles westward.  It is the north-easternmost in the
 horizon, which we see from our native town, but seen from there
 is too ethereally blue to be the same which the like of us have
 ever climbed.  Its name is said to mean "The Two Breasts," there
 being two eminences some distance apart.  The highest, which is
 about fourteen hundred feet above the sea, probably affords a
 more extensive view of the Merrimack valley and the adjacent
 country than any other hill, though it is somewhat obstructed by
 woods.  Only a few short reaches of the river are visible, but
 you can trace its course far down stream by the sandy tracts on
 its banks.
 
 A little south of Uncannunuc, about sixty years ago, as the story
 goes, an old woman who went out to gather pennyroyal, tript her
 foot in the bail of a small brass kettle in the dead grass and
 bushes.  Some say that flints and charcoal and some traces of a
 camp were also found.  This kettle, holding about four quarts, is
 still preserved and used to dye thread in.  It is supposed to
 have belonged to some old French or Indian hunter, who was killed
 in one of his hunting or scouting excursions, and so never
 returned to look after his kettle.
 
 But we were most interested to hear of the pennyroyal, it is
 soothing to be reminded that wild nature produces anything ready
 for the use of man.  Men know that _something_ is good.  One says
 that it is yellow-dock, another that it is bitter-sweet, another
 that it is slippery-elm bark, burdock, catnip, calamint,
 elicampane, thoroughwort, or pennyroyal.  A man may esteem
 himself happy when that which is his food is also his medicine.
 There is no kind of herb, but somebody or other says that it is
 good.  I am very glad to hear it.  It reminds me of the first
 chapter of Genesis.  But how should they know that it is good?
 That is the mystery to me.  I am always agreeably disappointed;
 it is incredible that they should have found it out.  Since all
 things are good, men fail at last to distinguish which is the
 bane, and which the antidote.  There are sure to be two
 prescriptions diametrically opposite.  Stuff a cold and starve a
 cold are but two ways.  They are the two practices both always in
 full blast.  Yet you must take advice of the one school as if
 there was no other.  In respect to religion and the healing art,
 all nations are still in a state of barbarism.  In the most
 civilized countries the priest is still but a Powwow, and the
 physician a Great Medicine.  Consider the deference which is
 everywhere paid to a doctor's opinion.  Nothing more strikingly
 betrays the credulity of mankind than medicine.  Quackery is a
 thing universal, and universally successful.  In this case it
 becomes literally true that no imposition is too great for the
 credulity of men.  Priests and physicians should never look one
 another in the face.  They have no common ground, nor is there
 any to mediate between them.  When the one comes, the other goes.
 They could not come together without laughter, or a significant
 silence, for the one's profession is a satire on the other's, and
 either's success would be the other's failure.  It is wonderful
 that the physician should ever die, and that the priest should
 ever live.  Why is it that the priest is never called to consult
 with the physician?  Is it because men believe practically that
 matter is independent of spirit.  But what is quackery?  It is
 commonly an attempt to cure the diseases of a man by addressing
 his body alone.  There is need of a physician who shall minister
 to both soul and body at once, that is, to man.  Now he falls
 between two souls.
 
 After passing through the locks, we had poled ourselves through
 the canal here, about half a mile in length, to the boatable part
 of the river.  Above Amoskeag the river spreads out into a lake
 reaching a mile or two without a bend.  There were many
 canal-boats here bound up to Hooksett, about eight miles, and as
 they were going up empty with a fair wind, one boatman offered to
 take us in tow if we would wait.  But when we came alongside, we
 found that they meant to take us on board, since otherwise we
 should clog their motions too much; but as our boat was too heavy
 to be lifted aboard, we pursued our way up the stream, as before,
 while the boatmen were at their dinner, and came to anchor at
 length under some alders on the opposite shore, where we could
 take our lunch.  Though far on one side, every sound was wafted
 over to us from the opposite bank, and from the harbor of the
 canal, and we could see everything that passed.  By and by came
 several canal-boats, at intervals of a quarter of a mile,
 standing up to Hooksett with a light breeze, and one by one
 disappeared round a point above.  With their broad sails set,
 they moved slowly up the stream in the sluggish and fitful
 breeze, like one-winged antediluvian birds, and as if impelled by
 some mysterious counter-current.  It was a grand motion, so slow
 and stately, this "standing out," as the phrase is, expressing
 the gradual and steady progress of a vessel, as if it were by
 mere rectitude and disposition, without shuffling.  Their sails,
 which stood so still, were like chips cast into the current of
 the air to show which way it set.  At length the boat which we
 had spoken came along, keeping the middle of the stream, and when
 within speaking distance the steersman called out ironically to
 say, that if we would come alongside now he would take us in tow;
 but not heeding his taunt, we still loitered in the shade till we
 had finished our lunch, and when the last boat had disappeared
 round the point with flapping sail, for the breeze had now sunk
 to a zephyr, with our own sails set, and plying our oars, we shot
 rapidly up the stream in pursuit, and as we glided close
 alongside, while they were vainly invoking Aeolus to their aid,
 we returned their compliment by proposing, if they would throw us
 a rope, to "take them in tow," to which these Merrimack sailors
 had no suitable answer ready.  Thus we gradually overtook and
 passed each boat in succession until we had the river to
 ourselves again.
 
 Our course this afternoon was between Manchester and Goffstown.
 
 
                            -------------
 
 
 While we float here, far from that tributary stream on whose
 banks our Friends and kindred dwell, our thoughts, like the
 stars, come out of their horizon still; for there circulates a
 finer blood than Lavoisier has discovered the laws of,--the
 blood, not of kindred merely, but of kindness, whose pulse still
 beats at any distance and forever.
 
      True kindness is a pure divine affinity,
      Not founded upon human consanguinity.
      It is a spirit, not a blood relation,
      Superior to family and station.
 
 After years of vain familiarity, some distant gesture or
 unconscious behavior, which we remember, speaks to us with more
 emphasis than the wisest or kindest words.  We are sometimes made
 aware of a kindness long passed, and realize that there have been
 times when our Friends' thoughts of us were of so pure and lofty
 a character that they passed over us like the winds of heaven
 unnoticed; when they treated us not as what we were, but as what
 we aspired to be.  There has just reached us, it may be, the
 nobleness of some such silent behavior, not to be forgotten, not
 to be remembered, and we shudder to think how it fell on us cold,
 though in some true but tardy hour we endeavor to wipe off these
 scores.
 
 In my experience, persons, when they are made the subject of
 conversation, though with a Friend, are commonly the most prosaic
 and trivial of facts.  The universe seems bankrupt as soon as we
 begin to discuss the character of individuals.  Our discourse all
 runs to slander, and our limits grow narrower as we advance.  How
 is it that we are impelled to treat our old Friends so ill when
 we obtain new ones?  The housekeeper says, I never had any new
 crockery in my life but I began to break the old.  I say, let us
 speak of mushrooms and forest trees rather.  Yet we can sometimes
 afford to remember them in private.
 
      Lately, alas, I knew a gentle boy,
      Whose features all were cast in Virtue's mould,
      As one she had designed for Beauty's toy,
      But after manned him for her own strong-hold.
 
      On every side he open was as day,
      That you might see no lack of strength within,
      For walls and ports do only serve alway
      For a pretence to feebleness and sin.
 
      Say not that Caesar was victorious,
      With toil and strife who stormed the House of Fame,
      In other sense this youth was glorious,
      Himself a kingdom wheresoe'er he came.
 
      No strength went out to get him victory,
      When all was income of its own accord;
      For where he went none other was to see,
      But all were parcel of their noble lord.
 
      He forayed like the subtile haze of summer,
      That stilly shows fresh landscapes to our eyes,
      And revolutions works without a murmur,
      Or rustling of a leaf beneath the skies.
 
      So was I taken unawares by this,
      I quite forgot my homage to confess;
      Yet now am forced to know, though hard it is,
      I might have loved him had I loved him less.
 
      Each moment as we nearer drew to each,
      A stern respect withheld us farther yet,
      So that we seemed beyond each other's reach,
      And less acquainted than when first we met.
 
      We two were one while we did sympathize,
      So could we not the simplest bargain drive;
      And what avails it now that we are wise,
      If absence doth this doubleness contrive?
 
      Eternity may not the chance repeat,
      But I must tread my single way alone,
      In sad remembrance that we once did meet,
      And know that bliss irrevocably gone.
 
      The spheres henceforth my elegy shall sing,
      For elegy has other subject none;
      Each strain of music in my ears shall ring
      Knell of departure from that other one.
 
      Make haste and celebrate my tragedy;
      With fitting strain resound ye woods and fields;
      Sorrow is dearer in such case to me
      Than all the joys other occasion yields.
 
 
                     -----------
 
 
      Is't then too late the damage to repair?
      Distance, forsooth, from my weak grasp hath reft
      The empty husk, and clutched the useless tare,
      But in my hands the wheat and kernel left.
 
      If I but love that virtue which he is,
      Though it be scented in the morning air,
      Still shall we be truest acquaintances,
      Nor mortals know a sympathy more rare.
 
 Friendship is evanescent in every man's experience, and
 remembered like heat lightning in past summers.  Fair and
 flitting like a summer cloud;--there is always some vapor in the
 air, no matter how long the drought; there are even April
 showers.  Surely from time to time, for its vestiges never
 depart, it floats through our atmosphere.  It takes place, like
 vegetation in so many materials, because there is such a law, but
 always without permanent form, though ancient and familiar as the
 sun and moon, and as sure to come again.  The heart is forever
 inexperienced.  They silently gather as by magic, these never
 failing, never quite deceiving visions, like the bright and
 fleecy clouds in the calmest and clearest days.  The Friend is
 some fair floating isle of palms eluding the mariner in Pacific
 seas.  Many are the dangers to be encountered, equinoctial gales
 and coral reefs, ere he may sail before the constant trades.  But
 who would not sail through mutiny and storm, even over Atlantic
 waves, to reach the fabulous retreating shores of some continent
 man?  The imagination still clings to the faintest tradition of
 
 
                  THE ATLANTIDES.
 
      The smothered streams of love, which flow
      More bright than Phlegethon, more low,
      Island us ever, like the sea,
      In an Atlantic mystery.
      Our fabled shores none ever reach,
      No mariner has found our beach,
      Scarcely our mirage now is seen,
      And neighboring waves with floating green,
      Yet still the oldest charts contain
      Some dotted outline of our main;
      In ancient times midsummer days
      Unto the western islands' gaze,
      To Teneriffe and the Azores,
      Have shown our faint and cloud-like shores.
 
      But sink not yet, ye desolate isles,
      Anon your coast with commerce smiles,
      And richer freights ye'll furnish far
      Than Africa or Malabar.
      Be fair, be fertile evermore,
      Ye rumored but untrodden shore,
      Princes and monarchs will contend
      Who first unto your land shall send,
      And pawn the jewels of the crown
      To call your distant soil their own.
 
 Columbus has sailed westward of these isles by the mariner's
 compass, but neither he nor his successors have found them.  We
 are no nearer than Plato was.  The earnest seeker and hopeful
 discoverer of this New World always haunts the outskirts of his
 time, and walks through the densest crowd uninterrupted, and as
 it were in a straight line.
 
       Sea and land are but his neighbors,
       And companions in his labors,
       Who on the ocean's verge and firm land's end
       Doth long and truly seek his Friend.
       Many men dwell far inland,
       But he alone sits on the strand.
       Whether he ponders men or books,
       Always still he seaward looks,
       Marine news he ever reads,
       And the slightest glances heeds,
       Feels the sea breeze on his cheek,
       At each word the landsmen speak,
       In every companion's eye
       A sailing vessel doth descry;
       In the ocean's sullen roar
       From some distant port he hears,
       Of wrecks upon a distant shore,
       And the ventures of past years.
 
 Who does not walk on the plain as amid the columns of Tadmore of
 the desert?  There is on the earth no institution which
 Friendship has established; it is not taught by any religion; no
 scripture contains its maxims.  It has no temple, nor even a
 solitary column.  There goes a rumor that the earth is inhabited,
 but the shipwrecked mariner has not seen a footprint on the
 shore.  The hunter has found only fragments of pottery and the
 monuments of inhabitants.
 
 However, our fates at least are social.  Our courses do not
 diverge; but as the web of destiny is woven it is fulled, and we
 are cast more and more into the centre.  Men naturally, though
 feebly, seek this alliance, and their actions faintly foretell
 it.  We are inclined to lay the chief stress on likeness and not
 on difference, and in foreign bodies we admit that there are many
 degrees of warmth below blood heat, but none of cold above it.
 
 Mencius says: "If one loses a fowl or a dog, he knows well how to
 seek them again; if one loses the sentiments of his heart, he
 does not know how to seek them again.  .  .  .  The duties of
 practical philosophy consist only in seeking after those
 sentiments of the heart which we have lost; that is all."
 
 
 One or two persons come to my house from time to time, there
 being proposed to them the faint possibility of intercourse.
 They are as full as they are silent, and wait for my plectrum to
 stir the strings of their lyre.  If they could ever come to the
 length of a sentence, or hear one, on that ground they are
 dreaming of!  They speak faintly, and do not obtrude themselves.
 They have heard some news, which none, not even they themselves,
 can impart.  It is a wealth they can bear about them which can be
 expended in various ways.  What came they out to seek?
 
 No word is oftener on the lips of men than Friendship, and indeed
 no thought is more familiar to their aspirations.  All men are
 dreaming of it, and its drama, which is always a tragedy, is
 enacted daily.  It is the secret of the universe.  You may thread
 the town, you may wander the country, and none shall ever speak
 of it, yet thought is everywhere busy about it, and the idea of
 what is possible in this respect affects our behavior toward all
 new men and women, and a great many old ones.  Nevertheless, I
 can remember only two or three essays on this subject in all
 literature.  No wonder that the Mythology, and Arabian Nights,
 and Shakespeare, and Scott's novels entertain us,--we are poets
 and fablers and dramatists and novelists ourselves.  We are
 continually acting a part in a more interesting drama than any
 written.  We are dreaming that our Friends are our _Friends_ ,
 and that we are our Friends' _Friends_.  Our actual Friends are
 but distant relations of those to whom we are pledged.  We never
 exchange more than three words with a Friend in our lives on that
 level to which our thoughts and feelings almost habitually rise.
 One goes forth prepared to say, "Sweet Friends!" and the
 salutation is, "Damn your eyes!"  But never mind; faint heart
 never won true Friend.  O my Friend, may it come to pass once,
 that when you are my Friend I may be yours.
 
 Of what use the friendliest dispositions even, if there are
 no hours given to Friendship, if it is forever postponed to
 unimportant duties and relations?  Friendship is first, Friendship
 last.  But it is equally impossible to forget our Friends, and to
 make them answer to our ideal.  When they say farewell, then
 indeed we begin to keep them company.  How often we find
 ourselves turning our backs on our actual Friends, that we may go
 and meet their ideal cousins.  I would that I were worthy to be
 any man's Friend.
 
 What is commonly honored with the name of Friendship is no very
 profound or powerful instinct.  Men do not, after all, _love_
 their Friends greatly.  I do not often see the farmers made seers
 and wise to the verge of insanity by their Friendship for one
 another.  They are not often transfigured and translated by love
 in each other's presence.  I do not observe them purified,
 refined, and elevated by the love of a man.  If one abates a
 little the price of his wood, or gives a neighbor his vote at
 town-meeting, or a barrel of apples, or lends him his wagon
 frequently, it is esteemed a rare instance of Friendship.  Nor do
 the farmers' wives lead lives consecrated to Friendship.  I do
 not see the pair of farmer Friends of either sex prepared to
 stand against the world.  There are only two or three couples in
 history.  To say that a man is your Friend, means commonly no
 more than this, that he is not your enemy.  Most contemplate only
 what would be the accidental and trifling advantages of
 Friendship, as that the Friend can assist in time of need, by his
 substance, or his influence, or his counsel; but he who foresees
 such advantages in this relation proves himself blind to its real
 advantage, or indeed wholly inexperienced in the relation itself.
 Such services are particular and menial, compared with the
 perpetual and all-embracing service which it is.  Even the utmost
 good-will and harmony and practical kindness are not sufficient
 for Friendship, for Friends do not live in harmony merely, as
 some say, but in melody.  We do not wish for Friends to feed and
 clothe our bodies,--neighbors are kind enough for that,--but to
 do the like office to our spirits.  For this few are rich enough,
 however well disposed they may be.  For the most part we stupidly
 confound one man with another.  The dull distinguish only races
 or nations, or at most classes, but the wise man, individuals.
 To his Friend a man's peculiar character appears in every feature
 and in every action, and it is thus drawn out and improved by
 him.
 
 Think of the importance of Friendship in the education of men.
 
      "He that hath love and judgment too,
      Sees more than any other doe."
 
 It will make a man honest; it will make him a hero; it will make
 him a saint.  It is the state of the just dealing with the just,
 the magnanimous with the magnanimous, the sincere with the
 sincere, man with man.
 
 And it is well said by another poet,
 
      "Why love among the virtues is not known,
      Is that love is them all contract in one."
 
 All the abuses which are the object of reform with the philanthropist,
  the statesman, and the housekeeper are unconsciously amended in
 the intercourse of Friends.  A Friend is one who incessantly pays
 us the compliment of expecting from us all the virtues, and who
 can appreciate them in us.  It takes two to speak the truth,--one
 to speak, and another to hear.  How can one treat with
 magnanimity mere wood and stone?  If we dealt only with the false
 and dishonest, we should at last forget how to speak truth.  Only
 lovers know the value and magnanimity of truth, while traders
 prize a cheap honesty, and neighbors and acquaintance a cheap
 civility.  In our daily intercourse with men, our nobler
 faculties are dormant and suffered to rust.  None will pay us the
 compliment to expect nobleness from us.  Though we have gold to
 give, they demand only copper.  We ask our neighbor to suffer
 himself to be dealt with truly, sincerely, nobly; but he answers
 no by his deafness.  He does not even hear this prayer.  He says
 practically, I will be content if you treat me as "no better than
 I should be," as deceitful, mean, dishonest, and selfish.  For
 the most part, we are contented so to deal and to be dealt with,
 and we do not think that for the mass of men there is any truer
 and nobler relation possible.  A man may have _good_ neighbors,
 so called, and acquaintances, and even companions, wife, parents,
 brothers, sisters, children, who meet himself and one another on
 this ground only.  The State does not demand justice of its
 members, but thinks that it succeeds very well with the least
 degree of it, hardly more than rogues practise; and so do the
 neighborhood and the family.  What is commonly called Friendship
 even is only a little more honor among rogues.
 
 But sometimes we are said to _love_ another, that is, to stand in
 a true relation to him, so that we give the best to, and receive
 the best from, him.  Between whom there is hearty truth, there is
 love; and in proportion to our truthfulness and confidence in one
 another, our lives are divine and miraculous, and answer to our
 ideal.  There are passages of affection in our intercourse with
 mortal men and women, such as no prophecy had taught us to
 expect, which transcend our earthly life, and anticipate Heaven
 for us.  What is this Love that may come right into the middle of
 a prosaic Goffstown day, equal to any of the gods? that discovers
 a new world, fair and fresh and eternal, occupying the place of
 the old one, when to the common eye a dust has settled on the
 universe? which world cannot else be reached, and does not exist.
 What other words, we may almost ask, are memorable and worthy to
 be repeated than those which love has inspired?  It is wonderful
 that they were ever uttered.  They are few and rare, indeed, but,
 like a strain of music, they are incessantly repeated and
 modulated by the memory.  All other words crumble off with the
 stucco which overlies the heart.  We should not dare to repeat
 these now aloud.  We are not competent to hear them at all times.
 
 The books for young people say a great deal about the _selection_
 of Friends; it is because they really have nothing to say about
 _Friends_.  They mean associates and confidants merely.  "Know
 that the contrariety of foe and Friend proceeds from God."
 Friendship takes place between those who have an affinity for one
 another, and is a perfectly natural and inevitable result.  No
 professions nor advances will avail.  Even speech, at first,
 necessarily has nothing to do with it; but it follows after
 silence, as the buds in the graft do not put forth into leaves
 till long after the graft has taken.  It is a drama in which the
 parties have no part to act.  We are all Mussulmen and fatalists
 in this respect.  Impatient and uncertain lovers think that they
 must say or do something kind whenever they meet; they must never
 be cold.  But they who are Friends do not do what they _think_
 they must, but what they _must_.  Even their Friendship is to
 some extent but a sublime phenomenon to them.
 
 The true and not despairing Friend will address his Friend in
 some such terms as these.
 
 "I never asked thy leave to let me love thee,--I have a right.  I
 love thee not as something private and personal, which is _your
 own_, but as something universal and worthy of love, _which I
 have found_.  O, how I think of you!  You are purely good, --you
 are infinitely good.  I can trust you forever.  I did not think
 that humanity was so rich.  Give me an opportunity to live."
 
 "You are the fact in a fiction,--you are the truth more strange
 and admirable than fiction.  Consent only to be what you are.  I
 alone will never stand in your way."
 
 "This is what I would like,--to be as intimate with you as our
 spirits are intimate,--respecting you as I respect my ideal.
 Never to profane one another by word or action, even by a
 thought.  Between us, if necessary, let there be no
 acquaintance."
 
 "I have discovered you; how can you be concealed from me?"
 
 
 The Friend asks no return but that his Friend will religiously
 accept and wear and not disgrace his apotheosis of him.  They
 cherish each other's hopes.  They are kind to each other's
 dreams.
 
 Though the poet says, "'Tis the pre-eminence of Friendship to
 impute excellence," yet we can never praise our Friend, nor
 esteem him praiseworthy, nor let him think that he can please us
 by any _behavior_, or ever _treat_ us well enough.  That kindness
 which has so good a reputation elsewhere can least of all consist
 with this relation, and no such affront can be offered to a
 Friend, as a conscious good-will, a friendliness which is not a
 necessity of the Friend's nature.
 
 The sexes are naturally most strongly attracted to one another,
 by constant constitutional differences, and are most commonly and
 surely the complements of each other.  How natural and easy it is
 for man to secure the attention of woman to what interests
 himself.  Men and women of equal culture, thrown together, are
 sure to be of a certain value to one another, more than men to
 men.  There exists already a natural disinterestedness and
 liberality in such society, and I think that any man will more
 confidently carry his favorite books to read to some circle of
 intelligent women, than to one of his own sex.  The visit of man
 to man is wont to be an interruption, but the sexes naturally
 expect one another.  Yet Friendship is no respecter of sex; and
 perhaps it is more rare between the sexes than between two of the
 same sex.
 
 Friendship is, at any rate, a relation of perfect equality.  It
 cannot well spare any outward sign of equal obligation and
 advantage.  The nobleman can never have a Friend among his
 retainers, nor the king among his subjects.  Not that the parties
 to it are in all respects equal, but they are equal in all that
 respects or affects their Friendship.  The one's love is exactly
 balanced and represented by the other's.  Persons are only the
 vessels which contain the nectar, and the hydrostatic paradox is
 the symbol of love's law.  It finds its level and rises to its
 fountain-head in all breasts, and its slenderest column balances
 the ocean.
 
      "And love as well the shepherd can
      As can the mighty nobleman."
 
 The one sex is not, in this respect, more tender than the other.
 A hero's love is as delicate as a maiden's.
 
 Confucius said, "Never contract Friendship with a man who is not
 better than thyself." It is the merit and preservation of
 Friendship, that it takes place on a level higher than the actual
 characters of the parties would seem to warrant.  The rays of
 light come to us in such a curve that every man whom we meet
 appears to be taller than he actually is.  Such foundation has
 civility.  My Friend is that one whom I can associate with my
 choicest thought.  I always assign to him a nobler employment in
 my absence than I ever find him engaged in; and I imagine that
 the hours which he devotes to me were snatched from a higher
 society.  The sorest insult which I ever received from a Friend
 was, when he behaved with the license which only long and cheap
 acquaintance allows to one's faults, in my presence, without
 shame, and still addressed me in friendly accents.  Beware, lest
 thy Friend learn at last to tolerate one frailty of thine, and so
 an obstacle be raised to the progress of thy love.  There are
 times when we have had enough even of our Friends, when we begin
 inevitably to profane one another, and must withdraw religiously
 into solitude and silence, the better to prepare ourselves for a
 loftier intimacy.  Silence is the ambrosial night in the
 intercourse of Friends, in which their sincerity is recruited and
 takes deeper root.
 
 Friendship is never established as an understood relation.  Do
 you demand that I be less your Friend that you may know it?  Yet
 what right have I to think that another cherishes so rare a
 sentiment for me?  It is a miracle which requires constant
 proofs.  It is an exercise of the purest imagination and the
 rarest faith.  It says by a silent but eloquent behavior,--"I
 will be so related to thee as thou canst imagine; even so thou
 mayest believe.  I will spend truth,--all my wealth on
 thee,"--and the Friend responds silently through his nature and
 life, and treats his Friend with the same divine courtesy.  He
 knows us literally through thick and thin.  He never asks for a
 sign of love, but can distinguish it by the features which it
 naturally wears.  We never need to stand upon ceremony with him
 with regard to his visits.  Wait not till I invite thee, but
 observe that I am glad to see thee when thou comest.  It would be
 paying too dear for thy visit to ask for it.  Where my Friend
 lives there are all riches and every attraction, and no slight
 obstacle can keep me from him.  Let me never have to tell thee
 what I have not to tell.  Let our intercourse be wholly above
 ourselves, and draw us up to it.
 
 The language of Friendship is not words, but meanings.  It is an
 intelligence above language.  One imagines endless conversations
 with his Friend, in which the tongue shall be loosed, and
 thoughts be spoken without hesitancy or end; but the experience
 is commonly far otherwise.  Acquaintances may come and go, and
 have a word ready for every occasion; but what puny word shall he
 utter whose very breath is thought and meaning?  Suppose you go
 to bid farewell to your Friend who is setting out on a journey;
 what other outward sign do you know than to shake his hand?  Have
 you any palaver ready for him then? any box of salve to commit to
 his pocket?  any particular message to send by him?  any
 statement which you had forgotten to make?--as if you could
 forget anything.--No, it is much that you take his hand and say
 Farewell; that you could easily omit; so far custom has
 prevailed.  It is even painful, if he is to go, that he should
 linger so long.  If he must go, let him go quickly.  Have you any
 _last_ words?  Alas, it is only the word of words, which you have
 so long sought and found not; _you_ have not a _first_ word yet.
 There are few even whom I should venture to call earnestly by
 their most proper names.  A name pronounced is the recognition of
 the individual to whom it belongs.  He who can pronounce my name
 aright, he can call me, and is entitled to my love and service.
 Yet reserve is the freedom and abandonment of lovers.  It is the
 reserve of what is hostile or indifferent in their natures, to
 give place to what is kindred and harmonious.
 
 The violence of love is as much to be dreaded as that of hate.
 When it is durable it is serene and equable.  Even its famous
 pains begin only with the ebb of love, for few are indeed lovers,
 though all would fain be.  It is one proof of a man's fitness for
 Friendship that he is able to do without that which is cheap and
 passionate.  A true Friendship is as wise as it is tender.  The
 parties to it yield implicitly to the guidance of their love, and
 know no other law nor kindness.  It is not extravagant and
 insane, but what it says is something established henceforth, and
 will bear to be stereotyped.  It is a truer truth, it is better
 and fairer news, and no time will ever shame it, or prove it
 false.  This is a plant which thrives best in a temperate zone,
 where summer and winter alternate with one another.  The Friend
 is a _necessarius_, and meets his Friend on homely ground; not on
 carpets and cushions, but on the ground and on rocks they will
 sit, obeying the natural and primitive laws.  They will meet
 without any outcry, and part without loud sorrow.  Their relation
 implies such qualities as the warrior prizes; for it takes a
 valor to open the hearts of men as well as the gates of castles.
 It is not an idle sympathy and mutual consolation merely, but a
 heroic sympathy of aspiration and endeavor.
 
      "When manhood shall be matched so
        That fear can take no place,
      Then weary _works_ make warriors
        Each other to embrace."
 
 The Friendship which Wawatam testified for Henry the fur-trader,
 as described in the latter's "Adventures," so almost bare and
 leafless, yet not blossomless nor fruitless, is remembered with
 satisfaction and security.  The stern, imperturbable warrior,
 after fasting, solitude, and mortification of body, comes to the
 white man's lodge, and affirms that he is the white brother whom
 he saw in his dream, and adopts him henceforth.  He buries the
 hatchet as it regards his friend, and they hunt and feast and
 make maple-sugar together.  "Metals unite from fluxility; birds
 and beasts from motives of convenience; fools from fear and
 stupidity; and just men at sight."  If Wawatam would taste the
 "white man's milk" with his tribe, or take his bowl of human
 broth made of the trader's fellow-countrymen, he first finds a
 place of safety for his Friend, whom he has rescued from a
 similar fate.  At length, after a long winter of undisturbed and
 happy intercourse in the family of the chieftain in the
 wilderness, hunting and fishing, they return in the spring to
 Michilimackinac to dispose of their furs; and it becomes
 necessary for Wawatam to take leave of his Friend at the Isle aux
 Outardes, when the latter, to avoid his enemies, proceeded to the
 Sault de Sainte Marie, supposing that they were to be separated
 for a short time only.  "We now exchanged farewells," says Henry,
 "with an emotion entirely reciprocal.  I did not quit the lodge
 without the most grateful sense of the many acts of goodness
 which I had experienced in it, nor without the sincerest respect
 for the virtues which I had witnessed among its members.  All the
 family accompanied me to the beach; and the canoe had no sooner
 put off than Wawatam commenced an address to the Kichi Manito,
 beseeching him to take care of me, his brother, till we should
 next meet.  We had proceeded to too great a distance to allow of
 our hearing his voice, before Wawatam had ceased to offer up his
 prayers." We never hear of him again.
 
 Friendship is not so kind as is imagined; it has not much human
 blood in it, but consists with a certain disregard for men and
 their erections, the Christian duties and humanities, while it
 purifies the air like electricity.  There may be the sternest
 tragedy in the relation of two more than usually innocent and
 true to their highest instincts.  We may call it an essentially
 heathenish intercourse, free and irresponsible in its nature, and
 practising all the virtues gratuitously.  It is not the highest
 sympathy merely, but a pure and lofty society, a fragmentary and
 godlike intercourse of ancient date, still kept up at intervals,
 which, remembering itself, does not hesitate to disregard the
 humbler rights and duties of humanity.  It requires immaculate
 and godlike qualities full-grown, and exists at all only by
 condescension and anticipation of the remotest future.  We love
 nothing which is merely good and not fair, if such a thing is
 possible.  Nature puts some kind of blossom before every fruit,
 not simply a calyx behind it.  When the Friend comes out of his
 heathenism and superstition, and breaks his idols, being
 converted by the precepts of a newer testament; when he forgets
 his mythology, and treats his Friend like a Christian, or as he
 can afford; then Friendship ceases to be Friendship, and becomes
 charity; that principle which established the almshouse is now
 beginning with its charity at home, and establishing an almshouse
 and pauper relations there.
 
 As for the number which this society admits, it is at any rate to
 be begun with one, the noblest and greatest that we know, and
 whether the world will ever carry it further, whether, as Chaucer
 affirms,
 
      "There be mo sterres in the skie than a pair,"
 
 remains to be proved;
 
      "And certaine he is well begone
      Among a thousand that findeth one."
 
 We shall not surrender ourselves heartily to any while we are
 conscious that another is more deserving of our love.  Yet
 Friendship does not stand for numbers; the Friend does not count
 his Friends on his fingers; they are not numerable.  The more
 there are included by this bond, if they are indeed included, the
 rarer and diviner the quality of the love that binds them.  I am
 ready to believe that as private and intimate a relation may
 exist by which three are embraced, as between two.  Indeed, we
 cannot have too many friends; the virtue which we appreciate we
 to some extent appropriate, so that thus we are made at last more
 fit for every relation of life.  A base Friendship is of a
 narrowing and exclusive tendency, but a noble one is not
 exclusive; its very superfluity and dispersed love is the
 humanity which sweetens society, and sympathizes with foreign
 nations; for though its foundations are private, it is, in
 effect, a public affair and a public advantage, and the Friend,
 more than the father of a family, deserves well of the state.
 
 The only danger in Friendship is that it will end.  It is a
 delicate plant, though a native.  The least unworthiness, even if
 it be unknown to one's self, vitiates it.  Let the Friend know
 that those faults which he observes in his Friend his own faults
 attract.  There is no rule more invariable than that we are paid
 for our suspicions by finding what we suspected.  By our narrowness
 and prejudices we say, I will have so much and such of you, my
 Friend, no more.  Perhaps there are none charitable, none
 disinterested, none wise, noble, and heroic enough, for a true
 and lasting Friendship.
 
 I sometimes hear my Friends complain finely that I do not
 appreciate their fineness.  I shall not tell them whether I do or
 not.  As if they expected a vote of thanks for every fine thing
 which they uttered or did.  Who knows but it was finely
 appreciated.  It may be that your silence was the finest thing of
 the two.  There are some things which a man never speaks of,
 which are much finer kept silent about.  To the highest
 communications we only lend a silent ear.  Our finest relations
 are not simply kept silent about, but buried under a positive
 depth of silence never to be revealed.  It may be that we are not
 even yet acquainted.  In human intercourse the tragedy begins,
 not when there is misunderstanding about words, but when silence
 is not understood.  Then there can never be an explanation.  What
 avails it that another loves you, if he does not understand you?
 Such love is a curse.  What sort of companions are they who are
 presuming always that their silence is more expressive than
 yours?  How foolish, and inconsiderate, and unjust, to conduct as
 if you were the only party aggrieved!  Has not your Friend always
 equal ground of complaint?  No doubt my Friends sometimes speak
 to me in vain, but they do not know what things I hear which they
 are not aware that they have spoken.  I know that I have
 frequently disappointed them by not giving them words when they
 expected them, or such as they expected.  Whenever I see my
 Friend I speak to him; but the expecter, the man with the ears,
 is not he.  They will complain too that you are hard.  O ye that
 would have the cocoa-nut wrong side outwards, when next I weep I
 will let you know.  They ask for words and deeds, when a true
 relation is word and deed.  If they know not of these things, how
 can they be informed?  We often forbear to confess our feelings,
 not from pride, but for fear that we could not continue to love
 the one who required us to give such proof of our affection.
 
 
 I know a woman who possesses a restless and intelligent mind,
 interested in her own culture, and earnest to enjoy the highest
 possible advantages, and I meet her with pleasure as a natural
 person who not a little provokes me, and I suppose is stimulated
 in turn by myself.  Yet our acquaintance plainly does not attain
 to that degree of confidence and sentiment which women, which
 all, in fact, covet.  I am glad to help her, as I am helped by
 her; I like very well to know her with a sort of stranger's
 privilege, and hesitate to visit her often, like her other
 Friends.  My nature pauses here, I do not well know why.  Perhaps
 she does not make the highest demand on me, a religious demand.
 Some, with whose prejudices or peculiar bias I have no sympathy,
 yet inspire me with confidence, and I trust that they confide in
 me also as a religious heathen at least,--a good Greek.  I, too,
 have principles as well founded as their own.  If this person
 could conceive that, without wilfulness, I associate with her as
 far as our destinies are coincident, as far as our Good Geniuses
 permit, and still value such intercourse, it would be a grateful
 assurance to me.  I feel as if I appeared careless, indifferent,
 and without principle to her, not expecting more, and yet not
 content with less.  If she could know that I make an infinite
 demand on myself, as well as on all others, she would see that
 this true though incomplete intercourse, is infinitely better
 than a more unreserved but falsely grounded one, without the
 principle of growth in it.  For a companion, I require one who
 will make an equal demand on me with my own genius.  Such a one
 will always be rightly tolerant.  It is suicide, and corrupts
 good manners to welcome any less than this.  I value and trust
 those who love and praise my aspiration rather than my
 performance.  If you would not stop to look at me, but look
 whither I am looking, and farther, then my education could not
 dispense with your company.
 
      My love must be as free
         As is the eagle's wing,
      Hovering o'er land and sea
         And everything.
 
      I must not dim my eye
         In thy saloon,
      I must not leave my sky
         And nightly moon.
 
      Be not the fowler's net
         Which stays my flight,
      And craftily is set
         T'allure the sight.
 
      But be the favoring gale
         That bears me on,
      And still doth fill my sail
         When thou art gone.
 
      I cannot leave my sky
         For thy caprice,
      True love would soar as high
         As heaven is.
 
      The eagle would not brook
         Her mate thus won,
      Who trained his eye to look
         Beneath the sun.
 
 Few things are more difficult than to help a Friend in matters
 which do not require the aid of Friendship, but only a cheap and
 trivial service, if your Friendship wants the basis of a thorough
 practical acquaintance.  I stand in the friendliest relation, on
 social and spiritual grounds, to one who does not perceive what
 practical skill I have, but when he seeks my assistance in such
 matters, is wholly ignorant of that one with whom he deals; does
 not use my skill, which in such matters is much greater than his,
 but only my hands.  I know another, who, on the contrary, is
 remarkable for his discrimination in this respect; who knows how
 to make use of the talents of others when he does not possess the
 same; knows when not to look after or oversee, and stops short at
 his man.  It is a rare pleasure to serve him, which all laborers
 know.  I am not a little pained by the other kind of treatment.
 It is as if, after the friendliest and most ennobling intercourse,
 your Friend should use you as a hammer, and drive a nail with
 your head, all in good faith; notwithstanding that you are a
 tolerable carpenter, as well as his good Friend, and would use a
 hammer cheerfully in his service.  This want of perception is a
 defect which all the virtues of the heart cannot supply:--
 
      The Good how can we trust?
      Only the Wise are just.
      The Good we use,
      The Wise we cannot choose.
      These there are none above;
      The Good they know and love,
      But are not known again
      By those of lesser ken.
      They do not charm us with their eyes,
      But they transfix with their advice;
      No partial sympathy they feel,
      With private woe or private weal,
      But with the universe joy and sigh,
      Whose knowledge is their sympathy.
 
 Confucius said: "To contract ties of Friendship with any one, is
 to contract Friendship with his virtue.  There ought not to be
 any other motive in Friendship."  But men wish us to contract
 Friendship with their vice also.  I have a Friend who wishes me
 to see that to be right which I know to be wrong.  But if
 Friendship is to rob me of my eyes, if it is to darken the day, I
 will have none of it.  It should be expansive and inconceivably
 liberalizing in its effects.  True Friendship can afford true
 knowledge.  It does not depend on darkness and ignorance.  A want
 of discernment cannot be an ingredient in it.  If I can see my
 Friend's virtues more distinctly than another's, his faults too
 are made more conspicuous by contrast.  We have not so good a
 right to hate any as our Friend.  Faults are not the less faults
 because they are invariably balanced by corresponding virtues,
 and for a fault there is no excuse, though it may appear greater
 than it is in many ways.  I have never known one who could bear
 criticism, who could not be flattered, who would not bribe his
 judge, or was content that the truth should be loved always
 better than himself.
 
 If two travellers would go their way harmoniously together, the
 one must take as true and just a view of things as the other,
 else their path will not be strewn with roses.  Yet you can
 travel profitably and pleasantly even with a blind man, if he
 practises common courtesy, and when you converse about the
 scenery will remember that he is blind but that you can see; and
 you will not forget that his sense of hearing is probably
 quickened by his want of sight.  Otherwise you will not long keep
 company.  A blind man, and a man in whose eyes there was no
 defect, were walking together, when they came to the edge of a
 precipice.  "Take care!  my friend," said the latter, "here is a
 steep precipice; go no farther this way."--"I know better," said
 the other, and stepped off.
 
 It is impossible to say all that we think, even to our truest
 Friend.  We may bid him farewell forever sooner than complain,
 for our complaint is too well grounded to be uttered.  There is
 not so good an understanding between any two, but the exposure by
 the one of a serious fault in the other will produce a
 misunderstanding in proportion to its heinousness.  The
 constitutional differences which always exist, and are obstacles
 to a perfect Friendship, are forever a forbidden theme to the
 lips of Friends.  They advise by their whole behavior.  Nothing
 can reconcile them but love.  They are fatally late when they
 undertake to explain and treat with one another like foes.  Who
 will take an apology for a Friend?  They must apologize like dew
 and frost, which are off again with the sun, and which all men
 know in their hearts to be beneficent.  The necessity itself for
 explanation,--what explanation will atone for that?
 
 True love does not quarrel for slight reasons, such mistakes as
 mutual acquaintances can explain away, but, alas, however slight
 the apparent cause, only for adequate and fatal and everlasting
 reasons, which can never be set aside.  Its quarrel, if there is
 any, is ever recurring, notwithstanding the beams of affection
 which invariably come to gild its tears; as the rainbow, however
 beautiful and unerring a sign, does not promise fair weather
 forever, but only for a season.  I have known two or three
 persons pretty well, and yet I have never known advice to be of
 use but in trivial and transient matters.  One may know what
 another does not, but the utmost kindness cannot impart what is
 requisite to make the advice useful.  We must accept or refuse
 one another as we are.  I could tame a hyena more easily than my
 Friend.  He is a material which no tool of mine will work.  A
 naked savage will fell an oak with a firebrand, and wear a
 hatchet out of a rock by friction, but I cannot hew the smallest
 chip out of the character of my Friend, either to beautify or
 deform it.
 
 The lover learns at last that there is no person quite
 transparent and trustworthy, but every one has a devil in him
 that is capable of any crime in the long run.  Yet, as an
 Oriental philosopher has said, "Although Friendship between good
 men is interrupted, their principles remain unaltered.  The stalk
 of the lotus may be broken, and the fibres remain connected."
 
 
 Ignorance and bungling with love are better than wisdom and skill
 without.  There may be courtesy, there may be even temper, and
 wit, and talent, and sparkling conversation, there may be
 good-will even,--and yet the humanest and divinest faculties pine
 for exercise.  Our life without love is like coke and ashes.  Men
 may be pure as alabaster and Parian marble, elegant as a Tuscan
 villa, sublime as Niagara, and yet if there is no milk mingled
 with the wine at their entertainments, better is the hospitality
 of Goths and Vandals.
 
 My Friend is not of some other race or family of men, but flesh
 of my flesh, bone of my bone.  He is my real brother.  I see his
 nature groping yonder so like mine.  We do not live far apart.
 Have not the fates associated us in many ways?  It says, in the
 Vishnu Purana: "Seven paces together is sufficient for the
 friendship of the virtuous, but thou and I have dwelt together."
 Is it of no significance that we have so long partaken of the
 same loaf, drank at the same fountain, breathed the same air
 summer and winter, felt the same heat and cold; that the same
 fruits have been pleased to refresh us both, and we have never
 had a thought of different fibre the one from the other!
 
       Nature doth have her dawn each day,
       But mine are far between;
       Content, I cry, for sooth to say,
       Mine brightest are I ween.
 
       For when my sun doth deign to rise,
       Though it be her noontide,
       Her fairest field in shadow lies,
       Nor can my light abide.
 
       Sometimes I bask me in her day,
       Conversing with my mate,
       But if we interchange one ray,
       Forthwith her heats abate.
 
       Through his discourse I climb and see,
       As from some eastern hill,
       A brighter morrow rise to me
       Than lieth in her skill.
 
       As 't were two summer days in one,
       Two Sundays come together,
       Our rays united make one sun,
       With fairest summer weather.
 
 As surely as the sunset in my latest November shall translate me
 to the ethereal world, and remind me of the ruddy morning of
 youth; as surely as the last strain of music which falls on my
 decaying ear shall make age to be forgotten, or, in short, the
 manifold influences of nature survive during the term of our
 natural life, so surely my Friend shall forever be my Friend, and
 reflect a ray of God to me, and time shall foster and adorn and
 consecrate our Friendship, no less than the ruins of temples.  As
 I love nature, as I love singing birds, and gleaming stubble, and
 flowing rivers, and morning and evening, and summer and winter, I
 love thee, my Friend.
 
 
 But all that can be said of Friendship, is like botany to
 flowers.  How can the understanding take account of its
 friendliness?
 
 Even the death of Friends will inspire us as much as their lives.
 They will leave consolation to the mourners, as the rich leave
 money to defray the expenses of their funerals, and their
 memories will be incrusted over with sublime and pleasing
 thoughts, as monuments of other men are overgrown with moss; for
 our Friends have no place in the graveyard.
 
 This to our cis-Alpine and cis-Atlantic Friends.
 
 
 Also this other word of entreaty and advice to the large and
 respectable nation of Acquaintances, beyond the
 mountains;--Greeting.
 
 My most serene and irresponsible neighbors, let us see that we
 have the whole advantage of each other; we will be useful, at
 least, if not admirable, to one another.  I know that the
 mountains which separate us are high, and covered with perpetual
 snow, but despair not.  Improve the serene winter weather to
 scale them.  If need be, soften the rocks with vinegar.  For here
 lie the verdant plains of Italy ready to receive you.  Nor shall
 I be slow on my side to penetrate to your Provence.  Strike then
 boldly at head or heart or any vital part.  Depend upon it, the
 timber is well seasoned and tough, and will bear rough usage; and
 if it should crack, there is plenty more where it came from.  I
 am no piece of crockery that cannot be jostled against my
 neighbor without danger of being broken by the collision, and
 must needs ring false and jarringly to the end of my days, when
 once I am cracked; but rather one of the old-fashioned wooden
 trenchers, which one while stands at the head of the table, and
 at another is a milking-stool, and at another a seat for
 children, and finally goes down to its grave not unadorned with
 honorable scars, and does not die till it is worn out.  Nothing
 can shock a brave man but dulness.  Think how many rebuffs every
 man has experienced in his day; perhaps has fallen into a
 horse-pond, eaten fresh-water clams, or worn one shirt for a week
 without washing.  Indeed, you cannot receive a shock unless you
 have an electric affinity for that which shocks you.  Use me,
 then, for I am useful in my way, and stand as one of many
 petitioners, from toadstool and henbane up to dahlia and violet,
 supplicating to be put to my use, if by any means ye may find me
 serviceable; whether for a medicated drink or bath, as balm and
 lavender; or for fragrance, as verbena and geranium; or for
 sight, as cactus; or for thoughts, as pansy.  These humbler, at
 least, if not those higher uses.
 
 Ah, my dear Strangers and Enemies, I would not forget you.  I can
 well afford to welcome you.  Let me subscribe myself Yours ever
 and truly,--your much obliged servant.  We have nothing to fear
 from our foes; God keeps a standing army for that service; but we
 have no ally against our Friends, those ruthless Vandals.
 
 
 Once more to one and all,
 
      "Friends, Romans, Countrymen, and Lovers."
 
      Let such pure hate still underprop
      Our love, that we may be
      Each other's conscience.
      And have our sympathy
      Mainly from thence.
 
      We'll one another treat like gods,
      And all the faith we have
      In virtue and in truth, bestow
      On either, and suspicion leave
      To gods below.
 
      Two solitary stars,--
      Unmeasured systems far
      Between us roll,
      But by our conscious light we are
      Determined to one pole.
 
      What need confound the sphere,--
      Love can afford to wait,
      For it no hour's too late
      That witnesseth one duty's end,
      Or to another doth beginning lend.
 
      It will subserve no use,
      More than the tints of flowers,
      Only the independent guest
      Frequents its bowers,
      Inherits its bequest.
 
      No speech though kind has it,
      But kinder silence doles
      Unto its mates,
      By night consoles,
      By day congratulates.
 
      What saith the tongue to tongue?
      What heareth ear of ear?
      By the decrees of fate
      From year to year,
      Does it communicate.
 
      Pathless the gulf of feeling yawns,--
      No trivial bridge of words,
      Or arch of boldest span,
      Can leap the moat that girds
      The sincere man.
 
      No show of bolts and bars
      Can keep the foeman out,
      Or 'scape his secret mine
      Who entered with the doubt
      That drew the line.
 
      No warder at the gate
      Can let the friendly in,
      But, like the sun, o'er all
      He will the castle win,
      And shine along the wall.
 
      There's nothing in the world I know
      That can escape from love,
      For every depth it goes below,
      And every height above.
 
      It waits as waits the sky,
      Until the clouds go by,
      Yet shines serenely on
      With an eternal day,
      Alike when they are gone,
      And when they stay.
 
      Implacable is Love,--
      Foes may be bought or teased
      From their hostile intent,
      But he goes unappeased
      Who is on kindness bent.
 
 Having rowed five or six miles above Amoskeag before sunset, and
 reached a pleasant part of the river, one of us landed to look
 for a farm-house, where we might replenish our stores, while the
 other remained cruising about the stream, and exploring the
 opposite shores to find a suitable harbor for the night.  In the
 mean while the canal-boats began to come round a point in our
 rear, poling their way along close to the shore, the breeze
 having quite died away.  This time there was no offer of
 assistance, but one of the boatmen only called out to say, as the
 truest revenge for having been the losers in the race, that he
 had seen a wood-duck, which we had scared up, sitting on a tall
 white-pine, half a mile down stream; and he repeated the
 assertion several times, and seemed really chagrined at the
 apparent suspicion with which this information was received.  But
 there sat the summer duck still, undisturbed by us.
 
 By and by the other voyageur returned from his inland expedition,
 bringing one of the natives with him, a little flaxen-headed boy,
 with some tradition, or small edition, of Robinson Crusoe in his
 head, who had been charmed by the account of our adventures, and
 asked his father's leave to join us.  He examined, at first from
 the top of the bank, our boat and furniture, with sparkling eyes,
 and wished himself already his own man.  He was a lively and
 interesting boy, and we should have been glad to ship him; but
 Nathan was still his father's boy, and had not come to years of
 discretion.
 
 We had got a loaf of home-made bread, and musk and water melons
 for dessert.  For this farmer, a clever and well-disposed man,
 cultivated a large patch of melons for the Hooksett and Concord
 markets.  He hospitably entertained us the next day, exhibiting
 his hop-fields and kiln and melon-patch, warning us to step over
 the tight rope which surrounded the latter at a foot from the
 ground, while he pointed to a little bower at one corner, where
 it connected with the lock of a gun ranging with the line, and
 where, as he informed us, he sometimes sat in pleasant nights to
 defend his premises against thieves.  We stepped high over the
 line, and sympathized with our host's on the whole quite human,
 if not humane, interest in the success of his experiment.  That
 night especially thieves were to be expected, from rumors in the
 atmosphere, and the priming was not wet.  He was a Methodist man,
 who had his dwelling between the river and Uncannunuc Mountain;
 who there belonged, and stayed at home there, and by the
 encouragement of distant political organizations, and by his own
 tenacity, held a property in his melons, and continued to plant.
 We suggested melon-seeds of new varieties and fruit of foreign
 flavor to be added to his stock.  We had come away up here among
 the hills to learn the impartial and unbribable beneficence of
 Nature.  Strawberries and melons grow as well in one man's garden
 as another's, and the sun lodges as kindly under his
 hillside,--when we had imagined that she inclined rather to some
 few earnest and faithful souls whom we know.
 
 We found a convenient harbor for our boat on the opposite or east
 shore, still in Hooksett, at the mouth of a small brook which
 emptied into the Merrimack, where it would be out of the way of
 any passing boat in the night,--for they commonly hug the shore
 if bound up stream, either to avoid the current, or touch the
 bottom with their poles,--and where it would be accessible
 without stepping on the clayey shore.  We set one of our largest
 melons to cool in the still water among the alders at the mouth
 of this creek, but when our tent was pitched and ready, and we
 went to get it, it had floated out into the stream, and was
 nowhere to be seen.  So taking the boat in the twilight, we went
 in pursuit of this property, and at length, after long straining
 of the eyes, its green disk was discovered far down the river,
 gently floating seaward with many twigs and leaves from the
 mountains that evening, and so perfectly balanced that it had not
 keeled at all, and no water had run in at the tap which had been
 taken out to hasten its cooling.
 
 As we sat on the bank eating our supper, the clear light of the
 western sky fell on the eastern trees, and was reflected in the
 water, and we enjoyed so serene an evening as left nothing to
 describe.  For the most part we think that there are few degrees
 of sublimity, and that the highest is but little higher than that
 which we now behold; but we are always deceived.  Sublimer
 visions appear, and the former pale and fade away.  We are
 grateful when we are reminded by interior evidence of the
 permanence of universal laws; for our faith is but faintly
 remembered, indeed, is not a remembered assurance, but a use and
 enjoyment of knowledge.  It is when we do not have to believe,
 but come into actual contact with Truth, and are related to her
 in the most direct and intimate way.  Waves of serener life pass
 over us from time to time, like flakes of sunlight over the
 fields in cloudy weather.  In some happier moment, when more sap
 flows in the withered stalk of our life, Syria and India stretch
 away from our present as they do in history.  All the events
 which make the annals of the nations are but the shadows of our
 private experiences.  Suddenly and silently the eras which we
 call history awake and glimmer in us, and _there_ is room for
 Alexander and Hannibal to march and conquer.  In short, the
 history which we read is only a fainter memory of events which
 have happened in our own experience.  Tradition is a more
 interrupted and feebler memory.
 
 This world is but canvas to our imaginations.  I see men with
 infinite pains endeavoring to realize to their bodies, what I,
 with at least equal pains, would realize to my imagination,--its
 capacities; for certainly there is a life of the mind above the
 wants of the body, and independent of it.  Often the body is
 warmed, but the imagination is torpid; the body is fat, but the
 imagination is lean and shrunk.  But what avails all other wealth
 if this is wanting?  "Imagination is the air of mind," in which
 it lives and breathes.  All things are as I am.  Where is the
 House of Change?  The past is only so heroic as we see it.
 It is the canvas on which our idea of heroism is painted, and
 so, in one sense, the dim prospectus of our future field.  Our
 circumstances answer to our expectations and the demand of our
 natures.  I have noticed that if a man thinks that he needs a
 thousand dollars, and cannot be convinced that he does not, he
 will commonly be found to have them; if he lives and thinks a
 thousand dollars will be forthcoming, though it be to buy
 shoe-strings with.  A thousand mills will be just as slow to
 come to one who finds it equally hard to convince himself that
 he needs _them_.
 
      Men are by birth equal in this, that given Themselves and
      their condition, they are even.
 
 I am astonished at the singular pertinacity and endurance of our
 lives.  The miracle is, that what is _is_, when it is so
 difficult, if not impossible, for anything else to be; that we
 walk on in our particular paths so far, before we fall on death
 and fate, merely because we must walk in some path; that every
 man can get a living, and so few can do anything more.  So much
 only can I accomplish ere health and strength are gone, and yet
 this suffices.  The bird now sits just out of gunshot.  I am
 never rich in money, and I am never meanly poor.  If debts are
 incurred, why, debts are in the course of events cancelled, as it
 were by the same law by which they were incurred.  I heard that
 an engagement was entered into between a certain youth and a
 maiden, and then I heard that it was broken off, but I did not
 know the reason in either case.  We are hedged about, we think,
 by accident and circumstance, now we creep as in a dream, and now
 again we run, as if there were a fate in it, and all things
 thwarted or assisted.  I cannot change my clothes but when I do,
 and yet I do change them, and soil the new ones.  It is wonderful
 that this gets done, when some admirable deeds which I could
 mention do not get done.  Our particular lives seem of such
 fortune and confident strength and durability as piers of solid
 rock thrown forward into the tide of circumstance.  When every
 other path would fail, with singular and unerring confidence we
 advance on our particular course.  What risks we run! famine and
 fire and pestilence, and the thousand forms of a cruel fate,--and
 yet every man lives till he--dies.  How did he manage that?  Is
 there no immediate danger?  We wonder superfluously when we hear
 of a somnambulist walking a plank securely,--we have walked a
 plank all our lives up to this particular string-piece where we
 are.  My life will wait for nobody, but is being matured still
 without delay, while I go about the streets, and chaffer with
 this man and that to secure it a living.  It is as indifferent
 and easy meanwhile as a poor man's dog, and making acquaintance
 with its kind.  It will cut its own channel like a mountain
 stream, and by the longest ridge is not kept from the sea at
 last.  I have found all things thus far, persons and inanimate
 matter, elements and seasons, strangely adapted to my resources.
 No matter what imprudent haste in my career; I am permitted to be
 rash.  Gulfs are bridged in a twinkling, as if some unseen
 baggage-train carried pontoons for my convenience, and while from
 the heights I scan the tempting but unexplored Pacific Ocean of
 Futurity, the ship is being carried over the mountains piecemeal
 on the backs of mules and lamas, whose keel shall plough its
 waves, and bear me to the Indies.  Day would not dawn if it were
 not for
 
      THE INWARD MORNING
 
      Packed in my mind lie all the clothes
      Which outward nature wears,
      And in its fashion's hourly change
      It all things else repairs.
 
      In vain I look for change abroad,
      And can no difference find,
      Till some new ray of peace uncalled
      Illumes my inmost mind.
 
      What is it gilds the trees and clouds,
      And paints the heavens so gay,
      But yonder fast-abiding light
      With its unchanging ray?
 
      Lo, when the sun streams through the wood,
      Upon a winter's morn,
      Where'er his silent beams intrude,
      The murky night is gone.
 
      How could the patient pine have known
        The morning breeze would come,
      Or humble flowers anticipate
        The insect's noonday hum,--
 
      Till the new light with morning cheer
        From far streamed through the aisles,
      And nimbly told the forest trees
        For many stretching miles?
 
      I've heard within my inmost soul
        Such cheerful morning news,
      In the horizon of my mind
        Have seen such orient hues,
 
      As in the twilight of the dawn,
        When the first birds awake,
      Are heard within some silent wood,
        Where they the small twigs break,
 
      Or in the eastern skies are seen,
        Before the sun appears,
      The harbingers of summer heats
         Which from afar he bears.
 
 Whole weeks and months of my summer life slide away in thin
 volumes like mist and smoke, till at length, some warm morning,
 perchance, I see a sheet of mist blown down the brook to the
 swamp, and I float as high above the fields with it.  I can recall
 to mind the stillest summer hours, in which the grasshopper sings
 over the mulleins, and there is a valor in that time the bare
 memory of which is armor that can laugh at any blow of fortune.
 For our lifetime the strains of a harp are heard to swell and die
 alternately, and death is but "the pause when the blast is
 recollecting itself."
 
 
 We lay awake a long while, listening to the murmurs of the brook,
 in the angle formed by whose bank with the river our tent was
 pitched, and there was a sort of human interest in its story,
 which ceases not in freshet or in drought the livelong summer,
 and the profounder lapse of the river was quite drowned by its
 din.  But the rill, whose
 
      "Silver sands and pebbles sing
      Eternal ditties with the spring,"
 
 is silenced by the first frosts of winter, while mightier
 streams, on whose bottom the sun never shines, clogged with
 sunken rocks and the ruins of forests, from whose surface comes
 up no murmur, are strangers to the icy fetters which bind fast a
 thousand contributary rills.
 
 I dreamed this night of an event which had occurred long before.
 It was a difference with a Friend, which had not ceased to give
 me pain, though I had no cause to blame myself.  But in my dream
 ideal justice was at length done me for his suspicions, and I
 received that compensation which I had never obtained in my
 waking hours.  I was unspeakably soothed and rejoiced, even after
 I awoke, because in dreams we never deceive ourselves, nor are
 deceived, and this seemed to have the authority of a final
 judgment.
 
 We bless and curse ourselves.  Some dreams are divine, as well as
 some waking thoughts.  Donne sings of one
 
      "Who dreamt devoutlier than most use to pray."
 
 Dreams are the touchstones of our characters.  We are scarcely
 less afflicted when we remember some unworthiness in our conduct
 in a dream, than if it had been actual, and the intensity of our
 grief, which is our atonement, measures the degree by which this
 is separated from an actual unworthiness.  For in dreams we but
 act a part which must have been learned and rehearsed in our
 waking hours, and no doubt could discover some waking consent
 thereto.  If this meanness had not its foundation in us, why are
 we grieved at it?  In dreams we see ourselves naked and acting
 out our real characters, even more clearly than we see others
 awake.  But an unwavering and commanding virtue would compel even
 its most fantastic and faintest dreams to respect its
 ever-wakeful authority; as we are accustomed to say carelessly,
 we should never have _dreamed_ of such a thing.  Our truest life
 is when we are in dreams awake.
 
      "And, more to lulle him in his slumber soft,
      A trickling streame from high rock tumbling downe,
      And ever-drizzling raine upon the loft,
      Mixt with a murmuring winde, much like the sowne
      Of swarming bees, did cast him in a swowne.
      No other noyse, nor people's troublous cryes,
      As still are wont t' annoy the walled towne,
      Might there be heard; but careless Quiet lyes
      Wrapt in eternall silence farre from enemyes."
 
 
 
 
 [page]
 
 
                       THURSDAY.
 
      "He trode the unplanted forest floor, whereon
      The all-seeing sun for ages hath not shone,
      Where feeds the moose, and walks the surly bear,
      And up the tall mast runs the woodpecker.
           .  .  .  .
      Where darkness found him he lay glad at night;
      There the red morning touched him with its light.
           .  .  .  .
      Go where he will, the wise man is at home,
      His hearth the earth,--his hall the azure dome;
      Where his clear spirit leads him, there's his road,
      By God's own light illumined and foreshowed."
                                             ^Emerson^.
 
 
 
 [page]
 
 
                       THURSDAY.
 
                         --*--
 
 
 
 When we awoke this morning, we heard the faint, deliberate, and
 ominous sound of rain-drops on our cotton roof.  The rain had
 pattered all night, and now the whole country wept, the drops
 falling in the river, and on the alders, and in the pastures, and
 instead of any bow in the heavens, there was the trill of the
 hair-bird all the morning.  The cheery faith of this little bird
 atoned for the silence of the whole woodland choir beside.  When
 we first stepped abroad, a flock of sheep, led by their rams,
 came rushing down a ravine in our rear, with heedless haste and
 unreserved frisking, as if unobserved by man, from some higher
 pasture where they had spent the night, to taste the herbage by
 the river-side; but when their leaders caught sight of our white
 tent through the mist, struck with sudden astonishment, with
 their fore-feet braced, they sustained the rushing torrent in
 their rear, and the whole flock stood stock-still, endeavoring to
 solve the mystery in their sheepish brains.  At length,
 concluding that it boded no mischief to them, they spread
 themselves out quietly over the field.  We learned afterward that
 we had pitched our tent on the very spot which a few summers
 before had been occupied by a party of Penobscots.  We could see
 rising before us through the mist a dark conical eminence called
 Hooksett Pinnacle, a landmark to boatmen, and also Uncannunuc
 Mountain, broad off on the west side of the river.
 
 This was the limit of our voyage, for a few hours more in the
 rain would have taken us to the last of the locks, and our boat
 was too heavy to be dragged around the long and numerous rapids
 which would occur.  On foot, however, we continued up along the
 bank, feeling our way with a stick through the showery and foggy
 day, and climbing over the slippery logs in our path with as much
 pleasure and buoyancy as in brightest sunshine; scenting the
 fragrance of the pines and the wet clay under our feet, and
 cheered by the tones of invisible waterfalls; with visions of
 toadstools, and wandering frogs, and festoons of moss hanging
 from the spruce-trees, and thrushes flitting silent under the
 leaves; our road still holding together through that wettest of
 weather, like faith, while we confidently followed its lead.  We
 managed to keep our thoughts dry, however, and only our clothes
 were wet.  It was altogether a cloudy and drizzling day, with
 occasional brightenings in the mist, when the trill of the
 tree-sparrow seemed to be ushering in sunny hours.
 
 "Nothing that naturally happens to man can _hurt_ him,
 earthquakes and thunder-storms not excepted," said a man of
 genius, who at this time lived a few miles farther on our road.
 When compelled by a shower to take shelter under a tree, we may
 improve that opportunity for a more minute inspection of some of
 Nature's works.  I have stood under a tree in the woods half a
 day at a time, during a heavy rain in the summer, and yet
 employed myself happily and profitably there prying with
 microscopic eye into the crevices of the bark or the leaves or
 the fungi at my feet.  "Riches are the attendants of the miser;
 and the heavens rain plenteously upon the mountains." I can fancy
 that it would be a luxury to stand up to one's chin in some
 retired swamp a whole summer day, scenting the wild honeysuckle
 and bilberry blows, and lulled by the minstrelsy of gnats and
 mosquitoes!  A day passed in the society of those Greek sages,
 such as described in the Banquet of Xenophon, would not be
 comparable with the dry wit of decayed cranberry vines, and the
 fresh Attic salt of the moss-beds.  Say twelve hours of genial
 and familiar converse with the leopard frog; the sun to rise
 behind alder and dogwood, and climb buoyantly to his meridian of
 two hands' breadth, and finally sink to rest behind some bold
 western hummock.  To hear the evening chant of the mosquito from
 a thousand green chapels, and the bittern begin to boom from some
 concealed fort like a sunset gun!--Surely one may as profitably
 be soaked in the juices of a swamp for one day as pick his way
 dry-shod over sand.  Cold and damp,--are they not as rich
 experience as warmth and dryness?
 
 At present, the drops come trickling down the stubble while we
 lie drenched on a bed of withered wild oats, by the side of a
 bushy hill, and the gathering in of the clouds, with the last
 rush and dying breath of the wind, and then the regular dripping
 of twigs and leaves the country over, enhance the sense of inward
 comfort and sociableness.  The birds draw closer and are more
 familiar under the thick foliage, seemingly composing new strains
 upon their roosts against the sunshine.  What were the amusements
 of the drawing-room and the library in comparison, if we had them
 here?  We should still sing as of old,--
 
      My books I'd fain cast off, I cannot read,
      'Twixt every page my thoughts go stray at large
      Down in the meadow, where is richer feed,
      And will not mind to hit their proper targe.
 
      Plutarch was good, and so was Homer too,
      Our Shakespeare's life were rich to live again,
      What Plutarch read, that was not good nor true,
      Nor Shakespeare's books, unless his books were men
 
      Here while I lie beneath this walnut bough,
      What care I for the Greeks or for Troy town,
      If juster battles are enacted now
      Between the ants upon this hummock's crown?
 
      Bid Homer wait till I the issue learn,
      If red or black the gods will favor most,
      Or yonder Ajax will the phalanx turn,
      Struggling to heave some rock against the host.
 
      Tell Shakespeare to attend some leisure hour,
      For now I've business with this drop of dew,
      And see you not, the clouds prepare a shower,--
      I'll meet him shortly when the sky is blue.
 
      This bed of herd's-grass and wild oats was spread
      Last year with nicer skill than monarchs use,
      A clover tuft is pillow for my head,
      And violets quite overtop my shoes.
 
      And now the cordial clouds have shut all in
      And gently swells the wind to say all's well
      The scattered drops are falling fast and thin,
      Some in the pool, some in the flower-bell.
 
      I am well drenched upon my bed of oats;
      But see that globe come rolling down its stem
      Now like a lonely planet there it floats,
      And now it sinks into my garment's hem.
 
      Drip drip the trees for all the country round,
      And richness rare distils from every bough,
      The wind alone it is makes every sound,
      Shaking down crystals on the leaves below.
 
      For shame the sun will never show himself,
      Who could not with his beams e'er melt me so,
      My dripping locks,--they would become an elf,
      Who in a beaded coat does gayly go.
 
 The Pinnacle is a small wooded hill which rises very abruptly to
 the height of about two hundred feet, near the shore at Hooksett
 Falls.  As Uncannunuc Mountain is perhaps the best point from
 which to view the valley of the Merrimack, so this hill affords
 the best view of the river itself.  I have sat upon its summit, a
 precipitous rock only a few rods long, in fairer weather, when
 the sun was setting and filling the river valley with a flood of
 light.  You can see up and down the Merrimack several miles each
 way.  The broad and straight river, full of light and life, with
 its sparkling and foaming falls, the islet which divides the
 stream, the village of Hooksett on the shore almost directly
 under your feet, so near that you can converse with its
 inhabitants or throw a stone into its yards, the woodland lake at
 its western base, and the mountains in the north and northeast,
 make a scene of rare beauty and completeness, which the traveller
 should take pains to behold.
 
 We were hospitably entertained in Concord, New Hampshire, which
 we persisted in calling _New_ Concord, as we had been wont, to
 distinguish it from our native town, from which we had been told
 that it was named and in part originally settled.  This would
 have been the proper place to conclude our voyage, uniting
 Concord with Concord by these meandering rivers, but our boat was
 moored some miles below its port.
 
 The richness of the intervals at Penacook, now Concord, New
 Hampshire, had been observed by explorers, and, according to the
 historian of Haverhill, in the
 
   "year 1726, considerable progress was made in the settlement,
   and a road was cut through the wilderness from Haverhill to
   Penacook.  In the fall of 1727, the first family, that of
   Captain Ebenezer Eastman, moved into the place.  His team was
   driven by Jacob Shute, who was by birth a Frenchman, and he is
   said to have been the first person who drove a team through the
   wilderness.  Soon after, says tradition, one Ayer, a lad of 18,
   drove a team consisting of ten yoke of oxen to Penacook, swam
   the river, and ploughed a portion of the interval.  He is
   supposed to have been the first person who ploughed land in
   that place.  After he had completed his work, he started on his
   return at sunrise, drowned a yoke of oxen while recrossing the
   river, and arrived at Haverhill about midnight.  The crank of
   the first saw-mill was manufactured in Haverhill, and carried
   to Penacook on a horse."
 
 But we found that the frontiers were not this way any longer.
 This generation has come into the world fatally late for some
 enterprises.  Go where we will on the _surface_ of things, men
 have been there before us.  We cannot now have the pleasure of
 erecting the _last_ house; that was long ago set up in the
 suburbs of Astoria City, and our boundaries have literally been
 run to the South Sea, according to the old patents.  But the
 lives of men, though more extended laterally in their range, are
 still as shallow as ever.  Undoubtedly, as a Western orator said,
 "Men generally live over about the same surface; some live long
 and narrow, and others live broad and short"; but it is all
 superficial living.  A worm is as good a traveller as a
 grasshopper or a cricket, and a much wiser settler.  With all
 their activity these do not hop away from drought nor forward to
 summer.  We do not avoid evil by fleeing before it, but by rising
 above or diving below its plane; as the worm escapes drought and
 frost by boring a few inches deeper.  The frontiers are not east
 or west, north or south, but wherever a man _fronts_ a fact,
 though that fact be his neighbor, there is an unsettled
 wilderness between him and Canada, between him and the setting
 sun, or, farther still, between him and _it_.  Let him build
 himself a log-house with the bark on where he is, _fronting_
 ^it^, and wage there an Old French war for seven or seventy
 years, with Indians and Rangers, or whatever else may come
 between him and the reality, and save his scalp if he can.
 
 
 We now no longer sailed or floated on the river, but trod the
 unyielding land like pilgrims.  Sadi tells who may travel; among
 others, "A common mechanic, who can earn a subsistence by the
 industry of his hand, and shall not have to stake his reputation
 for every morsel of bread, as philosophers have said." He may
 travel who can subsist on the wild fruits and game of the most
 cultivated country.  A man may travel fast enough and earn his
 living on the road.  I have at times been applied to to do work
 when on a journey; to do tinkering and repair clocks, when I had
 a knapsack on my back.  A man once applied to me to go into a
 factory, stating conditions and wages, observing that I succeeded
 in shutting the window of a railroad car in which we were
 travelling, when the other passengers had failed.  "Hast thou not
 heard of a Sufi, who was hammering some nails into the sole of
 his sandal; an officer of cavalry took him by the sleeve, saying,
 Come along and shoe my horse."  Farmers have asked me to assist
 them in haying, when I was passing their fields.  A man once
 applied to me to mend his umbrella, taking me for an
 umbrella-mender, because, being on a journey, I carried an
 umbrella in my hand while the sun shone.  Another wished to buy a
 tin cup of me, observing that I had one strapped to my belt, and
 a sauce-pan on my back.  The cheapest way to travel, and the way
 to travel the farthest in the shortest distance, is to go afoot,
 carrying a dipper, a spoon, and a fish-line, some Indian meal,
 some salt, and some sugar.  When you come to a brook or pond, you
 can catch fish and cook them; or you can boil a hasty-pudding; or
 you can buy a loaf of bread at a farmer's house for fourpence,
 moisten it in the next brook that crosses the road, and dip into
 it your sugar,--this alone will last you a whole day;--or, if you
 are accustomed to heartier living, you can buy a quart of milk
 for two cents, crumb your bread or cold pudding into it, and eat
 it with your own spoon out of your own dish.  Any one of these
 things I mean, not all together.  I have travelled thus some
 hundreds of miles without taking any meal in a house, sleeping on
 the ground when convenient, and found it cheaper, and in many
 respects more profitable, than staying at home.  So that some
 have inquired why it would not be best to travel always.  But I
 never thought of travelling simply as a means of getting a
 livelihood.  A simple woman down in Tyngsborough, at whose house
 I once stopped to get a draught of water, when I said,
 recognizing the bucket, that I had stopped there nine years
 before for the same purpose, asked if I was not a traveller,
 supposing that I had been travelling ever since, and had now come
 round again; that travelling was one of the professions, more or
 less productive, which her husband did not follow.  But continued
 travelling is far from productive.  It begins with wearing away
 the soles of the shoes, and making the feet sore, and erelong it
 will wear a man clean up, after making his heart sore into the
 bargain.  I have observed that the after-life of those who have
 travelled much is very pathetic.  True and sincere travelling is
 no pastime, but it is as serious as the grave, or any part of the
 human journey, and it requires a long probation to be broken into
 it.  I do not speak of those that travel sitting, the sedentary
 travellers whose legs hang dangling the while, mere idle symbols
 of the fact, any more than when we speak of sitting hens we mean
 those that sit standing, but I mean those to whom travelling is
 life for the legs, and death too, at last.  The traveller must be
 born again on the road, and earn a passport from the elements,
 the principal powers that be for him.  He shall experience at
 last that old threat of his mother fulfilled, that he shall be
 skinned alive.  His sores shall gradually deepen themselves that
 they may heal inwardly, while he gives no rest to the sole of his
 foot, and at night weariness must be his pillow, that so he may
 acquire experience against his rainy days.--So was it with us.
 
 Sometimes we lodged at an inn in the woods, where trout-fishers
 from distant cities had arrived before us, and where, to our
 astonishment, the settlers dropped in at nightfall to have a chat
 and hear the news, though there was but one road, and no other
 house was visible,--as if they had come out of the earth.  There
 we sometimes read old newspapers, who never before read new ones,
 and in the rustle of their leaves heard the dashing of the surf
 along the Atlantic shore, instead of the sough of the wind among
 the pines.  But then walking had given us an appetite even for
 the least palatable and nutritious food.
 
 Some hard and dry book in a dead language, which you have found
 it impossible to read at home, but for which you have still a
 lingering regard, is the best to carry with you on a journey.  At
 a country inn, in the barren society of ostlers and travellers, I
 could undertake the writers of the silver or the brazen age with
 confidence.  Almost the last regular service which I performed in
 the cause of literature was to read the works of
 
               AULUS PERSIUS FLACCUS.
 
 If you have imagined what a divine work is spread out for the
 poet, and approach this author too, in the hope of finding the
 field at length fairly entered on, you will hardly dissent from
 the words of the prologue,
 
      "Ipse semipaganus
      Ad sacra Vatum carmen affero nostrum."
 
      I half pagan
      Bring my verses to the shrine of the poets.
 
 Here is none of the interior dignity of Virgil, nor the elegance
 and vivacity of Horace, nor will any sibyl be needed to remind
 you, that from those older Greek poets there is a sad descent to
 Persius.  You can scarcely distinguish one harmonious sound amid
 this unmusical bickering with the follies of men.
 
 One sees that music has its place in thought, but hardly as yet
 in language.  When the Muse arrives, we wait for her to remould
 language, and impart to it her own rhythm.  Hitherto the verse
 groans and labors with its load, and goes not forward blithely,
 singing by the way.  The best ode may be parodied, indeed is
 itself a parody, and has a poor and trivial sound, like a man
 stepping on the rounds of a ladder.  Homer and Shakespeare and
 Milton and Marvell and Wordsworth are but the rustling of leaves
 and crackling of twigs in the forest, and there is not yet the
 sound of any bird.  The Muse has never lifted up her voice to
 sing.  Most of all, satire will not be sung.  A Juvenal or
 Persius do not marry music to their verse, but are measured
 fault-finders at best; stand but just outside the faults they
 condemn, and so are concerned rather about the monster which they
 have escaped, than the fair prospect before them.  Let them live
 on an age, and they will have travelled out of his shadow and
 reach, and found other objects to ponder.
 
 As long as there is satire, the poet is, as it were, _particeps
 criminis_.  One sees not but he had best let bad take care of
 itself, and have to do only with what is beyond suspicion.  If
 you light on the least vestige of truth, and it is the weight of
 the whole body still which stamps the faintest trace, an eternity
 will not suffice to extol it, while no evil is so huge, but you
 grudge to bestow on it a moment of hate.  Truth never turns to
 rebuke falsehood; her own straightforwardness is the severest
 correction.  Horace would not have written satire so well if he
 had not been inspired by it, as by a passion, and fondly
 cherished his vein.  In his odes, the love always exceeds the
 hate, so that the severest satire still sings itself, and the
 poet is satisfied, though the folly be not corrected.
 
 A sort of necessary order in the development of Genius is, first,
 Complaint; second, Plaint; third, Love.  Complaint, which is the
 condition of Persius, lies not in the province of poetry.  Erelong
 the enjoyment of a superior good would have changed his disgust
 into regret.  We can never have much sympathy with the complainer;
 for after searching nature through, we conclude that he must be
 both plaintiff and defendant too, and so had best come to a
 settlement without a hearing.  He who receives an injury is to
 some extent an accomplice of the wrong-doer.
 
 Perhaps it would be truer to say, that the highest strain of the
 muse is essentially plaintive.  The saint's are still _tears_ of
 joy.  Who has ever heard the _Innocent_ sing?
 
 But the divinest poem, or the life of a great man, is the
 severest satire; as impersonal as Nature herself, and like the
 sighs of her winds in the woods, which convey ever a slight
 reproof to the hearer.  The greater the genius, the keener the
 edge of the satire.
 
 Hence we have to do only with the rare and fragmentary traits,
 which least belong to Persius, or shall we say, are the properest
 utterances of his muse; since that which he says best at any time
 is what he can best say at all times.  The Spectators and
 Ramblers have not failed to cull some quotable sentences from
 this garden too, so pleasant is it to meet even the most familiar
 truth in a new dress, when, if our neighbor had said it, we
 should have passed it by as hackneyed.  Out of these six satires,
 you may perhaps select some twenty lines, which fit so well as
 many thoughts, that they will recur to the scholar almost as
 readily as a natural image; though when translated into familiar
 language, they lose that insular emphasis, which fitted them for
 quotation.  Such lines as the following, translation cannot
 render commonplace.  Contrasting the man of true religion with
 those who, with jealous privacy, would fain carry on a secret
 commerce with the gods, he says:--
 
      "Haud cuivis promptum est, murmurque humilesque susurros
      Tollere de templis; et aperto vivere voto."
 
      It is not easy for every one to take murmurs and low
      Whispers out of the temples, and live with open vow.
 
 
 To the virtuous man, the universe is the only _sanctum sanctorum_,
 and the penetralia of the temple are the broad noon of his
 existence.  Why should he betake himself to a subterranean crypt,
 as if it were the only holy ground in all the world which he had
 left unprofaned?  The obedient soul would only the more discover
 and familiarize things, and escape more and more into light and
 air, as having henceforth done with secrecy, so that the universe
 shall not seem open enough for it.  At length, it is neglectful
 even of that silence which is consistent with true modesty, but
 by its independence of all confidence in its disclosures, makes
 that which it imparts so private to the hearer, that it becomes
 the care of the whole world that modesty be not infringed.
 
 To the man who cherishes a secret in his breast, there is a still
 greater secret unexplored.  Our most indifferent acts may be
 matter for secrecy, but whatever we do with the utmost
 truthfulness and integrity, by virtue of its pureness, must be
 transparent as light.
 
 In the third satire, he asks:--
 
      "Est aliquid quo tendis, et in quod dirigis arcum?
      An passim sequeris corvos, testave, lutove,
      Securus quo pes ferat, atque ex tempore vivis?"
 
    Is there anything to which thou tendest, and against which thou
        directest thy bow?
    Or dost thou pursue crows, at random, with pottery or clay,
    Careless whither thy feet bear thee, and live _ex tempore_?
 
 The bad sense is always a secondary one.  Language does not
 appear to have justice done it, but is obviously cramped and
 narrowed in its significance, when any meanness is described.
 The truest construction is not put upon it.  What may readily be
 fashioned into a rule of wisdom, is here thrown in the teeth of
 the sluggard, and constitutes the front of his offence.
 Universally, the innocent man will come forth from the sharpest
 inquisition and lecturing, the combined din of reproof and
 commendation, with a faint sound of eulogy in his ears.  Our
 vices always lie in the direction of our virtues, and in their
 best estate are but plausible imitations of the latter.
 Falsehood never attains to the dignity of entire falseness, but
 is only an inferior sort of truth; if it were more thoroughly
 false, it would incur danger of becoming true.
 
      "Securus quo pes ferat, atque ex tempore _vivit_,"
 
 is then the motto of a wise man.  For first, as the subtle
 discernment of the language would have taught us, with all his
 negligence he is still secure; but the sluggard, notwithstanding
 his heedlessness, is insecure.
 
 The life of a wise man is most of all extemporaneous, for he
 lives out of an eternity which includes all time.  The cunning
 mind travels further back than Zoroaster each instant, and comes
 quite down to the present with its revelation.  The utmost thrift
 and industry of thinking give no man any stock in life; his
 credit with the inner world is no better, his capital no larger.
 He must try his fortune again to-day as yesterday.  All questions
 rely on the present for their solution.  Time measures nothing
 but itself.  The word that is written may be postponed, but not
 that on the lip.  If this is what the occasion says, let the
 occasion say it.  All the world is forward to prompt him who gets
 up to live without his creed in his pocket.
 
 In the fifth satire, which is the best, I find,--
 
      "Stat contra ratio, et secretam garrit in aurem,
      Ne liceat facere id, quod quis vitiabit agendo."
 
    Reason opposes, and whispers in the secret ear,
    That it is not lawful to do that which one will spoil by doing.
 
 Only they who do not see how anything might be better done are
 forward to try their hand on it.  Even the master workman must be
 encouraged by the reflection, that his awkwardness will be
 incompetent to do that thing harm, to which his skill may fail to
 do justice.  Here is no apology for neglecting to do many things
 from a sense of our incapacity,--for what deed does not fall
 maimed and imperfect from our hands?--but only a warning to
 bungle less.
 
 The satires of Persius are the furthest possible from inspired;
 evidently a chosen, not imposed subject.  Perhaps I have given
 him credit for more earnestness than is apparent; but it is
 certain, that that which alone we can call Persius, which is
 forever independent and consistent, _was_ in earnest, and so
 sanctions the sober consideration of all.  The artist and his
 work are not to be separated.  The most wilfully foolish man
 cannot stand aloof from his folly, but the deed and the doer
 together make ever one sober fact.  There is but one stage for
 the peasant and the actor.  The buffoon cannot bribe you to laugh
 always at his grimaces; they shall sculpture themselves in
 Egyptian granite, to stand heavy as the pyramids on the ground of
 his character.
 
                            ------
 
 
 Suns rose and set and found us still on the dank forest path
 which meanders up the Pemigewasset, now more like an otter's or a
 marten's trail, or where a beaver had dragged his trap, than
 where the wheels of travel raise a dust; where towns begin to
 serve as gores, only to hold the earth together.  The wild pigeon
 sat secure above our heads, high on the dead limbs of naval
 pines, reduced to a robin's size.  The very yards of our
 hostelries inclined upon the skirts of mountains, and, as we
 passed, we looked up at a steep angle at the stems of maples
 waving in the clouds.
 
 Far up in the country,--for we would be faithful to our
 experience,--in Thornton, perhaps, we met a soldier lad in the
 woods, going to muster in full regimentals, and holding the
 middle of the road; deep in the forest, with shouldered musket
 and military step, and thoughts of war and glory all to himself.
 It was a sore trial to the youth, tougher than many a battle, to
 get by us creditably and with soldierlike bearing.  Poor man!  He
 actually shivered like a reed in his thin military pants, and by
 the time we had got up with him, all the sternness that becomes
 the soldier had forsaken his face, and he skulked past as if he
 were driving his father's sheep under a sword-proof helmet.  It
 was too much for him to carry any extra armor then, who could not
 easily dispose of his natural arms.  And for his legs, they were
 like heavy artillery in boggy places; better to cut the traces
 and forsake them.  His greaves chafed and wrestled one with
 another for want of other foes.  But he did get by and get off
 with all his munitions, and lived to fight another day; and I do
 not record this as casting any suspicion on his honor and real
 bravery in the field.
 
 Wandering on through notches which the streams had made, by the
 side and over the brows of hoar hills and mountains, across the
 stumpy, rocky, forested, and bepastured country, we at length
 crossed on prostrate trees over the Amonoosuck, and breathed the
 free air of Unappropriated Land.  Thus, in fair days as well as
 foul, we had traced up the river to which our native stream is a
 tributary, until from Merrimack it became the Pemigewasset that
 leaped by our side, and when we had passed its fountain-head, the
 Wild Amonoosuck, whose puny channel was crossed at a stride,
 guiding us toward its distant source among the mountains, and at
 length, without its guidance, we were enabled to reach the summit
 of ^Agiocochook^.
 
                      ---------------
 
      "Sweet days, so cool, so calm, so bright,
      The bridal of the earth and sky,
      Sweet dews shall weep thy fall to-night,
                          For thou must die."
                                      ^Herbert^.
 
 When we returned to Hooksett, a week afterward, the melon man, in
 whose corn-barn we had hung our tent and buffaloes and other
 things to dry, was already picking his hops, with many women and
 children to help him.  We bought one watermelon, the largest in
 his patch, to carry with us for ballast.  It was Nathan's, which
 he might sell if he wished, having been conveyed to him in the
 green state, and owned daily by his eyes.  After due consultation
 with "Father," the bargain was concluded,--we to buy it at a
 venture on the vine, green or ripe, our risk, and pay "what the
 gentlemen pleased." It proved to be ripe; for we had had honest
 experience in selecting this fruit.
 
 Finding our boat safe in its harbor, under Uncannunuc Mountain,
 with a fair wind and the current in our favor, we commenced our
 return voyage at noon, sitting at our ease and conversing, or in
 silence watching for the last trace of each reach in the river as
 a bend concealed it from our view.  As the season was further
 advanced, the wind now blew steadily from the north, and with our
 sail set we could occasionally lie on our oars without loss of
 time.  The lumbermen throwing down wood from the top of the high
 bank, thirty or forty feet above the water, that it might be sent
 down stream, paused in their work to watch our retreating sail.
 By this time, indeed, we were well known to the boatmen, and were
 hailed as the Revenue Cutter of the stream.  As we sailed rapidly
 down the river, shut in between two mounds of earth, the sounds
 of this timber rolled down the bank enhanced the silence and
 vastness of the noon, and we fancied that only the primeval
 echoes were awakened.  The vision of a distant scow just heaving
 in sight round a headland also increased by contrast the
 solitude.
 
 Through the din and desultoriness of noon, even in the most
 Oriental city, is seen the fresh and primitive and savage nature,
 in which Scythians and Ethiopians and Indians dwell.  What is
 echo, what are light and shade, day and night, ocean and stars,
 earthquake and eclipse, there?  The works of man are everywhere
 swallowed up in the immensity of Nature.  The Aegean Sea is but
 Lake Huron still to the Indian.  Also there is all the refinement
 of civilized life in the woods under a sylvan garb.  The wildest
 scenes have an air of domesticity and homeliness even to the
 citizen, and when the flicker's cackle is heard in the clearing,
 he is reminded that civilization has wrought but little change
 there.  Science is welcome to the deepest recesses of the forest,
 for there too nature obeys the same old civil laws.  The little
 red bug on the stump of a pine,--for it the wind shifts and the
 sun breaks through the clouds.  In the wildest nature, there is
 not only the material of the most cultivated life, and a sort of
 anticipation of the last result, but a greater refinement already
 than is ever attained by man.  There is papyrus by the river-side,
 and rushes for light, and the goose only flies overhead, ages
 before the studious are born or letters invented, and that
 literature which the former suggest, and even from the first have
 rudely served, it may be man does not yet use them to express.
 Nature is prepared to welcome into her scenery the finest work of
 human art, for she is herself an art so cunning that the artist
 never appears in his work.
 
 Art is not tame, and Nature is not wild, in the ordinary sense.
 A perfect work of man's art would also be wild or natural in a
 good sense.  Man tames Nature only that he may at last make her
 more free even than he found her, though he may never yet have
 succeeded.
 
 
 With this propitious breeze, and the help of our oars, we soon
 reached the Falls of Amoskeag, and the mouth of the Piscataquoag,
 and recognized, as we swept rapidly by, many a fair bank and
 islet on which our eyes had rested in the upward passage.  Our
 boat was like that which Chaucer describes in his Dream, in which
 the knight took his departure from the island,
 
      "To journey for his marriage,
      And return with such an host,
      That wedded might be least and most. . . . .
      Which barge was as a man's thought,
      After his pleasure to him brought,
      The queene herself accustomed aye
      In the same barge to play,
      It needed neither mast ne rother,
      I have not heard of such another,
      No master for the governance,
      Hie sayled by thought and pleasaunce,
      Without labor east and west,
      All was one, calme or tempest."
 
 So we sailed this afternoon, thinking of the saying of
 Pythagoras, though we had no peculiar right to remember it, "It
 is beautiful when prosperity is present with intellect, and when
 sailing as it were with a prosperous wind, actions are performed
 looking to virtue; just as a pilot looks to the motions of the
 stars." All the world reposes in beauty to him who preserves
 equipoise in his life, and moves serenely on his path without
 secret violence; as he who sails down a stream, he has only to
 steer, keeping his bark in the middle, and carry it round the
 falls.  The ripples curled away in our wake, like ringlets from
 the head of a child, while we steadily held on our course, and
 under the bows we watched
 
                             "The swaying soft,
      Made by the delicate wave parted in front,
      As through the gentle element we move
      Like shadows gliding through untroubled dreams."
 
 The forms of beauty fall naturally around the path of him who is
 in the performance of his proper work; as the curled shavings
 drop from the plane, and borings cluster round the auger.
 Undulation is the gentlest and most ideal of motions, produced by
 one fluid falling on another.  Rippling is a more graceful
 flight.  From a hill-top you may detect in it the wings of birds
 endlessly repeated.  The two _waving_ lines which represent the
 flight of birds appear to have been copied from the ripple.
 
 The trees made an admirable fence to the landscape, skirting the
 horizon on every side.  The single trees and the groves left
 standing on the interval appeared naturally disposed, though the
 farmer had consulted only his convenience, for he too falls into
 the scheme of Nature.  Art can never match the luxury and
 superfluity of Nature.  In the former all is seen; it cannot
 afford concealed wealth, and is niggardly in comparison; but
 Nature, even when she is scant and thin outwardly, satisfies us
 still by the assurance of a certain generosity at the roots.  In
 swamps, where there is only here and there an ever-green tree
 amid the quaking moss and cranberry beds, the bareness does not
 suggest poverty.  The single-spruce, which I had hardly noticed
 in gardens, attracts me in such places, and now first I
 understand why men try to make them grow about their houses.  But
 though there may be very perfect specimens in front-yard plots,
 their beauty is for the most part ineffectual there, for there is
 no such assurance of kindred wealth beneath and around them, to
 make them show to advantage.  As we have said, Nature is a
 greater and more perfect art, the art of God; though, referred to
 herself, she is genius; and there is a similarity between her
 operations and man's art even in the details and trifles.  When
 the overhanging pine drops into the water, by the sun and water,
 and the wind rubbing it against the shore, its boughs are worn
 into fantastic shapes, and white and smooth, as if turned in a
 lathe.  Man's art has wisely imitated those forms into which all
 matter is most inclined to run, as foliage and fruit.  A hammock
 swung in a grove assumes the exact form of a canoe, broader or
 narrower, and higher or lower at the ends, as more or fewer
 persons are in it, and it rolls in the air with the motion of the
 body, like a canoe in the water.  Our art leaves its shavings and
 its dust about; her art exhibits itself even in the shavings and
 the dust which we make.  She has perfected herself by an eternity
 of practice.  The world is well kept; no rubbish accumulates; the
 morning air is clear even at this day, and no dust has settled on
 the grass.  Behold how the evening now steals over the fields,
 the shadows of the trees creeping farther and farther into the
 meadow, and erelong the stars will come to bathe in these retired
 waters.  Her undertakings are secure and never fail.  If I were
 awakened from a deep sleep, I should know which side of the
 meridian the sun might be by the aspect of nature, and by the
 chirp of the crickets, and yet no painter can paint this
 difference.  The landscape contains a thousand dials which
 indicate the natural divisions of time, the shadows of a thousand
 styles point to the hour.
 
      "Not only o'er the dial's face,
        This silent phantom day by day,
      With slow, unseen, unceasing pace
        Steals moments, months, and years away;
      From hoary rock and aged tree,
        From proud Palmyra's mouldering walls,
      From Teneriffe, towering o'er the sea,
        From every blade of grass it falls."
 
 It is almost the only game which the trees play at, this
 tit-for-tat, now this side in the sun, now that, the drama of the
 day.  In deep ravines under the eastern sides of cliffs, Night
 forwardly plants her foot even at noonday, and as Day retreats
 she steps into his trenches, skulking from tree to tree, from
 fence to fence, until at last she sits in his citadel and draws
 out her forces into the plain.  It may be that the forenoon is
 brighter than the afternoon, not only because of the greater
 transparency of its atmosphere, but because we naturally look
 most into the west, as forward into the day, and so in the
 forenoon see the sunny side of things, but in the afternoon the
 shadow of every tree.
 
 The afternoon is now far advanced, and a fresh and leisurely wind
 is blowing over the river, making long reaches of bright ripples.
 The river has done its stint, and appears not to flow, but lie at
 its length reflecting the light, and the haze over the woods is
 like the inaudible panting, or rather the gentle perspiration of
 resting nature, rising from a myriad of pores into the attenuated
 atmosphere.
 
 
 On the thirty-first day of March, one hundred and forty-two years
 before this, probably about this time in the afternoon, there
 were hurriedly paddling down this part of the river, between the
 pine woods which then fringed these banks, two white women and a
 boy, who had left an island at the mouth of the Contoocook before
 daybreak.  They were slightly clad for the season, in the English
 fashion, and handled their paddles unskilfully, but with nervous
 energy and determination, and at the bottom of their canoe lay
 the still bleeding scalps of ten of the aborigines.  They were
 Hannah Dustan, and her nurse, Mary Neff, both of Haverhill,
 eighteen miles from the mouth of this river, and an English boy,
 named Samuel Lennardson, escaping from captivity among the
 Indians.  On the 15th of March previous, Hannah Dustan had been
 compelled to rise from child-bed, and half dressed, with one foot
 bare, accompanied by her nurse, commence an uncertain march, in
 still inclement weather, through the snow and the wilderness.
 She had seen her seven elder children flee with their father, but
 knew not of their fate.  She had seen her infant's brains dashed
 out against an apple-tree, and had left her own and her
 neighbors' dwellings in ashes.  When she reached the wigwam of
 her captor, situated on an island in the Merrimack, more than
 twenty miles above where we now are, she had been told that she
 and her nurse were soon to be taken to a distant Indian
 settlement, and there made to run the gauntlet naked.  The family
 of this Indian consisted of two men, three women, and seven
 children, beside an English boy, whom she found a prisoner among
 them.  Having determined to attempt her escape, she instructed
 the boy to inquire of one of the men, how he should despatch an
 enemy in the quickest manner, and take his scalp.  "Strike 'em
 there," said he, placing his finger on his temple, and he also
 showed him how to take off the scalp.  On the morning of the 31st
 she arose before daybreak, and awoke her nurse and the boy, and
 taking the Indians' tomahawks, they killed them all in their
 sleep, excepting one favorite boy, and one squaw who fled wounded
 with him to the woods.  The English boy struck the Indian who had
 given him the information, on the temple, as he had been
 directed.  They then collected all the provision they could find,
 and took their master's tomahawk and gun, and scuttling all the
 canoes but one, commenced their flight to Haverhill, distant
 about sixty miles by the river.  But after having proceeded a
 short distance, fearing that her story would not be believed if
 she should escape to tell it, they returned to the silent wigwam,
 and taking off the scalps of the dead, put them into a bag as
 proofs of what they had done, and then retracing their steps to
 the shore in the twilight, recommenced their voyage.
 
 Early this morning this deed was performed, and now, perchance,
 these tired women and this boy, their clothes stained with blood,
 and their minds racked with alternate resolution and fear, are
 making a hasty meal of parched corn and moose-meat, while their
 canoe glides under these pine roots whose stumps are still
 standing on the bank.  They are thinking of the dead whom they
 have left behind on that solitary isle far up the stream, and of
 the relentless living warriors who are in pursuit.  Every
 withered leaf which the winter has left seems to know their
 story, and in its rustling to repeat it and betray them.  An
 Indian lurks behind every rock and pine, and their nerves cannot
 bear the tapping of a woodpecker.  Or they forget their own
 dangers and their deeds in conjecturing the fate of their
 kindred, and whether, if they escape the Indians, they shall find
 the former still alive.  They do not stop to cook their meals
 upon the bank, nor land, except to carry their canoe about the
 falls.  The stolen birch forgets its master and does them good
 service, and the swollen current bears them swiftly along with
 little need of the paddle, except to steer and keep them warm by
 exercise.  For ice is floating in the river; the spring is
 opening; the muskrat and the beaver are driven out of their holes
 by the flood; deer gaze at them from the bank; a few
 faint-singing forest birds, perchance, fly across the river to
 the northernmost shore; the fish-hawk sails and screams overhead,
 and geese fly over with a startling clangor; but they do not
 observe these things, or they speedily forget them.  They do not
 smile or chat all day.  Sometimes they pass an Indian grave
 surrounded by its paling on the bank, or the frame of a wigwam,
 with a few coals left behind, or the withered stalks still
 rustling in the Indian's solitary cornfield on the interval.  The
 birch stripped of its bark, or the charred stump where a tree has
 been burned down to be made into a canoe, these are the only
 traces of man,--a fabulous wild man to us.  On either side, the
 primeval forest stretches away uninterrupted to Canada, or to the
 "South Sea"; to the white man a drear and howling wilderness, but
 to the Indian a home, adapted to his nature, and cheerful as the
 smile of the Great Spirit.
 
 While we loiter here this autumn evening, looking for a spot
 retired enough, where we shall quietly rest to-night, they thus,
 in that chilly March evening, one hundred and forty-two years
 before us, with wind and current favoring, have already glided
 out of sight, not to camp, as we shall, at night, but while two
 sleep one will manage the canoe, and the swift stream bear them
 onward to the settlements, it may be, even to old John Lovewell's
 house on Salmon Brook to-night.
 
 According to the historian, they escaped as by a miracle all
 roving bands of Indians, and reached their homes in safety, with
 their trophies, for which the General Court paid them fifty
 pounds.  The family of Hannah Dustan all assembled alive once
 more, except the infant whose brains were dashed out against the
 apple-tree, and there have been many who in later times have
 lived to say that they had eaten of the fruit of that apple-tree.
 
 
 This seems a long while ago, and yet it happened since Milton
 wrote his Paradise Lost.  But its antiquity is not the less great
 for that, for we do not regulate our historical time by the
 English standard, nor did the English by the Roman, nor the Roman
 by the Greek.  "We must look a long way back," says Raleigh, "to
 find the Romans giving laws to nations, and their consuls bringing
 kings and princes bound in chains to Rome in triumph; to see men
 go to Greece for wisdom, or Ophir for gold; when now nothing
 remains but a poor paper remembrance of their former condition."
 And yet, in one sense, not so far back as to find the Penacooks
 and Pawtuckets using bows and arrows and hatchets of stone, on
 the banks of the Merrimack.  From this September afternoon, and
 from between these now cultivated shores, those times seemed more
 remote than the dark ages.  On beholding an old picture of
 Concord, as it appeared but seventy-five years ago, with a fair
 open prospect and a light on trees and river, as if it were broad
 noon, I find that I had not thought the sun shone in those days,
 or that men lived in broad daylight then.  Still less do we
 imagine the sun shining on hill and valley during Philip's war,
 on the war-path of Church or Philip, or later of Lovewell or
 Paugus, with serene summer weather, but they must have lived and
 fought in a dim twilight or night.
 
 The age of the world is great enough for our imaginations, even
 according to the Mosaic account, without borrowing any years from
 the geologist.  From Adam and Eve at one leap sheer down to the
 deluge, and then through the ancient monarchies, through Babylon
 and Thebes, Brahma and Abraham, to Greece and the Argonauts;
 whence we might start again with Orpheus and the Trojan war, the
 Pyramids and the Olympic games, and Homer and Athens, for our
 stages; and after a breathing space at the building of Rome,
 continue our journey down through Odin and Christ to--America.
 It is a wearisome while.  And yet the lives of but sixty old
 women, such as live under the hill, say of a century each, strung
 together, are sufficient to reach over the whole ground.  Taking
 hold of hands they would span the interval from Eve to my own
 mother.  A respectable tea-party merely,--whose gossip would be
 Universal History.  The fourth old woman from myself suckled
 Columbus,--the ninth was nurse to the Norman Conqueror,--the
 nineteenth was the Virgin Mary,--the twenty-fourth the Cumaean
 Sibyl,--the thirtieth was at the Trojan war and Helen her
 name,--the thirty-eighth was Queen Semiramis,--the sixtieth was
 Eve the mother of mankind.  So much for the
 
      "Old woman that lives under the hill,
      And if she's not gone she lives there still."
 
 It will not take a very great-granddaughter of hers to be in at
 the death of Time.
 
 We can never safely exceed the actual facts in our narratives.
 Of pure invention, such as some suppose, there is no instance.
 To write a true work of fiction even, is only to take leisure and
 liberty to describe some things more exactly as they are.  A true
 account of the actual is the rarest poetry, for common sense
 always takes a hasty and superficial view.  Though I am not much
 acquainted with the works of Goethe, I should say that it was one
 of his chief excellences as a writer, that he was satisfied with
 giving an exact description of things as they appeared to him,
 and their effect upon him.  Most travellers have not self-respect
 enough to do this simply, and make objects and events stand
 around them as the centre, but still imagine more favorable
 positions and relations than the actual ones, and so we get no
 valuable report from them at all.  In his Italian Travels Goethe
 jogs along at a snail's pace, but always mindful that the earth
 is beneath and the heavens are above him.  His Italy is not
 merely the fatherland of lazzaroni and virtuosi, and scene of
 splendid ruins, but a solid turf-clad soil, daily shined on by
 the sun, and nightly by the moon.  Even the few showers are
 faithfully recorded.  He speaks as an unconcerned spectator,
 whose object is faithfully to describe what he sees, and that,
 for the most part, in the order in which he sees it.  Even his
 reflections do not interfere with his descriptions.  In one place
 he speaks of himself as giving so glowing and truthful a
 description of an old tower to the peasants who had gathered
 around him, that they who had been born and brought up in the
 neighborhood must needs look over their shoulders, "that," to use
 his own words, "they might behold with their eyes, what I had
 praised to their ears,"--"and I added nothing, not even the ivy
 which for centuries had decorated the walls." It would thus be
 possible for inferior minds to produce invaluable books, if this
 very moderation were not the evidence of superiority; for the
 wise are not so much wiser than others as respecters of their own
 wisdom.  Some, poor in spirit, record plaintively only what has
 happened to them; but others how they have happened to the
 universe, and the judgment which they have awarded to
 circumstances.  Above all, he possessed a hearty good-will to all
 men, and never wrote a cross or even careless word.  On one
 occasion the post-boy snivelling, "Signor perdonate, questa e` la
 mia patria," he confesses that "to me poor northerner came
 something tear-like into the eyes."
 
 Goethe's whole education and life were those of the artist.  He
 lacks the unconsciousness of the poet.  In his autobiography he
 describes accurately the life of the author of Wilhelm Meister.
 For as there is in that book, mingled with a rare and serene
 wisdom, a certain pettiness or exaggeration of trifles, wisdom
 applied to produce a constrained and partial and merely well-bred
 man,--a magnifying of the theatre till life itself is turned into
 a stage, for which it is our duty to study our parts well, and
 conduct with propriety and precision,--so in the autobiography,
 the fault of his education is, so to speak, its merely artistic
 completeness.  Nature is hindered, though she prevails at last in
 making an unusually catholic impression on the boy.  It is the
 life of a city boy, whose toys are pictures and works of art,
 whose wonders are the theatre and kingly processions and
 crownings.  As the youth studied minutely the order and the
 degrees in the imperial procession, and suffered none of its
 effect to be lost on him, so the man aimed to secure a rank in
 society which would satisfy his notion of fitness and
 respectability.  He was defrauded of much which the savage boy
 enjoys.  Indeed, he himself has occasion to say in this very
 autobiography, when at last he escapes into the woods without the
 gates: "Thus much is certain, that only the undefinable,
 wide-expanding feelings of youth and of uncultivated nations are
 adapted to the sublime, which, whenever it may be excited in us
 through external objects, since it is either formless, or else
 moulded into forms which are incomprehensible, must surround us
 with a grandeur which we find above our reach." He further says
 of himself: "I had lived among painters from my childhood, and
 had accustomed myself to look at objects, as they did, with
 reference to art."  And this was his practice to the last.  He
 was even too _well-bred_ to be thoroughly bred.  He says that he
 had had no intercourse with the lowest class of his towns-boys.
 The child should have the advantage of ignorance as well as of
 knowledge, and is fortunate if he gets his share of neglect and
 exposure.
 
      "The laws of Nature break the rules of Art."
 
 The Man of Genius may at the same time be, indeed is commonly, an
 Artist, but the two are not to be confounded.  The Man of Genius,
 referred to mankind, is an originator, an inspired or demonic
 man, who produces a perfect work in obedience to laws yet
 unexplored.  The Artist is he who detects and applies the law
 from observation of the works of Genius, whether of man or
 nature.  The Artisan is he who merely applies the rules which
 others have detected.  There has been no man of pure Genius; as
 there has been none wholly destitute of Genius.
 
 Poetry is the mysticism of mankind.
 
 The expressions of the poet cannot be analyzed; his sentence is
 one word, whose syllables are words.  There are indeed no _words_
 quite worthy to be set to his music.  But what matter if we do
 not hear the words always, if we hear the music?
 
 Much verse fails of being poetry because it was not written
 exactly at the right crisis, though it may have been
 inconceivably near to it.  It is only by a miracle that poetry is
 written at all.  It is not recoverable thought, but a hue caught
 from a vaster receding thought.
 
 A poem is one undivided unimpeded expression fallen ripe into
 literature, and it is undividedly and unimpededly received by
 those for whom it was matured.
 
 If you can speak what you will never hear, if you can write what
 you will never read, you have done rare things.
 
      The work we choose should be our own,
      God lets alone.
 
 The unconsciousness of man is the consciousness of God.
 
 Deep are the foundations of sincerity.  Even stone walls have
 their foundation below the frost.
 
 What is produced by a free stroke charms us, like the forms of
 lichens and leaves.  There is a certain perfection in accident
 which we never consciously attain.  Draw a blunt quill filled
 with ink over a sheet of paper, and fold the paper before the ink
 is dry, transversely to this line, and a delicately shaded and
 regular figure will be produced, in some respects more pleasing
 than an elaborate drawing.
 
 The talent of composition is very dangerous,--the striking out
 the heart of life at a blow, as the Indian takes off a scalp.  I
 feel as if my life had grown more outward when I can express it.
 
 
 On his journey from Brenner to Verona, Goethe writes:
 
 "The Tees flows now more gently, and makes in many places broad
 sands.  On the land, near to the water, upon the hillsides,
 everything is so closely planted one to another, that you think
 they must choke one another,--vineyards, maize, mulberry-trees,
 apples, pears, quinces, and nuts.  The dwarf elder throws itself
 vigorously over the walls.  Ivy grows with strong stems up the
 rocks, and spreads itself wide over them, the lizard glides
 through the intervals, and everything that wanders to and fro
 reminds one of the loveliest pictures of art.  The women's tufts
 of hair bound up, the men's bare breasts and light jackets, the
 excellent oxen which they drive home from market, the little
 asses with their loads,--everything forms a living, animated
 Heinrich Roos.  And now that it is evening, in the mild air a few
 clouds rest upon the mountains, in the heavens more stand still
 than move, and immediately after sunset the chirping of crickets
 begins to grow more loud; then one feels for once at home in the
 world, and not as concealed or in exile.  I am contented as
 though I had been born and brought up here, and were now
 returning from a Greenland or whaling voyage.  Even the dust of
 my Fatherland, which is often whirled about the wagon, and which
 for so long a time I had not seen, is greeted.  The
 clock-and-bell jingling of the crickets is altogether lovely,
 penetrating, and agreeable.  It sounds bravely when roguish boys
 whistle in emulation of a field of such songstresses.  One
 fancies that they really enhance one another.  Also the evening
 is perfectly mild as the day."
 
 "If one who dwelt in the south, and came hither from the south,
 should hear of my rapture hereupon, he would deem me very
 childish.  Alas!  what I here express I have long known while I
 suffered under an unpropitious heaven, and now may I joyful feel
 this joy as an exception, which we should enjoy everforth as an
 eternal necessity of our nature."
 
 
 Thus we "sayled by thought and pleasaunce," as Chaucer says, and
 all things seemed with us to flow; the shore itself, and the
 distant cliffs, were dissolved by the undiluted air.  The hardest
 material seemed to obey the same law with the most fluid, and so
 indeed in the long run it does.  Trees were but rivers of sap and
 woody fibre, flowing from the atmosphere, and emptying into the
 earth by their trunks, as their roots flowed upward to the
 surface.  And in the heavens there were rivers of stars, and
 milky-ways, already beginning to gleam and ripple over our heads.
 There were rivers of rock on the surface of the earth, and rivers
 of ore in its bowels, and our thoughts flowed and circulated, and
 this portion of time was but the current hour.  Let us wander
 where we will, the universe is built round about us, and we are
 central still.  If we look into the heavens they are concave, and
 if we were to look into a gulf as bottomless, it would be concave
 also.  The sky is curved downward to the earth in the horizon,
 because we stand on the plain.  I draw down its skirts.  The
 stars so low there seem loath to depart, but by a circuitous path
 to be remembering me, and returning on their steps.
 
 We had already passed by broad daylight the scene of our
 encampment at Coos Falls, and at length we pitched our camp on
 the west bank, in the northern part of Merrimack, nearly opposite
 to the large island on which we had spent the noon in our way up
 the river.
 
 There we went to bed that summer evening, on a sloping shelf in
 the bank, a couple of rods from our boat, which was drawn up on
 the sand, and just behind a thin fringe of oaks which bordered
 the river; without having disturbed any inhabitants but the
 spiders in the grass, which came out by the light of our lamp,
 and crawled over our buffaloes.  When we looked out from under
 the tent, the trees were seen dimly through the mist, and a cool
 dew hung upon the grass, which seemed to rejoice in the night,
 and with the damp air we inhaled a solid fragrance.  Having eaten
 our supper of hot cocoa and bread and watermelon, we soon grew
 weary of conversing, and writing in our journals, and, putting
 out the lantern which hung from the tent-pole, fell asleep.
 
 Unfortunately, many things have been omitted which should have
 been recorded in our journal; for though we made it a rule to set
 down all our experiences therein, yet such a resolution is very
 hard to keep, for the important experience rarely allows us to
 remember such obligations, and so indifferent things get
 recorded, while that is frequently neglected.  It is not easy to
 write in a journal what interests us at any time, because to
 write it is not what interests us.
 
 Whenever we awoke in the night, still eking out our dreams with
 half-awakened thoughts, it was not till after an interval, when
 the wind breathed harder than usual, flapping the curtains of the
 tent, and causing its cords to vibrate, that we remembered that
 we lay on the bank of the Merrimack, and not in our chamber at
 home.  With our heads so low in the grass, we heard the river
 whirling and sucking, and lapsing downward, kissing the shore as
 it went, sometimes rippling louder than usual, and again its
 mighty current making only a slight limpid, trickling sound, as
 if our water-pail had sprung a leak, and the water were flowing
 into the grass by our side.  The wind, rustling the oaks and
 hazels, impressed us like a wakeful and inconsiderate person up
 at midnight, moving about, and putting things to rights,
 occasionally stirring up whole drawers full of leaves at a puff.
 There seemed to be a great haste and preparation throughout
 Nature, as for a distinguished visitor; all her aisles had to be
 swept in the night, by a thousand hand-maidens, and a thousand
 pots to be boiled for the next day's feasting;--such a whispering
 bustle, as if ten thousand fairies made their fingers fly,
 silently sewing at the new carpet with which the earth was to be
 clothed, and the new drapery which was to adorn the trees.  And
 then the wind would lull and die away, and we like it fell asleep
 again.
 
 
 
 
 [page]
 
 
                             FRIDAY.
 
 
                                "The Boteman strayt
      Held on his course with stayed stedfastnesse,
      Ne ever shroncke, ne ever sought to bayt
      His tryed armes for toylesome wearinesse;
      But with his oares did sweepe the watry wildernesse."
                                                 ^Spenser.^
 
 
 [page]
 
                 "Summer's robe grows
      Dusky, and like an oft-dyed garment shows."
                                        ^Donne.^
 
 
 
 [page]
 
 
 
                        FRIDAY.
 
                         --*--
 
 
 As we lay awake long before daybreak, listening to the rippling
 of the river, and the rustling of the leaves, in suspense whether
 the wind blew up or down the stream, was favorable or unfavorable
 to our voyage, we already suspected that there was a change in
 the weather, from a freshness as of autumn in these sounds.  The
 wind in the woods sounded like an incessant waterfall dashing and
 roaring amid rocks, and we even felt encouraged by the unusual
 activity of the elements.  He who hears the rippling of rivers in
 these degenerate days will not utterly despair.  That night was
 the turning-point in the season.  We had gone to bed in summer,
 and we awoke in autumn; for summer passes into autumn in some
 unimaginable point of time, like the turning of a leaf.
 
 We found our boat in the dawn just as we had left it, and as if
 waiting for us, there on the shore, in autumn, all cool and
 dripping with dew, and our tracks still fresh in the wet sand
 around it, the fairies all gone or concealed.  Before five
 o'clock we pushed it into the fog, and, leaping in, at one shove
 were out of sight of the shores, and began to sweep downward with
 the rushing river, keeping a sharp lookout for rocks.  We could
 see only the yellow gurgling water, and a solid bank of fog on
 every side, forming a small yard around us.  We soon passed the
 mouth of the Souhegan, and the village of Merrimack, and as the
 mist gradually rolled away, and we were relieved from the trouble
 of watching for rocks, we saw by the flitting clouds, by the
 first russet tinge on the hills, by the rushing river, the
 cottages on shore, and the shore itself, so coolly fresh and
 shining with dew, and later in the day, by the hue of the
 grape-vine, the goldfinch on the willow, the flickers flying in
 flocks, and when we passed near enough to the shore, as we
 fancied, by the faces of men, that the Fall had commenced.  The
 cottages looked more snug and comfortable, and their inhabitants
 were seen only for a moment, and then went quietly in and shut
 the door, retreating inward to the haunts of summer.
 
      "And now the cold autumnal dews are seen
      To cobweb ev'ry green;
      And by the low-shorn rowens doth appear
      The fast-declining year."
 
 We heard the sigh of the first autumnal wind, and even the water
 had acquired a grayer hue.  The sumach, grape, and maple were
 already changed, and the milkweed had turned to a deep rich
 yellow.  In all woods the leaves were fast ripening for their
 fall; for their full veins and lively gloss mark the ripe leaf,
 and not the sered one of the poets; and we knew that the maples,
 stripped of their leaves among the earliest, would soon stand
 like a wreath of smoke along the edge of the meadow.  Already the
 cattle were heard to low wildly in the pastures and along the
 highways, restlessly running to and fro, as if in apprehension of
 the withering of the grass and of the approach of winter.  Our
 thoughts, too, began to rustle.
 
 As I pass along the streets of our village of Concord on the day
 of our annual Cattle-Show, when it usually happens that the
 leaves of the elms and buttonwoods begin first to strew the
 ground under the breath of the October wind, the lively spirits
 in their sap seem to mount as high as any plough-boy's let loose
 that day; and they lead my thoughts away to the rustling woods,
 where the trees are preparing for their winter campaign.  This
 autumnal festival, when men are gathered in crowds in the streets
 as regularly and by as natural a law as the leaves cluster and
 rustle by the wayside, is naturally associated in my mind with
 the fall of the year.  The low of cattle in the streets sounds
 like a hoarse symphony or running bass to the rustling of the
 leaves.  The wind goes hurrying down the country, gleaning every
 loose straw that is left in the fields, while every farmer lad
 too appears to scud before it,--having donned his best pea-jacket
 and pepper-and-salt waistcoat, his unbent trousers, outstanding
 rigging of duck or kerseymere or corduroy, and his furry hat
 withal,--to country fairs and cattle-shows, to that Rome among
 the villages where the treasures of the year are gathered.  All
 the land over they go leaping the fences with their tough, idle
 palms, which have never learned to hang by their sides, amid the
 low of calves and the bleating of sheep,--Amos, Abner, Elnathan,
 Elbridge,--
 
      "From steep pine-bearing mountains to the plain."
 
 I love these sons of earth every mother's son of them, with their
 great hearty hearts rushing tumultuously in herds from spectacle
 to spectacle, as if fearful lest there should not be time between
 sun and sun to see them all, and the sun does not wait more than
 in haying-time.
 
      "Wise Nature's darlings, they live in the world
      Perplexing not themselves how it is hurled."
 
 Running hither and thither with appetite for the coarse pastimes
 of the day, now with boisterous speed at the heels of the
 inspired negro from whose larynx the melodies of all Congo and
 Guinea Coast have broke loose into our streets; now to see the
 procession of a hundred yoke of oxen, all as august and grave as
 Osiris, or the droves of neat cattle and milch cows as unspotted
 as Isis or Io.  Such as had no love for Nature
 
                                     "at all,
        Came lovers home from this great festival."
 
 They may bring their fattest cattle and richest fruits to the
 fair, but they are all eclipsed by the show of men.  These are
 stirring autumn days, when men sweep by in crowds, amid the
 rustle of leaves, like migrating finches; this is the true
 harvest of the year, when the air is but the breath of men, and
 the rustling of leaves is as the trampling of the crowd.  We read
 now-a-days of the ancient festivals, games, and processions of
 the Greeks and Etruscans, with a little incredulity, or at least
 with little sympathy; but how natural and irrepressible in every
 people is some hearty and palpable greeting of Nature.  The
 Corybantes, the Bacchantes, the rude primitive tragedians with
 their procession and goat-song, and the whole paraphernalia of
 the Panathenaea, which appear so antiquated and peculiar, have
 their parallel now.  The husbandman is always a better Greek than
 the scholar is prepared to appreciate, and the old custom still
 survives, while antiquarians and scholars grow gray in
 commemorating it.  The farmers crowd to the fair to-day in
 obedience to the same ancient law, which Solon or Lycurgus did
 not enact, as naturally as bees swarm and follow their queen.
 
 It is worth the while to see the country's people, how they pour
 into the town, the sober farmer folk, now all agog, their very
 shirt and coat-collars pointing forward,--collars so broad as if
 they had put their shirts on wrong end upward, for the fashions
 always tend to superfluity,--and with an unusual springiness in
 their gait, jabbering earnestly to one another.  The more supple
 vagabond, too, is sure to appear on the least rumor of such a
 gathering, and the next day to disappear, and go into his hole
 like the seventeen-year locust, in an ever-shabby coat, though
 finer than the farmer's best, yet never dressed; come to see the
 sport, and have a hand in what is going,--to know "what's the
 row," if there is any; to be where some men are drunk, some
 horses race, some cockerels fight; anxious to be shaking props
 under a table, and above all to see the "striped pig." He
 especially is the creature of the occasion.  He empties both his
 pockets and his character into the stream, and swims in such a
 day.  He dearly loves the social slush.  There is no reserve of
 soberness in him.
 
 I love to see the herd of men feeding heartily on coarse and
 succulent pleasures, as cattle on the husks and stalks of
 vegetables.  Though there are many crooked and crabbled specimens
 of humanity among them, run all to thorn and rind, and crowded
 out of shape by adverse circumstances, like the third chestnut in
 the burr, so that you wonder to see some heads wear a whole hat,
 yet fear not that the race will fail or waver in them; like the
 crabs which grow in hedges, they furnish the stocks of sweet and
 thrifty fruits still.  Thus is nature recruited from age to age,
 while the fair and palatable varieties die out, and have their
 period.  This is that mankind.  How cheap must be the material of
 which so many men are made.
 
 
 The wind blew steadily down the stream, so that we kept our sails
 set, and lost not a moment of the forenoon by delays, but from
 early morning until noon were continually dropping downward.
 With our hands on the steering-paddle, which was thrust deep into
 the river, or bending to the oar, which indeed we rarely
 relinquished, we felt each palpitation in the veins of our steed,
 and each impulse of the wings which drew us above.  The current
 of our thoughts made as sudden bends as the river, which was
 continually opening new prospects to the east or south, but we
 are aware that rivers flow most rapidly and shallowest at these
 points.  The steadfast shores never once turned aside for us, but
 still trended as they were made; why then should we always turn
 aside for them?
 
 A man cannot wheedle nor overawe his Genius.  It requires to be
 conciliated by nobler conduct than the world demands or can
 appreciate.  These winged thoughts are like birds, and will not
 be handled; even hens will not let you touch them like
 quadrupeds.  Nothing was ever so unfamiliar and startling to a
 man as his own thoughts.
 
 To the rarest genius it is the most expensive to succumb and
 conform to the ways of the world.  Genius is the worst of lumber,
 if the poet would float upon the breeze of popularity.  The bird
 of paradise is obliged constantly to fly against the wind, lest
 its gay trappings, pressing close to its body, impede its free
 movements.
 
 He is the best sailor who can steer within the fewest points of
 the wind, and extract a motive power out of the greatest
 obstacles.  Most begin to veer and tack as soon as the wind
 changes from aft, and as within the tropics it does not blow from
 all points of the compass, there are some harbors which they can
 never reach.
 
 The poet is no tender slip of fairy stock, who requires peculiar
 institutions and edicts for his defence, but the toughest son of
 earth and of Heaven, and by his greater strength and endurance
 his fainting companions will recognize the God in him.  It is the
 worshippers of beauty, after all, who have done the real pioneer
 work of the world.
 
 The poet will prevail to be popular in spite of his faults, and
 in spite of his beauties too.  He will hit the nail on the head,
 and we shall not know the shape of his hammer.  He makes us free
 of his hearth and heart, which is greater than to offer one the
 freedom of a city.
 
 Great men, unknown to their generation, have their fame among the
 great who have preceded them, and all true worldly fame subsides
 from their high estimate beyond the stars.
 
 Orpheus does not hear the strains which issue from his lyre, but
 only those which are breathed into it; for the original strain
 precedes the sound, by as much as the echo follows after.  The
 rest is the perquisite of the rocks and trees and beasts.
 
 When I stand in a library where is all the recorded wit of the
 world, but none of the recording, a mere accumulated, and not
 truly cumulative treasure, where immortal works stand side by
 side with anthologies which did not survive their month, and
 cobweb and mildew have already spread from these to the binding
 of those; and happily I am reminded of what poetry is,--I
 perceive that Shakespeare and Milton did not foresee into what
 company they were to fall.  Alas! that so soon the work of a true
 poet should be swept into such a dust-hole!
 
 The poet will write for his peers alone.  He will remember only
 that he saw truth and beauty from his position, and expect the
 time when a vision as broad shall overlook the same field as
 freely.
 
 We are often prompted to speak our thoughts to our neighbors, or
 the single travellers whom we meet on the road, but poetry is a
 communication from our home and solitude addressed to all
 Intelligence.  It never whispers in a private ear.  Knowing this,
 we may understand those sonnets said to be addressed to
 particular persons, or "To a Mistress's Eyebrow." Let none feel
 flattered by them.  For poetry write love, and it will be equally
 true.
 
 No doubt it is an important difference between men of genius or
 poets, and men not of genius, that the latter are unable to grasp
 and confront the thought which visits them.  But it is because it
 is too faint for expression, or even conscious impression.  What
 merely quickens or retards the blood in their veins and fills
 their afternoons with pleasure they know not whence, conveys a
 distinct assurance to the finer organization of the poet.
 
 We talk of genius as if it were a mere knack, and the poet could
 only express what other men conceived.  But in comparison with
 his task, the poet is the least talented of any; the writer of
 prose has more skill.  See what talent the smith has.  His
 material is pliant in his hands.  When the poet is most inspired,
 is stimulated by an _aura_ which never even colors the afternoons
 of common men, then his talent is all gone, and he is no longer a
 poet.  The gods do not grant him any skill more than another.
 They never put their gifts into his hands, but they encompass and
 sustain him with their breath.
 
 To say that God has given a man many and great talents,
 frequently means that he has brought his heavens down within
 reach of his hands.
 
 When the poetic frenzy seizes us, we run and scratch with our
 pen, intent only on worms, calling our mates around us, like the
 cock, and delighting in the dust we make, but do not detect where
 the jewel lies, which, perhaps, we have in the mean time cast to
 a distance, or quite covered up again.
 
 The poet's body even is not fed like other men's, but he sometimes
 tastes the genuine nectar and ambrosia of the gods, and lives a
 divine life.  By the healthful and invigorating thrills of
 inspiration his life is preserved to a serene old age.
 
 Some poems are for holidays only.  They are polished and sweet,
 but it is the sweetness of sugar, and not such as toil gives to
 sour bread.  The breath with which the poet utters his verse must
 be that by which he lives.
 
 Great prose, of equal elevation, commands our respect more than
 great verse, since it implies a more permanent and level height,
 a life more pervaded with the grandeur of the thought.  The poet
 often only makes an irruption, like a Parthian, and is off again,
 shooting while he retreats; but the prose writer has conquered
 like a Roman, and settled colonies.
 
 The true poem is not that which the public read.  There is always
 a poem not printed on paper, coincident with the production of
 this, stereotyped in the poet's life.  It is _what he has become
 through his work_.  Not how is the idea expressed in stone, or on
 canvas or paper, is the question, but how far it has obtained
 form and expression in the life of the artist.  His true work
 will not stand in any prince's gallery.
 
    My life has been the poem I would have writ,
    But I could not both live and utter it.
 
 
             THE POET'S DELAY.
 
      In vain I see the morning rise,
        In vain observe the western blaze,
      Who idly look to other skies,
        Expecting life by other ways.
 
      Amidst such boundless wealth without,
        I only still am poor within,
      The birds have sung their summer out,
        But still my spring does not begin.
 
      Shall I then wait the autumn wind,
        Compelled to seek a milder day,
      And leave no curious nest behind,
        No woods still echoing to my lay?
 
 This raw and gusty day, and the creaking of the oaks and pines on
 shore, reminded us of more northern climes than Greece, and more
 wintry seas than the Aegean.
 
 The genuine remains of Ossian, or those ancient poems which bear
 his name, though of less fame and extent, are, in many respects,
 of the same stamp with the Iliad itself.  He asserts the dignity
 of the bard no less than Homer, and in his era we hear of no
 other priest than he.  It will not avail to call him a heathen,
 because he personifies the sun and addresses it; and what if his
 heroes did "worship the ghosts of their fathers," their thin,
 airy, and unsubstantial forms? we worship but the ghosts of our
 fathers in more substantial forms.  We cannot but respect the
 vigorous faith of those heathen, who sternly believed somewhat,
 and are inclined to say to the critics, who are offended by their
 superstitious rites,--Don't interrupt these men's prayers.  As if
 we knew more about human life and a God, than the heathen and
 ancients.  Does English theology contain the recent discoveries!
 
 Ossian reminds us of the most refined and rudest eras, of Homer,
 Pindar, Isaiah, and the American Indian.  In his poetry, as in
 Homer's, only the simplest and most enduring features of humanity
 are seen, such essential parts of a man as Stonehenge exhibits of
 a temple; we see the circles of stone, and the upright shaft
 alone.  The phenomena of life acquire almost an unreal and
 gigantic size seen through his mists.  Like all older and grander
 poetry, it is distinguished by the few elements in the lives of
 its heroes.  They stand on the heath, between the stars and the
 earth, shrunk to the bones and sinews.  The earth is a boundless
 plain for their deeds.  They lead such a simple, dry, and
 everlasting life, as hardly needs depart with the flesh, but is
 transmitted entire from age to age.  There are but few objects to
 distract their sight, and their life is as unencumbered as the
 course of the stars they gaze at.
 
      "The wrathful kings, on cairns apart,
      Look forward from behind their shields,
      And mark the wandering stars,
      That brilliant westward move."
 
 It does not cost much for these heroes to live; they do not want
 much furniture.  They are such forms of men only as can be seen
 afar through the mist, and have no costume nor dialect, but for
 language there is the tongue itself, and for costume there are
 always the skins of beasts and the bark of trees to be had.  They
 live out their years by the vigor of their constitutions.  They
 survive storms and the spears of their foes, and perform a few
 heroic deeds, and then
 
      "Mounds will answer questions of them,
      For many future years."
 
 Blind and infirm, they spend the remnant of their days listening
 to the lays of the bards, and feeling the weapons which laid
 their enemies low, and when at length they die, by a convulsion
 of nature, the bard allows us a short and misty glance into
 futurity, yet as clear, perchance, as their lives had been.  When
 Mac-Roine was slain,
 
      "His soul departed to his warlike sires,
      To follow misty forms of boars,
      In tempestuous islands bleak."
 
 The hero's cairn is erected, and the bard sings a brief
 significant strain, which will suffice for epitaph and biography.
 
      "The weak will find his bow in the dwelling,
      The feeble will attempt to bend it."
 
 Compared with this simple, fibrous life, our civilized history
 appears the chronicle of debility, of fashion, and the arts of
 luxury.  But the civilized man misses no real refinement in the
 poetry of the rudest era.  It reminds him that civilization does
 but dress men.  It makes shoes, but it does not toughen the soles
 of the feet.  It makes cloth of finer texture, but it does not
 touch the skin.  Inside the civilized man stand the savage still
 in the place of honor.  We are those blue-eyed, yellow-haired
 Saxons, those slender, dark-haired Normans.
 
 The profession of the bard attracted more respect in those days
 from the importance attached to fame.  It was his province to
 record the deeds of heroes.  When Ossian hears the traditions of
 inferior bards, he exclaims,--
 
      "I straightway seize the unfutile tales,
      And send them down in faithful verse."
 
 His philosophy of life is expressed in the opening of the third
 Duan of Ca-Lodin.
 
      "Whence have sprung the things that are?
      And whither roll the passing years?
      Where does Time conceal its two heads,
      In dense impenetrable gloom,
      Its surface marked with heroes' deeds alone?
      I view the generations gone;
      The past appears but dim;
      As objects by the moon's faint beams,
      Reflected from a distant lake.
      I see, indeed, the thunderbolts of war,
      But there the unmighty joyless dwell,
      All those who send not down their deeds
      To far, succeeding times."
 
 The ignoble warriors die and are forgotten;
 
      "Strangers come to build a tower,
      And throw their ashes overhand;
      Some rusted swords appear in dust;
      One, bending forward, says,
      `The arms belonged to heroes gone;
      We never heard their praise in song.'"
 
 The grandeur of the similes is another feature which characterizes
 great poetry.  Ossian seems to speak a gigantic and universal
 language.  The images and pictures occupy even much space in the
 landscape, as if they could be seen only from the sides of
 mountains, and plains with a wide horizon, or across arms of the
 sea.  The machinery is so massive that it cannot be less than
 natural.  Oivana says to the spirit of her father, "Gray-haired
 Torkil of Torne," seen in the skies,
 
      "Thou glidest away like receding ships."
 
 So when the hosts of Fingal and Starne approach to battle,
 
      "With murmurs loud, like rivers far,
      The race of Torne hither moved."
 
 And when compelled to retire,
 
      "dragging his spear behind,
      Cudulin sank in the distant wood,
      Like a fire upblazing ere it dies."
 
 Nor did Fingal want a proper audience when he spoke;
 
      "A thousand orators inclined
      To hear the lay of Fingal."
 
 The threats too would have deterred a man.  Vengeance and terror
 were real.  Trenmore threatens the young warrior whom he meets on
 a foreign strand,
 
      "Thy mother shall find thee pale on the shore,
      While lessening on the waves she spies
      The sails of him who slew her son."
 
 If Ossian's heroes weep, it is from excess of strength, and not
 from weakness, a sacrifice or libation of fertile natures, like
 the perspiration of stone in summer's heat.  We hardly know that
 tears have been shed, and it seems as if weeping were proper only
 for babes and heroes.  Their joy and their sorrow are made of one
 stuff, like rain and snow, the rainbow and the mist.  When Fillan
 was worsted in fight, and ashamed in the presence of Fingal,
 
      "He strode away forthwith,
      And bent in grief above a stream,
      His cheeks bedewed with tears.
      From time to time the thistles gray
      He lopped with his inverted lance."
 
 Crodar, blind and old, receives Ossian, son of Fingal, who comes
 to aid him in war;--
 
      "`My eyes have failed,' says he, `Crodar is blind,
      Is thy strength like that of thy fathers?
      Stretch, Ossian, thine arm to the hoary-haired.'
         I gave my arm to the king.
      The aged hero seized my hand;
      He heaved a heavy sigh;
      Tears flowed incessant down his cheek.
      `Strong art thou, son of the mighty,
      Though not so dreadful as Morven's prince.
 
      Let my feast be spread in the hall,
      Let every sweet-voiced minstrel sing;
      Great is he who is within my walls,
      Sons of wave-echoing Croma.'"
 
 Even Ossian himself, the hero-bard, pays tribute to the superior
 strength of his father Fingal.
 
      "How beauteous, mighty man, was thy mind,
      Why succeeded Ossian without its strength?"
 
 
                     ----------------
 
 
 While we sailed fleetly before the wind, with the river gurgling
 under our stern, the thoughts of autumn coursed as steadily
 through our minds, and we observed less what was passing on the
 shore, than the dateless associations and impressions which the
 season awakened, anticipating in some measure the progress of the
 year.
 
      I hearing get, who had but ears,
        And sight, who had but eyes before,
      I moments live, who lived but years,
        And truth discern, who knew but learning's lore.
 
 
 Sitting with our faces now up stream, we studied the landscape by
 degrees, as one unrolls a map, rock, tree, house, hill, and
 meadow, assuming new and varying positions as wind and water
 shifted the scene, and there was variety enough for our
 entertainment in the metamorphoses of the simplest objects.
 Viewed from this side the scenery appeared new to us.
 
 The most familiar sheet of water viewed from a new hill-top,
 yields a novel and unexpected pleasure.  When we have travelled a
 few miles, we do not recognize the profiles even of the hills
 which overlook our native village, and perhaps no man is quite
 familiar with the horizon as seen from the hill nearest to his
 house, and can recall its outline distinctly when in the valley.
 We do not commonly know, beyond a short distance, which way the
 hills range which take in our houses and farms in their sweep.
 As if our birth had at first sundered things, and we had been
 thrust up through into nature like a wedge, and not till the
 wound heals and the scar disappears, do we begin to discover
 where we are, and that nature is one and continuous everywhere.
 It is an important epoch when a man who has always lived on the
 east side of a mountain, and seen it in the west, travels round
 and sees it in the east.  Yet the universe is a sphere whose
 centre is wherever there is intelligence.  The sun is not so
 central as a man.  Upon an isolated hill-top, in an open country,
 we seem to ourselves to be standing on the boss of an immense
 shield, the immediate landscape being apparently depressed below
 the more remote, and rising gradually to the horizon, which is
 the rim of the shield, villas, steeples, forests, mountains, one
 above another, till they are swallowed up in the heavens.  The
 most distant mountains in the horizon appear to rise directly
 from the shore of that lake in the woods by which we chance to be
 standing, while from the mountain-top, not only this, but a
 thousand nearer and larger lakes, are equally unobserved.
 
 Seen through this clear atmosphere, the works of the farmer, his
 ploughing and reaping, had a beauty to our eyes which he never
 saw.  How fortunate were we who did not own an acre of these
 shores, who had not renounced our title to the whole.  One who
 knew how to appropriate the true value of this world would be the
 poorest man in it.  The poor rich man! all he has is what he has
 bought.  What I see is mine.  I am a large owner in the Merrimack
 intervals.
 
      Men dig and dive but cannot my wealth spend,
        Who yet no partial store appropriate,
      Who no armed ship into the Indies send,
        To rob me of my orient estate.
 
 He is the rich man, and enjoys the fruits of riches, who summer
 and winter forever can find delight in his own thoughts.  Buy a
 farm! What have I to pay for a farm which a farmer will take?
 
 When I visit again some haunt of my youth, I am glad to find that
 nature wears so well.  The landscape is indeed something real,
 and solid, and sincere, and I have not put my foot through it
 yet.  There is a pleasant tract on the bank of the Concord,
 called Conantum, which I have in my mind;--the old deserted
 farm-house, the desolate pasture with its bleak cliff, the open
 wood, the river-reach, the green meadow in the midst, and the
 moss-grown wild-apple orchard,--places where one may have many
 thoughts and not decide anything.  It is a scene which I can not
 only remember, as I might a vision, but when I will can bodily
 revisit, and find it even so, unaccountable, yet unpretending in
 its pleasant dreariness.  When my thoughts are sensible of
 change, I love to see and sit on rocks which I _have_ known, and
 pry into their moss, and see unchangeableness so established.  I
 not yet gray on rocks forever gray, I no longer green under the
 evergreens.  There is something even in the lapse of time by
 which time recovers itself.
 
 As we have said, it proved a cool as well as breezy day, and by
 the time we reached Penichook Brook we were obliged to sit
 muffled in our cloaks, while the wind and current carried us
 along.  We bounded swiftly over the rippling surface, far by many
 cultivated lands and the ends of fences which divided innumerable
 farms, with hardly a thought for the various lives which they
 separated; now by long rows of alders or groves of pines or oaks,
 and now by some homestead where the women and children stood
 outside to gaze at us, till we had swept out of their sight, and
 beyond the limit of their longest Saturday ramble.  We glided
 past the mouth of the Nashua, and not long after, of Salmon
 Brook, without more pause than the wind.
 
      Salmon Brook,
      Penichook,
      Ye sweet waters of my brain,
      When shall I look,
      Or cast the hook,
      In your waves again?
 
      Silver eels,
      Wooden creels,
      These the baits that still allure,
      And dragon-fly
      That floated by,
      May they still endure?
 
 The shadows chased one another swiftly over wood and meadow, and
 their alternation harmonized with our mood.  We could distinguish
 the clouds which cast each one, though never so high in the
 heavens.  When a shadow flits across the landscape of the soul,
 where is the substance?  Probably, if we were wise enough, we
 should see to what virtue we are indebted for any happier moment
 we enjoy.  No doubt we have earned it at some time; for the gifts
 of Heaven are never quite gratuitous.  The constant abrasion and
 decay of our lives makes the soil of our future growth.  The wood
 which we now mature, when it becomes virgin mould, determines the
 character of our second growth, whether that be oaks or pines.
 Every man casts a shadow; not his body only, but his imperfectly
 mingled spirit.  This is his grief.  Let him turn which way he
 will, it falls opposite to the sun; short at noon, long at eve.
 Did you never see it?--But, referred to the sun, it is widest at
 its base, which is no greater than his own opacity.  The divine
 light is diffused almost entirely around us, and by means of the
 refraction of light, or else by a certain self-luminousness, or,
 as some will have it, transparency, if we preserve ourselves
 untarnished, we are able to enlighten our shaded side.  At any
 rate, our darkest grief has that bronze color of the moon
 eclipsed.  There is no ill which may not be dissipated, like the
 dark, if you let in a stronger light upon it.  Shadows, referred
 to the source of light, are pyramids whose bases are never
 greater than those of the substances which cast them, but light
 is a spherical congeries of pyramids, whose very apexes are the
 sun itself, and hence the system shines with uninterrupted light.
 But if the light we use is but a paltry and narrow taper, most
 objects will cast a shadow wider than themselves.
 
 The places where we had stopped or spent the night in our way up
 the river, had already acquired a slight historical interest for
 us; for many upward day's voyaging were unravelled in this rapid
 downward passage.  When one landed to stretch his limbs by
 walking, he soon found himself falling behind his companion, and
 was obliged to take advantage of the curves, and ford the brooks
 and ravines in haste, to recover his ground.  Already the banks
 and the distant meadows wore a sober and deepened tinge, for the
 September air had shorn them of their summer's pride.
 
      "And what's a life?  The flourishing array
      Of the proud summer meadow, which to-day
      Wears her green plush, and is to-morrow hay."
 
 The air was really the "fine element" which the poets describe.
 It had a finer and sharper grain, seen against the russet
 pastures and meadows, than before, as if cleansed of the summer's
 impurities.
 
 Having passed the New Hampshire line and reached the Horseshoe
 Interval in Tyngsborough, where there is a high and regular
 second bank, we climbed up this in haste to get a nearer sight of
 the autumnal flowers, asters, golden-rod, and yarrow, and
 blue-curls (_Trichostema dichotoma_), humble roadside blossoms,
 and, lingering still, the harebell and the _Rhexia Virginica_.
 The last, growing in patches of lively pink flowers on the edge
 of the meadows, had almost too gay an appearance for the rest of
 the landscape, like a pink ribbon on the bonnet of a Puritan
 woman.  Asters and golden-rods were the livery which nature wore
 at present.  The latter alone expressed all the ripeness of the
 season, and shed their mellow lustre over the fields, as if the
 now declining summer's sun had bequeathed its hues to them.  It
 is the floral solstice a little after midsummer, when the
 particles of golden light, the sun-dust, have, as it were, fallen
 like seeds on the earth, and produced these blossoms.  On every
 hillside, and in every valley, stood countless asters, coreopses,
 tansies, golden-rods, and the whole race of yellow flowers, like
 Brahminical devotees, turning steadily with their luminary from
 morning till night.
 
      "I see the golden-rod shine bright,
        As sun-showers at the birth of day,
      A golden plume of yellow light,
       That robs the Day-god's splendid ray.
 
      "The aster's violet rays divide
        The bank with many stars for me,
      And yarrow in blanch tints is dyed,
        As moonlight floats across the sea.
 
      "I see the emerald woods prepare
        To shed their vestiture once more,
      And distant elm-trees spot the air
        With yellow pictures softly o'er.
           .    .    .    .    .
      "No more the water-lily's pride
        In milk-white circles swims content,
      No more the blue-weed's clusters ride
        And mock the heavens' element.
           .    .    .    .    .
      "Autumn, thy wreath and mine are blent
        With the same colors, for to me
      A richer sky than all is lent,
        While fades my dream-like company.
 
      "Our skies glow purple, but the wind
        Sobs chill through green trees and bright graas,
      To-day shines fair, and lurk behind
        The times that into winter pass.
 
      "So fair we seem, so cold we are,
        So fast we hasten to decay,
      Yet through our night glows many a star,
        That still shall claim its sunny day."
 
 So sang a Concord poet once.
 
 There is a peculiar interest belonging to the still later
 flowers, which abide with us the approach of winter.  There is
 something witch-like in the appearance of the witch-hazel, which
 blossoms late in October and in November, with its irregular and
 angular spray and petals like furies' hair, or small ribbon
 streamers.  Its blossoming, too, at this irregular period, when
 other shrubs have lost their leaves, as well as blossoms, looks
 like witches' craft.  Certainly it blooms in no garden of man's.
 There is a whole fairy-land on the hillside where it grows.
 
 Some have thought that the gales do not at present waft to the
 voyager the natural and original fragrance of the land, such as
 the early navigators described, and that the loss of many
 odoriferous native plants, sweet-scented grasses and medicinal
 herbs, which formerly sweetened the atmosphere, and rendered it
 salubrious,--by the grazing of cattle and the rooting of swine,
 is the source of many diseases which now prevail; the earth, say
 they, having been long subjected to extremely artificial and
 luxurious modes of cultivation, to gratify the appetite,
 converted into a stye and hot-bed, where men for profit increase
 the ordinary decay of nature.
 
 
 According to the record of an old inhabitant of Tyngsborough, now
 dead, whose farm we were now gliding past, one of the greatest
 freshets on this river took place in October, 1785, and its
 height was marked by a nail driven into an apple-tree behind his
 house.  One of his descendants has shown this to me, and I judged
 it to be at least seventeen or eighteen feet above the level of
 the river at the time.  According to Barber, the river rose
 twenty-one feet above the common high-water mark, at Bradford in
 the year 1818.  Before the Lowell and Nashua railroad was built,
 the engineer made inquiries of the inhabitants along the banks as
 to how high they had known the river to rise.  When he came to
 this house he was conducted to the apple-tree, and as the nail
 was not then visible, the lady of the house placed her hand on
 the trunk where she said that she remembered the nail to have
 been from her childhood.  In the mean while the old man put his
 arm inside the tree, which was hollow, and felt the point of the
 nail sticking through, and it was exactly opposite to her hand.
 The spot is now plainly marked by a notch in the bark.  But as no
 one else remembered the river to have risen so high as this, the
 engineer disregarded this statement, and I learn that there has
 since been a freshet which rose within nine inches of the rails
 at Biscuit Brook, and such a freshet as that of 1785 would have
 covered the railroad two feet deep.
 
 The revolutions of nature tell as fine tales, and make as
 interesting revelations, on this river's banks, as on the
 Euphrates or the Nile.  This apple-tree, which stands within a
 few rods of the river, is called "Elisha's apple-tree," from a
 friendly Indian, who was anciently in the service of Jonathan
 Tyng, and, with one other man, was killed here by his own race in
 one of the Indian wars,--the particulars of which affair were
 told us on the spot.  He was buried close by, no one knew exactly
 where, but in the flood of 1785, so great a weight of water
 standing over the grave, caused the earth to settle where it had
 once been disturbed, and when the flood went down, a sunken spot,
 exactly of the form and size of the grave, revealed its locality;
 but this was now lost again, and no future flood can detect it;
 yet, no doubt, Nature will know how to point it out in due time,
 if it be necessary, by methods yet more searching and unexpected.
 Thus there is not only the crisis when the spirit ceases to
 inspire and expand the body, marked by a fresh mound in the
 churchyard, but there is also a crisis when the body ceases to
 take up room as such in nature, marked by a fainter depression in
 the earth.
 
 We sat awhile to rest us here upon the brink of the western bank,
 surrounded by the glossy leaves of the red variety of the
 mountain laurel, just above the head of Wicasuck Island, where we
 could observe some scows which were loading with clay from the
 opposite shore, and also overlook the grounds of the farmer, of
 whom I have spoken, who once hospitably entertained us for a
 night.  He had on his pleasant farm, besides an abundance of the
 beach-plum, or _Prunus littoralis_, which grew wild, the Canada
 plum under cultivation, fine Porter apples, some peaches, and
 large patches of musk and water melons, which he cultivated for
 the Lowell market.  Elisha's apple-tree, too, bore a native
 fruit, which was prized by the family.  He raised the blood
 peach, which, as he showed us with satisfaction, was more like
 the oak in the color of its bark and in the setting of its
 branches, and was less liable to break down under the weight of
 the fruit, or the snow, than other varieties.  It was of slower
 growth, and its branches strong and tough.  There, also, was his
 nursery of native apple-trees, thickly set upon the bank, which
 cost but little care, and which he sold to the neighboring
 farmers when they were five or six years old.  To see a single
 peach upon its stem makes an impression of paradisaical fertility
 and luxury.  This reminded us even of an old Roman farm, as
 described by Varro:--Caesar Vopiscus Aedilicius, when he pleaded
 before the Censors, said that the grounds of Rosea were the
 garden (_sumen_ the tid-bit) of Italy, in which a pole being left
 would not be visible the day after, on account of the growth of
 the herbage.  This soil may not have been remarkably fertile,
 yet at this distance we thought that this anecdote might be told
 of the Tyngsborough farm.
 
 When we passed Wicasuck Island, there was a pleasure-boat
 containing a youth and a maiden on the island brook, which we
 were pleased to see, since it proved that there were some
 hereabouts to whom our excursion would not be wholly strange.
 Before this, a canal-boatman, of whom we made some inquiries
 respecting Wicasuck Island, and who told us that it was disputed
 property, suspected that we had a claim upon it, and though we
 assured him that all this was news to us, and explained, as well
 as we could, why we had come to see it, he believed not a word of
 it, and seriously offered us one hundred dollars for our title.
 The only other small boats which we met with were used to pick up
 driftwood.  Some of the poorer class along the stream collect, in
 this way, all the fuel which they require.  While one of us
 landed not far from this island to forage for provisions among
 the farm-houses whose roofs we saw, for our supply was now
 exhausted, the other, sitting in the boat, which was moored to
 the shore, was left alone to his reflections.
 
 If there is nothing new on the earth, still the traveller always
 has a resource in the skies.  They are constantly turning a new
 page to view.  The wind sets the types on this blue ground, and
 the inquiring may always read a new truth there.  There are
 things there written with such fine and subtile tinctures, paler
 than the juice of limes, that to the diurnal eye they leave no
 trace, and only the chemistry of night reveals them.  Every man's
 daylight firmament answers in his mind to the brightness of the
 vision in his starriest hour.
 
 These continents and hemispheres are soon run over, but an always
 unexplored and infinite region makes off on every side from the
 mind, further than to sunset, and we can make no highway or
 beaten track into it, but the grass immediately springs up in the
 path, for we travel there chiefly with our wings.
 
 Sometimes we see objects as through a thin haze, in their eternal
 relations, and they stand like Palenque and the Pyramids, and we
 wonder who set them up, and for what purpose.  If we see the
 reality in things, of what moment is the superficial and apparent
 longer?  What are the earth and all its interests beside the deep
 surmise which pierces and scatters them?  While I sit here
 listening to the waves which ripple and break on this shore, I am
 absolved from all obligation to the past, and the council of
 nations may reconsider its votes.  The grating of a pebble annuls
 them.  Still occasionally in my dreams I remember that rippling
 water.
 
      Oft, as I turn me on my pillow o'er,
      I hear the lapse of waves upon the shore,
      Distinct as if it were at broad noonday,
      And I were drifting down from Nashua.
 
 With a bending sail we glided rapidly by Tyngsborough and
 Chelmsford, each holding in one hand half of a tart country
 apple-pie which we had purchased to celebrate our return, and in
 the other a fragment of the newspaper in which it was wrapped,
 devouring these with divided relish, and learning the news which
 had transpired since we sailed.  The river here opened into a
 broad and straight reach of great length, which we bounded
 merrily over before a smacking breeze, with a devil-may-care look
 in our faces, and our boat a white bone in its mouth, and a speed
 which greatly astonished some scow boatmen whom we met.  The wind
 in the horizon rolled like a flood over valley and plain, and
 every tree bent to the blast, and the mountains like school-boys
 turned their cheeks to it.  They were great and current motions,
 the flowing sail, the running stream, the waving tree, the roving
 wind.  The north-wind stepped readily into the harness which we
 had provided, and pulled us along with good will.  Sometimes we
 sailed as gently and steadily as the clouds overhead, watching
 the receding shores and the motions of our sail; the play of its
 pulse so like our own lives, so thin and yet so full of life, so
 noiseless when it labored hardest, so noisy and impatient when
 least effective; now bending to some generous impulse of the
 breeze, and then fluttering and flapping with a kind of human
 suspense.  It was the scale on which the varying temperature of
 distant atmospheres was graduated, and it was some attraction for
 us that the breeze it played with had been out of doors so long.
 Thus we sailed, not being able to fly, but as next best, making a
 long furrow in the fields of the Merrimack toward our home, with
 our wings spread, but never lifting our heel from the watery
 trench; gracefully ploughing homeward with our brisk and willing
 team, wind and stream, pulling together, the former yet a wild
 steer, yoked to his more sedate fellow.  It was very near flying,
 as when the duck rushes through the water with an impulse of her
 wings, throwing the spray about her, before she can rise.  How we
 had stuck fast if drawn up but a few feet on the shore!
 
 When we reached the great bend just above Middlesex, where the
 river runs east thirty-five miles to the sea, we at length lost
 the aid of this propitious wind, though we contrived to make one
 long and judicious tack carry us nearly to the locks of the
 canal.  We were here locked through at noon by our old friend,
 the lover of the higher mathematics, who seemed glad to see us
 safe back again through so many locks; but we did not stop to
 consider any of his problems, though we could cheerfully have
 spent a whole autumn in this way another time, and never have
 asked what his religion was.  It is so rare to meet with a man
 out-doors who cherishes a worthy thought in his mind, which is
 independent of the labor of his hands.  Behind every man's
 busy-ness there should be a level of undisturbed serenity and
 industry, as within the reef encircling a coral isle there is
 always an expanse of still water, where the depositions are going
 on which will finally raise it above the surface.
 
 
 The eye which can appreciate the naked and absolute beauty of a
 scientific truth is far more rare than that which is attracted by
 a moral one.  Few detect the morality in the former, or the
 science in the latter.  Aristotle defined art to be <Lo'gos tou~
 e'rgou a'neu hy'l_es>, _The principle of the work without the
 wood_; but most men prefer to have some of the wood along with
 the principle; they demand that the truth be clothed in flesh and
 blood and the warm colors of life.  They prefer the partial
 statement because it fits and measures them and their commodities
 best.  But science still exists everywhere as the sealer of
 weights and measures at least.
 
 We have heard much about the poetry of mathematics, but very
 little of it has yet been sung.  The ancients had a juster notion
 of their poetic value than we.  The most distinct and beautiful
 statement of any truth must take at last the mathematical form.
 We might so simplify the rules of moral philosophy, as well as of
 arithmetic, that one formula would express them both.  All the
 moral laws are readily translated into natural philosophy, for
 often we have only to restore the primitive meaning of the words
 by which they are expressed, or to attend to their literal
 instead of their metaphorical sense.  They are already
 _supernatural_ philosophy.  The whole body of what is now called
 moral or ethical truth existed in the golden age as abstract
 science.  Or, if we prefer, we may say that the laws of Nature
 are the purest morality.  The Tree of Knowledge is a Tree of
 Knowledge of good and evil.  He is not a true man of science who
 does not bring some sympathy to his studies, and expect to learn
 something by behavior as well as by application.  It is childish
 to rest in the discovery of mere coincidences, or of partial and
 extraneous laws.  The study of geometry is a petty and idle
 exercise of the mind, if it is applied to no larger system than
 the starry one.  Mathematics should be mixed not only with
 physics but with ethics, _that_ is _mixed_ mathematics.  The fact
 which interests us most is the life of the naturalist.  The
 purest science is still biographical.  Nothing will dignify and
 elevate science while it is sundered so wholly from the moral
 life of its devotee, and he professes another religion than it
 teaches, and worships at a foreign shrine.  Anciently the faith
 of a philosopher was identical with his system, or, in other
 words, his view of the universe.
 
 My friends mistake when they communicate facts to me with so much
 pains.  Their presence, even their exaggerations and loose
 statements, are equally good facts for me.  I have no respect for
 facts even except when I would use them, and for the most part I
 am independent of those which I hear, and can afford to be
 inaccurate, or, in other words, to substitute more present and
 pressing facts in their place.
 
 The poet uses the results of science and philosophy, and
 generalizes their widest deductions.
 
 The process of discovery is very simple.  An unwearied and
 systematic application of known laws to nature, causes the
 unknown to reveal themselves.  Almost any _mode_ of observation
 will be successful at last, for what is most wanted is method.
 Only let something be determined and fixed around which
 observation may rally.  How many new relations a foot-rule alone
 will reveal, and to how many things still this has not been
 applied!  What wonderful discoveries have been, and may still be,
 made, with a plumb-line, a level, a surveyor's compass, a
 thermometer, or a barometer!  Where there is an observatory and a
 telescope, we expect that any eyes will see new worlds at once.
 I should say that the most prominent scientific men of our
 country, and perhaps of this age, are either serving the arts and
 not pure science, or are performing faithful but quite
 subordinate labors in particular departments.  They make no
 steady and systematic approaches to the central fact.  A
 discovery is made, and at once the attention of all observers is
 distracted to that, and it draws many analogous discoveries in
 its train; as if their work were not already laid out for them,
 but they had been lying on their oars.  There is wanting constant
 and accurate observation with enough of theory to direct and
 discipline it.
 
 But, above all, there is wanting genius.  Our books of science,
 as they improve in accuracy, are in danger of losing the freshness
 and vigor and readiness to appreciate the real laws of Nature,
 which is a marked merit in the ofttimes false theories of the
 ancients.  I am attracted by the slight pride and satisfaction,
 the emphatic and even exaggerated style in which some of the
 older naturalists speak of the operations of Nature, though they
 are better qualified to appreciate than to discriminate the
 facts.  Their assertions are not without value when disproved.
 If they are not facts, they are suggestions for Nature herself to
 act upon.  "The Greeks," says Gesner, "had a common proverb
 (<Lagos katheudon>) a sleeping hare, for a dissembler or
 counterfeit; because the hare sees when she sleeps; for this is
 an admirable and rare work of Nature, that all the residue of her
 bodily parts take their rest, but the eye standeth continually
 sentinel."
 
 Observation is so wide awake, and facts are being so rapidly
 added to the sum of human experience, that it appears as if the
 theorizer would always be in arrears, and were doomed forever to
 arrive at imperfect conclusions; but the power to perceive a law
 is equally rare in all ages of the world, and depends but little
 on the number of facts observed.  The senses of the savage will
 furnish him with facts enough to set him up as a philosopher.
 The ancients can still speak to us with authority, even on the
 themes of geology and chemistry, though these studies are thought
 to have had their birth in modern times.  Much is said about the
 progress of science in these centuries.  I should say that the
 useful results of science had accumulated, but that there had
 been no accumulation of knowledge, strictly speaking, for
 posterity; for knowledge is to be acquired only by a corresponding
 experience.  How can we _know_ what we are _told_ merely?  Each
 man can interpret another's experience only by his own.  We read
 that Newton discovered the law of gravitation, but how many who
 have heard of his famous discovery have recognized the same truth
 that he did?  It may be not one.  The revelation which was then
 made to him has not been superseded by the revelation made to any
 successor.
 
      We see the _planet_ fall,
      And that is all.
 
 In a review of Sir James Clark Ross's Antarctic Voyage of
 Discovery, there is a passage which shows how far a body of men
 are commonly impressed by an object of sublimity, and which is
 also a good instance of the step from the sublime to the
 ridiculous.  After describing the discovery of the Antarctic
 Continent, at first seen a hundred miles distant over fields of
 ice,--stupendous ranges of mountains from seven and eight to
 twelve and fourteen thousand feet high, covered with eternal snow
 and ice, in solitary and inaccessible grandeur, at one time the
 weather being beautifully clear, and the sun shining on the icy
 landscape; a continent whose islands only are accessible, and
 these exhibited "not the smallest trace of vegetation," only in a
 few places the rocks protruding through their icy covering, to
 convince the beholder that land formed the nucleus, and that it
 was not an iceberg;--the practical British reviewer proceeds
 thus, sticking to his last, "On the 22d of January, afternoon,
 the Expedition made the latitude of 74 degrees 20' and by 7h
 P.M., having ground (ground! where did they get ground?) to
 believe that they were then in a higher southern latitude than
 had been attained by that enterprising seaman, the late Captain
 James Weddel, and therefore higher than all their predecessors,
 an extra allowance of grog was issued to the crews as a reward
 for their perseverance."
 
 Let not us sailors of late centuries take upon ourselves any airs
 on account of our Newtons and our Cuviers; we deserve an extra
 allowance of grog only.
 
 
 We endeavored in vain to persuade the wind to blow through the
 long corridor of the canal, which is here cut straight through
 the woods, and were obliged to resort to our old expedient of
 drawing by a cord.  When we reached the Concord, we were forced
 to row once more in good earnest, with neither wind nor current
 in our favor, but by this time the rawness of the day had
 disappeared, and we experienced the warmth of a summer afternoon.
 This change in the weather was favorable to our contemplative
 mood, and disposed us to dream yet deeper at our oars, while we
 floated in imagination farther down the stream of time, as we had
 floated down the stream of the Merrimack, to poets of a milder
 period than had engaged us in the morning.  Chelmsford and
 Billerica appeared like old English towns, compared with
 Merrimack and Nashua, and many generations of civil poets might
 have lived and sung here.
 
 What a contrast between the stern and desolate poetry of Ossian,
 and that of Chaucer, and even of Shakespeare and Milton, much
 more of Dryden, and Pope, and Gray.  Our summer of English poetry
 like the Greek and Latin before it, seems well advanced toward
 its fall, and laden with the fruit and foliage of the season,
 with bright autumnal tints, but soon the winter will scatter its
 myriad clustering and shading leaves, and leave only a few
 desolate and fibrous boughs to sustain the snow and rime, and
 creak in the blasts of ages.  We cannot escape the impression
 that the Muse has stooped a little in her flight, when we come to
 the literature of civilized eras.  Now first we hear of various
 ages and styles of poetry; it is pastoral, and lyric, and
 narrative, and didactic; but the poetry of runic monuments is of
 one style, and for every age.  The bard has in a great measure
 lost the dignity and sacredness of his office.  Formerly he was
 called a _seer_, but now it is thought that one man sees as much
 as another.  He has no longer the bardic rage, and only conceives
 the deed, which he formerly stood ready to perform.  Hosts of
 warriors earnest for battle could not mistake nor dispense with
 the ancient bard.  His lays were heard in the pauses of the
 fight.  There was no danger of his being overlooked by his
 contemporaries.  But now the hero and the bard are of different
 professions.  When we come to the pleasant English verse, the
 storms have all cleared away and it will never thunder and
 lighten more.  The poet has come within doors, and exchanged the
 forest and crag for the fireside, the hut of the Gael, and
 Stonehenge with its circles of stones, for the house of the
 Englishman.  No hero stands at the door prepared to break forth
 into song or heroic action, but a homely Englishman, who
 cultivates the art of poetry.  We see the comfortable fireside,
 and hear the crackling fagots in all the verse.
 
 Notwithstanding the broad humanity of Chaucer, and the many
 social and domestic comforts which we meet with in his verse, we
 have to narrow our vision somewhat to consider him, as if he
 occupied less space in the landscape, and did not stretch over
 hill and valley as Ossian does.  Yet, seen from the side of
 posterity, as the father of English poetry, preceded by a long
 silence or confusion in history, unenlivened by any strain of
 pure melody, we easily come to reverence him.  Passing over the
 earlier continental poets, since we are bound to the pleasant
 archipelago of English poetry, Chaucer's is the first name after
 that misty weather in which Ossian lived, which can detain us
 long.  Indeed, though he represents so different a culture and
 society, he may be regarded as in many respects the Homer of the
 English poets.  Perhaps he is the youthfullest of them all.  We
 return to him as to the purest well, the fountain farthest
 removed from the highway of desultory life.  He is so natural and
 cheerful, compared with later poets, that we might almost regard
 him as a personification of spring.  To the faithful reader his
 muse has even given an aspect to his times, and when he is fresh
 from perusing him, they seem related to the golden age.  It is
 still the poetry of youth and life, rather than of thought; and
 though the moral vein is obvious and constant, it has not yet
 banished the sun and daylight from his verse.  The loftiest
 strains of the muse are, for the most part, sublimely plaintive,
 and not a carol as free as nature's.  The content which the sun
 shines to celebrate from morning to evening, is unsung.  The muse
 solaces herself, and is not ravished but consoled.  There is a
 catastrophe implied, and a tragic element in all our verse, and
 less of the lark and morning dews, than of the nightingale and
 evening shades.  But in Homer and Chaucer there is more of the
 innocence and serenity of youth than in the more modern and moral
 poets.  The Iliad is not Sabbath but morning reading, and men
 cling to this old song, because they still have moments of
 unbaptized and uncommitted life, which give them an appetite for
 more.  To the innocent there are neither cherubim nor angels.  At
 rare intervals we rise above the necessity of virtue into an
 unchangeable morning light, in which we have only to live right
 on and breathe the ambrosial air.  The Iliad represents no creed
 nor opinion, and we read it with a rare sense of freedom and
 irresponsibility, as if we trod on native ground, and were
 autochthones of the soil.
 
 Chaucer had eminently the habits of a literary man and a scholar.
 There were never any times so stirring that there were not to be
 found some sedentary still.  He was surrounded by the din of
 arms.  The battles of Hallidon Hill and Neville's Cross, and the
 still more memorable battles of Cressy and Poictiers, were fought
 in his youth; but these did not concern our poet much, Wickliffe
 and his reform much more.  He regarded himself always as one
 privileged to sit and converse with books.  He helped to
 establish the literary class.  His character as one of the
 fathers of the English language would alone make his works
 important, even those which have little poetical merit.  He was
 as simple as Wordsworth in preferring his homely but vigorous
 Saxon tongue, when it was neglected by the court, and had not yet
 attained to the dignity of a literature, and rendered a similar
 service to his country to that which Dante rendered to Italy.  If
 Greek sufficeth for Greek, and Arabic for Arabian, and Hebrew for
 Jew, and Latin for Latin, then English shall suffice for him, for
 any of these will serve to teach truth "right as divers pathes
 leaden divers folke the right waye to Rome." In the Testament of
 Love he writes, "Let then clerkes enditen in Latin, for they have
 the propertie of science, and the knowinge in that facultie, and
 lette Frenchmen in their Frenche also enditen their queinte
 termes, for it is kyndely to their mouthes, and let us shewe our
 fantasies in soche wordes as we lerneden of our dames tonge."
 
 He will know how to appreciate Chaucer best, who has come down to
 him the natural way, through the meagre pastures of Saxon and
 ante-Chaucerian poetry; and yet, so human and wise he appears
 after such diet, that we are liable to misjudge him still.  In
 the Saxon poetry extant, in the earliest English, and the
 contemporary Scottish poetry, there is less to remind the reader
 of the rudeness and vigor of youth, than of the feebleness of a
 declining age.  It is for the most part translation of imitation
 merely, with only an occasional and slight tinge of poetry,
 oftentimes the falsehood and exaggeration of fable, without its
 imagination to redeem it, and we look in vain to find antiquity
 restored, humanized, and made blithe again by some natural
 sympathy between it and the present.  But Chaucer is fresh and
 modern still, and no dust settles on his true passages.  It
 lightens along the line, and we are reminded that flowers have
 bloomed, and birds sung, and hearts beaten in England.  Before
 the earnest gaze of the reader, the rust and moss of time
 gradually drop off, and the original green life is revealed.  He
 was a homely and domestic man, and did breathe quite as modern
 men do.
 
 There is no wisdom that can take place of humanity, and we find
 _that_ in Chaucer.  We can expand at last in his breadth, and we
 think that we could have been that man's acquaintance.  He was
 worthy to be a citizen of England, while Petrarch and Boccacio
 lived in Italy, and Tell and Tamerlane in Switzerland and in
 Asia, and Bruce in Scotland, and Wickliffe, and Gower, and Edward
 the Third, and John of Gaunt, and the Black Prince, were his own
 countrymen as well as contemporaries; all stout and stirring
 names.  The fame of Roger Bacon came down from the preceding
 century, and the name of Dante still possessed the influence of a
 living presence.  On the whole, Chaucer impresses us as greater
 than his reputation, and not a little like Homer and Shakespeare,
 for he would have held up his head in their company.  Among early
 English poets he is the landlord and host, and has the authority
 of such.  The affectionate mention which succeeding early poets
 make of him, coupling him with Homer and Virgil, is to be taken
 into the account in estimating his character and influence.  King
 James and Dunbar of Scotland speak of him with more love and
 reverence than any modern author of his predecessors of the last
 century.  The same childlike relation is without a parallel now.
 For the most part we read him without criticism, for he does not
 plead his own cause, but speaks for his readers, and has that
 greatness of trust and reliance which compels popularity.  He
 confides in the reader, and speaks privily with him, keeping
 nothing back.  And in return the reader has great confidence in
 him, that he tells no lies, and reads his story with indulgence,
 as if it were the circumlocution of a child, but often discovers
 afterwards that he has spoken with more directness and economy of
 words than a sage.  He is never heartless,
 
      "For first the thing is thought within the hart,
      Er any word out from the mouth astart."
 
 And so new was all his theme in those days, that he did not have
 to invent, but only to tell.
 
 We admire Chaucer for his sturdy English wit.  The easy height he
 speaks from in his Prologue to the Canterbury Tales, as if he
 were equal to any of the company there assembled, is as good as
 any particular excellence in it.  But though it is full of good
 sense and humanity, it is not transcendent poetry.  For
 picturesque description of persons it is, perhaps, without a
 parallel in English poetry; yet it is essentially humorous, as
 the loftiest genius never is.  Humor, however broad and genial,
 takes a narrower view than enthusiasm.  To his own finer vein he
 added all the common wit and wisdom of his time, and everywhere
 in his works his remarkable knowledge of the world, and nice
 perception of character, his rare common sense and proverbial
 wisdom, are apparent.  His genius does not soar like Milton's,
 but is genial and familiar.  It shows great tenderness and
 delicacy, but not the heroic sentiment.  It is only a greater
 portion of humanity with all its weakness.  He is not heroic, as
 Raleigh, nor pious, as Herbert, nor philosophical, as
 Shakespeare, but he is the child of the English muse, that child
 which is the father of the man.  The charm of his poetry consists
 often only in an exceeding naturalness, perfect sincerity, with
 the behavior of a child rather than of a man.
 
 Gentleness and delicacy of character are everywhere apparent in
 his verse.  The simplest and humblest words come readily to his
 lips.  No one can read the Prioress's tale, understanding the
 spirit in which it was written, and in which the child sings _O
 alma redemptoris mater_, or the account of the departure of
 Constance with her child upon the sea, in the Man of Lawe's tale,
 without feeling the native innocence and refinement of the
 author.  Nor can we be mistaken respecting the essential purity
 of his character, disregarding the apology of the manners of the
 age.  A simple pathos and feminine gentleness, which Wordsworth
 only occasionally approaches, but does not equal, are peculiar to
 him.  We are tempted to say that his genius was feminine, not
 masculine.  It was such a feminineness, however, as is rarest to
 find in woman, though not the appreciation of it; perhaps it is
 not to be found at all in woman, but is only the feminine in man.
 
 Such pure and genuine and childlike love of Nature is hardly to
 be found in any poet.
 
 Chaucer's remarkably trustful and affectionate character appears
 in his familiar, yet innocent and reverent, manner of speaking of
 his God.  He comes into his thought without any false reverence,
 and with no more parade than the zephyr to his ear.  If Nature is
 our mother, then God is our father.  There is less love and
 simple, practical trust in Shakespeare and Milton.  How rarely in
 our English tongue do we find expressed any affection for God.
 Certainly, there is no sentiment so rare as the love of God.
 Herbert almost alone expresses it, "Ah, my dear God!" Our poet
 uses similar words with propriety; and whenever he sees a
 beautiful person, or other object, prides himself on the
 "maistry" of his God.  He even recommends Dido to be his bride,--
 
      "if that God that heaven and yearth made,
      Would have a love for beauty and goodnesse,
      And womanhede, trouth, and semeliness."
 
 But in justification of our praise, we must refer to his works
 themselves; to the Prologue to the Canterbury Tales, the account
 of Gentilesse, the Flower and the Leaf, the stories of Griselda,
 Virginia, Ariadne, and Blanche the Dutchesse, and much more of
 less distinguished merit.  There are many poets of more taste,
 and better manners, who knew how to leave out their dulness; but
 such negative genius cannot detain us long; we shall return to
 Chaucer still with love.  Some natures, which are really rude and
 ill-developed, have yet a higher standard of perfection than
 others which are refined and well balanced.  Even the clown has
 taste, whose dictates, though he disregards them, are higher and
 purer than those which the artist obeys.  If we have to wander
 through many dull and prosaic passages in Chaucer, we have at
 least the satisfaction of knowing that it is not an artificial
 dulness, but too easily matched by many passages in life.  We
 confess that we feel a disposition commonly to concentrate
 sweets, and accumulate pleasures; but the poet may be presumed
 always to speak as a traveller, who leads us through a varied
 scenery, from one eminence to another, and it is, perhaps, more
 pleasing, after all, to meet with a fine thought in its natural
 setting.  Surely fate has enshrined it in these circumstances for
 some end.  Nature strews her nuts and flowers broadcast, and
 never collects them into heaps.  This was the soil it grew in,
 and this the hour it bloomed in; if sun, wind, and rain came here
 to cherish and expand the flower, shall not we come here to pluck
 it?
 
 
 A true poem is distinguished not so much by a felicitous
 expression, or any thought it suggests, as by the atmosphere
 which surrounds it.  Most have beauty of outline merely, and are
 striking as the form and bearing of a stranger; but true verses
 come toward us indistinctly, as the very breath of all
 friendliness, and envelop us in their spirit and fragrance.  Much
 of our poetry has the very best manners, but no character.  It is
 only an unusual precision and elasticity of speech, as if its
 author had taken, not an intoxicating draught, but an electuary.
 It has the distinct outline of sculpture, and chronicles an early
 hour.  Under the influence of passion all men speak thus
 distinctly, but wrath is not always divine.
 
 There are two classes of men called poets.  The one cultivates
 life, the other art,--one seeks food for nutriment, the other for
 flavor; one satisfies hunger, the other gratifies the palate.
 There are two kinds of writing, both great and rare; one that of
 genius, or the inspired, the other of intellect and taste, in the
 intervals of inspiration.  The former is above criticism, always
 correct, giving the law to criticism.  It vibrates and pulsates
 with life forever.  It is sacred, and to be read with reverence,
 as the works of nature are studied.  There are few instances of a
 sustained style of this kind; perhaps every man has spoken words,
 but the speaker is then careless of the record.  Such a style
 removes us out of personal relations with its author; we do not
 take his words on our lips, but his sense into our hearts.  It is
 the stream of inspiration, which bubbles out, now here, now
 there, now in this man, now in that.  It matters not through what
 ice-crystals it is seen, now a fountain, now the ocean stream
 running under ground.  It is in Shakespeare, Alpheus, in Burns,
 Arethuse; but ever the same.  The other is self-possessed and
 wise.  It is reverent of genius, and greedy of inspiration.  It
 is conscious in the highest and the least degree.  It consists
 with the most perfect command of the faculties.  It dwells in a
 repose as of the desert, and objects are as distinct in it as
 oases or palms in the horizon of sand.  The train of thought
 moves with subdued and measured step, like a caravan.  But the
 pen is only an instrument in its hand, and not instinct with
 life, like a longer arm.  It leaves a thin varnish or glaze over
 all its work.  The works of Goethe furnish remarkable instances
 of the latter.
 
 There is no just and serene criticism as yet.  Nothing is
 considered simply as it lies in the lap of eternal beauty, but
 our thoughts, as well as our bodies, must be dressed after the
 latest fashions.  Our taste is too delicate and particular.  It
 says nay to the poet's work, but never yea to his hope.  It
 invites him to adorn his deformities, and not to cast them off by
 expansion, as the tree its bark.  We are a people who live in a
 bright light, in houses of pearl and porcelain, and drink only
 light wines, whose teeth are easily set on edge by the least
 natural sour.  If we had been consulted, the backbone of the
 earth would have been made, not of granite, but of Bristol spar.
 A modern author would have died in infancy in a ruder age.  But
 the poet is something more than a scald, "a smoother and polisher
 of language"; he is a Cincinnatus in literature, and occupies no
 west end of the world.  Like the sun, he will indifferently
 select his rhymes, and with a liberal taste weave into his verse
 the planet and the stubble.
 
 In these old books the stucco has long since crumbled away, and
 we read what was sculptured in the granite.  They are rude and
 massive in their proportions, rather than smooth and delicate in
 their finish.  The workers in stone polish only their chimney
 ornaments, but their pyramids are roughly done.  There is a
 soberness in a rough aspect, as of unhewn granite, which
 addresses a depth in us, but a polished surface hits only the
 ball of the eye.  The true finish is the work of time, and the
 use to which a thing is put.  The elements are still polishing
 the pyramids.  Art may varnish and gild, but it can do no more.
 A work of genius is rough-hewn from the first, because it
 anticipates the lapse of time, and has an ingrained polish, which
 still appears when fragments are broken off, an essential quality
 of its substance.  Its beauty is at the same time its strength,
 and it breaks with a lustre.
 
 The great poem must have the stamp of greatness as well as its
 essence.  The reader easily goes within the shallowest
 contemporary poetry, and informs it with all the life and promise
 of the day, as the pilgrim goes within the temple, and hears the
 faintest strains of the worshippers; but it will have to speak to
 posterity, traversing these deserts, through the ruins of its
 outmost walls, by the grandeur and beauty of its proportions.
 
 ---------------
 
 
 But here on the stream of the Concord, where we have all the
 while been bodily, Nature, who is superior to all styles and
 ages, is now, with pensive face, composing her poem Autumn, with
 which no work of man will bear to be compared.
 
 In summer we live out of doors, and have only impulses and
 feelings, which are all for action, and must wait commonly for
 the stillness and longer nights of autumn and winter before any
 thought will subside; we are sensible that behind the rustling
 leaves, and the stacks of grain, and the bare clusters of the
 grape, there is the field of a wholly new life, which no man has
 lived; that even this earth was made for more mysterious and
 nobler inhabitants than men and women.  In the hues of October
 sunsets, we see the portals to other mansions than those which we
 occupy, not far off geographically,--
 
      "There is a place beyond that flaming hill,
      From whence the stars their thin appearance shed,
      A place beyond all place, where never ill,
      Nor impure thought was ever harbored."
 
 Sometimes a mortal feels in himself Nature, not his Father but
 his Mother stirs within him, and he becomes immortal with her
 immortality.  From time to time she claims kindredship with us,
 and some globule from her veins steals up into our own.
 
      I am the autumnal sun,
      With autumn gales my race is run;
      When will the hazel put forth its flowers,
      Or the grape ripen under my bowers?
      When will the harvest or the hunter's moon,
      Turn my midnight into mid-noon?
      I am all sere and yellow,
      And to my core mellow.
      The mast is dropping within my woods,
      The winter is lurking within my moods,
      And the rustling of the withered leaf
      Is the constant music of my grief.
 
 To an unskilful rhymer the Muse thus spoke in prose:
 
 The moon no longer reflects the day, but rises to her absolute
 rule, and the husbandman and hunter acknowledge her for their
 mistress.  Asters and golden-rods reign along the way, and the
 life-everlasting withers not.  The fields are reaped and shorn of
 their pride, but an inward verdure still crowns them.  The
 thistle scatters its down on the pool, and yellow leaves clothe
 the vine, and naught disturbs the serious life of men.  But
 behind the sheaves, and under the sod, there lurks a ripe fruit,
 which the reapers have not gathered, the true harvest of the
 year, which it bears forever, annually watering and maturing it,
 and man never severs the stalk which bears this palatable fruit.
 
 
 Men nowhere, east or west, live yet a _natural_ life, round which
 the vine clings, and which the elm willingly shadows.  Man would
 desecrate it by his touch, and so the beauty of the world remains
 veiled to him.  He needs not only to be spiritualized, but
 _naturalized_, on the soil of earth.  Who shall conceive what
 kind of roof the heavens might extend over him, what seasons
 minister to him, and what employment dignify his life!  Only the
 convalescent raise the veil of nature.  An immortality in his
 life would confer immortality on his abode.  The winds should be
 his breath, the seasons his moods, and he should impart of his
 serenity to Nature herself.  But such as we know him he is
 ephemeral like the scenery which surrounds him, and does not
 aspire to an enduring existence.  When we come down into the
 distant village, visible from the mountain-top, the nobler
 inhabitants with whom we peopled it have departed, and left only
 vermin in its desolate streets.  It is the imagination of poets
 which puts those brave speeches into the mouths of their heroes.
 They may feign that Cato's last words were
 
      "The earth, the air, and seas I know, and all
      The joys and horrors of their peace and wars;
      And now will view the Gods' state and the stars,"
 
 but such are not the thoughts nor the destiny of common men.
 What is this heaven which they expect, if it is no better than
 they expect?  Are they prepared for a better than they can now
 imagine?  Where is the heaven of him who dies on a stage, in a
 theatre?  Here or nowhere is our heaven.
 
      "Although we see celestial bodies move
      Above the earth, the earth we till and love."
 
 We can conceive of nothing more fair than something which we have
 experienced.  "The remembrance of youth is a sigh." We linger in
 manhood to tell the dreams of our childhood, and they are half
 forgotten ere we have learned the language.  We have need to be
 earth-born as well as heaven-born, <g_egenei~s>, as was said of
 the Titans of old, or in a better sense than they.  There have
 been heroes for whom this world seemed expressly prepared, as if
 creation had at last succeeded; whose daily life was the stuff of
 which our dreams are made, and whose presence enhanced the beauty
 and ampleness of Nature herself.  Where they walked,
 
      "Largior hic campos aether et lumine vestit
      Purpureo: Solemque suum, sua sidera norunt."
 
 "Here a more copious air invests the fields, and clothes with
 purple light; and they know their own sun and their own stars."
 We love to hear some men speak, though we hear not what they say;
 the very air they breathe is rich and perfumed, and the sound of
 their voices falls on the ear like the rustling of leaves or the
 crackling of the fire.  They stand many deep.  They have the
 heavens for their abettors, as those who have never stood from
 under them, and they look at the stars with an answering ray.
 Their eyes are like glow-worms, and their motions graceful and
 flowing, as if a place were already found for them, like rivers
 flowing through valleys.  The distinctions of morality, of right
 and wrong, sense and nonsense, are petty, and have lost their
 significance, beside these pure primeval natures.  When I
 consider the clouds stretched in stupendous masses across the
 sky, frowning with darkness or glowing with downy light, or
 gilded with the rays of the setting sun, like the battlements of
 a city in the heavens, their grandeur appears thrown away on the
 meanness of my employment; the drapery is altogether too rich for
 such poor acting.  I am hardly worthy to be a suburban dweller
 outside those walls
 
              "Unless above himself he can
      Erect himself, how poor a thing is man!"
 
 With our music we would fain challenge transiently another and
 finer sort of intercourse than our daily toil permits.  The
 strains come back to us amended in the echo, as when a friend
 reads our verse.  Why have they so painted the fruits, and
 freighted them with such fragrance as to satisfy a more than
 animal appetite?
 
      "I asked the schoolman, his advice was free,
      But scored me out too intricate a way."
 
 These things imply, perchance, that we live on the verge of
 another and purer realm, from which these odors and sounds are
 wafted over to us.  The borders of our plot are set with flowers,
 whose seeds were blown from more Elysian fields adjacent.  They
 are the pot-herbs of the gods.  Some fairer fruits and sweeter
 fragrances wafted over to us, betray another realm's vicinity.
 There, too, does Echo dwell, and there is the abutment of the
 rainbow's arch.
 
      A finer race and finer fed
      Feast and revel o'er our head,
      And we titmen are only able
      To catch the fragments from their table.
      Theirs is the fragrance of the fruits,
      While we consume the pulp and roots.
      What are the moments that we stand
      Astonished on the Olympian land!
 
 We need pray for no higher heaven than the pure senses can
 furnish, a _purely_ sensuous life.  Our present senses are but
 the rudiments of what they are destined to become.  We are
 comparatively deaf and dumb and blind, and without smell or taste
 or feeling.  Every generation makes the discovery, that its
 divine vigor has been dissipated, and each sense and faculty
 misapplied and debauched.  The ears were made, not for such
 trivial uses as men are wont to suppose, but to hear celestial
 sounds.  The eyes were not made for such grovelling uses as they
 are now put to and worn out by, but to behold beauty now
 invisible.  May we not _see_ God?  Are we to be put off and
 amused in this life, as it were with a mere allegory?  Is not
 Nature, rightly read, that of which she is commonly taken to be
 the symbol merely?  When the common man looks into the sky, which
 he has not so much profaned, he thinks it less gross than the
 earth, and with reverence speaks of "the Heavens," but the seer
 will in the same sense speak of "the Earths," and his Father who
 is in them.  "Did not he that made that which is _within_, make
 that which is _without_ also?" What is it, then, to educate but
 to develop these divine germs called the senses? for individuals
 and states to deal magnanimously with the rising generation,
 leading it not into temptation,--not teach the eye to squint, nor
 attune the ear to profanity.  But where is the instructed
 teacher?  Where are the _normal_ schools?
 
 A Hindoo sage said, "As a dancer, having exhibited herself to the
 spectator, desists from the dance, so does Nature desist, having
 manifested herself to soul--.  Nothing, in my opinion, is more
 gentle than Nature; once aware of having been seen, she does not
 again expose herself to the gaze of soul."
 
 
 It is easier to discover another such a new world as Columbus
 did, than to go within one fold of this which we appear to know
 so well; the land is lost sight of, the compass varies, and
 mankind mutiny; and still history accumulates like rubbish before
 the portals of nature.  But there is only necessary a moment's
 sanity and sound senses, to teach us that there is a nature
 behind the ordinary, in which we have only some vague pre-emption
 right and western reserve as yet.  We live on the outskirts of
 that region.  Carved wood, and floating boughs, and sunset skies,
 are all that we know of it.  We are not to be imposed on by the
 longest spell of weather.  Let us not, my friends, be wheedled
 and cheated into good behavior to earn the salt of our eternal
 porridge, whoever they are that attempt it.  Let us wait a
 little, and not purchase any clearing here, trusting that richer
 bottoms will soon be put up.  It is but thin soil where we stand;
 I have felt my roots in a richer ere this.  I have seen a bunch
 of violets in a glass vase, tied loosely with a straw, which
 reminded me of myself.
 
      I am a parcel of vain strivings tied
          By a chance bond together,
        Dangling this way and that, their links
          Were made so loose and wide,
                         Methinks,
               For milder weather.
 
      A bunch of violets without their roots,
          And sorrel intermixed,
        Encircled by a wisp of straw
          Once coiled about their shoots,
                         The law
               By which I'm fixed.
 
      A nosegay which Time clutched from out
           Those fair Elysian fields,
        With weeds and broken stems, in haste,
           Doth make the rabble rout
                         That waste
               The day he yields.
 
      And here I bloom for a short hour unseen,
           Drinking my juices up,
        With no root in the land
           To keep my branches green,
                          But stand
               In a bare cup.
 
      Some tender buds were left upon my stem
          In mimicry of life,
        But ah! the children will not know,
          Till time has withered them,
                          The woe
               With which they're rife.
 
      But now I see I was not plucked for naught,
          And after in life's vase
        Of glass set while I might survive,
          But by a kind hand brought
                          Alive
                To a strange place.
 
      That stock thus thinned will soon redeem its hours,
          And by another year,
        Such as God knows, with freer air,
          More fruits and fairer flowers
                        Will bear,
                While I droop here.
 
 This world has many rings, like Saturn, and we live now on the
 outmost of them all.  None can say deliberately that he inhabits
 the same sphere, or is contemporary with, the flower which his
 hands have plucked, and though his feet may seem to crush it,
 inconceivable spaces and ages separate them, and perchance there
 is no danger that he will hurt it.  What do the botanists know?
 Our lives should go between the lichen and the bark.  The eye may
 see for the hand, but not for the mind.  We are still being born,
 and have as yet but a dim vision of sea and land, sun, moon and
 stars, and shall not see clearly till after nine days at least.
 That is a pathetic inquiry among travellers and geographers after
 the site of ancient Troy.  It is not near where they think it is.
 When a thing is decayed and gone, how indistinct must be the
 place it occupied!
 
 The anecdotes of modern astronomy affect me in the same way as do
 those faint revelations of the Real which are vouchsafed to men
 from time to time, or rather from eternity to eternity.  When I
 remember the history of that faint light in our firmament, which
 we call Venus, which ancient men regarded, and which most modern
 men still regard, as a bright spark attached to a hollow sphere
 revolving about our earth, but which we have discovered to be
 _another world_, in itself,--how Copernicus, reasoning long and
 patiently about the matter, predicted confidently concerning it,
 before yet the telescope had been invented, that if ever men came
 to see it more clearly than they did then, they would discover
 that it had phases like our moon, and that within a century after
 his death the telescope was invented, and that prediction
 verified, by Galileo,--I am not without hope that we may, even
 here and now obtain some accurate information concerning that
 OTHER WORLD which the instinct of mankind has so long predicted.
 Indeed, all that we call science, as well as all that we call
 poetry, is a particle of such information, accurate as far as it
 goes, though it be but to the confines of the truth.  If we can
 reason so accurately, and with such wonderful confirmation of our
 reasoning, respecting so-called material objects and events
 infinitely removed beyond the range of our natural vision, so
 that the mind hesitates to trust its calculations even when they
 are confirmed by observation, why may not our speculations
 penetrate as far into the immaterial starry system, of which the
 former is but the outward and visible type?  Surely, we are
 provided with senses as well fitted to penetrate the spaces of
 the real, the substantial, the eternal, as these outward are to
 penetrate the material universe.  Veias, Menu, Zoroaster,
 Socrates, Christ, Shakespeare, Swedenborg,--these are some of our
 astronomers.
 
 There are perturbations in our orbits produced by the influence
 of outlying spheres, and no astronomer has ever yet calculated
 the elements of that undiscovered world which produces them.
 I perceive in the common train of my thoughts a natural and
 uninterrupted sequence, each implying the next, or, if interruption
  occurs, it is occasioned by a new object being presented to my
 _senses_.  But a steep, and sudden, and by these means unaccountable
 transition, is that from a comparatively narrow and partial, what
 is called common sense view of things, to an infinitely expanded
 and liberating one, from seeing things as men describe them, to
 seeing them as men cannot describe them.  This implies a sense
 which is not common, but rare in the wisest man's experience;
 which is sensible or sentient of more than common.
 
 In what enclosures does the astronomer loiter!  His skies are
 shoal, and imagination, like a thirsty traveller, pants to be
 through their desert.  The roving mind impatiently bursts the
 fetters of astronomical orbits, like cobwebs in a corner of its
 universe, and launches itself to where distance fails to follow,
 and law, such as science has discovered, grows weak and weary.
 The mind knows a distance and a space of which all those sums
 combined do not make a unit of measure,--the interval between
 that which _appears_, and that which _is_.  I know that there are
 many stars, I know that they are far enough off, bright enough,
 steady enough in their orbits,--but what are they all worth?
 They are more waste land in the West,--star territory,--to be
 made slave States, perchance, if we colonize them.  I have
 interest but for six feet of star, and that interest is
 transient.  Then farewell to all ye bodies, such as I have known
 ye.
 
 
 Every man, if he is wise, will stand on such bottom as will
 sustain him, and if one gravitates downward more strongly than
 another, he will not venture on those meads where the latter
 walks securely, but rather leave the cranberries which grow there
 unraked by himself.  Perchance, some spring a higher freshet will
 float them within his reach, though they may be watery and
 frost-bitten by that time.  Such shrivelled berries I have seen
 in many a poor man's garret, ay, in many a church-bin and
 state-coffer, and with a little water and heat they swell again
 to their original size and fairness, and added sugar enough,
 stead mankind for sauce to this world's dish.
 
 What is called common sense is excellent in its department, and
 as invaluable as the virtue of conformity in the army and
 navy,--for there must be subordination,--but uncommon sense, that
 sense which is common only to the wisest, is as much more
 excellent as it is more rare.  Some aspire to excellence in the
 subordinate department, and may God speed them.  What Fuller says
 of masters of colleges is universally applicable, that "a little
 alloy of dulness in a master of a college makes him fitter to
 manage secular affairs."
 
      "He that wants faith, and apprehends a grief
      Because he wants it, hath a true belief;
      And he that grieves because his grief's so small,
      Has a true grief, and the best Faith of all."
 
 Or be encouraged by this other poet's strain,--
 
      "By them went Fido marshal of the field:
      Weak was his mother when she gave him day;
      And he at first a sick and weakly child,
      As e'er with tears welcomed the sunny ray;
      Yet when more years afford more growth and might,
      A champion stout he was, and puissant knight,
      As ever came in field, or shone in armor bright.
 
      "Mountains he flings in seas with mighty hand;
      Stops and turns back the sun's impetuous course;
      Nature breaks Nature's laws at his command;
      No force of Hell or Heaven withstands his force;
      Events to come yet many ages hence,
      He present makes, by wondrous prescience;
      Proving the senses blind by being blind to sense."
 
 
 
 "Yesterday, at dawn," says Hafiz, "God delivered me from all
 worldly affliction; and amidst the gloom of night presented me
 with the water of immortality."
 
 
 In the life of Sadi by Dowlat Shah occurs this sentence: "The
 eagle of the immaterial soul of Shaikh Sadi shook from his
 plumage the dust of his body."
 
 
 Thus thoughtfully we were rowing homeward to find some autumnal
 work to do, and help on the revolution of the seasons.  Perhaps
 Nature would condescend to make use of us even without our
 knowledge, as when we help to scatter her seeds in our walks, and
 carry burrs and cockles on our clothes from field to field.
 
      All things are current found
      On earthly ground,
      Spirits and elements
      Have their descents.
 
      Night and day, year on year,
      High and low, far and near,
      These are our own aspects,
      These are our own regrets.
 
      Ye gods of the shore,
      Who abide evermore,
      I see your far headland,
      Stretching on either hand;
 
      I hear the sweet evening sounds
      From your undecaying grounds;
      Cheat me no more with time,
      Take me to your clime.
 
 As it grew later in the afternoon, and we rowed leisurely up the
 gentle stream, shut in between fragrant and blooming banks, where
 we had first pitched our tent, and drew nearer to the fields
 where our lives had passed, we seemed to detect the hues of our
 native sky in the southwest horizon.  The sun was just setting
 behind the edge of a wooded hill, so rich a sunset as would never
 have ended but for some reason unknown to men, and to be marked
 with brighter colors than ordinary in the scroll of time.  Though
 the shadows of the hills were beginning to steal over the stream,
 the whole river valley undulated with mild light, purer and more
 memorable than the noon.  For so day bids farewell even to
 solitary vales uninhabited by man.  Two herons, _Ardea herodias_,
 with their long and slender limbs relieved against the sky, were
 seen travelling high over our heads,--their lofty and silent
 flight, as they were wending their way at evening, surely not to
 alight in any marsh on the earth's surface, but, perchance, on
 the other side of our atmosphere, a symbol for the ages to study,
 whether impressed upon the sky, or sculptured amid the
 hieroglyphics of Egypt.  Bound to some northern meadow, they held
 on their stately, stationary flight, like the storks in the
 picture, and disappeared at length behind the clouds.  Dense
 flocks of blackbirds were winging their way along the river's
 course, as if on a short evening pilgrimage to some shrine of
 theirs, or to celebrate so fair a sunset.
 
      "Therefore, as doth the pilgrim, whom the night
      Hastes darkly to imprison on his way,
      Think on thy home, my soul, and think aright
      Of what's yet left thee of life's wasting day:
      Thy sun posts westward, passed is thy morn,
      And twice it is not given thee to be born."
 
 The sun-setting presumed all men at leisure, and in a contemplative
 mood; but the farmer's boy only whistled the more thoughtfully as
 he drove his cows home from pasture, and the teamster refrained
 from cracking his whip, and guided his team with a subdued voice.
 The last vestiges of daylight at length disappeared, and as we
 rowed silently along with our backs toward home through the
 darkness, only a few stars being visible, we had little to say,
 but sat absorbed in thought, or in silence listened to the
 monotonous sound of our oars, a sort of rudimental music,
 suitable for the ear of Night and the acoustics of her dimly
 lighted halls;
 
      "Pulsae referunt ad sidera valles,"
 
 and the valleys echoed the sound to the stars.
 
 As we looked up in silence to those distant lights, we were
 reminded that it was a rare imagination which first taught that
 the stars are worlds, and had conferred a great benefit on
 mankind.  It is recorded in the Chronicle of Bernaldez, that in
 Columbus's first voyage the natives "pointed towards the heavens,
 making signs that they believed that there was all power and
 holiness."  We have reason to be grateful for celestial
 phenomena, for they chiefly answer to the ideal in man.  The
 stars are distant and unobtrusive, but bright and enduring as our
 fairest and most memorable experiences.  "Let the immortal depth
 of your soul lead you, but earnestly extend your eyes upwards."
 
 
 As the truest society approaches always nearer to solitude, so
 the most excellent speech finally falls into Silence.  Silence is
 audible to all men, at all times, and in all places.  She is when
 we hear inwardly, sound when we hear outwardly.  Creation has not
 displaced her, but is her visible framework and foil.  All sounds
 are her servants, and purveyors, proclaiming not only that their
 mistress is, but is a rare mistress, and earnestly to be sought
 after.  They are so far akin to Silence, that they are but
 bubbles on her surface, which straightway burst, an evidence of
 the strength and prolificness of the under-current; a faint
 utterance of Silence, and then only agreeable to our auditory
 nerves when they contrast themselves with and relieve the former.
 In proportion as they do this, and are heighteners and
 intensifiers of the Silence, they are harmony and purest melody.
 
 Silence is the universal refuge, the sequel to all dull
 discourses and all foolish acts, a balm to our every chagrin, as
 welcome after satiety as after disappointment; that background
 which the painter may not daub, be he master or bungler, and
 which, however awkward a figure we may have made in the
 foreground, remains ever our inviolable asylum, where no
 indignity can assail, no personality disturb us.
 
 The orator puts off his individuality, and is then most eloquent
 when most silent.  He listens while he speaks, and is a hearer
 along with his audience.  Who has not hearkened to Her infinite
 din?  She is Truth's speaking-trumpet, the sole oracle, the true
 Delphi and Dodona, which kings and courtiers would do well to
 consult, nor will they be balked by an ambiguous answer.  For
 through Her all revelations have been made, and just in
 proportion as men have consulted her oracle within, they have
 obtained a clear insight, and their age has been marked as an
 enlightened one.  But as often as they have gone gadding abroad
 to a strange Delphi and her mad priestess, their age has been
 dark and leaden.  Such were garrulous and noisy eras, which no
 longer yield any sound, but the Grecian or silent and melodious
 era is ever sounding and resounding in the ears of men.
 
 A good book is the plectrum with which our else silent lyres are
 struck.  We not unfrequently refer the interest which belongs to
 our own unwritten sequel, to the written and comparatively
 lifeless body of the work.  Of all books this sequel is the most
 indispensable part.  It should be the author's aim to say once
 and emphatically, "He said," <e'ph_e, e'>.  This is the most the
 book-maker can attain to.  If he make his volume a mole whereon
 the waves of Silence may break, it is well.
 
 It were vain for me to endeavor to interrupt the Silence.  She
 cannot be done into English.  For six thousand years men have
 translated her with what fidelity belonged to each, and still she
 is little better than a sealed book.  A man may run on confidently
 for a time, thinking he has her under his thumb, and shall one
 day exhaust her, but he too must at last be silent, and men
 remark only how brave a beginning he made; for when he at length
 dives into her, so vast is the disproportion of the told to the
 untold, that the former will seem but the bubble on the surface
 where he disappeared.  Nevertheless, we will go on, like those
 Chinese cliff swallows, feathering our nests with the froth,
 which may one day be bread of life to such as dwell by the
 sea-shore.
 
 
 We had made about fifty miles this day with sail and oar, and
 now, far in the evening, our boat was grating against the
 bulrushes of its native port, and its keel recognized the Concord
 mud, where some semblance of its outline was still preserved in
 the flattened flags which had scarce yet erected themselves since
 our departure; and we leaped gladly on shore, drawing it up, and
 fastening it to the wild apple-tree, whose stem still bore the
 mark which its chain had worn in the chafing of the spring
 freshets.
 
 
                          THE END.
 
 -----------------
 
 In the original text, there were accented letters in a few lines, as
 follows:
 
 
 
 Sabr, according to the French traveller and naturalist, Botta,
 is celebrated for producing the Kt-tree, of which "the soft tops
 
 would be our Kt-trees.
 
 
     "Now turn again, turn again, said the pindr,
 
 
 
 began, in Alwkidis' Arabian Chronicle: "I was informed by _Ahmed
 Almatin Aljorhami_, who had it from _Repha Ebn Kais Almiri_,
 who had it from _Saiph Ebn Fabalah Alchtquarmi_, who had it from
 _Thabet Ebn Alkamah_, who said he was present at the action."
 
 collections as they have at the Catacombs, Pre la Chaise, Mount
 
 ignotis insultavre carinae;_ "and keels which had long stood on
 high mountains careered insultingly (_insultavre_) over unknown
 
 si bona nrint_, there are no more quiet Tempes, nor more poetic
 
      "Stat contr ratio, et secretam garrit in aurem,
 
      An passim sequeris corvos, testve, lutove,
      Securus qu pes ferat, atque ex tempore vivis?"
 
 occasion the post-boy snivelling,  "Signor perdonate, qusta  la
 
      Purpureo: Solemque suum, sua sidera nrunt.
 
 
 
 For the greek text transcription, the scheme at
 http://www.traditio.com/tradlib/greek.txt
 was used.
 
 
 
 End of The Project Gutenberg Etext of A Week on the Concord and Merrimack Rivers
 by Henry David Thoreau

 
 E-text prepared by Melissa McDaniel and the Online Distributed
 Proofreading Team (http://www.pgdp.net) from page images generously made
 available by Internet Archive (http://archive.org)
 
 
 
 Note: Project Gutenberg also has an HTML version of this
       file which includes the original illustrations.
       See 42500-h.htm or 42500-h.zip:
       (http://www.gutenberg.org/files/42500/42500-h/42500-h.htm)
       or
       (http://www.gutenberg.org/files/42500/42500-h.zip)
 
 
       Images of the original pages are available through
       Internet Archive. See
       http://archive.org/details/writingsofhenryd03thorrich
 
 
 Transcriber's note:
 
       Text enclosed by underscores is in italics (_italics_).
 
 
 
 
 
 The Writings of Henry David Thoreau
 
 In Twenty Volumes
 
 VOLUME III
 
 Manuscript Edition
 Limited to Six Hundred Copies
 Number ----
 
 
   [Illustration: _Snowberry_ (_page 227_)]
 
   [Illustration: _Moosehead Lake, from Mount Kineo_]
 
 
 The Writings of Henry David Thoreau
 
 THE MAINE WOODS
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 Boston and New York
 Houghton Mifflin and Company
 MDCCCCVI
 
 Copyright 1864 by Ticknor and Fields
 Copyright 1892, 1893, and 1906 by Houghton, Mifflin & Co.
 
 All rights reserved
 
 
 
 
 CONTENTS
 
 
      INTRODUCTORY NOTE                   ix
 
      KTAADN                               3
 
      CHESUNCOOK                          93
 
      THE ALLEGASH AND EAST BRANCH       174
 
      APPENDIX
 
        I. TREES                         329
 
       II. FLOWERS AND SHRUBS            330
 
      III. LIST OF PLANTS                335
 
       IV. LIST OF BIRDS                 347
 
        V. QUADRUPEDS                    349
 
       VI. OUTFIT FOR AN EXCURSION       350
 
      VII. A LIST OF INDIAN WORDS        351
 
      INDEX                              359
 
 
 
 
 ILLUSTRATIONS
 
 
      SNOWBERRY, _Carbon photograph_ (_page 227_)      _Frontispiece_
 
      MOOSEHEAD LAKE, FROM MOUNT KINEO,               _Colored plate_
 
      MAINE WILDERNESS                                             88
 
      PINE TREE, BOAR MOUNTAIN                                    134
 
      SQUAW MOUNTAIN, MOOSEHEAD LAKE                              184
 
      MOOSEHEAD LAKE, FROM MOUNT KINEO                            194
 
      MOUNT KINEO CLIFF                                           298
 
 
 
 
 INTRODUCTORY NOTE
 
 
 The Maine Woods was the second volume collected from his writings
 after Thoreau's death. Of the material which composed it, the first
 two divisions were already in print. "Ktaadn and the Maine Woods" was
 the title of a paper printed in 1848 in _The Union Magazine_, and
 "Chesuncook" was published in _The Atlantic Monthly_ in 1858. The book
 was edited by his friend William Ellery Channing.
 
 It was during his second summer at Walden that Thoreau made his first
 visit to the Maine woods. It was probably in response to a request
 from Horace Greeley that he wrote out the narrative from his journal,
 for Mr. Greeley had shown himself eager to help Thoreau in putting his
 wares on the market. In a letter to Emerson, January 12, 1848, Thoreau
 writes: "I read a part of the story of my excursion to Ktaadn to quite
 a large audience of men and boys, the other night, whom it interested.
 It contains many facts and some poetry." He offered the paper to
 Greeley at the end of March, and on the 17th of April Greeley
 responded: "I inclose you $25 for your article on Maine scenery, as
 promised. I know it is worth more, though I have not yet found time to
 read it; but I have tried once to sell it without success. It is
 rather long for my columns, and too fine for the million; but I
 consider it a cheap bargain, and shall print it myself if I do not
 dispose of it to better advantage. You will not, of course, consider
 yourself under any sort of obligation to me, for my offer was in the
 way of business, and I have got more than the worth of my money." But
 this generous, high-minded friend was thinking of Thoreau's business,
 not his own, for in October of the same year he writes, "I break a
 silence of some duration to inform you that I hope on Monday to
 receive payment for your glorious account of 'Ktaadn and the Maine
 Woods,' which I bought of you at a Jew's bargain and sold to _The
 Union Magazine_. I am to get $75 for it, and as I don't choose to
 _exploiter_ you at such a rate, I shall insist on inclosing you $25
 more in this letter, which will still leave me $25 to pay various
 charges and labors I have incurred in selling your articles and
 getting paid for them,--the latter by far the most difficult portion
 of the business."
 
 The third of Thoreau's excursions in the Maine woods was made very
 largely for the purpose of studying Indian life and character in the
 person of his guide. He had all his life been interested in the
 Indians, and Mr. Sanborn tells us--what is also evident from his
 journal--that it was his purpose to expand his studies into a separate
 work on the subject, for which he had collected a considerable amount
 of material from books as well as from his own observations. After his
 return from the Allegash and East Branch he wrote as follows to Mr.
 Blake under date of August 18, 1857: "I have now returned, and think I
 have had a quite profitable journey, chiefly from associating with an
 intelligent Indian.... Having returned, I flatter myself that the
 world appears in some respects a little larger, and not as usual
 smaller and shallower for having extended my range. I have made a
 short excursion into the new world which the Indian dwells in, or is.
 He begins where we leave off. It is worth the while to detect new
 faculties in man, he is so much the more divine; and anything that
 fairly excites our admiration expands us. The Indian who can find his
 way so wonderfully in the woods possesses so much intelligence which
 the white man does not, and it increases my own capacity as well as
 faith to observe it. I rejoice to find that intelligence flows in
 other channels than I knew. It redeems for me portions of what seemed
 brutish before. It is a great satisfaction to find that your oldest
 convictions are permanent. With regard to essentials I have never had
 occasion to change my mind. The aspect of the world varies from year
 to year as the landscape is differently clothed, but I find that the
 _truth_ is still _true_, and I never regret any emphasis which it may
 have inspired. Ktaadn is there still, but much more surely my old
 conviction is there, resting with more than mountain breadth and
 weight on the world, the source still of fertilizing streams, and
 affording glorious views from its summit if I can get up to it again."
 
 
 
 
 THE MAINE WOODS
 
 
 
 
 KTAADN
 
 
 On the 31st of August, 1846, I left Concord in Massachusetts for
 Bangor and the backwoods of Maine, by way of the railroad and
 steamboat, intending to accompany a relative of mine, engaged in the
 lumber trade in Bangor, as far as a dam on the West Branch of the
 Penobscot, in which property he was interested. From this place, which
 is about one hundred miles by the river above Bangor, thirty miles
 from the Houlton military road, and five miles beyond the last log
 hut, I proposed to make excursions to Mount Ktaadn, the second highest
 mountain in New England, about thirty miles distant, and to some of
 the lakes of the Penobscot, either alone or with such company as I
 might pick up there. It is unusual to find a camp so far in the woods
 at that season, when lumbering operations have ceased, and I was glad
 to avail myself of the circumstance of a gang of men being employed
 there at that time in repairing the injuries caused by the great
 freshet in the spring. The mountain may be approached more easily and
 directly on horseback and on foot from the northeast side, by the
 Aroostook road, and the Wassataquoik River; but in that case you see
 much less of the wilderness, none of the glorious river and lake
 scenery, and have no experience of the batteau and the boatman's life.
 I was fortunate also in the season of the year, for in the summer
 myriads of black flies, mosquitoes, and midges, or, as the Indians
 call them, "no-see-ems," make traveling in the woods almost
 impossible; but now their reign was nearly over.
 
 Ktaadn, whose name is an Indian word signifying highest land, was
 first ascended by white men in 1804. It was visited by Professor J. W.
 Bailey of West Point in 1836; by Dr. Charles T. Jackson, the State
 Geologist, in 1837; and by two young men from Boston in 1845. All
 these have given accounts of their expeditions. Since I was there, two
 or three other parties have made the excursion, and told their
 stories. Besides these, very few, even among backwoodsmen and hunters,
 have ever climbed it, and it will be a long time before the tide of
 fashionable travel sets that way. The mountainous region of the State
 of Maine stretches from near the White Mountains, northeasterly one
 hundred and sixty miles, to the head of the Aroostook River, and is
 about sixty miles wide. The wild or unsettled portion is far more
 extensive. So that some hours only of travel in this direction will
 carry the curious to the verge of a primitive forest, more
 interesting, perhaps, on all accounts, than they would reach by going
 a thousand miles westward.
 
 The next forenoon, Tuesday, September 1, I started with my companion
 in a buggy from Bangor for "up river," expecting to be overtaken the
 next day night at Mattawamkeag Point, some sixty miles off, by two
 more Bangoreans, who had decided to join us in a trip to the mountain.
 We had each a knapsack or bag filled with such clothing and articles
 as were indispensable, and my companion carried his gun.
 
 Within a dozen miles of Bangor we passed through the villages of
 Stillwater and Oldtown, built at the falls of the Penobscot, which
 furnish the principal power by which the Maine woods are converted
 into lumber. The mills are built directly over and across the river.
 Here is a close jam, a hard rub, at all seasons; and then the once
 green tree, long since white, I need not say as the driven snow, but
 as a driven log, becomes lumber merely. Here your inch, your two and
 your three inch stuff begin to be, and Mr. Sawyer marks off those
 spaces which decide the destiny of so many prostrate forests. Through
 this steel riddle, more or less coarse, is the arrowy Maine forest,
 from Ktaadn and Chesuncook, and the head-waters of the St. John,
 relentlessly sifted, till it comes out boards, clapboards, laths, and
 shingles such as the wind can take, still, perchance, to be slit and
 slit again, till men get a size that will suit. Think how stood the
 white pine tree on the shore of Chesuncook, its branches soughing with
 the four winds, and every individual needle trembling in the
 sunlight,--think how it stands with it now,--sold, perchance, to the
 New England Friction-Match Company! There were in 1837, as I read, two
 hundred and fifty sawmills on the Penobscot and its tributaries above
 Bangor, the greater part of them in this immediate neighborhood, and
 they sawed two hundred millions of feet of boards annually. To this is
 to be added the lumber of the Kennebec, Androscoggin, Saco,
 Passamaquoddy, and other streams. No wonder that we hear so often of
 vessels which are becalmed off our coast being surrounded a week at a
 time by floating lumber from the Maine woods. The mission of men there
 seems to be, like so many busy demons, to drive the forest all out of
 the country, from every solitary beaver swamp and mountain-side, as
 soon as possible.
 
 At Oldtown, we walked into a batteau-manufactory. The making of
 batteaux is quite a business here for the supply of the Penobscot
 River. We examined some on the stocks. They are light and shapely
 vessels, calculated for rapid and rocky streams, and to be carried
 over long portages on men's shoulders, from twenty to thirty feet
 long, and only four or four and a half wide, sharp at both ends like a
 canoe, though broadest forward on the bottom, and reaching seven or
 eight feet over the water, in order that they may slip over rocks as
 gently as possible. They are made very slight, only two boards to a
 side, commonly secured to a few light maple or other hard-wood knees,
 but inward are of the clearest and widest white pine stuff, of which
 there is a great waste on account of their form, for the bottom is
 left perfectly flat, not only from side to side, but from end to end.
 Sometimes they become "hogging" even, after long use, and the boatmen
 then turn them over and straighten them by a weight at each end. They
 told us that one wore out in two years, or often in a single trip, on
 the rocks, and sold for from fourteen to sixteen dollars. There was
 something refreshing and wildly musical to my ears in the very name of
 the white man's canoe, reminding me of Charlevoix and Canadian
 Voyageurs. The batteau is a sort of mongrel between the canoe and the
 boat, a fur-trader's boat.
 
 The ferry here took us past the Indian island. As we left the shore, I
 observed a short, shabby, washerwoman-looking Indian,--they commonly
 have the woebegone look of the girl that cried for spilt milk,--just
 from "up river," land on the Oldtown side near a grocery, and, drawing
 up his canoe, take out a bundle of skins in one hand, and an empty keg
 or half-barrel in the other, and scramble up the bank with them. This
 picture will do to put before the Indian's history, that is, the
 history of his extinction. In 1837 there were three hundred and
 sixty-two souls left of this tribe. The island seemed deserted to-day,
 yet I observed some new houses among the weather-stained ones, as if
 the tribe had still a design upon life; but generally they have a very
 shabby, forlorn, and cheerless look, being all back side and woodshed,
 not homesteads, even Indian homesteads, but instead of home or
 abroad-steads, for their life is _domi aut militiae_, at home or at
 war, or now rather _venatus_, that is, a hunting, and most of the
 latter. The church is the only trim-looking building, but that is not
 Abenaki, that was Rome's doings. Good Canadian it may be, but it is
 poor Indian. These were once a powerful tribe. Politics are all the
 rage with them now. I even thought that a row of wigwams, with a dance
 of powwows, and a prisoner tortured at the stake, would be more
 respectable than this.
 
 We landed in Milford, and rode along on the east side of the
 Penobscot, having a more or less constant view of the river, and the
 Indian islands in it, for they retain all the islands as far up as
 Nicketow, at the mouth of the East Branch. They are generally
 well-timbered, and are said to be better soil than the neighboring
 shores. The river seemed shallow and rocky, and interrupted by rapids,
 rippling and gleaming in the sun. We paused a moment to see a fish
 hawk dive for a fish down straight as an arrow, from a great height,
 but he missed his prey this time. It was the Houlton road on which we
 were now traveling, over which some troops were marched once towards
 Mars' Hill, though not to Mars' _field_, as it proved. It is the main,
 almost the only, road in these parts, as straight and well made, and
 kept in as good repair as almost any you will find anywhere.
 Everywhere we saw signs of the great freshet,--this house standing
 awry, and that where it was not founded, but where it was found, at
 any rate, the next day; and that other with a waterlogged look, as if
 it were still airing and drying its basement, and logs with
 everybody's marks upon them, and sometimes the marks of their having
 served as bridges, strewn along the road. We crossed the Sunkhaze, a
 summery Indian name, the Olemmon, Passadumkeag, and other streams,
 which make a greater show on the map than they now did on the road. At
 Passadumkeag we found anything but what the name implies,--earnest
 politicians, to wit,--white ones, I mean,--on the alert to know how
 the election was likely to go; men who talked rapidly, with subdued
 voice, and a sort of factitious earnestness you could not help
 believing, hardly waiting for an introduction, one on each side of
 your buggy, endeavoring to say much in little, for they see you hold
 the whip impatiently, but always saying little in much. Caucuses they
 have had, it seems, and caucuses they are to have again,--victory and
 defeat. Somebody may be elected, somebody may not. One man, a total
 stranger, who stood by our carriage in the dusk, actually frightened
 the horse with his asseverations, growing more solemnly positive as
 there was less in him to be positive about. So Passadumkeag did not
 look on the map. At sundown, leaving the river road awhile for
 shortness, we went by way of Enfield, where we stopped for the night.
 This, like most of the localities bearing names on this road, was a
 place to name which, in the midst of the unnamed and unincorporated
 wilderness, was to make a distinction without a difference, it seemed
 to me. Here, however, I noticed quite an orchard of healthy and
 well-grown apple trees, in a bearing state, it being the oldest
 settler's house in this region, but all natural fruit and
 comparatively worthless for want of a grafter. And so it is generally,
 lower down the river. It would be a good speculation, as well as a
 favor conferred on the settlers, for a Massachusetts boy to go down
 there with a trunk full of choice scions, and his grafting apparatus,
 in the spring.
 
 The next morning we drove along through a high and hilly country, in
 view of Cold-Stream Pond, a beautiful lake four or five miles long,
 and came into the Houlton road again, here called the military road,
 at Lincoln, forty-five miles from Bangor, where there is quite a
 village for this country,--the principal one above Oldtown. Learning
 that there were several wigwams here, on one of the Indian islands, we
 left our horse and wagon and walked through the forest half a mile to
 the river, to procure a guide to the mountain. It was not till after
 considerable search that we discovered their habitations,--small huts,
 in a retired place, where the scenery was unusually soft and
 beautiful, and the shore skirted with pleasant meadows and graceful
 elms. We paddled ourselves across to the island side in a canoe,
 which we found on the shore. Near where we landed sat an Indian girl,
 ten or twelve years old, on a rock in the water, in the sun, washing,
 and humming or moaning a song meanwhile. It was an aboriginal strain.
 A salmon-spear, made wholly of wood, lay on the shore, such as they
 might have used before white men came. It had an elastic piece of wood
 fastened to one side of its point, which slipped over and closed upon
 the fish, somewhat like the contrivance for holding a bucket at the
 end of a well-pole. As we walked up to the nearest house, we were met
 by a sally of a dozen wolfish-looking dogs, which may have been lineal
 descendants from the ancient Indian dogs, which the first voyageurs
 describe as "their wolves." I suppose they were. The occupant soon
 appeared, with a long pole in his hand, with which he beat off the
 dogs, while he parleyed with us,--a stalwart, but dull and
 greasy-looking fellow, who told us, in his sluggish way, in answer to
 our questions, as if it were the first serious business he had to do
 that day, that there _were_ Indians going "up river"--he and one
 other--to-day, before noon. And who was the other? Louis Neptune, who
 lives in the next house. Well, let us go over and see Louis together.
 The same doggish reception, and Louis Neptune makes his appearance,--a
 small, wiry man, with puckered and wrinkled face, yet he seemed the
 chief man of the two; the same, as I remembered, who had accompanied
 Jackson to the mountain in '37. The same questions were put to Louis,
 and the same information obtained, while the other Indian stood by. It
 appeared that they were going to start by noon, with two canoes, to
 go up to Chesuncook to hunt moose,--to be gone a month. "Well, Louis,
 suppose you get to the Point (to the Five Islands, just below
 Mattawamkeag) to camp, we walk on up the West Branch tomorrow,--four
 of us,--and wait for you at the dam, or this side. You overtake us
 to-morrow or next day, and take us into your canoes. We stop for you,
 you stop for us. We pay you for your trouble." "Ye'," replied Louis,
 "may be you carry some provision for all,--some pork,--some
 bread,--and so pay." He said, "Me sure get some moose;" and when I
 asked if he thought Pomola would let us go up, he answered that we
 must plant one bottle of rum on the top; he had planted good many; and
 when he looked again, the rum was all gone. He had been up two or
 three times; he had planted letter,--English, German, French, etc.
 These men were slightly clad in shirt and pantaloons, like laborers
 with us in warm weather. They did not invite us into their houses, but
 met us outside. So we left the Indians, thinking ourselves lucky to
 have secured such guides and companions.
 
 There were very few houses along the road, yet they did not altogether
 fail, as if the law by which men are dispersed over the globe were a
 very stringent one, and not to be resisted with impunity or for slight
 reasons. There were even the germs of one or two villages just
 beginning to expand. The beauty of the road itself was remarkable. The
 various evergreens, many of which are rare with us,--delicate and
 beautiful specimens of the larch, arbor-vitae, ball-spruce, and
 fir-balsam, from a few inches to many feet in height,--lined its
 sides, in some places like a long front yard, springing up from the
 smooth grass-plots which uninterruptedly border it, and are made
 fertile by its wash; while it was but a step on either hand to the
 grim, untrodden wilderness, whose tangled labyrinth of living, fallen,
 and decaying trees only the deer and moose, the bear and wolf can
 easily penetrate. More perfect specimens than any front-yard plot can
 show grew there to grace the passage of the Houlton teams.
 
 About noon we reached the Mattawamkeag, fifty-six miles from Bangor by
 the way we had come, and put up at a frequented house still on the
 Houlton road, where the Houlton stage stops. Here was a substantial
 covered bridge over the Mattawamkeag, built, I think they said, some
 seventeen years before. We had dinner,--where, by the way, and even at
 breakfast, as well as supper, at the public-houses on this road, the
 front rank is composed of various kinds of "sweet cakes," in a
 continuous line from one end of the table to the other. I think I may
 safely say that there was a row of ten or a dozen plates of this kind
 set before us two here. To account for which, they say that, when the
 lumberers come out of the woods, they have a craving for cakes and
 pies, and such sweet things, which there are almost unknown, and this
 is the _supply_ to satisfy that _demand_. The supply is always equal
 to the demand, and these hungry men think a good deal of getting their
 money's worth. No doubt the balance of victuals is restored by the
 time they reach Bangor,--Mattawamkeag takes off the raw edge. Well,
 over this front rank, I say, you, coming from the "sweet cake" side,
 with a cheap philosophic indifference though it may be, have to
 assault what there is behind, which I do not by any means mean to
 insinuate is insufficient in quantity or quality to supply that other
 demand, of men, not from the woods but from the towns, for venison and
 strong country fare. After dinner we strolled down to the "Point,"
 formed by the junction of the two rivers, which is said to be the
 scene of an ancient battle between the Eastern Indians and the
 Mohawks, and searched there carefully for relics, though the men at
 the bar-room had never heard of such things; but we found only some
 flakes of arrowhead stone, some points of arrowheads, one small leaden
 bullet, and some colored beads, the last to be referred, perhaps, to
 early fur-trader days. The Mattawamkeag, though wide, was a mere
 river's bed, full of rocks and shallows at this time, so that you
 could cross it almost dry-shod in boots; and I could hardly believe my
 companion, when he told me that he had been fifty or sixty miles up it
 in a batteau, through distant and still uncut forests. A batteau could
 hardly find a harbor now at its mouth. Deer and caribou, or reindeer,
 are taken here in the winter, in sight of the house.
 
 Before our companions arrived, we rode on up the Houlton road seven
 miles to Molunkus, where the Aroostook road comes into it, and where
 there is a spacious public house in the woods, called the "Molunkus
 House," kept by one Libbey, which looked as if it had its hall for
 dancing and for military drills. There was no other evidence of man
 but this huge shingle palace in this part of the world; but sometimes
 even this is filled with travelers. I looked off the piazza round the
 corner of the house up the Aroostook road, on which there was no
 clearing in sight. There was a man just adventuring upon it this
 evening in a rude, original, what you may call Aroostook wagon,--a
 mere seat, with a wagon swung under it, a few bags on it, and a dog
 asleep to watch them. He offered to carry a message for us to anybody
 in that country, cheerfully. I suspect that, if you should go to the
 end of the world, you would find somebody there going farther, as if
 just starting for home at sundown, and having a last word before he
 drove off. Here, too, _was_ a small trader, whom I did not see at
 first, who kept a store,--but no great store, certainly,--in a small
 box over the way, behind the Molunkus sign-post. It looked like the
 balance-box of a patent hay-scales. As for his house, we could only
 conjecture where that was; he may have been a boarder in the Molunkus
 House. I saw him standing in his shop door,--his shop was so small,
 that, if a traveler should make demonstrations of entering in, _he_
 would have to go out by the back way, and confer with his customer
 through a window, about his goods in the cellar, or, more probably,
 bespoken, and yet on the way. I should have gone in, for I felt a real
 impulse to trade, if I had not stopped to consider what would become
 of him. The day before, we had walked into a shop, over against an inn
 where we stopped, the puny beginning of trade, which would grow at
 last into a firm copartnership in the future town or city,--indeed, it
 was already "Somebody & Co.," I forget who. The woman came forward
 from the penetralia of the attached house, for "Somebody & Co." was in
 the burning, and she sold us percussion-caps, canales and smooth, and
 knew their prices and qualities, and which the hunters preferred. Here
 was a little of everything in a small compass to satisfy the wants and
 the ambition of the woods,--a stock selected with what pains and care,
 and brought home in the wagon-box, or a corner of the Houlton team;
 but there seemed to me, as usual, a preponderance of children's
 toys,--dogs to bark, and cats to mew, and trumpets to blow, where
 natives there hardly are yet. As if a child born into the Maine woods,
 among the pine cones and cedar berries, could not do without such a
 sugar-man or skipping-jack as the young Rothschild has.
 
 I think that there was not more than one house on the road to
 Molunkus, or for seven miles. At that place we got over the fence into
 a new field, planted with potatoes, where the logs were still burning
 between the hills; and, pulling up the vines, found good-sized
 potatoes, nearly ripe, growing like weeds, and turnips mixed with
 them. The mode of clearing and planting is to fell the trees, and burn
 once what will burn, then cut them up into suitable lengths, roll into
 heaps, and burn again; then, with a hoe, plant potatoes where you can
 come at the ground between the stumps and charred logs; for a first
 crop the ashes sufficing for manure, and no hoeing being necessary the
 first year. In the fall, cut, roll, and burn again, and so on, till
 the land is cleared; and soon it is ready for grain, and to be laid
 down. Let those talk of poverty and hard times who will in the towns
 and cities; cannot the emigrant who can pay his fare to New York or
 Boston pay five dollars more to get here,--I paid three, all told,
 for my passage from Boston to Bangor, two hundred and fifty
 miles,--and be as rich as he pleases, where land virtually costs
 nothing, and houses only the labor of building, and he may begin life
 as Adam did? If he will still remember the distinction of poor and
 rich, let him bespeak him a narrower house forthwith.
 
 When we returned to the Mattawamkeag, the Houlton stage had already
 put up there; and a Province man was betraying his greenness to the
 Yankees by his questions. Why Province money won't pass here at par,
 when States' money is good at Fredericton,--though this, perhaps, was
 sensible enough. From what I saw then, it appears that the Province
 man was now the only real Jonathan, or raw country bumpkin, left so
 far behind by his enterprising neighbors that he didn't know enough to
 put a question to them. No people can long continue provincial in
 character who have the propensity for politics and whittling, and
 rapid traveling, which the Yankees have, and who are leaving the
 mother country behind in the variety of their notions and inventions.
 The possession and exercise of practical talent merely are a sure and
 rapid means of intellectual culture and independence.
 
 The last edition of Greenleaf's Map of Maine hung on the wall here,
 and, as we had no pocket-map, we resolved to trace a map of the lake
 country. So, dipping a wad of tow into the lamp, we oiled a sheet of
 paper on the oiled table-cloth, and, in good faith, traced what we
 afterwards ascertained to be a labyrinth of errors, carefully
 following the outlines of the imaginary lakes which the map contains.
 The Map of the Public Lands of Maine and Massachusetts is the only one
 I have seen that at all deserves the name. It was while we were
 engaged in this operation that our companions arrived. They had seen
 the Indians' fire on the Five Islands, and so we concluded that all
 was right.
 
 Early the next morning we had mounted our packs, and prepared for a
 tramp up the West Branch, my companion having turned his horse out to
 pasture for a week or ten days, thinking that a bite of fresh grass
 and a taste of running water would do him as much good as backwoods
 fare and new country influences his master. Leaping over a fence, we
 began to follow an obscure trail up the northern bank of the
 Penobscot. There was now no road further, the river being the only
 highway, and but half a dozen log huts, confined to its banks, to be
 met with for thirty miles. On either hand, and beyond, was a wholly
 uninhabited wilderness, stretching to Canada. Neither horse nor cow,
 nor vehicle of any kind, had ever passed over this ground; the cattle,
 and the few bulky articles which the loggers use, being got up in the
 winter on the ice, and down again before it breaks up. The evergreen
 woods had a decidedly sweet and bracing fragrance; the air was a sort
 of diet-drink, and we walked on buoyantly in Indian file, stretching
 our legs. Occasionally there was a small opening on the bank, made for
 the purpose of log-rolling, where we got a sight of the river,--always
 a rocky and rippling stream. The roar of the rapids, the note of a
 whistler duck on the river, of the jay and chickadee around us, and of
 the pigeon woodpecker in the openings, were the sounds that we heard.
 This was what you might call a bran-new country; the only roads were
 of Nature's making, and the few houses were camps. Here, then, one
 could no longer accuse institutions and society, but must front the
 true source of evil.
 
 There are three classes of inhabitants who either frequent or inhabit
 the country which we had now entered: first, the loggers, who, for a
 part of the year, the winter and spring, are far the most numerous,
 but in the summer, except a few explorers for timber, completely
 desert it; second, the few settlers I have named, the only permanent
 inhabitants, who live on the verge of it, and help raise supplies for
 the former; third, the hunters, mostly Indians, who range over it in
 their season.
 
 At the end of three miles we came to the Mattaseunk stream and mill,
 where there was even a rude wooden railroad running down to the
 Penobscot, the last railroad we were to see. We crossed one tract, on
 the bank of the river, of more than a hundred acres of heavy timber,
 which had just been felled and burnt over, and was still smoking. Our
 trail lay through the midst of it, and was well-nigh blotted out. The
 trees lay at full length, four or five feet deep, and crossing each
 other in all directions, all black as charcoal, but perfectly sound
 within, still good for fuel or for timber; soon they would be cut into
 lengths and burnt again. Here were thousands of cords, enough to keep
 the poor of Boston and New York amply warm for a winter, which only
 cumbered the ground and were in the settler's way. And the whole of
 that solid and interminable forest is doomed to be gradually devoured
 thus by fire, like shavings, and no man be warmed by it. At Crocker's
 log-hut, at the mouth of Salmon River, seven miles from the Point, one
 of the party commenced distributing a store of small, cent
 picture-books among the children, to teach them to read, and also
 newspapers, more or less recent, among the parents, than which nothing
 can be more acceptable to a backwoods people. It was really an
 important item in our outfit, and, at times, the only currency that
 would circulate. I walked through Salmon River with my shoes on, it
 being low water, but not without wetting my feet. A few miles farther
 we came to "Marm Howard's," at the end of an extensive clearing, where
 there were two or three log huts in sight at once, one on the opposite
 side of the river, and a few graves even, surrounded by a wooden
 paling, where already the rude forefathers of a hamlet lie, and a
 thousand years hence, perchance, some poet will write his "Elergy in a
 Country Churchyard." The "Village Hampdens," the "mute, inglorious
 Miltons," and Cromwells, "guiltless of" their "country's blood," were
 yet unborn.
 
      "Perchance in this _wild_ spot _there will be_ laid
        Some heart once pregnant with celestial fire;
      Hands that the rod of empire might have swayed,
        Or waked to ecstasy the living lyre."
 
 The next house was Fisk's, ten miles from the Point at the mouth of
 the East Branch, opposite to the island Nicketow, or the Forks, the
 last of the Indian islands. I am particular to give the names of the
 settlers and the distances, since every log hut in these woods is a
 public house, and such information is of no little consequence to
 those who may have occasion to travel this way. Our course here
 crossed the Penobscot, and followed the southern bank. One of the
 party, who entered the house in search of some one to set us over,
 reported a very neat dwelling, with plenty of books, and a new wife,
 just imported from Boston, wholly new to the woods. We found the East
 Branch a large and rapid stream at its mouth and much deeper than it
 appeared. Having with some difficulty discovered the trail again, we
 kept up the south side of the West Branch, or main river, passing by
 some rapids called Rock-Ebeeme, the roar of which we heard through the
 woods, and, shortly after, in the thickest of the wood, some empty
 loggers' camps, still new, which were occupied the previous winter.
 Though we saw a few more afterwards, I will make one account serve for
 all. These were such houses as the lumberers of Maine spend the winter
 in, in the wilderness. There were the camps and the hovels for the
 cattle, hardly distinguishable, except that the latter had no chimney.
 These camps were about twenty feet long by fifteen wide, built of
 logs,--hemlock, cedar, spruce or yellow birch,--one kind alone, or all
 together, with the bark on; two or three large ones first, one
 directly above another, and notched together at the ends, to the
 height of three or four feet, then of smaller logs resting upon
 transverse ones at the ends, each of the last successively shorter
 than the other, to form the roof. The chimney was an oblong square
 hole in the middle, three or four feet in diameter, with a fence of
 logs as high as the ridge. The interstices were filled with moss, and
 the roof was shingled with long and handsome splints of cedar, or
 spruce, or pine, rifted with a sledge and cleaver. The fireplace, the
 most important place of all, was in shape and size like the chimney,
 and directly under it, defined by a log fence or fender on the ground,
 and a heap of ashes, a foot or two deep within, with solid benches of
 split logs running round it. Here the fire usually melts the snow, and
 dries the rain before it can descend to quench it. The faded beds of
 arbor-vitae leaves extended under the eaves on either hand. There was
 the place for the water-pail, pork-barrel, and wash-basin, and
 generally a dingy pack of cards left on a log. Usually a good deal of
 whittling was expended on the latch, which was made of wood, in the
 form of an iron one. These houses are made comfortable by the huge
 fires, which can be afforded night and day. Usually the scenery about
 them is drear and savage enough; and the loggers' camp is as
 completely in the woods as a fungus at the foot of a pine in a swamp;
 no outlook but to the sky overhead; no more clearing than is made by
 cutting down the trees of which it is built, and those which are
 necessary for fuel. If only it be well sheltered and convenient to his
 work, and near a spring, he wastes no thought on the prospect. They
 are very proper forest houses, the stems of the trees collected
 together and piled up around a man to keep out wind and rain,--made of
 living green logs, hanging with moss and lichen, and with the curls
 and fringes of the yellow birch bark, and dripping with resin, fresh
 and moist, and redolent of swampy odors, with that sort of vigor and
 perennialness even about them that toadstools suggest.[1] The
 logger's fare consists of tea, molasses, flour, pork (sometimes beef),
 and beans. A great proportion of the beans raised in Massachusetts
 find their market here. On expeditions it is only hard bread and pork,
 often raw, slice upon slice, with tea or water, as the case may be.
 
 The primitive wood is always and everywhere damp and mossy, so that I
 traveled constantly with the impression that I was in a swamp; and
 only when it was remarked that this or that tract, judging from the
 quality of the timber on it, would make a profitable clearing, was I
 reminded, that if the sun were let in it would make a dry field, like
 the few I had seen, at once. The best shod for the most part travel
 with wet feet. If the ground was so wet and spongy at this, the dryest
 part of a dry season, what must it be in the spring? The woods
 hereabouts abounded in beech and yellow birch, of which last there
 were some very large specimens; also spruce, cedar, fir, and hemlock;
 but we saw only the stumps of the white pine here, some of them of
 great size, these having been already culled out, being the only tree
 much sought after, even as low down as this. Only a little spruce and
 hemlock beside had been logged here. The Eastern wood which is sold
 for fuel in Massachusetts all comes from below Bangor. It was the
 pine alone, chiefly the white pine, that had tempted any but the
 hunter to precede us on this route.
 
 Waite's farm, thirteen miles from the Point, is an extensive and
 elevated clearing, from which we got a fine view of the river,
 rippling and gleaming far beneath us. My companions had formerly had a
 good view of Ktaadn and the other mountains here, but to-day it was so
 smoky that we could see nothing of them. We could overlook an immense
 country of uninterrupted forest, stretching away up the East Branch
 toward Canada on the north and northwest, and toward the Aroostook
 valley on the northeast; and imagine what wild life was stirring in
 its midst. Here was quite a field of corn for this region, whose
 peculiar dry scent we perceived a third of a mile off, before we saw
 it.
 
 Eighteen miles from the Point brought us in sight of McCauslin's, or
 "Uncle George's," as he was familiarly called by my companions, to
 whom he was well known, where we intended to break our long fast. His
 house was in the midst of an extensive clearing or intervale, at the
 mouth of the Little Schoodic River, on the opposite or north bank of
 the Penobscot. So we collected on a point of the shore, that we might
 be seen, and fired our gun as a signal, which brought out his dogs
 forthwith, and thereafter their master, who in due time took us across
 in his batteau. This clearing was bounded abruptly, on all sides but
 the river, by the naked stems of the forest, as if you were to cut
 only a few feet square in the midst of a thousand acres of mowing, and
 set down a thimble therein. He had a whole heaven and horizon to
 himself, and the sun seemed to be journeying over his clearing only
 the livelong day. Here we concluded to spend the night, and wait for
 the Indians, as there was no stopping-place so convenient above. He
 had seen no Indians pass, and this did not often happen without his
 knowledge. He thought that his dogs sometimes gave notice of the
 approach of Indians half an hour before they arrived.
 
 McCauslin was a Kennebec man, of Scotch descent, who had been a
 waterman twenty-two years, and had driven on the lakes and headwaters
 of the Penobscot five or six springs in succession, but was now
 settled here to raise supplies for the lumberers and for himself. He
 entertained us a day or two with true Scotch hospitality, and would
 accept no recompense for it. A man of a dry wit and shrewdness, and a
 general intelligence which I had not looked for in the back woods. In
 fact, the deeper you penetrate into the woods, the more intelligent,
 and, in one sense, less countrified do you find the inhabitants; for
 always the pioneer has been a traveler, and, to some extent, a man of
 the world; and, as the distances with which he is familiar are
 greater, so is his information more general and far reaching than the
 villager's. If I were to look for a narrow, uninformed, and
 countrified mind, as opposed to the intelligence and refinement which
 are thought to emanate from cities, it would be among the rusty
 inhabitants of an old-settled country, on farms all run out and gone
 to seed with life-everlasting, in the towns about Boston, even on the
 high-road in Concord, and not in the back woods of Maine.
 
 Supper was got before our eyes in the ample kitchen, by a fire which
 would have roasted an ox; many whole logs, four feet long, were
 consumed to boil our tea-kettle,--birch, or beech, or maple, the same
 summer and winter; and the dishes were soon smoking on the table, late
 the arm-chair, against the wall, from which one of the party was
 expelled. The arms of the chair formed the frame on which the table
 rested; and, when the round top was turned up against the wall, it
 formed the back of the chair, and was no more in the way than the wall
 itself. This, we noticed, was the prevailing fashion in these log
 houses, in order to economize in room. There were piping-hot wheaten
 cakes, the flour having been brought up the river in batteaux,--no
 Indian bread, for the upper part of Maine, it will be remembered, is a
 wheat country,--and ham, eggs, and potatoes, and milk and cheese, the
 produce of the farm; and also shad and salmon, tea sweetened with
 molasses, and sweet cakes, in contradistinction to the hot cakes not
 sweetened, the one white, the other yellow, to wind up with. Such we
 found was the prevailing fare, ordinary and extraordinary, along this
 river. Mountain cranberries (_Vaccinium Vitis-Idaea_), stewed and
 sweetened, were the common dessert. Everything here was in profusion,
 and the best of its kind. Butter was in such plenty that it was
 commonly used, before it was salted, to grease boots with.
 
 In the night we were entertained by the sound of rain-drops on the
 cedar splints which covered the roof, and awaked the next morning with
 a drop or two in our eyes. It had set in for a storm, and we made up
 our minds not to forsake such comfortable quarters with this prospect,
 but wait for Indians and fair weather. It rained and drizzled and
 gleamed by turns, the livelong day. What we did there, how we killed
 the time would perhaps be idle to tell; how many times we buttered our
 boots, and how often a drowsy one was seen to sidle off to the
 bedroom. When it held up, I strolled up and down the bank, and
 gathered the harebell and cedar berries, which grew there; or else we
 tried by turns the long-handled axe on the logs before the door. The
 axe-helves here were made to chop standing on the log,--a primitive
 log of course,--and were, therefore, nearly a foot longer than with
 us. One while we walked over the farm and visited his well-filled
 barns with McCauslin. There were one other man and two women only
 here. He kept horses, cows, oxen, and sheep. I think he said that he
 was the first to bring a plow and a cow so far; and he might have
 added the last, with only two exceptions. The potato-rot had found him
 out here, too, the previous year, and got half or two thirds of his
 crop, though the seed was of his own raising. Oats, grass, and
 potatoes were his staples; but he raised, also, a few carrots and
 turnips, and "a little corn for the hens," for this was all that he
 dared risk, for fear that it would not ripen. Melons, squashes, sweet
 corn, beans, tomatoes, and many other vegetables, could not be ripened
 there.
 
 The very few settlers along this stream were obviously tempted by the
 cheapness of the land mainly. When I asked McCauslin why more settlers
 did not come in, he answered, that one reason was, they could not buy
 the land, it belonged to individuals or companies who were afraid that
 their wild lands would be settled, and so incorporated into towns, and
 they be taxed for them; but to settling on the State's land there was
 no such hindrance. For his own part, he wanted no neighbors,--he
 didn't wish to see any road by his house. Neighbors, even the best,
 were a trouble and expense, especially on the score of cattle and
 fences. They might live across the river, perhaps, but not on the same
 side.
 
 The chickens here were protected by the dogs. As McCauslin said, "The
 old one took it up first, and she taught the pup, and now they had got
 it into their heads that it wouldn't do to have anything of the bird
 kind on the premises." A hawk hovering over was not allowed to alight,
 but barked off by the dogs circling underneath; and a pigeon, or a
 "yellow-hammer," as they called the pigeon woodpecker, on a dead limb
 or stump, was instantly expelled. It was the main business of their
 day, and kept them constantly coming and going. One would rush out of
 the house on the least alarm given by the other.
 
 When it rained hardest, we returned to the house, and took down a
 tract from the shelf. There was the "Wandering Jew," cheap edition,
 and fine print, the "Criminal Calendar," and "Parish's Geography," and
 flash novels two or three. Under the pressure of circumstances, we
 read a little in these. With such aid, the press is not so feeble an
 engine, after all. This house, which was a fair specimen of those on
 this river, was built of huge logs, which peeped out everywhere, and
 were chinked with clay and moss. It contained four or five rooms.
 There were no sawed boards, or shingles, or clapboards, about it; and
 scarcely any tool but the axe had been used in its construction. The
 partitions were made of long clapboard-like splints, of spruce or
 cedar, turned to a delicate salmon-color by the smoke. The roof and
 sides were covered with the same, instead of shingles and clapboards,
 and some of a much thicker and larger size were used for the floor.
 These were all so straight and smooth, that they answered the purpose
 admirably, and a careless observer would not have suspected that they
 were not sawed and planed. The chimney and hearth were of vast size,
 and made of stone. The broom was a few twigs of arbor-vitae tied to a
 stick; and a pole was suspended over the hearth, close to the ceiling,
 to dry stockings and clothes on. I noticed that the floor was full of
 small, dingy holes, as if made with a gimlet, but which were, in fact,
 made by the spikes, nearly an inch long, which the lumberers wear in
 their boots to prevent their slipping on wet logs. Just above
 McCauslin's, there is a rocky rapid, where logs jam in the spring; and
 many "drivers" are there collected, who frequent his house for
 supplies; these were their tracks which I saw.
 
 At sundown McCauslin pointed away over the forest, across the river,
 to signs of fair weather amid the clouds,--some evening redness there.
 For even there the points of compass held; and there was a quarter of
 the heavens appropriated to sunrise and another to sunset.
 
 The next morning, the weather proving fair enough for our purpose, we
 prepared to start, and, the Indians having failed us, persuaded
 McCauslin, who was not unwilling to revisit the scenes of his driving,
 to accompany us in their stead, intending to engage one other boatman
 on the way. A strip of cotton cloth for a tent, a couple of blankets,
 which would suffice for the whole party, fifteen pounds of hard bread,
 ten pounds of "clear" pork, and a little tea, made up "Uncle George's"
 pack. The last three articles were calculated to be provision enough
 for six men for a week, with what we might pick up. A tea-kettle, a
 frying-pan, and an axe, to be obtained at the last house, would
 complete our outfit.
 
 We were soon out of McCauslin's clearing, and in the evergreen woods
 again. The obscure trail made by the two settlers above, which even
 the woodman is sometimes puzzled to discern, ere long crossed a
 narrow, open strip in the woods overrun with weeds, called the Burnt
 Land, where a fire had raged formerly, stretching northward nine or
 ten miles, to Millinocket Lake. At the end of three miles, we reached
 Shad Pond, or Noliseemack, an expansion of the river. Hodge, the
 Assistant State Geologist, who passed through this on the 25th of
 June, 1837, says, "We pushed our boat through an acre or more of
 buck-beans, which had taken root at the bottom, and bloomed above the
 surface in the greatest profusion and beauty." Thomas Fowler's house
 is four miles from McCauslin's, on the shore of the pond, at the mouth
 of the Millinocket River, and eight miles from the lake of the same
 name, on the latter stream. This lake affords a more direct course to
 Ktaadn, but we preferred to follow the Penobscot and the Pamadumcook
 lakes. Fowler was just completing a new log hut, and was sawing out a
 window through the logs, nearly two feet thick, when we arrived. He
 had begun to paper his house with spruce bark, turned inside out,
 which had a good effect, and was in keeping with the circumstances.
 Instead of water we got here a draught of beer, which, it was allowed,
 would be better; clear and thin, but strong and stringent as the cedar
 sap. It was as if we sucked at the very teats of Nature's pine-clad
 bosom in these parts,--the sap of all Millinocket botany
 commingled,--the topmost, most fantastic, and spiciest sprays of the
 primitive wood, and whatever invigorating and stringent gum or essence
 it afforded steeped and dissolved in it,--a lumberer's drink, which
 would acclimate and naturalize a man at once,--which would make him
 see green, and, if he slept, dream that he heard the wind sough among
 the pines. Here was a fife, praying to be played on, through which we
 breathed a few tuneful strains,--brought hither to tame wild beasts.
 As we stood upon the pile of chips by the door, fish hawks were
 sailing overhead; and here, over Shad Pond, might daily be witnessed
 the tyranny of the bald eagle over that bird. Tom pointed away over
 the lake to a bald eagle's nest, which was plainly visible more than a
 mile off, on a pine, high above the surrounding forest, and was
 frequented from year to year by the same pair, and held sacred by him.
 There were these two houses only there, his low hut and the eagles'
 airy cart-load of fagots. Thomas Fowler, too, was persuaded to join
 us, for two men were necessary to manage the batteau, which was soon
 to be our carriage, and these men needed to be cool and skillful for
 the navigation of the Penobscot. Tom's pack was soon made, for he had
 not far to look for his waterman's boots, and a red flannel shirt.
 This is the favorite color with lumbermen; and red flannel is reputed
 to possess some mysterious virtues, to be most healthful and
 convenient in respect to perspiration. In every gang there will be a
 large proportion of red birds. We took here a poor and leaky batteau,
 and began to pole up the Millinocket two miles, to the elder Fowler's,
 in order to avoid the Grand Falls of the Penobscot, intending to
 exchange our batteau there for a better. The Millinocket is a small,
 shallow, and sandy stream, full of what I took to be lamprey-eels' or
 suckers' nests, and lined with musquash-cabins, but free from rapids,
 according to Fowler, excepting at its outlet from the lake. He was at
 this time engaged in cutting the native grass--rush-grass and
 meadow-clover, as he called it--on the meadows and small, low islands
 of this stream. We noticed flattened places in the grass on either
 side, where, he said, a moose had laid down the night before, adding,
 that there were thousands in these meadows.
 
 Old Fowler's, on the Millinocket, six miles from McCauslin's, and
 twenty-four from the Point, is the last house. Gibson's, on the
 Sowadnehunk, is the only clearing above, but that had proved a
 failure, and was long since deserted. Fowler is the oldest inhabitant
 of these woods. He formerly lived a few miles from here, on the south
 side of the West Branch, where he built his house sixteen years ago,
 the first house built above the Five Islands. Here our new batteau was
 to be carried over the first portage of two miles, round the Grand
 Falls of the Penobscot, on a horse-sled made of saplings, to jump the
 numerous rocks in the way; but we had to wait a couple of hours for
 them to catch the horses, which were pastured at a distance, amid the
 stumps, and had wandered still farther off. The last of the salmon for
 this season had just been caught, and were still fresh in pickle, from
 which enough was extracted to fill our empty kettle, and so graduate
 our introduction to simpler forest fare. The week before they had lost
 nine sheep here out of their first flock, by the wolves. The surviving
 sheep came round the house, and seemed frightened, which induced them
 to go and look for the rest, when they found seven dead and lacerated,
 and two still alive. These last they carried to the house, and, as
 Mrs. Fowler said, they were merely scratched in the throat, and had no
 more visible wound than would be produced by the prick of a pin. She
 sheared off the wool from their throats, and washed them, and put on
 some salve, and turned them out, but in a few moments they were
 missing, and had not been found since. In fact, they were all
 poisoned, and those that were found swelled up at once, so that they
 saved neither skin nor wool. This realized the old fables of the
 wolves and the sheep, and convinced me that that ancient hostility
 still existed. Verily, the shepherd-boy did not need to sound a false
 alarm this time. There were steel traps by the door, of various sizes,
 for wolves, otter, and bears, with large claws instead of teeth, to
 catch in their sinews. Wolves are frequently killed with poisoned
 bait.
 
 At length, after we had dined here on the usual backwoods fare, the
 horses arrived, and we hauled our batteau out of the water, and lashed
 it to its wicker carriage, and, throwing in our packs, walked on
 before, leaving the boatmen and driver, who was Tom's brother, to
 manage the concern. The route, which led through the wild pasture
 where the sheep were killed, was in some places the roughest ever
 traveled by horses, over rocky hills, where the sled bounced and slid
 along, like a vessel pitching in a storm; and one man was as necessary
 to stand at the stern, to prevent the boat from being wrecked, as a
 helmsman in the roughest sea. The philosophy of our progress was
 something like this: when the runners struck a rock three or four feet
 high, the sled bounced back and upwards at the same time; but, as the
 horses never ceased pulling, it came down on the top of the rock, and
 so we got over. This portage probably followed the trail of an ancient
 Indian carry round these falls. By two o'clock we, who had walked on
 before, reached the river above the falls, not far from the outlet of
 Quakish Lake, and waited for the batteau to come up. We had been here
 but a short time, when a thunder-shower was seen coming up from the
 west, over the still invisible lakes, and that pleasant wilderness
 which we were so eager to become acquainted with; and soon the heavy
 drops began to patter on the leaves around us. I had just selected the
 prostrate trunk of a huge pine, five or six feet in diameter, and was
 crawling under it, when, luckily, the boat arrived. It would have
 amused a sheltered man to witness the manner in which it was unlashed,
 and whirled over, while the first waterspout burst upon us. It was no
 sooner in the hands of the eager company than it was abandoned to the
 first revolutionary impulse, and to gravity, to adjust it; and they
 might have been seen all stooping to its shelter, and wriggling under
 like so many eels, before it was fairly deposited on the ground. When
 all were under, we propped up the lee side, and busied ourselves there
 whittling thole-pins for rowing, when we should reach the lakes; and
 made the woods ring, between the claps of thunder, with such
 boat-songs as we could remember. The horses stood sleek and shining
 with the rain, all drooping and crestfallen, while deluge after deluge
 washed over us; but the bottom of a boat may be relied on for a tight
 roof. At length, after two hours' delay at this place, a streak of
 fair weather appeared in the northwest, whither our course now lay,
 promising a serene evening for our voyage; and the driver returned
 with his horses, while we made haste to launch our boat, and commence
 our voyage in good earnest.
 
 There were six of us, including the two boatmen. With our packs heaped
 up near the bows, and ourselves disposed as baggage to trim the boat,
 with instructions not to move in case we should strike a rock, more
 than so many barrels of pork, we pushed out into the first rapid, a
 slight specimen of the stream we had to navigate. With Uncle George in
 the stern, and Tom in the bows, each using a spruce pole about twelve
 feet long, pointed with iron,[2] and poling on the same side, we shot
 up the rapids like a salmon, the water rushing and roaring around, so
 that only a practiced eye could distinguish a safe course, or tell
 what was deep water and what rocks, frequently grazing the latter on
 one or both sides, with a hundred as narrow escapes as ever the Argo
 had in passing through the Symplegades. I, who had had some experience
 in boating, had never experienced any half so exhilarating before. We
 were lucky to have exchanged our Indians, whom we did not know, for
 these men, who, together with Tom's brother, were reputed the best
 boatmen on the river, and were at once indispensable pilots and
 pleasant companions. The canoe is smaller, more easily upset, and
 sooner worn out; and the Indian is said not to be so skillful in the
 management of the batteau. He is, for the most part, less to be relied
 on, and more disposed to sulks and whims. The utmost familiarity with
 dead streams, or with the ocean, would not prepare a man for this
 peculiar navigation; and the most skillful boatman anywhere else would
 here be obliged to take out his boat and carry round a hundred times,
 still with great risk, as well as delay, where the practiced
 batteau-man poles up with comparative ease and safety. The hardy
 "voyageur" pushes with incredible perseverance and success quite up to
 the foot of the falls, and then only carries round some perpendicular
 ledge, and launches again in
 
      "The torrent's smoothness, ere it dash below,"
 
 to struggle with the boiling rapids above. The Indians say that the
 river once ran both ways, one half up and the other down, but that,
 since the white man came, it all runs down, and now they must
 laboriously pole their canoes against the stream, and carry them over
 numerous portages. In the summer, all stores--the grindstone and the
 plow of the pioneer, flour, pork, and utensils for the explorer--must
 be conveyed up the river in batteaux; and many a cargo and many a
 boatman is lost in these waters. In the winter, however, which is very
 equable and long, the ice is the great highway, and the loggers' team
 penetrates to Chesuncook Lake, and still higher up, even two hundred
 miles above Bangor. Imagine the solitary sled-track running far up
 into the snowy and evergreen wilderness, hemmed in closely for a
 hundred miles by the forest, and again stretching straight across the
 broad surfaces of concealed lakes!
 
 We were soon in the smooth water of the Quakish Lake, and took our
 turns at rowing and paddling across it. It is a small, irregular, but
 handsome lake, shut in on all sides by the forest, and showing no
 traces of man but some low boom in a distant cove, reserved for spring
 use. The spruce and cedar on its shores, hung with gray lichens,
 looked at a distance like the ghosts of trees. Ducks were sailing here
 and there on its surface, and a solitary loon, like a more living
 wave,--a vital spot on the lake's surface,--laughed and frolicked, and
 showed its straight leg, for our amusement. Joe Merry Mountain
 appeared in the northwest, as if it were looking down on this lake
 especially; and we had our first, but a partial view of Ktaadn, its
 summit veiled in clouds, like a dark isthmus in that quarter,
 connecting the heavens with the earth. After two miles of smooth
 rowing across this lake, we found ourselves in the river again, which
 was a continuous rapid for one mile, to the dam, requiring all the
 strength and skill of our boatmen to pole up it.
 
 This dam is a quite important and expensive work for this country,
 whither cattle and horses cannot penetrate in the summer, raising the
 whole river ten feet, and flooding, as they said, some sixty square
 miles by means of the innumerable lakes with which the river connects.
 It is a lofty and solid structure, with sloping piers, some distance
 above, made of frames of logs filled with stones, to break the ice.[3]
 Here every log pays toll as it passes through the sluices.
 
 We filed into the rude loggers' camp at this place, such as I have
 described, without ceremony, and the cook, at that moment the sole
 occupant, at once set about preparing tea for his visitors. His
 fireplace, which the rain had converted into a mud-puddle, was soon
 blazing again, and we sat down on the log benches around it to dry us.
 On the well-flattened and somewhat faded beds of arbor-vitae leaves,
 which stretched on either hand under the eaves behind us, lay an odd
 leaf of the Bible, some genealogical chapter out of the Old Testament;
 and, half buried by the leaves, we found Emerson's Address on West
 India Emancipation, which had been left here formerly by one of our
 company, and _had made two converts to the Liberty party_ here, as I
 was told; also, an odd number of the _Westminster Review_, for 1834,
 and a pamphlet entitled "History of the Erection of the Monument on
 the Grave of Myron Holly." This was the readable or reading matter in
 a lumberer's camp in the Maine woods, thirty miles from a road, which
 would be given up to the bears in a fortnight. These things were well
 thumbed and soiled. This gang was headed by one John Morrison, a good
 specimen of a Yankee; and was necessarily composed of men not bred to
 the business of dam-building, but who were jacks-at-all-trades, handy
 with the axe, and other simple implements, and well skilled in wood
 and water craft. We had hot cakes for our supper even here, white as
 snowballs, but without butter, and the never-failing sweet cakes, with
 which we filled our pockets, foreseeing that we should not soon meet
 with the like again. Such delicate puffballs seemed a singular diet
 for backwoodsmen. There was also tea without milk, sweetened with
 molasses. And so, exchanging a word with John Morrison and his gang
 when we had returned to the shore, and also exchanging our batteau for
 a better still, we made haste to improve the little daylight that
 remained. This camp, exactly twenty-nine miles from Mattawamkeag Point
 by the way we had come, and about one hundred from Bangor by the
 river, was the last human habitation of any kind in this direction.
 Beyond, there was no trail, and the river and lakes, by batteaux and
 canoes, was considered the only practicable route. We were about
 thirty miles by the river from the summit of Ktaadn, which was in
 sight, though not more than twenty, perhaps, in a straight line.
 
 It being about the full of the moon, and a warm and pleasant evening,
 we decided to row five miles by moonlight to the head of the North
 Twin Lake, lest the wind should rise on the morrow. After one mile of
 river, or what the boatmen call "thoroughfare,"--for the river becomes
 at length only the connecting link between the lakes,--and some slight
 rapid which had been mostly made smooth water by the dam, we entered
 the North Twin Lake just after sundown, and steered across for the
 river "thoroughfare," four miles distant. This is a noble sheet of
 water, where one may get the impression which a new country and a
 "lake of the woods" are fitted to create. There was the smoke of no
 log hut nor camp of any kind to greet us, still less was any lover of
 nature or musing traveler watching our batteau from the distant hills;
 not even the Indian hunter was there, for he rarely climbs them, but
 hugs the river like ourselves. No face welcomed us but the fine
 fantastic sprays of free and happy evergreen trees, waving one above
 another in their ancient home. At first the red clouds hung over the
 western shore as gorgeously as if over a city, and the lake lay open
 to the light with even a civilized aspect, as if expecting trade and
 commerce, and towns and villas. We could distinguish the inlet to the
 South Twin, which is said to be the larger, where the shore was misty
 and blue, and it was worth the while to look thus through a narrow
 opening across the entire expanse of a concealed lake to its own yet
 more dim and distant shore. The shores rose gently to ranges of low
 hills covered with forests; and though, in fact, the most valuable
 white-pine timber, even about this lake, had been culled out, this
 would never have been suspected by the voyager. The impression, which
 indeed corresponded with the fact, was, as if we were upon a high
 table-land between the States and Canada, the northern side of which
 is drained by the St. John and Chaudiere, the southern by the
 Penobscot and Kennebec. There was no bold, mountainous shore, as we
 might have expected, but only isolated hills and mountains rising here
 and there from the plateau. The country is an archipelago of
 lakes,--the lake-country of New England. Their levels vary but a few
 feet, and the boatmen, by short portages, or by none at all, pass
 easily from one to another. They say that at very high water the
 Penobscot and the Kennebec flow into each other, or at any rate, that
 you may lie with your face in the one and your toes in the other. Even
 the Penobscot and St. John have been connected by a canal, so that the
 lumber of the Allegash, instead of going down the St. John, comes down
 the Penobscot; and the Indian's tradition, that the Penobscot once ran
 both ways for his convenience, is, in one sense, partially realized
 to-day.
 
 None of our party but McCauslin had been above this lake, so we
 trusted to him to pilot us, and we could not but confess the
 importance of a pilot on these waters. While it is river, you will not
 easily forget which way is up-stream; but when you enter a lake, the
 river is completely lost, and you scan the distant shores in vain to
 find where it comes in. A stranger is, for the time at least, lost,
 and must set about a voyage of discovery first of all to find the
 river. To follow the windings of the shore when the lake is ten miles,
 or even more, in length, and of an irregularity which will not soon
 be mapped, is a wearisome voyage, and will spend his time and his
 provisions. They tell a story of a gang of experienced woodmen sent to
 a location on this stream, who were thus lost in the wilderness of
 lakes. They cut their way through thickets, and carried their baggage
 and their boats over from lake to lake, sometimes several miles. They
 carried into Millinocket Lake, which is on another stream, and is ten
 miles square, and contains a hundred islands. They explored its shores
 thoroughly, and then carried into another, and another, and it was a
 week of toil and anxiety before they found the Penobscot River again,
 and then their provisions were exhausted, and they were obliged to
 return.
 
 While Uncle George steered for a small island near the head of the
 lake, now just visible, like a speck on the water, we rowed by turns
 swiftly over its surface, singing such boat songs as we could
 remember. The shores seemed at an indefinite distance in the
 moonlight. Occasionally we paused in our singing and rested on our
 oars, while we listened to hear if the wolves howled, for this is a
 common serenade, and my companions affirmed that it was the most
 dismal and unearthly of sounds; but we heard none this time. If we did
 not _hear_, however, we did _listen_, not without a reasonable
 expectation; that at least I have to tell,--only some utterly
 uncivilized, big-throated owl hooted loud and dismally in the drear
 and boughy wilderness, plainly not nervous about his solitary life,
 nor afraid to hear the echoes of his voice there. We remembered also
 that possibly moose were silently watching us from the distant coves,
 or some surly bear or timid caribou had been startled by our singing.
 It was with new emphasis that we sang there the Canadian boat song,--
 
      "Row, brothers, row, the stream runs fast,
      The rapids are near and the daylight's past!"
 
 which describes precisely our own adventure, and was inspired by the
 experience of a similar kind of life,--for the rapids were ever near,
 and the daylight long past; the woods on shore looked dim, and many an
 Utawas' tide here emptied into the lake.
 
      "Why should we yet our sail unfurl?
      There is not a breath the blue wave to curl!
      But, when the wind blows off the shore,
      Oh, sweetly we'll rest our weary oar."
 
      "Utawas' tide! this trembling moon
      Shall see us float o'er thy surges soon."
 
 At last we glided past the "green isle," which had been our landmark,
 all joining in the chorus; as if by the watery links of rivers and of
 lakes we were about to float over unmeasured zones of earth, bound on
 unimaginable adventures,--
 
      "Saint of this green isle! hear our prayers,
      Oh, grant us cool heavens and favoring airs!"
 
 About nine o'clock we reached the river, and ran our boat into a
 natural haven between some rocks, and drew her out on the sand. This
 camping-ground McCauslin had been familiar with in his lumbering days,
 and he now struck it unerringly in the moonlight, and we heard the
 sound of the rill which would supply us with cool water emptying into
 the lake. The first business was to make a fire, an operation which
 was a little delayed by the wetness of the fuel and the ground, owing
 to the heavy showers of the afternoon. The fire is the main comfort of
 the camp, whether in summer or winter, and is about as ample at one
 season as at another. It is as well for cheerfulness as for warmth and
 dryness. It forms one side of the camp; one bright side at any rate.
 Some were dispersed to fetch in dead trees and boughs, while Uncle
 George felled the birches and beeches which stood convenient, and soon
 we had a fire some ten feet long by three or four high, which rapidly
 dried the sand before it. This was calculated to burn all night. We
 next proceeded to pitch our tent; which operation was performed by
 sticking our two spike-poles into the ground in a slanting direction,
 about ten feet apart, for rafters, and then drawing our cotton cloth
 over them, and tying it down at the ends, leaving it open in front,
 shed-fashion. But this evening the wind carried the sparks on to the
 tent and burned it. So we hastily drew up the batteau just within the
 edge of the woods before the fire, and propping up one side three or
 four feet high, spread the tent on the ground to lie on; and with the
 corner of a blanket, or what more or less we could get to put over us,
 lay down with our heads and bodies under the boat, and our feet and
 legs on the sand toward the fire. At first we lay awake, talking of
 our course, and finding ourselves in so convenient a posture for
 studying the heavens, with the moon and stars shining in our faces,
 our conversation naturally turned upon astronomy, and we recounted by
 turns the most interesting discoveries in that science. But at length
 we composed ourselves seriously to sleep. It was interesting, when
 awakened at midnight, to watch the grotesque and fiend-like forms and
 motions of some one of the party, who, not being able to sleep, had
 got up silently to arouse the fire, and add fresh fuel, for a change;
 now stealthily lugging a dead tree from out the dark, and heaving it
 on, now stirring up the embers with his fork, or tiptoeing about to
 observe the stars, watched, perchance, by half the prostrate party in
 breathless silence; so much the more intense because they were awake,
 while each supposed his neighbor sound asleep. Thus aroused, I, too,
 brought fresh fuel to the fire, and then rambled along the sandy shore
 in the moonlight, hoping to meet a moose come down to drink, or else a
 wolf. The little rill tinkled the louder, and peopled all the
 wilderness for me; and the glassy smoothness of the sleeping lake,
 laving the shores of a new world, with the dark, fantastic rocks
 rising here and there from its surface, made a scene not easily
 described. It has left such an impression of stern, yet gentle,
 wildness on my memory as will not soon be effaced. Not far from
 midnight we were one after another awakened by rain falling on our
 extremities; and as each was made aware of the fact by cold or wet, he
 drew a long sigh and then drew up his legs, until gradually we had all
 sidled round from lying at right angles with the boat, till our bodies
 formed an acute angle with it, and were wholly protected. When next we
 awoke, the moon and stars were shining again, and there were signs of
 dawn in the east. I have been thus particular in order to convey some
 idea of a night in the woods.
 
 We had soon launched and loaded our boat, and, leaving our fire
 blazing, were off again before breakfast. The lumberers rarely trouble
 themselves to put out their fires, such is the dampness of the
 primitive forest; and this is one cause, no doubt, of the frequent
 fires in Maine, of which we hear so much on smoky days in
 Massachusetts. The forests are held cheap after the white pine has
 been culled out; and the explorers and hunters pray for rain only to
 clear the atmosphere of smoke. The woods were so wet to-day, however,
 that there was no danger of our fire spreading. After poling up half a
 mile of river, or thoroughfare, we rowed a mile across the foot of
 Pamadumcook Lake, which is the name given on the map to this whole
 chain of lakes, as if there was but one, though they are, in each
 instance, distinctly separated by a reach of the river, with its
 narrow and rocky channel and its rapids. This lake, which is one of
 the largest, stretched northwest ten miles, to hills and mountains in
 the distance. McCauslin pointed to some distant, and as yet
 inaccessible, forests of white pine, on the sides of a mountain in
 that direction. The Joe Merry Lakes, which lay between us and
 Moosehead, on the west, were recently, if they are not still,
 "surrounded by some of the best timbered land in the State." By
 another thoroughfare we passed into Deep Cove, a part of the same
 lake, which makes up two miles, toward the northeast, and rowing two
 miles across this, by another short thoroughfare, entered Ambejijis
 Lake.
 
 At the entrance to a lake we sometimes observed what is technically
 called "fencing-stuff," or the unhewn timbers of which booms are
 formed, either secured together in the water, or laid up on the rocks
 and lashed to trees, for spring use. But it was always startling to
 discover so plain a trail of civilized man there. I remember that I
 was strangely affected, when we were returning, by the sight of a
 ring-bolt well drilled into a rock, and fastened with lead, at the
 head of this solitary Ambejijis Lake.
 
 It was easy to see that driving logs must be an exciting as well as
 arduous and dangerous business. All winter long the logger goes on
 piling up the trees which he has trimmed and hauled in some dry ravine
 at the head of a stream, and then in the spring he stands on the bank
 and whistles for Rain and Thaw, ready to wring the perspiration out of
 his shirt to swell the tide, till suddenly, with a whoop and halloo
 from him, shutting his eyes, as if to bid farewell to the existing
 state of things, a fair proportion of his winter's work goes
 scrambling down the country, followed by his faithful dogs, Thaw and
 Rain and Freshet and Wind, the whole pack in full cry, toward the
 Orono Mills. Every log is marked with the owner's name, cut in the
 sapwood with an axe or bored with an auger, so deep as not to be worn
 off in the driving, and yet not so as to injure the timber; and it
 requires considerable ingenuity to invent new and simple marks where
 there are so many owners. They have quite an alphabet of their own,
 which only the practiced can read. One of my companions read off from
 his memorandum book some marks of his own logs, among which there were
 crosses, belts, crow's feet, girdles, etc., as, "Y--girdle--crowfoot,"
 and various other devices. When the logs have run the gauntlet of
 innumerable rapids and falls, each on its own account, with more or
 less jamming and bruising, those bearing various owners' marks being
 mixed up together,--since all must take advantage of the same
 freshet,--they are collected together at the heads of the lakes, and
 surrounded by a boom fence of floating logs, to prevent their being
 dispersed by the wind, and are thus towed all together, like a flock
 of sheep, across the lake, where there is no current, by a windlass,
 or boom-head, such as we sometimes saw standing on an island or
 headland, and, if circumstances permit, with the aid of sails and
 oars. Sometimes, notwithstanding, the logs are dispersed over many
 miles of lake surface in a few hours by winds and freshets, and thrown
 up on distant shores, where the driver can pick up only one or two at
 a time, and return with them to the thoroughfare; and before he gets
 his flock well through Ambejijis or Pamadumcook, he makes many a wet
 and uncomfortable camp on the shore. He must be able to navigate a log
 as if it were a canoe, and be as indifferent to cold and wet as a
 muskrat. He uses a few efficient tools,--a lever commonly of rock
 maple, six or seven feet long, with a stout spike in it, strongly
 ferruled on, and a long spike-pole, with a screw at the end of the
 spike to make it hold. The boys along shore learn to walk on floating
 logs as city boys on sidewalks. Sometimes the logs are thrown up on
 rocks in such positions as to be irrecoverable but by another freshet
 as high, or they jam together at rapids and falls, and accumulate in
 vast piles, which the driver must start at the risk of his life. Such
 is the lumber business, which depends on many accidents, as the early
 freezing of the rivers, that the teams may get up in season, a
 sufficient freshet in the spring, to fetch the logs down, and many
 others.[4] I quote Michaux on Lumbering on the Kennebec, then the
 source of the best white pine lumber carried to England. "The persons
 engaged in this branch of industry are generally emigrants from New
 Hampshire.... In the summer they unite in small companies, and
 traverse these vast solitudes in every direction, to ascertain the
 places in which the pines abound. After cutting the grass and
 converting it into hay for the nourishment of the cattle to be
 employed in their labor, they return home. In the beginning of the
 winter they enter the forests again, establish themselves in huts
 covered with the bark of the canoe-birch, or the arbor-vitae; and,
 though the cold is so intense that the mercury sometimes remains for
 several weeks from 40 deg. to 50 deg. [Fahr.] below the point of
 congelation, they persevere, with unabated courage, in their work."
 According to Springer, the company consists of choppers, swampers,--who
 make roads,--barker and loader, teamster, and cook. "When the trees are
 felled, they cut them into logs from fourteen to eighteen feet long,
 and, by means of their cattle, which they employ with great dexterity,
 drag them to the river, and, after stamping on them a mark of
 property, roll them on its frozen bosom. At the breaking of the ice,
 in the spring, they float down with the current.... The logs that are
 not drawn the first year," adds Michaux, "are attacked by large worms,
 which form holes about two lines in diameter, in every direction; but,
 if stripped of their bark, they will remain uninjured for thirty
 years."
 
 Ambejijis, this quiet Sunday morning, struck me as the most beautiful
 lake we had seen. It is said to be one of the deepest. We had the
 fairest view of Joe Merry, Double Top, and Ktaadn, from its surface.
 The summit of the latter had a singularly flat, table-land appearance,
 like a short highway, where a demigod might be let down to take a turn
 or two in an afternoon, to settle his dinner. We rowed a mile and a
 half to near the head of the lake, and, pushing through a field of
 lily-pads, landed, to cook our breakfast, by the side of a large rock,
 known to McCauslin. Our breakfast consisted of tea, with hard-bread
 and pork, and fried salmon, which we ate with forks neatly whittled
 from alder twigs, which grew there, off strips of birch-bark for
 plates. The tea was black tea, without milk to color or sugar to
 sweeten it, and two tin dippers were our tea cups. This beverage is as
 indispensable to the loggers as to any gossiping old women in the
 land, and they, no doubt, derive great comfort from it. Here was the
 site of an old logger's camp, remembered by McCauslin, now overgrown
 with weeds and bushes. In the midst of a dense underwood we noticed a
 whole brick, on a rock, in a small run, clean and red and square as in
 a brick-yard, which had been brought thus far formerly for tamping.
 Some of us afterward regretted that we had not carried this on with us
 to the top of the mountain, to be left there for our mark. It would
 certainly have been a simple evidence of civilized man. McCauslin said
 that large wooden crosses, made of oak, still sound, were sometimes
 found standing in this wilderness, which were set up by the first
 Catholic missionaries who came through to the Kennebec.
 
 In the next nine miles, which were the extent of our voyage, and which
 it took us the rest of the day to get over, we rowed across several
 small lakes, poled up numerous rapids and thoroughfares, and carried
 over four portages. I will give the names and distances, for the
 benefit of future tourists. First, after leaving Ambejijis Lake, we
 had a quarter of a mile of rapids to the portage, or carry of ninety
 rods around Ambejijis Falls; then a mile and a half through Passamagamet
 Lake, which is narrow and river-like, to the falls of the same
 name,--Ambejijis stream coming in on the right; then two miles through
 Katepskonegan Lake to the portage of ninety rods around Katepskonegan
 Falls, which name signifies "carrying-place,"--Passamagamet stream
 coming in on the left; then three miles through Pockwockomus Lake, a
 slight expansion of the river, to the portage of forty rods around the
 falls of the same name,--Katepskonegan stream coming in on the left;
 then three quarters of a mile through Aboljacarmegus Lake, similar to
 the last, to the portage of forty rods around the falls of the same
 name; then half a mile of rapid water to the Sowadnehunk deadwater,
 and the Aboljacknagesic stream.
 
 This is generally the order of names as you ascend the river: First,
 the lake, or, if there is no expansion, the deadwater; then the falls;
 then the stream emptying into the lake, or river above, all of the
 same name. First we came to Passamagamet Lake, then to Passamagamet
 Falls, then to Passamagamet Stream, emptying in. This order and
 identity of names, it will be perceived, is quite philosophical, since
 the deadwater or lake is always at least partially produced by the
 stream emptying in above; and the first fall below, which is the
 outlet of that lake, and where that tributary water makes its first
 plunge, also naturally bears the same name.
 
 At the portage around Ambejijis Falls I observed a pork-barrel on the
 shore, with a hole eight or nine inches square cut in one side, which
 was set against an upright rock; but the bears, without turning or
 upsetting the barrel, had gnawed a hole in the opposite side, which
 looked exactly like an enormous rat-hole, big enough to put their
 heads in; and at the bottom of the barrel were still left a few
 mangled and slabbered slices of pork. It is usual for the lumberers to
 leave such supplies as they cannot conveniently carry along with them
 at carries or camps, to which the next comers do not scruple to help
 themselves, they being the property, commonly, not of an individual,
 but a company, who can afford to deal liberally.
 
 I will describe particularly how we got over some of these portages
 and rapids, in order that the reader may get an idea of the boatman's
 life. At Ambejijis Falls, for instance, there was the roughest path
 imaginable cut through the woods; at first up hill, at an angle of
 nearly forty-five degrees, over rocks and logs without end. This was
 the manner of the portage. We first carried over our baggage, and
 deposited it on the shore at the other end; then, returning to the
 batteau, we dragged it up the hill by the painter, and onward, with
 frequent pauses, over half the portage. But this was a bungling way,
 and would soon have worn out the boat. Commonly, three men walk over
 with a batteau weighing from three to five or six hundred pounds on
 their heads and shoulders, the tallest standing under the middle of
 the boat, which is turned over, and one at each end, or else there are
 two at the bows. More cannot well take hold at once. But this requires
 some practice, as well as strength, and is in any case extremely
 laborious, and wearing to the constitution, to follow. We were, on the
 whole, rather an invalid party, and could render our boatmen but
 little assistance. Our two men at length took the batteau upon their
 shoulders, and, while two of us steadied it, to prevent it from
 rocking and wearing into their shoulders, on which they placed their
 hats folded, walked bravely over the remaining distance, with two or
 three pauses. In the same manner they accomplished the other portages.
 With this crushing weight they must climb and stumble along over
 fallen trees and slippery rocks of all sizes, where those who walked
 by the sides were continually brushed off, such was the narrowness of
 the path. But we were fortunate not to have to cut our path in the
 first place. Before we launched our boat, we scraped the bottom smooth
 again, with our knives, where it had rubbed on the rocks, to save
 friction.
 
 To avoid the difficulties of the portage, our men determined to "warp
 up" the Passamagamet Falls; so while the rest walked over the portage
 with the baggage, I remained in the batteau, to assist in warping up.
 We were soon in the midst of the rapids, which were more swift and
 tumultuous than any we had poled up, and had turned to the side of the
 stream for the purpose of warping, when the boatmen, who felt some
 pride in their skill, and were ambitious to do something more than
 usual, for my benefit, as I surmised, took one more view of the
 rapids, or rather the falls; and, in answer to our question, whether
 we couldn't get up there, the other answered that he guessed he'd try
 it. So we pushed again into the midst of the stream, and began to
 struggle with the current. I sat in the middle of the boat to trim it,
 moving slightly to the right or left as it grazed a rock. With an
 uncertain and wavering motion we wound and bolted our way up, until
 the bow was actually raised two feet above the stern at the steepest
 pitch; and then, when everything depended upon his exertions, the
 bowman's pole snapped in two; but before he had time to take the spare
 one, which I reached him, he had saved himself with the fragment upon
 a rock; and so we got up by a hair's breadth; and Uncle George
 exclaimed that that was never done before, and he had not tried it if
 he had not known whom he had got in the bow, nor he in the bow, if he
 had not known him in the stern. At this place there was a regular
 portage cut through the woods, and our boatmen had never known a
 batteau to ascend the falls. As near as I can remember, there was a
 perpendicular fall here, at the worst place of the whole Penobscot
 River, two or three feet at least. I could not sufficiently admire the
 skill and coolness with which they performed this feat, never speaking
 to each other. The bowman, not looking behind, but knowing exactly
 what the other is about, works as if he worked alone. Now sounding in
 vain for a bottom in fifteen feet of water, while the boat falls back
 several rods, held straight only with the greatest skill and exertion;
 or, while the sternman obstinately holds his ground, like a turtle,
 the bowman springs from side to side with wonderful suppleness and
 dexterity, scanning the rapids and the rocks with a thousand eyes; and
 now, having got a bite at last, with a lusty shove, which makes his
 pole bend and quiver, and the whole boat tremble, he gains a few feet
 upon the river. To add to the danger, the poles are liable at any time
 to be caught between the rocks, and wrenched out of their hands,
 leaving them at the mercy of the rapids,--the rocks, as it were, lying
 in wait, like so many alligators, to catch them in their teeth, and
 jerk them from your hands, before you have stolen an effectual shove
 against their palates. The pole is set close to the boat, and the prow
 is made to overshoot, and just turn the corners of the rocks, in the
 very teeth of the rapids. Nothing but the length and lightness, and
 the slight draught of the batteau, enables them to make any headway.
 The bowman must quickly choose his course; there is no time to
 deliberate. Frequently the boat is shoved between rocks where both
 sides touch, and the waters on either hand are a perfect maelstrom.
 
 Half a mile above this two of us tried our hands at poling up a slight
 rapid; and we were just surmounting the last difficulty, when an
 unlucky rock confounded our calculations; and while the batteau was
 sweeping round irrecoverably amid the whirlpool, we were obliged to
 resign the poles to more skillful hands.
 
 Katepskonegan is one of the shallowest and weediest of the lakes, and
 looked as if it might abound in pickerel. The falls of the same name,
 where we stopped to dine, are considerable and quite picturesque. Here
 Uncle George had seen trout caught by the barrelful; but they would
 not rise to our bait at this hour. Halfway over this carry, thus far
 in the Maine wilderness on its way to the Provinces, we noticed a
 large, flaming, Oak Hall handbill, about two feet long, wrapped round
 the trunk of a pine, from which the bark had been stripped, and to
 which it was fast glued by the pitch. This should be recorded among
 the advantages of this mode of advertising, that so, possibly, even
 the bears and wolves, moose, deer, otter, and beaver, not to mention
 the Indian, may learn where they can fit themselves according to the
 latest fashion, or, at least, recover some of their own lost garments.
 We christened this the Oak Hall carry.
 
 The forenoon was as serene and placid on this wild stream in the
 woods, as we are apt to imagine that Sunday in summer usually is in
 Massachusetts. We were occasionally startled by the scream of a bald
 eagle, sailing over the stream in front of our batteau; or of the fish
 hawks on whom he levies his contributions. There were, at intervals,
 small meadows of a few acres on the sides of the stream, waving with
 uncut grass, which attracted the attention of our boatmen, who
 regretted that they were not nearer to their clearings, and calculated
 how many stacks they might cut. Two or three men sometimes spend the
 summer by themselves, cutting the grass in these meadows, to sell to
 the loggers in the winter, since it will fetch a higher price on the
 spot than in any market in the State. On a small isle, covered with
 this kind of rush, or cut-grass, on which we landed to consult about
 our further course, we noticed the recent track of a moose, a large,
 roundish hole in the soft, wet ground, evincing the great size and
 weight of the animal that made it. They are fond of the water, and
 visit all these island meadows, swimming as easily from island to
 island as they make their way through the thickets on land. Now and
 then we passed what McCauslin called a pokelogan, an Indian term for
 what the drivers might have reason to call a poke-logs-in, an inlet
 that leads nowhere. If you get in, you have got to get out again the
 same way. These, and the frequent "runrounds" which come into the
 river again, would embarrass an inexperienced voyager not a little.
 
 The carry around Pockwockomus Falls was exceedingly rough and rocky,
 the batteau having to be lifted directly from the water up four or
 five feet on to a rock, and launched again down a similar bank. The
 rocks on this portage were covered with the _dents_ made by the spikes
 in the lumberers' boots while staggering over under the weight of
 their batteaux; and you could see where the surface of some large
 rocks on which they had rested their batteaux was worn quite smooth
 with use. As it was, we had carried over but half the usual portage at
 this place for this stage of the water, and launched our boat in the
 smooth wave just curving to the fall, prepared to struggle with the
 most violent rapid we had to encounter. The rest of the party walked
 over the remainder of the portage, while I remained with the boatmen
 to assist in warping up. One had to hold the boat while the others got
 in to prevent it from going over the falls. When we had pushed up the
 rapids as far as possible, keeping close to the shore, Tom seized the
 painter and leaped out upon a rock just visible in the water, but he
 lost his footing, notwithstanding his spiked boots, and was instantly
 amid the rapids; but recovering himself by good luck, and reaching
 another rock, he passed the painter to me, who had followed him, and
 took his place again in the bows. Leaping from rock to rock in the
 shoal water, close to the shore, and now and then getting a bite with
 the rope round an upright one, I held the boat while one reset his
 pole, and then all three forced it upward against any rapid. This was
 "warping up." When a part of us walked round at such a place, we
 generally took the precaution to take out the most valuable part of
 the baggage for fear of being swamped.
 
 As we poled up a swift rapid for half a mile above Aboljacarmegus
 Falls, some of the party read their own marks on the huge logs which
 lay piled up high and dry on the rocks on either hand, the relics
 probably of a jam which had taken place here in the Great Freshet in
 the spring. Many of these would have to wait for another great
 freshet, perchance, if they lasted so long, before they could be got
 off. It was singular enough to meet with property of theirs which they
 had never seen, and where they had never been before, thus detained by
 freshets and rocks when on its way to them. Methinks that must be
 where all my property lies, cast up on the rocks on some distant and
 unexplored stream, and waiting for an unheard-of freshet to fetch it
 down. O make haste, ye gods, with your winds and rains, and start the
 jam before it rots!
 
 The last half mile carried us to the Sowadnehunk Deadwater, so called
 from the stream of the same name, signifying "running between
 mountains," an important tributary which comes in a mile above. Here
 we decided to camp, about twenty miles from the Dam, at the mouth of
 Murch Brook and the Aboljacknagesic, mountain streams, broad off from
 Ktaadn, and about a dozen miles from its summit, having made fifteen
 miles this day.
 
 We had been told by McCauslin that we should here find trout enough;
 so, while some prepared the camp, the rest fell to fishing. Seizing
 the birch poles which some party of Indians, or white hunters, had
 left on the shore, and baiting our hooks with pork, and with trout,
 as soon as they were caught, we cast our lines into the mouth of the
 Aboljacknagesic, a clear, swift, shallow stream, which came in from
 Ktaadn. Instantly a shoal of white chivin (_Leuciscus pulchellus_),
 silvery roaches, cousin-trout, or what not, large and small, prowling
 thereabouts, fell upon our bait, and one after another were landed
 amidst the bushes. Anon their cousins, the true trout, took their
 turn, and alternately the speckled trout, and the silvery roaches,
 swallowed the bait as fast as we could throw in; and the finest
 specimens of both that I have ever seen, the largest one weighing
 three pounds, were heaved upon the shore, though at first in vain, to
 wriggle down into the water again, for we stood in the boat; but soon
 we learned to remedy this evil; for one, who had lost his hook, stood
 on shore to catch them as they fell in a perfect shower around
 him,--sometimes, wet and slippery, full in his face and bosom, as his
 arms were outstretched to receive them. While yet alive, before their
 tints had faded, they glistened like the fairest flowers, the product
 of primitive rivers; and he could hardly trust his senses, as he stood
 over them, that these jewels should have swam away in that
 Aboljacknagesic water for so long, so many dark ages;--these bright
 fluviatile flowers, seen of Indians only, made beautiful, the Lord
 only knows why, to swim there! I could understand better for this, the
 truth of mythology, the fables of Proteus, and all those beautiful
 sea-monsters,--how all history, indeed, put to a terrestrial use, is
 mere history; but put to a celestial, is mythology always.
 
 But there is the rough voice of Uncle George, who commands at the
 frying-pan, to send over what you've got, and then you may stay till
 morning. The pork sizzles and cries for fish. Luckily for the foolish
 race, and this particularly foolish generation of trout, the night
 shut down at last, not a little deepened by the dark side of Ktaadn,
 which, like a permanent shadow, reared itself from the eastern bank.
 Lescarbot, writing in 1609, tells us that the Sieur Champdore, who,
 with one of the people of the Sieur de Monts, ascended some fifty
 leagues up the St. John in 1608, found the fish so plenty, "qu'en
 mettant la chaudiere sur le feu ils en avoient pris suffisamment pour
 eux disner avant que l'eau fust chaude." Their descendants here are no
 less numerous. So we accompanied Tom into the woods to cut cedar twigs
 for our bed. While he went ahead with the axe and lopped off the
 smallest twigs of the flat-leaved cedar, the arbor-vitae of the
 gardens, we gathered them up, and returned with them to the boat,
 until it was loaded. Our bed was made with as much care and skill as a
 roof is shingled; beginning at the foot, and laying the twig end of
 the cedar upward, we advanced to the head, a course at a time, thus
 successively covering the stub-ends, and producing a soft and level
 bed. For us six it was about ten feet long by six in breadth. This
 time we lay under our tent, having pitched it more prudently with
 reference to the wind and the flame, and the usual huge fire blazed in
 front. Supper was eaten off a large log, which some freshet had thrown
 up. This night we had a dish of arbor-vitae or cedar tea, which the
 lumberer sometimes uses when other herbs fail,--
 
      "A quart of arbor-vitae,
      To make him strong and mighty,"--
 
 but I had no wish to repeat the experiment. It had too medicinal a
 taste for my palate. There was the skeleton of a moose here, whose
 bones some Indian hunters had picked on this very spot.
 
 In the night I dreamed of trout-fishing; and, when at length I awoke,
 it seemed a fable that this painted fish swam there so near my couch,
 and rose to our hooks the last evening, and I doubted if I had not
 dreamed it all. So I arose before dawn to test its truth, while my
 companions were still sleeping. There stood Ktaadn with distinct and
 cloudless outline in the moonlight; and the rippling of the rapids was
 the only sound to break the stillness. Standing on the shore, I once
 more cast my line into the stream, and found the dream to be real and
 the fable true. The speckled trout and silvery roach, like
 flying-fish, sped swiftly through the moonlight air, describing bright
 arcs on the dark side of Ktaadn, until moonlight, now fading into
 daylight, brought satiety to my mind, and the minds of my companions,
 who had joined me.
 
 By six o'clock, having mounted our packs and a good blanketful of
 trout, ready dressed, and swung up such baggage and provision as we
 wished to leave behind upon the tops of saplings, to be out of the
 reach of bears, we started for the summit of the mountain, distant, as
 Uncle George said the boatmen called it, about four miles, but as I
 judged, and as it proved, nearer fourteen. He had never been any
 nearer the mountain than this, and there was not the slightest trace
 of man to guide us farther in this direction. At first, pushing a few
 rods up the Aboljacknagesic, or "open-land stream," we fastened our
 batteau to a tree, and traveled up the north side, through burnt
 lands, now partially overgrown with young aspens and other shrubbery;
 but soon, recrossing this stream, where it was about fifty or sixty
 feet wide, upon a jam of logs and rocks,--and you could cross it by
 this means almost anywhere,--we struck at once for the highest peak,
 over a mile or more of comparatively open land, still very gradually
 ascending the while. Here it fell to my lot, as the oldest
 mountain-climber, to take the lead. So, scanning the woody side of the
 mountain, which lay still at an indefinite distance, stretched out
 some seven or eight miles in length before us, we determined to steer
 directly for the base of the highest peak, leaving a large slide, by
 which, as I have since learned, some of our predecessors ascended, on
 our left. This course would lead us parallel to a dark seam in the
 forest, which marked the bed of a torrent, and over a slight spur,
 which extended southward from the main mountain, from whose bare
 summit we could get an outlook over the country, and climb directly up
 the peak, which would then be close at hand. Seen from this point, a
 bare ridge at the extremity of the open land, Ktaadn presented a
 different aspect from any mountain I have seen, there being a greater
 proportion of naked rock rising abruptly from the forest; and we
 looked up at this blue barrier as if it were some fragment of a wall
 which anciently bounded the earth in that direction. Setting the
 compass for a northeast course, which was the bearing of the southern
 base of the highest peak, we were soon buried in the woods.
 
 We soon began to meet with traces of bears and moose, and those of
 rabbits were everywhere visible. The tracks of moose, more or less
 recent, to speak literally, covered every square rod on the sides of
 the mountain; and these animals are probably more numerous there now
 than ever before, being driven into this wilderness, from all sides,
 by the settlements. The track of a full-grown moose is like that of a
 cow, or larger, and of the young, like that of a calf. Sometimes we
 found ourselves traveling in faint paths, which they had made, like
 cow-paths in the woods, only far more indistinct, being rather
 openings, affording imperfect vistas through the dense underwood, than
 trodden paths; and everywhere the twigs had been browsed by them,
 clipped as smoothly as if by a knife. The bark of trees was stripped
 up by them to the height of eight or nine feet, in long, narrow
 strips, an inch wide, still showing the distinct marks of their teeth.
 We expected nothing less than to meet a herd of them every moment, and
 our Nimrod held his shooting-iron in readiness; but we did not go out
 of our way to look for them, and, though numerous, they are so wary
 that the unskillful hunter might range the forest a long time before
 he could get sight of one. They are sometimes dangerous to encounter,
 and will not turn out for the hunter, but furiously rush upon him and
 trample him to death, unless he is lucky enough to avoid them by dodging
 round a tree. The largest are nearly as large as a horse, and weigh
 sometimes one thousand pounds; and it is said that they can step over a
 five-foot gate in their ordinary walk. They are described as exceedingly
 awkward-looking animals, with their long legs and short bodies, making
 a ludicrous figure when in full run, but making great headway,
 nevertheless. It seemed a mystery to us how they could thread these
 woods, which it required all our suppleness to accomplish,--climbing,
 stooping, and winding, alternately. They are said to drop their long
 and branching horns, which usually spread five or six feet, on their
 backs, and make their way easily by the weight of their bodies. Our
 boatmen said, but I know not with how much truth, that their horns are
 apt to be gnawed away by vermin while they sleep. Their flesh, which
 is more like beef than venison, is common in Bangor market.
 
 We had proceeded on thus seven or eight miles, till about noon, with
 frequent pauses to refresh the weary ones, crossing a considerable
 mountain stream, which we conjectured to be Murch Brook, at whose
 mouth we had camped, all the time in woods, without having once seen
 the summit, and rising very gradually, when the boatmen beginning to
 despair a little, and fearing that we were leaving the mountain on one
 side of us, for they had not entire faith in the compass, McCauslin
 climbed a tree, from the top of which he could see the peak, when it
 appeared that we had not swerved from a right line, the compass down
 below still ranging with his arm, which pointed to the summit. By the
 side of a cool mountain rill, amid the woods, where the water began to
 partake of the purity and transparency of the air, we stopped to cook
 some of our fishes, which we had brought thus far in order to save
 our hard-bread and pork, in the use of which we had put ourselves on
 short allowance. We soon had a fire blazing, and stood around it,
 under the damp and sombre forest of firs and birches, each with a
 sharpened stick, three or four feet in length, upon which he had
 spitted his trout, or roach, previously well gashed and salted, our
 sticks radiating like the spokes of a wheel from one centre, and each
 crowding his particular fish into the most desirable exposure, not
 with the truest regard always to his neighbor's rights. Thus we
 regaled ourselves, drinking meanwhile at the spring, till one man's
 pack, at least, was considerably lightened, when we again took up our
 line of march.
 
 At length we reached an elevation sufficiently bare to afford a view
 of the summit, still distant and blue, almost as if retreating from
 us. A torrent, which proved to be the same we had crossed, was seen
 tumbling down in front, literally from out of the clouds. But this
 glimpse at our whereabouts was soon lost, and we were buried in the
 woods again. The wood was chiefly yellow birch, spruce, fir,
 mountain-ash, or round-wood, as the Maine people call it, and
 moose-wood. It was the worst kind of traveling; sometimes like the
 densest scrub oak patches with us. The cornel, or bunch-berries, were
 very abundant, as well as Solomon's-seal and moose-berries.
 Blueberries were distributed along our whole route; and in one place
 the bushes were drooping with the weight of the fruit, still as fresh
 as ever. It was the 7th of September. Such patches afforded a grateful
 repast, and served to bait the tired party forward. When any lagged
 behind, the cry of "blueberries" was most effectual to bring them up.
 Even at this elevation we passed through a moose-yard, formed by a
 large flat rock, four or five rods square, where they tread down the
 snow in winter. At length, fearing that if we held the direct course
 to the summit, we should not find any water near our camping-ground,
 we gradually swerved to the west, till, at four o'clock, we struck
 again the torrent which I have mentioned, and here, in view of the
 summit, the weary party decided to camp that night.
 
 While my companions were seeking a suitable spot for this purpose, I
 improved the little daylight that was left in climbing the mountain
 alone. We were in a deep and narrow ravine, sloping up to the clouds,
 at an angle of nearly forty-five degrees, and hemmed in by walls of
 rock, which were at first covered with low trees, then with
 impenetrable thickets of scraggy birches and spruce trees, and with
 moss, but at last bare of all vegetation but lichens, and almost
 continually draped in clouds. Following up the course of the torrent
 which occupied this,--and I mean to lay some emphasis on this word
 _up_,--pulling myself up by the side of perpendicular falls of twenty
 or thirty feet, by the roots of firs and birches, and then, perhaps,
 walking a level rod or two in the thin stream, for it took up the
 whole road, ascending by huge steps, as it were, a giant's stairway,
 down which a river flowed, I had soon cleared the trees, and paused on
 the successive shelves, to look back over the country. The torrent was
 from fifteen to thirty feet wide, without a tributary, and seemingly
 not diminishing in breadth as I advanced; but still it came rushing
 and roaring down, with a copious tide, over and amidst masses of bare
 rock, from the very clouds, as though a waterspout had just burst over
 the mountain. Leaving this at last, I began to work my way, scarcely
 less arduous than Satan's anciently through Chaos, up the nearest
 though not the highest peak. At first scrambling on all fours over the
 tops of ancient black spruce trees (_Abies nigra_), old as the flood,
 from two to ten or twelve feet in height, their tops flat and
 spreading, and their foliage blue, and nipped with cold, as if for
 centuries they had ceased growing upward against the bleak sky, the
 solid cold. I walked some good rods erect upon the tops of these
 trees, which were overgrown with moss and mountain cranberries. It
 seemed that in the course of time they had filled up the intervals
 between the huge rocks, and the cold wind had uniformly leveled all
 over. Here the principle of vegetation was hard put to it. There was
 apparently a belt of this kind running quite round the mountain,
 though, perhaps, nowhere so remarkable as here. Once, slumping
 through, I looked down ten feet, into a dark and cavernous region, and
 saw the stem of a spruce, on whose top I stood, as on a mass of coarse
 basket-work, fully nine inches in diameter at the ground. These holes
 were bears' dens, and the bears were even then at home. This was the
 sort of garden I made my way _over_, for an eighth of a mile, at the
 risk, it is true, of treading on some of the plants, not seeing any
 path _through_ it,--certainly the most treacherous and porous country
 I ever traveled.
 
                      "Nigh foundered on he fares,
      Treading the crude consistence, half on foot,
      Half flying,"
 
 But nothing could exceed the toughness of the twigs,--not one snapped
 under my weight, for they had slowly grown. Having slumped, scrambled,
 rolled, bounced, and walked, by turns, over this scraggy country, I
 arrived upon a side-hill, or rather side-mountain, where rocks, gray,
 silent rocks, were the flocks and herds that pastured, chewing a rocky
 cud at sunset. They looked at me with hard gray eyes, without a bleat
 or a low. This brought me to the skirt of a cloud, and bounded my walk
 that night. But I had already seen that Maine country when I turned
 about, waving, flowing, rippling, down below.
 
 When I returned to my companions, they had selected a camping-ground
 on the torrent's edge, and were resting on the ground; one was on the
 sick list, rolled in a blanket, on a damp shelf of rock. It was a
 savage and dreary scenery enough, so wildly rough, that they looked
 long to find a level and open space for the tent. We could not well
 camp higher, for want of fuel; and the trees here seemed so evergreen
 and sappy, that we almost doubted if they would acknowledge the
 influence of fire; but fire prevailed at last, and blazed here, too,
 like a good citizen of the world. Even at this height we met with
 frequent traces of moose, as well as of bears. As here was no cedar,
 we made our bed of coarser feathered spruce; but at any rate the
 feathers were plucked from the live tree. It was, perhaps, even a more
 grand and desolate place for a night's lodging than the summit would
 have been, being in the neighborhood of those wild trees, and of the
 torrent. Some more aerial and finer-spirited winds rushed and roared
 through the ravine all night, from time to time arousing our fire, and
 dispersing the embers about. It was as if we lay in the very nest of a
 young whirlwind. At midnight, one of my bed-fellows, being startled in
 his dreams by the sudden blazing up to its top of a fir tree, whose
 green boughs were dried by the heat, sprang up, with a cry, from his
 bed, thinking the world on fire, and drew the whole camp after him.
 
 In the morning, after whetting our appetite on some raw pork, a wafer
 of hard-bread, and a dipper of condensed cloud or waterspout, we all
 together began to make our way up the falls, which I have described;
 this time choosing the right hand, or highest peak, which was not the
 one I had approached before. But soon my companions were lost to my
 sight behind the mountain ridge in my rear, which still seemed ever
 retreating before me, and I climbed alone over huge rocks, loosely
 poised, a mile or more, still edging toward the clouds; for though the
 day was clear elsewhere, the summit was concealed by mist. The
 mountain seemed a vast aggregation of loose rocks, as if some time it
 had rained rocks, and they lay as they fell on the mountain sides,
 nowhere fairly at rest, but leaning on each other, all rocking stones,
 with cavities between, but scarcely any soil or smoother shelf. They
 were the raw materials of a planet dropped from an unseen quarry,
 which the vast chemistry of nature would anon work up, or work down,
 into the smiling and verdant plains and valleys of earth. This was an
 undone extremity of the globe; as in lignite we see coal in the
 process of formation.
 
 At length I entered within the skirts of the cloud which seemed
 forever drifting over the summit, and yet would never be gone, but was
 generated out of that pure air as fast as it flowed away; and when, a
 quarter of a mile farther, I reached the summit of the ridge, which
 those who have seen in clearer weather say is about five miles long,
 and contains a thousand acres of table-land, I was deep within the
 hostile ranks of clouds, and all objects were obscured by them. Now
 the wind would blow me out a yard of clear sunlight, wherein I stood;
 then a gray, dawning light was all it could accomplish, the cloud-line
 ever rising and falling with the wind's intensity. Sometimes it seemed
 as if the summit would be cleared in a few moments, and smile in
 sunshine; but what was gained on one side was lost on another. It was
 like sitting in a chimney and waiting for the smoke to blow away. It
 was, in fact, a cloud-factory,--these were the cloud-works, and the
 wind turned them off done from the cool, bare rocks. Occasionally,
 when the windy columns broke in to me, I caught sight of a dark, damp
 crag to the right or left; the mist driving ceaselessly between it and
 me. It reminded me of the creations of the old epic and dramatic
 poets, of Atlas, Vulcan, the Cyclops, and Prometheus. Such was
 Caucasus and the rock where Prometheus was bound. Aeschylus had no
 doubt visited such scenery as this. It was vast, Titanic, and such as
 man never inhabits. Some part of the beholder, even some vital part,
 seems to escape through the loose grating of his ribs as he ascends.
 He is more lone than you can imagine. There is less of substantial
 thought and fair understanding in him than in the plains where men
 inhabit. His reason is dispersed and shadowy, more thin and subtile,
 like the air. Vast, Titanic, inhuman Nature has got him at
 disadvantage, caught him alone, and pilfers him of some of his divine
 faculty. She does not smile on him as in the plains. She seems to say
 sternly, Why came ye here before your time. This ground is not
 prepared for you. Is it not enough that I smile in the valleys? I have
 never made this soil for thy feet, this air for thy breathing, these
 rocks for thy neighbors. I cannot pity nor fondle thee here, but
 forever relentlessly drive thee hence to where I _am_ kind. Why seek
 me where I have not called thee, and then complain because you find me
 but a stepmother? Shouldst thou freeze or starve, or shudder thy life
 away, here is no shrine, nor altar, nor any access to my ear.
 
      "Chaos and ancient Night, I come no spy
      With purpose to explore or to disturb
      The secrets of your realm, but ...
      .    .    .    .    .    .    as my way
      Lies through your spacious empire up to light."
 
 The tops of mountains are among the unfinished parts of the globe,
 whither it is a slight insult to the gods to climb and pry into their
 secrets, and try their effect on our humanity. Only daring and
 insolent men, perchance, go there. Simple races, as savages, do not
 climb mountains,--their tops are sacred and mysterious tracts never
 visited by them. Pomola is always angry with those who climb to the
 summit of Ktaadn.
 
 According to Jackson, who, in his capacity of geological surveyor of
 the State, has accurately measured it, the altitude of Ktaadn is 5300
 feet, or a little more than one mile above the level of the sea, and
 he adds, "It is then evidently the highest point in the State of
 Maine, and is the most abrupt granite mountain in New England." The
 peculiarities of that spacious table-land on which I was standing, as
 well as the remarkable semicircular precipice or basin on the eastern
 side, were all concealed by the mist. I had brought my whole pack to
 the top, not knowing but I should have to make my descent to the
 river, and possibly to the settled portion of the State alone, and by
 some other route, and wishing to have a complete outfit with me. But
 at length fearing that my companions would be anxious to reach the
 river before night, and knowing that the clouds might rest on the
 mountain for days, I was compelled to descend. Occasionally, as I came
 down, the wind would blow me a vista open, through which I could see
 the country eastward, boundless forests, and lakes, and streams,
 gleaming in the sun, some of them emptying into the East Branch. There
 were also new mountains in sight in that direction. Now and then some
 small bird of the sparrow family would flit away before me, unable to
 command its course, like a fragment of the gray rock blown off by the
 wind.
 
 I found my companions where I had left them, on the side of the peak,
 gathering the mountain cranberries, which filled every crevice between
 the rocks, together with blueberries, which had a spicier flavor the
 higher up they grew, but were not the less agreeable to our palates.
 When the country is settled, and roads are made, these cranberries
 will perhaps become an article of commerce. From this elevation, just
 on the skirts of the clouds, we could overlook the country, west and
 south, for a hundred miles. There it was, the State of Maine, which we
 had seen on the map, but not much like that,--immeasurable forest for
 the sun to shine on, that eastern _stuff_ we hear of in Massachusetts.
 No clearing, no house. It did not look as if a solitary traveler had
 cut so much as a walking-stick there. Countless lakes,--Moosehead in
 the southwest, forty miles long by ten wide, like a gleaming silver
 platter at the end of the table; Chesuncook, eighteen long by three
 wide, without an island; Millinocket, on the south, with its hundred
 islands; and a hundred others without a name; and mountains, also,
 whose names, for the most part, are known only to the Indians. The
 forest looked like a firm grass sward, and the effect of these lakes
 in its midst has been well compared, by one who has since visited this
 same spot, to that of a "mirror broken into a thousand fragments, and
 wildly scattered over the grass, reflecting the full blaze of the
 sun." It was a large farm for somebody, when cleared. According to the
 Gazetteer, which was printed before the boundary question was settled,
 this single Penobscot County, in which we were, was larger than the
 whole State of Vermont, with its fourteen counties; and this was only
 a part of the wild lands of Maine. We are concerned now, however,
 about natural, not political limits. We were about eighty miles, as
 the bird flies, from Bangor, or one hundred and fifteen, as we had
 ridden, and walked, and paddled. We had to console ourselves with the
 reflection that this view was probably as good as that from the peak,
 as far as it went; and what were a mountain without its attendant
 clouds and mists? Like ourselves, neither Bailey nor Jackson had
 obtained a clear view from the summit.
 
 Setting out on our return to the river, still at an early hour in the
 day, we decided to follow the course of the torrent, which we supposed
 to be Murch Brook, as long as it would not lead us too far out of our
 way. We thus traveled about four miles in the very torrent itself,
 continually crossing and recrossing it, leaping from rock to rock, and
 jumping with the stream down falls of seven or eight feet, or
 sometimes sliding down on our backs in a thin sheet of water. This
 ravine had been the scene of an extraordinary freshet in the spring,
 apparently accompanied by a slide from the mountain. It must have been
 filled with a stream of stones and water, at least twenty feet above
 the present level of the torrent. For a rod or two, on either side of
 its channel, the trees were barked and splintered up to their tops,
 the birches bent over, twisted, and sometimes finely split, like a
 stable-broom; some, a foot in diameter, snapped off, and whole clumps
 of trees bent over with the weight of rocks piled on them. In one
 place we noticed a rock, two or three feet in diameter, lodged nearly
 twenty feet high in the crotch of a tree. For the whole four miles we
 saw but one rill emptying in, and the volume of water did not seem to
 be increased from the first. We traveled thus very rapidly with a
 downward impetus, and grew remarkably expert at leaping from rock to
 rock, for leap we must, and leap we did, whether there was any rock at
 the right distance or not. It was a pleasant picture when the foremost
 turned about and looked up the winding ravine, walled in with rocks
 and the green forest, to see, at intervals of a rod or two, a
 red-shirted or green-jacketed mountaineer against the white torrent,
 leaping down the channel with his pack on his back, or pausing upon a
 convenient rock in the midst of the torrent to mend a rent in his
 clothes, or unstrap the dipper at his belt to take a draught of the
 water. At one place we were startled by seeing, on a little sandy
 shelf by the side of the stream, the fresh print of a man's foot, and
 for a moment realized how Robinson Crusoe felt in a similar case; but
 at last we remembered that we had struck this stream on our way up,
 though we could not have told where, and one had descended into the
 ravine for a drink. The cool air above and the continual bathing of
 our bodies in mountain water, alternate foot, sitz, douche, and plunge
 baths, made this walk exceedingly refreshing, and we had traveled only
 a mile or two, after leaving the torrent, before every thread of our
 clothes was as dry as usual, owing perhaps to a peculiar quality in
 the atmosphere.
 
 After leaving the torrent, being in doubt about our course, Tom threw
 down his pack at the foot of the loftiest spruce tree at hand, and
 shinned up the bare trunk some twenty feet, and then climbed through
 the green tower, lost to our sight, until he held the topmost spray
 in his hand.[5] McCauslin, in his younger days, had marched through
 the wilderness with a body of troops, under General Somebody, and with
 one other man did all the scouting and spying service. The General's
 word was, "Throw down the top of that tree," and there was no tree in
 the Maine woods so high that it did not lose its top in such a case. I
 have heard a story of two men being lost once in these woods, nearer
 to the settlements than this, who climbed the loftiest pine they could
 find, some six feet in diameter at the ground, from whose top they
 discovered a solitary clearing and its smoke. When at this height,
 some two hundred feet from the ground, one of them became dizzy, and
 fainted in his companion's arms, and the latter had to accomplish the
 descent with him, alternately fainting and reviving, as best he could.
 To Tom we cried, "Where away does the summit bear? where the burnt
 lands?" The last he could only conjecture; he descried, however, a
 little meadow and pond, lying probably in our course, which we
 concluded to steer for. On reaching this secluded meadow, we found
 fresh tracks of moose on the shore of the pond, and the water was
 still unsettled as if they had fled before us. A little farther, in a
 dense thicket, we seemed to be still on their trail. It was a small
 meadow, of a few acres, on the mountain-side, concealed by the forest,
 and perhaps never seen by a white man before, where one would think
 that the moose might browse and bathe, and rest in peace. Pursuing
 this course, we soon reached the open land, which went sloping down
 some miles toward the Penobscot.
 
 Perhaps I most fully realized that this was primeval, untamed, and
 forever untamable _Nature_, or whatever else men call it, while coming
 down this part of the mountain. We were passing over "Burnt Lands,"
 burnt by lightning, perchance, though they showed no recent marks of
 fire, hardly so much as a charred stump, but looked rather like a
 natural pasture for the moose and deer, exceedingly wild and desolate,
 with occasional strips of timber crossing them, and low poplars
 springing up, and patches of blueberries here and there. I found
 myself traversing them familiarly, like some pasture run to waste, or
 partially reclaimed by man; but when I reflected what man, what
 brother or sister or kinsman of our race made it and claimed it, I
 expected the proprietor to rise up and dispute my passage. It is
 difficult to conceive of a region uninhabited by man. We habitually
 presume his presence and influence everywhere. And yet we have not
 seen pure Nature, unless we have seen her thus vast and drear and
 inhuman, though in the midst of cities. Nature was here something
 savage and awful, though beautiful. I looked with awe at the ground I
 trod on, to see what the Powers had made there, the form and fashion
 and material of their work. This was that Earth of which we have
 heard, made out of Chaos and Old Night. Here was no man's garden, but
 the unhandseled globe. It was not lawn, nor pasture, nor mead, nor
 woodland, nor lea, nor arable, nor waste land. It was the fresh and
 natural surface of the planet Earth, as it was made forever and
 ever,--to be the dwelling of man, we say,--so Nature made it, and man
 may use it if he can. Man was not to be associated with it. It was
 Matter, vast, terrific,--not his Mother Earth that we have heard of,
 not for him to tread on, or be buried in,--no, it were being too
 familiar even to let his bones lie there,--the home, this, of
 Necessity and Fate. There was clearly felt the presence of a force not
 bound to be kind to man. It was a place for heathenism and
 superstitious rites,--to be inhabited by men nearer of kin to the
 rocks and to wild animals than we. We walked over it with a certain
 awe, stopping, from time to time, to pick the blueberries which grew
 there, and had a smart and spicy taste. Perchance where _our_ wild
 pines stand, and leaves lie on their forest floor, in Concord, there
 were once reapers, and husbandmen planted grain; but here not even the
 surface had been scarred by man, but it was a specimen of what God saw
 fit to make this world. What is it to be admitted to a museum, to see
 a myriad of particular things, compared with being shown some star's
 surface, some hard matter in its home! I stand in awe of my body, this
 matter to which I am bound has become so strange to me. I fear not
 spirits, ghosts, of which I am one,--_that_ my body might,--but I
 fear bodies, I tremble to meet them. What is this Titan that has
 possession of me? Talk of mysteries! Think of our life in
 nature,--daily to be shown matter, to come in contact with it,--rocks,
 trees, wind on our cheeks! the _solid_ earth! the _actual_ world! the
 _common sense!_ _Contact!_ _Contact!_ _Who_ are we? _where_ are we?
 
 Erelong we recognized some rocks and other features in the landscape
 which we had purposely impressed on our memories, and, quickening our
 pace, by two o'clock we reached the batteau.[6] Here we had expected
 to dine on trout, but in this glaring sunlight they were slow to take
 the bait, so we were compelled to make the most of the crumbs of our
 hard-bread and our pork, which were both nearly exhausted. Meanwhile
 we deliberated whether we should go up the river a mile farther, to
 Gibson's clearing, on the Sowadnehunk, where there was a deserted log
 hut, in order to get a half-inch auger, to mend one of our spike-poles
 with. There were young spruce trees enough around us, and we had a
 spare spike, but nothing to make a hole with. But as it was uncertain
 whether we should find any tools left there, we patched up the broken
 pole, as well as we could, for the downward voyage, in which there
 would be but little use for it. Moreover, we were unwilling to lose
 any time in this expedition, lest the wind should rise before we
 reached the larger lakes, and detain us; for a moderate wind produces
 quite a sea on these waters, in which a batteau will not live for a
 moment; and on one occasion McCauslin had been delayed a week at the
 head of the North Twin, which is only four miles across. We were
 nearly out of provisions, and ill prepared in this respect for what
 might possibly prove a week's journey round by the shore, fording
 innumerable streams, and threading a trackless forest, should any
 accident happen to our boat.
 
 It was with regret that we turned our backs on Chesuncook, which
 McCauslin had formerly logged on, and the Allegash lakes. There were
 still longer rapids and portages above; among the last the Ripogenus
 Portage, which he described as the most difficult on the river, and
 three miles long. The whole length of the Penobscot is two hundred and
 seventy-five miles, and we are still nearly one hundred miles from its
 source. Hodge, the Assistant State Geologist, passed up this river in
 1837, and by a portage of only one mile and three quarters crossed
 over into the Allegash, and so went down that into the St. John, and
 up the Madawaska to the Grand Portage across to the St. Lawrence. His
 is the only account that I know of an expedition through to Canada in
 this direction. He thus describes his first sight of the latter river,
 which, to compare small things with great, is like Balboa's first
 sight of the Pacific from the mountains of the Isthmus of Darien.
 "When we first came in sight of the St. Lawrence," he says, "from the
 top of a high hill, the view was most striking, and much more
 interesting to me from having been shut up in the woods for the two
 previous months. Directly before us lay the broad river, extending
 across nine or ten miles, its surface broken by a few islands and
 reefs, and two ships riding at anchor near the shore. Beyond, extended
 ranges of uncultivated hills, parallel with the river. The sun was
 just going down behind them, and gilding the whole scene with its
 parting rays."
 
 About four o'clock, the same afternoon, we commenced our return
 voyage, which would require but little if any poling. In shooting
 rapids the boatmen use large and broad paddles, instead of poles, to
 guide the boat with. Though we glided so swiftly, and often smoothly,
 down, where it had cost us no slight effort to get up, our present
 voyage was attended with far more danger; for if we once fairly struck
 one of the thousand rocks by which we were surrounded, the boat would
 be swamped in an instant. When a boat is swamped under these
 circumstances, the boatmen commonly find no difficulty in keeping
 afloat at first, for the current keeps both them and their cargo up
 for a long way down the stream; and if they can swim, they have only
 to work their way gradually to the shore. The greatest danger is of
 being caught in an eddy behind some larger rock, where the water
 rushes up stream faster than elsewhere it does down, and being carried
 round and round under the surface till they are drowned. McCauslin
 pointed out some rocks which had been the scene of a fatal accident of
 this kind. Sometimes the body is not thrown out for several hours. He
 himself had performed such a circuit once, only his legs being visible
 to his companions; but he was fortunately thrown out in season to
 recover his breath.[7] In shooting the rapids, the boatman has this
 problem to solve: to choose a circuitous and safe course amid a
 thousand sunken rocks, scattered over a quarter or half a mile, at the
 same time that he is moving steadily on at the rate of fifteen miles
 an hour. Stop he cannot; the only question is, where will he go? The
 bowman chooses the course with all his eyes about him, striking broad
 off with his paddle, and drawing the boat by main force into her
 course. The sternman faithfully follows the bow.
 
 We were soon at the Aboljacarmegus Falls. Anxious to avoid the delay,
 as well as the labor, of the portage here, our boatmen went forward
 first to reconnoitre, and concluded to let the batteau down the falls,
 carrying the baggage only over the portage. Jumping from rock to rock
 until nearly in the middle of the stream, we were ready to receive the
 boat and let her down over the first fall, some six or seven feet
 perpendicular. The boatmen stand upon the edge of a shelf of rock,
 where the fall is perhaps nine or ten feet perpendicular, in from one
 to two feet of rapid water, one on each side of the boat, and let it
 slide gently over, till the bow is run out ten or twelve feet in the
 air; then, letting it drop squarely, while one holds the painter, the
 other leaps in, and his companion following, they are whirled down
 the rapids to a new fall or to smooth water. In a very few minutes
 they had accomplished a passage in safety, which would be as foolhardy
 for the unskillful to attempt as the descent of Niagara itself. It
 seemed as if it needed only a little familiarity, and a little more
 skill, to navigate down such falls as Niagara itself with safety. At
 any rate, I should not despair of such men in the rapids above Table
 Rock, until I saw them actually go over the falls, so cool, so
 collected, so fertile in resources are they. One might have thought
 that these were falls, and that falls were not to be waded through
 with impunity, like a mud-puddle. There was really danger of their
 losing their sublimity in losing their power to harm us. Familiarity
 breeds contempt. The boatman pauses, perchance, on some shelf beneath
 a table-rock under the fall, standing in some cove of backwater two
 feet deep, and you hear his rough voice come up through the spray,
 coolly giving directions how to launch the boat this time.
 
 Having carried round Pockwockomus Falls, our oars soon brought us to
 the Katepskonegan, or Oak Hall carry, where we decided to camp
 half-way over, leaving our batteau to be carried over in the morning
 on fresh shoulders. One shoulder of each of the boatmen showed a red
 spot as large as one's hand, worn by the batteau on this expedition;
 and this shoulder, as it did all the work, was perceptibly lower than
 its fellow, from long service. Such toil soon wears out the strongest
 constitution. The drivers are accustomed to work in the cold water in
 the spring, rarely ever dry; and if one falls in all over he rarely
 changes his clothes till night, if then, even. One who takes this
 precaution is called by a particular nickname, or is turned off. None
 can lead this life who are not almost amphibious. McCauslin said
 soberly, what is at any rate a good story to tell, that he had seen
 where six men were wholly under water at once, at a jam, with their
 shoulders to handspikes. If the log did not start, then they had to
 put out their heads to breathe. The driver works as long as he can
 see, from dark to dark, and at night has not time to eat his supper
 and dry his clothes fairly, before he is asleep on his cedar bed. We
 lay that night on the very bed made by such a party, stretching our
 tent over the poles which were still standing, but re-shingling the
 damp and faded bed with fresh leaves.
 
 In the morning we carried our boat over and launched it, making haste
 lest the wind should rise. The boatmen ran down Passamagamet, and soon
 after Ambejijis Falls, while we walked round with the baggage. We made
 a hasty breakfast at the head of Ambejijis Lake on the remainder of
 our pork, and were soon rowing across its smooth surface again, under
 a pleasant sky, the mountain being now clear of clouds in the
 northeast. Taking turns at the oars, we shot rapidly across Deep Cove,
 the foot of Pamadumcook, and the North Twin, at the rate of six miles
 an hour, the wind not being high enough to disturb us, and reached the
 Dam at noon. The boatmen went through one of the log sluices in the
 batteau, where the fall was ten feet at the bottom, and took us in
 below. Here was the longest rapid in our voyage, and perhaps the
 running this was as dangerous and arduous a task as any. Shooting down
 sometimes at the rate, as we judged, of fifteen miles an hour, if we
 struck a rock we were split from end to end in an instant. Now like a
 bait bobbing for some river monster, amid the eddies, now darting to
 this side of the stream, now to that, gliding swift and smooth near to
 our destruction, or striking broad off with the paddle and drawing the
 boat to right or left with all our might, in order to avoid a rock. I
 suppose that it was like running the rapids of the Sault Sainte Marie,
 at the outlet of Lake Superior, and our boatmen probably displayed no
 less dexterity than the Indians there do. We soon ran through this
 mile, and floated in Quakish Lake.
 
 After such a voyage, the troubled and angry waters, which once had
 seemed terrible and not to be trifled with, appeared tamed and
 subdued; they had been bearded and worried in their channels, pricked
 and whipped into submission with the spike-pole and paddle, gone
 through and through with impunity, and all their spirit and their
 danger taken out of them, and the most swollen and impetuous rivers
 seemed but playthings henceforth. I began, at length, to understand
 the boatman's familiarity with, and contempt for, the rapids. "Those
 Fowler boys," said Mrs. McCauslin, "are perfect ducks for the water."
 They had run down to Lincoln, according to her, thirty or forty miles,
 in a batteau, in the night, for a doctor, when it was so dark that
 they could not see a rod before them, and the river was swollen so as
 to be almost a continuous rapid, so that the doctor _cried_, when they
 brought him up by daylight, "Why, Tom, how did you see to steer?" "We
 didn't steer much,--only kept her straight." And yet they met with no
 accident. It is true, the more difficult rapids are higher up than
 this.
 
 When we reached the Millinocket opposite to Tom's house, and were
 waiting for his folks to set us over,--for we had left our batteau
 above the Grand Falls,--we discovered two canoes, with two men in
 each, turning up this stream from Shad Pond, one keeping the opposite
 side of a small island before us, while the other approached the side
 where we were standing, examining the banks carefully for muskrats as
 they came along. The last proved to be Louis Neptune and his
 companion, now, at last, on their way up to Chesuncook after moose,
 but they were so disguised that we hardly knew them. At a little
 distance they might have been taken for Quakers, with their
 broad-brimmed hats and overcoats with broad capes, the spoils of
 Bangor, seeking a settlement in this Sylvania,--or, nearer at hand,
 for fashionable gentlemen the morning after a spree. Met face to face,
 these Indians in their native woods looked like the sinister and
 slouching fellows whom you meet picking up strings and paper in the
 streets of a city. There is, in fact, a remarkable and unexpected
 resemblance between the degraded savage and the lowest classes in a
 great city. The one is no more a child of nature than the other. In
 the progress of degradation the distinction of races is soon lost.
 Neptune at first was only anxious to know what we "kill," seeing some
 partridges in the hands of one of the party, but we had assumed too
 much anger to permit of a reply. We thought Indians had some honor
 before. But--"Me been sick. Oh, me unwell now. You make bargain, then
 me go." They had in fact been delayed so long by a drunken frolic at
 the Five Islands, and they had not yet recovered from its effects.
 They had some young musquash in their canoes, which they dug out of
 the banks with a hoe, for food, not for their skins, for musquash are
 their principal food on these expeditions. So they went on up the
 Millinocket, and we kept down the bank of the Penobscot, after
 recruiting ourselves with a draught of Tom's beer, leaving Tom at his
 home.
 
 Thus a man shall lead his life away here on the edge of the
 wilderness, on Indian Millinocket Stream, in a new world, far in the
 dark of a continent, and have a flute to play at evening here, while
 his strains echo to the stars, amid the howling of wolves; shall live,
 as it were, in the primitive age of the world, a primitive man. Yet he
 shall spend a sunny day, and in this century be my contemporary;
 perchance shall read some scattered leaves of literature, and
 sometimes talk with me. Why read history, then, if the ages and the
 generations are now? He lives three thousand years deep into time, an
 age not yet described by poets. Can you well go further back in
 history than this? Ay! ay!--for there turns up but now into the mouth
 of Millinocket Stream a still more ancient and primitive man, whose
 history is not brought down even to the former. In a bark vessel sewn
 with the roots of the spruce, with horn-beam paddles, he dips his way
 along. He is but dim and misty to me, obscured by the aeons that lie
 between the bark canoe and the batteau. He builds no house of logs,
 but a wigwam of skins. He eats no hot bread and sweet cake, but
 musquash and moose meat and the fat of bears. He glides up the
 Millinocket and is lost to my sight, as a more distant and misty cloud
 is seen flitting by behind a nearer, and is lost in space. So he goes
 about his destiny, the red face of man.
 
 After having passed the night, and buttered our boots for the last
 time, at Uncle George's, whose dogs almost devoured him for joy at his
 return, we kept on down the river the next day, about eight miles on
 foot, and then took a batteau, with a man to pole it, to Mattawamkeag,
 ten more. At the middle of that very night, to make a swift conclusion
 to a long story, we dropped our buggy over the half-finished bridge at
 Oldtown, where we heard the confused din and clink of a hundred saws,
 which never rest, and at six o'clock the next morning one of the party
 was steaming his way to Massachusetts.
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
   [Illustration: _Maine Wilderness_]
 
 What is most striking in the Maine wilderness is the continuousness of
 the forest, with fewer open intervals or glades than you had imagined.
 Except the few burnt lands, the narrow intervals on the rivers, the
 bare tops of the high mountains, and the lakes and streams, the forest
 is uninterrupted. It is even more grim and wild than you had
 anticipated, a damp and intricate wilderness, in the spring everywhere
 wet and miry. The aspect of the country, indeed, is universally stern
 and savage, excepting the distant views of the forest from hills, and
 the lake prospects, which are mild and civilizing in a degree. The
 lakes are something which you are unprepared for; they lie up so
 high, exposed to the light, and the forest is diminished to a fine
 fringe on their edges, with here and there a blue mountain, like
 amethyst jewels set around some jewel of the first water,--so
 anterior, so superior, to all the changes that are to take place on
 their shores, even now civil and refined, and fair as they can ever
 be. These are not the artificial forests of an English king,--a royal
 preserve merely. Here prevail no forest laws but those of nature. The
 aborigines have never been dispossessed, nor nature disforested.
 
 It is a country full of evergreen trees, of mossy silver birches and
 watery maples, the ground dotted with insipid small, red berries, and
 strewn with damp and moss-grown rocks,--a country diversified with
 innumerable lakes and rapid streams, peopled with trout and various
 species of _leucisci_, with salmon, shad, and pickerel, and other
 fishes; the forest resounding at rare intervals with the note of the
 chickadee, the blue jay, and the woodpecker, the scream of the fish
 hawk and the eagle, the laugh of the loon, and the whistle of ducks
 along the solitary streams; at night, with the hooting of owls and
 howling of wolves; in summer, swarming with myriads of black flies and
 mosquitoes, more formidable than wolves to the white man. Such is the
 home of the moose, the bear, the caribou, the wolf, the beaver, and
 the Indian. Who shall describe the inexpressible tenderness and
 immortal life of the grim forest, where Nature, though it be
 midwinter, is ever in her spring, where the moss-grown and decaying
 trees are not old, but seem to enjoy a perpetual youth; and blissful,
 innocent Nature, like a serene infant, is too happy to make a noise,
 except by a few tinkling, lisping birds and trickling rills?
 
 What a place to live, what a place to die and be buried in! There
 certainly men would live forever, and laugh at death and the grave.
 There they could have no such thoughts as are associated with the
 village graveyard,--that make a grave out of one of those moist
 evergreen hummocks!
 
      Die and be buried who will,
        I mean to live here still;
      My nature grows ever more young
        The primitive pines among.
 
 I am reminded by my journey how exceedingly new this country still is.
 You have only to travel for a few days into the interior and back
 parts even of many of the old States, to come to that very America
 which the Northmen, and Cabot, and Gosnold, and Smith, and Raleigh
 visited. If Columbus was the first to discover the islands, Americus
 Vespucius and Cabot, and the Puritans, and we their descendants, have
 discovered only the shores of America. While the Republic has already
 acquired a history world-wide, America is still unsettled and
 unexplored. Like the English in New Holland, we live only on the
 shores of a continent even yet, and hardly know where the rivers come
 from which float our navy. The very timber and boards and shingles of
 which our houses are made grew but yesterday in a wilderness where the
 Indian still hunts and the moose runs wild. New York has her
 wilderness within her own borders; and though the sailors of Europe
 are familiar with the soundings of her Hudson, and Fulton long since
 invented the steamboat on its waters, an Indian is still necessary to
 guide her scientific men to its headwaters in the Adirondack country.
 
 Have we even so much as discovered and settled the shores? Let a man
 travel on foot along the coast, from the Passamaquoddy to the Sabine,
 or to the Rio Bravo, or to wherever the end is now, if he is swift
 enough to overtake it, faithfully following the windings of every
 inlet and of every cape, and stepping to the music of the surf,--with
 a desolate fishing town once a week, and a city's port once a month to
 cheer him, and putting up at the lighthouses, when there are any,--and
 tell me if it looks like a discovered and settled country, and not
 rather, for the most part, like a desolate island, and No-Man's Land.
 
 We have advanced by leaps to the Pacific, and left many a lesser
 Oregon and California unexplored behind us. Though the railroad and
 the telegraph have been established on the shores of Maine, the Indian
 still looks out from her interior mountains over all these to the sea.
 There stands the city of Bangor, fifty miles up the Penobscot, at the
 head of navigation for vessels of the largest class, the principal
 lumber depot on this continent, with a population of twelve thousand,
 like a star on the edge of night, still hewing at the forests of which
 it is built, already overflowing with the luxuries and refinement of
 Europe, and sending its vessels to Spain, to England, and to the West
 Indies for its groceries,--and yet only a few axemen have gone "up
 river," into the howling wilderness which feeds it. The bear and deer
 are still found within its limits; and the moose, as he swims the
 Penobscot, is entangled amid its shipping, and taken by foreign
 sailors in its harbor. Twelve miles in the rear, twelve miles of
 railroad, are Orono and the Indian Island, the home of the Penobscot
 tribe, and then commence the batteau and the canoe, and the military
 road; and sixty miles above, the country is virtually unmapped and
 unexplored, and there still waves the virgin forest of the New World.
 
 
 FOOTNOTES:
 
 [1] Springer, in his _Forest Life_ (1851), says that they first remove
 the leaves and turf from the spot where they intend to build a camp,
 for fear of fire; also, that "the spruce-tree is generally selected
 for camp-building, it being light, straight, and quite free from sap;"
 that "the roof is finally covered with the boughs of the fir, spruce,
 and hemlock, so that when the snow falls upon the whole, the warmth of
 the camp is preserved in the coldest weather;" and that they make the
 log seat before the fire, called the "Deacon's Seat," of a spruce or
 fir split in halves, with three or four stout limbs left on one side
 for legs, which are not likely to get loose.
 
 [2] The Canadians call it _picquer de fond_.
 
 [3] Even the Jesuit missionaries, accustomed to the St. Lawrence and
 other rivers of Canada, in their first expeditions to the
 Abenaquinois, speak of rivers _ferrees de rochers_, shod with rocks.
 See also No. 10 _Relations_, for 1647, p. 185.
 
 [4] "A steady current or pitch of water is preferable to one either
 rising or diminishing; as, when rising rapidly, the water at the
 middle of the river is considerably higher than at the shores,--so
 much so as to be distinctly perceived by the eye of a spectator on the
 banks, presenting an appearance like a turnpike road. The lumber,
 therefore, is always sure to incline from the centre of the channel
 toward either shore."--Springer.
 
 [5] "The spruce tree," says Springer in '51, "is generally selected,
 principally for the superior facilities which its numerous limbs
 afford the climber. To gain the first limbs of this tree, which are
 from twenty to forty feet from the ground, a smaller tree is undercut
 and lodged against it, clambering up which the top of the spruce is
 reached. In some cases, when a very elevated position is desired, the
 spruce tree is lodged against the trunk of some lofty pine, up which
 we ascend to a height twice that of the surrounding forest."
 
 To indicate the direction of pines, one throws down a branch, and a
 man on the ground takes the bearing.
 
 [6] The bears had not touched things on our possessions. They
 sometimes tear a batteau to pieces for the sake of the tar with which
 it is besmeared.
 
 [7] I cut this from a newspaper: "On the 11th (instant?) [May, '49],
 on Rappogenes Falls, Mr. John Delantee, of Orono, Me., was drowned
 while running logs. He was a citizen of Orono, and was twenty-six
 years of age. His companions found his body, enclosed it in bark, and
 buried it in the solemn woods."
 
 
 
 
 CHESUNCOOK
 
 
 At five P. M., September 13, 1853, I left Boston, in the steamer, for
 Bangor, by the outside course. It was a warm and still night,--warmer,
 probably, on the water than on the land,--and the sea was as smooth as
 a small lake in summer, merely rippled. The passengers went singing on
 the deck, as in a parlor, till ten o'clock. We passed a vessel on her
 beam-ends on a rock just outside the islands, and some of us thought
 that she was the "rapt ship" which ran
 
                     "on her side so low
      That she drank water, and her keel ploughed air,"
 
 not considering that there was no wind, and that she was under bare
 poles. Now we have left the islands behind and are off Nahant. We
 behold those features which the discoverers saw, apparently unchanged.
 Now we see the Cape Ann lights, and now pass near a small village-like
 fleet of mackerel fishers at anchor, probably off Gloucester. They
 salute us with a shout from their low decks; but I understand their
 "Good-evening" to mean, "Don't run against me, sir." From the wonders
 of the deep we go below to yet deeper sleep. And then the absurdity of
 being waked up in the night by a man who wants the job of blacking
 your boots! It is more inevitable than seasickness, and may have
 something to do with it. It is like the ducking you get on crossing
 the line the first time. I trusted that these old customs were
 abolished. They might with the same propriety insist on blacking your
 face. I heard of one man who complained that somebody had stolen his
 boots in the night; and when he found them, he wanted to know what
 they had done to them,--they had spoiled them,--he never put that
 stuff on them; and the bootblack narrowly escaped paying damages.
 
 Anxious to get out of the whale's belly, I rose early, and joined some
 old salts, who were smoking by a dim light on a sheltered part of the
 deck. We were just getting into the river. They knew all about it, of
 course. I was proud to find that I had stood the voyage so well, and
 was not in the least digested. We brushed up and watched the first
 signs of dawn through an open port; but the day seemed to hang fire.
 We inquired the time; none of my companions had a chronometer. At
 length an African prince rushed by, observing, "Twelve o'clock,
 gentlemen!" and blew out the light. It was moonrise. So I slunk down
 into the monster's bowels again.
 
 The first land we make is Monhegan Island, before dawn, and next St.
 George's Islands, seeing two or three lights. Whitehead, with its bare
 rocks and funereal bell, is interesting. Next I remember that the
 Camden Hills attracted my eyes, and afterward the hills about
 Frankfort. We reached Bangor about noon.
 
 When I arrived, my companion that was to be had gone up river, and
 engaged an Indian, Joe Aitteon, a son of the Governor, to go with us
 to Chesuncook Lake. Joe had conducted two white men a-moose-hunting in
 the same direction the year before. He arrived by cars at Bangor that
 evening, with his canoe and a companion, Sabattis Solomon, who was
 going to leave Bangor the following Monday with Joe's father, by way
 of the Penobscot, and join Joe in moose-hunting at Chesuncook when we
 had done with him. They took supper at my friend's house and lodged in
 his barn, saying that they should fare worse than that in the woods.
 They only made Watch bark a little, when they came to the door in the
 night for water, for he does not like Indians.
 
 The next morning Joe and his canoe were put on board the stage for
 Moosehead Lake, sixty and odd miles distant, an hour before we started
 in an open wagon. We carried hard-bread, pork, smoked beef, tea,
 sugar, etc., seemingly enough for a regiment; the sight of which
 brought together reminded me by what ignoble means we had maintained
 our ground hitherto. We went by the Avenue Road, which is quite
 straight and very good, northwestward toward Moosehead Lake, through
 more than a dozen flourishing towns, with almost every one its
 academy,--not one of which, however, is on my General Atlas,
 published, alas! in 1824; so much are they before the age, or I behind
 it! The earth must have been considerably lighter to the shoulders of
 General Atlas then.
 
 It rained all this day and till the middle of the next forenoon,
 concealing the landscape almost entirely; but we had hardly got out of
 the streets of Bangor before I began to be exhilarated by the sight of
 the wild fir and spruce tops, and those of other primitive evergreens,
 peering through the mist in the horizon. It was like the sight and
 odor of cake to a schoolboy. He who rides and keeps the beaten track
 studies the fences chiefly. Near Bangor, the fence-posts, on account
 of the frost's heaving them in the clayey soil, were not planted in
 the ground, but were mortised into a transverse horizontal beam lying
 on the surface. Afterwards, the prevailing fences were log ones, with
 sometimes a Virginia fence, or else rails slanted over crossed stakes;
 and these zigzagged or played leap-frog all the way to the lake,
 keeping just ahead of us. After getting out of the Penobscot valley,
 the country was unexpectedly level, or consisted of very even and
 equal swells, for twenty or thirty miles, never rising above the
 general level, but affording, it is said, a very good prospect in
 clear weather, with frequent views of Ktaadn,--straight roads and long
 hills. The houses were far apart, commonly small and of one story, but
 framed. There was very little land under cultivation, yet the forest
 did not often border the road. The stumps were frequently as high as
 one's head, showing the depth of the snows. The white hay-caps, drawn
 over small stacks of beans or corn in the fields on account of the
 rain, were a novel sight to me. We saw large flocks of pigeons, and
 several times came within a rod or two of partridges in the road. My
 companion said that in one journey out of Bangor he and his son had
 shot sixty partridges from his buggy. The mountain-ash was now very
 handsome, as also the wayfarer's-tree or hobble-bush, with its ripe
 purple berries mixed with red. The Canada thistle, an introduced
 plant, was the prevailing weed all the way to the lake, the roadside
 in many places, and fields not long cleared, being densely filled with
 it as with a crop, to the exclusion of everything else. There were
 also whole fields full of ferns, now rusty and withering, which in
 older countries are commonly confined to wet ground. There were very
 few flowers, even allowing for the lateness of the season. It chanced
 that I saw no asters in bloom along the road for fifty miles, though
 they were so abundant then in Massachusetts,--except in one place one
 or two of the _Aster acuminatus_,--and no golden-rods till within
 twenty miles of Monson, where I saw a three-ribbed one. There were
 many late buttercups, however, and the two fire-weeds, erechthites and
 epilobium, commonly where there had been a burning, and at last the
 pearly everlasting. I noticed occasionally very long troughs which
 supplied the road with water, and my companion said that three dollars
 annually were granted by the State to one man in each school-district,
 who provided and maintained a suitable water-trough by the roadside,
 for the use of travelers,--a piece of intelligence as refreshing to me
 as the water itself. That legislature did not sit in vain. It was an
 Oriental act, which made me wish that I was still farther down
 East,--another Maine law, which I hope we may get in Massachusetts.
 That State is banishing bar-rooms from its highways, and conducting
 the mountain springs thither.
 
 The country was first decidedly mountainous in Garland, Sangerville,
 and onwards, twenty-five or thirty miles from Bangor. At Sangerville,
 where we stopped at mid-afternoon to warm and dry ourselves, the
 landlord told us that he had found a wilderness where we found him. At
 a fork in the road between Abbot and Monson, about twenty miles from
 Moosehead Lake, I saw a guide-post surmounted by a pair of moose
 horns, spreading four or five feet, with the word "Monson" painted on
 one blade, and the name of some other town on the other. They are
 sometimes used for ornamental hat-trees, together with deer's horns,
 in front entries; but, after the experience which I shall relate, I
 trust that I shall have a better excuse for killing a moose than that
 I may hang my hat on his horns. We reached Monson, fifty miles from
 Bangor, and thirteen from the lake, after dark.
 
 At four o'clock the next morning, in the dark, and still in the rain,
 we pursued our journey. Close to the academy in this town they have
 erected a sort of gallows for the pupils to practice on. I thought
 that they might as well hang at once all who need to go through such
 exercises in so new a country, where there is nothing to hinder their
 living an outdoor life. Better omit Blair, and take the air. The
 country about the south end of the lake is quite mountainous, and the
 road began to feel the effects of it. There is one hill which, it is
 calculated, it takes twenty-five minutes to ascend. In many places the
 road was in that condition called _repaired_, having just been
 whittled into the required semicylindrical form with the shovel and
 scraper, with all the softest inequalities in the middle, like a hog's
 back with the bristles up, and Jehu was expected to keep astride of
 the spine. As you looked off each side of the bare sphere into the
 horizon, the ditches were awful to behold,--a vast hollowness, like
 that between Saturn and his ring. At a tavern hereabouts the hostler
 greeted our horse as an old acquaintance, though he did not remember
 the driver. He said that he had taken care of that little mare for a
 short time, a year or two before, at the Mount Kineo House, and
 thought she was not in as good condition as then. Every man to his
 trade. I am not acquainted with a single horse in the world, not even
 the one that kicked me.
 
 Already we had thought that we saw Moosehead Lake from a hilltop,
 where an extensive fog filled the distant lowlands, but we were
 mistaken. It was not till we were within a mile or two of its south
 end that we got our first view of it,--a suitably wild-looking sheet
 of water, sprinkled with small, low islands, which were covered with
 shaggy spruce and other wild wood,--seen over the infant port of
 Greenville with mountains on each side and far in the north, and a
 steamer's smoke-pipe rising above a roof. A pair of moose-horns
 ornamented a corner of the public house where we left our horse, and a
 few rods distant lay the small steamer Moosehead, Captain King. There
 was no village, and no summer road any farther in this direction, but
 a winter road, that is, one passable only when deep snow covers its
 inequalities, from Greenville up the east side of the lake to Lily
 Bay, about twelve miles.
 
 I was here first introduced to Joe. He had ridden all the way on the
 outside of the stage, the day before, in the rain, giving way to
 ladies, and was well wetted. As it still rained, he asked if we were
 going to "put it through." He was a good-looking Indian, twenty-four
 years old, apparently of unmixed blood, short and stout, with a broad
 face and reddish complexion, and eyes, methinks, narrower and more
 turned up at the outer corners than ours, answering to the description
 of his race. Besides his underclothing, he wore a red flannel shirt,
 woolen pants, and a black Kossuth hat, the ordinary dress of the
 lumberman, and, to a considerable extent, of the Penobscot Indian.
 When, afterward, he had occasion to take off his shoes and stockings,
 I was struck with the smallness of his feet. He had worked a good deal
 as a lumberman, and appeared to identify himself with that class. He
 was the only one of the party who possessed an india-rubber jacket.
 The top strip or edge of his canoe was worn nearly through by friction
 on the stage.
 
 At eight o'clock the steamer, with her bell and whistle, scaring the
 moose, summoned us on board. She was a well-appointed little boat,
 commanded by a gentlemanly captain, with patent life-seats and
 metallic life-boat, and dinner on board, if you wish. She is chiefly
 used by lumberers for the transportation of themselves, their boats,
 and supplies, but also by hunters and tourists. There was another
 steamer, named Amphitrite, laid up close by; but, apparently, her name
 was not more trite than her hull. There were also two or three large
 sailboats in port. These beginnings of commerce on a lake in the
 wilderness are very interesting,--these larger white birds that come
 to keep company with the gulls. There were but few passengers, and not
 one female among them: a St. Francis Indian, with his canoe and
 moose-hides; two explorers for lumber; three men who landed at Sandbar
 Island, and a gentleman who lives on Deer Island, eleven miles up the
 lake, and owns also Sugar Island, between which and the former the
 steamer runs; these, I think, were all beside ourselves. In the saloon
 was some kind of musical instrument--cherubim or seraphim--to soothe
 the angry waves; and there, very properly, was tacked up the map of
 the public lands of Maine and Massachusetts, a copy of which I had in
 my pocket.
 
 The heavy rain confining us to the saloon awhile, I discoursed with
 the proprietor of Sugar Island on the condition of the world in Old
 Testament times. But at length, leaving this subject as fresh as we
 found it, he told me that he had lived about this lake twenty or
 thirty years, and yet had not been to the head of it for twenty-one
 years. He faces the other way. The explorers had a fine new birch on
 board, larger than ours, in which they had come up the Piscataquis
 from Howland, and they had had several messes of trout already. They
 were going to the neighborhood of Eagle and Chamberlain lakes, or the
 head-waters of the St. John, and offered to keep us company as far as
 we went. The lake to-day was rougher than I found the ocean, either
 going or returning, and Joe remarked that it would swamp his birch.
 Off Lily Bay it is a dozen miles wide, but it is much broken by
 islands. The scenery is not merely wild, but varied and interesting;
 mountains were seen, farther or nearer, on all sides but the
 northwest, their summits now lost in the clouds; but Mount Kineo is
 the principal feature of the lake, and more exclusively belongs to it.
 After leaving Greenville, at the foot, which is the nucleus of a town
 some eight or ten years old, you see but three or four houses for the
 whole length of the lake, or about forty miles, three of them the
 public houses at which the steamer is advertised to stop, and the
 shore is an unbroken wilderness. The prevailing wood seemed to be
 spruce, fir, birch, and rock maple. You could easily distinguish the
 hard wood from the soft, or "black growth," as it is called, at a
 great distance, the former being smooth, round-topped, and light
 green, with a bowery and cultivated look.
 
 Mount Kineo, at which the boat touched, is a peninsula with a narrow
 neck, about midway the lake on the east side. The celebrated precipice
 is on the east or land side of this, and is so high and perpendicular
 that you can jump from the top, many hundred feet, into the water,
 which makes up behind the point. A man on board told us that an anchor
 had been sunk ninety fathoms at its base before reaching bottom!
 Probably it will be discovered ere long that some Indian maiden jumped
 off it for love once, for true love never could have found a path more
 to its mind. We passed quite close to the rock here, since it is a
 very bold shore, and I observed marks of a rise of four or five feet
 on it. The St. Francis Indian expected to take in his boy here, but he
 was not at the landing. The father's sharp eyes, however, detected a
 canoe with his boy in it far away under the mountain, though no one
 else could see it. "Where is the canoe?" asked the captain, "I don't
 see it;" but he held on, nevertheless, and by and by it hove in sight.
 
 We reached the head of the lake about noon. The weather had, in the
 meanwhile, cleared up, though the mountains were still capped with
 clouds. Seen from this point, Mount Kineo, and two other allied
 mountains ranging with it northeasterly, presented a very strong
 family likeness, as if all cast in one mould. The steamer here
 approached a long pier projecting from the northern wilderness, and
 built of some of its logs, and whistled, where not a cabin nor a
 mortal was to be seen. The shore was quite low, with flat rocks on it,
 overhung with black ash, arbor-vitae, etc., which at first looked as if
 they did not care a whistle for us. There was not a single cabman to
 cry "Coach!" or inveigle us to the United States Hotel. At length a
 Mr. Hinckley, who has a camp at the other end of the "carry," appeared
 with a truck drawn by an ox and a horse over a rude log-railway
 through the woods. The next thing was to get our canoe and effects
 over the carry from this lake, one of the heads of the Kennebec, into
 the Penobscot River. This railway from the lake to the river occupied
 the middle of a clearing two or three rods wide and perfectly straight
 through the forest. We walked across while our baggage was drawn
 behind. My companion went ahead to be ready for partridges, while I
 followed, looking at the plants.
 
 This was an interesting botanical locality for one coming from the
 south to commence with; for many plants which are rather rare, and one
 or two which are not found at all, in the eastern part of
 Massachusetts, grew abundantly between the rails,--as Labrador-tea,
 _Kalmia glauca_, Canada blueberry (which was still in fruit, and a
 second time in bloom), _Clintonia_ and _Linnaea borealis_, which last a
 lumberer called _moxon_, creeping snowberry, painted trillium,
 large-flowered bellwort, etc. I fancied that the _Aster Radula_,
 _Diplopappus umbellatus_, _Solidago lanceolata_, red trumpet-weed, and
 many others which were conspicuously in bloom on the shore of the lake
 and on the carry, had a peculiarly wild and primitive look there. The
 spruce and fir trees crowded to the track on each side to welcome us,
 the arbor-vitae, with its changing leaves, prompted us to make haste,
 and the sight of the canoe birch gave us spirits to do so. Sometimes
 an evergreen just fallen lay across the track with its rich burden of
 cones, looking, still, fuller of life than our trees in the most
 favorable positions. You did not expect to find such _spruce_ trees in
 the wild woods, but they evidently attend to their toilets each
 morning even there. Through such a front yard did we enter that
 wilderness.
 
 There was a very slight rise above the lake,--the country appearing
 like, and perhaps being partly a swamp,--and at length a gradual
 descent to the Penobscot, which I was surprised to find here a large
 stream, from twelve to fifteen rods wide, flowing from west to east,
 or at right angles with the lake, and not more than two and a half
 miles from it. The distance is nearly twice too great on the Map of
 the Public Lands, and on Colton's Map of Maine, and Russell Stream is
 placed too far down. Jackson makes Moosehead Lake to be nine hundred
 and sixty feet above high water in Portland harbor. It is higher than
 Chesuncook, for the lumberers consider the Penobscot, where we struck
 it, twenty-five feet lower than Moosehead, though eight miles above it
 is said to be the highest, so that the water can be made to flow
 either way, and the river falls a good deal between here and
 Chesuncook. The carry-man called this about one hundred and forty
 miles above Bangor by the river, or two hundred from the ocean, and
 fifty-five miles below Hilton's, on the Canada road, the first
 clearing above, which is four and a half miles from the source of the
 Penobscot.
 
 At the north end of the carry, in the midst of a clearing of sixty
 acres or more, there was a log camp of the usual construction, with
 something more like a house adjoining, for the accommodation of the
 carry-man's family and passing lumberers. The bed of withered fir
 twigs smelled very sweet, though really very dirty. There was also a
 store-house on the bank of the river, containing pork, flour, iron,
 batteaux, and birches, locked up.
 
 We now proceeded to get our dinner, which always turned out to be tea,
 and to pitch canoes, for which purpose a large iron pot lay
 permanently on the bank. This we did in company with the explorers.
 Both Indians and whites use a mixture of rosin and grease for this
 purpose, that is, for the pitching, not the dinner. Joe took a small
 brand from the fire and blew the heat and flame against the pitch on
 his birch, and so melted and spread it. Sometimes he put his mouth
 over the suspected spot and sucked, to see if it admitted air; and at
 one place, where we stopped, he set his canoe high on crossed stakes,
 and poured water into it. I narrowly watched his motions, and listened
 attentively to his observations, for we had employed an Indian mainly
 that I might have an opportunity to study his ways. I heard him swear
 once, mildly, during this operation, about his knife being as dull as
 a hoe,--an accomplishment which he owed to his intercourse with the
 whites; and he remarked, "We ought to have some tea before we start;
 we shall be hungry before we kill that moose."
 
 At mid-afternoon we embarked on the Penobscot. Our birch was nineteen
 and a half feet long by two and a half at the widest part, and
 fourteen inches deep within, both ends alike, and painted green, which
 Joe thought affected the pitch and made it leak. This, I think, was a
 middling-sized one. That of the explorers was much larger, though
 probably not much longer. This carried us three with our baggage,
 weighing in all between five hundred and fifty and six hundred pounds.
 We had two heavy, though slender, rock-maple paddles, one of them of
 bird's-eye maple. Joe placed birch-bark on the bottom for us to sit
 on, and slanted cedar splints against the cross-bars to protect our
 backs, while he himself sat upon a cross-bar in the stern. The baggage
 occupied the middle or widest part of the canoe. We also paddled by
 turns in the bows, now sitting with our legs extended, now sitting
 upon our legs, and now rising upon our knees; but I found none of
 these positions endurable, and was reminded of the complaints of the
 old Jesuit missionaries of the torture they endured from long
 confinement in constrained positions in canoes, in their long voyages
 from Quebec to the Huron country; but afterwards I sat on the
 cross-bars, or stood up, and experienced no inconvenience.
 
 It was deadwater for a couple of miles. The river had been raised
 about two feet by the rain, and lumberers were hoping for a flood
 sufficient to bring down the logs that were left in the spring. Its
 banks were seven or eight feet high, and densely covered with white
 and black spruce,--which, I think, must be the commonest trees
 thereabouts,--fir, arbor-vitae, canoe, yellow and black birch, rock,
 mountain, and a few red maples, beech, black and mountain ash, the
 large-toothed aspen, many civil-looking elms, now imbrowned, along the
 stream, and at first a few hemlocks also. We had not gone far before I
 was startled by seeing what I thought was an Indian encampment,
 covered with a red flag, on the bank, and exclaimed, "Camp!" to my
 comrades. I was slow to discover that it was a red maple changed by
 the frost. The immediate shores were also densely covered with the
 speckled alder, red osier, shrubby willows or sallows, and the like.
 There were a few yellow lily pads still left, half-drowned, along the
 sides, and sometimes a white one. Many fresh tracks of moose were
 visible where the water was shallow, and on the shore, the lily stems
 were freshly bitten off by them.
 
 After paddling about two miles, we parted company with the explorers,
 and turned up Lobster Stream, which comes in on the right, from the
 southeast. This was six or eight rods wide, and appeared to run nearly
 parallel with the Penobscot. Joe said that it was so called from small
 fresh-water lobsters found in it. It is the Matahumkeag of the maps.
 My companion wished to look for moose signs, and intended, if it
 proved worth the while, to camp up that way, since the Indian advised
 it. On account of the rise of the Penobscot, the water ran up this
 stream to the pond of the same name, one or two miles. The Spencer
 Mountains, east of the north end of Moosehead Lake, were now in plain
 sight in front of us. The kingfisher flew before us, the pigeon
 woodpecker was seen and heard, and nuthatches and chickadees close at
 hand. Joe said that they called the chickadee _kecunnilessu_ in his
 language. I will not vouch for the spelling of what possibly was never
 spelt before, but I pronounced after him till he said it would do. We
 passed close to a woodcock, which stood perfectly still on the shore,
 with feathers puffed up, as if sick. This Joe said they called
 _nipsquecohossus_. The kingfisher was _skuscumonsuck_; bear was
 _wassus_; Indian devil, _lunxus_; the mountain-ash, _upahsis_. This
 was very abundant and beautiful. Moose tracks were not so fresh along
 this stream, except in a small creek about a mile up it, where a large
 log had lodged in the spring, marked "W-cross-girdle-crow-foot." We
 saw a pair of moose-horns on the shore, and I asked Joe if a moose had
 shed them; but he said there was a head attached to them, and I knew
 that they did not shed their heads more than once in their lives.
 
 After ascending about a mile and a half, to within a short distance of
 Lobster Lake, we returned to the Penobscot. Just below the mouth of
 the Lobster we found quick water, and the river expanded to twenty or
 thirty rods in width. The moose-tracks were quite numerous and fresh
 here. We noticed in a great many places narrow and well-trodden paths
 by which they had come down to the river, and where they had slid on
 the steep and clayey bank. Their tracks were either close to the edge
 of the stream, those of the calves distinguishable from the others, or
 in shallow water; the holes made by their feet in the soft bottom
 being visible for a long time. They were particularly numerous where
 there was a small bay, or pokelogan, as it is called, bordered by a
 strip of meadow, or separated from the river by a low peninsula
 covered with coarse grass, wool-grass, etc., wherein they had waded
 back and forth and eaten the pads. We detected the remains of one in
 such a spot. At one place, where we landed to pick up a summer duck,
 which my companion had shot, Joe peeled a canoe birch for bark for his
 hunting-horn. He then asked if we were not going to get the other
 duck, for his sharp eyes had seen another fall in the bushes a little
 farther along, and my companion obtained it. I now began to notice the
 bright red berries of the tree-cranberry, which grows eight or ten
 feet high, mingled with the alders and cornel along the shore. There
 was less hard wood than at first.
 
 After proceeding a mile and three quarters below the mouth of the
 Lobster, we reached, about sundown, a small island at the head of what
 Joe called the Moosehorn Deadwater (the Moosehorn, in which he was
 going to hunt that night, coming in about three miles below), and on
 the upper end of this we decided to camp. On a point at the lower end
 lay the carcass of a moose killed a month or more before. We concluded
 merely to prepare our camp, and leave our baggage here, that all might
 be ready when we returned from moose-hunting. Though I had not come
 a-hunting, and felt some compunctions about accompanying the hunters,
 I wished to see a moose near at hand, and was not sorry to learn how
 the Indian managed to kill one. I went as reporter or chaplain to the
 hunters,--and the chaplain has been known to carry a gun himself.
 After clearing a small space amid the dense spruce and fir trees, we
 covered the damp ground with a shingling of fir twigs, and, while Joe
 was preparing his birch horn and pitching his canoe,--for this had to
 be done whenever we stopped long enough to build a fire, and was the
 principal labor which he took upon himself at such times,--we
 collected fuel for the night, large, wet, and rotting logs, which had
 lodged at the head of the island, for our hatchet was too small for
 effective chopping; but we did not kindle a fire, lest the moose
 should smell it. Joe set up a couple of forked stakes, and prepared
 half a dozen poles, ready to cast one of our blankets over in case it
 rained in the night, which precaution, however, was omitted the next
 night. We also plucked the ducks which had been killed for breakfast.
 
 While we were thus engaged in the twilight, we heard faintly, from far
 down the stream, what sounded like two strokes of a woodchopper's axe,
 echoing dully through the grim solitude. We are wont to liken many
 sounds, heard at a distance in the forest, to the stroke of an axe,
 because they resemble each other under those circumstances, and that
 is the one we commonly hear there. When we told Joe of this, he
 exclaimed, "By George, I'll bet that was a moose! They make a noise
 like that." These sounds affected us strangely, and by their very
 resemblance to a familiar one, where they probably had so different
 an origin, enhanced the impression of solitude and wildness.
 
 At starlight we dropped down the stream, which was a deadwater for
 three miles, or as far as the Moosehorn; Joe telling us that we must
 be very silent, and he himself making no noise with his paddle, while
 he urged the canoe along with effective impulses. It was a still
 night, and suitable for this purpose,--for if there is wind, the moose
 will smell you,--and Joe was very confident that he should get some.
 The Harvest Moon had just risen, and its level rays began to light up
 the forest on our right, while we glided downward in the shade on the
 same side, against the little breeze that was stirring. The lofty,
 spiring tops of the spruce and fir were very black against the sky,
 and more distinct than by day, close bordering this broad avenue on
 each side; and the beauty of the scene, as the moon rose above the
 forest, it would not be easy to describe. A bat flew over our heads,
 and we heard a few faint notes of birds from time to time, perhaps the
 myrtle-bird for one, or the sudden plunge of a musquash, or saw one
 crossing the stream before us, or heard the sound of a rill emptying
 in, swollen by the recent rain. About a mile below the island, when
 the solitude seemed to be growing more complete every moment, we
 suddenly saw the light and heard the crackling of a fire on the bank,
 and discovered the camp of the two explorers; they standing before it
 in their red shirts, and talking aloud of the adventures and profits
 of the day. They were just then speaking of a bargain, in which, as I
 understood, somebody had cleared twenty-five dollars. We glided by
 without speaking, close under the bank, within a couple of rods of
 them; and Joe, taking his horn, imitated the call of the moose, till
 we suggested that they might fire on us. This was the last we saw of
 them, and we never knew whether they detected or suspected us.
 
 I have often wished since that I was with them. They search for timber
 over a given section, climbing hills and often high trees to look off;
 explore the streams by which it is to be driven, and the like; spend
 five or six weeks in the woods, they two alone, a hundred miles or
 more from any town, roaming about, and sleeping on the ground where
 night overtakes them, depending chiefly on the provisions they carry
 with them, though they do not decline what game they come across; and
 then in the fall they return and make report to their employers,
 determining the number of teams that will be required the following
 winter. Experienced men get three or four dollars a day for this work.
 It is a solitary and adventurous life, and comes nearest to that of
 the trapper of the West, perhaps. They work ever with a gun as well as
 an axe, let their beards grow, and live without neighbors, not on an
 open plain, but far within a wilderness.
 
 This discovery accounted for the sounds which we had heard, and destroyed
 the prospect of seeing moose yet awhile. At length, when we had left
 the explorers far behind, Joe laid down his paddle, drew forth his
 birch horn,--a straight one, about fifteen inches long and three or
 four wide at the mouth, tied round with strips of the same bark,--and,
 standing up, imitated the call of the moose,--_ugh-ugh-ugh_, or
 _oo-oo-oo-oo_, and then a prolonged _oo-o-o-o-o-o-o-o_, and listened
 attentively for several minutes. We asked him what kind of noise he
 expected to hear. He said that if a moose heard it, he guessed we
 should find out; we should hear him coming half a mile off; he would
 come close to, perhaps into, the water, and my companion must wait
 till he got fair sight, and then aim just behind the shoulder.
 
 The moose venture out to the riverside to feed and drink at night.
 Earlier in the season the hunters do not use a horn to call them out,
 but steal upon them as they are feeding along the sides of the stream,
 and often the first notice they have of one is the sound of the water
 dropping from its muzzle. An Indian whom I heard imitate the voice of
 the moose, and also that of the caribou and the deer, using a much
 longer horn than Joe's, told me that the first could be heard eight or
 ten miles, sometimes; it was a loud sort of bellowing sound, clearer
 and more sonorous than the lowing of cattle, the caribou's a sort of
 snort, and the small deer's like that of a lamb.
 
 At length we turned up the Moosehorn, where the Indians at the carry
 had told us that they killed a moose the night before. This is a very
 meandering stream, only a rod or two in width, but comparatively deep,
 coming in on the right, fitly enough named Moosehorn, whether from its
 windings or its inhabitants. It was bordered here and there by narrow
 meadows between the stream and the endless forest, affording favorable
 places for the moose to feed, and to call them out on. We proceeded
 half a mile up this as through a narrow, winding canal, where the
 tall, dark spruce and firs and arbor-vitae towered on both sides in the
 moonlight, forming a perpendicular forest-edge of great height, like
 the spires of a Venice in the forest. In two places stood a small
 stack of hay on the bank, ready for the lumberer's use in the winter,
 looking strange enough there. We thought of the day when this might be
 a brook winding through smooth-shaven meadows on some gentleman's
 grounds; and seen by moonlight then, excepting the forest that now
 hems it in, how little changed it would appear!
 
 Again and again Joe called the moose, placing the canoe close by some
 favorable point of meadow for them to come out on, but listened in
 vain to hear one come rushing through the woods, and concluded that
 they had been hunted too much thereabouts. We saw, many times, what to
 our imaginations looked like a gigantic moose, with his horns peering
 from out the forest edge; but we saw the forest only, and not its
 inhabitants, that night. So at last we turned about. There was now a
 little fog on the water, though it was a fine, clear night above.
 There were very few sounds to break the stillness of the forest.
 Several times we heard the hooting of a great horned owl, as at home,
 and told Joe that he would call out the moose for him, for he made a
 sound considerably like the horn; but Joe answered, that the moose had
 heard that sound a thousand times, and knew better; and oftener still
 we were startled by the plunge of a musquash. Once, when Joe had
 called again, and we were listening for moose, we heard, come faintly
 echoing, or creeping from far through the moss-clad aisles, a dull,
 dry, rushing sound with a solid core to it, yet as if half smothered
 under the grasp of the luxuriant and fungus-like forest, like the
 shutting of a door in some distant entry of the damp and shaggy
 wilderness. If we had not been there, no mortal had heard it. When we
 asked Joe in a whisper what it was, he answered, "Tree fall." There is
 something singularly grand and impressive in the sound of a tree
 falling in a perfectly calm night like this, as if the agencies which
 overthrow it did not need to be excited, but worked with a subtle,
 deliberate, and conscious force, like a boa-constrictor, and more
 effectively then than even in a windy day. If there is any such
 difference, perhaps it is because trees with the dews of the night on
 them are heavier than by day.
 
 Having reached the camp, about ten o'clock, we kindled our fire and
 went to bed. Each of us had a blanket, in which he lay on the fir
 twigs, with his extremities toward the fire, but nothing over his
 head. It was worth the while to lie down in a country where you could
 afford such great fires; that was one whole side, and the bright side,
 of our world. We had first rolled up a large log some eighteen inches
 through and ten feet long, for a backlog, to last all night, and then
 piled on the trees to the height of three or four feet, no matter how
 green or damp. In fact, we burned as much wood that night as would,
 with economy and an air-tight stove, last a poor family in one of our
 cities all winter. It was very agreeable, as well as independent, thus
 lying in the open air, and the fire kept our uncovered extremities
 warm enough. The Jesuit missionaries used to say, that, in their
 journeys with the Indians in Canada, they lay on a bed which had never
 been shaken up since the creation, unless by earthquakes. It is
 surprising with what impunity and comfort one who has always lain in a
 warm bed in a close apartment, and studiously avoided drafts of air,
 can lie down on the ground without a shelter, roll himself in a
 blanket, and sleep before a fire, in a frosty autumn night, just after
 a long rain-storm, and even come soon to enjoy and value the fresh
 air.
 
 I lay awake awhile, watching the ascent of the sparks through the
 firs, and sometimes their descent in half-extinguished cinders on my
 blanket. They were as interesting as fireworks, going up in endless,
 successive crowds, each after an explosion, in an eager, serpentine
 course, some to five or six rods above the tree-tops before they went
 out. We do not suspect how much our chimneys have concealed; and now
 air-tight stoves have come to conceal all the rest. In the course of
 the night, I got up once or twice and put fresh logs on the fire,
 making my companions curl up their legs.
 
 When we awoke in the morning (Saturday, September 17), there was
 considerable frost whitening the leaves. We heard the sound of the
 chickadee, and a few faintly lisping birds, and also of ducks in the
 water about the island. I took a botanical account of stock of our
 domains before the dew was off, and found that the ground-hemlock, or
 American yew, was the prevailing undershrub. We breakfasted on tea,
 hard-bread, and ducks.
 
 Before the fog had fairly cleared away we paddled down the stream
 again, and were soon past the mouth of the Moosehorn. These twenty
 miles of the Penobscot, between Moosehead and Chesuncook lakes, are
 comparatively smooth, and a great part deadwater; but from time to
 time it is shallow and rapid, with rocks or gravel beds, where you can
 wade across. There is no expanse of water, and no break in the forest,
 and the meadow is a mere edging here and there. There are no hills
 near the river nor within sight, except one or two distant mountains
 seen in a few places. The banks are from six to ten feet high, but
 once or twice rise gently to higher ground. In many places the forest
 on the bank was but a thin strip, letting the light through from some
 alder swamp or meadow behind. The conspicuous berry-bearing bushes and
 trees along the shore were the red osier, with its whitish fruit,
 hobble-bush, mountain-ash, tree-cranberry, choke-cherry, now ripe,
 alternate cornel, and naked viburnum. Following Joe's example, I ate
 the fruit of the last, and also of the hobble-bush, but found them
 rather insipid and seedy. I looked very narrowly at the vegetation, as
 we glided along close to the shore, and frequently made Joe turn aside
 for me to pluck a plant, that I might see by comparison what was
 primitive about my native river. Horehound, horse-mint, and the
 sensitive fern grew close to the edge, under the willows and alders,
 and wool-grass on the islands, as along the Assabet River in Concord.
 It was too late for flowers, except a few asters, goldenrods, etc. In
 several places we noticed the slight frame of a camp, such as we had
 prepared to set up, amid the forest by the riverside, where some
 lumberers or hunters had passed a night, and sometimes steps cut in
 the muddy or clayey bank in front of it.
 
 We stopped to fish for trout at the mouth of a small stream called
 Ragmuff, which came in from the west, about two miles below the
 Moosehorn. Here were the ruins of an old lumbering-camp, and a small
 space, which had formerly been cleared and burned over, was now
 densely overgrown with the red cherry and raspberries. While we were
 trying for trout, Joe, Indian-like, wandered off up the Ragmuff on his
 own errands, and when we were ready to start was far beyond call. So
 we were compelled to make a fire and get our dinner here, not to lose
 time. Some dark reddish birds, with grayer females (perhaps purple
 finches), and myrtle-birds in their summer dress, hopped within six or
 eight feet of us and our smoke. Perhaps they smelled the frying pork.
 The latter bird, or both, made the lisping notes which I had heard in
 the forest. They suggested that the few small birds found in the
 wilderness are on more familiar terms with the lumberman and hunter
 than those of the orchard and clearing with the farmer. I have since
 found the Canada jay, and partridges, both the black and the common,
 equally tame there, as if they had not yet learned to mistrust man
 entirely. The chickadee, which is at home alike in the primitive woods
 and in our wood-lots, still retains its confidence in the towns to a
 remarkable degree.
 
 Joe at length returned, after an hour and a half, and said that he
 had been two miles up the stream exploring, and had seen a moose, but,
 not having the gun, he did not get him. We made no complaint, but
 concluded to look out for Joe the next time. However, this may have
 been a mere mistake, for we had no reason to complain of him
 afterwards. As we continued down the stream, I was surprised to hear
 him whistling "O Susanna" and several other such airs, while his
 paddle urged us along. Once he said, "Yes, sir-ee." His common word
 was "Sartain." He paddled, as usual, on one side only, giving the
 birch an impulse by using the side as a fulcrum. I asked him how the
 ribs were fastened to the side rails. He answered, "I don't know, I
 never noticed." Talking with him about subsisting wholly on what the
 woods yielded,--game, fish, berries, etc.,--I suggested that his
 ancestors did so; but he answered that he had been brought up in such
 a way that he could not do it. "Yes," said he, "that's the way they
 got a living, like wild fellows, wild as bears. By George! I shan't go
 into the woods without provision,--hard-bread, pork, etc." He had
 brought on a barrel of hard-bread and stored it at the carry for his
 hunting. However, though he was a Governor's son, he had not learned
 to read.
 
 At one place below this, on the east side, where the bank was higher
 and drier than usual, rising gently from the shore to a slight
 elevation, some one had felled the trees over twenty or thirty acres,
 and left them drying in order to burn. This was the only preparation
 for a house between the Moosehead Carry and Chesuncook, but there was
 no hut nor inhabitants there yet. The pioneer thus selects a site for
 his house, which will, perhaps, prove the germ of a town.
 
 My eyes were all the while on the trees, distinguishing between the
 black and white spruce and the fir. You paddle along in a narrow canal
 through an endless forest, and the vision I have in my mind's eye,
 still, is of the small, dark, and sharp tops of tall fir and spruce
 trees, and pagoda-like arbor-vitaes, crowded together on each side,
 with various hard woods intermixed. Some of the arbor-vitaes were at
 least sixty feet high. The hard woods, occasionally occurring
 exclusively, were less wild to my eye. I fancied them ornamental
 grounds, with farmhouses in the rear. The canoe and yellow birch,
 beech, maple, and elm are Saxon and Norman, but the spruce and fir,
 and pines generally, are Indian. The soft engravings which adorn the
 annuals give no idea of a stream in such a wilderness as this. The
 rough sketches in Jackson's Reports on the Geology of Maine answer
 much better. At one place we saw a small grove of slender sapling
 white pines, the only collection of pines that I saw on this voyage.
 Here and there, however, was a full-grown, tall, and slender, but
 defective one, what lumbermen call a _konchus_ tree, which they
 ascertain with their axes, or by the knots. I did not learn whether
 this word was Indian or English. It reminded me of the Greek [Greek:
 konche], a conch or shell, and I amused myself with fancying that it
 might signify the dead sound which the trees yield when struck. All
 the rest of the pines had been driven off.
 
 How far men go for the material of their houses! The inhabitants of
 the most civilized cities, in all ages, send into far, primitive
 forests, beyond the bounds of their civilization, where the moose and
 bear and savage dwell, for their pine boards for ordinary use. And, on
 the other hand, the savage soon receives from cities iron
 arrow-points, hatchets, and guns, to point his savageness with.
 
 The solid and well-defined fir-tops, like sharp and regular
 spearheads, black against the sky, gave a peculiar, dark, and sombre
 look to the forest. The spruce-tops have a similar but more ragged
 outline, their shafts also merely feathered below. The firs were
 somewhat oftener regular and dense pyramids. I was struck by this
 universal spiring upward of the forest evergreens. The tendency is to
 slender, spiring tops, while they are narrower below. Not only the
 spruce and fir, but even the arbor-vitae and white pine, unlike the
 soft, spreading second-growth, of which I saw none, all spire upwards,
 lifting a dense spearhead of cones to the light and air, at any rate,
 while their branches straggle after as they may; as Indians lift the
 ball over the heads of the crowd in their desperate game. In this they
 resemble grasses, as also palms somewhat. The hemlock is commonly a
 tent-like pyramid from the ground to its summit.
 
 After passing through some long rips, and by a large island, we
 reached an interesting part of the river called the Pine Stream
 Deadwater, about six miles below Ragmuff, where the river expanded to
 thirty rods in width and had many islands in it, with elms and
 canoe-birches, now yellowing, along the shore, and we got our first
 sight of Ktaadn.
 
 Here, about two o'clock, we turned up a small branch three or four
 rods wide, which comes in on the right from the south, called Pine
 Stream, to look for moose signs. We had gone but a few rods before we
 saw very recent signs along the water's edge, the mud lifted up by
 their feet being quite fresh, and Joe declared that they had gone
 along there but a short time before. We soon reached a small meadow on
 the east side, at an angle in the stream, which was, for the most
 part, densely covered with alders. As we were advancing along the edge
 of this, rather more quietly than usual, perhaps, on account of the
 freshness of the signs,--the design being to camp up this stream, if
 it promised well,--I heard a slight crackling of twigs deep in the
 alders, and turned Joe's attention to it; whereupon he began to push
 the canoe back rapidly; and we had receded thus half a dozen rods,
 when we suddenly spied two moose standing just on the edge of the open
 part of the meadow which we had passed, not more than six or seven
 rods distant, looking round the alders at us. They made me think of
 great frightened rabbits, with their long ears and half-inquisitive,
 half-frightened looks; the true denizens of the forest (I saw at
 once), filling a vacuum which now first I discovered had not been
 filled for me,--_moose_-men, _wood-eaters_, the word is said to
 mean,--clad in a sort of Vermont gray, or homespun. Our Nimrod, owing
 to the retrograde movement, was now the farthest from the game; but
 being warned of its neighborhood, he hastily stood up, and, while we
 ducked, fired over our heads one barrel at the foremost, which alone
 he saw, though he did not know what kind of creature it was;
 whereupon this one dashed across the meadow and up a high bank on the
 northeast, so rapidly as to leave but an indistinct impression of its
 outlines on my mind. At the same instant, the other, a young one, but
 as tall as a horse, leaped out into the stream, in full sight, and
 there stood cowering for a moment, or rather its disproportionate
 lowness behind gave it that appearance, and uttering two or three
 trumpeting squeaks. I have an indistinct recollection of seeing the
 old one pause an instant on the top of the bank in the woods, look
 toward its shivering young, and then dash away again. The second
 barrel was leveled at the calf, and when we expected to see it drop in
 the water, after a little hesitation, it, too, got out of the water,
 and dashed up the hill, though in a somewhat different direction. All
 this was the work of a few seconds, and our hunter, having never seen
 a moose before, did not know but they were deer, for they stood partly
 in the water, nor whether he had fired at the same one twice or not.
 From the style in which they went off, and the fact that he was not
 used to standing up and firing from a canoe, I judged that we should
 not see anything more of them. The Indian said that they were a cow
 and her calf,--a yearling, or perhaps two years old, for they
 accompany their dams so long; but, for my part, I had not noticed much
 difference in their size. It was but two or three rods across the
 meadow to the foot of the bank, which, like all the world thereabouts,
 was densely wooded; but I was surprised to notice, that, as soon as
 the moose had passed behind the veil of the woods, there was no sound
 of footsteps to be heard from the soft, damp moss which carpets that
 forest, and long before we landed, perfect silence reigned. Joe said,
 "If you wound 'em moose, me sure get 'em."
 
 We all landed at once. My companion reloaded; the Indian fastened his
 birch, threw off his hat, adjusted his waistband, seized the hatchet,
 and set out. He told me afterward, casually, that before we landed he
 had seen a drop of blood on the bank, when it was two or three rods
 off. He proceeded rapidly up the bank and through the woods, with a
 peculiar, elastic, noiseless, and stealthy tread, looking to right and
 left on the ground, and stepping in the faint tracks of the wounded
 moose, now and then pointing in silence to a single drop of blood on
 the handsome, shining leaves of the _Clintonia borealis_, which, on
 every side, covered the ground, or to a dry fern stem freshly broken,
 all the while chewing some leaf or else the spruce gum. I followed,
 watching his motions more than the trail of the moose. After following
 the trail about forty rods in a pretty direct course, stepping over
 fallen trees and winding between standing ones, he at length lost it,
 for there were many other moose-tracks there, and, returning once more
 to the last blood-stain, traced it a little way and lost it again,
 and, too soon, I thought, for a good hunter, gave it up entirely. He
 traced a few steps, also, the tracks of the calf; but, seeing no
 blood, soon relinquished the search.
 
 I observed, while he was tracking the moose, a certain reticence or
 moderation in him. He did not communicate several observations of
 interest which he made, as a white man would have done, though they
 may have leaked out afterward. At another time, when we heard a slight
 crackling of twigs and he landed to reconnoitre, he stepped lightly
 and gracefully, stealing through the bushes with the least possible
 noise, in a way in which no white man does,--as it were, finding a
 place for his foot each time.
 
 About half an hour after seeing the moose, we pursued our voyage up
 Pine Stream, and soon, coming to a part which was very shoal and also
 rapid, we took out the baggage, and proceeded to carry it round, while
 Joe got up with the canoe alone. We were just completing our portage
 and I was absorbed in the plants, admiring the leaves of the _Aster
 macrophyllus_, ten inches wide, and plucking the seeds of the great
 round-leaved orchis, when Joe exclaimed from the stream that he had
 killed a moose. He had found the cow moose lying dead, but quite warm,
 in the middle of the stream, which was so shallow that it rested on
 the bottom, with hardly a third of its body above water. It was about
 an hour after it was shot, and it was swollen with water. It had run
 about a hundred rods and sought the stream again, cutting off a slight
 bend. No doubt a better hunter would have tracked it to this spot at
 once. I was surprised at its great size, horse-like, but Joe said it
 was not a large cow moose. My companion went in search of the calf
 again. I took hold of the ears of the moose, while Joe pushed his
 canoe down-stream toward a favorable shore, and so we made out, though
 with some difficulty, its long nose frequently sticking in the
 bottom, to drag it into still shallower water. It was a
 brownish-black, or perhaps a dark iron-gray, on the back and sides,
 but lighter beneath and in front. I took the cord which served for the
 canoe's painter, and with Joe's assistance measured it carefully, the
 greatest distances first, making a knot each time. The painter being
 wanted, I reduced these measures that night with equal care to lengths
 and fractions of my umbrella, beginning with the smallest measures,
 and untying the knots as I proceeded; and when we arrived at
 Chesuncook the next day, finding a two-foot rule there, I reduced the
 last to feet and inches; and, moreover, I made myself a two-foot rule
 of a thin and narrow strip of black ash, which would fold up
 conveniently to six inches. All this pains I took because I did not
 wish to be obliged to say merely that the moose was very large. Of the
 various dimensions which I obtained I will mention only two. The
 distance from the tips of the hoofs of the fore feet, stretched out,
 to the top of the back between the shoulders, was seven feet and five
 inches. I can hardly believe my own measure, for this is about two
 feet greater than the height of a tall horse. (Indeed, I am now
 satisfied that this measurement was incorrect, but the other measures
 given here I can warrant to be correct, having proved them in a more
 recent visit to those woods.) The extreme length was eight feet and
 two inches. Another cow moose, which I have since measured in those
 woods with a tape, was just six feet from the tip of the hoof to the
 shoulders, and eight feet long as she lay.
 
 When afterward I asked an Indian at the carry how much taller the
 male was, he answered, "Eighteen inches," and made me observe the
 height of a cross-stake over the fire, more than four feet from the
 ground, to give me some idea of the depth of his chest. Another
 Indian, at Oldtown, told me that they were nine feet high to the top
 of the back, and that one which he tried weighed eight hundred pounds.
 The length of the spinal projections between the shoulders is very
 great. A white hunter, who was the best authority among hunters that I
 could have, told me that the male was not eighteen inches taller than
 the female; yet he agreed that he was sometimes nine feet high to the
 top of the back, and weighed a thousand pounds. Only the male has
 horns, and they rise two feet or more above the shoulders,--spreading
 three or four, and sometimes six feet,--which would make him in all,
 sometimes, eleven feet high! According to this calculation, the moose
 is as tall, though it may not be as large, as the great Irish elk,
 _Megaceros Hibernicus_, of a former period, of which Mantell says that
 it "very far exceeded in magnitude any living species, the skeleton"
 being "upward of ten feet high from the ground to the highest point of
 the antlers." Joe said, that, though the moose shed the whole horn
 annually, each new horn has an additional prong; but I have noticed
 that they sometimes have more prongs on one side than on the other. I
 was struck with the delicacy and tenderness of the hoofs, which divide
 very far up, and the one half could be pressed very much behind the
 other, thus probably making the animal surer-footed on the uneven
 ground and slippery moss-covered logs of the primitive forest. They
 were very unlike the stiff and battered feet of our horses and oxen.
 The bare, horny part of the fore foot was just six inches long, and
 the two portions could be separated four inches at the extremities.
 
 The moose is singularly grotesque and awkward to look at. Why should
 it stand so high at the shoulders? Why have so long a head? Why have
 no tail to speak of? for in my examination I overlooked it entirely.
 Naturalists say it is an inch and a half long. It reminded me at once
 of the camelopard, high before and low behind,--and no wonder, for,
 like it, it is fitted to browse on trees. The upper lip projected two
 inches beyond the lower for this purpose. This was the kind of man
 that was at home there; for, as near as I can learn, that has never
 been the residence, but rather the hunting-ground of the Indian. The
 moose will, perhaps, one day become extinct; but how naturally then,
 when it exists only as a fossil relic, and unseen as that, may the
 poet or sculptor invent a fabulous animal with similar branching and
 leafy horns,--a sort of fucus or lichen in bone,--to be the inhabitant
 of such a forest as this!
 
 Here, just at the head of the murmuring rapids, Joe now proceeded to
 skin the moose with a pocket-knife, while I looked on; and a tragical
 business it was,--to see that still warm and palpitating body pierced
 with a knife, to see the warm milk stream from the rent udder, and the
 ghastly naked red carcass appearing from within its seemly robe, which
 was made to hide it. The ball had passed through the shoulder-blade
 diagonally and lodged under the skin on the opposite side, and was
 partially flattened. My companion keeps it to show to his
 grandchildren. He has the shanks of another moose which he has since
 shot, skinned and stuffed, ready to be made into boots by putting in a
 thick leather sole. Joe said, if a moose stood fronting you, you must
 not fire, but advance toward him, for he will turn slowly and give you
 a fair shot. In the bed of this narrow, wild, and rocky stream,
 between two lofty walls of spruce and firs, a mere cleft in the forest
 which the stream had made, this work went on. At length Joe had
 stripped off the hide and dragged it trailing to the shore, declaring
 that it weighed a hundred pounds, though probably fifty would have
 been nearer the truth. He cut off a large mass of the meat to carry
 along, and another, together with the tongue and nose, he put with the
 hide on the shore to lie there all night, or till we returned. I was
 surprised that he thought of leaving this meat thus exposed by the
 side of the carcass, as the simplest course, not fearing that any
 creature would touch it; but nothing did. This could hardly have
 happened on the bank of one of our rivers in the eastern part of
 Massachusetts; but I suspect that fewer small wild animals are
 prowling there than with us. Twice, however, in this excursion, I had
 a glimpse of a species of large mouse.
 
 This stream was so withdrawn, and the moose-tracks were so fresh, that
 my companions, still bent on hunting, concluded to go farther up it
 and camp, and then hunt up or down at night. Half a mile above this,
 at a place where I saw the _Aster puniceus_ and the beaked hazel, as
 we paddled along, Joe, hearing a slight rustling amid the alders, and
 seeing something black about two rods off, jumped up and whispered,
 "Bear!" but before the hunter had discharged his piece, he corrected
 himself to "Beaver!"--"Hedgehog!" The bullet killed a large hedgehog
 more than two feet and eight inches long. The quills were rayed out
 and flattened on the hinder part of its back, even as if it had lain
 on that part, but were erect and long between this and the tail. Their
 points, closely examined, were seen to be finely bearded or barbed,
 and shaped like an awl, that is, a little concave, to give the barbs
 effect. After about a mile of still water, we prepared our camp on the
 right side, just at the foot of a considerable fall. Little chopping
 was done that night, for fear of scaring the moose. We had moose meat
 fried for supper. It tasted like tender beef, with perhaps more
 flavor,--sometimes like veal.
 
 After supper, the moon having risen, we proceeded to hunt a mile up
 this stream, first "carrying" about the falls. We made a picturesque
 sight, wending single file along the shore, climbing over rocks and
 logs, Joe, who brought up the rear, twirling his canoe in his hands as
 if it were a feather, in places where it was difficult to get along
 without a burden. We launched the canoe again from the ledge over
 which the stream fell, but after half a mile of still water, suitable
 for hunting, it became rapid again, and we were compelled to make our
 way along the shore, while Joe endeavored to get up in the birch
 alone, though it was still very difficult for him to pick his way amid
 the rocks in the night. We on the shore found the worst of walking, a
 perfect chaos of fallen and drifted trees, and of bushes projecting
 far over the water, and now and then we made our way across the mouth
 of a small tributary on a kind of network of alders. So we went
 tumbling on in the dark, being on the shady side, effectually scaring
 all the moose and bears that might be thereabouts. At length we came
 to a standstill, and Joe went forward to reconnoitre; but he reported
 that it was still a continuous rapid as far as he went, or half a
 mile, with no prospect of improvement, as if it were coming down from
 a mountain. So we turned about, hunting back to the camp through the
 still water. It was a splendid moonlight night, and I, getting sleepy
 as it grew late,--for I had nothing to do,--found it difficult to
 realize where I was. This stream was much more unfrequented than the
 main one, lumbering operations being no longer carried on in this
 quarter. It was only three or four rods wide, but the firs and spruce
 through which it trickled seemed yet taller by contrast. Being in this
 dreamy state, which the moonlight enhanced, I did not clearly discern
 the shore, but seemed, most of the time, to be floating through
 ornamental grounds,--for I associated the fir-tops with such
 scenes;--very high up some Broadway, and beneath or between their
 tops, I thought I saw an endless succession of porticoes and columns,
 cornices and facades, verandas and churches. I did not merely fancy
 this, but in my drowsy state such was the illusion. I fairly lost
 myself in sleep several times, still dreaming of that architecture and
 the nobility that dwelt behind and might issue from it: but all at
 once I would be aroused and brought back to a sense of my actual
 position by the sound of Joe's birch horn in the midst of all this
 silence calling the moose, _ugh_, _ugh_, _oo-oo-oo-oo-oo-oo_, and I
 prepared to hear a furious moose come rushing and crashing through the
 forest, and see him burst out on to the little strip of meadow by our
 side.
 
 But, on more accounts than one, I had had enough of moose-hunting. I
 had not come to the woods for this purpose, nor had I foreseen it,
 though I had been willing to learn how the Indian manoeuvred; but
 one moose killed was as good, if not as bad, as a dozen. The
 afternoon's tragedy, and my share in it, as it affected the innocence,
 destroyed the pleasure of my adventure. It is true, I came as near as
 is possible to come to being a hunter and miss it, myself; and as it
 is, I think that I could spend a year in the woods, fishing and
 hunting just enough to sustain myself, with satisfaction. This would
 be next to living like a philosopher on the fruits of the earth which
 you had raised, which also attracts me. But this hunting of the moose
 merely for the satisfaction of killing him,--not even for the sake of
 his hide,--without making any extraordinary exertion or running any
 risk yourself, is too much like going out by night to some wood-side
 pasture and shooting your neighbor's horses. These are God's own
 horses, poor, timid creatures, that will run fast enough as soon as
 they smell you, though they are nine feet high. Joe told us of some
 hunters who a year or two before had shot down several oxen by night,
 somewhere in the Maine woods, mistaking them for moose. And so might
 any of the hunters; and what is the difference in the sport, but the
 name? In the former case, having killed one of God's and _your own_
 oxen, you strip off its hide,--because that is the common trophy, and,
 moreover, you have heard that it may be sold for moccasins,--cut a
 steak from its haunches, and leave the huge carcass to smell to heaven
 for you. It is no better, at least, than to assist at a
 slaughter-house.
 
 This afternoon's experience suggested to me how base or coarse are the
 motives which commonly carry men into the wilderness. The explorers
 and lumberers generally are all hirelings, paid so much a day for
 their labor, and as such they have no more love for wild nature than
 wood-sawyers have for forests. Other white men and Indians who come
 here are for the most part hunters, whose object is to slay as many
 moose and other wild animals as possible. But, pray, could not one
 spend some weeks or years in the solitude of this vast wilderness with
 other employments than these,--employments perfectly sweet and
 innocent and ennobling? For one that comes with a pencil to sketch or
 sing, a thousand come with an axe or rifle. What a coarse and
 imperfect use Indians and hunters make of nature! No wonder that their
 race is so soon exterminated. I already, and for weeks afterward, felt
 my nature the coarser for this part of my woodland experience, and was
 reminded that our life should be lived as tenderly and daintily as one
 would pluck a flower.
 
 With these thoughts, when we reached our camping-ground, I decided to
 leave my companions to continue moose-hunting down the stream, while I
 prepared the camp, though they requested me not to chop much nor make
 a large fire, for fear I should scare their game. In the midst of the
 damp fir wood, high on the mossy bank, about nine o'clock of this
 bright moonlight night, I kindled a fire, when they were gone, and,
 sitting on the fir twigs, within sound of the falls, examined by its
 light the botanical specimens which I had collected that afternoon,
 and wrote down some of the reflections which I have here expanded; or
 I walked along the shore and gazed up the stream, where the whole
 space above the falls was filled with mellow light. As I sat before
 the fire on my fir-twig seat, without walls above or around me, I
 remembered how far on every hand that wilderness stretched, before you
 came to cleared or cultivated fields, and wondered if any bear or
 moose was watching the light of my fire; for Nature looked sternly
 upon me on account of the murder of the moose.
 
 Strange that so few ever come to the woods to see how the pine lives
 and grows and spires, lifting its evergreen arms to the light,--to see
 its perfect success; but most are content to behold it in the shape of
 many broad boards brought to market, and deem _that_ its true success!
 But the pine is no more lumber than man is, and to be made into boards
 and houses is no more its true and highest use than the truest use of
 a man is to be cut down and made into manure. There is a higher law
 affecting our relation to pines as well as to men. A pine cut down, a
 dead pine, is no more a pine than a dead human carcass is a man. Can
 he who has discovered only some of the values of whalebone and whale
 oil be said to have discovered the true use of the whale? Can he who
 slays the elephant for his ivory be said to have "seen the
 elephant"? These are petty and accidental uses; just as if a stronger
 race were to kill us in order to make buttons and flageolets of our
 bones; for everything may serve a lower as well as a higher use. Every
 creature is better alive than dead, men and moose and pine trees, and
 he who understands it aright will rather preserve its life than
 destroy it.
 
   [Illustration: _Pine Tree, Boar Mountain_]
 
 Is it the lumberman, then, who is the friend and lover of the pine,
 stands nearest to it, and understands its nature best? Is it the
 tanner who has barked it, or he who has boxed it for turpentine, whom
 posterity will fable to have been changed into a pine at last? No! no!
 it is the poet; he it is who makes the truest use of the pine, who
 does not fondle it with an axe, nor tickle it with a saw, nor stroke
 it with a plane, who knows whether its heart is false without cutting
 into it, who has not bought the stumpage of the township on which it
 stands. All the pines shudder and heave a sigh when that man steps on
 the forest floor. No, it is the poet, who loves them as his own shadow
 in the air, and lets them stand. I have been into the lumber-yard, and
 the carpenter's shop, and the tannery, and the lampblack factory, and
 the turpentine clearing; but when at length I saw the tops of the
 pines waving and reflecting the light at a distance high over all the
 rest of the forest, I realized that the former were not the highest
 use of the pine. It is not their bones or hide or tallow that I love
 most. It is the living spirit of the tree, not its spirit of
 turpentine, with which I sympathize, and which heals my cuts. It is as
 immortal as I am, and perchance will go to as high a heaven, there to
 tower above me still.
 
 Ere long, the hunters returned, not having seen a moose, but, in
 consequence of my suggestions, bringing a quarter of the dead one,
 which, with ourselves, made quite a load for the canoe.
 
 After breakfasting on moose meat, we returned down Pine Stream on our
 way to Chesuncook Lake, which was about five miles distant. We could
 see the red carcass of the moose lying in Pine Stream when nearly half
 a mile off. Just below the mouth of this stream were the most
 considerable rapids between the two lakes, called Pine Stream Falls,
 where were large flat rocks washed smooth, and at this time you could
 easily wade across above them. Joe ran down alone while we walked over
 the portage, my companion collecting spruce gum for his friends at
 home, and I looking for flowers. Near the lake, which we were
 approaching with as much expectation as if it had been a
 university,--for it is not often that the stream of our life opens
 into such expansions,--were islands, and a low and meadowy shore with
 scattered trees, birches, white and yellow, slanted over the water,
 and maples,--many of the white birches killed, apparently by
 inundations. There was considerable native grass; and even a few
 cattle--whose movements we heard, though we did not see them,
 mistaking them at first for moose--were pastured there.
 
 On entering the lake, where the stream runs southeasterly, and for
 some time before, we had a view of the mountains about Ktaadn
 (_Katahdinauquoh_ one says they are called), like a cluster of blue
 fungi of rank growth, apparently twenty-five or thirty miles distant,
 in a southeast direction, their summits concealed by clouds. Joe
 called some of them the Sowadnehunk Mountains. This is the name of a
 stream there, which another Indian told us meant "running between
 mountains." Though some lower summits were afterward uncovered, we got
 no more complete view of Ktaadn while we were in the woods. The
 clearing to which we were bound was on the right of the mouth of the
 river, and was reached by going round a low point, where the water was
 shallow to a great distance from the shore. Chesuncook Lake extends
 northwest and southeast, and is called eighteen miles long and three
 wide, without an island. We had entered the northwest corner of it,
 and when near the shore could see only part way down it. The principal
 mountains visible from the land here were those already mentioned,
 between southeast and east, and a few summits a little west of north,
 but generally the north and northwest horizon about the St. John and
 the British boundary was comparatively level.
 
 Ansell Smith's, the oldest and principal clearing about this lake,
 appeared to be quite a harbor for batteaux and canoes; seven or eight
 of the former were lying about, and there was a small scow for hay,
 and a capstan on a platform, now high and dry, ready to be floated and
 anchored to tow rafts with. It was a very primitive kind of harbor,
 where boats were drawn up amid the stumps,--such a one, methought, as
 the Argo might have been launched in. There were five other huts with
 small clearings on the opposite side of the lake, all at this end and
 visible from this point. One of the Smiths told me that it was so far
 cleared that they came here to live and built the present house four
 years before, though the family had been here but a few months.
 
 I was interested to see how a pioneer lived on this side of the
 country. His life is in some respects more adventurous than that of
 his brother in the West; for he contends with winter as well as the
 wilderness, and there is a greater interval of time at least between
 him and the army which is to follow. Here immigration is a tide which
 may ebb when it has swept away the pines; there it is not a tide, but
 an inundation, and roads and other improvements come steadily rushing
 after.
 
 As we approached the log house, a dozen rods from the lake, and
 considerably elevated above it, the projecting ends of the logs
 lapping over each other irregularly several feet at the corners gave
 it a very rich and picturesque look, far removed from the meanness of
 weather-boards. It was a very spacious, low building, about eighty
 feet long, with many large apartments. The walls were well clayed
 between the logs, which were large and round, except on the upper and
 under sides, and as visible inside as out, successive bulging cheeks
 gradually lessening upwards and tuned to each other with the axe, like
 Pandean pipes. Probably the musical forest gods had not yet cast them
 aside; they never do till they are split or the bark is gone. It was a
 style of architecture not described by Vitruvius, I suspect, though
 possibly hinted at in the biography of Orpheus; none of your frilled
 or fluted columns, which have cut such a false swell, and support
 nothing but a gable end and their builder's pretensions,--that is,
 with the multitude; and as for "ornamentation," one of those words
 with a dead tail which architects very properly use to describe their
 flourishes, there were the lichens and mosses and fringes of bark,
 which nobody troubled himself about. We certainly leave the handsomest
 paint and clapboards behind in the woods, when we strip off the bark
 and poison ourselves with white-lead in the towns. We get but half the
 spoils of the forest. For beauty, give me trees with the fur on. This
 house was designed and constructed with the freedom of stroke of a
 forester's axe, without other compass and square than Nature uses.
 Wherever the logs were cut off by a window or door, that is, were not
 kept in place by alternate overlapping, they were held one upon
 another by very large pins, driven in diagonally on each side, where
 branches might have been, and then cut off so close up and down as not
 to project beyond the bulge of the log, as if the logs clasped each
 other in their arms. These logs were posts, studs, boards, clapboards,
 laths, plaster, and nails, all in one. Where the citizen uses a mere
 sliver or board, the pioneer uses the whole trunk of a tree. The house
 had large stone chimneys, and was roofed with spruce-bark. The windows
 were imported, all but the casings. One end was a regular logger's
 camp, for the boarders, with the usual fir floor and log benches. Thus
 this house was but a slight departure from the hollow tree, which the
 bear still inhabits,--being a hollow made with trees piled up, with a
 coating of bark like its original.
 
 The cellar was a separate building, like an ice-house, and it answered
 for a refrigerator at this season, our moose meat being kept there. It
 was a potato hole with a permanent roof. Each structure and
 institution here was so primitive that you could at once refer it to
 its source; but our buildings commonly suggest neither their origin
 nor their purpose. There was a large, and what farmers would call
 handsome, barn, part of whose boards had been sawed by a whip-saw; and
 the saw-pit, with its great pile of dust, remained before the house.
 The long split shingles on a portion of the barn were laid a foot to
 the weather, suggesting what kind of weather they have there. Grant's
 barn at Caribou Lake was said to be still larger, the biggest ox-nest
 in the woods, fifty feet by a hundred. Think of a monster barn in that
 primitive forest lifting its gray back above the tree-tops! Man makes
 very much such a nest for his domestic animals, of withered grass and
 fodder, as the squirrels and many other wild creatures do for
 themselves.
 
 There was also a blacksmith's shop, where plainly a good deal of work
 was done. The oxen and horses used in lumbering operations were shod,
 and all the iron-work of sleds, etc., was repaired or made here. I saw
 them load a batteau at the Moosehead Carry, the next Tuesday, with
 about thirteen hundredweight of bar iron for this shop. This reminded
 me how primitive and honorable a trade was Vulcan's. I do not hear
 that there was any carpenter or tailor among the gods. The smith seems
 to have preceded these and every other mechanic at Chesuncook as well
 as on Olympus, and his family is the most widely dispersed, whether he
 be christened John or Ansell.
 
 Smith owned two miles down the lake by half a mile in width. There
 were about one hundred acres cleared here. He cut seventy tons of
 English hay this year on this ground, and twenty more on another
 clearing, and he uses it all himself in lumbering operations. The barn
 was crowded with pressed hay, and a machine to press it. There was a
 large garden full of roots,--turnips, beets, carrots, potatoes, etc.,
 all of great size. They said that they were worth as much here as in
 New York. I suggested some currants for sauce, especially as they had
 no apple trees set out, and showed how easily they could be obtained.
 
 There was the usual long-handled axe of the primitive woods by the
 door, three and a half feet long,--for my new black-ash rule was in
 constant use,--and a large, shaggy dog, whose nose, report said, was
 full of porcupine quills. I can testify that he looked very sober.
 This is the usual fortune of pioneer dogs, for they have to face the
 brunt of the battle for their race, and act the part of Arnold
 Winkelried without intending it. If he should invite one of his town
 friends up this way, suggesting moose meat and unlimited freedom, the
 latter might pertinently inquire, "What is that sticking in your
 nose?" When a generation or two have used up all the enemies' darts,
 their successors lead a comparatively easy life. We owe to our fathers
 analogous blessings. Many old people receive pensions for no other
 reason, it seems to me, but as a compensation for having lived a long
 time ago. No doubt our town dogs still talk, in a snuffling way, about
 the days that tried dogs' noses. How they got a cat up there I do not
 know, for they are as shy as my aunt about entering a canoe. I
 wondered that she did not run up a tree on the way; but perhaps she
 was bewildered by the very crowd of opportunities.
 
 Twenty or thirty lumberers, Yankee and Canadian, were coming and
 going,--Aleck among the rest,--and from time to time an Indian touched
 here. In the winter there are sometimes a hundred men lodged here at
 once. The most interesting piece of news that circulated among them
 appeared to be, that four horses belonging to Smith, worth seven
 hundred dollars, had passed by farther into the woods a week before.
 
 The white pine tree was at the bottom or farther end of all this. It
 is a war against the pines, the only real Aroostook or Penobscot war.
 I have no doubt that they lived pretty much the same sort of life in
 the Homeric age, for men have always thought more of eating than of
 fighting; then, as now, their minds ran chiefly on the "hot bread and
 sweet cakes;" and the fur and lumber trade is an old story to Asia and
 Europe. I doubt if men ever made a trade of heroism. In the days of
 Achilles, even, they delighted in big barns, and perchance in pressed
 hay, and he who possessed the most valuable team was the best fellow.
 
 We had designed to go on at evening up the Caucomgomoc, whose mouth
 was a mile or two distant, to the lake of the same name, about ten
 miles off; but some Indians of Joe's acquaintance, who were making
 canoes on the Caucomgomoc, came over from that side, and gave so poor
 an account of the moose-hunting, so many had been killed there lately,
 that my companions concluded not to go there. Joe spent this Sunday
 and the night with his acquaintances. The lumberers told me that there
 were many moose hereabouts, but no caribou or deer. A man from Oldtown
 had killed ten or twelve moose, within a year, so near the house that
 they heard all his guns. His name may have been Hercules, for aught I
 know, though I should rather have expected to hear the rattling of his
 club; but, no doubt, he keeps pace with the improvements of the age,
 and uses a Sharp's rifle now; probably he gets all his armor made and
 repaired at Smith's shop. One moose had been killed and another shot
 at within sight of the house within two years. I do not know whether
 Smith has yet got a poet to look after the cattle, which, on account
 of the early breaking up of the ice, are compelled to summer in the
 woods, but I would suggest this office to such of my acquaintances as
 love to write verses and go a-gunning.
 
 After a dinner at which apple-sauce was the greatest luxury to me, but
 our moose meat was oftenest called for by the lumberers, I walked
 across the clearing into the forest, southward, returning along the
 shore. For my dessert, I helped myself to a large slice of the
 Chesuncook woods, and took a hearty draught of its waters with all my
 senses. The woods were as fresh and full of vegetable life as a lichen
 in wet weather, and contained many interesting plants; but unless they
 are of white pine, they are treated with as little respect here as a
 mildew, and in the other case they are only the more quickly cut down.
 The shore was of coarse, flat, slate rocks, often in slabs, with the
 surf beating on it. The rocks and bleached drift-logs, extending some
 way into the shaggy woods, showed a rise and fall of six or eight
 feet, caused partly by the dam at the outlet. They said that in winter
 the snow was three feet deep on a level here, and sometimes four or
 five,--that the ice on the lake was two feet thick, clear, and four
 feet including the snow-ice. Ice had already formed in vessels.
 
 We lodged here this Sunday night in a comfortable bedroom, apparently
 the best one; and all that I noticed unusual in the night--for I still
 kept taking notes, like a spy in the camp--was the creaking of the
 thin split boards, when any of our neighbors stirred.
 
 Such were the first rude beginnings of a town. They spoke of the
 practicability of a winter road to the Moosehead Carry, which would
 not cost much, and would connect them with steam and staging and all
 the busy world. I almost doubted if the lake would be there,--the
 self-same lake,--preserve its form and identity, when the shores
 should be cleared and settled; as if these lakes and streams which
 explorers report never awaited the advent of the citizen.
 
 The sight of one of these frontier houses, built of these great logs,
 whose inhabitants have unflinchingly maintained their ground many
 summers and winters in the wilderness, reminds me of famous forts,
 like Ticonderoga or Crown Point, which have sustained memorable
 sieges. They are especially winter-quarters, and at this season this
 one had a partially deserted look, as if the siege were raised a
 little, the snowbanks being melted from before it, and its garrison
 accordingly reduced. I think of their daily food as rations,--it is
 called "supplies;" a Bible and a greatcoat are munitions of war, and a
 single man seen about the premises is a sentinel on duty. You expect
 that he will require the countersign, and will perchance take you for
 Ethan Allen, come to demand the surrender of his fort in the name of
 the Continental Congress. It is a sort of ranger service. Arnold's
 expedition is a daily experience with these settlers. They can prove
 that they were out at almost any time; and I think that all the first
 generation of them deserve a pension more than any that went to the
 Mexican war.
 
 Early the next morning we started on our return up the Penobscot, my
 companion wishing to go about twenty-five miles above the Moosehead
 Carry to a camp near the junction of the two forks, and look for moose
 there. Our host allowed us something for the quarter of the moose
 which we had brought, and which he was glad to get. Two explorers from
 Chamberlain Lake started at the same time that we did. Red flannel
 shirts should be worn in the woods, if only for the fine contrast
 which this color makes with the evergreens and the water. Thus I
 thought when I saw the forms of the explorers in their birch, poling
 up the rapids before us, far off against the forest. It is the
 surveyor's color also, most distinctly seen under all circumstances.
 We stopped to dine at Ragmuff, as before. My companion it was who
 wandered up the stream to look for moose this time, while Joe went to
 sleep on the bank, so that we felt sure of him; and I improved the
 opportunity to botanize and bathe. Soon after starting again, while
 Joe was gone back in the canoe for the frying-pan, which had been
 left, we picked a couple of quarts of tree-cranberries for a sauce.
 
 I was surprised by Joe's asking me how far it was to the Moosehorn. He
 was pretty well acquainted with this stream, but he had noticed that I
 was curious about distances, and had several maps. He and Indians
 generally, with whom I have talked, are not able to describe
 dimensions or distances in our measures with any accuracy. He could
 tell, perhaps, at what time we should arrive, but not how far it was.
 We saw a few wood ducks, sheldrakes, and black ducks, but they were
 not so numerous there at that season as on our river at home. We
 scared the same family of wood ducks before us, going and returning.
 We also heard the note of one fish hawk, somewhat like that of a
 pigeon woodpecker, and soon after saw him perched near the top of a
 dead white pine against the island where we had first camped, while a
 company of peetweets were twittering and teetering about over the
 carcass of a moose on a low sandy spit just beneath. We drove the fish
 hawk from perch to perch, each time eliciting a scream or whistle, for
 many miles before us. Our course being up-stream, we were obliged to
 work much harder than before, and had frequent use for a pole.
 Sometimes all three of us paddled together, standing up, small and
 heavily laden as the canoe was. About six miles from Moosehead, we
 began to see the mountains east of the north end of the lake, and at
 four o'clock we reached the carry.
 
 The Indians were still encamped here. There were three, including the
 St. Francis Indian who had come in the steamer with us. One of the
 others was called Sabattis. Joe and the St. Francis Indian were
 plainly clear Indian, the other two apparently mixed Indian and white;
 but the difference was confined to their features and complexion, for
 all that I could see. We here cooked the tongue of the moose for
 supper,--having left the nose, which is esteemed the choicest part, at
 Chesuncook, boiling, it being a good deal of trouble to prepare it.
 We also stewed our tree-cranberries (_Viburnum opulus_), sweetening
 them with sugar. The lumberers sometimes cook them with molasses. They
 were used in Arnold's expedition. This sauce was very grateful to us
 who had been confined to hard-bread, pork, and moose meat, and,
 notwithstanding their seeds, we all three pronounced them equal to the
 common cranberry; but perhaps some allowance is to be made for our
 forest appetites. It would be worth the while to cultivate them, both
 for beauty and for food. I afterward saw them in a garden in Bangor.
 Joe said that they were called _ebeemenar_.
 
 While we were getting supper, Joe commenced curing the moose-hide, on
 which I had sat a good part of the voyage, he having already cut most
 of the hair off with his knife at the Caucomgomoc. He set up two stout
 forked poles on the bank, seven or eight feet high, and as much
 asunder east and west, and having cut slits eight or ten inches long,
 and the same distance apart, close to the edge, on the sides of the
 hide, he threaded poles through them, and then, placing one of the
 poles on the forked stakes, tied the other down tightly at the bottom.
 The two ends also were tied with cedar bark, their usual string, to
 the upright poles, through small holes at short intervals. The hide,
 thus stretched, and slanted a little to the north, to expose its flesh
 side to the sun, measured, in the extreme, eight feet long by six
 high. Where any flesh still adhered, Joe boldly scored it with his
 knife to lay it open to the sun. It now appeared somewhat spotted and
 injured by the duck shot. You may see the old frames on which hides
 have been stretched at many camping-places in these woods.
 
 For some reason or other, the going to the forks of the Penobscot was
 given up, and we decided to stop here, my companion intending to hunt
 down the stream at night. The Indians invited us to lodge with them,
 but my companion inclined to go to the log camp on the carry. This
 camp was close and dirty, and had an ill smell, and I preferred to
 accept the Indians' offer, if we did not make a camp for ourselves;
 for, though they were dirty, too, they were more in the open air, and
 were much more agreeable, and even refined company, than the
 lumberers. The most interesting question entertained at the lumberers'
 camp was, which man could "handle" any other on the carry; and, for
 the most part, they possessed no qualities which you could not lay
 hands on. So we went to the Indians' camp or wigwam.
 
 It was rather windy, and therefore Joe concluded to hunt after
 midnight, if the wind went down, which the other Indians thought it
 would not do, because it was from the south. The two mixed-bloods,
 however, went off up the river for moose at dark, before we arrived at
 their camp. This Indian camp was a slight, patched-up affair, which
 had stood there several weeks, built shed-fashion, open to the fire on
 the west. If the wind changed, they could turn it round. It was formed
 by two forked stakes and a cross-bar, with rafters slanted from this
 to the ground. The covering was partly an old sail, partly birch-bark,
 quite imperfect, but securely tied on, and coming down to the ground
 on the sides. A large log was rolled up at the back side for a
 headboard, and two or three moose-hides were spread on the ground
 with the hair up. Various articles of their wardrobe were tucked
 around the sides and corners, or under the roof. They were smoking
 moose meat on just such a crate as is represented by With, in De Bry's
 "Collectio Peregrinationum," published in 1588, and which the natives
 of Brazil called _boucan_ (whence buccaneer), on which were frequently
 shown pieces of human flesh drying along with the rest. It was erected
 in front of the camp over the usual large fire, in the form of an
 oblong square. Two stout forked stakes, four or five feet apart and
 five feet high, were driven into the ground at each end, and then two
 poles ten feet long were stretched across over the fire, and smaller
 ones laid transversely on these a foot apart. On the last hung large,
 thin slices of moose meat smoking and drying, a space being left open
 over the centre of the fire. There was the whole heart, black as a
 thirty-two pound ball, hanging at one corner. They said that it took
 three or four days to cure this meat, and it would keep a year or
 more. Refuse pieces lay about on the ground in different stages of
 decay, and some pieces also in the fire, half buried and sizzling in
 the ashes, as black and dirty as an old shoe. These last I at first
 thought were thrown away, but afterwards found that they were being
 cooked. Also a tremendous rib-piece was roasting before the fire,
 being impaled on an upright stake forced in and out between the ribs.
 There was a moose-hide stretched and curing on poles like ours, and
 quite a pile of cured skins close by. They had killed twenty-two moose
 within two months, but, as they could use but very little of the meat,
 they left the carcases on the ground. Altogether it was about as
 savage a sight as was ever witnessed, and I was carried back at once
 three hundred years. There were many torches of birch-bark, shaped
 like straight tin horns, lying ready for use on a stump outside.
 
 For fear of dirt, we spread our blankets over their hides, so as not
 to touch them anywhere. The St. Francis Indian and Joe alone were
 there at first, and we lay on our backs talking with them till
 midnight. They were very sociable, and, when they did not talk with
 us, kept up a steady chatting in their own language. We heard a small
 bird just after dark, which, Joe said, sang at a certain hour in the
 night,--at ten o'clock, he believed. We also heard the hylodes and
 tree-toads, and the lumberers singing in their camp a quarter of a
 mile off. I told them that I had seen pictured in old books pieces of
 human flesh drying on these crates; whereupon they repeated some
 tradition about the Mohawks eating human flesh, what parts they
 preferred, etc., and also of a battle with the Mohawks near Moosehead,
 in which many of the latter were killed; but I found that they knew
 but little of the history of their race, and could be entertained by
 stories about their ancestors as readily as any way. At first I was
 nearly roasted out, for I lay against one side of the camp, and felt
 the heat reflected not only from the birch-bark above, but from the
 side; and again I remembered the sufferings of the Jesuit
 missionaries, and what extremes of heat and cold the Indians were said
 to endure. I struggled long between my desire to remain and talk with
 them and my impulse to rush out and stretch myself on the cool grass;
 and when I was about to take the last step, Joe, hearing my murmurs,
 or else being uncomfortable himself, got up and partially dispersed
 the fire. I suppose that that is Indian manners,--to defend yourself.
 
 While lying there listening to the Indians, I amused myself with
 trying to guess at their subject by their gestures, or some proper
 name introduced. There can be no more startling evidence of their
 being a distinct and comparatively aboriginal race than to hear this
 unaltered Indian language, which the white man cannot speak nor
 understand. We may suspect change and deterioration in almost every
 other particular but the language which is so wholly unintelligible to
 us. It took me by surprise, though I had found so many arrowheads, and
 convinced me that the Indian was not the invention of historians and
 poets. It was a purely wild and primitive American sound, as much as
 the barking of a chickaree, and I could not understand a syllable of
 it; but Paugus, had he been there, would have understood it. These
 Abenakis gossiped, laughed, and jested, in the language in which
 Eliot's Indian Bible is written, the language which has been spoken in
 New England who shall say how long? These were the sounds that issued
 from the wigwams of this country before Columbus was born; they have
 not yet died away; and, with remarkably few exceptions, the language
 of their forefathers is still copious enough for them. I felt that I
 stood, or rather lay, as near to the primitive man of America, that
 night, as any of its discoverers ever did.
 
 In the midst of their conversation, Joe suddenly appealed to me to
 know how long Moosehead Lake was.
 
 Meanwhile, as we lay there, Joe was making and trying his horn, to be
 ready for hunting after midnight. The St. Francis Indian also amused
 himself with sounding it, or rather calling through it; for the sound
 is made with the voice, and not by blowing through the horn. The
 latter appeared to be a speculator in moose-hides. He bought my
 companion's for two dollars and a quarter, green. Joe said that it was
 worth two and a half at Oldtown. Its chief use is for moccasins. One
 or two of these Indians wore them. I was told that, by a recent law of
 Maine, foreigners are not allowed to kill moose there at any season;
 white Americans can kill them only at a particular season, but the
 Indians of Maine at all seasons. The St. Francis Indian accordingly
 asked my companion for a _wighiggin_, or bill, to show, since he was a
 foreigner. He lived near Sorel. I found that he could write his name
 very well, Tahmunt Swasen. One Ellis, an old white man of Guilford, a
 town through which we passed, not far from the south end of Moosehead,
 was the most celebrated moose-hunter of those parts. Indians and
 whites spoke with equal respect of him. Tahmunt said that there were
 more moose here than in the Adirondack country in New York, where he
 had hunted; that three years before there were a great many about, and
 there were a great many now in the woods, but they did not come out to
 the water. It was of no use to hunt them at midnight,--they would not
 come out then. I asked Sabattis, after he came home, if the moose
 never attacked him. He answered that you must not fire many times, so
 as to mad him. "I fire once and hit him in the right place, and in the
 morning I find him. He won't go far. But if you keep firing, you mad
 him. I fired once five bullets, every one through the heart, and he
 did not mind 'em at all; it only made him more mad." I asked him if
 they did not hunt them with dogs. He said that they did so in winter,
 but never in the summer, for then it was of no use; they would run
 right off straight and swiftly a hundred miles.
 
 Another Indian said that the moose, once scared, would run all day. A
 dog will hang to their lips, and be carried along till he is swung
 against a tree and drops off. They cannot run on a "glaze," though
 they can run in snow four feet deep; but the caribou can run on ice.
 They commonly find two or three moose together. They cover themselves
 with water, all but their noses, to escape flies. He had the horns of
 what he called "the black moose that goes in low lands." These spread
 three or four feet. The "red moose" was another kind, "running on
 mountains," and had horns which spread six feet. Such were his
 distinctions. Both can move their horns. The broad flat blades are
 covered with hair, and are so soft, when the animal is alive, that you
 can run a knife through them. They regard it as a good or bad sign, if
 the horns turn this way or that. His caribou horns had been gnawed by
 mice in his wigwam, but he thought that the horns neither of the moose
 nor of the caribou were ever gnawed while the creature was alive, as
 some have asserted. An Indian, whom I met after this at Oldtown, who
 had carried about a bear and other animals of Maine to exhibit, told
 me that thirty years ago there were not so many moose in Maine as
 now; also, that the moose were very easily tamed, and would come back
 when once fed, and so would deer, but not caribou. The Indians of this
 neighborhood are about as familiar with the moose as we are with the
 ox, having associated with them for so many generations. Father
 Rasles, in his Dictionary of the Abenaki Language, gives not only a
 word for the male moose (_aianbe_), and another for the female
 (_herar_), but for the bone which is in the middle of the heart of the
 moose (!), and for his left hind leg.
 
 There were none of the small deer up there; they are more common about
 the settlements. One ran into the city of Bangor two years before, and
 jumped through a window of costly plate glass, and then into a mirror,
 where it thought it recognized one of its kind, and out again, and so
 on, leaping over the heads of the crowd, until it was captured. This
 the inhabitants speak of as the deer that went a-shopping. The
 last-mentioned Indian spoke of the _lunxus_ or Indian devil (which I
 take to be the cougar, and not the _Gulo luscus_), as the only animal
 in Maine which man need fear; it would follow a man, and did not mind
 a fire. He also said that beavers were getting to be pretty numerous
 again, where we went, but their skins brought so little now that it
 was not profitable to hunt them.
 
 I had put the ears of our moose, which were ten inches long, to dry
 along with the moose meat over the fire, wishing to preserve them; but
 Sabattis told me that I must skin and cure them, else the hair would
 all come off. He observed that they made tobacco pouches of the skins
 of their ears, putting the two together inside to inside. I asked him
 how he got fire; and he produced a little cylindrical box of friction
 matches. He also had flints and steel, and some punk, which was not
 dry; I think it was from the yellow birch. "But suppose you upset, and
 all these and your powder get wet." "Then," said he, "we wait till we
 get to where there is some fire." I produced from my pocket a little
 vial, containing matches, stoppled water-tight, and told him, that,
 though we were upset, we should still have some dry matches; at which
 he stared without saying a word.
 
 We lay awake thus a long while talking, and they gave us the meaning
 of many Indian names of lakes and streams in the vicinity,--especially
 Tahmunt. I asked the Indian name of Moosehead Lake. Joe answered
 _Sebamook_; Tahmunt pronounced it _Sebemook_. When I asked what it
 meant, they answered, Moosehead Lake. At length, getting my meaning,
 they alternately repeated the word over to themselves, as a
 philologist might,--_Sebamook_,--_Sebamook_,--now and then comparing
 notes in Indian; for there was a slight difference in their dialects;
 and finally Tahmunt said, "Ugh! I know,"--and he rose up partly on the
 moose-hide,--"like as here is a place, and there is a place," pointing
 to different parts of the hide, "and you take water from there and
 fill this, and it stays here; that is _Sebamook_." I understood him to
 mean that it was a reservoir of water which did not run away, the
 river coming in on one side and passing out again near the same place,
 leaving a permanent bay. Another Indian said, that it meant Large Bay
 Lake, and that _Sebago_ and _Sebec_, the names of other lakes, were
 kindred words, meaning large open water. Joe said that _Seboois_ meant
 Little River. I observed their inability, often described, to convey
 an abstract idea. Having got the idea, though indistinctly, they
 groped about in vain for words with which to express it. Tahmunt
 thought that the whites called it Moosehead Lake, because Mount Kineo,
 which commands it, is shaped like a moose's head, and that Moose River
 was so called "because the mountain points right across the lake to
 its mouth." John Josselyn, writing about 1673, says, "Twelve miles
 from Casco Bay, and passable for men and horses, is a lake, called by
 the Indians Sebug. On the brink thereof, at one end, is the famous
 rock, shaped like a moose deer or helk, diaphanous, and called the
 Moose Rock." He appears to have confounded Sebamook with Sebago, which
 is nearer, but has no "diaphanous" rock on its shore.
 
 I give more of their definitions, for what they are worth,--partly
 _because_ they differ sometimes from the commonly received ones. They
 never analyzed these words before. After long deliberation and
 repeating of the word,--for it gave much trouble,--Tahmunt said that
 _Chesuncook_ meant a place where many streams emptied in (?), and he
 enumerated them,--Penobscot, Umbazookskus, Cusabesex, Red Brook, etc.
 "_Caucomgomoc_,--what does that mean?" "What are those large white
 birds?" he asked. "Gulls," said I. "Ugh! Gull Lake." _Pammadumcook_,
 Joe thought, meant the Lake with Gravelly Bottom or Bed. _Kenduskeag_,
 Tahmunt concluded at last, after asking if birches went up it,--for he
 said that he was not much acquainted with it,--meant something like
 this: "You go up Penobscot till you come to _Kenduskeag_, and you go
 by, you don't turn up there. That is _Kenduskeag_." (?) Another
 Indian, however, who knew the river better, told us afterward that it
 meant Little Eel River. _Mattawamkeag_ was a place where two rivers
 meet. (?) _Penobscot_ was Rocky River. One writer says that this was
 "originally the name of only a section of the main channel, from the
 head of the tide-water to a short distance above Oldtown."
 
 A very intelligent Indian, whom we afterward met, son-in-law of
 Neptune, gave us also these other definitions: _Umbazookskus_, Meadow
 Stream; _Millinoket_, Place of Islands; _Aboljacarmegus_, Smooth-Ledge
 Falls (and Deadwater); _Aboljacarmeguscook_, the stream emptying in
 (the last was the word he gave when I asked about _Aboljacknagesic_,
 which he did not recognize); _Mattahumkeag_, Sand-Creek Pond;
 _Piscataquis_, Branch of a River.
 
 I asked our hosts what _Musketaquid_, the Indian name of Concord,
 Massachusetts, meant; but they changed it to _Musketicook_, and
 repeated that, and Tahmunt said that it meant Dead Stream, which is
 probably true. _Cook_ appears to mean stream, and perhaps _quid_
 signifies the place or ground. When I asked the meaning of the names
 of two of our hills, they answered that they were another language. As
 Tahmunt said that he traded at Quebec, my companion inquired the
 meaning of the word _Quebec_, about which there has been so much
 question. He did not know, but began to conjecture. He asked what
 those great ships were called that carried soldiers. "Men-of-war," we
 answered. "Well," he said, "when the English ships came up the river,
 they could not go any farther, it was so narrow there; they must go
 back,--go-back,--that's Que-bec." I mention this to show the value of
 his authority in the other cases.
 
 Late at night the other two Indians came home from moose-hunting, not
 having been successful, aroused the fire again, lighted their pipes,
 smoked awhile, took something strong to drink, and ate some moose
 meat, and, finding what room they could, lay down on the moose-hides;
 and thus we passed the night, two white men and four Indians, side by
 side.
 
 When I awoke in the morning the weather was drizzling. One of the
 Indians was lying outside, rolled in his blanket, on the opposite side
 of the fire, for want of room. Joe had neglected to awake my
 companion, and he had done no hunting that night. Tahmunt was making a
 cross-bar for his canoe with a singularly shaped knife, such as I have
 since seen other Indians using. The blade was thin, about three
 quarters of an inch wide, and eight or nine inches long, but curved
 out of its plane into a hook, which he said made it more convenient to
 shave with. As the Indians very far north and northwest use the same
 kind of knife, I suspect that it was made according to an aboriginal
 pattern, though some white artisans may use a similar one. The Indians
 baked a loaf of flour bread in a spider on its edge before the fire
 for their breakfast; and while my companion was making tea, I caught a
 dozen sizable fishes in the Penobscot, two kinds of sucker and one
 trout. After we had breakfasted by ourselves, one of our bed-fellows,
 who had also breakfasted, came along, and, being invited, took a cup
 of tea, and finally, taking up the common platter, licked it clean.
 But he was nothing to a white fellow, a lumberer, who was continually
 stuffing himself with the Indians' moose meat, and was the butt of his
 companions accordingly. He seems to have thought that it was a feast
 "to eat all." It is commonly said that the white man finally surpasses
 the Indian on his own ground, and it was proved true in this case. I
 cannot swear to his employment during the hours of darkness, but I saw
 him at it again as soon as it was light, though he came a quarter of a
 mile to his work.
 
 The rain prevented our continuing any longer in the woods; so, giving
 some of our provisions and utensils to the Indians, we took leave of
 them. This being the steamer's day, I set out for the lake at once.
 
 I walked over the carry alone and waited at the head of the lake. An
 eagle, or some other large bird, flew screaming away from its perch by
 the shore at my approach. For an hour after I reached the shore there
 was not a human being to be seen, and I had all that wide prospect to
 myself. I thought that I heard the sound of the steamer before she
 came in sight on the open lake. I noticed at the landing, when the
 steamer came in, one of our bed-fellows, who had been a-moose-hunting
 the night before, now very sprucely dressed in a clean white shirt and
 fine black pants, a true Indian dandy, who had evidently come over the
 carry to show himself to any arrivers on the north shore of Moosehead
 Lake, just as New York dandies take a turn up Broadway and stand on
 the steps of a hotel.
 
 Midway the lake we took on board two manly-looking middle-aged men,
 with their batteau, who had been exploring for six weeks as far as the
 Canada line, and had let their beards grow. They had the skin of a
 beaver, which they had recently caught, stretched on an oval hoop,
 though the fur was not good at that season. I talked with one of them,
 telling him that I had come all this distance partly to see where the
 white pine, the Eastern stuff of which our houses are built, grew, but
 that on this and a previous excursion into another part of Maine I had
 found it a scarce tree; and I asked him where I must look for it. With
 a smile, he answered that he could hardly tell me. However, he said
 that he had found enough to employ two teams the next winter in a
 place where there was thought to be none left. What was considered a
 "tip-top" tree now was not looked at twenty years ago, when he first
 went into the business; but they succeeded very well now with what was
 considered quite inferior timber then. The explorer used to cut into a
 tree higher and higher up, to see if it was false-hearted, and if
 there was a rotten heart as big as his arm, he let it alone; but now
 they cut such a tree and sawed it all around the rot, and it made the
 very best of boards, for in such a case they were never shaky.
 
 One connected with lumbering operations at Bangor told me that the
 largest pine belonging to his firm, cut the previous winter, "scaled"
 in the woods four thousand five hundred feet, and was worth ninety
 dollars in the log at the Bangor boom in Oldtown. They cut a road
 three and a half miles long for this tree alone. He thought that the
 principal locality for the white pine that came down the Penobscot
 now was at the head of the East Branch and the Allegash, about Webster
 Stream and Eagle and Chamberlain lakes. Much timber has been stolen
 from the public lands. (Pray, what kind of forest-warden is the Public
 itself?) I heard of one man who, having discovered some particularly
 fine trees just within the boundaries of the public lands, and not
 daring to employ an accomplice, cut them down, and by means of block
 and tackle, without cattle, tumbled them into a stream, and so
 succeeded in getting off with them without the least assistance.
 Surely, stealing pine trees in this way is not so mean as robbing
 hen-roosts.
 
 We reached Monson that night, and the next day rode to Bangor, all the
 way in the rain again, varying our route a little. Some of the taverns
 on this road, which were particularly dirty, were plainly in a
 transition state from the camp to the house.
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 The next forenoon we went to Oldtown. One slender old Indian on the
 Oldtown shore, who recognized my companion, was full of mirth and
 gestures, like a Frenchman. A Catholic priest crossed to the island in
 the same batteau with us. The Indian houses are framed, mostly of one
 story, and in rows one behind another, at the south end of the island,
 with a few scattered ones. I counted about forty, not including the
 church and what my companion called the council-house. The last, which
 I suppose is their town-house, was regularly framed and shingled like
 the rest. There were several of two stories, quite neat, with front
 yards inclosed, and one at least had green blinds. Here and there
 were moose-hides stretched and drying about them. There were no
 cart-paths, nor tracks of horses, but footpaths; very little land
 cultivated, but an abundance of weeds, indigenous and naturalized;
 more introduced weeds than useful vegetables, as the Indian is said to
 cultivate the vices rather than the virtues of the white man. Yet this
 village was cleaner than I expected, far cleaner than such Irish
 villages as I have seen. The children were not particularly ragged nor
 dirty. The little boys met us with bow in hand and arrow on string,
 and cried, "Put up a cent." Verily, the Indian has but a feeble hold
 on his bow now; but the curiosity of the white man is insatiable, and
 from the first he has been eager to witness this forest
 accomplishment. That elastic piece of wood with its feathered dart, so
 sure to be unstrung by contact with civilization, will serve for the
 type, the coat-of-arms of the savage. Alas for the Hunter Race! the
 white man has driven off their game, and substituted a cent in its
 place. I saw an Indian woman washing at the water's edge. She stood on
 a rock, and, after dipping the clothes in the stream, laid them on the
 rock, and beat them with a short club. In the graveyard, which was
 crowded with graves, and overrun with weeds, I noticed an inscription
 in Indian, painted on a wooden grave-board. There was a large wooden
 cross on the island.
 
 Since my companion knew him, we called on Governor Neptune, who lived
 in a little "ten-footer," one of the humblest of them all.
 Personalities are allowable in speaking of public men, therefore I
 will give the particulars of our visit. He was abed. When we entered
 the room, which was one half of the house, he was sitting on the side
 of the bed. There was a clock hanging in one corner. He had on a black
 frock coat, and black pants, much worn, white cotton shirt, socks, a
 red silk handkerchief about his neck, and a straw hat. His black hair
 was only slightly grayed. He had very broad cheeks, and his features
 were decidedly and refreshingly different from those of any of the
 upstart Native American party whom I have seen. He was no darker than
 many old white men. He told me that he was eighty-nine; but he was
 going a-moose-hunting that fall, as he had been the previous one.
 Probably his companions did the hunting. We saw various squaws dodging
 about. One sat on the bed by his side and helped him out with his
 stories. They were remarkably corpulent, with smooth, round faces,
 apparently full of good-humor. Certainly our much-abused climate had
 not dried up their adipose substance. While we were there,--for we
 stayed a good while,--one went over to Oldtown, returned and cut out a
 dress, which she had bought, on another bed in the room. The Governor
 said that "he could remember when the moose were much larger; that
 they did not use to be in the woods, but came out of the water, as all
 deer did. Moose was whale once. Away down Merrimack way, a whale came
 ashore in a shallow bay. Sea went out and left him, and he came up on
 land a moose. What made them know he was a whale was, that at first,
 before he began to run in bushes, he had no bowels inside, but"--and
 then the squaw who sat on the bed by his side, as the Governor's aid,
 and had been putting in a word now and then and confirming the story,
 asked me what we called that soft thing we find along the seashore.
 "Jelly-fish," I suggested. "Yes," said he, "no bowels, but
 jelly-fish."
 
 There may be some truth in what he said about the moose growing larger
 formerly; for the quaint John Josselyn, a physician who spent many
 years in this very district of Maine in the seventeenth century, says
 that the tips of their horns "are sometimes found to be two fathoms
 asunder,"--and he is particular to tell us that a fathom is six
 feet,--"and [they are] in height, from the toe of the fore foot to the
 pitch of the shoulder, twelve foot, both which hath been taken by some
 of my sceptique readers to be monstrous lies;" and he adds, "There are
 certain transcendentia in every creature, which are the indelible
 character of God, and which discover God." This is a greater dilemma
 to be caught in than is presented by the cranium of the young Bechuana
 ox, apparently another of the _transcendentia_, in the collection of
 Thomas Steel, Upper Brook Street, London, whose "entire length of
 horn, from tip to tip, along the curve, is 13 ft. 5 in.; distance
 (straight) between the tips of the horns, 8 ft. 8-1/2 in." However, the
 size both of the moose and the cougar, as I have found, is generally
 rather underrated than overrated, and I should be inclined to add to
 the popular estimate a part of what I subtracted from Josselyn's.
 
 But we talked mostly with the Governor's son-in-law, a very sensible
 Indian; and the Governor, being so old and deaf, permitted himself to
 be ignored, while we asked questions about him. The former said that
 there were two political parties among them,--one in favor of schools,
 and the other opposed to them, or rather they did not wish to resist
 the priest, who was opposed to them. The first had just prevailed at
 the election and sent their man to the legislature. Neptune and
 Aitteon and he himself were in favor of schools. He said, "If Indians
 got learning, they would keep their money." When we asked where Joe's
 father, Aitteon, was, he knew that he must be at Lincoln, though he
 was about going a-moose-hunting, for a messenger had just gone to him
 there to get his signature to some papers. I asked Neptune if they had
 any of the old breed of dogs yet. He answered, "Yes." "But that," said
 I, pointing to one that had just come in, "is a Yankee dog." He
 assented. I said that he did not look like a good one. "Oh, yes!" he
 said, and he told, with much gusto, how, the year before, he had
 caught and held by the throat a wolf. A very small black puppy rushed
 into the room and made at the Governor's feet, as he sat in his
 stockings with his legs dangling from the bedside. The Governor rubbed
 his hands and dared him to come on, entering into the sport with
 spirit. Nothing more that was significant transpired, to my knowledge,
 during this interview. This was the first time that I ever called on a
 governor, but, as I did not ask for an office, I can speak of it with
 the more freedom.
 
 An Indian who was making canoes behind a house, looking up pleasantly
 from his work,--for he knew my companion,--said that his name was Old
 John Pennyweight. I had heard of him long before, and I inquired after
 one of his contemporaries, Joe Four-pence-ha'penny; but alas! he no
 longer circulates. I made a faithful study of canoe-building, and I
 thought that I should like to serve an apprenticeship at that trade
 for one season, going into the woods for bark with my "boss," making
 the canoe there, and returning in it at last.
 
 While the batteau was coming over to take us off, I picked up some
 fragments of arrowheads on the shore, and one broken stone chisel,
 which were greater novelties to the Indians than to me. After this, on
 Old Fort Hill, at the bend of the Penobscot, three miles above Bangor,
 looking for the site of an Indian town which some think stood
 thereabouts, I found more arrowheads, and two little dark and
 crumbling fragments of Indian earthenware, in the ashes of their
 fires. The Indians on the island appeared to live quite happily and to
 be well treated by the inhabitants of Oldtown.
 
 We visited Veazie's mills, just below the island, where were sixteen
 sets of saws,--some gang saws, sixteen in a gang, not to mention
 circular saws. On one side, they were hauling the logs up an inclined
 plane by water-power; on the other, passing out the boards, planks,
 and sawed timber, and forming them into rafts. The trees were
 literally drawn and quartered there. In forming the rafts, they use
 the lower three feet of hard-wood saplings, which have a crooked and
 knobbed butt-end, for bolts, passing them up through holes bored in
 the corners and sides of the rafts, and keying them. In another
 apartment they were making fence-slats, such as stand all over New
 England, out of odds and ends; and it may be that I saw where the
 picket-fence behind which I dwell at home came from. I was surprised
 to find a boy collecting the long edgings of boards as fast as cut
 off, and thrusting them down a hopper, where they were ground up
 beneath the mill, that they might be out of the way; otherwise they
 accumulate in vast piles by the side of the building, increasing the
 danger from fire, or, floating off, they obstruct the river. This was
 not only a sawmill, but a gristmill, then. The inhabitants of Oldtown,
 Stillwater, and Bangor cannot suffer for want of kindling stuff,
 surely. Some get their living exclusively by picking up the driftwood
 and selling it by the cord in the winter. In one place I saw where an
 Irishman, who keeps a team and a man for the purpose, had covered the
 shore for a long distance with regular piles, and I was told that he
 had sold twelve hundred dollars' worth in a year. Another, who lived
 by the shore, told me that he got all the material of his outbuildings
 and fences from the river; and in that neighborhood I perceived that
 this refuse wood was frequently used instead of sand to fill hollows
 with, being apparently cheaper than dirt.
 
 I got my first clear view of Ktaadn, on this excursion, from a hill
 about two miles northwest of Bangor, whither I went for this purpose.
 After this I was ready to return to Massachusetts.
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 Humboldt has written an interesting chapter on the primitive forest,
 but no one has yet described for me the difference between that wild
 forest which once occupied our oldest townships, and the tame one
 which I find there to-day. It is a difference which would be worth
 attending to. The civilized man not only clears the land permanently
 to a great extent, and cultivates open fields, but he tames and
 cultivates to a certain extent the forest itself. By his mere
 presence, almost, he changes the nature of the trees as no other
 creature does. The sun and air, and perhaps fire, have been
 introduced, and grain raised where it stands. It has lost its wild,
 damp, and shaggy look; the countless fallen and decaying trees are
 gone, and consequently that thick coat of moss which lived on them is
 gone too. The earth is comparatively bare and smooth and dry. The most
 primitive places left with us are the swamps, where the spruce still
 grows shaggy with usnea. The surface of the ground in the Maine woods
 is everywhere spongy and saturated with moisture. I noticed that the
 plants which cover the forest floor there are such as are commonly
 confined to swamps with us,--the _Clintonia borealis_, orchises,
 creeping snowberry, and others; and the prevailing aster there is the
 _Aster acuminatus_, which with us grows in damp and shady woods. The
 asters _cordifolius_ and _macrophyllus_ also are common, asters of
 little or no color, and sometimes without petals. I saw no soft,
 spreading, second-growth white pines, with smooth bark, acknowledging
 the presence of the woodchopper, but even the young white pines were
 all tall and slender rough-barked trees.
 
 Those Maine woods differ essentially from ours. There you are never
 reminded that the wilderness which you are threading is, after all,
 some villager's familiar wood-lot, some widow's thirds, from which her
 ancestors have sledded fuel for generations, minutely described in
 some old deed which is recorded, of which the owner has got a plan,
 too, and old bound-marks may be found every forty rods, if you will
 search. 'Tis true, the map may inform you that you stand on land
 granted by the State to some academy, or on Bingham's purchase; but
 these names do not impose on you, for you see nothing to remind you of
 the academy or of Bingham. What were the "forests" of England to
 these? One writer relates of the Isle of Wight, that in Charles the
 Second's time "there were woods in the island so complete and
 extensive, that it is said a squirrel might have traveled in several
 parts many leagues together on the top of the trees." If it were not
 for the rivers (and he might go round their heads), a squirrel could
 here travel thus the whole breadth of the country.
 
 We have as yet had no adequate account of a primitive pine forest. I
 have noticed that in a physical atlas lately published in
 Massachusetts, and used in our schools, the "wood land" of North
 America is limited almost solely to the valleys of the Ohio and some
 of the Great Lakes, and the great pine forests of the globe are not
 represented. In our vicinity, for instance, New Brunswick and Maine
 are exhibited as bare as Greenland. It may be that the children of
 Greenville, at the foot of Moosehead Lake, who surely are not likely
 to be scared by an owl, are referred to the valley of the Ohio to get
 an idea of a forest; but they would not know what to do with their
 moose, bear, caribou, beaver, etc., there. Shall we leave it to an
 Englishman to inform us, that "in North America, both in the United
 States and Canada, are the most extensive pine forests in the world"?
 The greater part of New Brunswick, the northern half of Maine, and
 adjacent parts of Canada, not to mention the northeastern part of New
 York and other tracts farther off, are still covered with an almost
 unbroken pine forest.
 
 But Maine, perhaps, will soon be where Massachusetts is. A good part
 of her territory is already as bare and commonplace as much of our
 neighborhood, and her villages generally are not so well shaded as
 ours. We seem to think that the earth must go through the ordeal of
 sheep-pasturage before it is habitable by man. Consider Nahant, the
 resort of all the fashion of Boston,--which peninsula I saw but
 indistinctly in the twilight, when I steamed by it, and thought that
 it was unchanged since the discovery. John Smith described it in 1614
 as "the Mattahunts, two pleasant isles of groves, gardens, and
 cornfields;" and others tell us that it was once well wooded, and even
 furnished timber to build the wharves of Boston. Now it is difficult
 to make a tree grow there, and the visitor comes away with a vision of
 Mr. Tudor's ugly fences, a rod high, designed to protect a few pear
 shrubs. And what are we coming to in our Middlesex towns? A bald,
 staring town-house, or meeting-house, and a bare liberty-pole, as
 leafless as it is fruitless, for all I can see. We shall be obliged to
 import the timber for the last, hereafter, or splice such sticks as we
 have. And our ideas of liberty are equally mean with these. The very
 willow-rows lopped every three years for fuel or powder, and every
 sizable pine and oak, or other forest tree, cut down within the memory
 of man! As if individual speculators were to be allowed to export the
 clouds out of the sky, or the stars out of the firmament, one by one.
 We shall be reduced to gnaw the very crust of the earth for
 nutriment.
 
 They have even descended to smaller game. They have lately, as I hear,
 invented a machine for chopping up huckleberry bushes fine, and so
 converting them into fuel!--bushes which, for fruit alone, are worth
 all the pear trees in the country many times over. (I can give you a
 list of the three best kinds, if you want it.) At this rate, we shall
 all be obliged to let our beards grow at least, if only to hide the
 nakedness of the land and make a sylvan appearance. The farmer
 sometimes talks of "brushing up," simply as if bare ground looked
 better than clothed ground, than that which wears its natural
 vesture,--as if the wild hedges, which, perhaps, are more to his
 children than his whole farm beside, were dirt. I know of one who
 deserves to be called the Tree-hater, and, perhaps, to leave this for
 a new patronymic to his children. You would think that he had been
 warned by an oracle that he would be killed by the fall of a tree, and
 so was resolved to anticipate them. The journalists think that they
 cannot say too much in favor of such "improvements" in husbandry; it
 is a safe theme, like piety; but as for the beauty of one of these
 "model farms," I would as lief see a patent churn and a man turning
 it. They are, commonly, places merely where somebody is making money,
 it may be counterfeiting. The virtue of making two blades of grass
 grow where only one grew before does not begin to be superhuman.
 
 Nevertheless, it was a relief to get back to our smooth but still
 varied landscape. For a permanent residence, it seemed to me that
 there could be no comparison between this and the wilderness,
 necessary as the latter is for a resource and a background, the raw
 material of all our civilization. The wilderness is simple, almost to
 barrenness. The partially cultivated country it is which chiefly has
 inspired, and will continue to inspire, the strains of poets, such as
 compose the mass of any literature. Our woods are sylvan, and their
 inhabitants woodmen and rustics; that is _selvaggia_, and the
 inhabitants are _salvages_. A civilized man, using the word in the
 ordinary sense, with his ideas and associations, must at length pine
 there, like a cultivated plant, which clasps its fibres about a crude
 and undissolved mass of peat. At the extreme north, the voyagers are
 obliged to dance and act plays for employment. Perhaps our own woods
 and fields,--in the best wooded towns, where we need not quarrel about
 the huckleberries,--with the primitive swamps scattered here and there
 in their midst, but not prevailing over them, are the perfection of
 parks and groves, gardens, arbors, paths, vistas, and landscapes. They
 are the natural consequence of what art and refinement we as a people
 have,--the common which each village possesses, its true paradise, in
 comparison with which all elaborately and willfully wealth-constructed
 parks and gardens are paltry imitations. Or, I would rather say, such
 _were_ our groves twenty years ago. The poet's, commonly, is not a
 logger's path, but a woodman's. The logger and pioneer have preceded
 him, like John the Baptist; eaten the wild honey, it may be, but the
 locusts also; banished decaying wood and the spongy mosses which feed
 on it, and built hearths and humanized Nature for him.
 
 But there are spirits of a yet more liberal culture, to whom no
 simplicity is barren. There are not only stately pines, but fragile
 flowers, like the orchises, commonly described as too delicate for
 cultivation, which derive their nutriment from the crudest mass of
 peat. These remind us, that, not only for strength, but for beauty,
 the poet must, from time to time, travel the logger's path and the
 Indian's trail, to drink at some new and more bracing fountain of the
 Muses, far in the recesses of the wilderness.
 
 The kings of England formerly had their forests "to hold the king's
 game," for sport or food, sometimes destroying villages to create or
 extend them; and I think that they were impelled by a true instinct.
 Why should not we, who have renounced the king's authority, have our
 national preserves, where no villages need be destroyed, in which the
 bear and panther, and some even of the hunter race, may still exist,
 and not be "civilized off the face of the earth,"--our forests, not to
 hold the king's game merely, but to hold and preserve the king himself
 also, the lord of creation,--not for idle sport or food, but for
 inspiration and our own true recreation? or shall we, like the
 villains, grub them all up, poaching on our own national domains?
 
 
 
 
 THE ALLEGASH AND EAST BRANCH
 
 
 I started on my third excursion to the Maine woods Monday, July 20,
 1857, with one companion, arriving at Bangor the next day at noon. We
 had hardly left the steamer, when we passed Molly Molasses in the
 street. As long as she lives, the Penobscots may be considered extant
 as a tribe. The succeeding morning, a relative of mine, who is well
 acquainted with the Penobscot Indians, and who had been my companion
 in my two previous excursions into the Maine woods, took me in his
 wagon to Oldtown, to assist me in obtaining an Indian for this
 expedition. We were ferried across to the Indian Island in a batteau.
 The ferryman's boy had got the key to it, but the father, who was a
 blacksmith, after a little hesitation cut the chain with a cold-chisel
 on the rock. He told me that the Indians were nearly all gone to the
 seaboard and to Massachusetts, partly on account of the smallpox--of
 which they are very much afraid--having broken out in Oldtown, and it
 was doubtful whether we should find a suitable one at home. The old
 chief Neptune, however, was there still. The first man we saw on the
 island was an Indian named Joseph Polis, whom my relative had known
 from a boy, and now addressed familiarly as "Joe." He was dressing a
 deer-skin in his yard. The skin was spread over a slanting log, and he
 was scraping it with a stick held by both hands. He was stoutly built,
 perhaps a little above the middle height, with a broad face, and, as
 others said, perfect Indian features and complexion. His house was a
 two-story white one, with blinds, the best-looking that I noticed
 there, and as good as an average one on a New England village street.
 It was surrounded by a garden and fruit-trees, single cornstalks
 standing thinly amid the beans. We asked him if he knew any good
 Indian who would like to go into the woods with us, that is, to the
 Allegash Lakes, by way of Moosehead, and return by the East Branch of
 the Penobscot, or vary from this as we pleased. To which he answered,
 out of that strange remoteness in which the Indian ever dwells to the
 white man, "Me like to go myself; me wants to get some moose;" and
 kept on scraping the skin. His brother had been into the woods with my
 relative only a year or two before, and the Indian now inquired what
 the latter had done to him, that he did not come back, for he had not
 seen nor heard from him since.
 
 At length we got round to the more interesting topic again. The
 ferryman had told us that all the best Indians were gone except Polis,
 who was one of the aristocracy. He to be sure would be the best man we
 could have, but if he went at all would want a great price; so we did
 not expect to get him. Polis asked at first two dollars a day, but
 agreed to go for a dollar and a half, and fifty cents a week for his
 canoe. He would come to Bangor with his canoe by the seven o'clock
 train that evening,--we might depend on him. We thought ourselves
 lucky to secure the services of this man, who was known to be
 particularly steady and trustworthy.
 
 I spent the afternoon with my companion, who had remained in Bangor,
 in preparing for our expedition, purchasing provisions, hard-bread,
 pork, coffee, sugar, etc., and some india-rubber clothing.
 
 We had at first thought of exploring the St. John from its source to
 its mouth, or else to go up the Penobscot by its East Branch to the
 lakes of the St. John, and return by way of Chesuncook and Moosehead.
 We had finally inclined to the last route, only reversing the order of
 it, going by way of Moosehead, and returning by the Penobscot,
 otherwise it would have been all the way upstream and taken twice as
 long.
 
 At evening the Indian arrived in the cars, and I led the way while he
 followed me three quarters of a mile to my friend's house, with the
 canoe on his head. I did not know the exact route myself, but steered
 by the lay of the land, as I do in Boston, and I tried to enter into
 conversation with him, but as he was puffing under the weight of his
 canoe, not having the usual apparatus for carrying it, but, above all,
 was an Indian, I might as well have been thumping on the bottom of his
 birch the while. In answer to the various observations which I made by
 way of breaking the ice, he only grunted vaguely from beneath his
 canoe once or twice, so that I knew he was there.
 
 Early the next morning (July 23) the stage called for us, the Indian
 having breakfasted with us, and already placed the baggage in the
 canoe to see how it would go. My companion and I had each a large
 knapsack as full as it would hold, and we had two large india-rubber
 bags which held our provision and utensils. As for the Indian, all the
 baggage he had, beside his axe and gun, was a blanket, which he
 brought loose in his hand. However, he had laid in a store of tobacco
 and a new pipe for the excursion. The canoe was securely lashed
 diagonally across the top of the stage, with bits of carpet tucked
 under the edge to prevent its chafing. The very accommodating driver
 appeared as much accustomed to carrying canoes in this way as
 bandboxes.
 
 At the Bangor House we took in four men bound on a hunting excursion,
 one of the men going as cook. They had a dog, a middling-sized
 brindled cur, which ran by the side of the stage, his master showing
 his head and whistling from time to time; but after we had gone about
 three miles the dog was suddenly missing, and two of the party went
 back for him, while the stage, which was full of passengers, waited. I
 suggested that he had taken the back track for the Bangor House. At
 length one man came back, while the other kept on. This whole party of
 hunters declared their intention to stop till the dog was found; but
 the very obliging driver was ready to wait a spell longer. He was
 evidently unwilling to lose so many passengers, who would have taken a
 private conveyance, or perhaps the other line of stages, the next day.
 Such progress did we make, with a journey of over sixty miles to be
 accomplished that day, and a rain-storm just setting in. We discussed
 the subject of dogs and their instincts till it was threadbare, while
 we waited there, and the scenery of the suburbs of Bangor is still
 distinctly impressed on my memory. After full half an hour the man
 returned, leading the dog by a rope. He had overtaken him just as he
 was entering the Bangor House. He was then tied on the top of the
 stage, but being wet and cold, several times in the course of the
 journey he jumped off, and I saw him dangling by his neck. This dog
 was depended on to stop bears with. He had already stopped one
 somewhere in New Hampshire, and I can testify that he stopped a stage
 in Maine. This party of four probably paid nothing for the dog's ride,
 nor for his run, while our party of three paid two dollars--and were
 charged four--for the light canoe which lay still on the top.
 
 It soon began to rain, and grew more and more stormy as the day
 advanced. This was the third time that I had passed over this route,
 and it rained steadily each time all day. We accordingly saw but
 little of the country. The stage was crowded all the way, and I
 attended the more to my fellow-travelers. If you had looked inside
 this coach you would have thought that we were prepared to run the
 gauntlet of a band of robbers, for there were four or five guns on the
 front seat, the Indian's included, and one or two on the back one,
 each man holding his darling in his arms. One had a gun which carried
 twelve to a pound. It appeared that this party of hunters was going
 our way, but much farther,--down the Allegash and St. John, and thence
 up some other stream, and across to the Restigouche and the Bay of
 Chaleur, to be gone six weeks. They had canoes, axes, and supplies
 deposited some distance along the route. They carried flour, and were
 to have new bread made every day. Their leader was a handsome man
 about thirty years old, of good height, but not apparently robust, of
 gentlemanly address and faultless toilet; such a one as you might
 expect to meet on Broadway. In fact, in the popular sense of the word,
 he was the most "gentlemanly" appearing man in the stage, or that we
 saw on the road. He had a fair white complexion, as if he had always
 lived in the shade, and an intellectual face, and with his quiet
 manners might have passed for a divinity student who had seen
 something of the world. I was surprised to find, on talking with him
 in the course of the day's journey, that he was a hunter at all,--for
 his gun was not much exposed,--and yet more to find that he was
 probably the chief white hunter of Maine, and was known all along the
 road. He had also hunted in some of the States farther south and west.
 I afterwards heard him spoken of as one who could endure a great deal
 of exposure and fatigue without showing the effect of it; and he could
 not only use guns, but make them, being himself a gunsmith. In the
 spring, he had saved a stage-driver and two passengers from drowning
 in the backwater of the Piscataquis in Foxcroft on this road, having
 swum ashore in the freezing water and made a raft and got them
 off,--though the horses were drowned,--at great risk to himself, while
 the only other man who could swim withdrew to the nearest house to
 prevent freezing. He could now ride over this road for nothing. He
 knew our man, and remarked that we had a good Indian there, a good
 hunter; adding that he was said to be worth $6000. The Indian also
 knew him, and said to me, "the great hunter."
 
 The former told me that he practiced a kind of still-hunting, new or
 uncommon in those parts; that the caribou, for instance, fed round and
 round the same meadow, returning on the same path, and he lay in wait
 for them.
 
 The Indian sat on the front seat, saying nothing to anybody, with a
 stolid expression of face, as if barely awake to what was going on.
 Again I was struck by the peculiar vagueness of his replies when
 addressed in the stage, or at the taverns. He really never said
 anything on such occasions. He was merely stirred up, like a wild
 beast, and passively muttered some insignificant response. His answer,
 in such cases, was never the consequence of a positive mental energy,
 but vague as a puff of smoke, suggesting no _responsibility_, and if
 you considered it, you would find that you had got nothing out of him.
 This was instead of the conventional palaver and smartness of the
 white man, and equally profitable. Most get no more than this out of
 the Indian, and pronounce him stolid accordingly. I was surprised to
 see what a foolish and impertinent style a Maine man, a passenger,
 used in addressing him, as if he were a child, which only made his
 eyes glisten a little. A tipsy Canadian asked him at a tavern, in a
 drawling tone, if he smoked, to which he answered with an indefinite
 "Yes." "Won't you lend me your pipe a little while?" asked the other.
 He replied, looking straight by the man's head, with a face singularly
 vacant to all neighboring interests, "Me got no pipe;" yet I had seen
 him put a new one, with a supply of tobacco, into his pocket that
 morning.
 
 Our little canoe, so neat and strong, drew a favorable criticism from
 all the wiseacres among the tavern loungers along the road. By the
 roadside, close to the wheels, I noticed a splendid great purple
 fringed orchis with a spike as big as an epilobium, which I would fain
 have stopped the stage to pluck, but as this had never been known to
 stop a bear, like the cur on the stage, the driver would probably have
 thought it a waste of time.
 
 When we reached the lake, about half past eight in the evening, it was
 still steadily raining, and harder than before; and, in that fresh,
 cool atmosphere, the hylodes were peeping and the toads ringing about
 the lake universally, as in the spring with us. It was as if the
 season had revolved backward two or three months, or I had arrived at
 the abode of perpetual spring.
 
 We had expected to go upon the lake at once, and, after paddling up
 two or three miles, to camp on one of its islands; but on account of
 the steady and increasing rain, we decided to go to one of the taverns
 for the night, though, for my own part, I should have preferred to
 camp out.
 
 About four o'clock the next morning (July 24), though it was quite
 cloudy, accompanied by the landlord to the water's edge, in the
 twilight, we launched our canoe from a rock on the Moosehead Lake.
 When I was there four years before, we had a rather small canoe for
 three persons, and I had thought that this time I would get a larger
 one, but the present one was even smaller than that. It was 18-1/4 feet
 long by 2 feet 6-1/2 inches wide in the middle, and one foot deep within,
 so I found by measurement, and I judged that it would weigh not far
 from eighty pounds. The Indian had recently made it himself, and its
 smallness was partly compensated for by its newness, as well as
 stanchness and solidity, it being made of very thick bark and ribs.
 Our baggage weighed about 166 pounds, so that the canoe carried about
 600 pounds in all, or the weight of four men. The principal part of
 the baggage was, as usual, placed in the middle of the broadest part,
 while we stowed ourselves in the chinks and crannies that were left
 before and behind it, where there was no room to extend our legs, the
 loose articles being tucked into the ends. The canoe was thus as
 closely packed as a market-basket, and might possibly have been upset
 without spilling any of its contents. The Indian sat on a cross-bar in
 the stern, but we flat on the bottom, with a splint or chip behind our
 backs, to protect them from the cross-bar, and one of us commonly
 paddled with the Indian. He foresaw that we should not want a pole
 till we reached the Umbazookskus River, it being either deadwater or
 down-stream so far, and he was prepared to make a sail of his blanket
 in the bows if the wind should be fair; but we never used it.
 
 It had rained more or less the four previous days, so that we thought
 we might count on some fair weather. The wind was at first
 southwesterly.
 
 Paddling along the eastern side of the lake in the still of the
 morning, we soon saw a few sheldrakes, which the Indian called
 _Shecorways_, and some peetweets, _Naramekechus_, on the rocky shore;
 we also saw and heard loons, _Medawisla_, which he said was a sign of
 wind. It was inspiriting to hear the regular dip of the paddles, as if
 they were our fins or flippers, and to realize that we were at length
 fairly embarked. We who had felt strangely as stage-passengers and
 tavern-lodgers were suddenly naturalized there and presented with the
 freedom of the lakes and the woods. Having passed the small rocky
 isles within two or three miles of the foot of the lake, we had a
 short consultation respecting our course, and inclined to the western
 shore for the sake of its lee; for otherwise, if the wind should rise,
 it would be impossible for us to reach Mount Kineo, which is about
 midway up the lake on the east side, but at its narrowest part, where
 probably we could recross if we took the western side. The wind is the
 chief obstacle to crossing the lakes, especially in so small a canoe.
 The Indian remarked several times that he did not like to cross the
 lakes "in littlum canoe," but nevertheless, "just as we say, it made
 no odds to him." He sometimes took a straight course up the middle of
 the lake between Sugar and Deer islands, when there was no wind.
 
 Measured on the map, Moosehead Lake is twelve miles wide at the widest
 place, and thirty miles long in a direct line, but longer as it lies.
 The captain of the steamer called it thirty-eight miles as he steered.
 We should probably go about forty. The Indian said that it was called
 "_Mspame_, because large water." Squaw Mountain rose darkly on our
 left, near the outlet of the Kennebec, and what the Indian called
 Spencer Bay Mountain, on the east, and already we saw Mount Kineo
 before us in the north.
 
 Paddling near the shore, we frequently heard the _pe-pe_ of the
 olive-sided flycatcher, also the wood pewee, and the kingfisher, thus
 early in the morning. The Indian reminding us that he could not work
 without eating, we stopped to breakfast on the main shore, southwest
 of Deer Island, at a spot where the _Mimulus ringens_ grew abundantly.
 We took out our bags, and the Indian made a fire under a very large
 bleached log, using white pine bark from a stump, though he said that
 hemlock was better, and kindling with canoe birch bark. Our table was
 a large piece of freshly peeled birch bark, laid wrong side up, and
 our breakfast consisted of hard-bread, fried pork, and strong coffee,
 well sweetened, in which we did not miss the milk.
 
 While we were getting breakfast, a brood of twelve black dippers, half
 grown, came paddling by within three or four rods, not at all alarmed;
 and they loitered about as long as we stayed, now huddled close
 together, within a circle of eighteen inches in diameter, now moving
 off in a long line, very cunningly. Yet they bore a certain proportion
 to the great Moosehead Lake on whose bosom they floated, and I felt as
 if they were under its protection.
 
 Looking northward from this place it appeared as if we were entering a
 large bay, and we did not know whether we should be obliged to diverge
 from our course and keep outside a point which we saw, or should find
 a passage between this and the mainland. I consulted my map and used
 my glass, and the Indian did the same, but we could not find our place
 exactly on the map, nor could we detect any break in the shore. When I
 asked the Indian the way, he answered, "I don't know," which I thought
 remarkable, since he had said that he was familiar with the lake; but
 it appeared that he had never been up this side. It was misty dog-day
 weather, and we had already penetrated a smaller bay of the same kind,
 and knocked the bottom out of it, though we had been obliged to pass
 over a small bar, between an island and the shore, where there was
 but just breadth and depth enough to float the canoe, and the
 Indian had observed, "Very easy makum bridge here," but now it seemed
 that, if we held on, we should be fairly embayed. Presently, however,
 though we had not stirred, the mist lifted somewhat, and revealed a
 break in the shore northward, showing that the point was a portion of
 Deer Island, and that our course lay westward of it. Where it had
 seemed a continuous shore even through a glass, one portion was now
 seen by the naked eye to be much more distant than the other which
 overlapped it, merely by the greater thickness of the mist which still
 rested on it, while the nearer or island portion was comparatively
 bare and green. The line of separation was very distinct, and the
 Indian immediately remarked, "I guess you and I go there,--I guess
 there's room for my canoe there." This was his common expression
 instead of saying "we." He never addressed us by our names, though
 curious to know how they were spelled and what they meant, while we
 called him Polis. He had already guessed very accurately at our ages,
 and said that he was forty-eight.
 
   [Illustration: _Squaw Mountain, Moosehead Lake_]
 
 After breakfast I emptied the melted pork that was left into the lake,
 making what sailors call a "slick," and watching to see how much it
 spread over and smoothed the agitated surface. The Indian looked at it
 a moment and said, "That make hard paddlum thro'; hold 'em canoe. So
 say old times."
 
 We hastily reloaded, putting the dishes loose in the bows, that they
 might be at hand when wanted, and set out again. The western shore,
 near which we paddled along, rose gently to a considerable height, and
 was everywhere densely covered with the forest, in which was a large
 proportion of hard wood to enliven and relieve the fir and spruce.
 
 The Indian said that the usnea lichen which we saw hanging from the
 trees was called _chorchorque_. We asked him the names of several
 small birds which we heard this morning. The wood thrush, which was
 quite common, and whose note he imitated, he said was called
 _Adelungquamooktum_; but sometimes he could not tell the name of some
 small bird which I heard and knew, but he said, "I tell all the birds
 about here,--this country; can't tell littlum noise, but I see 'em,
 then I can tell."
 
 I observed that I should like to go to school to him to learn his
 language, living on the Indian island the while; could not that be
 done? "Oh, yer," he replied, "good many do so." I asked how long he
 thought it would take. He said one week. I told him that in this
 voyage I would tell him all I knew, and he should tell me all he knew,
 to which he readily agreed.
 
 The birds sang quite as in our woods,--the red-eye, redstart, veery,
 wood pewee, etc., but we saw no bluebirds in all our journey, and
 several told me in Bangor that they had not the bluebird there. Mount
 Kineo, which was generally visible, though occasionally concealed by
 islands or the mainland in front, had a level bar of cloud concealing
 its summit, and all the mountain-tops about the lake were cut off at
 the same height. Ducks of various kinds--sheldrake, summer ducks,
 etc.--were quite common, and ran over the water before us as fast as a
 horse trots. Thus they were soon out of sight.
 
 The Indian asked the meaning of _reality_, as near as I could make out
 the word, which he said one of us had used; also of "_interrent_,"
 that is, intelligent. I observed that he could rarely sound the letter
 r, but used l, as also r for l sometimes; as _load_ for road,
 _pickelel_ for pickerel, _Soogle_ Island for Sugar Island, _lock_ for
 rock, etc. Yet he trilled the _r_ pretty well after me.
 
 He generally added the syllable _um_ to his words when he could,--as
 paddl_um_, etc. I have once heard a Chippeway lecture, who made his
 audience laugh unintentionally by putting _m_ after the word _too_,
 which word he brought in continually and unnecessarily, accenting and
 prolonging this sound into _m-ah_ sonorously, as if it were necessary
 to bring in so much of his vernacular as a relief to his organs, a
 compensation for twisting his jaws about, and putting his tongue into
 every corner of his mouth, as he complained that he was obliged to do
 when he spoke English. There was so much of the Indian accent
 resounding through his English, so much of the "bow-arrow tang" as my
 neighbor calls it, and I have no doubt that word seemed to him the
 best pronounced. It was a wild and refreshing sound, like that of the
 wind among the pines, or the booming of the surf on the shore.
 
 I asked him the meaning of the word _Musketicook_, the Indian name of
 Concord River. He pronounced it _Muskeeticook_, emphasizing the second
 syllable with a peculiar guttural sound, and said that it meant
 "deadwater," which it is, and in this definition he agreed exactly
 with the St. Francis Indian with whom I talked in 1853.
 
 On a point on the mainland some miles southwest of Sand-bar Island,
 where we landed to stretch our legs and look at the vegetation, going
 inland a few steps, I discovered a fire still glowing beneath its
 ashes, where somebody had breakfasted, and a bed of twigs prepared for
 the following night. So I knew not only that they had just left, but
 that they designed to return, and by the breadth of the bed that there
 was more than one in the party. You might have gone within six feet of
 these signs without seeing them. There grew the beaked hazel, the only
 hazel which I saw on this journey, the diervilla, rue seven feet high,
 which was very abundant on all the lake and river shores, and _Cornus
 stolonifera_, or red osier, whose bark, the Indian said, was good to
 smoke, and was called _maquoxigill_, "tobacco before white people came
 to this country, Indian tobacco."
 
 The Indian was always very careful in approaching the shore, lest he
 should injure his canoe on the rocks, letting it swing round slowly
 sidewise, and was still more particular that we should not step into
 it on shore, nor till it floated free, and then should step gently
 lest we should open its seams, or make a hole in the bottom. He said
 that he would tell us when to jump.
 
 Soon after leaving this point we passed the Kennebec, or outlet of the
 lake, and heard the falls at the dam there, for even Moosehead Lake is
 dammed. After passing Deer Island, we saw the little steamer from
 Greenville, far east in the middle of the lake, and she appeared
 nearly stationary. Sometimes we could hardly tell her from an island
 which had a few trees on it. Here we were exposed to the wind from
 over the whole breadth of the lake, and ran a little risk of being
 swamped. While I had my eye fixed on the spot where a large fish had
 leaped, we took in a gallon or two of water, which filled my lap; but
 we soon reached the shore and took the canoe over the bar, at Sand-bar
 Island, a few feet wide only, and so saved a considerable distance.
 One landed first at a more sheltered place, and walking round caught
 the canoe by the prow, to prevent it being injured against the shore.
 
 Again we crossed a broad bay opposite the mouth of Moose River, before
 reaching the narrow strait at Mount Kineo, made what the voyageurs
 call a _traverse_, and found the water quite rough. A very little wind
 on these broad lakes raises a sea which will swamp a canoe. Looking
 off from the shore, the surface may appear to be very little agitated,
 almost smooth, a mile distant, or if you see a few white crests they
 appear nearly level with the rest of the lake; but when you get out so
 far, you may find quite a sea running, and ere long, before you think
 of it, a wave will gently creep up the side of the canoe and fill your
 lap, like a monster deliberately covering you with its slime before it
 swallows you, or it will strike the canoe violently, and break into
 it. The same thing may happen when the wind rises suddenly, though it
 were perfectly calm and smooth there a few minutes before; so that
 nothing can save you, unless you can swim ashore, for it is impossible
 to get into a canoe again when it is upset. Since you sit flat on the
 bottom, though the danger should not be imminent, a little water is a
 great inconvenience, not to mention the wetting of your provisions. We
 rarely crossed even a bay directly, from point to point, when there
 was wind, but made a slight curve corresponding somewhat to the shore,
 that we might the sooner reach it if the wind increased.
 
 When the wind is aft, and not too strong, the Indian makes a spritsail
 of his blanket. He thus easily skims over the whole length of this
 lake in a day.
 
 The Indian paddled on one side, and one of us on the other, to keep
 the canoe steady, and when he wanted to change hands he would say, "T'
 other side." He asserted, in answer to our questions, that he had
 never upset a canoe himself, though he may have been upset by others.
 
 Think of our little eggshell of a canoe tossing across that great
 lake, a mere black speck to the eagle soaring above it!
 
 My companion trailed for trout as we paddled along, but the Indian
 warning him that a big fish might upset us, for there are some very
 large ones there, he agreed to pass the line quickly to him in the
 stern if he had a bite. Besides trout, I heard of cusk, whitefish,
 etc., as found in this lake.
 
 While we were crossing this bay, where Mount Kineo rose dark before
 us, within two or three miles, the Indian repeated the tradition
 respecting this mountain's having anciently been a cow moose,--how a
 mighty Indian hunter, whose name I forget, succeeded in killing this
 queen of the moose tribe with great difficulty, while her calf was
 killed somewhere among the islands in Penobscot Bay, and, to his eyes,
 this mountain had still the form of the moose in a reclining posture,
 its precipitous side presenting the outline of her head. He told this
 at some length, though it did not amount to much, and with apparent
 good faith, and asked us how we supposed the hunter could have killed
 such a mighty moose as that,--how we could do it. Whereupon a
 man-of-war to fire broadsides into her was suggested, etc. An Indian
 tells such a story as if he thought it deserved to have a good deal
 said about it, only he has not got it to say, and so he makes up for
 the deficiency by a drawling tone, long-windedness, and a dumb wonder
 which he hopes will be contagious.
 
 We approached the land again through pretty rough water, and then
 steered directly across the lake, at its narrowest part, to the
 eastern side, and were soon partly under the lee of the mountain,
 about a mile north of the Kineo House, having paddled about twenty
 miles. It was now about noon.
 
 We designed to stop there that afternoon and night, and spent half an
 hour looking along the shore northward for a suitable place to camp.
 We took out all our baggage at one place in vain, it being too rocky
 and uneven, and while engaged in this search we made our first
 acquaintance with the moose-fly. At length, half a mile farther north,
 by going half a dozen rods into the dense spruce and fir wood on the
 side of the mountain, almost as dark as a cellar, we found a place
 sufficiently clear and level to lie down on, after cutting away a few
 bushes. We required a space only seven feet by six for our bed, the
 fire being four or five feet in front, though it made no odds how
 rough the hearth was; but it was not always easy to find this in those
 woods. The Indian first cleared a path to it from the shore with his
 axe, and we then carried up all our baggage, pitched our tent, and
 made our bed, in order to be ready for foul weather, which then
 threatened us, and for the night. He gathered a large armful of fir
 twigs, breaking them off, which he said were the best for our bed,
 partly, I thought, because they were the largest and could be most
 rapidly collected. It had been raining more or less for four or five
 days, and the wood was even damper than usual, but he got dry bark for
 the fire from the under side of a dead leaning hemlock, which, he
 said, he could always do.
 
 This noon his mind was occupied with a law question, and I referred
 him to my companion, who was a lawyer. It appeared that he had been
 buying land lately (I think it was a hundred acres), but there was
 probably an incumbrance to it, somebody else claiming to have bought
 some grass on it for this year. He wished to know to whom the grass
 belonged, and was told that if the other man could prove that he
 bought the grass before he, Polis, bought the land, the former could
 take it, whether the latter knew it or not. To which he only answered,
 "Strange!" He went over this several times, fairly sat down to it,
 with his back to a tree, as if he meant to confine us to this topic
 henceforth; but as he made no headway, only reached the jumping-off
 place of his wonder at white men's institutions after each
 explanation, we let the subject die.
 
 He said that he had fifty acres of grass, potatoes, etc., somewhere
 above Oldtown, besides some about his house; that he hired a good deal
 of his work, hoeing, etc., and preferred white men to Indians, because
 "they keep steady, and know how."
 
 After dinner we returned southward along the shore, in the canoe, on
 account of the difficulty of climbing over the rocks and fallen trees,
 and began to ascend the mountain along the edge of the precipice. But
 a smart shower coming up just then, the Indian crept under his canoe,
 while we, being protected by our rubber coats, proceeded to botanize.
 So we sent him back to the camp for shelter, agreeing that he should
 come there for us with his canoe toward night. It had rained a little
 in the forenoon, and we trusted that this would be the clearing-up
 shower, which it proved; but our feet and legs were thoroughly wet by
 the bushes. The clouds breaking away a little, we had a glorious wild
 view, as we ascended, of the broad lake with its fluctuating surface
 and numerous forest-clad islands, extending beyond our sight both
 north and south, and the boundless forest undulating away from its
 shores on every side, as densely packed as a rye-field, and enveloping
 nameless mountains in succession; but above all, looking westward over
 a large island, was visible a very distant part of the lake, though we
 did not then suspect it to be Moosehead,--at first a mere broken white
 line seen through the tops of the island trees, like hay-caps, but
 spreading to a lake when we got higher. Beyond this we saw what
 appears to be called Bald Mountain on the map, some twenty-five miles
 distant, near the sources of the Penobscot. It was a perfect lake of
 the woods. But this was only a transient gleam, for the rain was not
 quite over.
 
 Looking southward, the heavens were completely overcast, the mountains
 capped with clouds, and the lake generally wore a dark and stormy
 appearance, but from its surface just north of Sugar Island, six or
 eight miles distant, there was reflected upward to us through the
 misty air a bright blue tinge from the distant unseen sky of another
 latitude beyond. They probably had a clear sky then at Greenville, the
 south end of the lake. Standing on a mountain in the midst of a lake,
 where would you look for the first sign of approaching fair weather?
 Not into the heavens, it seems, but into the lake.
 
 Again we mistook a little rocky islet seen through the "drisk," with
 some taller bare trunks or stumps on it, for the steamer with its
 smoke-pipes, but as it had not changed its position after half an
 hour, we were undeceived. So much do the works of man resemble the
 works of nature. A moose might mistake a steamer for a floating isle,
 and not be scared till he heard its puffing or its whistle.
 
 If I wished to see a mountain or other scenery under the most
 favorable auspices, I would go to it in foul weather, so as to be
 there when it cleared up; we are then in the most suitable mood, and
 nature is most fresh and inspiring. There is no serenity so fair as
 that which is just established in a tearful eye.
 
 Jackson, in his Report on the Geology of Maine, in 1838, says of this
 mountain: "Hornstone, which will answer for flints, occurs in various
 parts of the State, where trap-rocks have acted upon silicious slate.
 The largest mass of this stone known in the world is Mount Kineo, upon
 Moosehead Lake, which appears to be entirely composed of it, and rises
 seven hundred feet above the lake level. This variety of hornstone I
 have seen in every part of New England in the form of Indian
 arrowheads, hatchets, chisels, etc., which were probably obtained from
 this mountain by the aboriginal inhabitants of the country." I have
 myself found hundreds of arrowheads made of the same material. It is
 generally slate-colored, with white specks, becoming a uniform white
 where exposed to the light and air, and it breaks with a conchoidal
 fracture, producing a ragged cutting edge. I noticed some conchoidal
 hollows more than a foot in diameter. I picked up a small thin piece
 which had so sharp an edge that I used it as a dull knife, and to see
 what I could do, fairly cut off an aspen one inch thick with it, by
 bending it and making many cuts; though I cut my fingers badly with
 the back of it in the meanwhile.
 
   [Illustration: _Moosehead Lake, from Mount Kineo_]
 
 From the summit of the precipice which forms the southern and eastern
 sides of this mountain peninsula, and is its most remarkable feature,
 being described as five or six hundred feet high, we looked, and
 probably might have jumped, down to the water, or to the seemingly
 dwarfish trees on the narrow neck of land which connects it with the
 main. It is a dangerous place to try the steadiness of your nerves.
 Hodge says that these cliffs descend "perpendicularly ninety feet"
 below the surface of the water.
 
 The plants which chiefly attracted our attention on this mountain were
 the mountain cinquefoil (_Potentilla tridentata_), abundant and in
 bloom still at the very base, by the waterside, though it is usually
 confined to the summits of mountains in our latitude; very beautiful
 harebells overhanging the precipice; bear-berry; the Canada blueberry
 (_Vaccinium Canadense_), similar to the _V. Pennsylvanicum_, our
 earliest one, but entire-leaved and with a downy stem and leaf (I have
 not seen it in Massachusetts); _Diervilla trifida_; _Microstylis
 ophioglossoides_, an orchidaceous plant new to us; wild holly
 (_Nemopanthes Canadensis_); the great round-leaved orchis
 (_Platanthera orbiculata_), not long in bloom; _Spiranthes cernua_, at
 the top; bunchberry, reddening as we ascended, green at the base of
 the mountain, red at the top; and the small fern _Woodsia ilvensis_,
 growing in tufts, now in fruit. I have also received _Liparis
 liliifolia_, or tway-blade, from this spot. Having explored the
 wonders of the mountain, and the weather being now entirely cleared
 up, we commenced the descent. We met the Indian, puffing and panting,
 about one third of the way up, but thinking that he must be near the
 top, and saying that it took his breath away. I thought that
 superstition had something to do with his fatigue. Perhaps he believed
 that he was climbing over the back of a tremendous moose. He said that
 he had never ascended Kineo. On reaching the canoe we found that he
 had caught a lake trout weighing about three pounds, at the depth of
 twenty-five or thirty feet, while we were on the mountain.
 
 When we got to the camp, the canoe was taken out and turned over, and
 a log laid across it to prevent its being blown away. The Indian cut
 some large logs of damp and rotten hard wood to smoulder and keep fire
 through the night. The trout was fried for supper. Our tent was of
 thin cotton cloth and quite small, forming with the ground a
 triangular prism closed at the rear end, six feet long, seven wide,
 and four high, so that we could barely sit up in the middle. It
 required two forked stakes, a smooth ridge-pole, and a dozen or more
 pins to pitch it. It kept off dew and wind, and an ordinary rain, and
 answered our purpose well enough. We reclined within it till bedtime,
 each with his baggage at his head, or else sat about the fire, having
 hung our wet clothes on a pole before the fire for the night.
 
 As we sat there, just before night, looking out through the dusky wood,
 the Indian heard a noise which he said was made by a snake. He imitated
 it at my request, making a low whistling note,--_pheet_--_pheet_,--two
 or three times repeated, somewhat like the peep of the hylodes, but
 not so loud. In answer to my inquiries, he said that he had never seen
 them while making it, but going to the spot he finds the snake. This,
 he said on another occasion, was a sign of rain. When I had selected
 this place for our camp, he had remarked that there were snakes
 there,--he saw them. "But they won't do any hurt," I said. "Oh, no,"
 he answered, "just as you say; it makes no difference to me."
 
 He lay on the right side of the tent, because, as he said, he was
 partly deaf in one ear, and he wanted to lie with his good ear up. As
 we lay there, he inquired if I ever heard "Indian sing." I replied
 that I had not often, and asked him if he would not favor us with a
 song. He readily assented, and, lying on his back, with his blanket
 wrapped around him, he commenced a slow, somewhat nasal, yet musical
 chant, in his own language, which probably was taught his tribe long
 ago by the Catholic missionaries. He translated it to us, sentence by
 sentence, afterward, wishing to see if we could remember it. It proved
 to be a very simple religious exercise or hymn, the burden of which
 was, that there was only one God who ruled all the world. This was
 hammered (or sung) out very thin, so that some stanzas well-nigh meant
 nothing at all, merely keeping up the idea. He then said that he would
 sing us a Latin song; but we did not detect any Latin, only one or two
 Greek words in it,--the rest may have been Latin with the Indian
 pronunciation.
 
 His singing carried me back to the period of the discovery of America,
 to San Salvador and the Incas, when Europeans first encountered the
 simple faith of the Indian. There was, indeed, a beautiful simplicity
 about it; nothing of the dark and savage, only the mild and infantile.
 The sentiments of humility and reverence chiefly were expressed.
 
 It was a dense and damp spruce and fir wood in which we lay, and,
 except for our fire, perfectly dark; and when I awoke in the night, I
 either heard an owl from deeper in the forest behind us, or a loon
 from a distance over the lake. Getting up some time after midnight to
 collect the scattered brands together, while my companions were sound
 asleep, I observed, partly in the fire, which had ceased to blaze, a
 perfectly regular elliptical ring of light, about five inches in its
 shortest diameter, six or seven in its longer, and from one eighth to
 one quarter of an inch wide. It was fully as bright as the fire, but
 not reddish or scarlet, like a coal, but a white and slumbering light,
 like the glow-worm's. I could tell it from the fire only by its
 whiteness. I saw at once that it must be phosphorescent wood, which I
 had so often heard of, but never chanced to see. Putting my finger on
 it, with a little hesitation, I found that it was a piece of dead
 moose-wood (_Acer striatum_) which the Indian had cut off in a
 slanting direction the evening before. Using my knife, I discovered
 that the light proceeded from that portion of the sap-wood immediately
 under the bark, and thus presented a regular ring at the end, which,
 indeed, appeared raised above the level of the wood, and when I pared
 off the bark and cut into the sap, it was all aglow along the log. I
 was surprised to find the wood quite hard and apparently sound, though
 probably decay had commenced in the sap, and I cut out some little
 triangular chips, and, placing them in the hollow of my hand, carried
 them into the camp, waked my companion, and showed them to him. They
 lit up the inside of my hand, revealing the lines and wrinkles, and
 appearing exactly like coals of fire raised to a white heat, and I saw
 at once how, probably, the Indian jugglers had imposed on their people
 and on travelers, pretending to hold coals of fire in their mouths.
 
 I also noticed that part of a decayed stump within four or five feet
 of the fire, an inch wide and six inches long, soft and shaking wood,
 shone with equal brightness.
 
 I neglected to ascertain whether our fire had anything to do with
 this, but the previous day's rain and long-continued wet weather
 undoubtedly had.
 
 I was exceedingly interested by this phenomenon, and already felt paid
 for my journey. It could hardly have thrilled me more if it had taken
 the form of letters, or of the human face. If I had met with this
 ring of light while groping in this forest alone, away from any fire,
 I should have been still more surprised. I little thought that there
 was such a light shining in the darkness of the wilderness for me.
 
 The next day the Indian told me their name for this
 light,--_artoosoqu'_--and on my inquiring concerning the
 will-o'-the-wisp, and the like phenomena, he said that his "folks"
 sometimes saw fires passing along at various heights, even as high as
 the trees, and making a noise. I was prepared after this to hear of
 the most startling and unimagined phenomena, witnessed by "his folks;"
 they are abroad at all hours and seasons in scenes so unfrequented by
 white men. Nature must have made a thousand revelations to them which
 are still secrets to us.
 
 I did not regret my not having seen this before, since I now saw it
 under circumstances so favorable. I was in just the frame of mind to
 see something wonderful, and this was a phenomenon adequate to my
 circumstances and expectation, and it put me on the alert to see more
 like it. I exulted like "a pagan suckled in a creed" that had never
 been worn at all, but was bran-new, and adequate to the occasion. I
 let science slide, and rejoiced in that light as if it had been a
 fellow creature. I saw that it was excellent, and was very glad to
 know that it was so cheap. A scientific _explanation_, as it is
 called, would have been altogether out of place there. That is for
 pale daylight. Science with its retorts would have put me to sleep; it
 was the opportunity to be ignorant that I improved. It suggested to me
 that there was something to be seen if one had eyes. It made a
 believer of me more than before. I believed that the woods were not
 tenantless, but choke-full of honest spirits as good as myself any
 day,--not an empty chamber, in which chemistry was left to work alone,
 but an inhabited house,--and for a few moments I enjoyed fellowship
 with them. Your so-called wise man goes trying to persuade himself
 that there is no entity there but himself and his traps, but it is a
 great deal easier to believe the truth. It suggested, too, that the
 same experience always gives birth to the same sort of belief or
 religion. One revelation has been made to the Indian, another to the
 white man. I have much to learn of the Indian, nothing of the
 missionary. I am not sure but all that would tempt me to teach the
 Indian my religion would be his promise to teach me _his_. Long enough
 I had heard of irrelevant things; now at length I was glad to make
 acquaintance with the light that dwells in rotten wood. Where is all
 your knowledge gone to? It evaporates completely, for it has no depth.
 
 I kept those little chips and wet them again the next night, but they
 emitted no light.
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
      SATURDAY, July 25.
 
 At breakfast this Saturday morning, the Indian, evidently curious to
 know what would be expected of him the next day, whether we should go
 along or not, asked me how I spent the Sunday when at home. I told him
 that I commonly sat in my chamber reading, etc., in the forenoon, and
 went to walk in the afternoon. At which he shook his head and said,
 "Er, that is ver bad." "How do you spend it?" I asked. He said that
 he did no work, that he went to church at Oldtown when he was at home;
 in short, he did as he had been taught by the whites. This led to a
 discussion in which I found myself in the minority. He stated that he
 was a Protestant, and asked me if I was. I did not at first know what
 to say, but I thought that I could answer with truth that I was.
 
 When we were washing the dishes in the lake, many fishes, apparently
 chivin, came close up to us to get the particles of grease.
 
 The weather seemed to be more settled this morning, and we set out
 early in order to finish our voyage up the lake before the wind arose.
 Soon after starting, the Indian directed our attention to the
 Northeast Carry, which we could plainly see, about thirteen miles
 distant in that direction as measured on the map, though it is called
 much farther. This carry is a rude wooden railroad, running north and
 south about two miles, perfectly straight, from the lake to the
 Penobscot, through a low tract, with a clearing three or four rods
 wide; but low as it is, it passes over the height of land there. This
 opening appeared as a clear bright, or light, point in the horizon,
 resting on the edge of the lake, whose breadth a hair could have
 covered at a considerable distance from the eye, and of no appreciable
 height. We should not have suspected it to be visible if the Indian
 had not drawn our attention to it. It was a remarkable kind of light
 to steer for,--daylight seen through a vista in the forest,--but
 visible as far as an ordinary beacon at night.
 
 We crossed a deep and wide bay which makes eastward north of Kineo,
 leaving an island on our left, and keeping up the eastern side of the
 lake. This way or that led to some Tomhegan or _Socatarian_ stream, up
 which the Indian had hunted, and whither I longed to go. The last
 name, however, had a bogus sound, too much like sectarian for me, as
 if a missionary had tampered with it; but I knew that the Indians were
 very liberal. I think I should have inclined to the Tomhegan first.
 
 We then crossed another broad bay, which, as we could no longer
 observe the shore particularly, afforded ample time for conversation.
 The Indian said that he had got his money by hunting, mostly high up
 the West Branch of the Penobscot, and toward the head of the St. John;
 he had hunted there from a boy, and knew all about that region. His
 game had been beaver, otter, black cat (or fisher), sable, moose, etc.
 Loup-cervier (or Canada lynx) were plenty yet in burnt grounds. For
 food in the woods, he uses partridges, ducks, dried moose-meat,
 hedgehog, etc. Loons, too, were good, only "bile 'em good." He told us
 at some length how he had suffered from starvation when a mere lad,
 being overtaken by winter when hunting with two grown Indians in the
 northern part of Maine, and obliged to leave their canoe on account of
 ice.
 
 Pointing into the bay, he said that it was the way to various lakes
 which he knew. Only solemn bear-haunted mountains, with their great
 wooded slopes, were visible; where, as man is not, we suppose some
 other power to be. My imagination personified the slopes themselves,
 as if by their very length they would waylay you, and compel you to
 camp again on them before night. Some invisible glutton would seem to
 drop from the trees and gnaw at the heart of the solitary hunter who
 threaded those woods; and yet I was tempted to walk there. The Indian
 said that he had been along there several times.
 
 I asked him how he guided himself in the woods. "Oh," said he, "I can
 tell good many ways." When I pressed him further, he answered,
 "Sometimes I lookum side-hill," and he glanced toward a high hill or
 mountain on the eastern shore, "great difference between the north and
 south, see where the sun has shone most. So trees,--the large limbs
 bend toward south. Sometimes I lookum locks" (rocks). I asked what he
 saw on the rocks, but he did not describe anything in particular,
 answering vaguely, in a mysterious or drawling tone, "Bare locks on
 lake shore,--great difference between north, south, east, west,
 side,--can tell what the sun has shone on." "Suppose," said I, "that I
 should take you in a dark night, right up here into the middle of the
 woods a hundred miles, set you down, and turn you round quickly twenty
 times, could you steer straight to Oldtown?" "Oh, yer," said he, "have
 done pretty much same thing. I will tell you. Some years ago I met an
 old white hunter at Millinocket; very good hunter. He said he could go
 anywhere in the woods. He wanted to hunt with me that day, so we
 start. We chase a moose all the forenoon, round and round, till middle
 of afternoon, when we kill him. Then I said to him, 'Now you go
 straight to camp. Don't go round and round where we've been, but go
 straight.' He said, 'I can't do that, I don't know where I am.'
 'Where you think camp?' I asked. He pointed so. Then I laugh at him. I
 take the lead and go right off the other way, cross our tracks many
 times, straight camp." "How do you do that?" asked I. "Oh, I can't
 tell you," he replied. "Great difference between me and white man."
 
 It appeared as if the sources of information were so various that he
 did not give a distinct, conscious attention to any one, and so could
 not readily refer to any when questioned about it, but he found his
 way very much as an animal does. Perhaps what is commonly called
 instinct in the animal, in this case is merely a sharpened and
 educated sense. Often, when an Indian says, "I don't know," in regard
 to the route he is to take, he does not mean what a white man would by
 those words, for his Indian instinct may tell him still as much as the
 most confident white man knows. He does not carry things in his head,
 nor remember the route exactly, like a white man, but relies on
 himself at the moment. Not having experienced the need of the other
 sort of knowledge, all labeled and arranged, he has not acquired it.
 
 The white hunter with whom I talked in the stage knew some of the
 resources of the Indian. He said that he steered by the wind, or by
 the limbs of the hemlocks, which were largest on the south side; also
 sometimes, when he knew that there was a lake near, by firing his gun
 and listening to hear the direction and distance of the echo from over
 it.
 
 The course we took over this lake, and others afterward, was rarely
 direct, but a succession of curves from point to point, digressing
 considerably into each of the bays; and this was not merely on account
 of the wind, for the Indian, looking toward the middle of the lake,
 said it was hard to go there, easier to keep near the shore, because
 he thus got over it by successive reaches and saw by the shore how he
 got along.
 
 The following will suffice for a common experience in crossing lakes
 in a canoe. As the forenoon advanced, the wind increased. The last bay
 which we crossed before reaching the desolate pier at the Northeast
 Carry was two or three miles over, and the wind was southwesterly.
 After going a third of the way, the waves had increased so as
 occasionally to wash into the canoe, and we saw that it was worse and
 worse ahead. At first we might have turned about, but were not willing
 to. It would have been of no use to follow the course of the shore,
 for not only the distance would have been much greater, but the waves
 ran still higher there on account of the greater sweep the wind had.
 At any rate it would have been dangerous now to alter our course,
 because the waves would have struck us at an advantage. It will not do
 to meet them at right angles, for then they will wash in both sides,
 but you must take them quartering. So the Indian stood up in the
 canoe, and exerted all his skill and strength for a mile or two, while
 I paddled right along in order to give him more steerage-way. For more
 than a mile he did not allow a single wave to strike the canoe as it
 would, but turned it quickly from this side to that, so that it would
 always be on or near the crest of a wave when it broke, where all its
 force was spent, and we merely settled down with it. At length I
 jumped out on to the end of the pier, against which the waves were
 dashing violently, in order to lighten the canoe, and catch it at the
 landing, which was not much sheltered; but just as I jumped we took in
 two or three gallons of water. I remarked to the Indian, "You managed
 that well," to which he replied, "Ver few men do that. Great many
 waves; when I look out for one, another come quick."
 
 While the Indian went to get cedar bark, etc., to carry his canoe
 with, we cooked the dinner on the shore, at this end of the carry, in
 the midst of a sprinkling rain.
 
 He prepared his canoe for carrying in this wise. He took a cedar
 shingle or splint eighteen inches long and four or five wide, rounded
 at one end, that the corners might not be in the way, and tied it with
 cedar bark by two holes made midway, near the edge on each side, to
 the middle cross-bar of the canoe. When the canoe was lifted upon his
 head bottom up, this shingle, with its rounded end uppermost,
 distributed the weight over his shoulders and head, while a band of
 cedar bark, tied to the cross-bar on each side of the shingle, passed
 round his breast, and another longer one, outside of the last, round
 his forehead; also a hand on each side-rail served to steer the canoe
 and keep it from rocking. He thus carried it with his shoulders, head,
 breast, forehead, and both hands, as if the upper part of his body
 were all one hand to clasp and hold it. If you know of a better way, I
 should like to hear of it. A cedar tree furnished all the gear in this
 case, as it had the woodwork of the canoe. One of the paddles rested
 on the cross-bars in the bows. I took the canoe upon my head and found
 that I could carry it with ease, though the straps were not fitted to
 my shoulders; but I let him carry it, not caring to establish a
 different precedent, though he said that if I would carry the canoe,
 he would take all the rest of the baggage, except my companion's. This
 shingle remained tied to the cross-bar throughout the voyage, was
 always ready for the carries, and also served to protect the back of
 one passenger.
 
 We were obliged to go over this carry twice, our load was so great.
 But the carries were an agreeable variety, and we improved the
 opportunity to gather the rare plants which we had seen, when we
 returned empty handed.
 
 We reached the Penobscot about four o'clock, and found there some St.
 Francis Indians encamped on the bank, in the same place where I camped
 with four Indians four years before. They were making a canoe, and, as
 then, drying moose-meat. The meat looked very suitable to make a
 _black_ broth at least. Our Indian said it was not good. Their camp
 was covered with spruce bark. They had got a young moose, taken in the
 river a fortnight before, confined in a sort of cage of logs piled up
 cob-fashion, seven or eight feet high. It was quite tame, about four
 feet high, and covered with moose-flies. There was a large quantity of
 cornel (_C. stolonifera_), red maple, and also willow and aspen
 boughs, stuck through between the logs on all sides, butt ends out,
 and on their leaves it was browsing. It looked at first as if it were
 in a bower rather than a pen.
 
 Our Indian said that _he_ used _black_ spruce roots to sew canoes
 with, obtaining it from high lands or mountains. The St. Francis
 Indian thought that _white_ spruce roots might be best. But the former
 said, "No good, break, can't split 'em;" also that they were hard to
 get, deep in ground, but the black were near the surface, on higher
 land, as well as tougher. He said that the white spruce was
 _subekoondark_, black, _skusk_. I told him I thought that I could make
 a canoe, but he expressed great doubt of it; at any rate, he thought
 that my work would not be "neat" the first time. An Indian at
 Greenville had told me that the winter bark, that is, bark taken off
 before the sap flows in May, was harder and much better than summer
 bark.
 
 Having reloaded, we paddled down the Penobscot, which, as the Indian
 remarked, and even I detected, remembering how it looked before, was
 uncommonly full. We soon after saw a splendid yellow lily (_Lilium
 Canadense_) by the shore, which I plucked. It was six feet high, and
 had twelve flowers, in two whorls, forming a pyramid, such as I have
 seen in Concord. We afterward saw many more thus tall along this
 stream, and also still more numerous on the East Branch, and, on the
 latter, one which I thought approached yet nearer to the _Lilium
 superbum_. The Indian asked what we called it, and said that the
 "loots" (roots) were good for soup, that is, to cook with meat, to
 thicken it, taking the place of flour. They get them in the fall. I
 dug some, and found a mass of bulbs pretty deep in the earth, two
 inches in diameter, looking, and even tasting, somewhat like raw green
 corn on the ear.
 
 When we had gone about three miles down the Penobscot, we saw through
 the tree-tops a thunder-shower coming up in the west, and we looked
 out a camping-place in good season, about five o'clock, on the west
 side, not far below the mouth of what Joe Aitteon, in '53, called
 Lobster Stream, coming from Lobster Pond. Our present Indian, however,
 did not admit this name, nor even that of _Matahumkeag_, which is on
 the map, but called the lake _Beskabekuk_.
 
 I will describe, once for all, the routine of camping at this season.
 We generally told the Indian that we would stop at the first suitable
 place, so that he might be on the lookout for it. Having observed a
 clear, hard, and flat beach to land on, free from mud, and from stones
 which would injure the canoe, one would run up the bank to see if
 there were open and level space enough for the camp between the trees,
 or if it could be easily cleared, preferring at the same time a cool
 place, on account of insects. Sometimes we paddled a mile or more
 before finding one to our minds, for where the shore was suitable, the
 bank would often be too steep, or else too low and grassy, and
 therefore mosquitoey. We then took out the baggage and drew up the
 canoe, sometimes turning it over on shore for safety. The Indian cut a
 path to the spot we had selected, which was usually within two or
 three rods of the water, and we carried up our baggage. One, perhaps,
 takes canoe birch bark, always at hand, and dead dry wood or bark, and
 kindles a fire five or six feet in front of where we intend to lie. It
 matters not, commonly, on which side this is, because there is little
 or no wind in so dense a wood at that season; and then he gets a
 kettle of water from the river, and takes out the pork, bread, coffee,
 etc., from their several packages.
 
 Another, meanwhile, having the axe, cuts down the nearest dead rock
 maple or other dry hard wood, collecting several large logs to last
 through the night, also a green stake, with a notch or fork to it,
 which is slanted over the fire, perhaps resting on a rock or forked
 stake, to hang the kettle on, and two forked stakes and a pole for the
 tent.
 
 The third man pitches the tent, cuts a dozen or more pins with his
 knife, usually of moose-wood, the common underwood, to fasten it down
 with, and then collects an armful or two of fir twigs,[8] arbor-vitae,
 spruce, or hemlock, whichever is at hand, and makes the bed, beginning
 at either end, and laying the twigs wrong side up, in regular rows,
 covering the stub ends of the last row; first, however, filling the
 hollows, if there are any, with coarser material. Wrangel says that
 his guides in Siberia first strewed a quantity of dry brushwood on the
 ground, and then cedar twigs on that.
 
 Commonly, by the time the bed is made, or within fifteen or twenty
 minutes, the water boils, the pork is fried, and supper is ready. We
 eat this sitting on the ground, or a stump, if there is any, around a
 large piece of birch bark for a table, each holding a dipper in one
 hand and a piece of ship-bread or fried pork in the other, frequently
 making a pass with his hand, or thrusting his head into the smoke, to
 avoid the mosquitoes.
 
 Next, pipes are lit by those who smoke, and veils are donned by those
 who have them, and we hastily examine and dry our plants, anoint our
 faces and hands, and go to bed--and--the mosquitoes.
 
 Though you have nothing to do but see the country, there's rarely any
 time to spare, hardly enough to examine a plant, before the night or
 drowsiness is upon you.
 
 Such was the ordinary experience, but this evening we had camped
 earlier on account of the rain, and had more time.
 
 We found that our camp to-night was on an old, and now more than
 usually indistinct, supply road, running along the river. What is
 called a road there shows no ruts or trace of wheels, for they are not
 used; nor, indeed, of runners, since they are used only in the winter
 when the snow is several feet deep. It is only an indistinct vista
 through the wood, which it takes an experienced eye to detect.
 
 We had no sooner pitched our tent than the thunder-shower burst on us,
 and we hastily crept under it, drawing our bags after us, curious to
 see how much of a shelter our thin cotton roof was going to be in this
 excursion. Though the violence of the rain forced a fine shower
 through the cloth before it was fairly wetted and shrunk, with which
 we were well bedewed, we managed to keep pretty dry, only a box of
 matches having been left out and spoiled, and before we were aware of
 it the shower was over, and only the dripping trees imprisoned us.
 
 Wishing to see what fishes there were in the river there, we cast our
 lines over the wet bushes on the shore, but they were repeatedly swept
 down the swift stream in vain. So, leaving the Indian, we took the
 canoe just before dark, and dropped down the river a few rods to fish
 at the mouth of a sluggish brook on the opposite side. We pushed up
 this a rod or two, where, perhaps, only a canoe had been before. But
 though there were a few small fishes, mostly chivin, there, we were
 soon driven off by the mosquitoes. While there we heard the Indian
 fire his gun twice in such rapid succession that we thought it must be
 double-barreled, though we observed afterward that it was single. His
 object was to clean out and dry it after the rain, and he then loaded
 it with ball, being now on ground where he expected to meet with large
 game. This sudden, loud, crashing noise in the still aisles of the
 forest, affected me like an insult to nature, or ill manners at any
 rate, as if you were to fire a gun in a hall or temple. It was not
 heard far, however, except along the river, the sound being rapidly
 hushed up or absorbed by the damp trees and mossy ground.
 
 The Indian made a little smothered fire of damp leaves close to the
 back of the camp, that the smoke might drive through and keep out the
 mosquitoes; but just before we fell asleep this suddenly blazed up,
 and came near setting fire to the tent. We were considerably molested
 by mosquitoes at this camp.
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
      SUNDAY, July 26.
 
 The note of the white-throated sparrow, a very inspiriting but almost
 wiry sound, was the first heard in the morning, and with this all the
 woods rang. This was the prevailing bird in the northern part of
 Maine. The forest generally was all alive with them at this season,
 and they were proportionally numerous and musical about Bangor. They
 evidently breed in that State. Though commonly unseen, their simple
 _ah, te-te-te, te-te-te, te-te-te_, so sharp and piercing, was as
 distinct to the ear as the passage of a spark of fire shot into the
 darkest of the forest would be to the eye. I thought that they
 commonly uttered it as they flew. I hear this note for a few days only
 in the spring, as they go through Concord, and in the fall see them
 again going southward, but then they are mute. We were commonly
 aroused by their lively strain very early. What a glorious time they
 must have in that wilderness, far from mankind and election day!
 
 I told the Indian that we would go to church to Chesuncook this
 (Sunday) morning, some fifteen miles. It was settled weather at last.
 A few swallows flitted over the water, we heard Maryland
 yellow-throats along the shore, the phebe notes of the chickadee, and,
 I believe, redstarts, and moose-flies of large size pursued us in
 midstream.
 
 The Indian thought that we should lie by on Sunday. Said he, "We come
 here lookum things, look all round; but come Sunday, lock up all that,
 and then Monday look again." He spoke of an Indian of his acquaintance
 who had been with some ministers to Ktaadn, and had told him how they
 conducted. This he described in a low and solemn voice. "They make a
 long prayer every morning and night, and at every meal. Come Sunday,"
 said he, "they stop 'em, no go at all that day,--keep still,--preach
 all day,--first one, then another, just like church. Oh, ver good
 men." "One day," said he, "going along a river, they came to the body
 of a man in the water, drowned good while, all ready fall to pieces.
 They go right ashore,--stop there, go no farther that day,--they have
 meeting there, preach and pray just like Sunday. Then they get poles
 and lift up the body, and they go back and carry the body with them.
 Oh, they ver good men."
 
 I judged from this account that their every camp was a camp-meeting,
 and they had mistaken their route,--they should have gone to Eastham;
 that they wanted an opportunity to preach somewhere more than to see
 Ktaadn. I read of another similar party that seem to have spent their
 time there singing the songs of Zion. I was glad that I did not go to
 that mountain with such slow coaches.
 
 However, the Indian added, plying the paddle all the while, that if we
 would go along, he must go with us, he our man, and he suppose that if
 he no takum pay for what he do Sunday, then ther's no harm, but if he
 takum pay, then wrong. I told him that he was stricter than white men.
 Nevertheless, I noticed that he did not forget to reckon in the
 Sundays at last.
 
 He appeared to be a very religious man, and said his prayers in a loud
 voice, in Indian, kneeling before the camp, morning and
 evening,--sometimes scrambling up again in haste when he had forgotten
 this, and saying them with great rapidity. In the course of the day,
 he remarked, not very originally, "Poor man rememberum God more than
 rich."
 
 We soon passed the island where I had camped four years before, and I
 recognized the very spot. The deadwater, a mile or two below it, the
 Indian called _Beskabekukskishtuk_, from the lake _Beskabekuk_, which
 empties in above. This deadwater, he said, was "a great place for
 moose always." We saw the grass bent where a moose came out the night
 before, and the Indian said that he could smell one as far as he could
 see him; but, he added, that if he should see five or six to-day close
 by canoe, he no shoot 'em. Accordingly, as he was the only one of the
 party who had a gun, or had come a-hunting, the moose were safe.
 
 Just below this, a cat owl flew heavily over the stream, and he,
 asking if I knew what it was, imitated very well the common _hoo, hoo,
 hoo, hoorer, hoo_, of our woods; making a hard, guttural sound, "Ugh,
 ugh, ugh,--ugh, ugh." When we passed the Moose-horn, he said that it
 had no name. What Joe Aitteon had called Ragmuff, he called
 _Paytaytequick_, and said that it meant Burnt Ground Stream. We
 stopped there, where I had stopped before, and I bathed in this
 tributary. It was shallow but cold, apparently too cold for the
 Indian, who stood looking on. As we were pushing away again, a
 white-headed eagle sailed over our heads. A reach some miles above
 Pine Stream, where there were several islands, the Indian said was
 _Nonglangyis_ Deadwater. Pine Stream he called Black River, and said
 that its Indian name was _Karsaootuk_. He could go to Caribou Lake
 that way.
 
 We carried a part of the baggage about Pine Stream Falls, while the
 Indian went down in the canoe. A Bangor merchant had told us that two
 men in his employ were drowned some time ago while passing these falls
 in a batteau, and a third clung to a rock all night, and was taken off
 in the morning. There were magnificent great purple fringed orchises
 on this carry and the neighboring shores. I measured the largest canoe
 birch which I saw in this journey near the end of the carry. It was
 14-1/2 feet in circumference at two feet from the ground, but at five
 feet divided into three parts. The canoe birches thereabouts were
 commonly marked by conspicuous dark spiral ridges, with a groove
 between, so that I thought at first that they had been struck by
 lightning, but, as the Indian said, it was evidently caused by the
 grain of the tree. He cut a small, woody knob, as big as a filbert,
 from the trunk of a fir, apparently an old balsam vesicle filled with
 wood, which he said was good medicine.
 
 After we had embarked and gone half a mile, my companion remembered
 that he had left his knife, and we paddled back to get it, against the
 strong and swift current. This taught us the difference between going
 up and down the stream, for while we were working our way back a
 quarter of a mile, we should have gone down a mile and a half at
 least. So we landed, and while he and the Indian were gone back for
 it, I watched the motions of the foam, a kind of white water-fowl near
 the shore, forty or fifty rods below. It alternately appeared and
 disappeared behind the rock, being carried round by an eddy. Even this
 semblance of life was interesting on that lonely river.
 
 Immediately below these falls was the Chesuncook Deadwater, caused by
 the flowing back of the lake. As we paddled slowly over this, the
 Indian told us a story of his hunting thereabouts, and something more
 interesting about himself. It appeared that he had represented his
 tribe at Augusta, and also once at Washington, where he had met some
 Western chiefs. He had been consulted at Augusta, and gave advice,
 which he said was followed, respecting the eastern boundary of Maine,
 as determined by highlands and streams, at the time of the
 difficulties on that side. He was employed with the surveyors on the
 line. Also he had called on Daniel Webster in Boston, at the time of
 his Bunker Hill oration.
 
 I was surprised to hear him say that he liked to go to Boston, New
 York, Philadelphia, etc., etc.; that he would like to live there. But
 then, as if relenting a little, when he thought what a poor figure he
 would make there, he added, "I suppose, I live in New York, I be
 poorest hunter, I expect." He understood very well both his superiority
 and his inferiority to the whites. He criticised the people of the
 United States as compared with other nations, but the only distinct
 idea with which he labored was, that they were "very strong," but,
 like some individuals, "too fast." He must have the credit of saying
 this just before the general breaking down of railroads and banks. He
 had a great idea of education, and would occasionally break out into
 such expressions as this, "Kademy--a-cad-e-my--good thing--I suppose
 they usum Fifth Reader there.... You been college?"
 
 From this deadwater the outlines of the mountains about Ktaadn were
 visible. The top of Ktaadn was concealed by a cloud, but the Souneunk
 Mountains were nearer, and quite visible. We steered across the
 northwest end of the lake, from which we looked down south-southeast,
 the whole length to Joe Merry Mountain, seen over its extremity. It is
 an agreeable change to cross a lake, after you have been shut up in
 the woods, not only on account of the greater expanse of water, but
 also of sky. It is one of the surprises which Nature has in store for
 the traveler in the forest. To look down, in this case, over eighteen
 miles of water, was liberating and civilizing even. No doubt, the
 short distance to which you can see in the woods, and the general
 twilight, would at length react on the inhabitants, and make them
 salvages. The lakes also reveal the mountains, and give ample scope
 and range to our thought. The very gulls which we saw sitting on the
 rocks, like white specks, or circling about, reminded me of
 custom-house officers. Already there were half a dozen log huts about
 this end of the lake, though so far from a road. I perceive that in
 these woods the earliest settlements are, for various reasons,
 clustering about the lakes, but partly, I think, for the sake of the
 neighborhood as the oldest clearings. They are forest schools already
 established,--great centres of light. Water is a pioneer which the
 settler follows, taking advantage of its improvements.
 
 Thus far only I had been before. About noon we turned northward, up a
 broad kind of estuary, and at its northeast corner found the
 Caucomgomoc River, and after going about a mile from the lake, reached
 the Umbazookskus, which comes in on the right at a point where the
 former river, coming from the west, turns short to the south. Our
 course was up the Umbazookskus, but as the Indian knew of a good
 camping-place, that is, a cool place where there were few mosquitoes
 about half a mile farther up the Caucomgomoc, we went thither. The
 latter river, judging from the map, is the longer and principal
 stream, and, therefore, its name must prevail below the junction. So
 quickly we changed the civilizing sky of Chesuncook for the dark wood
 of the Caucomgomoc. On reaching the Indian's camping-ground, on the
 south side, where the bank was about a dozen feet high, I read on the
 trunk of a fir tree, blazed by an axe, an inscription in charcoal
 which had been left by him. It was surmounted by a drawing of a bear
 paddling a canoe, which he said was the sign which had been used by
 his family always. The drawing, though rude, could not be mistaken for
 anything but a bear, and he doubted my ability to copy it. The
 inscription ran thus, _verbatim et literatim_. I interline the English
 of his Indian as he gave it to me.
 
      [The figure of a bear in a boat.]
 
                   July 26
                    1853
                 -----------
                 _niasoseb_
               We alone Joseph
                _Polis elioi_
                 Polis start
                  _sia olta_
                 for Oldtown
                  _onke ni_
                 right away
                  _quambi_
                ------------
                  July 15
                    1855
                 _niasoseb_
 
 He added now below:--
 
                    1857
                  July 26
                 Jo. Polis
 
 This was one of his homes. I saw where he had sometimes stretched his
 moose-hides on the opposite or sunny north side of the river, where
 there was a narrow meadow.
 
 After we had selected a place for our camp, and kindled our fire,
 almost exactly on the site of the Indian's last camp here, he, looking
 up, observed, "That tree danger." It was a dead part, more than a foot
 in diameter, of a large canoe birch, which branched at the ground.
 This branch, rising thirty feet or more, slanted directly over the
 spot which we had chosen for our bed. I told him to try it with his
 axe; but he could not shake it perceptibly, and therefore seemed
 inclined to disregard it, and my companion expressed his willingness
 to run the risk. But it seemed to me that we should be fools to lie
 under it, for though the lower part was firm, the top, for aught we
 knew, might be just ready to fall, and we should at any rate be very
 uneasy if the wind arose in the night. It is a common accident for men
 camping in the woods to be killed by a falling tree. So the camp was
 moved to the other side of the fire.
 
 It was, as usual, a damp and shaggy forest, that Caucomgomoc one, and
 the most you knew about it was, that on this side it stretched toward
 the settlements, and on that to still more unfrequented regions. You
 carried so much topography in your mind always,--and sometimes it
 seemed to make a considerable difference whether you sat or lay nearer
 the settlements, or farther off, than your companions,--were the rear
 or frontier man of the camp. But there is really the same difference
 between our positions wherever we may be camped, and some are nearer
 the frontiers on feather-beds in the towns than others on fir twigs in
 the backwoods.
 
 The Indian said that the Umbazookskus, being a dead stream with broad
 meadows, was a good place for moose, and he frequently came a-hunting
 here, being out alone three weeks or more from Oldtown. He sometimes,
 also, went a-hunting to the Seboois Lakes, taking the stage, with his
 gun and ammunition, axe and blankets, hard-bread and pork, perhaps for
 a hundred miles of the way, and jumped off at the wildest place on the
 road, where he was at once at home, and every rod was a tavern-site
 for him. Then, after a short journey through the woods, he would build
 a spruce-bark canoe in one day, putting but few ribs into it, that it
 might be light, and, after doing his hunting with it on the lakes,
 would return with his furs the same way he had come. Thus you have an
 Indian availing himself cunningly of the advantages of civilization,
 without losing any of his woodcraft, but proving himself the more
 successful hunter for it.
 
 This man was very clever and quick to learn anything in his line. Our
 tent was of a kind new to him; but when he had once seen it pitched,
 it was surprising how quickly he would find and prepare the pole and
 forked stakes to pitch it with, cutting and placing them right the
 first time, though I am sure that the majority of white men would have
 blundered several times.
 
 This river came from Caucomgomoc Lake, about ten miles farther up.
 Though it was sluggish here, there were falls not far above us, and we
 saw the foam from them go by from time to time. The Indian said that
 _Caucomgomoc_ meant Big-Gull Lake (_i. e._, herring gull, I suppose),
 gomoc meaning lake. Hence this was _Caucomgomoctook_, or the river
 from that lake. This was the Penobscot _Caucomgomoctook_; there was
 another St. John one not far north. He finds the eggs of this gull,
 sometimes twenty together, as big as hen's eggs, on rocky ledges on
 the west side of Millinocket River, for instance, and eats them.
 
 Now I thought I would observe how he spent his Sunday. While I and my
 companion were looking about at the trees and river, he went to sleep.
 Indeed, he improved every opportunity to get a nap, whatever the day.
 
 Rambling about the woods at this camp, I noticed that they consisted
 chiefly of firs, black spruce, and some white, red maple, canoe birch,
 and, along the river, the hoary alder (_Alnus incana_). I name them in
 the order of their abundance. The _Viburnum nudum_ was a common shrub,
 and of smaller plants, there were the dwarf cornel, great round-leaved
 orchis, abundant and in bloom (a greenish-white flower growing in
 little communities), _Uvularia grandiflora_, whose stem tasted like a
 cucumber, _Pyrola secunda_, apparently the commonest pyrola in those
 woods, now out of bloom, _Pyrola elliptica_, and _Chiogenes
 hispidula_. The _Clintonia borealis_, with ripe berries, was very
 abundant, and perfectly at home there. Its leaves, disposed commonly
 in triangles about its stem, were just as handsomely formed and green,
 and its berries as blue and glossy, as if it grew by some botanist's
 favorite path.
 
 I could trace the outlines of large birches that had fallen long ago,
 collapsed and rotted and turned to soil, by faint yellowish-green
 lines of feather-like moss, eighteen inches wide and twenty or thirty
 feet long, crossed by other similar lines.
 
 I heard a night-warbler, wood thrush, kingfisher, tweezer-bird or
 parti-colored warbler, and a nighthawk. I also heard and saw red
 squirrels, and heard a bullfrog. The Indian said that he heard a
 snake.
 
 Wild as it was, it was hard for me to get rid of the associations of
 the settlements. Any steady and monotonous sound, to which I did not
 distinctly attend, passed for a sound of human industry. The
 waterfalls which I heard were not without their dams and mills to my
 imagination; and several times I found that I had been regarding the
 steady rushing sound of the wind from over the woods beyond the rivers
 as that of a train of cars,--the cars at Quebec. Our minds anywhere,
 when left to themselves, are always thus busily drawing conclusions
 from false premises.
 
 I asked the Indian to make us a sugar-bowl of birch bark, which he
 did, using the great knife which dangled in a sheath from his belt;
 but the bark broke at the corners when he bent it up, and he said it
 was not good; that there was a great difference in this respect
 between the bark of one canoe birch and that of another, _i. e._, one
 cracked more easily than another. I used some thin and delicate sheets
 of this bark which he split and cut, in my flower-book; thinking it
 would be good to separate the dried specimens from the green.
 
 My companion, wishing to distinguish between the black and white
 spruce, asked Polis to show him a twig of the latter, which he did at
 once, together with the black; indeed, he could distinguish them about
 as far as he could see them; but as the two twigs appeared very much
 alike, my companion asked the Indian to point out the difference;
 whereupon the latter, taking the twigs, instantly remarked, as he
 passed his hand over them successively in a stroking manner, that the
 white was rough (_i. e._, the needles stood up nearly perpendicular),
 but the black smooth (_i. e._, as if bent or combed down). This was an
 obvious difference, both to sight and touch. However, if I remember
 rightly, this would not serve to distinguish the white spruce from the
 light-colored variety of the black.
 
 I asked him to let me see him get some black spruce root, and make
 some thread. Whereupon, without looking up at the trees overhead, he
 began to grub in the ground, instantly distinguishing the black spruce
 roots, and cutting off a slender one, three or four feet long, and as
 big as a pipe-stem, he split the end with his knife, and, taking a
 half between the thumb and forefinger of each hand, rapidly separated
 its whole length into two equal semicylindrical halves; then giving me
 another root, he said, "You try." But in my hands it immediately ran
 off one side, and I got only a very short piece. In short, though it
 looked very easy, I found that there was a great art in splitting
 these roots. The split is skillfully humored by bending short with
 this hand or that, and so kept in the middle. He then took off the
 bark from each half, pressing a short piece of cedar bark against the
 convex side with both hands, while he drew the root upward with his
 teeth. An Indian's teeth are strong, and I noticed that he used his
 often where we should have used a hand. They amounted to a third hand.
 He thus obtained, in a moment, a very neat, tough, and flexible
 string, which he could tie into a knot, or make into a fish-line even.
 It is said that in Norway and Sweden the roots of the Norway spruce
 (_Abies excelsa_) are used in the same way for the same purpose. He
 said that you would be obliged to give half a dollar for spruce root
 enough for a canoe, thus prepared. He had hired the sewing of his own
 canoe, though he made all the rest. The root in his canoe was of a
 pale slate-color, probably acquired by exposure to the weather, or
 perhaps from being boiled in water first.
 
 He had discovered the day before that his canoe leaked a little, and
 said that it was owing to stepping into it violently, which forced the
 water under the edge of the horizontal seams on the side. I asked him
 where he would get pitch to mend it with, for they commonly use hard
 pitch, obtained of the whites at Oldtown. He said that he could make
 something very similar, and equally good, not of spruce gum, or the
 like, but of material which we had with us; and he wished me to guess
 what. But I could not, and he would not tell me, though he showed me a
 ball of it when made, as big as a pea, and like black pitch, saying,
 at last, that there were some things which a man did not tell even his
 wife. It may have been his own discovery. In Arnold's expedition the
 pioneers used for their canoe "the turpentine of the pine, and the
 scrapings of the pork-bag."
 
 Being curious to see what kind of fishes there were in this dark,
 deep, sluggish river, I cast in my line just before night, and caught
 several small somewhat yellowish sucker-like fishes, which the Indian
 at once rejected, saying that they were _michigan_ fish (_i. e._,
 _soft_ and _stinking_ fish) and good for nothing. Also, he would not
 touch a pout, which I caught, and said that neither Indians nor whites
 thereabouts ever ate them, which I thought was singular, since they
 are esteemed in Massachusetts, and he had told me that he ate
 hedgehogs, loons, etc. But he said that some small silvery fishes,
 which I called white chivin, which were similar in size and form to
 the first, were the best fish in the Penobscot waters, and if I would
 toss them up the bank to him, he would cook them for me. After
 cleaning them, not very carefully, leaving the heads on, he laid them
 on the coals and so broiled them.
 
 Returning from a short walk, he brought a vine in his hand, and asked
 me if I knew what it was, saying that it made the best tea of anything
 in the woods. It was the creeping snowberry (_Chiogenes hispidula_),
 which was quite common there, its berries just grown. He called it
 _cowosnebagosar_, which name implies that it grows where old prostrate
 trunks have collapsed and rotted. So we determined to have some tea
 made of this to-night. It had a slight checkerberry flavor, and we
 both agreed that it was really better than the black tea which we had
 brought. We thought it quite a discovery, and that it might well be
 dried, and sold in the shops. I, for one, however, am not an old
 tea-drinker, and cannot speak with authority to others. It would have
 been particularly good to carry along for a cold drink during the
 day, the water thereabouts being invariably warm. The Indian said that
 they also used for tea a certain herb which grew in low ground, which
 he did not find there, and ledum, or Labrador tea, which I have since
 found and tried in Concord; also hemlock leaves, the last especially
 in the winter, when the other plants were covered with snow; and
 various other things; but he did not approve of arbor-vitae, which I
 said I had drunk in those woods. We could have had a new kind of tea
 every night.
 
 Just before night we saw a _musquash_ (he did not say muskrat), the
 only one we saw in this voyage, swimming downward on the opposite side
 of the stream. The Indian, wishing to get one to eat, hushed us,
 saying, "Stop, me call 'em;" and, sitting flat on the bank, he began
 to make a curious squeaking, wiry sound with his lips, exerting
 himself considerably. I was greatly surprised,--thought that I had at
 last got into the wilderness, and that he was a wild man indeed, to be
 talking to a musquash! I did not know which of the two was the
 strangest to me. He seemed suddenly to have quite forsaken humanity,
 and gone over to the musquash side. The musquash, however, as near as
 I could see, did not turn aside, though he may have hesitated a
 little, and the Indian said that he saw our fire; but it was evident
 that he was in the habit of calling the musquash to him, as he said.
 An acquaintance of mine who was hunting moose in those woods a month
 after this, tells me that his Indian in this way repeatedly called the
 musquash within reach of his paddle in the moonlight, and struck at
 them.
 
 The Indian said a particularly long prayer this Sunday evening, as if
 to atone for working in the morning.
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
      MONDAY, July 27.
 
 Having rapidly loaded the canoe, which the Indian always carefully
 attended to, that it might be well trimmed, and each having taken a
 look, as usual, to see that nothing was left, we set out again
 descending the Caucomgomoc, and turning northeasterly up the
 _Umbazookskus_. This name, the Indian said, meant Much Meadow River.
 We found it a very meadowy stream, and deadwater, and now very wide on
 account of the rains, though, he said, it was sometimes quite narrow.
 The space between the woods, chiefly bare meadow, was from fifty to
 two hundred rods in breadth, and is a rare place for moose. It
 reminded me of the Concord; and what increased the resemblance was one
 old musquash-house almost afloat.
 
 In the water on the meadows grew sedges, wool-grass, the common blue
 flag abundantly, its flower just showing itself above the high water,
 as if it were a blue water-lily, and higher in the meadows a great
 many clumps of a peculiar narrow-leaved willow (_Salix petiolaris_),
 which is common in our river meadows. It was the prevailing one here,
 and the Indian said that the musquash ate much of it; and here also
 grew the red osier (_Cornus stolonifera_), its large fruit now
 whitish.
 
 Though it was still early in the morning, we saw nighthawks circling
 over the meadow, and as usual heard the pepe (_Muscicapa Cooperi_),
 which is one of the prevailing birds in these woods, and the robin.
 
 It was unusual for the woods to be so distant from the shore, and
 there was quite an echo from them, but when I was shouting in order to
 awake it, the Indian reminded me that I should scare the moose, which
 he was looking out for, and which we all wanted to see. The word for
 echo was _Pockadunkquaywayle_.
 
 A broad belt of dead larch trees along the distant edge of the meadow,
 against the forest on each side, increased the usual wildness of the
 scenery. The Indian called these juniper, and said that they had been
 killed by the backwater caused by the dam at the outlet of Chesuncook
 Lake, some twenty miles distant. I plucked at the water's edge the
 _Asclepias incarnata_, with quite handsome flowers, a brighter red
 than our variety (the _pulchra_). It was the only form of it which I
 saw there.
 
 Having paddled several miles up the Umbazookskus, it suddenly
 contracted to a mere brook, narrow and swift, the larches and other
 trees approaching the bank and leaving no open meadow, and we landed
 to get a black spruce pole for pushing against the stream. This was
 the first occasion for one. The one selected was quite slender, cut
 about ten feet long, merely whittled to a point, and the bark shaved
 off. The stream, though narrow and swift, was still deep, with a muddy
 bottom, as I proved by diving to it. Beside the plants which I have
 mentioned, I observed on the bank here the _Salix cordata_ and
 _rostrata_, _Ranunculus recurvatus_, and _Rubus triflorus_ with ripe
 fruit.
 
 While we were thus employed, two Indians in a canoe hove in sight
 round the bushes, coming down stream. Our Indian knew one of them, an
 old man, and fell into conversation with him in Indian. He belonged at
 the foot of Moosehead. The other was of another tribe. They were
 returning from hunting. I asked the younger if they had seen any
 moose, to which he said no; but I, seeing the moose-hides sticking out
 from a great bundle made with their blankets in the middle of the
 canoe, added, "Only their hides." As he was a foreigner, he may have
 wished to deceive me, for it is against the law for white men and
 foreigners to kill moose in Maine at this season. But perhaps he need
 not have been alarmed, for the moose-wardens are not very particular.
 I heard quite directly of one who being asked by a white man going
 into the woods what he would say if he killed a moose, answered, "If
 you bring me a quarter of it, I guess you won't be troubled." His duty
 being, as he said, only to prevent the "indiscriminate" slaughter of
 them for their hides. I suppose that he would consider it an
 _indiscriminate_ slaughter when a quarter was not reserved for
 himself. Such are the perquisites of this office.
 
 We continued along through the most extensive larch wood which I had
 seen,--tall and slender trees with fantastic branches. But though this
 was the prevailing tree here, I do not remember that we saw any
 afterward. You do not find straggling trees of this species here and
 there throughout the wood, but rather a little forest of them. The
 same is the case with the white and red pines, and some other trees,
 greatly to the convenience of the lumberer. They are of a social
 habit, growing in "veins," "clumps," "groups," or "communities," as
 the explorers call them, distinguishing them far away, from the top of
 a hill or a tree, the white pines towering above the surrounding
 forest, or else they form extensive forests by themselves. I should
 have liked to come across a large community of pines, which had never
 been invaded by the lumbering army.
 
 We saw some fresh moose-tracks along the shore, but the Indian said
 that the moose were not driven out of the woods by the flies, as usual
 at this season, on account of the abundance of water everywhere. The
 stream was only from one and one half to three rods wide, quite
 winding, with occasional small islands, meadows, and some very swift
 and shallow places. When we came to an island, the Indian never
 hesitated which side to take, as if the current told him which was the
 shortest and deepest. It was lucky for us that the water was so high.
 We had to walk but once on this stream, carrying a part of the load,
 at a swift and shallow reach, while he got up with the canoe, not
 being obliged to take out, though he said it was very strong water.
 Once or twice we passed the red wreck of a batteau which had been
 stove some spring.
 
 While making this portage I saw many splendid specimens of the great
 purple fringed orchis, three feet high. It is remarkable that such
 delicate flowers should here adorn these wilderness paths.
 
 Having resumed our seats in the canoe, I felt the Indian wiping my
 back, which he had accidentally spat upon. He said it was a sign that
 I was going to be married.
 
 The Umbazookskus River is called ten miles long. Having poled up the
 narrowest part some three or four miles, the next opening in the sky
 was over Umbazookskus Lake, which we suddenly entered about eleven
 o'clock in the forenoon. It stretches northwesterly four or five
 miles, with what the Indian called the Caucomgomoc Mountain seen far
 beyond it. It was an agreeable change.
 
 This lake was very shallow a long distance from the shore, and I saw
 stone-heaps on the bottom, like those in the Assabet at home. The
 canoe ran into one. The Indian thought that they were made by an eel.
 Joe Aitteon in 1853 thought that they were made by chub. We crossed
 the southeast end of the lake to the carry into Mud Pond.
 
 Umbazookskus Lake is the head of the Penobscot in this direction, and
 Mud Pond is the nearest head of the Allegash, one of the chief sources
 of the St. John. Hodge, who went through this way to the St. Lawrence
 in the service of the State, calls the portage here a mile and three
 quarters long, and states that Mud Pond has been found to be fourteen
 feet higher than Umbazookskus Lake. As the West Branch of the
 Penobscot at the Moosehead carry is considered about twenty-five feet
 lower than Moosehead Lake, it appears that the Penobscot in the upper
 part of its course runs in a broad and shallow valley, between the
 Kennebec and St. John, and lower than either of them, though, judging
 from the map, you might expect it to be the highest.
 
 Mud Pond is about halfway from Umbazookskus to Chamberlain Lake, into
 which it empties, and to which we were bound. The Indian said that
 this was the wettest carry in the State, and as the season was a very
 wet one, we anticipated an unpleasant walk. As usual he made one large
 bundle of the pork-keg, cooking-utensils, and other loose traps, by
 tying them up in his blanket. We should be obliged to go over the
 carry twice, and our method was to carry one half part way, and then
 go back for the rest.
 
 Our path ran close by the door of a log hut in a clearing at this end
 of the carry, which the Indian, who alone entered it, found to be
 occupied by a Canadian and his family, and that the man had been blind
 for a year. He seemed peculiarly unfortunate to be taken blind there,
 where there were so few eyes to see for him. He could not even be led
 out of that country by a dog, but must be taken down the rapids as
 passively as a barrel of flour. This was the first house above
 Chesuncook, and the last on the Penobscot waters, and was built here,
 no doubt, because it was the route of the lumberers in the winter and
 spring.
 
 After a slight ascent from the lake through the springy soil of the
 Canadian's clearing, we entered on a level and very wet and rocky path
 through the universal dense evergreen forest, a loosely paved gutter
 merely, where we went leaping from rock to rock and from side to side,
 in the vain attempt to keep out of the water and mud. We concluded
 that it was yet Penobscot water, though there was no flow to it. It
 was on this carry that the white hunter whom I met in the stage, as he
 told me, had shot two bears a few months before. They stood directly
 in the path, and did not turn out for him. They might be excused for
 not turning out there, or only taking the right as the law directs.
 He said that at this season bears were found on the mountains and
 hillsides in search of berries, and were apt to be saucy,--that we
 might come across them up Trout Stream; and he added, what I hardly
 credited, that many Indians slept in their canoes, not daring to sleep
 on land, on account of them.
 
 Here commences what was called, twenty years ago, the best timber land
 in the State. This very spot was described as "covered with the
 greatest abundance of pine," but now this appeared to me,
 comparatively, an uncommon tree there,--and yet you did not see where
 any more could have stood, amid the dense growth of cedar, fir, etc.
 It was then proposed to cut a canal from lake to lake here, but the
 outlet was finally made farther east, at Telos Lake, as we shall see.
 
 The Indian with his canoe soon disappeared before us; but ere long he
 came back and told us to take a path which turned off westward, it
 being better walking, and, at my suggestion, he agreed to leave a
 bough in the regular carry at that place, that we might not pass it by
 mistake. Thereafter, he said, we were to keep the main path, and he
 added, "You see 'em my tracks." But I had not much faith that we could
 distinguish his tracks, since others had passed over the carry within
 a few days.
 
 We turned off at the right place, but were soon confused by numerous
 logging-paths, coming into the one we were on, by which lumberers had
 been to pick out those pines which I have mentioned. However, we kept
 what we considered the main path, though it was a winding one, and in
 this, at long intervals, we distinguished a faint trace of a
 footstep. This, though comparatively unworn, was at first a better,
 or, at least, a drier road than the regular carry which we had left.
 It led through an arbor-vitae wilderness of the grimmest character. The
 great fallen and rotting trees had been cut through and rolled aside,
 and their huge trunks abutted on the path on each side, while others
 still lay across it two or three feet high. It was impossible for us
 to discern the Indian's trail in the elastic moss, which, like a thick
 carpet, covered every rock and fallen tree, as well as the earth.
 Nevertheless, I did occasionally detect the track of a man, and I gave
 myself some credit for it. I carried my whole load at once, a heavy
 knapsack, and a large india-rubber bag, containing our bread and a
 blanket, swung on a paddle; in all, about sixty pounds; but my
 companion preferred to make two journeys, by short stages, while I
 waited for him. We could not be sure that we were not depositing our
 loads each time farther off from the true path.
 
 As I sat waiting for my companion, he would seem to be gone a long
 time, and I had ample opportunity to make observations on the forest.
 I now first began to be seriously molested by the black fly, a very
 small but perfectly formed fly of that color, about one tenth of an
 inch long, which I first felt, and then saw, in swarms about me, as I
 sat by a wider and more than usually doubtful fork in this dark forest
 path. The hunters tell bloody stories about them,--how they settle in
 a ring about your neck, before you know it, and are wiped off in great
 numbers with your blood. But remembering that I had a wash in my
 knapsack, prepared by a thoughtful hand in Bangor, I made haste to
 apply it to my face and hands, and was glad to find it effectual, as
 long as it was fresh, or for twenty minutes, not only against black
 flies, but all the insects that molested us. They would not alight on
 the part thus defended. It was composed of sweet oil and oil of
 turpentine, with a little oil of spearmint, and camphor. However, I
 finally concluded that the remedy was worse than the disease. It was
 so disagreeable and inconvenient to have your face and hands covered
 with such a mixture.
 
 Three large slate-colored birds of the jay genus (_Garrulus
 Canadensis_), the Canada jay, moose-bird, meat-bird, or what not, came
 flitting silently and by degrees toward me, and hopped down the limbs
 inquisitively to within seven or eight feet. They were more clumsy and
 not nearly so handsome as the bluejay. Fish hawks, from the lake,
 uttered their sharp whistling notes low over the top of the forest
 near me, as if they were anxious about a nest there.
 
 After I had sat there some time, I noticed at this fork in the path a
 tree which had been blazed, and the letters "Chamb. L." written on it
 with red chalk. This I knew to mean Chamberlain Lake. So I concluded
 that on the whole we were on the right course, though as we had come
 nearly two miles, and saw no signs of Mud Pond, I did harbor the
 suspicion that we might be on a direct course to Chamberlain Lake,
 leaving out Mud Pond. This I found by my map would be about five miles
 northeasterly, and I then took the bearing by my compass.
 
 My companion having returned with his bag, and also defended his face
 and hands with the insect-wash, we set forward again. The walking
 rapidly grew worse, and the path more indistinct, and at length, after
 passing through a patch of _Calla palustris_, still abundantly in
 bloom, we found ourselves in a more open and regular swamp, made less
 passable than ordinary by the unusual wetness of the season. We sank a
 foot deep in water and mud at every step, and sometimes up to our
 knees, and the trail was almost obliterated, being no more than that a
 musquash leaves in similar places, when he parts the floating sedge.
 In fact, it probably was a musquash trail in some places. We concluded
 that if Mud Pond was as muddy as the approach to it was wet, it
 certainly deserved its name. It would have been amusing to behold the
 dogged and deliberate pace at which we entered that swamp, without
 interchanging a word, as if determined to go through it, though it
 should come up to our necks. Having penetrated a considerable distance
 into this, and found a tussock on which we could deposit our loads,
 though there was no place to sit, my companion went back for the rest
 of his pack. I had thought to observe on this carry when we crossed
 the dividing line between the Penobscot and St. John, but as my feet
 had hardly been out of water the whole distance, and it was all level
 and stagnant, I began to despair of finding it. I remembered hearing a
 good deal about the "highlands" dividing the waters of the Penobscot
 from those of the St. John, as well as the St. Lawrence, at the time
 of the northeast boundary dispute, and I observed by my map, that the
 line claimed by Great Britain as the boundary prior to 1842 passed
 between Umbazookskus Lake and Mud Pond, so that we had either crossed
 or were then on it. These, then, according to _her_ interpretation of
 the treaty of '83, were the "highlands which divide those rivers that
 empty themselves into the St. Lawrence from those which fall into the
 Atlantic Ocean." Truly an interesting spot to stand on,--if that were
 it,--though you could not sit down there. I thought that if the
 commissioners themselves, and the King of Holland with them, had spent
 a few days here, with their packs upon their backs, looking for that
 "highland," they would have had an interesting time, and perhaps it
 would have modified their views of the question somewhat. The King of
 Holland would have been in his element. Such were my meditations while
 my companion was gone back for his bag.
 
 It was a cedar swamp, through which the peculiar note of the
 white-throated sparrow rang loud and clear. There grew the side-saddle
 flower, Labrador tea, _Kalmia glauca_, and, what was new to me, the
 low birch (_Betula pumila_), a little round-leafed shrub, two or three
 feet high only. We thought to name this swamp after the latter.
 
 After a long while my companion came back, and the Indian with him. We
 had taken the wrong road, and the Indian had lost us. He had very
 wisely gone back to the Canadian's camp, and asked him which way we
 had probably gone, since he could better understand the ways of white
 men, and he told him correctly that we had undoubtedly taken the
 supply road to Chamberlain Lake (slender supplies they would get over
 such a road at this season). The Indian was greatly surprised that we
 should have taken what he called a "tow" (_i. e._, tote or toting or
 supply) road, instead of a carry path,--that we had not followed his
 tracks,--said it was "strange," and evidently thought little of our
 woodcraft.
 
 Having held a consultation, and eaten a mouthful of bread, we
 concluded that it would perhaps be nearer for us two now to keep on to
 Chamberlain Lake, omitting Mud Pond, than to go back and start anew
 for the last place, though the Indian had never been through this way,
 and knew nothing about it. In the meanwhile he would go back and
 finish carrying over his canoe and bundle to Mud Pond, cross that, and
 go down its outlet and up Chamberlain Lake, and trust to meet us there
 before night. It was now a little after noon. He supposed that the
 water in which we stood had flowed back from Mud Pond, which could not
 be far off eastward, but was unapproachable through the dense cedar
 swamp.
 
 Keeping on, we were ere long agreeably disappointed by reaching firmer
 ground, and we crossed a ridge where the path was more distinct, but
 there was never any outlook over the forest. While descending the
 last, I saw many specimens of the great round-leaved orchis, of large
 size; one which I measured had leaves, as usual, flat on the ground,
 nine and a half inches long, and nine wide, and was two feet high. The
 dark, damp wilderness is favorable to some of these orchidaceous
 plants, though they are too delicate for cultivation. I also saw the
 swamp gooseberry (_Rides lacustre_), with green fruit, and in all the
 low ground, where it was not too wet, the _Rubus triflorus_ in fruit.
 At one place I heard a very clear and piercing note from a small hawk,
 like a single note from a white-throated sparrow, only very much
 louder, as he dashed through the tree-tops over my head. I wondered
 that he allowed himself to be disturbed by our presence, since it
 seemed as if he could not easily find his nest again himself in that
 wilderness. We also saw and heard several times the red squirrel, and
 often, as before observed, the bluish scales of the fir cones which it
 had left on a rock or fallen tree. This, according to the Indian, is
 the only squirrel found in those woods, except a very few striped
 ones. It must have a solitary time in that dark evergreen forest,
 where there is so little life, seventy-five miles from a road as we
 had come. I wondered how he could call any particular tree there his
 home; and yet he would run up the stem of one out of the myriads, as
 if it were an old road to him. How can a hawk ever find him there? I
 fancied that he must be glad to see us, though he did seem to chide
 us. One of those sombre fir and spruce woods is not complete unless
 you hear from out its cavernous mossy and twiggy recesses his fine
 alarum,--his spruce voice, like the working of the sap through some
 crack in a tree,--the working of the spruce beer. Such an impertinent
 fellow would occasionally try to alarm the wood about me. "Oh," said
 I, "I am well acquainted with your family, I know your cousins in
 Concord very well. Guess the mail's irregular in these parts, and
 you'd like to hear from 'em." But my overtures were vain, for he would
 withdraw by his aerial turnpikes into a more distant cedar-top, and
 spring his rattle again.
 
 We then entered another swamp, at a necessarily slow pace, where the
 walking was worse than ever, not only on account of the water, but the
 fallen timber, which often obliterated the indistinct trail entirely.
 The fallen trees were so numerous, that for long distances the route
 was through a succession of small yards, where we climbed over fences
 as high as our heads, down into water often up to our knees, and then
 over another fence into a second yard, and so on; and, going back for
 his bag, my companion once lost his way and came back without it. In
 many places the canoe would have run if it had not been for the fallen
 timber. Again it would be more open, but equally wet, too wet for
 trees to grow, and no place to sit down. It was a mossy swamp, which
 it required the long legs of a moose to traverse, and it is very
 likely that we scared some of them in our transit, though we saw none.
 It was ready to echo the growl of a bear, the howl of a wolf, or the
 scream of a panther; but when you get fairly into the middle of one of
 these grim forests, you are surprised to find that the larger
 inhabitants are not at home commonly, but have left only a puny red
 squirrel to bark at you. Generally speaking, a howling wilderness does
 not howl: it is the imagination of the traveler that does the howling.
 I did, however, see one dead porcupine; perhaps he had succumbed to
 the difficulties of the way. These bristly fellows are a very suitable
 small fruit of such unkempt wildernesses.
 
 Making a logging-road in the Maine woods is called "swamping" it, and
 they who do the work are called "swampers." I now perceived the
 fitness of the term. This was the most perfectly swamped of all the
 roads I ever saw. Nature must have cooperated with art here. However,
 I suppose they would tell you that this name took its origin from the
 fact that the chief work of roadmakers in those woods is to make the
 swamps passable. We came to a stream where the bridge, which had been
 made of logs tied together with cedar bark, had been broken up, and we
 got over as we could. This probably emptied into Mud Pond, and perhaps
 the Indian might have come up it and taken us in there if he had known
 it. Such as it was, this ruined bridge was the chief evidence that we
 were on a path of any kind.
 
 We then crossed another low rising ground, and I, who wore shoes, had
 an opportunity to wring out my stockings, but my companion, who used
 boots, had found that this was not a safe experiment for him, for he
 might not be able to get his wet boots on again. He went over the
 whole ground, or water, three times, for which reason our progress was
 very slow; beside that the water softened our feet, and to some extent
 unfitted them for walking. As I sat waiting for him, it would
 naturally seem an unaccountable time that he was gone. Therefore, as I
 could see through the woods that the sun was getting low, and it was
 uncertain how far the lake might be, even if we were on the right
 course, and in what part of the world we should find ourselves at
 nightfall, I proposed that I should push through with what speed I
 could, leaving boughs to mark my path, and find the lake and the
 Indian, if possible, before night, and send the latter back to carry
 my companion's bag.
 
 Having gone about a mile, and got into low ground again, I heard a
 noise like the note of an owl, which I soon discovered to be made by
 the Indian, and, answering him, we soon came together. He had reached
 the lake, after crossing Mud Pond, and running some rapids below it,
 and had come up about a mile and a half on our path. If he had not
 come back to meet us, we probably should not have found him that
 night, for the path branched once or twice before reaching this
 particular part of the lake. So he went back for my companion and his
 bag, while I kept on. Having waded through another stream, where the
 bridge of logs had been broken up and half floated away,--and this was
 not altogether worse than our ordinary walking, since it was less
 muddy,--we continued on, through alternate mud and water, to the shore
 of Apmoojenegamook Lake, which we reached in season for a late supper,
 instead of dining there, as we had expected, having gone without our
 dinner. It was at least five miles by the way we had come, and as my
 companion had gone over most of it three times, he had walked full a
 dozen miles, bad as it was. In the winter, when the water is frozen,
 and the snow is four feet deep, it is no doubt a tolerable path to a
 footman. As it was, I would not have missed that walk for a good deal.
 If you want an exact recipe for making such a road, take one part Mud
 Pond, and dilute it with equal parts of Umbazookskus and
 Apmoojenegamook; then send a family of musquash through to locate it,
 look after the grades and culverts, and finish it to their minds, and
 let a hurricane follow to do the fencing.
 
 We had come out on a point extending into Apmoojenegamook, or
 Chamberlain Lake, west of the outlet of Mud Pond, where there was a
 broad, gravelly, and rocky shore, encumbered with bleached logs and
 trees. We were rejoiced to see such dry things in that part of the
 world. But at first we did not attend to dryness so much as to mud and
 wetness. We all three walked into the lake up to our middle to wash
 our clothes.
 
 This was another noble lake, called twelve miles long, east and west;
 if you add Telos Lake, which, since the dam was built, has been
 connected with it by dead water, it will be twenty; and it is
 apparently from a mile and a half to two miles wide. We were about
 midway its length, on the south side. We could see the only clearing
 in these parts, called the "Chamberlain Farm," with two or three log
 buildings close together, on the opposite shore, some two and a half
 miles distant. The smoke of our fire on the shore brought over two men
 in a canoe from the farm, that being a common signal agreed on when
 one wishes to cross. It took them about half an hour to come over, and
 they had their labor for their pains this time. Even the English name
 of the lake had a wild, woodland sound, reminding me of that
 Chamberlain who killed Paugus at Lovewell's fight.
 
 After putting on such dry clothes as we had, and hanging the others to
 dry on the pole which the Indian arranged over the fire, we ate our
 supper, and lay down on the pebbly shore with our feet to the fire,
 without pitching our tent, making a thin bed of grass to cover the
 stones.
 
 Here first I was molested by the little midge called the no-see-em
 (_Simulium nocivum_,--the latter word is not the Latin for no-see-em),
 especially over the sand at the water's edge, for it is a kind of
 sand-fly. You would not observe them but for their light-colored
 wings. They are said to get under your clothes, and produce a
 feverish heat, which I suppose was what I felt that night.
 
 Our insect foes in this excursion, to sum them up, were, first,
 mosquitoes, the chief ones, but only troublesome at night, or when we
 sat still on shore by day; second, black flies (_Simulium molestum_),
 which molested us more or less on the carries by day, as I have before
 described, and sometimes in narrower parts of the stream. Harris
 mistakes when he says that they are not seen after June. Third,
 moose-flies. The big ones, Polis said, were called _Bososquasis_. It
 is a stout, brown fly, much like a horse-fly, about eleven sixteenths
 of an inch long, commonly rusty-colored beneath, with unspotted wings.
 They can bite smartly, according to Polis, but are easily avoided or
 killed. Fourth, the no-see-ems above mentioned. Of all these, the
 mosquitoes are the only ones that troubled me seriously; but, as I was
 provided with a wash and a veil, they have not made any deep
 impression.
 
 The Indian would not use our wash to protect his face and hands, for
 fear that it would hurt his skin, nor had he any veil; he, therefore,
 suffered from insects now, and throughout this journey, more than
 either of us. I think that he suffered more than I did, when neither
 of us was protected. He regularly tied up his face in his
 handkerchief, and buried it in his blanket, and he now finally lay
 down on the sand between us and the fire for the sake of the smoke,
 which he tried to make enter his blanket about his face, and for the
 same purpose he lit his pipe and breathed the smoke into his blanket.
 
 As we lay thus on the shore, with nothing between us and the stars, I
 inquired what stars he was acquainted with, or had names for. They
 were the Great Bear, which he called by this name, the Seven Stars,
 which he had no English name for, "the morning star," and "the north
 star."
 
 In the middle of the night, as indeed each time that we lay on the
 shore of a lake, we heard the voice of the loon, loud and distinct,
 from far over the lake. It is a very wild sound, quite in keeping with
 the place and the circumstances of the traveler, and very unlike the
 voice of a bird. I could lie awake for hours listening to it, it is so
 thrilling. When camping in such a wilderness as this, you are prepared
 to hear sounds from some of its inhabitants which will give voice to
 its wildness. Some idea of bears, wolves, or panthers runs in your
 head naturally, and when this note is first heard very far off at
 midnight, as you lie with your ear to the ground,--the forest being
 perfectly still about you, you take it for granted that it is the
 voice of a wolf or some other wild beast, for only the last part is
 heard when at a distance,--you conclude that it is a pack of wolves,
 baying the moon, or, perchance, cantering after a moose. Strange as it
 may seem, the "mooing" of a cow on a mountain-side comes nearest to my
 idea of the voice of a bear; and this bird's note resembled that. It
 was the unfailing and characteristic sound of those lakes. We were not
 so lucky as to hear wolves howl, though that is an occasional
 serenade. Some friends of mine, who two years ago went up the
 Caucomgomoc River, were serenaded by wolves while moose-hunting by
 moonlight. It was a sudden burst, as if a hundred demons had broke
 loose,--a startling sound enough, which, if any, would make your hair
 stand on end, and all was still again. It lasted but a moment, and
 you'd have thought there were twenty of them, when probably there were
 only two or three. They heard it twice only, and they said that it
 gave expression to the wilderness which it lacked before. I heard of
 some men who, while skinning a moose lately in those woods, were
 driven off from the carcass by a pack of wolves, which ate it up.
 
 This of the loon--I do not mean its laugh, but its looning,--is a
 long-drawn call, as it were, sometimes singularly human to my
 ear,--_hoo-hoo-ooooo_, like the hallooing of a man on a very high key,
 having thrown his voice into his head. I have heard a sound exactly
 like it when breathing heavily through my own nostrils, half awake at
 ten at night, suggesting my affinity to the loon; as if its language
 were but a dialect of my own, after all. Formerly, when lying awake at
 midnight in those woods, I had listened to hear some words or
 syllables of their language, but it chanced that I listened in vain
 until I heard the cry of the loon. I have heard it occasionally on the
 ponds of my native town, but there its wildness is not enhanced by the
 surrounding scenery.
 
 I was awakened at midnight by some heavy, low-flying bird, probably a
 loon, flapping by close over my head, along the shore. So, turning the
 other side of my half-clad body to the fire, I sought slumber again.
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
      TUESDAY, July 28.
 
 When we awoke, we found a heavy dew on our blankets. I lay awake very
 early, and listened to the clear, shrill _ah, te te, te te, te_ of
 the white-throated sparrow, repeated at short intervals, without the
 least variation, for half an hour, as if it could not enough express
 its happiness. Whether my companions heard it or not, I know not, but
 it was a kind of matins to me, and the event of that forenoon.
 
 It was a pleasant sunrise, and we had a view of the mountains in the
 southeast. Ktaadn appeared about southeast by south. A double-topped
 mountain, about southeast by east, and another portion of the same,
 east-southeast. The last the Indian called Nerlumskeechticook, and
 said that it was at the head of the East Branch, and we should pass
 near it on our return that way.
 
 We did some more washing in the lake this morning, and with our
 clothes hung about on the dead trees and rocks, the shore looked like
 washing-day at home. The Indian, taking the hint, borrowed the soap,
 and, walking into the lake, washed his only cotton shirt on his
 person, then put on his pants and let it dry on him.
 
 I observed that he wore a cotton shirt, originally white, a greenish
 flannel one over it, but no waistcoat, flannel drawers, and strong
 linen or duck pants, which also had been white, blue woolen stockings,
 cowhide boots, and a Kossuth hat. He carried no change of clothing,
 but putting on a stout, thick jacket, which he laid aside in the
 canoe, and seizing a full-sized axe, his gun and ammunition, and a
 blanket, which would do for a sail or knapsack, if wanted, and
 strapping on his belt, which contained a large sheath-knife, he walked
 off at once, ready to be gone all summer. This looked very
 independent; a few simple and effective tools, and no india-rubber
 clothing. He was always the first ready to start in the morning, and
 if it had not held some of our property, would not have been obliged
 to roll up his blanket. Instead of carrying a large bundle of his own
 extra clothing, etc., he brought back the greatcoats of moose tied up
 in his blanket. I found that his outfit was the result of a long
 experience, and in the main hardly to be improved on, unless by
 washing and an extra shirt. Wanting a button here, he walked off to a
 place where some Indians had recently encamped, and searched for one,
 but I believe in vain.
 
 Having softened our stiffened boots and shoes with the pork fat, the
 usual disposition of what was left at breakfast, we crossed the lake
 early, steering in a diagonal direction, northeasterly about four
 miles, to the outlet, which was not to be discovered till we were
 close to it. The Indian name, _Apmoojenegamook_, means lake that is
 crossed, because the usual course lies across, and not along it. This
 is the largest of the Allegash lakes, and was the first St. John water
 that we floated on. It is shaped in the main like Chesuncook. There
 are no mountains or high hills very near it. At Bangor we had been
 told of a township many miles farther northwest; it was indicated to
 us as containing the highest land thereabouts, where, by climbing a
 particular tree in the forest, we could get a general idea of the
 country. I have no doubt that the last was good advice, but we did not
 go there. We did not intend to go far down the Allegash, but merely to
 get a view of the great lakes which are its source, and then return
 this way to the East Branch of the Penobscot. The water now, by good
 rights, flowed northward, if it could be said to flow at all.
 
 After reaching the middle of the lake, we found the waves as usual
 pretty high, and the Indian warned my companion, who was nodding, that
 he must not allow himself to fall asleep in the canoe lest he should
 upset us; adding, that when Indians want to sleep in a canoe, they lie
 down straight on the bottom. But in this crowded one that was
 impossible. However, he said that he would nudge him if he saw him
 nodding.
 
 A belt of dead trees stood all around the lake, some far out in the
 water, with others prostrate behind them, and they made the shore, for
 the most part, almost inaccessible. This is the effect of the dam at
 the outlet. Thus the natural sandy or rocky shore, with its green
 fringe, was concealed and destroyed. We coasted westward along the
 north side, searching for the outlet, about one quarter of a mile
 distant from this savage-looking shore, on which the waves were
 breaking violently, knowing that it might easily be concealed amid
 this rubbish, or by the overlapping of the shore. It is remarkable how
 little these important gates to a lake are blazoned. There is no
 triumphal arch over the modest inlet or outlet, but at some
 undistinguished point it trickles in or out through the uninterrupted
 forest, almost as through a sponge.
 
 We reached the outlet in about an hour, and carried over the dam
 there, which is quite a solid structure, and about one quarter of a
 mile farther there was a second dam. The reader will perceive that the
 result of this particular damming about Chamberlain Lake is, that the
 head-waters of the St. John are made to flow by Bangor. They have thus
 dammed all the larger lakes, raising their broad surfaces many feet;
 Moosehead, for instance, some forty miles long, with its steamer on
 it; thus turning the forces of nature against herself, that they might
 float their spoils out of the country. They rapidly run out of these
 immense forests all the finer, and more accessible pine timber, and
 then leave the bears to watch the decaying dams, not clearing nor
 cultivating the land, nor making roads, nor building houses, but
 leaving it a wilderness as they found it. In many parts, only these
 dams remain, like deserted beaver-dams. Think how much land they have
 flowed, without asking Nature's leave! When the State wishes to endow
 an academy or university, it grants it a tract of forest land: one saw
 represents an academy; a gang, a university.
 
 The wilderness experiences a sudden rise of all her streams and lakes.
 She feels ten thousand vermin gnawing at the base of her noblest
 trees. Many combining drag them off, jarring over the roots of the
 survivors, and tumble them into the nearest stream, till, the fairest
 having fallen, they scamper off to ransack some new wilderness, and
 all is still again. It is as when a migrating army of mice girdles a
 forest of pines. The chopper fells trees from the same motive that the
 mouse gnaws them,--to get his living. You tell me that he has a more
 interesting family than the mouse. That is as it happens. He speaks of
 a "berth" of timber, a good place for him to get into, just as a worm
 might. When the chopper would praise a pine, he will commonly tell you
 that the one he cut was so big that a yoke of oxen stood on its stump;
 as if that were what the pine had grown for, to become the footstool
 of oxen. In my mind's eye, I can see these unwieldy tame deer, with a
 yoke binding them together, and brazen-tipped horns betraying their
 servitude, taking their stand on the stump of each giant pine in
 succession throughout this whole forest, and chewing their cud there,
 until it is nothing but an ox-pasture, and run out at that. As if it
 were good for the oxen, and some terebinthine or other medicinal
 quality ascended into their nostrils. Or is their elevated position
 intended merely as a symbol of the fact that the pastoral comes next
 in order to the sylvan or hunter life?
 
 The character of the logger's admiration is betrayed by his very mode
 of expressing it. If he told all that was in his mind, he would say,
 it was so big that I cut it down and then a yoke of oxen could stand
 on its stump. He admires the log, the carcass or corpse, more than the
 tree. Why, my dear sir, the tree might have stood on its own stump,
 and a great deal more comfortably and firmly than a yoke of oxen can,
 if you had not cut it down. What right have you to celebrate the
 virtues of the man you murdered?
 
 The Anglo-American can indeed cut down, and grub up all this waving
 forest, and make a stump speech, and vote for Buchanan on its ruins,
 but he cannot converse with the spirit of the tree he fells, he cannot
 read the poetry and mythology which retire as he advances. He
 ignorantly erases mythological tablets in order to print his handbills
 and town-meeting warrants on them. Before he has learned his _a b c_
 in the beautiful but mystic lore of the wilderness which Spenser and
 Dante had just begun to read, he cuts it down, coins a _pine-tree_
 shilling (as if to signify the pine's value to him), puts up a
 _dee_strict schoolhouse, and introduces Webster's spelling-book.
 
 Below the last dam, the river being swift and shallow, though broad
 enough, we two walked about half a mile to lighten the canoe. I made
 it a rule to carry my knapsack when I walked, and also to keep it tied
 to a crossbar when in the canoe, that it might be found with the canoe
 if we should upset.
 
 I heard the dog-day locust here, and afterward on the carries, a sound
 which I had associated only with more open, if not settled countries.
 The area for locusts must be small in the Maine woods.
 
 We were now fairly on the Allegash River, which name our Indian said
 meant hemlock bark. These waters flow northward about one hundred
 miles, at first very feebly, then southeasterly two hundred and fifty
 more to the Bay of Fundy. After perhaps two miles of river, we entered
 Heron Lake, called on the map _Pongokwahem_, scaring up forty or fifty
 young _shecorways_, sheldrakes, at the entrance, which ran over the
 water with great rapidity, as usual in a long line.
 
 This was the fourth great lake, lying northwest and southeast, like
 Chesuncook and most of the long lakes in that neighborhood, and,
 judging from the map, it is about ten miles long. We had entered it on
 the southwest side, and saw a dark mountain northeast over the lake,
 not very far off nor high, which the Indian said was called Peaked
 Mountain, and used by explorers to look for timber from. There was
 also some other high land more easterly. The shores were in the same
 ragged and unsightly condition, encumbered with dead timber, both
 fallen and standing, as in the last lake, owing to the dam on the
 Allegash below. Some low points or islands were almost drowned.
 
 I saw something white a mile off on the water, which turned out to be
 a great gull on a rock in the middle, which the Indian would have been
 glad to kill and eat, but it flew away long before we were near; and
 also a flock of summer ducks that were about the rock with it. I
 asking him about herons, since this was Heron Lake, he said that he
 found the blue heron's nests in the hardwood trees. I thought that I
 saw a light-colored object move along the opposite or northern shore,
 four or five miles distant. He did not know what it could be, unless
 it were a moose, though he had never seen a white one; but he said
 that he could distinguish a moose "anywhere on shore, clear across the
 lake."
 
 Rounding a point, we stood across a bay for a mile and a half or two
 miles, toward a large island, three or four miles down the lake. We
 met with ephemerae (shadfly) midway, about a mile from the shore, and
 they evidently fly over the whole lake. On Moosehead I had seen a
 large devil's-needle half a mile from the shore, coming from the
 middle of the lake, where it was three or four miles wide at least. It
 had probably crossed. But at last, of course, you come to lakes so
 large that an insect cannot fly across them; and this, perhaps, will
 serve to distinguish a large lake from a small one.
 
 We landed on the southeast side of the island, which was rather
 elevated and densely wooded, with a rocky shore, in season for an
 early dinner. Somebody had camped there not long before, and left the
 frame on which they stretched a moose-hide, which our Indian
 criticised severely, thinking it showed but little woodcraft. Here
 were plenty of the shells of crayfish, or fresh-water lobsters, which
 had been washed ashore, such as have given a name to some ponds and
 streams. They are commonly four or five inches long. The Indian
 proceeded at once to cut a canoe birch, slanted it up against another
 tree on the shore, tying it with a withe, and lay down to sleep in its
 shade.
 
 When we were on the Caucomgomoc, he recommended to us a new way home,
 the very one which we had first thought of, by the St. John. He even
 said that it was easier, and would take but little more time than the
 other, by the East Branch of the Penobscot, though very much farther
 round; and taking the map, he showed where we should be each night,
 for he was familiar with the route. According to his calculation, we
 should reach the French settlements the next night after this, by
 keeping northward down the Allegash, and when we got into the main St.
 John the banks would be more or less settled all the way; as if that
 were a recommendation. There would be but one or two falls, with short
 carrying-places, and we should go down the stream very fast, even a
 hundred miles a day, if the wind allowed; and he indicated where we
 should carry over into Eel River to save a bend below Woodstock in New
 Brunswick, and so into the Schoodic Lake, and thence to the
 Mattawamkeag. It would be about three hundred and sixty miles to
 Bangor this way, though only about one hundred and sixty by the
 other; but in the former case we should explore the St. John from its
 source through two thirds of its course, as well as the Schoodic Lake
 and Mattawamkeag,--and we were again tempted to go that way. I feared,
 however, that the banks of the St. John were too much settled. When I
 asked him which course would take us through the wildest country, he
 said the route by the East Branch. Partly from this consideration, as
 also from its shortness, we resolved to adhere to the latter route,
 and perhaps ascend Ktaadn on the way. We made this island the limit of
 our excursion in this direction.
 
 We had now seen the largest of the Allegash lakes. The next dam "was
 about fifteen miles" farther north, down the Allegash, and it was dead
 water so far. We had been told in Bangor of a man who lived alone, a
 sort of hermit, at that dam, to take care of it, who spent his time
 tossing a bullet from one hand to the other, for want of
 employment,--as if we might want to call on him. This sort of
 tit-for-tat intercourse between his two hands, bandying to and fro a
 leaden subject, seems to have been his symbol for society.
 
 This island, according to the map, was about a hundred and ten miles
 in a straight line north-northwest from Bangor, and about ninety-nine
 miles east-southeast from Quebec. There was another island visible
 toward the north end of the lake, with an elevated clearing on it; but
 we learned afterward that it was not inhabited, had only been used as
 a pasture for cattle which summered in these woods, though our
 informant said that there was a hut on the mainland near the outlet
 of the lake. This unnaturally smooth-shaven, squarish spot, in the
 midst of the otherwise uninterrupted forest, only reminded us how
 uninhabited the country was. You would sooner expect to meet with a
 bear than an ox in such a clearing. At any rate, it must have been a
 surprise to the bears when they came across it. Such, seen far or
 near, you know at once to be man's work, for Nature never does it. In
 order to let in the light to the earth as on a lake, he clears off the
 forest on the hillsides and plains, and sprinkles fine grass seed,
 like an enchanter, and so carpets the earth with a firm sward.
 
 Polis had evidently more curiosity respecting the few settlers in
 those woods than we. If nothing was said, he took it for granted that
 we wanted to go straight to the next log-hut. Having observed that we
 came by the log huts at Chesuncook, and the blind Canadian's at the
 Mud Pond carry, without stopping to communicate with the inhabitants,
 he took occasion now to suggest that the usual way was, when you came
 near a house, to go to it, and tell the inhabitants what you had seen
 or heard, and then they tell you what they had seen; but we laughed,
 and said that we had had enough of houses for the present, and had
 come here partly to avoid them.
 
 In the meanwhile, the wind, increasing, blew down the Indian's birch,
 and created such a sea that we found ourselves prisoners on the
 island, the nearest shore, which was the western, being perhaps a mile
 distant, and we took the canoe out to prevent its drifting away. We
 did not know but we should be compelled to spend the rest of the day
 and the night there. At any rate, the Indian went to sleep again in
 the shade of his birch, my companion busied himself drying his
 plants, and I rambled along the shore westward, which was quite stony,
 and obstructed with fallen, bleached, or drifted trees for four or
 five rods in width. I found growing on this broad, rocky, and gravelly
 shore the _Salix rostrata_, _discolor_, and _lucida_, _Ranunculus
 recurvatus_, _Potentilla Norvegica_, _Scutellaria lateriflora_,
 _Eupatorium purpureum_, _Aster Tradescanti_, _Mentha Canadensis_,
 _Epilobium angustifolium_ (abundant), _Lycopus sinuatus_, _Solidago
 lanceolata_, _Spiraea salicifolia_, _Antennaria margaraticea_,
 _Prunella_, _Rumex Acetosella_, raspberries, wool-grass, _Onoclea_,
 etc. The nearest trees were _Betula papyracea_ and _excelsa_, and
 _Populus tremuloides_. I give these names because it was my farthest
 northern point.
 
 Our Indian said that he was a doctor, and could tell me some medicinal
 use for every plant I could show him. I immediately tried him. He said
 that the inner bark of the aspen (_Populus tremuloides_) was good for
 sore eyes; and so with various other plants, proving himself as good
 as his word. According to his account, he had acquired such knowledge
 in his youth from a wise old Indian with whom he associated, and he
 lamented that the present generation of Indians "had lost a great
 deal."
 
 He said that the caribou was a "very great runner," that there was
 none about this lake now, though there used to be many, and pointing
 to the belt of dead trees caused by the dams, he added, "No likum
 stump,--when he sees that he scared."
 
 Pointing southeasterly over the lake and distant forest, he observed,
 "Me go Oldtown in three days." I asked how he would get over the
 swamps and fallen trees. "Oh," said he, "in winter all covered, go
 anywhere on snowshoes, right across lakes." When I asked how he went,
 he said, "First I go Ktaadn, west side, then I go Millinocket, then
 Pamadumcook, then Nicketow, then Lincoln, then Oldtown," or else he
 went a shorter way by the Piscataquis. What a wilderness walk for a
 man to take alone! None of your half-mile swamps, none of your
 mile-wide woods merely, as on the skirts of our towns, without hotels,
 only a dark mountain or a lake for guide-board and station, over
 ground much of it impassable in summer!
 
 It reminded me of Prometheus Bound. Here was traveling of the old
 heroic kind over the unaltered face of nature. From the Allegash, or
 Hemlock River, and Pongoquahem Lake, across great Apmoojenegamook, and
 leaving the Nerlumskeechticook Mountain on his left, he takes his way
 under the bear-haunted slopes of Souneunk and Ktaadn Mountains to
 Pamadumcook, and Millinocket's inland seas (where often gulls'-eggs
 may increase his store), and so on to the forks of the Nicketow
 (_niasoseb_, "we alone Joseph," seeing what our folks see), ever
 pushing the boughs of the fir and spruce aside, with his load of furs,
 contending day and night, night and day, with the shaggy demon
 vegetation, traveling through the mossy graveyard of trees. Or he
 could go by "that rough tooth of the sea," Kineo, great source of
 arrows and of spears to the ancients, when weapons of stone were used.
 Seeing and hearing moose, caribou, bears, porcupines, lynxes, wolves,
 and panthers. Places where he might live and die and never hear of
 the United States, which make such a noise in the world,--never hear
 of America, so called from the name of a European gentleman.
 
 There is a lumberer's road called the Eagle Lake road, from the
 Seboois to the east side of this lake. It may seem strange that any
 road through such a wilderness should be passable, even in winter,
 when the snow is three or four feet deep, but at that season, wherever
 lumbering operations are actively carried on, teams are continually
 passing on the single track, and it becomes as smooth almost as a
 railway. I am told that in the Aroostook country the sleds are
 required by law to be of one width (four feet), and sleighs must be
 altered to fit the track, so that one runner may go in one rut and the
 other follow the horse. Yet it is very bad turning out.
 
 We had for some time seen a thunder-shower coming up from the west
 over the woods of the island, and heard the muttering of the thunder,
 though we were in doubt whether it would reach us; but now the
 darkness rapidly increasing, and a fresh breeze rustling the forest,
 we hastily put up the plants which we had been drying, and with one
 consent made a rush for the tent material and set about pitching it. A
 place was selected and stakes and pins cut in the shortest possible
 time, and we were pinning it down lest it should be blown away, when
 the storm suddenly burst over us.
 
 As we lay huddled together under the tent, which leaked considerably
 about the sides, with our baggage at our feet, we listened to some of
 the grandest thunder which I ever heard,--rapid peals, round and
 plump, bang, bang, bang, in succession, like artillery from some
 fortress in the sky; and the lightning was proportionally brilliant.
 The Indian said, "It must be good powder." All for the benefit of the
 moose and us, echoing far over the concealed lakes. I thought it must
 be a place which the thunder loved, where the lightning practiced to
 keep its hand in, and it would do no harm to shatter a few pines. What
 had become of the ephemerae and devil's-needles then? Were they prudent
 enough to seek harbor before the storm? Perhaps their motions might
 guide the voyageur.
 
 Looking out I perceived that the violent shower falling on the lake
 had almost instantaneously flattened the waves,--the commander of that
 fortress had smoothed it for us so,--and, it clearing off, we resolved
 to start immediately, before the wind raised them again.
 
 Going outside, I said that I saw clouds still in the southwest, and
 heard thunder there. The Indian asked if the thunder went "lound"
 (round), saying that if it did we should have more rain. I thought
 that it did. We embarked, nevertheless, and paddled rapidly back
 toward the dams. The white-throated sparrows on the shore were about,
 singing, _Ah, te-e-e, te-e-e, te_, or else _ah, te-e-e, te-e-e,
 te-e-e, te-e-e_.
 
 At the outlet of Chamberlain Lake we were overtaken by another gusty
 rain-storm, which compelled us to take shelter, the Indian under his
 canoe on the bank, and we ran under the edge of the dam. However, we
 were more scared than wet. From my covert I could see the Indian
 peeping out from beneath his canoe to see what had become of the rain.
 When we had taken our respective places thus once or twice, the rain
 not coming down in earnest, we commenced rambling about the
 neighborhood, for the wind had by this time raised such waves on the
 lake that we could not stir, and we feared that we should be obliged
 to camp there. We got an early supper on the dam and tried for fish
 there, while waiting for the tumult to subside. The fishes were not
 only few, but small and worthless, and the Indian declared that there
 were no good fishes in the St. John's waters; that we must wait till
 we got to the Penobscot waters.
 
 At length, just before sunset, we set out again. It was a wild evening
 when we coasted up the north side of this Apmoojenegamook Lake. One
 thunder-storm was just over, and the waves which it had raised still
 running with violence, and another storm was now seen coming up in the
 southwest, far over the lake; but it might be worse in the morning,
 and we wished to get as far as possible on our way up the lake while
 we might. It blowed hard against the northern shore about an eighth of
 a mile distant on our left, and there was just as much sea as our
 shallow canoe would bear, without our taking unusual care. That which
 we kept off, and toward which the waves were driving, was as dreary
 and harborless a shore as you can conceive. For half a dozen rods in
 width it was a perfect maze of submerged trees, all dead and bare and
 bleaching, some standing half their original height, others prostrate,
 and criss-across, above or beneath the surface, and mingled with them
 were loose trees and limbs and stumps, beating about. Imagine the
 wharves of the largest city in the world, decayed, and the earth and
 planking washed away, leaving the spiles standing in loose order, but
 often of twice the ordinary height, and mingled with and beating
 against them the wreck of ten thousand navies, all their spars and
 timbers, while there rises from the water's edge the densest and
 grimmest wilderness, ready to supply more material when the former
 fails, and you may get a faint idea of that coast. We could not have
 landed if we would, without the greatest danger of being swamped; so
 blow as it might, we must depend on coasting by it. It was twilight,
 too, and that stormy cloud was advancing rapidly in our rear. It was a
 pleasant excitement, yet we were glad to reach, at length, in the
 dusk, the cleared shore of the Chamberlain Farm.
 
 We landed on a low and thinly wooded point there, and while my
 companions were pitching the tent, I ran up to the house to get some
 sugar, our six pounds being gone;--it was no wonder they were, for
 Polis had a sweet tooth. He would first fill his dipper nearly a third
 full of sugar, and then add the coffee to it. Here was a clearing
 extending back from the lake to a hilltop, with some dark-colored log
 buildings and a storehouse in it, and half a dozen men standing in
 front of the principal hut, greedy for news. Among them was the man
 who tended the dam on the Allegash and tossed the bullet. He having
 charge of the dams, and learning that we were going to Webster Stream
 the next day, told me that some of their men, who were haying at Telos
 Lake, had shut the dam at the canal there in order to catch trout, and
 if we wanted more water to take us through the canal, we might raise
 the gate, for he would like to have it raised. The Chamberlain Farm is
 no doubt a cheerful opening in the woods, but such was the lateness
 of the hour that it has left but a dusky impression on my mind. As I
 have said, the influx of light merely is civilizing, yet I fancied
 that they walked about on Sundays in their clearing somewhat as in a
 prison-yard.
 
 They were unwilling to spare more than four pounds of brown
 sugar,--unlocking the storehouse to get it,--since they only kept a
 little for such cases as this, and they charged twenty cents a pound
 for it, which certainly it was worth to get it up there.
 
 When I returned to the shore it was quite dark, but we had a rousing
 fire to warm and dry us by, and a snug apartment behind it. The Indian
 went up to the house to inquire after a brother who had been absent
 hunting a year or two, and while another shower was beginning, I
 groped about cutting spruce and arbor-vitae twigs for a bed. I
 preferred the arbor-vitae on account of its fragrance, and spread it
 particularly thick about the shoulders. It is remarkable with what
 pure satisfaction the traveler in these woods will reach his
 camping-ground on the eve of a tempestuous night like this, as if he
 had got to his inn, and, rolling himself in his blanket, stretch
 himself on his six-feet-by-two bed of dripping fir twigs, with a thin
 sheet of cotton for roof, snug as a meadow-mouse in its nest.
 Invariably our best nights were those when it rained, for then we were
 not troubled with mosquitoes.
 
 You soon come to disregard rain on such excursions, at least in the
 summer, it is so easy to dry yourself, supposing a dry change of
 clothing is not to be had. You can much sooner dry you by such a fire
 as you can make in the woods than in anybody's kitchen, the fireplace
 is so much larger, and wood so much more abundant. A shed-shaped tent
 will catch and reflect the heat like a Yankee baker, and you may be
 drying while you are sleeping.
 
 Some who have leaky roofs in the towns may have been kept awake, but
 we were soon lulled asleep by a steady, soaking rain, which lasted all
 night. To-night, the rain not coming at once with violence, the twigs
 were soon dried by the reflected heat.
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
      WEDNESDAY, July 29.
 
 When we awoke it had done raining, though it was still cloudy. The
 fire was put out, and the Indian's boots, which stood under the eaves
 of the tent, were half full of water. He was much more improvident in
 such respects than either of us, and he had to thank us for keeping
 his powder dry. We decided to cross the lake at once, before
 breakfast, or while we could; and before starting I took the bearing
 of the shore which we wished to strike, S. S. E. about three miles
 distant, lest a sudden misty rain should conceal it when we were
 midway. Though the bay in which we were was perfectly quiet and
 smooth, we found the lake already wide awake outside, but not
 dangerously or unpleasantly so; nevertheless, when you get out on one
 of those lakes in a canoe like this, you do not forget that you are
 completely at the mercy of the wind, and a fickle power it is. The
 playful waves may at any time become too rude for you in their sport,
 and play right on over you. We saw a few _shecorways_ and a fish hawk
 thus early, and after much steady paddling and dancing over the dark
 waves of Apmoojenegamook, we found ourselves in the neighborhood of
 the southern land, heard the waves breaking on it, and turned our
 thoughts wholly to that side. After coasting eastward along this shore
 a mile or two, we breakfasted on a rocky point, the first convenient
 place that offered.
 
 It was well enough that we crossed thus early, for the waves now ran
 quite high, and we should have been obliged to go round somewhat, but
 beyond this point we had comparatively smooth water. You can commonly
 go along one side or the other of a lake, when you cannot cross it.
 
 The Indian was looking at the hard-wood ridges from time to time, and
 said that he would like to buy a few hundred acres somewhere about
 this lake, asking our advice. It was to buy as near the crossing-place
 as possible.
 
 My companion and I, having a minute's discussion on some point of
 ancient history, were amused by the attitude which the Indian, who
 could not tell what we were talking about, assumed. He constituted
 himself umpire, and, judging by our air and gesture, he very seriously
 remarked from time to time, "you beat," or "he beat."
 
 Leaving a spacious bay, a northeasterly prolongation of Chamberlain
 Lake, on our left, we entered through a short strait into a small lake
 a couple of miles over, called on the map _Telasinis_, but the Indian
 had no distinct name for it, and thence into _Telos_ Lake, which he
 called _Paytaywecomgomoc_, or Burnt-Ground Lake. This curved round
 toward the northeast, and may have been three or four miles long as
 we paddled. He had not been here since 1825. He did not know what
 Telos meant; thought it was not Indian. He used the word
 "_spokelogan_" (for an inlet in the shore which led nowhere), and when
 I asked its meaning said that there was "no Indian in 'em." There was
 a clearing, with a house and barn, on the southwest shore, temporarily
 occupied by some men who were getting the hay, as we had been told;
 also a clearing for a pasture on a hill on the west side of the lake.
 
 We landed on a rocky point on the northeast side, to look at some red
 pines (_Pinus resinosa_), the first we had noticed, and get some
 cones, for our few which grow in Concord do not bear any.
 
 The outlet from the lake into the East Branch of the Penobscot is an
 artificial one, and it was not very apparent where it was exactly, but
 the lake ran curving far up northeasterly into two narrow valleys or
 ravines, as if it had for a long time been groping its way toward the
 Penobscot waters, or remembered when it anciently flowed there; by
 observing where the horizon was lowest, and following the longest of
 these, we at length reached the dam, having come about a dozen miles
 from the last camp. Somebody had left a line set for trout, and the
 jack knife with which the bait had been cut on the dam beside it, an
 evidence that man was near, and on a deserted log close by a loaf of
 bread baked in a Yankee baker. These proved the property of a solitary
 hunter, whom we soon met, and canoe and gun and traps were not far
 off. He told us that it was twenty miles farther on our route to the
 foot of Grand Lake, where you could catch as many trout as you
 wanted, and that the first house below the foot of the lake, on the
 East Branch, was Hunt's, about forty-five miles farther; though there
 was one about a mile and a half up Trout Stream, some fifteen miles
 ahead, but it was rather a blind route to it. It turned out that,
 though the stream was in our favor, we did not reach the next house
 till the morning of the third day after this. The nearest permanently
 inhabited house behind us was now a dozen miles distant, so that the
 interval between the two nearest houses on our route was about sixty
 miles.
 
 This hunter, who was a quite small, sunburnt man, having already
 carried his canoe over, and baked his loaf, had nothing so interesting
 and pressing to do as to observe our transit. He had been out a month
 or more alone. How much more wild and adventurous his life than that
 of the hunter in Concord woods, who gets back to his house and the
 mill-dam every night! Yet they in the towns who have wild oats to sow
 commonly sow them on cultivated and comparatively exhausted ground.
 And as for the rowdy world in the large cities, so little enterprise
 has it that it never adventures in this direction, but like vermin
 clubs together in alleys and drinking-saloons, its highest
 accomplishment, perchance, to run beside a fire-engine and throw
 brickbats. But the former is comparatively an independent and
 successful man, getting his living in a way that he likes, without
 disturbing his human neighbors. How much more respectable also is the
 life of the solitary pioneer or settler in these, or any
 woods,--having real difficulties, not of his own creation, drawing his
 subsistence directly from nature,--than that of the helpless
 multitudes in the towns who depend on gratifying the extremely
 artificial wants of society and are thrown out of employment by hard
 times!
 
 Here for the first time we found the raspberries really plenty,--that
 is, on passing the height of land between the Allegash and the East
 Branch of the Penobscot; the same was true of the blueberries.
 
 Telos Lake, the head of the St. John on this side, and Webster Pond,
 the head of the East Branch of the Penobscot, are only about a mile
 apart, and they are connected by a ravine, in which but little digging
 was required to make the water of the former, which is the highest,
 flow into the latter. This canal, which is something less than a mile
 long and about four rods wide, was made a few years before my first
 visit to Maine. Since then the lumber of the upper Allegash and its
 lakes has been run down the Penobscot, that is, up the Allegash, which
 here consists principally of a chain of large and stagnant lakes,
 whose thoroughfares, or river-links, have been made nearly equally
 stagnant by damming, and then down the Penobscot. The rush of the
 water has produced such changes in the canal that it has now the
 appearance of a very rapid mountain stream flowing through a ravine,
 and you would not suspect that any digging had been required to
 persuade the waters of the St. John to flow into the Penobscot here.
 It was so winding that one could see but little way down.
 
 It is stated by Springer, in his "Forest Life," that the cause of this
 canal being dug was this: according to the treaty of 1842 with Great
 Britain, it was agreed that all the timber run down the St. John,
 which rises in Maine, "when within the Province of New Brunswick ...
 shall be dealt with as if it were the produce of the said Province,"
 which was thought by our side to mean that it should be free from
 taxation. Immediately, the Province, wishing to get something out of
 the Yankees, levied a duty on all the timber that passed down the St.
 John; but to satisfy its own subjects "made a corresponding discount
 on the stumpage charged those hauling timber from the crown lands."
 The result was that the Yankees made the St. John run the other way,
 or down the Penobscot, so that the Province lost both its duty and its
 water, while the Yankees, being greatly enriched, had reason to thank
 it for the suggestion.
 
 It is wonderful how well watered this country is. As you paddle across
 a lake, bays will be pointed out to you, by following up which, and
 perhaps the tributary stream which empties in, you may, after a short
 portage, or possibly, at some seasons, none at all, get into another
 river, which empties far away from the one you are on. Generally, you
 may go in any direction in a canoe, by making frequent but not very
 long portages. You are only realizing once more what all nature
 distinctly remembers here, for no doubt the waters flowed thus in a
 former geological period, and, instead of being a lake country, it was
 an archipelago. It seems as if the more youthful and impressible
 streams can hardly resist the numerous invitations and temptations to
 leave their native beds and run down their neighbors' channels. Your
 carries are often over half-submerged ground, on the dry channels of a
 former period. In carrying from one river to another, I did not go
 over such high and rocky ground as in going about the falls of the
 same river. For in the former case I was once lost in a swamp, as I
 have related, and, again, found an artificial canal which appeared to
 be natural.
 
 I remember once dreaming of pushing a canoe up the rivers of Maine,
 and that, when I had got so high that the channels were dry, I kept on
 through the ravines and gorges, nearly as well as before, by pushing a
 little harder, and now it seemed to me that my dream was partially
 realized.
 
 Wherever there is a channel for water, there is a road for the canoe.
 The pilot of the steamer which ran from Oldtown up the Penobscot in
 1854 told me that she drew only fourteen inches, and would run easily
 in two feet of water, though they did not like to. It is said that
 some Western steamers can run on a heavy dew, whence we can imagine
 what a canoe may do. Montresor, who was sent from Quebec by the
 English about 1760 to explore the route to the Kennebec, over which
 Arnold afterward passed, supplied the Penobscot near its source with
 water by opening the beaver-dams, and he says, "This is often done."
 He afterward states that the Governor of Canada had forbidden to
 molest the beaver about the outlet of the Kennebec from Moosehead
 Lake, on account of the service which their dams did by raising the
 water for navigation.
 
 This canal, so called, was a considerable and extremely rapid and
 rocky river. The Indian decided that there was water enough in it
 without raising the dam, which would only make it more violent, and
 that he would run down it alone, while we carried the greater part of
 the baggage. Our provision being about half consumed, there was the
 less left in the canoe. We had thrown away the pork-keg, and wrapt its
 contents in birch bark, which is the unequaled wrapping-paper of the
 woods.
 
 Following a moist trail through the forest, we reached the head of
 Webster Pond about the same time with the Indian, notwithstanding the
 velocity with which he moved, our route being the most direct. The
 Indian name of Webster Stream, of which this pond is the source, is,
 according to him, _Madunkchunk_, _i. e._, Height of Land, and of the
 pond, _Madunkchunk-gamooc_, or Height of Land Pond. The latter was two
 or three miles long. We passed near a pine on its shore which had been
 splintered by lightning, perhaps the day before. This was the first
 proper East Branch Penobscot water that we came to.
 
 At the outlet of Webster Lake was another dam, at which we stopped and
 picked raspberries, while the Indian went down the stream a half-mile
 through the forest, to see what he had got to contend with. There was
 a deserted log camp here, apparently used the previous winter, with
 its "hovel" or barn for cattle. In the hut was a large fir twig bed,
 raised two feet from the floor, occupying a large part of the single
 apartment, a long narrow table against the wall, with a stout log
 bench before it, and above the table a small window, the only one
 there was, which admitted a feeble light. It was a simple and strong
 fort erected against the cold, and suggested what valiant trencher
 work had been done there. I discovered one or two curious wooden
 traps, which had not been used for a long time, in the woods near by.
 The principal part consisted of a long and slender pole.
 
 We got our dinner on the shore, on the upper side of the dam. As we
 were sitting by our fire, concealed by the earth bank of the dam, a
 long line of sheldrake, half-grown, came waddling over it from the
 water below, passing within about a rod of us, so that we could almost
 have caught them in our hands. They were very abundant on all the
 streams and lakes which we visited, and every two or three hours they
 would rush away in a long string over the water before us, twenty to
 fifty of them at once, rarely ever flying, but running with great
 rapidity up or down the stream, even in the midst of the most violent
 rapids, and apparently as fast up as down, or else crossing
 diagonally, the old, as it appeared, behind, and driving them, and
 flying to the front from time to time, as if to direct them. We also
 saw many small black dippers, which behaved in a similar manner, and,
 once or twice, a few black ducks.
 
 An Indian at Oldtown had told us that we should be obliged to carry
 ten miles between Telos Lake on the St. John and Second Lake on the
 East Branch of the Penobscot; but the lumberers whom we met assured us
 that there would not be more than a mile of carry. It turned out that
 the Indian, who had lately been over this route, was nearest right, as
 far as we were concerned. However, if one of us could have assisted
 the Indian in managing the canoe in the rapids, we might have run the
 greater part of the way; but as he was alone in the management of the
 canoe in such places, we were obliged to walk the greater part. I did
 not feel quite ready to try such an experiment on Webster Stream,
 which has so bad a reputation. According to my observation, a batteau,
 properly manned, shoots rapids as a matter of course, which a single
 Indian with a canoe carries round.
 
 My companion and I carried a good part of the baggage on our
 shoulders, while the Indian took that which would be least injured by
 wet in the canoe. We did not know when we should see him again, for he
 had not been this way since the canal was cut, nor for more than
 thirty years. He agreed to stop when he got to smooth water, come up
 and find our path if he could, and halloo for us, and after waiting a
 reasonable time go on and try again,--and we were to look out in like
 manner for him.
 
 He commenced by running through the sluiceway and over the dam, as
 usual, standing up in his tossing canoe, and was soon out of sight
 behind a point in a wild gorge. This Webster Stream is well known to
 lumbermen as a difficult one. It is exceedingly rapid and rocky, and
 also shallow, and can hardly be considered navigable, unless that may
 mean that what is launched in it is sure to be carried swiftly down
 it, though it may be dashed to pieces by the way. It is somewhat like
 navigating a thunder-spout. With commonly an irresistible force urging
 you on, you have got to choose your own course each moment, between
 the rocks and shallows, and to get into it, moving forward always with
 the utmost possible moderation, and often holding on, if you can, that
 you may inspect the rapids before you.
 
 By the Indian's direction we took an old path on the south side,
 which appeared to keep down the stream, though at a considerable
 distance from it, cutting off bends, perhaps to Second Lake, having
 first taken the course from the map with a compass, which was
 northeasterly, for safety. It was a wild wood-path, with a few tracks
 of oxen which had been driven over it, probably to some old camp
 clearing, for pasturage, mingled with the tracks of moose which had
 lately used it. We kept on steadily for about an hour without putting
 down our packs, occasionally winding around or climbing over a fallen
 tree, for the most part far out of sight and hearing of the river;
 till, after walking about three miles, we were glad to find that the
 path came to the river again at an old camp ground, where there was a
 small opening in the forest, at which we paused. Swiftly as the
 shallow and rocky river ran here, a continuous rapid with dancing
 waves, I saw, as I sat on the shore, a long string of sheldrakes,
 which something scared, run up the opposite side of the stream by me,
 with the same ease that they commonly did down it, just touching the
 surface of the waves, and getting an impulse from them as they flowed
 from under them; but they soon came back, driven by the Indian, who
 had fallen a little behind us on account of the windings. He shot
 round a point just above, and came to land by us with considerable
 water in his canoe. He had found it, as he said, "very strong water,"
 and had been obliged to land once before to empty out what he had
 taken in. He complained that it strained him to paddle so hard in
 order to keep his canoe straight in its course, having no one in the
 bows to aid him, and, shallow as it was, said that it would be no
 joke to upset there, for the force of the water was such that he had
 as lief I would strike him over the head with a paddle as have that
 water strike him. Seeing him come out of that gap was as if you should
 pour water down an inclined and zigzag trough, then drop a nutshell
 into it, and, taking a short cut to the bottom, get there in time to
 see it come out, notwithstanding the rush and tumult, right side up,
 and only partly full of water.
 
 After a moment's breathing-space, while I held his canoe, he was soon
 out of sight again around another bend, and we, shouldering our packs,
 resumed our course.
 
 We did not at once fall into our path again, but made our way with
 difficulty along the edge of the river, till at length, striking
 inland through the forest, we recovered it. Before going a mile we
 heard the Indian calling to us. He had come up through the woods and
 along the path to find us, having reached sufficiently smooth water to
 warrant his taking us in. The shore was about one fourth of a mile
 distant, through a dense, dark forest, and as he led us back to it,
 winding rapidly about to the right and left, I had the curiosity to
 look down carefully, and found that he was following his steps
 backward. I could only occasionally perceive his trail in the moss,
 and yet he did not appear to look down nor hesitate an instant, but
 led us out exactly to his canoe. This surprised me; for without a
 compass, or the sight or noise of the river to guide us, we could not
 have kept our course many minutes, and could have retraced our steps
 but a short distance, with a great deal of pains and very slowly,
 using a laborious circumspection. But it was evident that he could go
 back through the forest wherever he had been during the day.
 
 After this rough walking in the dark woods it was an agreeable change
 to glide down the rapid river in the canoe once more. This river,
 which was about the size of our Assabet (in Concord), though still
 very swift, was almost perfectly smooth here, and showed a very
 visible declivity, a regularly inclined plane, for several miles, like
 a mirror set a little aslant, on which we coasted down. This very
 obvious regular descent, particularly plain when I regarded the
 water-line against the shores, made a singular impression on me, which
 the swiftness of our motion probably enhanced, so that we seemed to be
 gliding down a much steeper declivity than we were, and that we could
 not save ourselves from rapids and falls if we should suddenly come to
 them. My companion did not perceive this slope, but I have a
 surveyor's eyes, and I satisfied myself that it was no ocular
 illusion. You could tell at a glance on approaching such a river which
 way the water flowed, though you might perceive no motion. I observed
 the angle at which a level line would strike the surface, and
 calculated the amount of fall in a rod, which did not need to be
 remarkably great to produce this effect.
 
 It was very exhilarating, and the perfection of traveling, quite
 unlike floating on our dead Concord River, the coasting down this
 inclined mirror, which was now and then gently winding, down a
 mountain, indeed, between two evergreen forests, edged with lofty dead
 white pines, sometimes slanted half-way over the stream, and destined
 soon to bridge it. I saw some monsters there, nearly destitute of
 branches, and scarcely diminishing in diameter for eighty or ninety
 feet.
 
 As we thus swept along, our Indian repeated in a deliberate and
 drawling tone the words "Daniel Webster, great lawyer," apparently
 reminded of him by the name of the stream, and he described his
 calling on him once in Boston, at what he supposed was his
 boarding-house. He had no business with him, but merely went to pay
 his respects, as we should say. In answer to our questions, he
 described his person well enough. It was on the day after Webster
 delivered his Bunker Hill oration, which I believe Polis heard. The
 first time he called he waited till he was tired without seeing him,
 and then went away. The next time, he saw him go by the door of the
 room in which he was waiting several times, in his shirt-sleeves,
 without noticing him. He thought that if he had come to see Indians,
 they would not have treated him so. At length, after very long delay,
 he came in, walked toward him, and asked in a loud voice, gruffly,
 "What do you want?" and he, thinking at first, by the motion of his
 hand, that he was going to strike him, said to himself, "You'd better
 take care; if you try that I shall know what to do." He did not like
 him, and declared that all he said "was not worth talk about a
 musquash." We suggested that probably Mr. Webster was very busy, and
 had a great many visitors just then.
 
 Coming to falls and rapids, our easy progress was suddenly terminated.
 The Indian went alongshore to inspect the water, while we climbed over
 the rocks, picking berries. The peculiar growth of blueberries on the
 tops of large rocks here made the impression of high land, and indeed
 this was the Height-of-Land Stream. When the Indian came back, he
 remarked, "You got to walk; ver strong water." So, taking out his
 canoe, he launched it again below the falls, and was soon out of
 sight. At such times he would step into the canoe, take up his paddle,
 and, with an air of mystery, start off, looking far down-stream, and
 keeping his own counsel, as if absorbing all the intelligence of
 forest and stream into himself; but I sometimes detected a little fun
 in his face, which could yield to my sympathetic smile, for he was
 thoroughly good-humored. We meanwhile scrambled along the shore with
 our packs, without any path. This was the last of _our_ boating for
 the day.
 
 The prevailing rock here was a kind of slate, standing on its edges,
 and my companion, who was recently from California, thought it exactly
 like that in which the gold is found, and said that if he had had a
 pan he would have liked to wash a little of the sand here.
 
 The Indian now got along much faster than we, and waited for us from
 time to time. I found here the only cool spring that I drank at
 anywhere on this excursion, a little water filling a hollow in the
 sandy bank. It was a quite memorable event, and due to the elevation
 of the country, for wherever else we had been the water in the rivers
 and the streams emptying in was dead and warm, compared with that of a
 mountainous region. It was very bad walking along the shore over
 fallen and drifted trees and bushes, and rocks, from time to time
 swinging ourselves round over the water, or else taking to a gravel
 bar or going inland. At one place, the Indian being ahead, I was
 obliged to take off all my clothes in order to ford a small but deep
 stream emptying in, while my companion, who was inland, found a rude
 bridge, high up in the woods, and I saw no more of him for some time.
 I saw there very fresh moose tracks, found a new goldenrod to me
 (perhaps _Solidago thyrsoidea_), and I passed one white pine log,
 which had lodged, in the forest near the edge of the stream, which was
 quite five feet in diameter at the butt. Probably its size detained
 it.
 
 Shortly after this I overtook the Indian at the edge of some burnt
 land, which extended three or four miles at least, beginning about
 three miles above Second Lake, which we were expecting to reach that
 night, and which is about ten miles from Telos Lake. This burnt region
 was still more rocky than before, but, though comparatively open, we
 could not yet see the lake. Not having seen my companion for some
 time, I climbed, with the Indian, a singular high rock on the edge of
 the river, forming a narrow ridge only a foot or two wide at top, in
 order to look for him; and, after calling many times, I at length
 heard him answer from a considerable distance inland, he having taken
 a trail which led off from the river, perhaps directly to the lake,
 and was now in search of the river again. Seeing a much higher rock,
 of the same character, about one third of a mile farther east, or
 down-stream, I proceeded toward it, through the burnt land, in order
 to look for the lake from its summit, supposing that the Indian would
 keep down the stream in his canoe, and hallooing all the while that my
 companion might join me on the way. Before we came together I noticed
 where a moose, which possibly I had scared by my shouting, had
 apparently just run along a large rotten trunk of a pine, which made
 a bridge, thirty or forty feet long, over a hollow, as convenient for
 him as for me. The tracks were as large as those of an ox, but an ox
 could not have crossed there. This burnt land was an exceedingly wild
 and desolate region. Judging by the weeds and sprouts, it appeared to
 have been burnt about two years before. It was covered with charred
 trunks, either prostrate or standing, which crocked our clothes and
 hands, and we could not easily have distinguished a bear there by his
 color. Great shells of trees, sometimes unburnt without, or burnt on
 one side only, but black within, stood twenty or forty feet high. The
 fire had run up inside, as in a chimney, leaving the sap-wood.
 Sometimes we crossed a rocky ravine fifty feet wide, on a fallen
 trunk; and there were great fields of fire-weed (_Epilobium
 angustifolium_) on all sides, the most extensive that I ever saw,
 which presented great masses of pink. Intermixed with these were
 blueberry and raspberry bushes.
 
 Having crossed a second rocky ridge like the first, when I was
 beginning to ascend the third, the Indian, whom I had left on the
 shore some fifty rods behind, beckoned to me to come to him, but I
 made sign that I would first ascend the highest rock before me, whence
 I expected to see the lake. My companion accompanied me to the top.
 This was formed just like the others. Being struck with the perfect
 parallelism of these singular rock hills, however much one might be in
 advance of another, I took out my compass and found that they lay
 northwest and southeast, the rock being on its edge, and sharp edges
 they were. This one, to speak from memory, was perhaps a third of a
 mile in length, but quite narrow, rising gradually from the northwest
 to the height of about eighty feet, but steep on the southeast end.
 The southwest side was as steep as an ordinary roof, or as we could
 safely climb; the northeast was an abrupt precipice from which you
 could jump clean to the bottom, near which the river flowed; while the
 level top of the ridge, on which you walked along, was only from one
 to three or four feet in width. For a rude illustration, take the half
 of a pear cut in two lengthwise, lay it on its flat side, the stem to
 the northwest, and then halve it vertically in the direction of its
 length, keeping the southwest half. Such was the general form.
 
 There was a remarkable series of these great rock-waves revealed by
 the burning; breakers, as it were. No wonder that the river that found
 its way through them was rapid and obstructed by falls. No doubt the
 absence of soil on these rocks, or its dryness where there was any,
 caused this to be a very thorough burning. We could see the lake over
 the woods, two or three miles ahead, and that the river made an abrupt
 turn southward around the northwest end of the cliff on which we
 stood, or a little above us, so that we had cut off a bend, and that
 there was an important fall in it a short distance below us. I could
 see the canoe a hundred rods behind, but now on the opposite shore,
 and supposed that the Indian had concluded to take out and carry round
 some bad rapids on that side, and that that might be what he had
 beckoned to me for; but after waiting a while I could still see
 nothing of him, and I observed to my companion that I wondered where
 he was, though I began to suspect that he had gone inland to look for
 the lake from some hilltop on that side, as we had done. This proved
 to be the case; for after I had started to return to the canoe, I
 heard a faint halloo, and descried him on the top of a distant rocky
 hill on that side. But as, after a long time had elapsed, I still saw
 his canoe in the same place, and he had not returned to it, and
 appeared in no hurry to do so, and, moreover, as I remembered that he
 had previously beckoned to me, I thought that there might be something
 more to delay him than I knew, and began to return northwest, along
 the ridge, toward the angle in the river. My companion, who had just
 been separated from us, and had even contemplated the necessity of
 camping alone, wishing to husband his steps, and yet to keep with us,
 inquired where I was going; to which I answered that I was going far
 enough back to communicate with the Indian, and that then I thought we
 had better go along the shore together, and keep him in sight.
 
 When we reached the shore, the Indian appeared from out the woods on
 the opposite side, but on account of the roar of the water it was
 difficult to communicate with him. He kept along the shore westward to
 his canoe, while we stopped at the angle where the stream turned
 southward around the precipice. I again said to my companion that we
 would keep along the shore and keep the Indian in sight. We started to
 do so, being close together, the Indian behind us having launched his
 canoe again, but just then I saw the latter, who had crossed to our
 side, forty or fifty rods behind, beckoning to me, and I called to my
 companion, who had just disappeared behind large rocks at the point
 of the precipice, three or four rods before me, on his way down the
 stream, that I was going to help the Indian a moment. I did
 so,--helped get the canoe over a fall, lying with my breast over a
 rock, and holding one end while he received it below,--and within ten
 or fifteen minutes at most I was back again at the point where the
 river turned southward, in order to catch up with my companion, while
 Polis glided down the river alone, parallel with me. But to my
 surprise, when I rounded the precipice, though the shore was bare of
 trees, without rocks, for a quarter of a mile at least, my companion
 was not to be seen. It was as if he had sunk into the earth. This was
 the more unaccountable to me, because I knew that his feet were, since
 our swamp walk, very sore, and that he wished to keep with the party;
 and besides this was very bad walking, climbing over or about the
 rocks. I hastened along, hallooing and searching for him, thinking he
 might be concealed behind a rock, yet doubting if he had not taken the
 other side of the precipice, but the Indian had got along still faster
 in his canoe, till he was arrested by the falls, about a quarter of a
 mile below. He then landed, and said that we could go no farther that
 night. The sun was setting, and on account of falls and rapids we
 should be obliged to leave this river and carry a good way into
 another farther east. The first thing then was to find my companion,
 for I was now very much alarmed about him, and I sent the Indian along
 the shore down-stream, which began to be covered with unburnt wood
 again just below the falls, while I searched backward about the
 precipice which we had passed. The Indian showed some unwillingness
 to exert himself, complaining that he was very tired, in consequence
 of his day's work, that it had strained him very much getting down so
 many rapids alone; but he went off calling somewhat like an owl. I
 remembered that my companion was near-sighted, and I feared that he
 had either fallen from the precipice, or fainted and sunk down amid
 the rocks beneath it. I shouted and searched above and below this
 precipice in the twilight till I could not see, expecting nothing less
 than to find his body beneath it. For half an hour I anticipated and
 believed only the worst. I thought what I should do the next day if I
 did not find him, what I _could_ do in such a wilderness, and how his
 relatives would feel, if I should return without him. I felt that if
 he were really lost away from the river there, it would be a desperate
 undertaking to find him; and where were they who could help you? What
 would it be to raise the country, where there were only two or three
 camps, twenty or thirty miles apart, and no road, and perhaps nobody
 at home? Yet we must try the harder, the less the prospect of success.
 
 I rushed down from this precipice to the canoe in order to fire the
 Indian's gun, but found that my companion had the caps. I was still
 thinking of getting it off when the Indian returned. He had not found
 him, but he said that he had seen his tracks once or twice along the
 shore. This encouraged me very much. He objected to firing the gun,
 saying that if my companion heard it, which was not likely, on account
 of the roar of the stream, it would tempt him to come toward us, and
 he might break his neck in the dark. For the same reason we refrained
 from lighting a fire on the highest rock. I proposed that we should
 both keep down the stream to the lake, or that I should go at any
 rate, but the Indian said: "No use, can't do anything in the dark;
 come morning, then we find 'em. No harm,--he make 'em camp. No bad
 animals here, no gristly bears, such as in California, where he's
 been,--warm night,--he well off as you and I." I considered that if he
 was well he could do without us. He had just lived eight years in
 California, and had plenty of experience with wild beasts and wilder
 men, was peculiarly accustomed to make journeys of great length; but
 if he were sick or dead, he was near where we were. The darkness in
 the woods was by this so thick that it alone decided the question. We
 must camp where we were. I knew that he had his knapsack, with
 blankets and matches, and, if well, would fare no worse than we,
 except that he would have no supper nor society.
 
 This side of the river being so encumbered with rocks, we crossed to
 the eastern or smoother shore, and proceeded to camp there, within two
 or three rods of the falls. We pitched no tent, but lay on the sand,
 putting a few handfuls of grass and twigs under us, there being no
 evergreen at hand. For fuel we had some of the charred stumps. Our
 various bags of provisions had got quite wet in the rapids, and I
 arranged them about the fire to dry. The fall close by was the
 principal one on this stream, and it shook the earth under us. It was
 a cool, because dewy, night; the more so, probably, owing to the
 nearness of the falls. The Indian complained a good deal, and thought
 afterward that he got a cold there which occasioned a more serious
 illness. We were not much troubled by mosquitoes at any rate. I lay
 awake a good deal from anxiety, but, unaccountably to myself, was at
 length comparatively at ease respecting him. At first I had
 apprehended the worst, but now I had little doubt but that I should
 find him in the morning. From time to time I fancied that I heard his
 voice calling through the roar of the falls from the opposite side of
 the river; but it is doubtful if we could have heard him across the
 stream there. Sometimes I doubted whether the Indian had really seen
 his tracks, since he manifested an unwillingness to make much of a
 search, and then my anxiety returned.
 
 It was the most wild and desolate region we had camped in, where, if
 anywhere, one might expect to meet with befitting inhabitants, but I
 heard only the squeak of a nighthawk flitting over. The moon in her
 first quarter, in the fore part of the night, setting over the bare
 rocky hills garnished with tall, charred, and hollow stumps or shells
 of trees, served to reveal the desolation.
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
      THURSDAY, July 30.
 
 I aroused the Indian early this morning to go in search of our
 companion, expecting to find him within a mile or two, farther down
 the stream. The Indian wanted his breakfast first, but I reminded him
 that my companion had had neither breakfast nor supper. We were
 obliged first to carry our canoe and baggage over into another stream,
 the main East Branch, about three fourths of a mile distant, for
 Webster Stream was no farther navigable. We went twice over this
 carry, and the dewy bushes wet us through like water up to the
 middle; I hallooed in a high key from time to time, though I had
 little expectation that I could be heard over the roar of the rapids,
 and, moreover, we were necessarily on the opposite side of the stream
 to him. In going over this portage the last time, the Indian, who was
 before me with the canoe on his head, stumbled and fell heavily once,
 and lay for a moment silent, as if in pain. I hastily stepped forward
 to help him, asking if he was much hurt, but after a moment's pause,
 without replying, he sprang up and went forward. He was all the way
 subject to taciturn fits, but they were harmless ones.
 
 We had launched our canoe and gone but little way down the East
 Branch, when I heard an answering shout from my companion, and soon
 after saw him standing on a point where there was a clearing a quarter
 of a mile below, and the smoke of his fire was rising near by. Before
 I saw him I naturally shouted again and again, but the Indian curtly
 remarked, "He hears you," as if once was enough. It was just below the
 mouth of Webster Stream. When we arrived, he was smoking his pipe, and
 said that he had passed a pretty comfortable night, though it was
 rather cold, on account of the dew.
 
 It appeared that when we stood together the previous evening, and I
 was shouting to the Indian across the river, he, being near-sighted,
 had not seen the Indian nor his canoe, and when I went back to the
 Indian's assistance, did not see which way I went, and supposed that
 we were below and not above him, and so, making haste to catch up, he
 ran away from us. Having reached this clearing, a mile or more below
 our camp, the night overtook him, and he made a fire in a little
 hollow, and lay down by it in his blanket, still thinking that we were
 ahead of him. He thought it likely that he had heard the Indian call
 once the evening before, but mistook it for an owl. He had seen one
 botanical rarity before it was dark,--pure white _Epilobium
 angustifolium_ amidst the fields of pink ones, in the burnt lands. He
 had already stuck up the remnant of a lumberer's shirt, found on the
 point, on a pole by the waterside, for a signal, and attached a note
 to it, to inform us that he had gone on to the lake, and that if he
 did not find us there, he would be back in a couple of hours. If he
 had not found us soon, he had some thoughts of going back in search of
 the solitary hunter whom we had met at Telos Lake, ten miles behind,
 and, if successful, hire him to take him to Bangor. But if this hunter
 had moved as fast as we, he would have been twenty miles off by this
 time, and who could guess in what direction? It would have been like
 looking for a needle in a haymow, to search for him in these woods. He
 had been considering how long he could live on berries alone.
 
 We substituted for his note a card containing our names and
 destination, and the date of our visit, which Polis neatly inclosed in
 a piece of birch bark to keep it dry. This has probably been read by
 some hunter or explorer ere this.
 
 We all had good appetites for the breakfast which we made haste to
 cook here, and then, having partially dried our clothes, we glided
 swiftly down the winding stream toward Second Lake.
 
 As the shores became flatter with frequent gravel and sand-bars, and
 the stream more winding in the lower land near the lake, elms and ash
 trees made their appearance; also the wild yellow lily (_Lilium
 Canadense_), some of whose bulbs I collected for a soup. On some
 ridges the burnt land extended as far as the lake. This was a very
 beautiful lake, two or three miles long, with high mountains on the
 southwest side, the (as our Indian said) _Nerlumskeechticook_, _i.
 e._, Deadwater Mountain. It appears to be the same called Carbuncle
 Mountain on the map. According to Polis, it extends in separate
 elevations all along this and the next lake, which is much larger. The
 lake, too, I think, is called by the same name, or perhaps with the
 addition of _gamoc_ or _mooc_. The morning was a bright one, and
 perfectly still and serene, the lake as smooth as glass, we making the
 only ripple as we paddled into it. The dark mountains about it were
 seen through a glaucous mist, and the brilliant white stems of canoe
 birches mingled with the other woods around it. The wood thrush sang
 on the distant shore, and the laugh of some loons, sporting in a
 concealed western bay, as if inspired by the morning, came distinct
 over the lake to us, and, what was more remarkable, the echo which ran
 round the lake was much louder than the original note; probably
 because, the loon being in a regularly curving bay under the mountain,
 we were exactly in the focus of many echoes, the sound being reflected
 like light from a concave mirror. The beauty of the scene may have
 been enhanced to our eyes by the fact that we had just come together
 again after a night of some anxiety. This reminded me of the Ambejijis
 Lake on the West Branch, which I crossed in my first coming to Maine.
 Having paddled down three quarters of the lake, we came to a
 standstill, while my companion let down for fish. A white (or whitish)
 gull sat on a rock which rose above the surface in mid-lake not far
 off, quite in harmony with the scene; and as we rested there in the
 warm sun, we heard one loud crushing or crackling sound from the
 forest, forty or fifty rods distant, as of a stick broken by the foot
 of some large animal. Even this was an interesting incident there. In
 the midst of our dreams of giant lake trout, even then supposed to be
 nibbling, our fishermen drew up a diminutive red perch, and we took up
 our paddles again in haste.
 
 It was not apparent where the outlet of this lake was, and while the
 Indian thought it was in one direction, I thought it was in another.
 He said, "I bet you four-pence it is there," but he still held on in
 my direction, which proved to be the right one. As we were approaching
 the outlet, it being still early in the forenoon, he suddenly
 exclaimed, "Moose! moose!" and told us to be still. He put a cap on
 his gun, and, standing up in the stern, rapidly pushed the canoe
 straight toward the shore and the moose. It was a cow moose, about
 thirty rods off, standing in the water by the side of the outlet,
 partly behind some fallen timber and bushes, and at that distance she
 did not look very large. She was flapping her large ears, and from
 time to time poking off the flies with her nose from some part of her
 body. She did not appear much alarmed by our neighborhood, only
 occasionally turned her head and looked straight at us, and then gave
 her attention to the flies again. As we approached nearer she got out
 of the water, stood higher, and regarded us more suspiciously. Polis
 pushed the canoe steadily forward in the shallow water, and I for a
 moment forgot the moose in attending to some pretty rose-colored
 Polygonums just rising above the surface, but the canoe soon grounded
 in the mud eight or ten rods distant from the moose, and the Indian
 seized his gun and prepared to fire. After standing still a moment,
 she turned slowly, as usual, so as to expose her side, and he improved
 this moment to fire, over our heads. She thereupon moved off eight or
 ten rods at a moderate pace, across a shallow bay, to an old
 standing-place of hers, behind some fallen red maples, on the opposite
 shore, and there she stood still again a dozen or fourteen rods from
 us, while the Indian hastily loaded and fired twice at her, without
 her moving. My companion, who passed him his caps and bullets, said
 that Polis was as excited as a boy of fifteen, that his hand trembled,
 and he once put his ramrod back upside down. This was remarkable for
 so experienced a hunter. Perhaps he was anxious to make a good shot
 before us. The white hunter had told me that the Indians were not good
 shots, because they were excited, though he said that we had got a
 good hunter with us.
 
 The Indian now pushed quickly and quietly back, and a long distance
 round, in order to get into the outlet,--for he had fired over the
 neck of a peninsula between it and the lake,--till we approached the
 place where the moose had stood, when he exclaimed, "She is a goner!"
 and was surprised that we did not see her as soon as he did. There, to
 be sure, she lay perfectly dead, with her tongue hanging out, just
 where she had stood to receive the last shots, looking unexpectedly
 large and horse-like, and we saw where the bullets had scarred the
 trees.
 
 Using a tape, I found that the moose measured just six feet from the
 shoulder to the tip of the hoof, and was eight feet long as she lay.
 Some portions of the body, for a foot in diameter, were almost covered
 with flies, apparently the common fly of our woods, with a dark spot
 on the wing, and not the very large ones which occasionally pursued us
 in midstream, though both are called moose-flies.
 
 Polis, preparing to skin the moose, asked me to help him find a stone
 on which to sharpen his large knife. It being all a flat alluvial
 ground where the moose had fallen, covered with red maples, etc., this
 was no easy matter; we searched far and wide, a long time, till at
 length I found a flat kind of slate-stone, and soon after he returned
 with a similar one, on which he soon made his knife very sharp.
 
 While he was skinning the moose, I proceeded to ascertain what kind of
 fishes were to be found in the sluggish and muddy outlet. The greatest
 difficulty was to find a pole. It was almost impossible to find a
 slender, straight pole ten or twelve feet long in those woods. You
 might search half an hour in vain. They are commonly spruce,
 arbor-vitae, fir, etc., short, stout, and branchy, and do not make good
 fish-poles, even after you have patiently cut off all their tough and
 scraggy branches. The fishes were red perch and chivin.
 
 The Indian, having cut off a large piece of sirloin, the upper lip,
 and the tongue, wrapped them in the hide, and placed them in the
 bottom of the canoe, observing that there was "one man," meaning the
 weight of one. Our load had previously been reduced some thirty
 pounds, but a hundred pounds were now added,--a serious addition,
 which made our quarters still more narrow, and considerably increased
 the danger on the lakes and rapids, as well as the labor of the
 carries. The skin was ours according to custom, since the Indian was
 in our employ, but we did not think of claiming it. He being a
 skillful dresser of moose-hides would make it worth seven or eight
 dollars to him, as I was told. He said that he sometimes earned fifty
 or sixty dollars in a day at them; he had killed ten moose in one day,
 though the skinning and all took two days. This was the way he had got
 his property. There were the tracks of a calf thereabouts, which he
 said would come "by, by," and he could get it if we cared to wait, but
 I cast cold water on the project.
 
 We continued along the outlet toward Grand Lake, through a swampy
 region, by a long, winding, and narrow dead water, very much choked up
 by wood, where we were obliged to land sometimes in order to get the
 canoe over a log. It was hard to find any channel, and we did not know
 but we should be lost in the swamp. It abounded in ducks, as usual. At
 length we reached Grand Lake, which the Indian called _Matungamook_.
 
 At the head of this we saw, coming in from the southwest, with a sweep
 apparently from a gorge in the mountains, Trout Stream, or
 _Uncardnerheese_, which name, the Indian said, had something to do
 with mountains.
 
 We stopped to dine on an interesting high rocky island, soon after
 entering Matungamook Lake, securing our canoe to the cliffy shore. It
 is always pleasant to step from a boat on to a large rock or cliff.
 Here was a good opportunity to dry our dewy blankets on the open sunny
 rock. Indians had recently camped here, and accidentally burned over
 the western end of the island, and Polis picked up a gun-case of blue
 broadcloth, and said that he knew the Indian it belonged to, and would
 carry it to him. His tribe is not so large but he may know all its
 effects. We proceeded to make a fire and cook our dinner amid some
 pines, where our predecessors had done the same, while the Indian
 busied himself about his moose-hide on the shore, for he said that he
 thought it a good plan for one to do all the cooking, _i. e._, I
 suppose, if that one were not himself. A peculiar evergreen overhung
 our fire, which at first glance looked like a pitch pine (_P.
 rigida_), with leaves little more than an inch long, spruce-like, but
 we found it to be the _Pinus Banksiana_,--"Banks's, or the Labrador
 Pine," also called scrub pine, gray pine, etc., a new tree to us.
 These must have been good specimens, for several were thirty or
 thirty-five feet high. Richardson found it forty feet high and upward,
 and states that the porcupine feeds on its bark. Here also grew the
 red pine (_Pinus resinosa_).
 
 I saw where the Indians had made canoes in a little secluded hollow in
 the woods, on the top of the rock, where they were out of the wind,
 and large piles of whittlings remained. This must have been a favorite
 resort for their ancestors, and, indeed, we found here the point of an
 arrowhead, such as they have not used for two centuries and now know
 not how to make. The Indian, picking up a stone, remarked to me, "That
 very strange lock (rock)." It was a piece of hornstone, which I told
 him his tribe had probably brought here centuries before to make
 arrowheads of. He also picked up a yellowish curved bone by the side
 of our fireplace and asked me to guess what it was. It was one of the
 upper incisors of a beaver, on which some party had feasted within a
 year or two. I found also most of the teeth, and the skull, etc. We
 here dined on fried moose-meat.
 
 One who was my companion in my two previous excursions to these woods,
 tells me that when hunting up the Caucomgomoc, about two years ago, he
 found himself dining one day on moose-meat, mud turtle, trout, and
 beaver, and he thought that there were few places in the world where
 these dishes could easily be brought together on one table.
 
 After the almost incessant rapids and falls of the Madunkchunk
 (Height-of-Land, or Webster Stream), we had just passed through the
 dead water of Second Lake, and were now in the much larger dead water
 of Grand Lake, and I thought the Indian was entitled to take an extra
 nap here. Ktaadn, near which we were to pass the next day, is said to
 mean "Highest Land." So much geography is there in their names. The
 Indian navigator naturally distinguishes by a name those parts of a
 stream where he has encountered quick water and forks, and again, the
 lakes and smooth water where he can rest his weary arms, since those
 are the most interesting and more arable parts to him. The very sight
 of the _Nerlumskeechticook_, or Deadwater Mountains, a day's journey
 off over the forest, as we first saw them, must awaken in him pleasing
 memories. And not less interesting is it to the white traveler, when
 he is crossing a placid lake in these out-of-the-way woods, perhaps
 thinking that he is in some sense one of the earlier discoverers of
 it, to be reminded that it was thus well known and suitably named by
 Indian hunters perhaps a thousand years ago.
 
 Ascending the precipitous rock which formed this long narrow island, I
 was surprised to find that its summit was a narrow ridge, with a
 precipice on one side, and that its axis of elevation extended from
 northwest to southeast exactly like that of the great rocky ridge at
 the commencement of the Burnt Ground, ten miles northwesterly. The
 same arrangement prevailed here, and we could plainly see that the
 mountain ridges on the west of the lake trended the same way. Splendid
 large harebells nodded over the edge and in the clefts of the cliff,
 and the blueberries (_Vaccinium Canadense_) were for the first time
 really abundant in the thin soil on its top. There was no lack of them
 henceforward on the East Branch. There was a fine view hence over the
 sparkling lake, which looked pure and deep, and had two or three, in
 all, rocky islands in it. Our blankets being dry, we set out again,
 the Indian as usual having left his gazette on a tree. This time it
 was we three in a canoe, my companion smoking. We paddled southward
 down this handsome lake, which appeared to extend nearly as far east
 as south, keeping near the western shore, just outside a small island,
 under the dark Nerlumskeechticook Mountain. For I had observed on my
 map that this was the course. It was three or four miles across it. It
 struck me that the outline of this mountain on the southwest of
 the lake, and of another beyond it, was not only like that of the huge
 rock waves of Webster Stream, but in the main like Kineo, on Moosehead
 Lake, having a similar but less abrupt precipice at the southeast end;
 in short, that all the prominent hills and ridges hereabouts were
 larger or smaller Kineos, and that possibly there was such a relation
 between Kineo and the rocks of Webster Stream.
 
   [Illustration: _Mount Kineo Cliff_]
 
 The Indian did not know exactly where the outlet was, whether at the
 extreme southwest angle or more easterly, and had asked to see my plan
 at the last stopping-place, but I had forgotten to show it to him. As
 usual, he went feeling his way by a middle course between two probable
 points, from which he could diverge either way at last without losing
 much distance. In approaching the south shore, as the clouds looked
 gusty and the waves ran pretty high, we so steered as to get partly
 under the lee of an island, though at a great distance from it.
 
 I could not distinguish the outlet till we were almost in it, and
 heard the water falling over the dam there.
 
 Here was a considerable fall, and a very substantial dam, but no sign
 of a cabin or camp. The hunter whom we met at Telos Lake had told us
 that there were plenty of trout here, but at this hour they did not
 rise to the bait, only cousin trout, from the very midst of the
 rushing waters. There are not so many fishes in these rivers as in the
 Concord.
 
 While we loitered here, Polis took occasion to cut with his big knife
 some of the hair from his moose-hide, and so lightened and prepared it
 for drying. I noticed at several old Indian camps in the woods the
 pile of hair which they had cut from their hides.
 
 Having carried over the dam, he darted down the rapids, leaving us to
 walk for a mile or more, where for the most part there was no path,
 but very thick and difficult traveling near the stream. At length he
 would call to let us know where he was waiting for us with his canoe,
 when, on account of the windings of the stream, we did not know where
 the shore was, but he did not call often enough, forgetting that we
 were not Indians. He seemed to be very saving of his breath,--yet he
 would be surprised if we went by, or did not strike the right spot.
 This was not because he was unaccommodating, but a proof of superior
 manners. Indians like to get along with the least possible
 communication and ado. He was really paying us a great compliment all
 the while, thinking that we preferred a hint to a kick.
 
 At length, climbing over the willows and fallen trees, when this was
 easier than to go round or under them, we overtook the canoe, and
 glided down the stream in smooth but swift water for several miles. I
 here observed again, as at Webster Stream, and on a still larger scale
 the next day, that the river was a smooth and regularly inclined plane
 down which we coasted. As we thus glided along we started the first
 black ducks which we had distinguished.
 
 We decided to camp early to-night, that we might have ample time
 before dark; so we stopped at the first favorable shore, where there
 was a narrow gravelly beach on the western side, some five miles below
 the outlet of the lake. It was an interesting spot, where the river
 began to make a great bend to the east, and the last of the peculiar
 moose-faced Nerlumskeechticook Mountains not far southwest of Grand
 Lake rose dark in the northwest a short distance behind, displaying
 its gray precipitous southeast side, but we could not see this without
 coming out upon the shore.
 
 Two steps from the water on either side, and you come to the abrupt
 bushy and rooty if not turfy edge of the bank, four or five feet high,
 where the interminable forest begins, as if the stream had but just
 cut its way through it.
 
 It is surprising on stepping ashore anywhere into this unbroken
 wilderness to see so often, at least within a few rods of the river,
 the marks of the axe, made by lumberers who have either camped here or
 driven logs past in previous springs. You will see perchance where,
 going on the same errand that you do, they have cut large chips from a
 tall white pine stump for their fire. While we were pitching the camp
 and getting supper, the Indian cut the rest of the hair from his
 moose-hide, and proceeded to extend it vertically on a temporary frame
 between two small trees, half a dozen feet from the opposite side of
 the fire, lashing and stretching it with arbor-vitae bark which was
 always at hand, and in this case was stripped from one of the trees it
 was tied to. Asking for a new kind of tea, he made us some, pretty
 good, of the checkerberry (_Gaultheria procumbens_), which covered the
 ground, dropping a little bunch of it tied up with cedar bark into the
 kettle; but it was not quite equal to the _Chiogenes_. We called this
 therefore Checkerberry-Tea Camp.
 
 I was struck with the abundance of the _Linnaea borealis_,
 checkerberry, and _Chiogenes hispidula_, almost everywhere in the
 Maine woods. The wintergreen (_Chimaphila umbellata_) was still in
 bloom here, and clintonia berries were abundant and ripe. This
 handsome plant is one of the most common in that forest. We here first
 noticed the moose-wood in fruit on the banks. The prevailing trees
 were spruce (commonly black), arbor-vitae, canoe birch (black ash and
 elms beginning to appear), yellow birch, red maple, and a little
 hemlock skulking in the forest. The Indian said that the white maple
 punk was the best for tinder, that yellow birch punk was pretty good,
 but hard. After supper he put on the moose tongue and lips to boil,
 cutting out the _septum_. He showed me how to write on the under side
 of birch bark, with a black spruce twig, which is hard and tough, and
 can be brought to a point.
 
 The Indian wandered off into the woods a short distance just before
 night, and, coming back, said, "Me found great treasure,--fifty, sixty
 dollars' worth." "What's that?" we asked. "Steel traps, under a log,
 thirty or forty, I didn't count 'em. I guess Indian work,--worth three
 dollars apiece." It was a singular coincidence that he should have
 chanced to walk to and look under that particular log, in that
 trackless forest.
 
 I saw chivin and chub in the stream when washing my hands, but my
 companion tried in vain to catch them. I also heard the sound of
 bullfrogs from a swamp on the opposite side, thinking at first that
 they were moose; a duck paddled swiftly by; and sitting in that dusky
 wilderness, under that dark mountain, by the bright river which was
 full of reflected light, still I heard the wood thrush sing, as if no
 higher civilization could be attained. By this time the night was upon
 us.
 
 You commonly make your camp just at sundown, and are collecting wood,
 getting your supper, or pitching your tent while the shades of night
 are gathering around and adding to the already dense gloom of the
 forest. You have no time to explore or look around you before it is
 dark. You may penetrate half a dozen rods farther into that twilight
 wilderness, after some dry bark to kindle your fire with, and wonder
 what mysteries lie hidden still deeper in it, say at the end of a long
 day's walk; or you may run down to the shore for a dipper of water,
 and get a clearer view for a short distance up or down the stream, and
 while you stand there, see a fish leap, or duck alight in the river,
 or hear a wood thrush or robin sing in the woods. That is as if you
 had been to town or civilized parts. But there is no sauntering off to
 see the country, and ten or fifteen rods seems a great way from your
 companions, and you come back with the air of a much-traveled man, as
 from a long journey, with adventures to relate, though you may have
 heard the crackling of the fire all the while,--and at a hundred rods
 you might be lost past recovery, and have to camp out. It is all mossy
 and _moosey_. In some of those dense fir and spruce woods there is
 hardly room for the smoke to go up. The trees are a _standing_ night,
 and every fir and spruce which you fell is a plume plucked from
 night's raven wing. Then at night the general stillness is more
 impressive than any sound, but occasionally you hear the note of an
 owl farther or nearer in the woods, and if near a lake, the semihuman
 cry of the loons at their unearthly revels.
 
 To-night the Indian lay between the fire and his stretched moose-hide,
 to avoid the mosquitoes. Indeed, he also made a small smoky fire of
 damp leaves at his head and his feet, and then as usual rolled up his
 head in his blanket. We with our veils and our wash were tolerably
 comfortable, but it would be difficult to pursue any sedentary
 occupation in the woods at this season; you cannot see to read much by
 the light of a fire through a veil in the evening, nor handle pencil
 and paper well with gloves or anointed fingers.
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
      FRIDAY, July 31.
 
 The Indian said, "You and I kill moose last night, therefore use 'em
 best wood. Always use hard wood to cook moose-meat." His "best wood"
 was rock maple. He cast the moose's lip into the fire, to burn the
 hair off, and then rolled it up with the meat to carry along.
 Observing that we were sitting down to breakfast without any pork, he
 said, with a very grave look, "Me want some fat," so he was told that
 he might have as much as he would fry.
 
 We had smooth but swift water for a considerable distance, where we
 glided rapidly along, scaring up ducks and kingfishers. But, as usual,
 our smooth progress ere long came to an end, and we were obliged to
 carry canoe and all about half a mile down the right bank, around some
 rapids or falls. It required sharp eyes sometimes to tell which side
 was the carry, before you went over the falls, but Polis never failed
 to land us rightly. The raspberries were particularly abundant and
 large here, and all hands went to eating them, the Indian remarking on
 their size.
 
 Often on bare rocky carries the trail was so indistinct that I
 repeatedly lost it, but when I walked behind him I observed that he
 could keep it almost like a hound, and rarely hesitated, or, if he
 paused a moment on a bare rock, his eye immediately detected some sign
 which would have escaped me. Frequently _we_ found no path at all at
 these places, and were to him unaccountably delayed. He would only say
 it was "ver strange."
 
 We had heard of a Grand Fall on this stream, and thought that each
 fall we came to must be it, but after christening several in
 succession with this name, we gave up the search. There were more
 Grand or Petty Falls than I can remember.
 
 I cannot tell how many times we had to walk on account of falls or
 rapids. We were expecting all the while that the river would take a
 final leap and get to smooth water, but there was no improvement this
 forenoon. However, the carries were an agreeable variety. So surely as
 we stepped out of the canoe and stretched our legs we found ourselves
 in a blueberry and raspberry garden, each side of our rocky trail
 around the falls being lined with one or both. There was not a carry
 on the main East Branch where we did not find an abundance of both
 these berries, for these were the rockiest places, and partially
 cleared, such as these plants prefer, and there had been none to
 gather the finest before us.
 
 In our three journeys over the carries,--for we were obliged to go
 over the ground three times whenever the canoe was taken out,--we did
 full justice to the berries, and they were just what we wanted to
 correct the effect of our hard bread and pork diet. Another name for
 making a portage would have been going a-berrying. We also found a few
 amelanchier, or service, berries, though most were abortive, but they
 held on rather more generally than they do in Concord. The Indian
 called them _pemoymenuk_, and said that they bore much fruit in some
 places. He sometimes also ate the northern wild red cherries, saying
 that they were good medicine, but they were scarcely edible. We bathed
 and dined at the foot of one of these carries. It was the Indian who
 commonly reminded us that it was dinner-time, sometimes even by
 turning the prow to the shore. He once made an indirect, but lengthy
 apology, by saying that we might think it strange, but that one who
 worked hard all day was very particular to have his dinner in good
 season. At the most considerable fall on this stream, when I was
 walking over the carry, close behind the Indian, he observed a track
 on the rock, which was but slightly covered with soil, and, stooping,
 muttered "caribou." When we returned, he observed a much larger track
 near the same place, where some animal's foot had sunk into a small
 hollow in the rock, partly filled with grass and earth, and he
 exclaimed with surprise, "What that?" "Well, what is it?" I asked.
 Stooping and laying his hand in it, he answered with a mysterious air,
 and in a half whisper, "Devil [that is, Indian Devil, or
 cougar]--ledges about here--very bad animal--pull 'em rocks all to
 pieces." "How long since it was made?" I asked. "To-day or yesterday,"
 said he. But when I asked him afterward if he was sure it was the
 devil's track, he said he did not know. I had been told that the
 scream of a cougar was heard about Ktaadn recently, and we were not
 far from that mountain.
 
 We spent at least half the time in walking to-day, and the walking was
 as bad as usual, for the Indian, being alone, commonly ran down far
 below the foot of the carries before he waited for us. The carry-paths
 themselves were more than usually indistinct, often the route being
 revealed only by the countless small holes in the fallen timber made
 by the tacks in the drivers' boots, or where there _was_ a slight
 trail we did not find it. It was a tangled and perplexing thicket,
 through which we stumbled and threaded our way, and when we had
 finished a mile of it, our starting-point seemed far away. We were
 glad that we had not got to walk to Bangor along the banks of this
 river, which would be a journey of more than a hundred miles. Think of
 the denseness of the forest, the fallen trees and rocks, the windings
 of the river, the streams emptying in, and the frequent swamps to be
 crossed. It made you shudder. Yet the Indian from time to time pointed
 out to us where he had thus crept along day after day when he was a
 boy of ten, and in a starving condition. He had been hunting far north
 of this with two grown Indians. The winter came on unexpectedly early,
 and the ice compelled them to leave their canoe at Grand Lake, and
 walk down the bank. They shouldered their furs and started for
 Oldtown. The snow was not deep enough for snowshoes, or to cover the
 inequalities of the ground. Polis was soon too weak to carry any
 burden; but he managed to catch one otter. This was the most they all
 had to eat on this journey, and he remembered how good the yellow lily
 roots were, made into a soup with the otter oil. He shared this food
 equally with the other two, but being so small he suffered much more
 than they. He waded through the Mattawamkeag at its mouth, when it was
 freezing cold and came up to his chin, and he, being very weak and
 emaciated, expected to be swept away. The first house which they
 reached was at Lincoln, and thereabouts they met a white teamster with
 supplies, who, seeing their condition, gave them as much of his load
 as they could eat. For six months after getting home, he was very low,
 and did not expect to live, and was perhaps always the worse for it.
 
 We could not find much more than half of this day's journey on our
 maps (the "Map of the Public Lands of Maine and Massachusetts," and
 "Colton's Railroad and Township Map of Maine," which copies the
 former). By the maps there was not more than fifteen miles between
 camps at the outside, and yet we had been busily progressing all day,
 and much of the time very rapidly.
 
 For seven or eight miles below that succession of "Grand" falls, the
 aspect of the banks as well as the character of the stream was
 changed. After passing a tributary from the northeast, perhaps Bowlin
 Stream, we had good swift smooth water, with a regular slope, such as
 I have described. Low, grassy banks and muddy shores began. Many elms,
 as well as maples, and more ash trees, overhung the stream, and
 supplanted the spruce.
 
 My lily roots having been lost when the canoe was taken out at a
 carry, I landed late in the afternoon, at a low and grassy place amid
 maples, to gather more. It was slow work, grubbing them up amid the
 sand, and the mosquitoes were all the while feasting on me.
 Mosquitoes, black flies, etc., pursued us in mid-channel, and we were
 glad sometimes to get into violent rapids, for then we escaped them.
 
 A red-headed woodpecker flew across the river, and the Indian remarked
 that it was good to eat. As we glided swiftly down the inclined plane
 of the river, a great cat owl launched itself away from a stump on the
 bank, and flew heavily across the stream, and the Indian, as usual,
 imitated its note. Soon the same bird flew back in front of us, and we
 afterwards passed it perched on a tree. Soon afterward a white-headed
 eagle sailed down the stream before us. We drove him several miles,
 while we were looking for a good place to camp, for we expected to be
 overtaken by a shower,--and still we could distinguish him by his
 white tail, sailing away from time to time from some tree by the shore
 still farther down the stream. Some shecorways being surprised by us,
 a part of them dived, and we passed directly over them, and could
 trace their course here and there by a bubble on the surface, but we
 did not see them come up. Polis detected once or twice what he called
 a "tow" road, an indistinct path leading into the forest. In the
 meanwhile we passed the mouth of the Seboois on our left. This did not
 look so large as our stream, which was indeed the main one. It was
 some time before we found a camping-place, for the shore was either
 too grassy and muddy, where mosquitoes abounded, or too steep a
 hillside. The Indian said that there were but few mosquitoes on a
 steep hillside. We examined a good place, where somebody had camped a
 long time; but it seemed pitiful to occupy an old site, where there
 was so much room to choose, so we continued on. We at length found a
 place to our minds, on the west bank, about a mile below the mouth of
 the Seboois, where, in a very dense spruce wood above a gravelly
 shore, there seemed to be but few insects. The trees were so thick
 that we were obliged to clear a space to build our fire and lie down
 in, and the young spruce trees that were left were like the wall of an
 apartment rising around us. We were obliged to pull ourselves up a
 steep bank to get there. But the place which you have selected for
 your camp, though never so rough and grim, begins at once to have its
 attractions, and becomes a very centre of civilization to you: "Home
 is home, be it never so homely."
 
 It turned out that the mosquitoes were more numerous here than we had
 found them before, and the Indian complained a good deal, though he
 lay, as the night before, between three fires and his stretched hide.
 As I sat on a stump by the fire, with a veil and gloves on, trying to
 read, he observed, "I make you candle," and in a minute he took a
 piece of birch bark about two inches wide and rolled it hard, like an
 allumette fifteen inches long, lit it, and fixed it by the other end
 horizontally in a split stick three feet high, stuck it in the ground,
 turning the blazing end to the wind, and telling me to snuff it from
 time to time. It answered the purpose of a candle pretty well.
 
 I noticed, as I had done before, that there was a lull among the
 mosquitoes about midnight, and that they began again in the morning.
 Nature is thus merciful. But apparently they need rest as well as we.
 Few, if any, creatures are equally active all night. As soon as it was
 light I saw, through my veil, that the inside of the tent about our
 heads was quite blackened with myriads, each one of their wings when
 flying, as has been calculated, vibrating some three thousand times in
 a minute, and their combined hum was almost as bad to endure as their
 stings. I had an uncomfortable night on this account though I am not
 sure that one succeeded in his attempt to sting me. We did not suffer
 so much from insects on this excursion as the statements of some who
 have explored these woods in midsummer led us to anticipate. Yet I
 have no doubt that at some seasons and in some places they are a much
 more serious pest. The Jesuit Hierome Lalemant, of Quebec, reporting
 the death of Father Reni Menard, who was abandoned, lost his way, and
 died in the woods, among the Ontarios near Lake Superior, in 1661,
 dwells chiefly on his probable sufferings from the attacks of
 mosquitoes when too weak to defend himself, adding that there was a
 frightful number of them in those parts, "and so insupportable," says
 he, "that the three Frenchmen who have made that voyage affirm that
 there was no other means of defending one's self but to run always
 without stopping, and it was even necessary for two of them to be
 employed in driving off these creatures while the third wanted to
 drink, otherwise he could not have done it." I have no doubt that this
 was said in good faith.
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
      August 1.
 
 I caught two or three large red chivin (_Leuciscus pulchellus_) early
 this morning, within twenty feet of the camp, which, added to the
 moose-tongue, that had been left in the kettle boiling overnight, and
 to our other stores, made a sumptuous breakfast. The Indian made us
 some hemlock tea instead of coffee, and we were not obliged to go as
 far as China for it; indeed, not quite so far as for the fish. This
 was tolerable, though he said it was not strong enough. It was
 interesting to see so simple a dish as a kettle of water with a
 handful of green hemlock sprigs in it, boiling over the huge fire in
 the open air, the leaves fast losing their lively green color, and
 know that it was for our breakfast.
 
 We were glad to embark once more, and leave some of the mosquitoes
 behind. We had passed the _Wassataquoik_ without perceiving it. This,
 according to the Indian, is the name of the main East Branch itself,
 and not properly applied to this small tributary alone, as on the
 maps.
 
 We found that we had camped about a mile above Hunt's, which is on the
 east bank, and is the last house for those who ascend Ktaadn on this
 side.
 
 We had expected to ascend it from this point, but my companion was
 obliged to give up this on account of sore feet. The Indian, however,
 suggested that perhaps he might get a pair of moccasins at this place,
 and that he could walk very easily in them without hurting his feet,
 wearing several pairs of stockings, and he said beside that they were
 so porous that when you had taken in water it all drained out again
 in a little while. We stopped to get some sugar, but found that the
 family had moved away, and the house was unoccupied, except
 temporarily by some men who were getting the hay. They told me that
 the road to Ktaadn left the river eight miles above; also that perhaps
 we could get some sugar at Fisk's, fourteen miles below. I do not
 remember that we saw the mountain at all from the river. I noticed a
 seine here stretched on the bank, which probably had been used to
 catch salmon. Just below this, on the west bank, we saw a moose-hide
 stretched, and with it a bearskin, which was comparatively very small.
 I was the more interested in this sight, because it was near here that
 a townsman of ours, then quite a lad, and alone, killed a large bear
 some years ago. The Indian said that they belonged to Joe Aitteon, my
 last guide, but how he told I do not know. He was probably hunting
 near, and had left them for the day. Finding that we were going
 directly to Oldtown, he regretted that he had not taken more of the
 moose-meat to his family, saying that in a short time, by drying it,
 he could have made it so light as to have brought away the greater
 part, leaving the bones. We once or twice inquired after the lip,
 which is a famous tidbit, but he said, "That go Oldtown for my old
 woman; don't get it every day."
 
 Maples grew more and more numerous. It was lowering, and rained a
 little during the forenoon, and, as we expected a wetting, we stopped
 early and dined on the east side of a small expansion of the river,
 just above what are probably called Whetstone Falls, about a dozen
 miles below Hunt's. There were pretty fresh moose-tracks by the
 waterside. There were singular long ridges hereabouts, called
 "horsebacks," covered with ferns. My companion, having lost his pipe,
 asked the Indian if he could not make him one. "Oh, yer," said he, and
 in a minute rolled up one of birch bark, telling him to wet the bowl
 from time to time. Here also he left his gazette on a tree.
 
 We carried round the falls just below, on the west side. The rocks
 were on their edges, and very sharp. The distance was about three
 fourths of a mile. When we had carried over one load, the Indian
 returned by the shore, and I by the path, and though I made no
 particular haste, I was nevertheless surprised to find him at the
 other end as soon as I. It was remarkable how easily he got along over
 the worst ground. He said to me, "I take canoe and you take the rest,
 suppose you can keep along with me?" I thought that he meant that
 while he ran down the rapids I should keep along the shore, and be
 ready to assist him from time to time, as I had done before; but as
 the walking would be very bad, I answered, "I suppose you will go too
 fast for me, but I will try." But I was to go by the path, he said.
 This I thought would not help the matter, I should have so far to go
 to get to the riverside when he wanted me. But neither was this what
 he meant. He was proposing a race over the carry, and asked me if I
 thought I could keep along with him by the same path, adding that I
 must be pretty smart to do it. As his load, the canoe, would be much
 the heaviest and bulkiest, though the simplest, I thought that I ought
 to be able to do it, and said that I would try. So I proceeded to
 gather up the gun, axe, paddle, kettle, frying-pan, plates, dippers,
 carpets, etc., etc., and while I was thus engaged he threw me his
 cowhide boots. "What, are these in the bargain?" I asked. "Oh, yer,"
 said he; but before I could make a bundle of my load I saw him
 disappearing over a hill with the canoe on his head; so, hastily
 scraping the various articles together, I started on the run, and
 immediately went by him in the bushes, but I had no sooner left him
 out of sight in a rocky hollow than the greasy plates, dippers, etc.,
 took to themselves wings, and while I was employed in gathering them
 up again, he went by me; but hastily pressing the sooty kettle to my
 side, I started once more, and soon passing him again, I saw him no
 more on the carry. I do not mention this as anything of a feat, for it
 was but poor running on my part, and he was obliged to move with great
 caution for fear of breaking his canoe as well as his neck. When he
 made his appearance, puffing and panting like myself, in answer to my
 inquiries where he had been, he said, "Rocks (locks) cut 'em feet,"
 and, laughing, added, "Oh, me love to play sometimes." He said that he
 and his companions, when they came to carries several miles long, used
 to try who would get over first; each, perhaps, with a canoe on his
 head. I bore the sign of the kettle on my brown linen sack for the
 rest of the voyage.
 
 We made a second carry on the west side, around some falls about a
 mile below this. On the mainland were Norway pines, indicating a new
 geological formation, and it was such a dry and sandy soil as we had
 not noticed before.
 
 As we approached the mouth of the East Branch, we passed two or three
 huts, the first sign of civilization after Hunt's, though we saw no
 road as yet; we heard a cow-bell, and even saw an infant held up to a
 small square window to see us pass, but apparently the infant and the
 mother that held it were the only inhabitants then at home for several
 miles. This took the wind out of our sails, reminding us that we were
 travelers surely, while it was a native of the soil, and had the
 advantage of us. Conversation flagged. I would only hear the Indian,
 perhaps, ask my companion, "You load my pipe?" He said that he smoked
 alder bark, for medicine. On entering the West Branch at Nicketow it
 appeared much larger than the East. Polis remarked that the former was
 all gone and lost now, that it was all smooth water hence to Oldtown,
 and he threw away his pole which was cut on the Umbazookskus. Thinking
 of the rapids, he said once or twice that you wouldn't catch him to go
 East Branch again; but he did not by any means mean all that he said.
 
 Things are quite changed since I was here eleven years ago. Where
 there were but one or two houses, I now found quite a village, with
 sawmills and a store (the latter was locked, but its contents were so
 much the more safely stored), and there was a stage-road to
 Mattawamkeag, and the rumor of a stage. Indeed, a steamer had ascended
 thus far once, when the water was very high. But we were not able to
 get any sugar, only a better shingle to lean our backs against.
 
 We camped about two miles below Nicketow, on the south side of the
 West Branch, covering with fresh twigs the withered bed of a former
 traveler, and feeling that we were now in a settled country,
 especially when in the evening we heard an ox sneeze in its wild
 pasture across the river. Wherever you land along the frequented part
 of the river, you have not far to go to find these sites of temporary
 inns, the withered bed of flattened twigs, the charred sticks, and
 perhaps the tent-poles. And not long since, similar beds were spread
 along the Connecticut, the Hudson, and the Delaware, and longer still
 ago, by the Thames and Seine, and they now help to make the soil where
 private and public gardens, mansions and palaces are. We could not get
 fir twigs for our bed here, and the spruce was harsh in comparison,
 having more twig in proportion to its leaf, but we improved it
 somewhat with hemlock. The Indian remarked as before, "Must have hard
 wood to cook moose-meat," as if that were a maxim, and proceeded to
 get it. My companion cooked some in California fashion, winding a long
 string of the meat round a stick and slowly turning it in his hand
 before the fire. It was very good. But the Indian, not approving of
 the mode, or because he was not allowed to cook it his own way, would
 not taste it. After the regular supper we attempted to make a lily
 soup of the bulbs which I had brought along, for I wished to learn all
 I could before I got out of the woods. Following the Indian's
 directions, for he began to be sick, I washed the bulbs carefully,
 minced some moose-meat and some pork, salted and boiled all together,
 but we had not patience to try the experiment fairly, for he said it
 must be boiled till the roots were completely softened so as to
 thicken the soup like flour; but though we left it on all night, we
 found it dried to the kettle in the morning, and not yet boiled to a
 flour. Perhaps the roots were not ripe enough, for they commonly
 gather them in the fall. As it was, it was palatable enough, but it
 reminded me of the Irishman's limestone broth. The other ingredients
 were enough alone. The Indian's name for these bulbs was _Sheepnoc_. I
 stirred the soup by accident with a striped maple or moose-wood stick,
 which I had peeled, and he remarked that its bark was an emetic.
 
 He prepared to camp as usual between his moose-hide and the fire; but
 it beginning to rain suddenly, he took refuge under the tent with us,
 and gave us a song before falling asleep. It rained hard in the night,
 and spoiled another box of matches for us, which the Indian had left
 out, for he was very careless; but, as usual, we had so much the
 better night for the rain, since it kept the mosquitoes down.
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
      SUNDAY, August 2.
 
 Was a cloudy and unpromising morning. One of us observed to the
 Indian, "You did not stretch your moose-hide last night, did you, Mr.
 Polis?" Whereat he replied, in a tone of surprise, though perhaps not
 of ill humor: "What you ask me that question for? Suppose I stretch
 'em, you see 'em. May be your way talking, may be all right, no Indian
 way." I had observed that he did not wish to answer the same question
 more than once, and was often silent when it was put again for the
 sake of certainty, as if he were moody. Not that he was incommunicative,
 for he frequently commenced a long-winded narrative of his own
 accord,--repeated at length the tradition of some old battle, or some
 passage in the recent history of his tribe in which he had acted a
 prominent part, from time to time drawing a long breath, and resuming
 the thread of his tale, with the true story-teller's leisureliness,
 perhaps after shooting a rapid,--prefacing with "We-e-ll, by-by,"
 etc., as he paddled along. Especially after the day's work was over,
 and he had put himself in posture for the night, he would be
 unexpectedly sociable, exhibit even the _bonhommie_ of a Frenchman,
 and we would fall asleep before he got through his periods.
 
 Nicketow is called eleven miles from Mattawamkeag by the river. Our
 camp was, therefore, about nine miles from the latter place.
 
 The Indian was quite sick this morning with the colic. I thought that
 he was the worse for the moose-meat he had eaten.
 
 We reached the Mattawamkeag at half past eight in the morning, in the
 midst of a drizzling rain, and, after buying some sugar, set out
 again.
 
 The Indian growing much worse, we stopped in the north part of Lincoln
 to get some brandy for him; but failing in this, an apothecary
 recommended Brandreth's pills, which he refused to take, because he
 was not acquainted with them. He said to me, "Me doctor,--first study
 my case, find out what ail 'em,--then I know what to take." We dropped
 down a little farther, and stopped at mid-forenoon on an island and
 made him a dipper of tea. Here, too, we dined and did some washing and
 botanizing, while he lay on the bank. In the afternoon we went on a
 little farther, though the Indian was no better. "Burntibus," as he
 called it, was a long, smooth, lake-like reach below the Five
 Islands. He said that he owned a hundred acres somewhere up this way.
 As a thunder-shower appeared to be coming up, we stopped opposite a
 barn on the west bank, in Chester, about a mile above Lincoln. Here at
 last we were obliged to spend the rest of the day and night, on
 account of our patient, whose sickness did not abate. He lay groaning
 under his canoe on the bank, looking very woebegone, yet it was only a
 common case of colic. You would not have thought, if you had seen him
 lying about thus, that he was the proprietor of so many acres in that
 neighborhood, was worth six thousand dollars, and had been to
 Washington. It seemed to me that, like the Irish, he made a greater
 ado about his sickness than a Yankee does, and was more alarmed about
 himself. We talked somewhat of leaving him with his people in
 Lincoln,--for that is one of their homes,--and taking the stage the
 next day, but he objected on account of the expense saying, "Suppose
 me well in morning, you and I go Oldtown by noon."
 
 As we were taking our tea at twilight, while he lay groaning still
 under his canoe, having at length found out "what ail him," he asked
 me to get him a dipper of water. Taking the dipper in one hand he
 seized his powder-horn with the other, and, pouring into it a charge
 or two of powder, stirred it up with his finger, and drank it off.
 This was all he took to-day after breakfast beside his tea.
 
 To save the trouble of pitching our tent, when we had secured our
 stores from wandering dogs, we camped in the solitary half-open barn
 near the bank, with the permission of the owner, lying on new-mown
 hay four feet deep. The fragrance of the hay, in which many ferns,
 etc., were mingled, was agreeable, though it was quite alive with
 grasshoppers which you could hear crawling through it. This served to
 graduate our approach to houses and feather beds. In the night some
 large bird, probably an owl, flitted through over our heads, and very
 early in the morning we were awakened by the twittering of swallows
 which had their nests there.
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
      MONDAY, August 3.
 
 We started early before breakfast, the Indian being considerably
 better, and soon glided by Lincoln, and after another long and
 handsome lake-like reach, we stopped to breakfast on the west shore,
 two or three miles below this town.
 
 We frequently passed Indian islands with their small houses on them.
 The Governor, Aitteon, lives in one of them, in Lincoln.
 
 The Penobscot Indians seem to be more social, even, than the whites.
 Ever and anon in the deepest wilderness of Maine, you come to the log
 hut of a Yankee or Canada settler, but a Penobscot never takes up his
 residence in such a solitude. They are not even scattered about on
 their islands in the Penobscot, which are all within the settlements,
 but gathered together on two or three,--though not always on the best
 soil,--evidently for the sake of society. I saw one or two houses not
 now used by them, because, as our Indian Polis said, they were too
 solitary.
 
 The small river emptying in at Lincoln is the Matanancook, which
 also, we noticed, was the name of a steamer moored there. So we
 paddled and floated along, looking into the mouths of rivers. When
 passing the Mohawk Rips, or, as the Indian called them, "Mohog lips,"
 four or five miles below Lincoln, he told us at length the story of a
 fight between his tribe and the Mohawks there, anciently,--how the
 latter were overcome by stratagem, the Penobscots using concealed
 knives,--but they could not for a long time kill the Mohawk chief, who
 was a very large and strong man, though he was attacked by several
 canoes at once, when swimming alone in the river.
 
 From time to time we met Indians in their canoes, going up river. Our
 man did not commonly approach them, but exchanged a few words with
 them at a distance in his tongue. These were the first Indians we had
 met since leaving the Umbazookskus.
 
 At Piscataquis Falls, just above the river of that name, we walked
 over the wooden railroad on the eastern shore, about one and a half
 miles long, while the Indian glided down the rapids. The steamer from
 Oldtown stops here, and passengers take a new boat above. Piscataquis,
 whose mouth we here passed, means "branch." It is obstructed by falls
 at its mouth, but can be navigated with batteaux or canoes above
 through a settled country, even to the neighborhood of Moosehead Lake,
 and we had thought at first of going that way. We were not obliged to
 get out of the canoe after this on account of falls or rapids, nor,
 indeed, was it quite necessary here. We took less notice of the
 scenery to-day, because we were in quite a settled country. The river
 became broad and sluggish, and we saw a blue heron winging its way
 slowly down the stream before us.
 
 We passed the Passadumkeag River on our left and saw the blue Olamon
 mountains at a distance in the southeast. Hereabouts our Indian told
 us at length the story of their contention with the priest respecting
 schools. He thought a great deal of education and had recommended it
 to his tribe. His argument in its favor was, that if you had been to
 college and learnt to calculate, you could "keep 'em property,--no
 other way." He said that his boy was the best scholar in the school at
 Oldtown, to which he went with whites. He himself is a Protestant, and
 goes to church regularly at Oldtown. According to his account, a good
 many of his tribe are Protestants, and many of the Catholics also are
 in favor of schools. Some years ago they had a schoolmaster, a
 Protestant, whom they liked very well. The priest came and said that
 they must send him away, and finally he had such influence, telling
 them that they would go to the bad place at last if they retained him,
 that they sent him away. The school party, though numerous, were about
 giving up. Bishop Fenwick came from Boston and used his influence
 against them. But our Indian told his side that they must not give up,
 must hold on, they were the strongest. If they gave up, then they
 would have no party. But they answered that it was "no use, priest too
 strong, we'd better give up." At length he persuaded them to make a
 stand.
 
 The priest was going for a sign to cut down the liberty-pole. So Polis
 and his party had a secret meeting about it; he got ready fifteen or
 twenty stout young men, "stript 'em naked, and painted 'em like old
 times," and told them that when the priest and his party went to cut
 down the liberty-pole, they were to rush up, take hold of it, and
 prevent them, and he assured them that there would be no war, only a
 noise,--"no war where priest is." He kept his men concealed in a house
 near by, and when the priest's party were about to cut down the
 liberty-pole, the fall of which would have been a death-blow to the
 school party, he gave a signal, and his young men rushed out and
 seized the pole. There was a great uproar, and they were about coming
 to blows, but the priest interfered, saying, "No war, no war," and so
 the pole stands, and the school goes on still.
 
 We thought that it showed a good deal of tact in him, to seize this
 occasion and take his stand on it; proving how well he understood
 those with whom he had to deal.
 
 The Olamon River comes in from the east in Greenbush a few miles below
 the Passadumkeag. When we asked the meaning of this name, the Indian
 said there was an island opposite its mouth which was called
 _Olarmon_; that in old times, when visitors were coming to Oldtown,
 they used to stop there to dress and fix up or paint themselves. "What
 is that which ladies used?" he asked. Rouge? Red Vermilion? "Yer," he
 said, "that is _larmon_, a kind of clay or red paint, which they used
 to get here."
 
 We decided that we, too, would stop at this island, and fix up our
 inner man, at least, by dining.
 
 It was a large island, with an abundance of hemp nettle, but I did not
 notice any kind of red paint there. The Olamon River, at its mouth at
 least, is a dead stream. There was another large island in that
 neighborhood, which the Indian called "_Soogle_" (_i. e._, Sugar)
 Island.
 
 About a dozen miles before reaching Oldtown he inquired, "How you like
 'em your pilot?" But we postponed an answer till we had got quite back
 again.
 
 The Sunkhaze, another short dead stream, comes in from the east two
 miles above Oldtown. There is said to be some of the best deer ground
 in Maine on this stream. Asking the meaning of this name, the Indian
 said, "Suppose you are going down Penobscot, just like we, and you see
 a canoe come out of bank and go along before you, but you no see 'em
 stream. That is _Sunkhaze_."
 
 He had previously complimented me on my paddling, saying that I
 paddled "just like anybody," giving me an Indian name which meant
 "great paddler." When off this stream he said to me, who sat in the
 bows, "Me teach you paddle." So, turning toward the shore, he got out,
 came forward, and placed my hands as he wished. He placed one of them
 quite outside the boat, and the other parallel with the first,
 grasping the paddle near the end, not over the flat extremity, and
 told me to slide it back and forth on the side of the canoe. This, I
 found, was a great improvement which I had not thought of, saving me
 the labor of lifting the paddle each time, and I wondered that he had
 not suggested it before. It is true, before our baggage was reduced we
 had been obliged to sit with our legs drawn up, and our knees above
 the side of the canoe, which would have prevented our paddling thus,
 or perhaps he was afraid of wearing out his canoe, by constant
 friction on the side.
 
 I told him that I had been accustomed to sit in the stern, and,
 lifting my paddle at each stroke, give it a twist in order to steer
 the boat, only getting a pry on the side each time, and I still
 paddled partly as if in the stern. He then wanted to see me paddle in
 the stern. So, changing paddles, for he had the longer and better one,
 and turning end for end, he sitting flat on the bottom and I on the
 crossbar, he began to paddle very hard, trying to turn the canoe,
 looking over his shoulder and laughing; but finding it in vain, he
 relaxed his efforts, though we still sped along a mile or two very
 swiftly. He said that he had no fault to find with my paddling in the
 stern, but I complained that he did not paddle according to his own
 directions in the bows.
 
 Opposite the Sunkhaze is the main boom of the Penobscot, where the
 logs from far up the river are collected and assorted.
 
 As we drew near to Oldtown I asked Polis if he was not glad to get
 home again; but there was no relenting to his wildness, and he said,
 "It makes no difference to me where I am." Such is the Indian's
 pretense always.
 
 We approached the Indian Island through the narrow strait called
 "Cook." He said, "I 'xpect we take in some water there, river so
 high,--never see it so high at this season. Very rough water there,
 but short; swamp steamboat once. Don't you paddle till I tell you,
 then you paddle right along." It was a very short rapid. When we were
 in the midst of it he shouted "paddle," and we shot through without
 taking in a drop.
 
 Soon after the Indian houses came in sight, but I could not at first
 tell my companion which of two or three large white ones was our
 guide's. He said it was the one with blinds.
 
 We landed opposite his door at about four in the afternoon, having
 come some forty miles this day. From the Piscataquis we had come
 remarkably and unaccountably quick, probably as fast as the stage or
 the boat, though the last dozen miles was dead water.
 
 Polis wanted to sell us his canoe, said it would last seven or eight
 years, or with care, perhaps ten; but we were not ready to buy it.
 
 We stopped for an hour at his house, where my companion shaved with
 his razor, which he pronounced in very good condition. Mrs. P. wore a
 hat and had a silver brooch on her breast, but she was not introduced
 to us. The house was roomy and neat. A large new map of Oldtown and
 the Indian Island hung on the wall, and a clock opposite to it.
 Wishing to know when the cars left Oldtown, Polis's son brought one of
 the last Bangor papers, which I saw was directed to "Joseph Polis,"
 from the office.
 
 This was the last that I saw of Joe Polis. We took the last train, and
 reached Bangor that night.
 
 FOOTNOTE:
 
 [8] These twigs are called in Rasle's Dictionary _Sediak_.
 
 
 
 
 APPENDIX
 
 
 I. TREES
 
 The prevailing trees (I speak only of what I saw) on the east and west
 branches of the Penobscot and on the upper part of the Allegash were
 the fir, spruce (both black and white), and arbor-vitae, or "cedar."
 The fir has the darkest foliage, and, together with the spruce, makes
 a very dense "black growth," especially on the upper parts of the
 rivers. A dealer in lumber with whom I talked called the former a
 weed, and it is commonly regarded as fit neither for timber nor fuel.
 But it is more sought after as an ornamental tree than any other
 evergreen of these woods except the arbor-vitae. The black spruce is
 much more common than the white. Both are tall and slender trees. The
 arbor-vitae, which is of a more cheerful hue, with its light-green
 fans, is also tall and slender, though sometimes two feet in diameter.
 It often fills the swamps.
 
 Mingled with the former, and also here and there forming extensive and
 more open woods by themselves, indicating, it is said, a better soil,
 were canoe and yellow birches (the former was always at hand for
 kindling a fire,--we saw no small white birches in that wilderness),
 and sugar and red maples.
 
 The aspen (_Populus tremuloides_) was very common on burnt grounds. We
 saw many straggling white pines, commonly unsound trees, which had
 therefore been skipped by the choppers; these were the largest trees
 we saw; and we occasionally passed a small wood in which this was the
 prevailing tree; but I did not notice nearly so many of these trees as
 I can see in a single walk in Concord. The speckled or hoary alder
 (_Alnus incana_) abounds everywhere along the muddy banks of rivers
 and lakes, and in swamps. Hemlock could commonly be found for tea, but
 was nowhere abundant. Yet F. A. Michaux states that in Maine, Vermont,
 and the upper part of New Hampshire, etc., the hemlock forms three
 fourths of the evergreen woods, the rest being black spruce. It
 belongs to cold hillsides.
 
 The elm and black ash were very common along the lower and stiller
 parts of the streams, where the shores were flat and grassy or there
 were low gravelly islands. They made a pleasing variety in the
 scenery, and we felt as if nearer home while gliding past them.
 
 The above fourteen trees made the bulk of the woods which we saw.
 
 The larch (juniper), beech, and Norway pine (_Pinus resinosa_, red
 pine) were only occasionally seen in particular places. The _Pinus
 Banksiana_ (gray or Northern scrub pine), and a single small red oak
 (_Quercus rubra_) only, are on islands in Grand Lake, on the East
 Branch.
 
 The above are almost all peculiarly Northern trees, and found chiefly,
 if not solely, on mountains southward.
 
 
 II. FLOWERS AND SHRUBS
 
 It appears that in a forest like this the great majority of flowers,
 shrubs, and grasses are confined to the banks of the rivers and lakes,
 and to the meadows, more open swamps, burnt lands, and mountain-tops;
 comparatively very few indeed penetrate the woods. There is no such
 dispersion even of wild-flowers as is commonly supposed, or as exists
 in a cleared and settled country. Most of our wild-flowers, so called,
 may be considered as naturalized in the localities where they grow.
 Rivers and lakes are the great protectors of such plants against the
 aggressions of the forest, by their annual rise and fall keeping open
 a narrow strip where these more delicate plants have light and space
 in which to grow. They are the _proteges_ of the rivers. These narrow
 and straggling bands and isolated groups are, in a sense, the pioneers
 of civilization. Birds, quadrupeds, insects, and man also, in the
 main, follow the flowers, and the latter in his turn makes more room
 for them and for berry-bearing shrubs, birds, and small quadrupeds.
 One settler told me that not only blackberries and raspberries but
 mountain maples came in, in the clearing and burning.
 
 Though plants are often referred to primitive woods as their locality,
 it cannot be true of very many, unless the woods are supposed to
 include such localities as I have mentioned. Only those which require
 but little light, and can bear the drip of the trees, penetrate the
 woods, and these have commonly more beauty in their leaves than in
 their pale and almost colorless blossoms.
 
 The prevailing flowers and conspicuous small plants of the _woods_,
 which I noticed, were: _Clintonia borealis_, linnaea, checkerberry
 (_Gaultheria procumbens_), _Aralia nudicaulis_ (wild sarsaparilla),
 great round-leaved orchis, _Dalibarda repens_, _Chiogenes hispidula_
 (creeping snowberry), _Oxalis Acetosella_ (common wood-sorrel), _Aster
 acuminatus_, _Pyrola secunda_ (one-sided pyrola), _Medeola Virginica_
 (Indian cucumber-root), small _Circaea_ (enchanter's nightshade), and
 perhaps _Cornus Canadensis_ (dwarf cornel).
 
 Of these, the last of July, 1858, only the _Aster acuminatus_ and
 great round-leaved orchis were conspicuously in bloom.
 
 The most common flowers of the _river_ and _lake shores_ were:
 _Thalictrum cornuti_ (meadow-rue); _Hypericum ellipticum_, _mutilum_,
 and _Canadense_ (St. John's-wort); horsemint; horehound, _Lycopus
 Virginicus_ and _Europaeus_, var. _sinuatus_ (bugle-weed); _Scutellaria
 galericulata_ (skullcap); _Solidago lanceolata_ and _squarrosa_, East
 Branch, (goldenrod); _Diplopappus umbellatus_ (double-bristled aster);
 _Aster Radula_; _Cicuta maculata_ and _bulbifera_ (water hemlock);
 meadow-sweet; _Lysimachia stricta_ and _ciliata_ (loosestrife);
 _Galium trifidum_ (small bed-straw); _Lilium Canadense_ (wild yellow
 lily); _Platanthera peramoena_ and _psycodes_ (great purple orchis
 and small purple fringed orchis); _Mimulus ringens_ (monkey-flower);
 dock (water); blue flag; _Hydrocotyle Americana_ (marsh pennywort);
 _Sanicula Canadensis_ (_?_) (black snake-root); _Clematis Virginiana_
 (_?_) (common virgin's-bower); _Nasturtium palustre_ (marsh cress);
 _Ranunculus recurvatus_ (hooked crow-foot); _Asclepias incarnata_
 (swamp milkweed); _Aster Tradescanti_ (Tradescant's aster); _Aster
 miser_, also _longifolius_; _Eupatorium purpureum_, apparently, lake
 shores, (Joe-Pye-weed); _Apocynum Cannabinum_, East Branch, (Indian
 hemp); _Polygonum cilinode_ (bindweed); and others. Not to mention,
 among inferior orders, wool-grass and the sensitive fern.
 
 In the water, _Nuphar advena_ (yellow pond-lily), some _potamogetons_
 (pond-weed), _Sagittaria variabilis_ (arrowhead), _Sium lineare_ (_?_)
 (water-parsnip).
 
 Of these, those conspicuously in flower the last of July, 1857, were:
 rue, _Solidago lanceolata_ and _squarrosa_, _Diplopappus umbellatus_,
 _Aster Radula_, _Lilium Canadense_, great and small purple orchis,
 _Mimulus ringens_, blue flag, virgin's-bower, etc.
 
 The characteristic flowers in _swamps_ were: _Rubus triflorus_ (dwarf
 raspberry); _Calla palustris_ (water-arum); and _Sarracenia purpurea_
 (pitcher-plant). On _burnt grounds_: _Epilobium angustifolium_, in
 full bloom, (great willow-herb); and _Erechthites hieracifolia_
 (fire-weed). On _cliffs_: _Campanula rotundifolia_ (harebell); _Cornus
 Canadensis_ (dwarf cornel); _Arctostaphylos Uva-Ursi_ (bear-berry);
 _Potentilla tridentata_ (mountain cinquefoil); _Pteris aquilina_
 (common brake). At _old camps, carries, and logging-paths_: _Cirsium
 arvense_ (Canada thistle); _Prunella vulgaris_ (common self-heal);
 clover; herd's-grass; _Achillea millefolium_ (common yarrow);
 _Leucanthemum vulgare_ (whiteweed); _Aster macrophyllus_; _Halenia
 deflexa_, East Branch, (spurred gentian); _Antennaria margaritacea_
 (pearly everlasting); _Actaea rubra_ and _alba_, wet carries, (red and
 white cohosh); _Desmodium Canadense_ (tick-trefoil); sorrel.
 
 The handsomest and most interesting flowers were the great purple
 orchises, rising ever and anon, with their great purple spikes
 perfectly erect, amid the shrubs and grasses of the shore. It seemed
 strange that they should be made to grow there in such profusion, seen
 of moose and moose-hunters only, while they are so rare in Concord. I
 have never seen this species flowering nearly so late with us, or with
 the small one.
 
 The prevailing underwoods were: _Dirca palustris_ (moose-wood), _Acer
 spicatum_ (mountain maple), _Virburnum lantanoides_ (hobble-bush), and
 frequently _Taxus baccata_, var. _Canadensis_ (American yew).
 
 The prevailing shrubs and small trees along the shore were: _osier
 rouge_ and alders (before mentioned); sallows, or small willows, of
 two or three kinds, as _Salis humilis_, _rostrata_, and _discolor_
 (_?_); _Sambucus Canadensis_ (black elder); rose; _Viburnum Opulus_
 and _nudum_ (cranberry-tree and withe-rod); _Pyrus Americana_
 (American mountain-ash); _Corylus rostrata_ (beaked hazelnut);
 _Diervilla trifida_ (bush honeysuckle); _Prunus Virginiana_
 (choke-cherry); _Myrica gale_ (sweet-gale); _Nemopanthes Canadensis_
 (mountain holly); _Cephalanthus occidentalis_ (button-bush); _Ribes
 prostratum_, in some places, (fetid currant).
 
 More particularly of shrubs and small trees in _swamps_: some willows,
 _Kalmia glauca_ (pale laurel), _Ledum latifolium_ and _palustre_
 (Labrador tea), _Ribes lacustre_ (swamp gooseberry), and in one place
 _Betula pumila_ (low birch). At _camps and carries_: raspberry,
 _Vaccinium Canadense_ (Canada blueberry), _Prunus Pennsylvanica_ (also
 alongshore) (wild red cherry), _Amelanchier Canadensis_ (shad-bush),
 _Sambucus pubens_ (red-berried elder). Among those peculiar to the
 _mountains_ would be the _Vaccinium Vitis-Idaea_ (cow-berry).
 
 Of plants commonly regarded as _introduced_ from Europe, I observed at
 Ansel Smith's clearing, Chesuncook, abundant in 1857: _Ranunculus
 acris_ (buttercups); _Plantago major_ (common plantain); _Chenopodium
 album_ (lamb's-quarters); _Capsella Bursa-pastoris_, 1853,
 (shepherd's-purse); _Spergula arvensis_, also north shore of Moosehead
 in 1853, and elsewhere, 1857, (corn-spurry); _Taraxacum
 Dens-leonis_--regarded as indigenous by Gray, but evidently introduced
 there--(common dandelion); _Polygonum Persicaria_ and _hydropiper_, by
 a logging-path in woods at Smith's, (lady's-thumb and smart-weed);
 _Rumex Acetosella_, common at carries, (sheep sorrel); _Trifolium
 pratense_, 1853, on carries, frequent, (red clover); _Leucanthemum
 vulgare_, carries, (whiteweed); _Phleum pratense_, carries, 1853 and
 1857, (herd's-grass); _Verbena hastata_ (blue vervain); _Cirsium
 arvense_, abundant at camps, 1857, (Canada thistle); _Rumex crispus_
 (_?_), West Branch, 1853 (?), (curled dock); _Verbascum Thapsus_,
 between Bangor and lake, 1853, (common mullein).
 
 It appears that I saw about a dozen plants which had accompanied man
 as far into the woods as Chesuncook, and had naturalized themselves
 there, in 1853. Plants begin thus early to spring by the side of a
 logging-path,--a mere vista through the woods, which can only be used
 in the winter, on account of the stumps and fallen trees,--which at
 length are the roadside plants in old settlements. The pioneers of
 such are planted in part by the first cattle, which cannot be summered
 in the woods.
 
 
 III. LIST OF PLANTS
 
 The following is a list of the plants which I noticed in the Maine
 woods, in the years 1853 and 1857. (Those marked * not in woods.)
 
 1. THOSE WHICH ATTAINED THE HEIGHT OF TREES
 
 _Alnus incana_ (speckled or hoary alder), abundant along streams, etc.
 
 _Thuja occidentalis_ (American arbor-vitae), one of the prevailing.
 
 _Fraxinus sambucifolia_ (black ash), very common, especially near dead
 water. The Indian spoke of "yellow ash" as also found there.
 
 _Populus tremuloides_ (American aspen), very common, especially on
 burnt lands, almost as white as birches.
 
 _Populus grandidentata_ (large-toothed aspen), perhaps two or three.
 
 _Fagus ferruginea_ (American beech), not uncommon, at least on the
 West Branch. (Saw more in 1846.)
 
 _Betula papyracea_ (canoe birch), prevailing everywhere and about
 Bangor.
 
 _Betula excelsa_ (yellow birch), very common.
 
 _Betula lenta_ (black birch), on the West Branch in 1853.
 
 _Betula alba_ (American white birch), about Bangor only.
 
 _Ulmus Americana_ (American or white elm), West Branch and low down
 the East Branch, _i. e._ on the lower and alluvial part of the river,
 very common.
 
 _Larix Americana_ (American or black larch), very common on the
 Umbazookskus; some elsewhere.
 
 _Abies Canadensis_ (hemlock spruce); not abundant; some on the West
 Branch, and a little everywhere.
 
 _Acer saccharinum_ (sugar maple), very common.
 
 _Acer rubrum_ (red or swamp maple), very common.
 
 _Acer dasycarpum_ (white or silver maple), a little low on East Branch
 and in Chesuncook woods.
 
 _Quercus rubra_ (red oak), one on an island in Grand Lake, East
 Branch, and, according to a settler, a few on the east side of
 Chesuncook Lake; a few also about Bangor in 1853.
 
 _Pinus Strobus_ (white pine), scattered along, most abundant at Heron
 Lake.
 
 _Pinus resinosa_ (red pine), Telos and Grand Lake, a little afterwards
 here and there.
 
 _Abies balsamea_ (balsam fir), perhaps the most common tree,
 especially in the upper parts of rivers.
 
 _Abies nigra_ (black or double spruce), next to the last the most
 common, if not equally common, and on mountains.
 
 _Abies alba_ (white or single spruce), common with the last along the
 rivers.
 
 _Pinus Banksiana_ (gray or Northern scrub pine), a few on an island in
 Grand Lake.
 
 Twenty-three in all (23).
 
 2. SMALL TREES AND SHRUBS
 
 _Prunus depressa_ (dwarf cherry), on gravel-bars, East Branch, near
 Hunt's, with green fruit; obviously distinct from the _pumila_ of
 river and meadows.
 
 _Vaccinium corymbosum_ (common swamp blueberry), Bucksport.
 
 _Vaccinium Canadense_ (Canada blueberry), carries and rocky hills
 everywhere as far south as Bucksport.
 
 _Vaccinium Pennsylvanicum_ (dwarf-blueberry?), Whetstone Falls.
 
 _Betula pumila_ (low birch), Mud Pond Swamp.
 
 _Prinos verticillatus_ (black alder), 1857, now placed with _Ilex_ by
 Gray, 2d ed.
 
 _Cephalanthus occidentalis_ (button-bush).
 
 _Prunus Pennsylvanica_ (wild red cherry), very common at camps,
 carries, etc., along rivers; fruit ripe August 1, 1857.
 
 _Prunus Virginiana_ (choke-cherry), riverside, common.
 
 _Cornus alternifolia_ (alternate-leaved cornel), West Branch, 1853.
 
 _Ribes prostratum_ (fetid currant), common along streams; on Webster
 Stream.
 
 _Sambucus Canadensis_ (common elder), common along riversides.
 
 _Sambucus pubens_ (red-berried elder), not quite so common; roadsides
 toward Moosehead, and on carries afterward; fruit beautiful.
 
 _Ribes lacustre_ (swamp-gooseberry), swamps, common; Mud Pond Swamp
 and Webster Stream; not ripe July 29, 1857.
 
 _Corylus rostrata_ (beaked hazelnut), common.
 
 _Taxus baccata_, var. _Canadensis_ (American yew), a common undershrub
 at an island in West Branch and Chesuncook woods.
 
 _Viburnum lantanoides_ (hobble-bush), common, especially in Chesuncook
 woods; fruit ripe in September, 1853, not in July, 1857.
 
 _Viburnum Opulus_ (cranberry-tree), on West Branch; one in flower
 still, July 25, 1857.
 
 _Viburnum nudum_ (withe-rod), common along rivers.
 
 _Kalmia glauca_ (pale laurel), swamps, common, as at Moosehead Carry
 and Chamberlain Swamp.
 
 _Kalmia angustifolia_ (lambkill), with _Kalmia glauca_.
 
 _Acer spicatum_ (mountain maple), a prevailing underwood.
 
 _Acer striatum_ (striped maple), in fruit July 30, 1857; green the
 first year; green, striped with white, the second; darker, the third,
 with dark blotches.
 
 _Cornus stolonifera_ (red-osier dogwood), prevailing shrub on shore of
 West Branch; fruit still white in August, 1857.
 
 _Pyrus Americana_ (American mountain-ash), common along shores.
 
 _Amelanchier Canadensis_ (shad-bush), rocky carries, etc.,
 considerable fruit in 1857.
 
 _Rubus strigosus_ (wild red raspberry), very abundant, burnt grounds,
 camps, and carries, but not ripe till we got to Chamberlain dam and on
 East Branch.
 
 _Rosa Carolina_ (swamp rose), common on the shores of lakes, etc.
 
 _Rhus typhina_* (staghorn sumach).
 
 _Myrica Gale_ (sweet-gale), common.
 
 _Nemopanthes Canadensis_ (mountain holly), common in low ground,
 Moosehead Carry, and on Mount Kineo.
 
 _Crataegus_ (_coccinea_? scarlet-fruited thorn), not uncommon; with
 hard fruit in September, 1853.
 
 _Salix_ (near to _petiolaris_, petioled willow), very common in
 Umbazookskus meadows.
 
 _Salix rostrata_ (long-beaked willow), common.
 
 _Salix humilis_ (low bush willow), common.
 
 _Salix discolor_ (glaucous willow) (?).
 
 _Salix lucida_ (shining willow), at island in Heron Lake.
 
 _Dirca palustris_ (moose-wood), common.
 
 In all, 38.
 
 3. SMALL SHRUBS AND HERBACEOUS PLANTS
 
 _Agrimonia Eupatoria_ (common agrimony), not uncommon.
 
 _Circaea alpina_ (enchanter's nightshade), very common in woods.
 
 _Nasturtium palustre_ (marsh cress), var. _hispidum_, common, as at A.
 Smith's.
 
 _Aralia hispida_ (bristly sarsaparilla), on West Branch, both years.
 
 _Aralia nudicaulis_ (wild sarsaparilla), Chesuncook woods.
 
 _Sagittaria variabilis_ (arrowhead), common at Moosehead and
 afterward.
 
 _Arum triphyllum_ (Indian turnip), now _arisaema_, Moosehead Carry in
 1853.
 
 _Asclepias incarnata_ (swamp milkweed), Umbazookskus River and after;
 redder than ours, and a different variety from our var. _pulchra_.
 
 _Aster acuminatus_ (pointed-leaved aster), the prevailing aster in
 woods, not long open on South Branch, July 31; two or more feet high.
 
 _Aster macrophyllus_ (large-leaved aster), common, and the whole plant
 surprisingly fragrant, like a medicinal herb; just out at Telos Dam,
 July 29, 1857, and after to Bangor and Bucksport; bluish flower (in
 woods on Pine Stream and at Chesuncook in 1853).
 
 _Aster Radula_ (rough-leaved aster), common, Moosehead Carry and
 after.
 
 _Aster miser_ (petty aster), in 1853 on West Branch, and common on
 Chesuncook shore.
 
 _Aster longifolius_ (willow-leaved blue aster), 1853, Moosehead and
 Chesuncook shores.
 
 _Aster cordifolius_ (heart-leaved aster), 1853, West Branch.
 
 _Aster Tradescanti_ (Tradescant's aster), 1857. A narrow-leaved one,
 Chesuncook shore, 1853.
 
 _Aster_, _longifolius_-like, with small flowers, West Branch, 1853.
 
 _Aster puniceus_ (rough-stemmed aster), Pine Stream.
 
 _Diplopappus umbellatus_ (large diplopappus aster), common along
 river.
 
 _Arctostaphylos Uva-Ursi_ (bear-berry), Kineo, etc., 1857.
 
 _Polygonum cilinode_ (fringe-jointed false-buckwheat), common.
 
 _Bidens cernua_ (bur-marigold), 1853, West Branch.
 
 _Ranunculus acris_ (buttercups), abundant at Smith's dam, Chesuncook,
 1853.
 
 _Rubus triflorus_ (dwarf raspberry), low grounds and swamps, common.
 
 _Utricularia vulgaris_* (greater bladderwort), Pushaw.
 
 _Iris versicolor_ (larger blue flag), common, Moosehead, West Branch,
 Umbazookskus, etc.
 
 _Sparganium_ (bur-reed).
 
 _Calla palustris_ (water-arum), in bloom July 27, 1857, Mud Pond
 Swamp.
 
 _Lobelia cardinalis_ (cardinal-flower), apparently common, but out of
 bloom August, 1857.
 
 _Cerastium nutans_ (clammy wild chickweed) (?).
 
 _Gaultheria procumbens_ (checkerberry), prevailing everywhere in woods
 along banks of rivers.
 
 _Stellaria media_* (common chickweed), Bangor.
 
 _Chiogenes hispidula_ (creeping snowberry), very common in woods.
 
 _Cicuta maculata_ (water hemlock).
 
 _Cicuta bulbifera_ (bulb-bearing water hemlock), Penobscot and
 Chesuncook shore, 1853.
 
 _Galium trifidum_ (small bed-straw), common.
 
 _Galium Aparine_ (cleavers) (?), Chesuncook, 1853.
 
 _Galium_, one kind on Pine Stream, 1853.
 
 _Trifolium pratense_ (red clover), on carries, etc.
 
 _Actaea spicata_, var. _alba_ (white cohosh), Chesuncook woods, 1853,
 and East Branch, 1857.
 
 _Actaea_, var. _rubra_ (red cohosh), East Branch, 1857.
 
 _Vaccinium Vitis-Idaea_ (cow-berry), Ktaadn, very abundant.
 
 _Cornus Canadensis_ (dwarf cornel), in woods Chesuncook, 1853; just
 ripe at Kineo, July 24, 1857, common; still in bloom, Moosehead Carry,
 September 16, 1853.
 
 _Medeola Virginica_ (Indian cucumber-root), West Branch and Chesuncook
 woods.
 
 _Dalibarda repens_ (dalibarda), Moosehead Carry and after, common. In
 flower still, August 1, 1857.
 
 _Taraxacum Dens-leonis_ (common dandelion), Smith's, 1853; only there.
 Is it not foreign?
 
 _Diervilla trifida_ (bush honeysuckle), very common.
 
 _Rumex Hydrolapathum_ (_?_) (great water dock), in 1857; noticed it
 was large-seeded in 1853; common.
 
 _Rumex crispus_ (_?_) (curled dock), West Branch, 1853.
 
 _Apocynum cannabinum_ (Indian hemp), Kineo (Bradford) and East Branch,
 1857, at Whetstone Falls.
 
 _Apocynum androsaemifolium_ (spreading dogbane), Kineo (Bradford).
 
 _Clintonia borealis_ (clintonia), all over woods; fruit just ripening,
 July 25, 1857.
 
 A _Lemna_ (duckweed), Pushaw, 1857.
 
 _Elodea Virginica_ (marsh St. John's-wort), Moosehead, 1853.
 
 _Epilobium angustifolium_ (great willow-herb), great fields on burnt
 lands; some white at Webster Stream.
 
 _Epilobium coloratum_ (purple-veined willow-herb), once in 1857.
 
 _Eupatorium purpureum_ (Joe-Pye-weed), Heron, Moosehead, and
 Chesuncook lake shores, common.
 
 _Allium_ (onion), a new kind to me in bloom, without bulbs above, on
 rocks near Whetstone Falls (?), East Branch.
 
 _Halenia deflexa_ (spurred gentian), carries on East Branch, common.
 
 _Geranium Robertianum_ (herb-robert).
 
 _Solidago lanceolata_ (bushy goldenrod), very common.
 
 _Solidago_, one of the three-ribbed, in both years.
 
 _Solidago thyrsoidea_ (large mountain goldenrod), one on Webster
 Stream.
 
 _Solidago squarrosa_ (large-spiked goldenrod), the most common on East
 Branch.
 
 _Solidago altissima_ (rough hairy goldenrod), not uncommon both
 years.
 
 _Coptis trifolia_ (three-leaved gold-thread).
 
 _Smilax herbacea_ (carrion-flower), not uncommon both years.
 
 _Spiraea tomentosa_* (hardhack), Bangor.
 
 _Campanula rotundifolia_ (harebell), cliffs, Kineo, Grand Lake, etc.
 
 _Hieracium_ (hawkweed), not uncommon.
 
 _Veratrum viride_ (American white hellebore).
 
 _Lycopus Virginicus_ (bugle-weed), 1857.
 
 _Lycopus Europaeus_ (water horehound), var. _sinuatus_, Heron Lake
 shore.
 
 _Chenopodium album_ (lamb's-quarters), Smith's.
 
 _Mentha Canadensis_ (wild mint), very common.
 
 _Galeopsis tetrahit_ (common hemp-nettle), Olamon Isle, abundant, and
 below, in prime, August 3, 1857.
 
 _Houstonia caerulea_ (bluets), now _Oldenlandia_ (Gray, 2d ed.), 1857.
 
 _Hydrocotyle Americana_ (marsh pennywort), common.
 
 _Hypericum ellipticum_ (elliptical-leaved St. John's-wort), common.
 
 _Hypericum mutilum_ (small St. John's-wort), both years, common.
 
 _Hypericum Canadense_ (Canadian St. John's-wort), Moosehead Lake and
 Chesuncook shores, 1853.
 
 _Trientalis Americana_ (star-flower), Pine Stream, 1853.
 
 _Lobelia inflata_ (Indian tobacco).
 
 _Spiranthes cernua_ (ladies'-tresses), Kineo and after.
 
 _Nabalus_ (rattlesnake-root), 1857; _altissimus_ (tall white lettuce),
 Chesuncook woods, 1853.
 
 _Antennaria margaritacea_ (pearly everlasting), common, Moosehead,
 Smith's, etc.
 
 _Lilium Canadense_ (wild yellow lily), very common and large, West
 and East Branch; one on East Branch, 1857, with strongly revolute
 petals, and leaves perfectly smooth beneath, but not larger than the
 last, and apparently only a variety.
 
 _Linnaea borealis_ (linnaea), almost everywhere in woods.
 
 _Lobelia Dortmanna_ (water lobelia), pond in Bucksport.
 
 _Lysimachia ciliata_ (hairy-stalked loosestrife), very common,
 Chesuncook shore and East Branch.
 
 _Lysimachia stricta_ (upright loosestrife), very common.
 
 _Microstylis ophioglossoides_ (adder's-mouth), Kineo.
 
 _Spiraea salicifolia_ (common meadow-sweet), common.
 
 _Mimulus ringens_ (monkey-flower), common, lake-shores, etc.
 
 _Scutellaria galericulata_ (skullcap), very common.
 
 _Scutellaria lateriflora_ (mad-dog skullcap), Heron Lake, 1857;
 Chesuncook, 1853.
 
 _Platanthera psycodes_ (small purple fringed orchis), very common,
 East Branch and Chesuncook, 1853.
 
 _Platanthera fimbriata_ (large purple fringed orchis), very common,
 West Branch and Umbazookskus, 1857.
 
 _Platanthera orbiculata_ (large round-leaved orchis), very common in
 woods, Moosehead and Chamberlain carries, Caucomgomoc, etc.
 
 _Amphicarpaea monoica_ (hog peanut).
 
 _Aralia racemosa_ (spikenard), common, Moosehead Carry, Telos Lake,
 etc., and after; out about August 1, 1857.
 
 _Plantago major_ (common plantain), common in open land at Smith's in
 1853.
 
 _Pontederia cordata_* (pickerel-weed), only near Oldtown, 1857.
 
 _Potamogeton_ (pondweed), not common.
 
 _Potentilla tridentata_ (mountain cinquefoil), Kineo.
 
 _Potentilla Norvegica_ (cinquefoil), Heron Lake shore and Smith's.
 
 _Polygonum amphibium_ (water persicaria), var. _aquaticum_ Second
 Lake.
 
 _Polygonum Persicaria_ (lady's-thumb), log-path, Chesuncook, 1853.
 
 _Nuphar advena_ (yellow pond-lily), not abundant.
 
 _Nymphaea odorata_ (sweet water-lily), a few in West Branch, 1853.
 
 _Polygonum Hydropiper_ (smart-weed), log-path, Chesuncook.
 
 _Pyrola secunda_ (one-sided pyrola), very common, Caucomgomoc.
 
 _Pyrola elliptica_ (shin-leaf), Caucomgomoc River.
 
 _Ranunculus Flammula_ (spearwort, var. _reptans_).
 
 _Ranunculus recurvatus_ (hooked crowfoot), Umbazookskus landing, &c.
 
 _Typha latifolia_* (common cat-tail or reed-mace), extremely abundant
 between Bangor and Portland.
 
 _Sanicula Marylandica_ (black snake-root), Moosehead Carry and after.
 
 _Aralia nudicaulis_ (wild sarsaparilla).
 
 _Capsella Bursa-pastoris_ (shepherd's-purse), Smith's, 1853.
 
 _Prunella vulgaris_ (self-heal), very common everywhere.
 
 _Erechthites hieracifolia_ (fire-weed), 1857, and Smith's open land,
 1853.
 
 _Sarracenia purpurea_ (pitcher-plant), Mud Pond Swamp.
 
 _Smilacina bifolia_ (false Solomon's-seal), 1857, and Chesuncook
 woods, 1853.
 
 _Smilacina racemosa_ (false spikenard) (?), Umbazookskus Carry, July
 27, 1853.
 
 _Veronica scutellata_ (marsh speedwell).
 
 _Spergula arvensis_ (corn-spurry), 1857, not uncommon, 1853, Moosehead
 and Smith's.
 
 _Fragaria_ (strawberry), 1853, Smith's; 1857, Bucksport.
 
 _Thalictrum Cornuti_ (meadow-rue), very common, especially along
 rivers, tall, and conspicuously in bloom in July, 1857.
 
 _Cirsium arvense_ (Canada thistle), abundant at camps and
 highway-sides in the north of Maine.
 
 _Cirsium muticum_ (swamp thistle), well in bloom, Webster Stream,
 August 31.
 
 _Rumex acetosella_ (sheep sorrel), common by river and log-paths, as
 Chesuncook log-path.
 
 _Impatiens fulva_ (spotted touch-me-not).
 
 _Trillium erythrocarpum_ (painted trillium), common West Branch and
 Moosehead Carry.
 
 _Verbena hastata_ (blue vervain).
 
 _Clematis Virginiana_ (common virgin's-bower), common on river-banks;
 feathered in September, 1853; in bloom July, 1857.
 
 _Leucanthemum vulgare_ (whiteweed).
 
 _Sium lineare_ (water-parsnip), 1857, and Chesuncook shore 1853.
 
 _Achillea millefolium_ (common yarrow), by river and log-paths, and
 Smith's.
 
 _Desmodium Canadense_ (Canadian tick-trefoil), not uncommon.
 
 _Oxalis Acetosella_ (common wood-sorrel), still out July 25 1853, at
 Moosehead Carry and after.
 
 _Oxalis stricta_ (yellow wood-sorrel), 1853, at Smith's and his
 wood-path.
 
 _Liparis liliifolia_ (tway-blade), Kineo (Bradford).
 
 _Uvularia grandiflora_ (large-flowered bellwort), woods, common.
 
 _Uvularia sessilifolia_ (sessile-leaved bellwort), Chesuncook woods,
 1853.
 
 In all, 145.
 
 4. OF LOWER ORDER
 
 _Scirpus Eriophorum_ (wool-grass), very common, especially on low
 islands. A coarse grass, four or five feet high, along the river.
 
 _Phleum pratense_ (herd's-grass), on carries, at camps and clearings.
 
 _Equisetum sylvaticum_ (sylvatic horse-tail).
 
 _Pteris aquilina_ (brake), Kineo and after.
 
 _Onoclea sensibilis_ (sensitive fern), very common along the
 riversides; some on the gravelly shore of Heron Lake Island.
 
 _Polypodium Dryopteris_ (brittle polypody).
 
 _Woodsia Ilvensis_ (rusty woodsia), Kineo.
 
 _Lycopodium lucidulum_ (toothed club-moss).
 
 _Usnea_ (a parmeliaceous lichen), common on various trees.
 
 
 IV. LIST OF BIRDS
 
 WHICH I SAW IN MAINE BETWEEN JULY 24 AND AUGUST 3, 1857
 
 A very small hawk at Great Falls, on Webster Stream.
 
 _Haliaeetus leucocephalus_ (white-headed or bald eagle), at Ragmuff,
 and above and below Hunt's, and on pond below Mattawamkeag.
 
 _Pandion haliaetus_ (fish hawk or osprey), heard, also seen on East
 Branch.
 
 _Bubo Virginianus_ (cat owl), near Camp Island, also above mouth of
 Schoonis, from a stump back and forth, also near Hunt's on a tree.
 
 _Icterus phoeniceus_ (red-winged blackbird), Umbazookskus River.
 
 _Corvus Americanus_ (American crow), a few, as at outlet of Grand
 Lake; a peculiar cawing.
 
 _Fringilla Canadensis_ (tree sparrow), think I saw one on Mount Kineo,
 July 24, which behaved as if it had a nest there.
 
 _Garrulus cristatus_ (blue jay).
 
 _Parus atricapillus_ (chickadee), a few.
 
 _Muscicapa tyrannus_ (kingbird).
 
 _Muscicapa Cooperii_ (olive-sided flycatcher), everywhere a prevailing
 bird.
 
 _Muscicapa virens_ (wood pewee), Moosehead, and I think beyond.
 
 _Muscicapa acadica_ (small pewee), common.
 
 _Muscicapa ruticilla_ (American redstart), Moosehead.
 
 _Vireo olivaceus_ (red-eyed vireo), everywhere common.
 
 _Turdus migratorius_ (red-breasted robin), some everywhere.
 
 _Turdus melodus_ (wood thrush), common in all the woods.
 
 _Turdus Wilsonii_ (Wilson's thrush), Moosehead and beyond.
 
 _Turdus aurocapillus_ (golden-crowned thrush or oven-bird), Moosehead.
 
 _Fringilla albicollis_ (white-throated sparrow), Kineo and after,
 apparently nesting; the prevailing bird early and late.
 
 _Fringilla melodia_ (song sparrow), at Moosehead or beyond.
 
 _Sylvia pinus_ (pine warbler), one part of voyage.
 
 _Trichas Marylandica_ (Maryland yellow-throat), everywhere.
 
 _Coccyzus Americanus_ (_?_) (yellow-billed cuckoo), common.
 
 _Picus erythrocephalus_ (red-headed woodpecker), heard and saw, and
 good to eat.
 
 _Sitta Carolinensis_ (_?_) (white-breasted American nuthatch), heard.
 
 _Alcedo alcyon_ (belted kingfisher), very common.
 
 _Caprimulgus Americanus_ (nighthawk).
 
 _Tetrao umbellus_ (partridge), Moosehead Carry, etc.
 
 _Tetrao cupido_ (_?_) (pinnated grouse), Webster Stream.
 
 _Ardea caerulea_ (blue heron), lower part of Penobscot.
 
 _Totanus macularius_ (spotted sandpiper or peetweet), everywhere.
 
 _Larus argentatus_ (_?_) (herring gull), Heron Lake on rocks, and
 Chamberlain. Smaller gull on Second Lake.
 
 _Anas obscura_ (dusky or black duck), once in East Branch.
 
 _Anas sponsa_ (summer or wood duck), everywhere.
 
 _Fuligula albeola_ (spirit duck or dipper), common.
 
 _Colymbus glacialis_ (great northern diver or loon), in all the lakes.
 
 _Mergus Merganser_ (buff-breasted merganser or sheldrake), common on
 lakes and rivers.
 
 A swallow; the night-warbler (?) once or twice.
 
 
 V. QUADRUPEDS
 
 A bat on West Branch; beaver skull at Grand Lake; Mr. Thatcher ate
 beaver with moose on the Caucomgomoc. A muskrat on the last stream;
 the red squirrel is common in the depths of the woods; a dead
 porcupine on Chamberlain road; a cow moose and tracks of calf; skin of
 a bear, just killed.
 
 
 VI. OUTFIT FOR AN EXCURSION
 
 The following will be a good outfit for one who wishes to make an
 excursion of _twelve_ days into the Maine woods in July, with a
 companion and one Indian, for the same purposes that I did.
 
 _Wear_,--a check shirt, stout old shoes, thick socks, a neck-ribbon,
 thick waistcoat, thick pants, old Kossuth hat, a linen sack.
 
 _Carry_,--in an india-rubber knapsack, with a large flap, two shirts
 (check), one pair thick socks, one pair drawers, one flannel shirt,
 two pocket-handkerchiefs, a light india-rubber coat or a thick woolen
 one, two bosoms and collars to go and come with, one napkin, pins,
 needles, thread, one blanket, best gray, seven feet long.
 
 _Tent_,--six by seven feet, and four feet high in middle, will do;
 veil and gloves and insect-wash, or, better, mosquito-bars to cover
 all at night; best pocket map, and perhaps description of the route;
 compass; plant-book and red blotting-paper; paper and stamps, botany,
 small pocket spy-glass for birds, pocket microscope, tape-measure,
 insect-boxes.
 
 Axe, full size if possible, jackknife, fish-lines, two only apiece,
 with a few hooks and corks ready, and with pork for bait in a packet,
 rigged; matches (some also in a small vial in the waistcoat pocket);
 soap, two pieces; large knife and iron spoon (for all); three or four
 old newspapers, much twine, and several rags for dish-cloths; twenty
 feet of strong cord, four-quart tin pail for kettle, two tin dippers,
 three tin plates, a fry-pan.
 
 _Provisions._--Soft hard-bread, twenty-eight pounds; pork, sixteen
 pounds; sugar, twelve pounds; one pound black tea or three pounds
 coffee; one box or a pint of salt; one quart Indian meal, to fry fish
 in; six lemons, good to correct the pork and warm water; perhaps two
 or three pounds of rice, for variety. You will probably get some
 berries, fish, etc., beside.
 
 A gun is not worth the carriage, unless you go as hunters. The pork
 should be in an open keg, sawed to fit; the sugar, tea or coffee,
 meal, salt, etc., should be put in separate water-tight india-rubber
 bags, tied with a leather string; and all the provisions, and part of
 the rest of the baggage, put into two large india-rubber bags, which
 have been proved to be water-tight and durable.
 
 Expense of preceding outfit is twenty-four dollars.
 
 An Indian may be hired for about one dollar and fifty cents per day,
 and perhaps fifty cents a week for his canoe (this depends on the
 demand). The canoe should be a strong and tight one. This expense will
 be nineteen dollars.
 
 Such an excursion need not cost more than twenty-five dollars apiece,
 starting at the foot of Moosehead, if you already possess or can
 borrow a reasonable part of the outfit. If you take an Indian and
 canoe at Oldtown, it will cost seven or eight dollars more to
 transport them to the lake.
 
 
 VII. A LIST OF INDIAN WORDS
 
      1. _Ktaadn_, said to mean _Highest Land_, Rasles puts for _Mt.
      Pemadene_; for _Grai, pierre a aiguiser_, _Kitadauegan_. (_Vide_
      Potter.)
 
      _Mattawamkeag_, place where two rivers meet. (Indian of carry.)
      (_Vide_ Williamson's History of Maine, and Willis.)
 
      _Molunkus._
 
      _Ebeeme_, rock.
 
      _Noliseemack_; other name, Shad Pond.
 
      _Kecunnilessu_, chickadee.                                   }
                                                                   }
      _Nipsquecohossus_, woodcock.                                 }
                                                                   }
      _Skuscumonsuk_, kingfisher. Has it not the pl. termination   }
      _uk_ here, or _suk_?                                         } Joe.
                                                                   }
      _Wassus_, bear, _aouessous_ (Rasles).                        }
                                                                   }
      _Lunxus_, Indian-devil.                                      }
                                                                   }
      _Upahsis_, mountain-ash.                                     }
 
      _Moose_ (is it called, or does it mean, wood-eater?), _mous_
      (Rasles).
 
      _Katahdinauguoh_, said to mean mountains about Ktaadn.
 
      _Ebemena_, tree-cranberry. _Ibibimin_, _nar_, red, bad     }Joe
      fruit. (Rasles.)                                           }
 
      _Wighiggin_, a bill or writing, _aouixigan_,               } Ind'n of
      "_livre_, _lettre_, _peinture_, _ceinture_" (Rasles).      } carry.
 
      _Sebamook_, Large-bay Lake, _Peqouasebem_; add _ar_        }
      for plural, _lac_ or _etang_, (Rasles). _Ouauerinauegamek_, } Nicholai.
      _anse dans un lac_, (Rasles). _Mspame_, large water.       }
      Polis.                                                     }
 
      _Sebago_ and _Sebec_, large open water.
 
      _Chesuncook_, place where many streams empty in.      }
      (_Vide_ Willis and Potter.)                           }
                                                            } Tahmunt,
      _Caucomgomoc_, Gull Lake. (_Caucomgomoc_, the lake;   } etc.
      _Caucomgomoc-took_, the river, Polis.)                }
 
      _Pammadumcook._
 
      _Kenduskieg_, Little Eel River. (_Vide_ Willis.)      Nicholai.
 
      _Penobscot_, Rocky River. _Puapeskou_, stone. (Rasles  } Ind'n of
      v. Springer.)                                          } carry.
 
      _Umbazookskus_, meadow stream. (Much-meadow            }
      river, Polis.)                                         }
                                                             }
      _Millinocket_, place of islands.                       } Nicholai.
                                                             }
      _Souneunk_, that runs between mountains.               }
                                                             }
      _Aboljacarmegus_, Smooth-ledge Falls and Deadwater.    }
 
      _Aboljacarmeguscook_, the river there.
 
      _Muskiticook_, dead stream. (Indian of carry.) _Meskikou_, or
      _Meskikouikou_, a place where there is grass, (Rasles).
      _Muskeeticook_, deadwater, (Polis).
 
      _Mattahumkeag_, Sand-creek Pond.     }
                                           } Nicholai.
      _Piscataquis_, branch of river.      }
 
      _Shecorways_, sheldrakes.      }
                                     }
      _Naramekechus_, peetweet.      } Polis.
                                     }
      _Medawisla_, loon.             }
 
      _Orignal_, Moosehead Lake. (Montresor.)
 
      _Chor-chor-que_, usnea.                               }
                                                            }
      _Adelungquamooktum_, wood thrush.                     }
                                                            }
      _Bematruichtik_, high land generally.                 } Polis.
      (_Mt. Pemadene._ Rasles).                             }
                                                            }
      _Maquoxigil_, bark of red osier, Indian tobacco.      }
 
      _Kineo_, flint (Williamson; old Indian hunter). (Hodge.)
 
      _Artoosoqu'_, phosphorescence.                             }
                                                                 }
      _Subekoondark_, white spruce.                              }
                                                                 }
      _Skusk_, black spruce.                                     }
                                                                 }
      _Beskabekuk_, the "Lobster Lake" of maps.                  } Polis.
                                                                 }
      _Beskabekukskishtuk_, the deadwater below the island.      }
                                                                 }
      _Paytaytequick_, Burnt-Ground Stream, what Joe             }
      called _Ragmuff_.                                          }
                                                                 }
      _Nonlangyis_, the name of a deadwater between the          }
      last and Pine Stream.                                      }
 
      _Karsaootuk_, Black River (or Pine Stream). _Mkazeouighen_, }
      black, (Rasles).                                            }
                                                                  }
      _Michigan, fimus._ Polis applied it to a sucker, or         }
      a poor, good-for-nothing fish. _Fiante (?) mitsegan_        }
      (Rasles). (Pickering puts the ? after the first word.)      }
                                                                  }
      _Cowosnebagosar_, _Chiogenes hispidula_, means, grows       }
      where trees have rotted.                                    }
                                                                  } Polis.
      _Pockadunkquaywayle_, echo. _Pagadauekoueouerre_            }
      (Rasles).                                                   }
                                                                  }
      _Bororquasis_, moose-fly.                                   }
                                                                  }
      _Nerlumskeechtcook_ (or _quoik_?), (or _skeetcook_),        }
      Deadwater, and applied to the mountains near.               }
                                                                  }
      _Apmoojenegamook_, lake that is crossed.                    }
                                                                  }
      _Allegash_, hemlock bark. (_Vide_ Willis.)                  }
 
      _Paytaywecongomec_, Burnt-Ground Lake, _Telos_.
 
      _Madunkehunk_, Height-of-Land Stream (Webster                 }
      Stream).                                                      }
                                                                    }
      _Madunkehunk-gamooc_, Height-of-Land Lake.                    }
                                                                    }
      _Matungamooc_, Grand Lake.                                    }
                                                                    }
      _Uncardnerheese_, Trout Stream.                               }
                                                                    }
      _Wassataquoik_ (or _-cook_), Salmon River, East Branch.       }
      (_Vide_ Willis.)                                              }
                                                                    } Polis.
      _Pemoymenuk_, amelanchier berries, "_Pemouaimin,              }
      nak_, a black fruit. Rasles." Has it not here the plural      }
      ending?                                                       }
                                                                    }
      _Sheepnoc_, _Lilium Canadense_ bulbs. "_Sipen, nak_,          }
      white, larger than _penak_" (Rasles).                         }
                                                                    }
      _Paytgumkiss_, Petticoat (where a small river comes           }
      into the Penobscot below Nicketow).                           }
                                                                    }
      _Burntibus_, a lake-like reach in the Penobscot.              }
 
      _Passadumkeag_, "where the water falls into the Penobscot
      above the falls" (Williamson). _Pauesidauekioui_ is, _au dessus
      de la montagne_ (Rasles).
 
      _Olarmon_, or _larmon_ (Polis), red paint. "Vermilion, paint,
      _Ouramaue_" (Rasles).
 
      _Sunkhaze_, "See canoe come out; no see 'em stream" (Polis).
      The mouth of a river, according to Rasles, is _Saueghedetegoue_.
      The place where one stream empties into another, thus [Symbol]
      is _sauektaueoui_. (_Vide_ Willis.)
 
      _Tomhegan_ Br. (at Moosehead). "_Hatchet_, _temahigan_"
      (Rasles).
 
      _Nicketow_, "_Nicketaoutegue_, or _Niketoutegoue_, _riviere qui
      fourche_" (Rasles).
 
      2. From WILLIAM WILLIS, on the Language of the Abnaquies, Maine
      Hist. Coll., Vol. IV.
 
      _Abalajako-megus_ (river near Ktaadn).
 
      _Aitteon_ (name of a pond and sachem).
 
      _Apmogenegamook_ (name of a lake).
 
      _Allagash_ (a bark camp). Sockbasin, a Penobscot, told him,
      "The Indians gave this name to the lake from the fact of their
      keeping a hunting-camp there."
 
      _Bamonewengamock_, head of Allegash, Cross Lake. (Sockbasin.)
 
      _Chesuncook_, Big Lake. (Sockbasin.)
 
      _Caucongamock_ (a lake).
 
      _Ebeeme_, mountains that have plums on them. (Sockbasin).
 
      _Ktaadn_. Sockbasin pronounces this Ka-tah-din, and said it
      meant "large mountain or large thing."
 
      _Kenduskeag_ (the place of eels).
 
      _Kineo_ (flint), mountain on the border, etc.
 
      _Metawamkeag_, a river with a smooth, gravelly bottom.
      (Sockbasin.)
 
      _Metanawcook._
 
      _Millinoket_, a lake with many islands in it. (Sockbasin.)
 
      _Matakeunk_ (river).
 
      _Molunkus_ (river).
 
      _Nicketow_, Neccotoh, where two streams meet ("Forks of the
      Penobscot").
 
      _Negas_ (Indian village on the Kenduskeag).
 
      _Orignal_ (Montresor's name for Moosehead Lake).
 
      _Ponguongamook_, Allagash, name of a Mohawk Indian killed
      there. (Sockbasin.)
 
      _Penobscot_, _Penobskeag_, French _Pentagoet_, etc.
 
      _Pougohwaken_ (Heron Lake).
 
      _Pemadumcook_ (lake).
 
      _Passadumkeag_, where water goes into the river above falls.
      (Williamson.)
 
      _Ripogenus_ (river).
 
      _Sunkhaze_ (river), deadwater.
 
      _Souneunk._
 
      _Seboomook._ Sockbasin says this word means "the shape of a
      Moose's head, and was given to the lake," etc. Howard says
      differently.
 
      _Seboois_, a brook, a small river. (Sockbasin.)
 
      _Sebec_ (river).
 
      _Sebago_ (great water).
 
      _Telos_ (lake).
 
      _Telasius_ (lake).
 
      _Umbagog_ (lake), doubled up; so called from its form.
      (Sockbasin.)
 
      _Umbazookskus_ (lake).
 
      _Wassatiquoik_, a mountain river. (Sockbasin.)
 
      Judge C. E. Potter of Manchester, New Hampshire, adds in
      November, 1855:--
 
      "_Chesuncook._ This is formed from _Chesunk_, or _Schunk_ (a
      goose), and _Auke_ (a place), and means 'The Goose Place.'
      Chesunk, or Schunk, is the sound made by the wild geese when
      flying."
 
      _Ktaadn._ This is doubtless a corruption of _kees_ (high), and
      _auke_ (a place).
 
      _Penobscot_, _penapse_ (stone, rock place), and _auke_ (place).
 
      _Suncook_, goose place, _Schunk-auke_.
 
      The Judge says that _schoot_ means to rush, and hence
      _schoodic_ from this and _auke_ (a place where water rushes),
      and that _schoon_ means the same; and that the Marblehead
      people and others have derived the words "scoon" and "scoot"
      from the Indians, and hence "schooner"; refers to a Mr. Chute.
 
 
 
 
 INDEX
 
 
 ABBOT (Me.), 97.
 
 Aboljacarmegus Falls, 58, 82; meaning of the name, 157.
 
 Aboljacarmegus, Lake, 51.
 
 Aboljacknagesic Stream, 51, 58, 59, 62.
 
 Aitteon, Joe, 94, 99, 100, 210, 233, 313.
 
 ALLEGASH AND EAST BRANCH, THE, 174-327.
 
 Allegash Lakes, the, 78, 175, 250, 257.
 
 Allegash River, the, 40, 80, 161, 178, 233, 250, 254-257, 260, 270.
 
 Ambejijis Falls, 50; portage round, 52; 84.
 
 Ambejijis Lake, 45-47, 49, 50, 84, 291.
 
 Ambejijis Stream, 50.
 
 America, the newness of, 90.
 
 Apmoojenegamook Lake, 244; meaning of, 250; 260; a storm on, 263, 264;
 hard paddling on, 267.
 
 Aroostook (Me.) road, 3, 13, 14; river, 4; wagon, an, 14; valley, 23;
 sleds of the, 261.
 
 Asters, 97.
 
 Atlas, the General, 95.
 
 
 Bailey, Prof. J. W., 4.
 
 Bangor (Me.), 3, 4, 9, 12; passage to, 16; 23, 36, 38, 74, 86, 91,
 94-98; the deer that went a-shopping in, 154; 160, 161, 166, 167, 174,
 175; House, the, 177; 250, 251, 256, 257, 290, 307.
 
 Batteaux, 6, 35.
 
 Bears, abundance of, 235.
 
 Bed, a cedar-twig, 60; of arbor-vitae twigs, 265; the primitive, by all
 rivers, 317.
 
 Birds, in the wilderness, 118; about Moosehead Lake, 186; about Mud
 Pond Carry, 237; near Chamberlain Lake, 240, 241; on Heron Lake, 255;
 on East Branch, 309.
 
 Black flies, protection against, 236; 246.
 
 Blueberries, 66, 298.
 
 Boston (Mass.), countrified minds in towns about, 24.
 
 Bowlin Stream, 308.
 
 Burnt Land, the, 29, 77.
 
 "Burntibus," 319.
 
 
 Camp, loggers', 20; reading matter in a, 37, 38; on side of Ktaadn, a,
 68; the routine for making, 210-212; darkness about a, 303, 304.
 
 Canadian boat-song, 42; a blind, 234.
 
 Canoe, a birch, 106; used in third excursion to Maine Woods, 181;
 shipping water in a, 189; crossing lakes in a, 206; carrying a, 207,
 208; running rapids in a, 275-277, 279, 280.
 
 Carbuncle Mountain, 291.
 
 Caribou Lake, 216.
 
 Carry, Indian's method with canoe at a, 207, 208; a wet, 235-244;
 berries at each, 305, 306; race at a, 314, 315.
 
 Caucomgomoc Lake, meaning of the name, 156; 222, 223.
 
 Caucomgomoc Mountain, 233.
 
 Caucomgomoc Stream, 142, 147, 219, 229, 247, 297.
 
 Cedar tea, arbor-vitae, or, 60.
 
 Chaleur, Bay of, 178.
 
 Chamberlain Farm, the, 245, 264, 265.
 
 Chamberlain Lake, 101, 145, 161, 233, 237, 239, 240; Apmoojenegamook
 or, 244; dams about, 251; 262, 267.
 
 Checkerberry-Tea Camp, 301.
 
 CHESUNCOOK, 93-173.
 
 Chesuncook Deadwater, 217.
 
 Chesuncook Lake, 5, 11, 36, 73, 80, 86, 94, 104, 105, 117, 119, 136,
 137; meaning of the word, 156; 176; going to church on, 214; 234, 250,
 254.
 
 Chivin, silvery roaches, cousin-trout, or, 59; 312.
 
 Civilization and landscape, 171-173.
 
 Cloud, entering a, 70; factory, a, 70.
 
 Cold Stream Pond, 9.
 
 Colton's Map of Maine, 104, 308.
 
 Concord (Mass.), 1, 24, 76, 117; meaning of Indian name for, 157, 187;
 214, 268; the Assabet in, 278.
 
 Concord River, 229, 278, 299.
 
 Cranberries, mountain, 27; tree-, 147.
 
 Crosses in the wilderness, 50.
 
 Curing moose meat and hide, 149, 150, 208.
 
 
 De Bry's _Collectio Peregrinationum_, 149.
 
 Deep Cove, 45, 84.
 
 Deer, 154.
 
 Deer Island, 100, 183, 185, 188.
 
 "Die and be buried who will," verse, 90.
 
 Dippers, a brood of, 184.
 
 Dog, a troublesome, 177.
 
 Double Top Mountain, 49.
 
 Dream of fishing, a, 61.
 
 
 Eagle Lake, 101, 161; road, 261.
 
 EAST BRANCH, THE ALLEGASH AND, 174-327.
 
 East Branch, mouth of the, 19; 23, 161, 175, 176, 249, 256, 257, 268;
 Hunt's house on the, 269, 270, 273, 274, 288, 289, 298, 312, 315, 316.
 
 Eel River, 256.
 
 Elegy in a Country Churchyard, quoted, 19.
 
 Enfield (Me.), 9.
 
 Everlasting, the pearly, 97.
 
 
 Fenwick, Bishop, 323.
 
 Fire, a camp, 43, 115, 116.
 
 Fire-weed, 95, 282.
 
 Fishing, 58; the Caucomgomoc, 147.
 
 Five Islands, the, 11, 31, 87, 320.
 
 Fowler, Thomas, sheltered and joined by, 29-34.
 
 Fredericton (N. B.), 16.
 
 Freshet, the Great, 58.
 
 Frontier houses, 144.
 
 Fundy, Bay of, 254.
 
 
 Goldenrod, 97.
 
 Grand Falls of the Penobscot, 31; portage to avoid the, 32.
 
 Grand Lake, 268; Indian name for, 295; 297, 307.
 
 Grand Portage, the, 80.
 
 Greenbush (Me.), 324.
 
 Greenleaf's Map of Maine, 16.
 
 Greenville (Me.), 99, 101, 188, 194, 209.
 
 
 Hedgehog, shooting a, 130.
 
 Heron Lake, 254, 255.
 
 Hide, stretching a, 147, 148; sale of a moose-, 152.
 
 "Highlands" between the Penobscot and St. John, 238.
 
 Hilton's clearing, 105.
 
 History, reading, 87.
 
 Hobble-bush, wayfarer's tree or, 96.
 
 Hodge, assistant geologist, quoted, 29, 80.
 
 Holland, the King of, in his element, 239.
 
 Horns, uses for deer's, 97, 98.
 
 Hornstone, 194.
 
 Houlton (Me.), road, the, 3, 8, 9, 12, 13.
 
 Hunter, a "gentlemanly," 178, 179; Indian, with hides, 231; enviable
 life of a, 269, 270.
 
 Hunting, the degradation of, 132-134.
 
 
 Indian, extinction, 7; guides secured, 11; belief that river ran two
 ways, 35; words for some birds and animals, 108; camp, an, 146-159;
 language, 151; words for Maine waters, 155-157; houses at Oldtown,
 161; relics, 166; speech, 187; singing, 198; methods of guiding,
 204-206; manner of carrying canoes, 207, 208; inscription, an, 220;
 wardrobe, 249, 250; failure to understand avoidance of settlers, 258;
 medicines, 259; travel, 260, 261; as umpire, 267; skill in retracing
 steps, 277; relics and geographical names, 297; good manners, 300;
 devil (or cougar), the, 306; reticence and talkativeness, 318, 319;
 sickness, 319, 320; indifference, 326.
 
 Indian Island, 92, 174, 326, 327.
 
 Insect foes, 246.
 
 
 Jackson, Dr. Charles T., 4, 10; quoted regarding altitude of Ktaadn,
 72; on Moosehead Lake, 104; sketches in Reports of, 120; quoted,
 regarding hornstone on Mount Kineo, 194, 195.
 
 Joe Merry Lakes, the, 45.
 
 Joe Merry Mountain, 38, 51, 218.
 
 Josselyn, John, quoted, 156, 164.
 
 
 Katepskonegan Falls, 52; Carry, 81.
 
 Katepskonegan Lake, 50, 57.
 
 Katepskonegan Stream, 50.
 
 Kenduskeag, meaning of, 156.
 
 Kennebec River, the, 5, 40, 103, 183, 188, 233, 272.
 
 Kineo, Mount, 9-103, 156, 183, 186, 189; Indian tradition of origin
 of, 190; hornstone on, 194; 196, 203, 260, 299.
 
 Knife, an Indian, 156.
 
 KTAADN, 3-90.
 
 Ktaadn, Mt., 1; ascents of, 3-5; view of, 23; first view of, 36; 38;
 the flat summit of, 49; 58, 61; the ascent of, 63-76; altitude of, 72;
 96, 121, 136, 167, 215, 218, 249, 257, 260, 297, 312, 313.
 
 
 Lake country of New England, the, 40.
 
 Larch, extensive wood of, 231.
 
 Lescarbot quoted regarding abundance of fishes, 60.
 
 Lily, the yellow, 209, 291; roots, gathering, 309; roots, soup of,
 317.
 
 Lily Bay, 97, 99.
 
 Lincoln (Me.), 9, 85, 260, 319, 321, 322.
 
 Little Schoodic River, the, 23.
 
 Lobster Lake, 106.
 
 Lobster Pond, 210.
 
 Lobster Stream, 105, 210.
 
 Locusts, 254.
 
 Loggers, camps of, 20; a gang of, 38.
 
 Log house, a, 138.
 
 Logs, from woods to market, sending, 46-49.
 
 Loon, Indian word for, 182; cry of the, 247, 248.
 
 Lost, in the lakes, experienced woodmen, 41; in the woods, T.'s
 companion, 285-290.
 
 Lovewell's Fight, 245.
 
 
 Madawaska, the, 80.
 
 Maine, mountainous region of, 4; intelligence of backwoodsmen in, 24;
 view of, 73; the forest of, 88.
 
 Map of the Public Lands of Maine and Massachusetts, 17, 101, 104, 308.
 
 Marriage, a sign of, 232.
 
 Mars' Hill, 8.
 
 Matahumkeag, 107; meaning of the word, 157; 210.
 
 Matanancook River, the, 321.
 
 Mattaseunk, 18.
 
 Mattawamkeag, the, 12, 13, 16; meaning of the name, 157; 256.
 
 Mattawamkeag Point, 4, 11, 38, 88, 316, 319.
 
 Matungamook Lake, 295.
 
 McCauslin, or "Uncle George," weather-bound at farm of, 23-29; good
 services as guide by, 40-42.
 
 Michaux on lumbering, quoted, 48.
 
 Milford (Me.), 7.
 
 Millinocket Lake, 29, 41, 73, 260.
 
 Millinocket River, 29, 31, 86-88, 223.
 
 Ministers, with, on Ktaadn, 214.
 
 Mohawk Rips, the, 322.
 
 Mohawk traditions, 154.
 
 Molasses, Molly, 174.
 
 Molunkus (Me.), 13, 15.
 
 Monhegan Island, 94.
 
 Monson (Me.), 97, 98, 161.
 
 Moose, sign of, 58, 65, 108; carcass of a, 109; night expedition in
 vain hunt for, 110-115; shooting at and wounding a, 122-124; found,
 measured, and skinned, 125-130; Indian ideas about, 153; Indian
 tradition of evolution of, from the whale, 163; shooting and skinning
 a, on Second Lake, 292-295.
 
 Moose-flies, 246.
 
 Moosehead Lake, 45, 46, 73, 95, 97, 99; steamers and sail-boats on,
 100; 104, 108, 117, 145, 150, 152; Indian name for, 155; 159, 175,
 176, 181; extent of, 183; 184, 188, 193, 231, 252; dragon-fly on, 255;
 272, 299, 322.
 
 Moosehorn Deadwater, 109.
 
 Moosehorn Stream, the, 111, 113, 117, 118, 145, 216.
 
 Moose River, 189.
 
 Moose wardens, laxness of, 231.
 
 Moose-wood, 65; phosphorescent light in, 199.
 
 Morrison, John, head of a lumber-gang, 38.
 
 Mosquitoes, 246, 310, 311.
 
 Mountain-ash, 94.
 
 Mountain-tops, 71.
 
 Mud Pond, 233, 237, 238, 240, 243, 244.
 
 Murch Brook, 58, 64, 74.
 
 Musquash, calling a, 228.
 
 
 Nahant (Mass.), 170.
 
 Nature, the earth as made by, 77, 78; always young, 89, 90; the coarse
 use of, 133.
 
 Neptune, Louis, 10, 86; a call on Governor, 162, 163; the old chief,
 174.
 
 Nerlumskeechticook Mountain, 249, 260, 291, 297, 298, 301.
 
 Nicketow (Me.), 7, 19, 260, 316, 319.
 
 Night, in the woods, a, 43-45; thoughts by a stream at, 131; sounds in
 the woods at, 247, 248.
 
 Noliseemack, Shad Pond or, 29.
 
 North Twin Lake, 39, 80, 84.
 
 No-see-em, midge called, 245, 246.
 
 
 Oak Hall hand-bill and carry, 55, 83.
 
 Olamon Mountains, 323.
 
 Olamon River, the, and meaning of word, 324.
 
 Old Fort Hill, 166.
 
 Oldtown (Me.), 4, 6, 7, 9, 88, 142, 152, 153, 160, 161, 166, 167, 174,
 192, 202, 204, 222, 226, 259, 272, 274, 313, 320, 322, 323, 325-327.
 
 Orchis, the great round-leaved, 240.
 
 Orono (Me.), 92.
 
 Osier, red, Indian word for, 188.
 
 
 Paddling, a lesson in, 325, 326.
 
 Pamadumcook Lakes, the, 30, 45, 47, 84; meaning of the word, 156; 260.
 
 Passadumkeag River, the, 8, 9, 323, 324.
 
 Passamagamet Falls, 51; "warping up," 53; 84.
 
 Passamagamet Lake, 50, 51.
 
 Passamagamet Stream, 50, 51.
 
 Passamaquoddy River, the, 5, 91.
 
 Peaked Mountain, 254.
 
 Peetweets, Indian word for, 182.
 
 Penobscot County, 73.
 
 Penobscot Indians, sociability of, 321.
 
 Penobscot River, the, 3, 5, 6; Indian islands in the, 7; 17, 18, 24,
 29, 31, 32, 40, 41, 54, 77, 80, 87, 91, 95, 96, 103-105, 107, 108;
 between Moosehead and Chesuncook Lake, described, 117; 145, 148;
 meaning of the word, 157, 158, 161; 166, 176, 193, 202; West Branch
 of, 203; 208, 209, 233, 234, 238, 270-272; main boom of the, 329.
 
 Phosphorescent wood, 199-201.
 
 Pine, the white, 160; forests, 169; red, 268; Labrador and red, 296.
 
 Pine Stream, 122, 136, 216.
 
 Pine Stream Deadwater, 121.
 
 Pine Stream Falls, 136, 216.
 
 Piscataquis Falls, 322.
 
 Piscataquis River, the, 101; meaning of the word, 157; 179, 260, 327.
 
 Pitching a canoe, 105.
 
 Plants, abundance of strange, by Moosehead Lake, 103, 104, 188;
 observed on Mount Kineo, 195; about camp on the Caucomgomoc, 223;
 along the Umbazookskus, 229, 230; in cedar swamp by Chamberlain Lake,
 239-241; on East Branch, 302.
 
 Pockwockomus Falls, 56, 57, 83.
 
 Pockwockomus Lake, 50.
 
 Pokelogan, a, 56.
 
 Poling a batteau, 34, 35, 53, 54.
 
 Polis, Joe, 174; secured as guide, 175; puzzled about white men's law,
 192; travels and opinions of, 217, 218; calls upon Daniel Webster,
 279; as a boy, hard experience in traveling of, 308; good-by to, 327.
 
 Politicians, country, 8, 9.
 
 Pongoquahem Lake, 260.
 
 Portage, a rough, 33; round Ambejijis Falls, 51.
 
 Province man, a green, 16.
 
 
 Quakish Lake, 33, 36, 85.
 
 Quebec, meaning of the word, 157; 257.
 
 
 Ragmuff Stream, 118, 121, 145, 216.
 
 Rain, 33, 265, 266.
 
 Rapids, shooting, 81.
 
 Rasles, Father, Dictionary of the Abenaki language, 154.
 
 Red shirts, 31, 145.
 
 _Repaired_ road, a, 98.
 
 Restigouche River, the, 178.
 
 Ripogenus Portage, 80.
 
 Roaches, silvery, 59.
 
 Road, a supply, 212; recipe for making a, 244.
 
 Rock-Ebeeme, 20.
 
 Rock hills, singular, 282.
 
 Roots of spruce, as thread, 225, 226.
 
 Russell Stream, 104.
 
 
 St. Francis Indian, 146, 208.
 
 St. John River, the, 5, 40, 80, 101, 137, 176, 178, 203, 233, 238,
 251, 256, 257, 270, 271, 274.
 
 St. Lawrence River, the, 80, 233, 238.
 
 Salmon River, 19.
 
 Sandbar Island, 100, 188, 189.
 
 Schoodic Lake, 256.
 
 School question, the, among Indians, 323, 324.
 
 Seboois Lakes, 222, 261, 310.
 
 Second Lake, 274, 276, 281; beauty of, 290-292, 297.
 
 Shad Pond, or Noliseemack, 29, 30, 86.
 
 Shad-flies, ephemerae or, 255.
 
 Sheldrakes, Indian word for, 182; 254, 274, 276.
 
 Singing, 41, 42.
 
 Smith, Ansell, clearing and settlement of, 137-145.
 
 Snowberry, creeping, used as tea, 227.
 
 "Somebody & Co.," 14.
 
 Souneunk Mountains, the, 218, 260.
 
 South Twin Lake, 39.
 
 Sowadnehunk Deadwater, 58.
 
 Sowadnehunk River, the, 31, 79.
 
 Sparrow, the white-throated, 213, 249, 262.
 
 Spencer Bay Mountain, 183.
 
 Spencer Mountains, 108.
 
 "Spokelogan," 268.
 
 Spring, a cool, 280.
 
 Springer, J. S., Forest Life, quoted, 21, note; on lumbering, quoted,
 48, note; on the spruce tree, quoted, 75; about the digging of a
 canal, quoted, 270, 271.
 
 Spruce, the, 104; Indian words for black and white, 209; difference
 between black and white, 225.
 
 Spruce beer, a draught of, 30.
 
 Squaw Mountain, 183.
 
 Squirrel, the red, 241.
 
 Stars known to Indian, 247.
 
 Stillwater (Me.), 4, 167.
 
 Sugar Island, 101, 183, 194; near Olamon River, 324.
 
 Sunday, an Indian's, 201, 202, 214, 215, 223, 229.
 
 Sunkhaze, the, 8, 325, 326.
 
 "Swampers," 242.
 
 "Sweet cakes," 12.
 
 
 Tea, varieties of forest, 227; hemlock, 312.
 
 Telasinis Lake, 267.
 
 Telos Lake, 235, 245, 264; Indian name for, 267; 270, 274, 281, 290,
 299.
 
 Tent, description of, 196, 197.
 
 Thistle, the Canada, 96.
 
 Thoreau, Henry David, leaves Concord for Maine, 31 Aug. 1846, 3;
 starts "up river" from Bangor, 4; strikes into the wilderness, 15;
 starts for summit of Ktaadn, 61, 62; begins descent, 72; leaves Boston
 by steamer for Bangor, 13 Sept. 1853, 93; takes Moosehead Lake steamer
 for return home, 159; starts on third excursion to Maine Woods, 20
 July, 1857, 174; reaches farthest northern point, 259; lands at
 Oldtown, the journey finished, 326.
 
 Thrush, wood, Indian word for, 186.
 
 Thunder-storm, violent, 261, 262.
 
 Timber, 18; land, best in Maine, 235.
 
 Tomhegan Stream, 203.
 
 Traps, a find of steel, 302.
 
 Tree, fall of a, at night, 115; a dangerous, 221.
 
 Trees, varieties of, 22, 116; along the Penobscot, 107, 120; about
 camp on the Caucomgomoc, 223; along the Umbazookskus, 231; on island
 in Heron Lake, farthest northern point, 259; on East Branch, 302.
 
 Tree-tops, a walk over, 67; appearance of various, 121.
 
 Trout, true and cousin-, 59.
 
 Trout Stream, 235, 269; Indian name for, 295.
 
 
 Umbazookskus, the, 219, 222; Much Meadow River, 229; 230, 232.
 
 Umbazookskus Lake, 233, 238.
 
 Usnea lichen, Indian word for, 186.
 
 
 Veazie's mills, 166.
 
 Voyageurs, Canadian, 6.
 
 
 Waite's farm, 23.
 
 "Warping up," 57.
 
 Washing in a lake, 249.
 
 Wassataquoik River, the, 3, 312.
 
 Water-troughs, 97.
 
 Wayfarer's-tree or hobble-bush, 96.
 
 Webster, Daniel, Joe Polis's call upon, 279.
 
 Webster Pond, 270, 273; Indian name for, 273.
 
 Webster Stream, 161, 264; Indian name for, 273; 275, 289, 297, 299,
 300.
 
 West Branch, tramp up the, 17; 20, 31, 32, 291, 316.
 
 Whetstone Falls, 313.
 
 White Mountains, the, 4.
 
 Whitehead Island, 94.
 
 Woods, wetness of the, 22; characteristics of Maine, and uses of all,
 167-173; destruction of the, 252-254.
 
 Woodstock (N. B.), 256.
 
 
      The Riverside Press
      H. O. HOUGHTON AND COMPANY
      CAMBRIDGE
      MASSACHUSETTS
 
 
 
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 
 
 
 Transcriber's note:
 
   Inconsistent hyphenation and spelling in the original document have
   been preserved.  In particular, numerous spelling differences between
   the text and the Appendices were noted and retained.
 
   On page 19, "Elergy in a Country Churchyard" possibly should be "Elegy
   in a Country Churchyard."
 
   On page 240, "Rides lacustre" possibly should be "Ribes lacustre."
 
   On page 259, "margaraticea" possibly should be "margaritacea."
 
   On page 319, "bonhommie" possibly should be "bonhomie."
 
   On page 330, "New Hamphsire" was corrected to "New Hampshire."
 
   On page 333, "Virbirnum" possibly should be "Viburnum."
 
   On page 351, "Mt. Pemadene" possibly should be "Mt. Pemadenee."
 
   On page 354, "Allegash" possibly should be "Allagash."
 
   On page 355, a symbol, circle with up arrow, is denoted by [Symbol].
 

 
 E-text prepared by Melissa McDaniel and the Online Distributed
 Proofreading Team (http://www.pgdp.net) from page images generously made
 available by Internet Archive (http://archive.org)
 
 
 
 Note: Project Gutenberg also has an HTML version of this
       file which includes the original illustrations.
       See 42553-h.htm or 42553-h.zip:
       (http://www.gutenberg.org/files/42553/42553-h/42553-h.htm)
       or
       (http://www.gutenberg.org/files/42553/42553-h.zip)
 
 
       Images of the original pages are available through
       Internet Archive. See
       http://archive.org/details/writingsofhenryd05thorrich
 
 
 Transcriber's note:
 
       Text enclosed by underscores is in italics (_italics_).
 
 
 
 
 
 The Writings of Henry David Thoreau
 
 In Twenty Volumes
 
 VOLUME V
 
 Manuscript Edition
 Limited to Six Hundred Copies
 Number ----
 
 
 
   [Illustration: _Apple Blossoms (page 294)_]
 
   [Illustration: _Wild Apple Tree_]
 
 
 
 The Writings of Henry David Thoreau
 
 EXCURSIONS AND POEMS
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 Boston and New York
 Houghton Mifflin and Company
 MDCCCCVI
 
 Copyright 1865 and 1866 by Ticknor and Fields
 Copyright 1893 and 1906 by Houghton, Mifflin & Co.
 
 All rights reserved
 
 
 
 
 CONTENTS
 
 
      INTRODUCTORY NOTE                            xi
 
 
      EXCURSIONS
 
      A YANKEE IN CANADA
 
        I. CONCORD TO MONTREAL                      3
 
       II. QUEBEC AND MONTMORENCI                  20
 
      III. ST. ANNE                                40
 
       IV. THE WALLS OF QUEBEC                     69
 
        V. THE SCENERY OF QUEBEC; AND THE
           RIVER ST. LAWRENCE                      85
 
      NATURAL HISTORY OF MASSACHUSETTS            103
 
      A WALK TO WACHUSETT                         133
 
      THE LANDLORD                                153
 
      A WINTER WALK                               163
 
      THE SUCCESSION OF FOREST TREES              184
 
      WALKING                                     205
 
      AUTUMNAL TINTS                              249
 
      WILD APPLES                                 290
 
      NIGHT AND MOONLIGHT                         323
 
 
      TRANSLATIONS
 
      THE PROMETHEUS BOUND OF AESCHYLUS           337
 
      TRANSLATIONS FROM PINDAR                    375
 
 
      POEMS
 
      NATURE                                      395
 
      INSPIRATION                                 396
 
      THE AURORA OF GUIDO                         399
 
      TO THE MAIDEN IN THE EAST                   400
 
      TO MY BROTHER                               403
 
      GREECE                                      404
 
      THE FUNERAL BELL                            405
 
      THE MOON                                    406
 
      THE FALL OF THE LEAF                        407
 
      THE THAW                                    409
 
      A WINTER SCENE                              410
 
      TO A STRAY FOWL                             411
 
      POVERTY                                     412
 
      PILGRIMS                                    413
 
      THE DEPARTURE                               414
 
      INDEPENDENCE                                415
 
      DING DONG                                   417
 
      OMNIPRESENCE                                417
 
      INSPIRATION (QUATRAIN)                      418
 
      MISSION                                     418
 
      DELAY                                       418
 
      PRAYER                                      418
 
 
      A LIST OF THE POEMS AND BITS OF VERSE
      SCATTERED AMONG THOREAU'S PROSE
      WRITINGS EXCLUSIVE OF THE JOURNAL           420
 
      INDEX                                       423
 
 
 
 
 ILLUSTRATIONS
 
 
      APPLE BLOSSOMS, _Carbon photograph (page 294)_     _Frontispiece_
 
      WILD APPLE TREE,                                  _Colored plate_
 
      MONTREAL FROM MOUNT ROYAL                                      98
 
      MOUNT WACHUSETT FROM THE WAYLAND HILLS                        134
 
      THE OLD MARLBOROUGH ROAD                                      214
 
      FALLEN LEAVES                                                 270
 
      WILD APPLE TREE                                               300
 
 
 
 
 INTRODUCTORY NOTE
 
 
 The "Excursions" of the present volume follow the arrangement of the
 volume bearing that title in the Riverside Edition, which differed
 somewhat as to contents from the "Excursions" collected by Thoreau's
 sister after his death, and published in 1863 by Messrs. Ticknor &
 Fields. The Biographical Sketch by Emerson which prefaced the latter
 appears in the first volume of the present edition.
 
 "A Yankee in Canada," which here, as in the Riverside Edition, is made
 the first of the series of Excursions, was formerly published in a
 volume with "Anti-Slavery and Reform Papers." Thoreau made this
 excursion to Canada with his friend Ellery Channing, and sent his
 narrative to Mr. Greeley, who wrote him regarding it, March 18, 1852:
 "I shall get you some money for the articles you sent me, though not
 immediately. As to your long account of a Canadian tour, I don't know.
 It looks unmanageable. Can't you cut it into three or four, and omit
 all that relates to time? The cities are described to death, but I
 know you are at home with Nature, and that _she_ rarely and slowly
 changes. Break this up, if you can, and I will try to have it
 swallowed and digested." Thoreau appears to have taken Greeley's
 advice, and the narrative was divided into chapters. But after it had
 been begun in _Putnam's_ in January, 1853, where it was entitled
 "Excursion to Canada," the author and the editor, who appears from
 the following letter to have been Mr. G. W. Curtis, disagreed
 regarding the expediency of including certain passages, and Thoreau
 withdrew all after the third chapter. The letter is as follows:--
 
            NEW YORK, January 2, 1853.
 
       FRIEND THOREAU.... I am sorry you and C. cannot agree so as to
       have your whole MS. printed. It will be worth nothing
       elsewhere after having partly appeared in _Putnam's_. I think
       it is a mistake to conceal the authorship of the several
       articles, making them all (so to speak) _editorial_; but _if_
       that is done, don't you see that the elimination of very
       flagrant heresies (like your defiant Pantheism) becomes a
       necessity? If you had withdrawn your MS. on account of the
       abominable misprints in the first number, your ground would
       have been far more tenable. However, do what you will. Yours,
 
           HORACE GREELEY.
 
 "Natural History of Massachusetts" was contributed to _The Dial_,
 July, 1842, nominally as a review of some recent State reports. "A
 Walk to Wachusett" was printed in _The Boston Miscellany_, 1843. Mr.
 Sanborn, in his volume on Thoreau, prints a very interesting letter
 written by Margaret Fuller in 1841, in criticism of the verses which
 stand near the beginning of the paper, offered at that time for
 publication in _The Dial_. "The Landlord" was printed in _The
 Democratic Review_ for October, 1843. "A Winter Walk" appeared in _The
 Dial_ in the same month and year. Emerson in a letter to Thoreau,
 September 8, 1843, says: "I mean to send the 'Winter's Walk' to the
 printer to-morrow for _The Dial_. I had some hesitation about it,
 notwithstanding its faithful observation and its fine sketches of the
 pickerel-fisher and of the woodchopper, on account of _mannerism_, an
 old charge of mine,--as if, by attention, one could get the trick of
 the rhetoric; for example, to call a cold place sultry, a solitude
 public, a wilderness _domestic_ (a favorite word), and in the woods to
 insult over cities, armies, etc. By pretty free omissions, however, I
 have removed my principal objections." The address "The Succession of
 Forest Trees" was printed first in _The New York Tribune_, October 6,
 1860, and was perhaps the latest of his writings which Thoreau saw in
 print.
 
 After his death the interest which had already been growing was
 quickened by the successive publication in _The Atlantic Monthly_ of
 "Autumnal Tints" and "Wild Apples" in October and November, 1862, and
 "Night and Moonlight" November, 1863. The last named appeared just
 before the publication of the volume "Excursions," which collected the
 several papers.
 
 "May Days" and "Days and Nights in Concord," which were printed in the
 Riverside Edition, are now omitted as consisting merely of extracts
 from Thoreau's Journal and therefore superseded by the publication of
 the latter in its complete form.
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 A few of Thoreau's poems, taken from the "Week" and elsewhere, were
 added by Mr. Emerson to the volume entitled "Letters to Various
 Persons" which he brought out in 1865, but it was not till the volume
 of "Miscellanies" was issued in the Riverside Edition that the
 otherwise unpublished verse of his that had appeared in _The Dial_ was
 gathered into a single volume. Besides the _Dial_ contributions, the
 Riverside "Miscellanies" contained a few poems that first found
 publication in Mr. Sanborn's Life of Thoreau. But the collection was
 not intended to be complete.
 
 Many of Thoreau's poems, including his translations from the
 Anacreontics, are imbedded in the "Week," "Walden," and "Excursions,"
 and it seemed best not to reproduce them in another volume. In 1895,
 shortly after the publication of the Riverside Thoreau, Mr. Henry S.
 Salt and Mr. Frank B. Sanborn brought out a book entitled "Poems of
 Nature by Henry David Thoreau," in which were collected "perhaps two
 thirds of [the poems] which Thoreau preserved." "Many of them," says
 the Introduction to that volume, "were printed by him, in whole or in
 part, among his early contributions to Emerson's _Dial_, or in his own
 two volumes, the _Week_ and _Walden_.... Others were given to Mr.
 Sanborn for publication, by Sophia Thoreau, the year after her
 brother's death (several appeared in the _Boston Commonwealth_ in
 1863); or have been furnished from time to time by Mr. Blake, his
 literary executor." This volume contained a number of poems which had
 not before appeared in any of Thoreau's published books. Such poems
 are now added to those of the Riverside Edition. The present
 collection, however, no more than its predecessors pretends to
 completeness. It includes only those of Thoreau's poems which have
 been previously published and which are not contained in other volumes
 of this series. A list of the poems and scattered bits of verse
 printed in the other volumes will be found in an Appendix. The Journal
 also contains, especially in the early part, a number of heretofore
 unpublished poems which it seems best to retain in their original
 setting.
 
 
 
 
 EXCURSIONS
 
 
 
 
 A YANKEE IN CANADA
 
 
 New England is by some affirmed to be an island, bounded on the north
 with the River Canada (so called from Monsieur Cane).--JOSSELYN'S
 RARITIES.
 
 And still older, in Thomas Morton's "New English Canaan," published in
 1632, it is said, on page 97, "From this Lake [Erocoise] Northwards is
 derived the famous River of Canada, so named, of Monsier de Cane, a
 French Lord, who first planted a colony of French in America."
 
 
 
 
 A YANKEE IN CANADA
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER I
 
 CONCORD TO MONTREAL
 
 
 I fear that I have not got much to say about Canada, not having seen
 much; what I got by going to Canada was a cold. I left Concord,
 Massachusetts, Wednesday morning, September 25th, 1850, for Quebec.
 Fare, seven dollars there and back; distance from Boston, five hundred
 and ten miles; being obliged to leave Montreal on the return as soon
 as Friday, October 4th, or within ten days. I will not stop to tell
 the reader the names of my fellow-travelers; there were said to be
 fifteen hundred of them. I wished only to be set down in Canada, and
 take one honest walk there as I might in Concord woods of an
 afternoon.
 
 The country was new to me beyond Fitchburg. In Ashburnham and
 afterward, as we were whirled rapidly along, I noticed the woodbine
 (_Ampelopsis quinquefolia_), its leaves now changed, for the most part
 on dead trees, draping them like a red scarf. It was a little
 exciting, suggesting bloodshed, or at least a military life, like an
 epaulet or sash, as if it were dyed with the blood of the trees whose
 wounds it was inadequate to stanch. For now the bloody autumn was
 come, and an Indian warfare was waged through the forest. These
 military trees appeared very numerous, for our rapid progress
 connected those that were even some miles apart. Does the woodbine
 prefer the elm? The first view of Monadnock was obtained five or six
 miles this side of Fitzwilliam, but nearest and best at Troy and
 beyond. Then there were the Troy cuts and embankments. Keene Street
 strikes the traveler favorably, it is so wide, level, straight, and
 long. I have heard one of my relatives, who was born and bred there,
 say that you could see a chicken run across it a mile off. I have also
 been told that when this town was settled they laid out a street four
 rods wide, but at a subsequent meeting of the proprietors one rose and
 remarked, "We have plenty of land, why not make the street eight rods
 wide?" and so they voted that it should be eight rods wide, and the
 town is known far and near for its handsome street. It was a cheap way
 of securing comfort, as well as fame, and I wish that all new towns
 would take pattern from this. It is best to lay our plans widely in
 youth, for then land is cheap, and it is but too easy to contract our
 views afterward. Youths so laid out, with broad avenues and parks,
 that they may make handsome and liberal old men! Show me a youth whose
 mind is like some Washington city of magnificent distances, prepared
 for the most remotely successful and glorious life after all, when
 those spaces shall be built over and the idea of the founder be
 realized. I trust that every New England boy will begin by laying out
 a Keene Street through his head, eight rods wide. I know one such
 Washington city of a man, whose lots as yet are only surveyed and
 staked out, and, except a cluster of shanties here and there, only the
 Capitol stands there for all structures, and any day you may see from
 afar his princely idea borne coachwise along the spacious but yet
 empty avenues. Keene is built on a remarkably large and level
 interval, like the bed of a lake, and the surrounding hills, which are
 remote from its street, must afford some good walks. The scenery of
 mountain towns is commonly too much crowded. A town which is built on
 a plain of some extent, with an open horizon, and surrounded by hills
 at a distance, affords the best walks and views.
 
 As we travel northwest up the country, sugar maples, beeches, birches,
 hemlocks, spruce, butternuts, and ash trees prevail more and more. To
 the rapid traveler the number of elms in a town is the measure of its
 civility. One man in the cars has a bottle full of some liquor. The
 whole company smile whenever it is exhibited. I find no difficulty in
 containing myself. The Westmoreland country looked attractive. I heard
 a passenger giving the very obvious derivation of this name,
 Westmore-land, as if it were purely American, and he had made a
 discovery; but I thought of "my cousin Westmoreland" in England. Every
 one will remember the approach to Bellows Falls, under a high cliff
 which rises from the Connecticut. I was disappointed in the size of
 the river here; it appeared shrunk to a mere mountain-stream. The
 water was evidently very low. The rivers which we had crossed this
 forenoon possessed more of the character of mountain-streams than
 those in the vicinity of Concord, and I was surprised to see
 everywhere traces of recent freshets, which had carried away bridges
 and injured the railroad, though I had heard nothing of it. In
 Ludlow, Mount Holly, and beyond, there is interesting mountain
 scenery, not rugged and stupendous, but such as you could easily
 ramble over,--long, narrow, mountain vales through which to see the
 horizon. You are in the midst of the Green Mountains. A few more
 elevated blue peaks are seen from the neighborhood of Mount Holly;
 perhaps Killington Peak is one. Sometimes, as on the Western Railroad,
 you are whirled over mountainous embankments, from which the scared
 horses in the valleys appear diminished to hounds. All the hills
 blush; I think that autumn must be the best season to journey over
 even the _Green_ Mountains. You frequently exclaim to yourself, What
 _red_ maples! The sugar maple is not so red. You see some of the
 latter with rosy spots or cheeks only, blushing on one side like
 fruit, while all the rest of the tree is green, proving either some
 partiality in the light or frosts or some prematurity in particular
 branches. Tall and slender ash trees, whose foliage is turned to a
 dark mulberry color, are frequent. The butternut, which is a
 remarkably spreading tree, is turned completely yellow, thus proving
 its relation to the hickories. I was also struck by the bright yellow
 tints of the yellow birch. The sugar maple is remarkable for its clean
 ankle. The groves of these trees looked like vast forest sheds, their
 branches stopping short at a uniform height, four or five feet from
 the ground, like eaves, as if they had been trimmed by art, so that
 you could look under and through the whole grove with its leafy
 canopy, as under a tent whose curtain is raised.
 
 As you approach Lake Champlain you begin to see the New York
 mountains. The first view of the lake at Vergennes is impressive, but
 rather from association than from any peculiarity in the scenery. It
 lies there so small (not appearing in that proportion to the width of
 the State that it does on the map), but beautifully quiet, like a
 picture of the Lake of Lucerne on a music-box, where you trace the
 name of Lucerne among the foliage; far more ideal than ever it looked
 on the map. It does not say, "Here I am, Lake Champlain," as the
 conductor might for it, but having studied the geography thirty years,
 you crossed over a hill one afternoon and beheld it. But it is only a
 glimpse that you get here. At Burlington you rush to a wharf and go on
 board a steamboat, two hundred and thirty-two miles from Boston. We
 left Concord at twenty minutes before eight in the morning, and were
 in Burlington about six at night, but too late to see the lake. We got
 our first fair view of the lake at dawn, just before reaching
 Plattsburg, and saw blue ranges of mountains on either hand, in New
 York and in Vermont, the former especially grand. A few white
 schooners, like gulls, were seen in the distance, for it is not waste
 and solitary like a lake in Tartary; but it was such a view as leaves
 not much to be said; indeed, I have postponed Lake Champlain to
 another day.
 
 The oldest reference to these waters that I have yet seen is in the
 account of Cartier's discovery and exploration of the St. Lawrence in
 1535. Samuel Champlain actually discovered and paddled up the lake in
 July, 1609, eleven years before the settlement of Plymouth,
 accompanying a war-party of the Canadian Indians against the
 Iroquois. He describes the islands in it as not inhabited, although
 they are pleasant,--on account of the continual wars of the Indians,
 in consequence of which they withdraw from the rivers and lakes into
 the depths of the land, that they may not be surprised. "Continuing
 our course," says he, "in this lake, on the western side, viewing the
 country, I saw on the eastern side very high mountains, where there
 was snow on the summit. I inquired of the savages if those places were
 inhabited. They replied that they were, and that they were Iroquois,
 and that in those places there were beautiful valleys and plains
 fertile in corn, such as I have eaten in this country, with an
 infinity of other fruits." This is the earliest account of what is now
 Vermont.
 
 The number of French-Canadian gentlemen and ladies among the
 passengers, and the sound of the French language, advertised us by
 this time that we were being whirled towards some foreign vortex. And
 now we have left Rouse's Point, and entered the Sorel River, and
 passed the invisible barrier between the States and Canada. The shores
 of the Sorel, Richelieu, or St. John's River are flat and reedy, where
 I had expected something more rough and mountainous for a natural
 boundary between two nations. Yet I saw a difference at once, in the
 few huts, in the pirogues on the shore, and as it were, in the shore
 itself. This was an interesting scenery to me, and the very reeds or
 rushes in the shallow water and the tree-tops in the swamps have left
 a pleasing impression. We had still a distant view behind us of two or
 three blue mountains in Vermont and New York. About nine o'clock in
 the forenoon we reached St. John's, an old frontier post three hundred
 and six miles from Boston, and twenty-four from Montreal. We now
 discovered that we were in a foreign country, in a station-house of
 another nation. This building was a barn-like structure, looking as if
 it were the work of the villagers combined, like a log house in a new
 settlement. My attention was caught by the double advertisements in
 French and English fastened to its posts, by the formality of the
 English, and the covert or open reference to their queen and the
 British lion. No gentlemanly conductor appeared, none whom you would
 know to be the conductor by his dress and demeanor; but ere long we
 began to see here and there a solid, red-faced, burly-looking
 Englishman, a little pursy perhaps, who made us ashamed of ourselves
 and our thin and nervous countrymen,--a grandfatherly personage, at
 home in his greatcoat, who looked as if he might be a stage
 proprietor, certainly a railroad director, and knew, or had a right to
 know, when the cars did start. Then there were two or three
 pale-faced, black-eyed, loquacious Canadian-French gentlemen there,
 shrugging their shoulders; pitted as if they had all had the
 small-pox. In the meanwhile some soldiers, redcoats, belonging to the
 barracks near by, were turned out to be drilled. At every important
 point in our route the soldiers showed themselves ready for us; though
 they were evidently rather raw recruits here, they manoeuvred far
 better than our soldiers; yet, as usual, I heard some Yankees talk as
 if they were no great shakes, and they had seen the Acton Blues
 manoeuvre as well. The officers spoke sharply to them, and appeared
 to be doing their part thoroughly. I heard one suddenly coming to the
 rear, exclaim, "Michael Donouy, take his name!" though I could not see
 what the latter did or omitted to do. It was whispered that Michael
 Donouy would have to suffer for that. I heard some of our party
 discussing the possibility of their driving these troops off the field
 with their umbrellas. I thought that the Yankee, though undisciplined,
 had this advantage at least, that he especially is a man who,
 everywhere and under all circumstances, is fully resolved to better
 his condition essentially, and therefore he could afford to be beaten
 at first; while the virtue of the Irishman, and to a great extent the
 Englishman, consists in merely maintaining his ground or condition.
 The Canadians here, a rather poor-looking race, clad in gray homespun,
 which gave them the appearance of being covered with dust, were riding
 about in caleches and small one-horse carts called charettes. The
 Yankees assumed that all the riders were racing, or at least
 exhibiting the paces of their horses, and saluted them accordingly. We
 saw but little of the village here, for nobody could tell us when the
 cars would start; that was kept a profound secret, perhaps for
 political reasons; and therefore we were tied to our seats. The
 inhabitants of St. John's and vicinity are described by an English
 traveler as "singularly unprepossessing," and before completing his
 period he adds, "besides, they are generally very much disaffected to
 the British crown." I suspect that that "besides" should have been a
 because.
 
 At length, about noon, the cars began to roll towards La Prairie. The
 whole distance of fifteen miles was over a remarkably level country,
 resembling a Western prairie, with the mountains about Chambly visible
 in the northeast. This novel but monotonous scenery was exciting. At
 La Prairie we first took notice of the tinned roofs, but above all of
 the St. Lawrence, which looked like a lake; in fact it is considerably
 expanded here; it was nine miles across diagonally to Montreal. Mount
 Royal in the rear of the city, and the island of St. Helen's opposite
 to it, were now conspicuous. We could also see the Sault St. Louis
 about five miles up the river, and the Sault Norman still farther
 eastward. The former are described as the most considerable rapids in
 the St. Lawrence; but we could see merely a gleam of light there as
 from a cobweb in the sun. Soon the city of Montreal was discovered
 with its tin roofs shining afar. Their reflections fell on the eye
 like a clash of cymbals on the ear. Above all the church of Notre Dame
 was conspicuous, and anon the Bonsecours market-house, occupying a
 commanding position on the quay, in the rear of the shipping. This
 city makes the more favorable impression from being approached by
 water, and also being built of stone, a gray limestone found on the
 island. Here, after traveling directly inland the whole breadth of New
 England, we had struck upon a city's harbor,--it made on me the
 impression of a seaport,--to which ships of six hundred tons can
 ascend, and where vessels drawing fifteen feet lie close to the wharf,
 five hundred and forty miles from the Gulf, the St. Lawrence being
 here two miles wide. There was a great crowd assembled on the
 ferry-boat wharf and on the quay to receive the Yankees, and flags of
 all colors were streaming from the vessels to celebrate their arrival.
 When the gun was fired, the gentry hurrahed again and again, and then
 the Canadian caleche-drivers, who were most interested in the matter,
 and who, I perceived, were separated from the former by a fence,
 hurrahed their welcome; first the broadcloth, then the homespun.
 
 It was early in the afternoon when we stepped ashore. With a single
 companion, I soon found my way to the church of Notre Dame. I saw that
 it was of great size and signified something. It is said to be the
 largest ecclesiastical structure in North America, and can seat ten
 thousand. It is two hundred and fifty-five and a half feet long, and
 the groined ceiling is eighty feet above your head. The Catholic are
 the only churches which I have seen worth remembering, which are not
 almost wholly profane. I do not speak only of the rich and splendid
 like this, but of the humblest of them as well. Coming from the
 hurrahing mob and the rattling carriages, we pushed aside the listed
 door of this church, and found ourselves instantly in an atmosphere
 which might be sacred to thought and religion, if one had any. There
 sat one or two women who had stolen a moment from the concerns of the
 day, as they were passing; but, if there had been fifty people there,
 it would still have been the most solitary place imaginable. They did
 not look up at us, nor did one regard another. We walked softly down
 the broad aisle with our hats in our hands. Presently came in a troop
 of Canadians, in their homespun, who had come to the city in the boat
 with us, and one and all kneeled down in the aisle before the high
 altar to their devotions, somewhat awkwardly, as cattle prepare to lie
 down, and there we left them. As if you were to catch some farmer's
 sons from Marlborough, come to cattle-show, silently kneeling in
 Concord meeting-house some Wednesday! Would there not soon be a mob
 peeping in at the windows? It is true, these Roman Catholics, priests
 and all, impress me as a people who have fallen far behind the
 significance of their symbols. It is as if an ox had strayed into a
 church and were trying to bethink himself. Nevertheless, they are
 capable of reverence; but we Yankees are a people in whom this
 sentiment has nearly died out, and in this respect we cannot bethink
 ourselves even as oxen. I did not mind the pictures nor the candles,
 whether tallow or tin. Those of the former which I looked at appeared
 tawdry. It matters little to me whether the pictures are by a neophyte
 of the Algonquin or the Italian tribe. But I was impressed by the
 quiet, religious atmosphere of the place. It was a great cave in the
 midst of a city; and what were the altars and the tinsel but the
 sparkling stalactites, into which you entered in a moment, and where
 the still atmosphere and the sombre light disposed to serious and
 profitable thought? Such a cave at hand, which you can enter any day,
 is worth a thousand of our churches which are open only Sundays,
 hardly long enough for an airing, and then filled with a bustling
 congregation,--a church where the priest is the least part, where you
 do your own preaching, where the universe preaches to you and can be
 heard. I am not sure but this Catholic religion would be an admirable
 one if the priest were quite omitted. I think that I might go to
 church myself some Monday, if I lived in a city where there was such a
 one to go to. In Concord, to be sure, we do not need such. Our forests
 are such a church, far grander and more sacred. We dare not leave
 _our_ meeting-houses open for fear they would be profaned. Such a
 cave, such a shrine, in one of our groves, for instance, how long
 would it be respected? for what purposes would it be entered, by such
 baboons as we are? I think of its value not only to religion, but to
 philosophy and to poetry; besides a reading-room, to have a
 thinking-room in every city! Perchance the time will come when every
 house even will have not only its sleeping-rooms, and dining-room, and
 talking-room or parlor, but its thinking-room also, and the architects
 will put it into their plans. Let it be furnished and ornamented with
 whatever conduces to serious and creative thought. I should not object
 to the holy water, or any other simple symbol, if it were consecrated
 by the imagination of the worshipers.
 
 I heard that some Yankees bet that the candles were not wax, but tin.
 A European assured them that they were wax; but, inquiring of the
 sexton, he was surprised to learn that they were tin filled with oil.
 The church was too poor to afford wax. As for the Protestant churches,
 here or elsewhere, they did not interest me, for it is only as caves
 that churches interest me at all, and in that respect they were
 inferior.
 
 Montreal makes the impression of a larger city than you had expected
 to find, though you may have heard that it contains nearly sixty
 thousand inhabitants. In the newer parts, it appeared to be growing
 fast like a small New York, and to be considerably Americanized. The
 names of the squares reminded you of Paris,--the Champ de Mars, the
 Place d'Armes, and others,--and you felt as if a French revolution
 might break out any moment. Glimpses of Mount Royal rising behind the
 town, and the names of some streets in that direction, make one think
 of Edinburgh. That hill sets off this city wonderfully. I inquired at
 a principal bookstore for books published in Montreal. They said that
 there were none but school-books and the like; they got their books
 from the States. From time to time we met a priest in the streets, for
 they are distinguished by their dress, like the _civil_ police. Like
 clergymen generally, with or without the gown, they made on us the
 impression of effeminacy. We also met some Sisters of Charity, dressed
 in black, with Shaker-shaped black bonnets and crosses, and cadaverous
 faces, who looked as if they had almost cried their eyes out, their
 complexions parboiled with scalding tears; insulting the daylight by
 their presence, having taken an oath not to smile. By cadaverous I
 mean that their faces were like the faces of those who have been dead
 and buried for a year, and then untombed, with the life's grief upon
 them, and yet, for some unaccountable reason, the process of decay
 arrested.
 
      "Truth never fails her servant, sir, nor leaves him
      With the day's shame upon him."
 
 They waited demurely on the sidewalk while a truck laden with raisins
 was driven in at the seminary of St. Sulpice, never once lifting their
 eyes from the ground.
 
 The soldier here, as everywhere in Canada, appeared to be put forward,
 and by his best foot. They were in the proportion of the soldiers to
 the laborers in an African ant-hill. The inhabitants evidently rely on
 them in a great measure for music and entertainment. You would meet
 with them pacing back and forth before some guard-house or
 passage-way, guarding, regarding, and disregarding all kinds of law by
 turns, apparently for the sake of the discipline to themselves, and
 not because it was important to exclude anybody from entering that
 way. They reminded me of the men who are paid for piling up bricks and
 then throwing them down again. On every prominent ledge you could see
 England's hands holding the Canadas, and I judged by the redness of
 her knuckles that she would soon have to let go. In the rear of such a
 guard-house, in a large graveled square or parade ground, called the
 Champ de Mars, we saw a large body of soldiers being drilled, we being
 as yet the only spectators. But they did not appear to notice us any
 more than the devotees in the church, but were seemingly as
 indifferent to fewness of spectators as the phenomena of nature are,
 whatever they might have been thinking under their helmets of the
 Yankees that were to come. Each man wore white kid gloves. It was one
 of the most interesting sights which I saw in Canada. The problem
 appeared to be how to smooth down all individual protuberances or
 idiosyncrasies, and make a thousand men move as one man, animated by
 one central will; and there was some approach to success. They obeyed
 the signals of a commander who stood at a great distance, wand in
 hand; and the precision, and promptness, and harmony of their
 movements could not easily have been matched. The harmony was far more
 remarkable than that of any choir or band, and obtained, no doubt, at
 a greater cost. They made on me the impression, not of many
 individuals, but of one vast centipede of a man, good for all sorts of
 pulling down; and why not then for some kinds of building up? If men
 could combine thus earnestly, and patiently, and harmoniously to some
 really worthy end, what might they not accomplish? They now put their
 hands, and partially perchance their heads together, and the result is
 that they are the imperfect tools of an imperfect and tyrannical
 government. But if they could put their hands and heads and hearts and
 all together, such a cooperation and harmony would be the very end and
 success for which government now exists in vain,--a government, as it
 were, not only with tools, but stock to trade with.
 
 I was obliged to frame some sentences that sounded like French in
 order to deal with the market-women, who, for the most part, cannot
 speak English. According to the guidebook the relative population of
 this city stands nearly thus: two fifths are French-Canadian; nearly
 one fifth British-Canadian; one and a half fifths English, Irish, and
 Scotch; somewhat less than one half fifth Germans, United States
 people, and others. I saw nothing like pie for sale, and no good cake
 to put in my bundle, such as you can easily find in our towns, but
 plenty of fair-looking apples, for which Montreal Island is
 celebrated, and also pears cheaper and I thought better than ours, and
 peaches, which, though they were probably brought from the South, were
 as cheap as they commonly are with us. So imperative is the law of
 demand and supply that, as I have been told, the market of Montreal is
 sometimes supplied with green apples from the State of New York some
 weeks even before they are ripe in the latter place. I saw here the
 spruce wax which the Canadians chew, done up in little silvered
 papers, a penny a roll; also a small and shriveled fruit which they
 called _cerises_, mixed with many little stems, somewhat like raisins,
 but I soon returned what I had bought, finding them rather insipid,
 only putting a sample in my pocket. Since my return, I find on
 comparison that it is the fruit of the sweet viburnum (_Viburnum
 Lentago_), which with us rarely holds on till it is ripe.
 
 I stood on the deck of the steamer John Munn, late in the afternoon,
 when the second and third ferry-boats arrived from La Prairie,
 bringing the remainder of the Yankees. I never saw so many caleches,
 cabs, charettes, and similar vehicles collected before, and doubt if
 New York could easily furnish more. The handsome and substantial stone
 quay which stretches a mile along the riverside and protects the
 street from the ice was thronged with the citizens who had turned out
 on foot and in carriages to welcome or to behold the Yankees. It was
 interesting to see the caleche-drivers dash up and down the slope of
 the quay with their active little horses. They drive much faster than
 in our cities. I have been told that some of them come nine miles into
 the city every morning and return every night, without changing their
 horses during the day. In the midst of the crowd of carts, I observed
 one deep one loaded with sheep with their legs tied together, and
 their bodies piled one upon another, as if the driver had forgotten
 that they were sheep and not yet mutton,--a sight, I trust, peculiar
 to Canada, though I fear that it is not.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER II
 
 QUEBEC AND MONTMORENCI
 
 
 About six o'clock we started for Quebec, one hundred and eighty miles
 distant by the river; gliding past Longueuil and Boucherville on the
 right, and Pointe aux Trembles, "so called from having been originally
 covered with aspens," and Bout de l'Isle, or the end of the island, on
 the left. I repeat these names not merely for want of more substantial
 facts to record, but because they sounded singularly poetic to my
 ears. There certainly was no lie in them. They suggested that some
 simple, and, perchance, heroic human life might have transpired there.
 There is all the poetry in the world in a name. It is a poem which the
 mass of men hear and read. What is poetry in the common sense, but a
 string of such jingling names? I want nothing better than a good word.
 The name of a thing may easily be more than the thing itself to me.
 Inexpressibly beautiful appears the recognition by man of the least
 natural fact, and the allying his life to it. All the world
 reiterating this slender truth, that aspens once grew there; and the
 swift inference is that men were there to see them. And so it would be
 with the names of our native and neighboring villages, if we had not
 profaned them.
 
 The daylight now failed us, and we went below; but I endeavored to
 console myself for being obliged to make this voyage by night, by
 thinking that I did not lose a great deal, the shores being low and
 rather unattractive, and that the river itself was much the more
 interesting object. I heard something in the night about the boat
 being at William Henry, Three Rivers, and in the Richelieu Rapids, but
 I was still where I had been when I lost sight of Pointe aux Trembles.
 To hear a man who has been waked up at midnight in the cabin of a
 steamboat inquiring, "Waiter, where are we now?" is as if, at any
 moment of the earth's revolution round the sun, or of the system round
 its centre, one were to raise himself up and inquire of one of the
 deck hands, "Where are we now?"
 
 I went on deck at daybreak, when we were thirty or forty miles above
 Quebec. The banks were now higher and more interesting. There was an
 "uninterrupted succession of whitewashed cottages," on each side of
 the river. This is what every traveler tells. But it is not to be
 taken as an evidence of the populousness of the country in general,
 hardly even of the river-banks. They have presented a similar
 appearance for a hundred years. The Swedish traveler and naturalist
 Kalm, who descended the river in 1749, says, "It could really be
 called a village, beginning at Montreal and ending at Quebec, which is
 a distance of more than one hundred and eighty miles; for the
 farmhouses are never above five arpents, and sometimes but three
 asunder, a few places excepted." Even in 1684 Hontan said that the
 houses were not more than a gunshot apart at most. Ere long we passed
 Cape Rouge, eight miles above Quebec, the mouth of the Chaudiere on
 the opposite or south side; New Liverpool Cove with its lumber-rafts
 and some shipping; then Sillery and Wolfe's Cove and the Heights of
 Abraham on the north, with now a view of Cape Diamond, and the citadel
 in front. The approach to Quebec was very imposing. It was about six
 o'clock in the morning when we arrived. There is but a single street
 under the cliff on the south side of the cape, which was made by
 blasting the rocks and filling up the river. Three-story houses did
 not rise more than one fifth or one sixth the way up the nearly
 perpendicular rock, whose summit is three hundred and forty-five feet
 above the water. We saw, as we glided past, the sign on the side of
 the precipice, part way up, pointing to the spot where Montgomery was
 killed in 1775. Formerly it was the custom for those who went to
 Quebec for the first time to be ducked, or else pay a fine. Not even
 the Governor-General escaped. But we were too many to be ducked, even
 if the custom had not been abolished.[1]
 
 Here we were, in the harbor of Quebec, still three hundred and sixty
 miles from the mouth of the St. Lawrence, in a basin two miles across,
 where the greatest depth is twenty-eight fathoms, and though the water
 is fresh, the tide rises seventeen to twenty-four feet,--a harbor
 "large and deep enough," says a British traveler, "to hold the English
 navy." I may as well state that, in 1844, the county of Quebec
 contained about forty-five thousand inhabitants (the city and suburbs
 having about forty-three thousand),--about twenty-eight thousand being
 Canadians of French origin; eight thousand British; over seven
 thousand natives of Ireland; one thousand five hundred natives of
 England; the rest Scotch and others. Thirty-six thousand belong to the
 Church of Rome.
 
 Separating ourselves from the crowd, we walked up a narrow street,
 thence ascended by some wooden steps, called the Break-neck Stairs,
 into another steep, narrow, and zigzag street, blasted through the
 rock, which last led through a low, massive stone portal, called
 Prescott Gate, the principal thoroughfare into the Upper Town. This
 passage was defended by cannon, with a guard-house over it, a sentinel
 at his post, and other soldiers at hand ready to relieve him. I rubbed
 my eyes to be sure that I was in the Nineteenth Century, and was not
 entering one of those portals which sometimes adorn the frontispieces
 of new editions of old black-letter volumes. I thought it would be a
 good place to read Froissart's Chronicles. It was such a reminiscence
 of the Middle Ages as Scott's novels. Men apparently dwelt there for
 security! Peace be unto them! As if the inhabitants of New York were
 to go over to Castle William to live! What a place it must be to bring
 up children! Being safe through the gate, we naturally took the street
 which was steepest, and after a few turns found ourselves on the
 Durham Terrace, a wooden platform on the site of the old castle of St.
 Louis, still one hundred and fifteen feet below the summit of the
 citadel, overlooking the Lower Town, the wharf where we had landed,
 the harbor, the Isle of Orleans, and the river and surrounding country
 to a great distance. It was literally a _splendid_ view. We could see,
 six or seven miles distant, in the northeast, an indentation in the
 lofty shore of the northern channel, apparently on one side of the
 harbor, which marked the mouth of the Montmorenci, whose celebrated
 fall was only a few rods in the rear.
 
 At a shoe-shop, whither we were directed for this purpose, we got some
 of our American money changed into English. I found that American hard
 money would have answered as well, excepting cents, which fell very
 fast before their pennies, it taking two of the former to make one of
 the latter, and often the penny, which had cost us two cents, did us
 the service of one cent only. Moreover, our robust cents were
 compelled to meet on even terms a crew of vile half-penny tokens, and
 Bungtown coppers, which had more brass in their composition, and so
 perchance made their way in the world. Wishing to get into the
 citadel, we were directed to the Jesuits' Barracks,--a good part of
 the public buildings here are barracks,--to get a pass of the Town
 Major. We did not heed the sentries at the gate, nor did they us, and
 what under the sun they were placed there for, unless to hinder a free
 circulation of the air, was not apparent. There we saw soldiers eating
 their breakfasts in their mess-room, from bare wooden tables in camp
 fashion. We were continually meeting with soldiers in the streets,
 carrying funny little tin pails of all shapes, even semicircular, as
 if made to pack conveniently. I supposed that they contained their
 dinners,--so many slices of bread and butter to each, perchance.
 Sometimes they were carrying some kind of military chest on a sort of
 bier or hand-barrow, with a springy, undulating, military step, all
 passengers giving way to them, even the charette-drivers stopping for
 them to pass,--as if the battle were being lost from an inadequate
 supply of powder. There was a regiment of Highlanders, and, as I
 understood, of Royal Irish, in the city; and by this time there was a
 regiment of Yankees also. I had already observed, looking up even from
 the water, the head and shoulders of some General Poniatowsky, with an
 enormous cocked hat and gun, peering over the roof of a house, away up
 where the chimney caps commonly are with us, as it were a caricature
 of war and military awfulness; but I had not gone far up St. Louis
 Street before my riddle was solved, by the apparition of a real live
 Highlander under a cocked hat, and with his knees out, standing and
 marching sentinel on the ramparts, between St. Louis and St. John's
 Gate. (It must be a holy war that is waged there.) We stood close by
 without fear and looked at him. His legs were somewhat tanned, and the
 hair had begun to grow on them, as some of our wise men predict that
 it will in such cases, but I did not think they were remarkable in any
 respect. Notwithstanding all his warlike gear, when I inquired of him
 the way to the Plains of Abraham, he could not answer me without
 betraying some bashfulness through his broad Scotch. Soon after, we
 passed another of these creatures standing sentry at the St. Louis
 Gate, who let us go by without shooting us, or even demanding the
 countersign. We then began to go through the gate, which was so thick
 and tunnel-like as to remind me of those lines in Claudian's "Old Man
 of Verona," about the getting out of the gate being the greater part
 of a journey;--as you might imagine yourself crawling through an
 architectural vignette _at the end_ of a black-letter volume. We were
 then reminded that we had been in a fortress, from which we emerged by
 numerous zigzags in a ditch-like road, going a considerable distance
 to advance a few rods, where they could have shot us two or three
 times over, if their minds had been disposed as their guns were. The
 greatest, or rather the most prominent, part of this city was
 constructed with the design to offer the deadest resistance to leaden
 and iron missiles that might be cast against it. But it is a
 remarkable meteorological and psychological fact, that it is rarely
 known to rain lead with much violence, except on places so
 constructed. Keeping on about a mile we came to the Plains of
 Abraham,--for having got through with the Saints, we came next to the
 Patriarchs. Here the Highland regiment was being reviewed, while the
 band stood on one side and played--methinks it was _La Claire
 Fontaine_, the national air of the Canadian French. This is the site
 where a real battle once took place, to commemorate which they have
 had a sham fight here almost every day since. The Highlanders
 manoeuvred very well, and if the precision of their movements was
 less remarkable, they did not appear so stiffly erect as the English
 or Royal Irish, but had a more elastic and graceful gait, like a herd
 of their own red deer, or as if accustomed to stepping down the sides
 of mountains. But they made a sad impression on the whole, for it was
 obvious that all true manhood was in the process of being drilled out
 of them. I have no doubt that soldiers well drilled are, as a class,
 peculiarly destitute of originality and independence. The officers
 appeared like men dressed above their condition. It is impossible to
 give the soldier a good education without making him a deserter. His
 natural foe is the government that drills him. What would any
 philanthropist who felt an interest in these men's welfare naturally
 do, but first of all teach them so to respect themselves that they
 could not be hired for this work, whatever might be the consequences
 to this government or that?--not drill a few, but educate all. I
 observed one older man among them, gray as a wharf-rat, and supple as
 the devil, marching lock-step with the rest, who would have to pay for
 that elastic gait.
 
 We returned to the citadel along the heights, plucking such flowers as
 grew there. There was an abundance of succory still in blossom,
 broad-leaved goldenrod, buttercups, thorn bushes, Canada thistles, and
 ivy, on the very summit of Cape Diamond. I also found the bladder
 campion in the neighborhood. We there enjoyed an extensive view, which
 I will describe in another place. Our pass, which stated that all the
 rules were "to be strictly enforced," as if they were determined to
 keep up the semblance of reality to the last gasp, opened to us the
 Dalhousie Gate, and we were conducted over the citadel by a
 bare-legged Highlander in cocked hat and full regimentals. He told us
 that he had been here about three years, and had formerly been
 stationed at Gibraltar. As if his regiment, having perchance been
 nestled amid the rocks of Edinburgh Castle, must flit from rock to
 rock thenceforth over the earth's surface, like a bald eagle, or other
 bird of prey, from eyrie to eyrie. As we were going out, we met the
 Yankees coming in, in a body headed by a red-coated officer called the
 commandant, and escorted by many citizens, both English and
 French-Canadian. I therefore immediately fell into the procession, and
 went round the citadel again with more intelligent guides, carrying,
 as before, all my effects with me. Seeing that nobody walked with the
 red-coated commandant, I attached myself to him, and though I was not
 what is called well-dressed, he did not know whether to repel me or
 not, for I talked like one who was not aware of any deficiency in that
 respect. Probably there was not one among all the Yankees who went to
 Canada this time, who was not more splendidly dressed than I was. It
 would have been a poor story if I had not enjoyed some distinction. I
 had on my "bad-weather clothes," like Olaf Trygvesson the Northman,
 when he went to the Thing in England, where, by the way, he won his
 bride. As we stood by the thirty-two-pounder on the summit of Cape
 Diamond, which is fired three times a day, the commandant told me that
 it would carry to the Isle of Orleans, four miles distant, and that no
 hostile vessel could come round the island. I now saw the subterranean
 or rather "casemated" barracks of the soldiers, which I had not
 noticed before, though I might have walked over them. They had very
 narrow windows, serving as loop-holes for musketry, and small iron
 chimneys rising above the ground. There we saw the soldiers at home
 and in an undress, splitting wood,--I looked to see whether with
 swords or axes,--and in various ways endeavoring to realize that their
 nation was now at peace with this part of the world. A part of each
 regiment, chiefly officers, are allowed to marry. A grandfatherly,
 would-be witty Englishman could give a Yankee whom he was patronizing
 no reason for the bare knees of the Highlanders, other than oddity.
 The rock within the citadel is a little convex, so that shells falling
 on it would roll toward the circumference, where the barracks of the
 soldiers and officers are; it has been proposed, therefore, to make it
 slightly concave, so that they may roll into the centre, where they
 would be comparatively harmless; and it is estimated that to do this
 would cost twenty thousand pounds sterling. It may be well to remember
 this when I build my next house, and have the roof "all correct" for
 bomb-shells.
 
 At mid-afternoon we made haste down Sault-au-Matelot Street, towards
 the Falls of Montmorenci, about eight miles down the St. Lawrence, on
 the north side, leaving the further examination of Quebec till our
 return. On our way, we saw men in the streets sawing logs pit-fashion,
 and afterward, with a common wood-saw and horse, cutting the planks
 into squares for paving the streets. This looked very shiftless,
 especially in a country abounding in water-power, and reminded me that
 I was no longer in Yankeeland. I found, on inquiry, that the excuse
 for this was that labor was so cheap; and I thought, with some pain,
 how cheap men are here! I have since learned that the English traveler
 Warburton remarked, soon after landing at Quebec, that everything was
 cheap there but men. That must be the difference between going thither
 from New and from Old England. I had already observed the dogs
 harnessed to their little milk-carts, which contain a single large
 can, lying asleep in the gutters regardless of the horses, while they
 rested from their labors, at different stages of the ascent in the
 Upper Town. I was surprised at the regular and extensive use made of
 these animals for drawing not only milk but groceries, wood, etc. It
 reminded me that the dog commonly is not put to any use. Cats catch
 mice; but dogs only worry the cats. Kalm, a hundred years ago, saw
 sledges here for ladies to ride in, drawn by a pair of dogs. He says,
 "A middle-sized dog is sufficient to draw a single person, when the
 roads are good;" and he was told by old people that horses were very
 scarce in their youth, and almost all the land-carriage was then
 effected by dogs. They made me think of the Esquimaux, who, in fact,
 are the next people on the north. Charlevoix says that the first
 horses were introduced in 1665.
 
 We crossed Dorchester Bridge, over the St. Charles, the little river
 in which Cartier, the discoverer of the St. Lawrence, put his ships,
 and spent the winter of 1535, and found ourselves on an excellent
 macadamized road, called Le Chemin de Beauport. We had left Concord
 Wednesday morning, and we endeavored to realize that now, Friday
 morning, we were taking a walk in Canada, in the Seigniory of
 Beauport, a foreign country, which a few days before had seemed
 almost as far off as England and France. Instead of rambling to
 Flint's Pond or the Sudbury meadows, we found ourselves, after being a
 little detained in cars and steamboats,--after spending half a night
 at Burlington, and half a day at Montreal,--taking a walk down the
 bank of the St. Lawrence to the Falls of Montmorenci and elsewhere.
 Well, I thought to myself, here I am in a foreign country; let me have
 my eyes about me, and take it all in. It already looked and felt a
 good deal colder than it had in New England, as we might have expected
 it would. I realized fully that I was four degrees nearer the pole,
 and shuddered at the thought; and I wondered if it were possible that
 the peaches might not be all gone when I returned. It was an
 atmosphere that made me think of the fur-trade, which is so
 interesting a department in Canada, for I had for all head-covering a
 thin palm-leaf hat without lining, that cost twenty-five cents, and
 over my coat one of those unspeakably cheap, as well as thin, brown
 linen sacks of the Oak Hall pattern, which every summer appear all
 over New England, thick as the leaves upon the trees. It was a
 thoroughly Yankee costume, which some of my fellow-travelers wore in
 the cars to save their coats a dusting. I wore mine, at first, because
 it looked better than the coat it covered, and last, because two coats
 were warmer than one, though one was thin and dirty. I never wear my
 best coat on a journey, though perchance I could show a certificate to
 prove that I have a more costly one, at least, at home, if that were
 all that a gentleman required. It is not wise for a traveler to go
 dressed. I should no more think of it than of putting on a clean
 dicky and blacking my shoes to go a-fishing; as if you were going out
 to dine, when, in fact, the genuine traveler is going out to work
 hard, and fare harder,--to eat a crust by the wayside whenever he can
 get it. Honest traveling is about as dirty work as you can do, and a
 man needs a pair of overalls for it. As for blacking my shoes in such
 a case, I should as soon think of blacking my face. I carry a piece of
 tallow to preserve the leather and keep out the water; that's all; and
 many an officious shoe-black, who carried off my shoes when I was
 slumbering, mistaking me for a gentleman, has had occasion to repent
 it before he produced a gloss on them.
 
 My pack, in fact, was soon made, for I keep a short list of those
 articles which, from frequent experience, I have found indispensable
 to the foot-traveler; and, when I am about to start, I have only to
 consult that, to be sure that nothing is omitted, and, what is more
 important, nothing superfluous inserted. Most of my fellow-travelers
 carried carpet-bags, or valises. Sometimes one had two or three
 ponderous yellow valises in his clutch, at each hitch of the cars, as
 if we were going to have another rush for seats; and when there was a
 rush in earnest,--and there were not a few,--I would see my man in the
 crowd, with two or three affectionate lusty fellows along each side of
 his arm, between his shoulder and his valises, which last held them
 tight to his back, like the nut on the end of a screw. I could not
 help asking in my mind, What so great cause for showing Canada to
 those valises, when perhaps your very nieces had to stay at home for
 want of an escort? I should have liked to be present when the
 custom-house officer came aboard of him, and asked him to declare upon
 his honor if he had anything but wearing apparel in them. Even the
 elephant carries but a small trunk on his journeys. The perfection of
 traveling is to travel without baggage. After considerable reflection
 and experience, I have concluded that the best bag for the
 foot-traveler is made with a handkerchief, or, if he study
 appearances, a piece of stiff brown paper, well tied up, with a fresh
 piece within to put outside when the first is torn. That is good for
 both town and country, and none will know but you are carrying home
 the silk for a new gown for your wife, when it may be a dirty shirt. A
 bundle which you can carry literally under your arm, and which will
 shrink and swell with its contents. I never found the carpet-bag of
 equal capacity which was not a bundle of itself. We styled ourselves
 the Knights of the Umbrella and the Bundle; for, wherever we went,
 whether to Notre Dame or Mount Royal or the Champ de Mars, to the Town
 Major's or the Bishop's Palace, to the Citadel, with a bare-legged
 Highlander for our escort, or to the Plains of Abraham, to dinner or
 to bed, the umbrella and the bundle went with us; for we wished to be
 ready to digress at any moment. We made it our home nowhere in
 particular, but everywhere where our umbrella and bundle were. It
 would have been an amusing circumstance, if the mayor of one of those
 cities had politely asked us where we were staying. We could only have
 answered that we were staying with his honor for the time being. I was
 amused when, after our return, some green ones inquired if we found it
 easy to get accommodated; as if we went abroad to get accommodated,
 when we can get that at home.
 
 We met with many charettes, bringing wood and stone to the city. The
 most ordinary-looking horses traveled faster than ours, or perhaps
 they were ordinary-looking because, as I am told, the Canadians do not
 use the curry-comb. Moreover, it is said that on the approach of
 winter their horses acquire an increased quantity of hair, to protect
 them from the cold. If this be true, some of our horses would make you
 think winter were approaching, even in midsummer. We soon began to see
 women and girls at work in the fields, digging potatoes alone, or
 bundling up the grain which the men cut. They appeared in rude health,
 with a great deal of color in their cheeks, and, if their occupation
 had made them coarse, it impressed me as better in its effects than
 making shirts at fourpence apiece, or doing nothing at all--unless it
 be chewing slate-pencils--with still smaller results. They were much
 more agreeable objects, with their great broad-brimmed hats and
 flowing dresses, than the men and boys. We afterwards saw them doing
 various other kinds of work; indeed, I thought that we saw more women
 at work out of doors than men. On our return, we observed in this town
 a girl, with Indian boots nearly two feet high, taking the harness off
 a dog.
 
 The purity and transparency of the atmosphere were wonderful. When we
 had been walking an hour, we were surprised, on turning round, to see
 how near the city, with its glittering tin roofs, still looked. A
 village ten miles off did not appear to be more than three or four. I
 was convinced that you could see objects distinctly there much
 farther than here. It is true the villages are of a dazzling white,
 but the dazzle is to be referred, perhaps, to the transparency of the
 atmosphere as much as to the whitewash.
 
 We were now fairly in the village of Beauport, though there was still
 but one road. The houses stood close upon this, without any front
 yards, and at an angle with it, as if they had dropped down, being set
 with more reference to the road which the sun travels. It being about
 sundown, and the falls not far off, we began to look round for a
 lodging, for we preferred to put up at a private house, that we might
 see more of the inhabitants. We inquired first at the most
 promising-looking houses,--if, indeed, any were promising. When we
 knocked, they shouted some French word for come in, perhaps _Entrez_,
 and we asked for a lodging in English; but we found, unexpectedly,
 that they spoke French only. Then we went along and tried another
 house, being generally saluted by a rush of two or three little curs,
 which readily distinguished a foreigner, and which we were prepared
 now to hear bark in French. Our first question would be "Parlez-vous
 Anglais?" but the invariable answer was "Non, monsieur;" and we soon
 found that the inhabitants were exclusively French Canadians, and
 nobody spoke English at all, any more than in France; that, in fact,
 we were in a foreign country, where the inhabitants uttered not one
 familiar sound to us. Then we tried by turns to talk French with them,
 in which we succeeded sometimes pretty well, but for the most part
 pretty ill. "Pouvez-vous nous donner un lit cette nuit?" we would
 ask, and then they would answer with French volubility, so that we
 could catch only a word here and there. We could understand the women
 and children generally better than the men, and they us; and thus,
 after a while, we would learn that they had no more beds than they
 used.
 
 So we were compelled to inquire, "Y a-t-il une maison publique ici?"
 (_auberge_ we should have said, perhaps, for they seemed never to have
 heard of the other), and they answered at length that there was no
 tavern, unless we could get lodgings at the mill, _le moulin_, which
 we had passed; or they would direct us to a grocery, and almost every
 house had a small grocery at one end of it. We called on the public
 notary or village lawyer, but he had no more beds nor English than the
 rest. At one house there was so good a misunderstanding at once
 established through the politeness of all parties, that we were
 encouraged to walk in and sit down, and ask for a glass of water; and
 having drank their water, we thought it was as good as to have tasted
 their salt. When our host and his wife spoke of their poor
 accommodations, meaning for themselves, we assured them that they were
 good enough, for we thought that they were only apologizing for the
 poorness of the accommodations they were about to offer us, and we did
 not discover our mistake till they took us up a ladder into a loft,
 and showed to our eyes what they had been laboring in vain to
 communicate to our brains through our ears, that they had but that one
 apartment with its few beds for the whole family. We made our _adieus_
 forthwith, and with gravity, perceiving the literal signification of
 that word. We were finally taken in at a sort of public house, whose
 master worked for Patterson, the proprietor of the extensive sawmills
 driven by a portion of the Montmorenci stolen from the fall, whose
 roar we now heard. We here talked, or murdered, French all the
 evening, with the master of the house and his family, and probably had
 a more amusing time than if we had completely understood one another.
 At length they showed us to a bed in their best chamber, very high to
 get into, with a low wooden rail to it. It had no cotton sheets, but
 coarse, home-made, dark-colored linen ones. Afterward, we had to do
 with sheets still coarser than these, and nearly the color of our
 blankets. There was a large open buffet loaded with crockery in one
 corner of the room, as if to display their wealth to travelers, and
 pictures of Scripture scenes, French, Italian, and Spanish, hung
 around. Our hostess came back directly to inquire if we would have
 brandy for breakfast. The next morning, when I asked their names, she
 took down the temperance pledges of herself and husband and children,
 which were hanging against the wall. They were Jean Baptiste Binet and
 his wife, Genevieve Binet. Jean Baptiste is the sobriquet of the
 French Canadians.
 
 After breakfast we proceeded to the fall, which was within half a
 mile, and at this distance its rustling sound, like the wind among the
 leaves, filled all the air. We were disappointed to find that we were
 in some measure shut out from the west side of the fall by the private
 grounds and fences of Patterson, who appropriates not only a part of
 the water for his mill, but a still larger part of the prospect, so
 that we were obliged to trespass. This gentleman's mansion-house and
 grounds were formerly occupied by the Duke of Kent, father to Queen
 Victoria. It appeared to me in bad taste for an individual, though he
 were the father of Queen Victoria, to obtrude himself with his land
 titles, or at least his fences, on so remarkable a natural phenomenon,
 which should, in every sense, belong to mankind. Some falls should
 even be kept sacred from the intrusion of mills and factories, as
 water privileges in another than the millwright's sense. This small
 river falls perpendicularly nearly two hundred and fifty feet at one
 pitch. The St. Lawrence falls only one hundred and sixty-four feet at
 Niagara. It is a very simple and noble fall, and leaves nothing to be
 desired; but the most that I could say of it would only have the force
 of one other testimony to assure the reader that it is there. We
 looked directly down on it from the point of a projecting rock, and
 saw far below us, on a low promontory, the grass kept fresh and green
 by the perpetual drizzle, looking like moss. The rock is a kind of
 slate, in the crevices of which grew ferns and goldenrods. The
 prevailing trees on the shores were spruce and arbor-vitae,--the latter
 very large and now full of fruit,--also aspens, alders, and the
 mountain-ash with its berries. Every emigrant who arrives in this
 country by way of the St. Lawrence, as he opens a point of the Isle of
 Orleans, sees the Montmorenci tumbling into the Great River thus
 magnificently in a vast white sheet, making its contribution with
 emphasis. Roberval's pilot, Jean Alphonse, saw this fall thus, and
 described it, in 1542. It is a splendid introduction to the scenery of
 Quebec. Instead of an artificial fountain in its square, Quebec has
 this magnificent natural waterfall, to adorn one side of its harbor.
 Within the mouth of the chasm below, which can be entered only at
 ebb-tide, we had a grand view at once of Quebec and of the fall. Kalm
 says that the noise of the fall is sometimes heard at Quebec, about
 eight miles distant, and is a sign of a northeast wind. The side of
 this chasm, of soft and crumbling slate too steep to climb, was among
 the memorable features of the scene. In the winter of 1829 the frozen
 spray of the fall, descending on the ice of the St. Lawrence, made a
 hill one hundred and twenty-six feet high. It is an annual phenomenon
 which some think may help explain the formation of glaciers.
 
 In the vicinity of the fall we began to notice what looked like our
 red-fruited thorn bushes, grown to the size of ordinary apple trees,
 very common, and full of large red or yellow fruit, which the
 inhabitants called _pommettes_, but I did not learn that they were put
 to any use.
 
 FOOTNOTE:
 
 [1] Hierosme Lalemant says in 1648, in his Relation, he being
 Superior: "All those who come to New France know well enough the
 mountain of Notre Dame, because the pilots and sailors, being arrived
 at that part of the Great River which is opposite to those high
 mountains, baptize ordinarily for sport the new passengers, if they do
 not turn aside by some present the inundation of this baptism which
 one makes flow plentifully on their heads."
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER III
 
 ST. ANNE
 
 
 By the middle of the forenoon, though it was a rainy day, we were once
 more on our way down the north bank of the St. Lawrence, in a
 northeasterly direction, toward the Falls of St. Anne, which are about
 thirty miles from Quebec. The settled, more level, and fertile portion
 of Canada East may be described rudely as a triangle, with its apex
 slanting toward the northeast, about one hundred miles wide at its
 base, and from two to three or even four hundred miles long, if you
 reckon its narrow northeastern extremity; it being the immediate
 valley of the St. Lawrence and its tributaries, rising by a single or
 by successive terraces toward the mountains on either hand. Though the
 words Canada East on the map stretch over many rivers and lakes and
 unexplored wildernesses, the actual Canada, which might be the colored
 portion of the map, is but a little clearing on the banks of the
 river, which one of those syllables would more than cover. The banks
 of the St. Lawrence are rather low from Montreal to the Richelieu
 Rapids, about forty miles above Quebec. Thence they rise gradually to
 Cape Diamond, or Quebec. Where we now were, eight miles northeast of
 Quebec, the mountains which form the northern side of this triangle
 were only five or six miles distant from the river, gradually
 departing farther and farther from it, on the west, till they reach
 the Ottawa, and making haste to meet it on the east, at Cape
 Tourmente, now in plain sight about twenty miles distant. So that we
 were traveling in a very narrow and sharp triangle between the
 mountains and the river, tilted up toward the mountains on the north,
 never losing sight of our great fellow-traveler on our right.
 According to Bouchette's Topographical Description of the Canadas, we
 were in the Seigniory of the Cote de Beaupre, in the county of
 Montmorenci, and the district of Quebec,--in that part of Canada which
 was the first to be settled, and where the face of the country and the
 population have undergone the least change from the beginning, where
 the influence of the States and of Europe is least felt, and the
 inhabitants see little or nothing of the world over the walls of
 Quebec. This Seigniory was granted in 1636, and is now the property of
 the Seminary of Quebec. It is the most mountainous one in the
 province. There are some half a dozen parishes in it, each containing
 a church, parsonage-house, gristmill, and several sawmills. We were
 now in the most westerly parish, called Ange Gardien, or the Guardian
 Angel, which is bounded on the west by the Montmorenci. The north bank
 of the St. Lawrence here is formed on a grand scale. It slopes gently,
 either directly from the shore or from the edge of an interval, till,
 at the distance of about a mile, it attains the height of four or five
 hundred feet. The single road runs along the side of the slope two or
 three hundred feet above the river at first, and from a quarter of a
 mile to a mile distant from it, and affords fine views of the north
 channel, which is about a mile wide, and of the beautiful Isle of
 Orleans, about twenty miles long by five wide, where grow the best
 apples and plums in the Quebec district.
 
 Though there was but this single road, it was a continuous village for
 as far as we walked this day and the next, or about thirty miles down
 the river, the houses being as near together all the way as in the
 middle of one of our smallest straggling country villages, and we
 could never tell by their number when we were on the skirts of a
 parish, for the road never ran through the fields or woods. We were
 told that it was just six miles from one parish church to another. I
 thought that we saw every house in Ange Gardien. Therefore, as it was
 a muddy day, we never got out of the mud, nor out of the village,
 unless we got over the fence; then, indeed, if it was on the north
 side, we were out of the civilized world. There were sometimes a few
 more houses near the church, it is true, but we had only to go a
 quarter of a mile from the road, to the top of the bank, to find
 ourselves on the verge of the uninhabited, and, for the most part,
 unexplored wilderness stretching toward Hudson's Bay. The farms
 accordingly were extremely long and narrow, each having a frontage on
 the river. Bouchette accounts for this peculiar manner of laying out a
 village by referring to "the social character of the Canadian peasant,
 who is singularly fond of neighborhood," also to the advantage arising
 from a concentration of strength in Indian times. Each farm, called
 _terre_, he says, is, in nine cases out of ten, three arpents wide by
 thirty deep, that is, very nearly thirty-five by three hundred and
 forty-nine of our rods; sometimes one half arpent by thirty, or one to
 sixty; sometimes, in fact, a few yards by half a mile. Of course it
 costs more for fences. A remarkable difference between the Canadian
 and the New England character appears from the fact that, in 1745, the
 French government were obliged to pass a law forbidding the farmers or
 _censitaires_ building on land less than one and a half arpents front
 by thirty or forty deep, under a certain penalty, in order to compel
 emigration, and bring the seigneur's estates all under cultivation;
 and it is thought that they have now less reluctance to leave the
 paternal roof than formerly, "removing beyond the sight of the parish
 spire, or the sound of the parish bell." But I find that in the
 previous or seventeenth century, the complaint, often renewed, was of
 a totally opposite character, namely, that the inhabitants dispersed
 and exposed themselves to the Iroquois. Accordingly, about 1664, the
 king was obliged to order that "they should make no more clearings
 except one next to another, and that they should reduce their parishes
 to the form of the parishes in France as much as possible." The
 Canadians of those days, at least, possessed a roving spirit of
 adventure which carried them further, in exposure to hardship and
 danger, than ever the New England colonist went, and led them, though
 not to clear and colonize the wilderness, yet to range over it as
 _coureurs de bois_, or runners of the woods, or, as Hontan prefers to
 call them, _coureurs de risques_, runners of risks; to say nothing of
 their enterprising priesthood; and Charlevoix thinks that if the
 authorities had taken the right steps to prevent the youth from
 ranging the woods (_de courir les bois_), they would have had an
 excellent militia to fight the Indians and English.
 
 The road in this clayey-looking soil was exceedingly muddy in
 consequence of the night's rain. We met an old woman directing her
 dog, which was harnessed to a little cart, to the least muddy part of
 it. It was a beggarly sight. But harnessed to the cart as he was, we
 heard him barking after we had passed, though we looked anywhere but
 to the cart to see where the dog was that barked. The houses commonly
 fronted the south, whatever angle they might make with the road; and
 frequently they had no door nor cheerful window on the road side. Half
 the time they stood fifteen to forty rods from the road, and there was
 no very obvious passage to them, so that you would suppose that there
 must be another road running by them. They were of stone, rather
 coarsely mortared, but neatly whitewashed, almost invariably one story
 high and long in proportion to their height, with a shingled roof, the
 shingles being pointed, for ornament, at the eaves, like the pickets
 of a fence, and also one row halfway up the roof. The gables sometimes
 projected a foot or two at the ridge-pole only. Yet they were very
 humble and unpretending dwellings. They commonly had the date of their
 erection on them. The windows opened in the middle, like blinds, and
 were frequently provided with solid shutters. Sometimes, when we
 walked along the back side of a house which stood near the road, we
 observed stout stakes leaning against it, by which the shutters, now
 pushed half open, were fastened at night; within, the houses were
 neatly ceiled with wood not painted. The oven was commonly out of
 doors, built of stone and mortar, frequently on a raised platform of
 planks. The cellar was often on the opposite side of the road, in
 front of or behind the houses, looking like an ice-house with us, with
 a lattice door for summer. The very few mechanics whom we met had an
 old-Bettyish look, in their aprons and _bonnets rouges_ like fools'
 caps. The men wore commonly the same _bonnet rouge_, or red woolen or
 worsted cap, or sometimes blue or gray, looking to us as if they had
 got up with their night-caps on, and, in fact, I afterwards found that
 they had. Their clothes were of the cloth of the country, _etoffe du
 pays_, gray or some other plain color. The women looked stout, with
 gowns that stood out stiffly, also, for the most part, apparently of
 some home-made stuff. We also saw some specimens of the more
 characteristic winter dress of the Canadian, and I have since
 frequently detected him in New England by his coarse gray homespun
 capote and picturesque red sash, and his well-furred cap, made to
 protect his ears against the severity of his climate.
 
 It drizzled all day, so that the roads did not improve. We began now
 to meet with wooden crosses frequently, by the roadside, about a dozen
 feet high, often old and toppling down, sometimes standing in a square
 wooden platform, sometimes in a pile of stones, with a little niche
 containing a picture of the Virgin and Child, or of Christ alone,
 sometimes with a string of beads, and covered with a piece of glass to
 keep out the rain, with the words, _Pour la Vierge_, or INRI, on them.
 Frequently, on the cross-bar, there would be quite a collection of
 symbolical knickknacks, looking like an Italian's board; the
 representation in wood of a hand, a hammer, spikes, pincers, a flask
 of vinegar, a ladder, etc., the whole, perchance, surmounted by a
 weathercock; but I could not look at an honest weathercock in this
 walk without mistrusting that there was some covert reference in it to
 St. Peter. From time to time we passed a little one-story chapel-like
 building, with a tin-roofed spire, a shrine, perhaps it would be
 called, close to the path-side, with a lattice door, through which we
 could see an altar, and pictures about the walls; equally open,
 through rain and shine, though there was no getting into it. At these
 places the inhabitants kneeled and perhaps breathed a short prayer. We
 saw one schoolhouse in our walk, and listened to the sounds which
 issued from it; but it appeared like a place where the process, not of
 enlightening, but of obfuscating the mind was going on, and the pupils
 received only so much light as could penetrate the shadow of the
 Catholic Church. The churches were very picturesque, and their
 interior much more showy than the dwelling-houses promised. They were
 of stone, for it was ordered, in 1699, that that should be their
 material. They had tinned spires, and quaint ornaments. That of Ange
 Gardien had a dial on it, with the Middle Age Roman numerals on its
 face, and some images in niches on the outside. Probably its
 counterpart has existed in Normandy for a thousand years. At the
 church of Chateau Richer, which is the next parish to Ange Gardien, we
 read, looking over the wall, the inscriptions in the adjacent
 churchyard, which began with _Ici git_ or _Repose_, and one over a boy
 contained _Priez pour lui_. This answered as well as Pere la Chaise.
 We knocked at the door of the cure's house here, when a sleek,
 friar-like personage, in his sacerdotal robe, appeared. To our
 "Parlez-vous Anglais?" even he answered, "Non, monsieur;" but at last
 we made him understand what we wanted. It was to find the ruins of the
 old _chateau_. "Ah! oui! oui!" he exclaimed, and, donning his coat,
 hastened forth, and conducted us to a small heap of rubbish which we
 had already examined. He said that fifteen years before, it was _plus
 considerable_. Seeing at that moment three little red birds fly out of
 a crevice in the ruins, up into an arbor-vitae tree which grew out of
 them, I asked him their names, in such French as I could muster, but
 he neither understood me nor ornithology; he only inquired where we
 had _appris a parler Francais_; we told him, _dans les Etats-Unis_;
 and so we bowed him into his house again. I was surprised to find a
 man wearing a black coat, and with apparently no work to do, even in
 that part of the world.
 
 The universal salutation from the inhabitants whom we met was _bon
 jour_, at the same time touching the hat; with _bon jour_, and
 touching your hat, you may go smoothly through all Canada East. A
 little boy, meeting us, would remark, "Bon jour, monsieur; le chemin
 est mauvais" (Good morning, sir; it is bad walking). Sir Francis Head
 says that the immigrant is forward to "appreciate the happiness of
 living in a land in which the old country's servile custom of touching
 the hat does not exist," but he was thinking of Canada West, of
 course. It would, indeed, be a serious bore to be obliged to touch
 your hat several times a day. A Yankee has not leisure for it.
 
 We saw peas, and even beans, collected into heaps in the fields. The
 former are an important crop here, and, I suppose, are not so much
 infested by the weevil as with us. There were plenty of apples, very
 fair and sound, by the roadside, but they were so small as to suggest
 the origin of the apple in the crab. There was also a small, red fruit
 which they called _snells_, and another, also red and very acid, whose
 name a little boy wrote for me, "_pinbena_." It is probably the same
 with, or similar to, the _pembina_ of the voyageurs, a species of
 viburnum, which, according to Richardson, has given its name to many
 of the rivers of Rupert's Land. The forest trees were spruce,
 arbor-vitae, firs, birches, beeches, two or three kinds of maple,
 basswood, wild cherry, aspens, etc., but no pitch pines (_Pinus
 rigida_). I saw very few, if any, trees which had been set out for
 shade or ornament. The water was commonly running streams or springs
 in the bank by the roadside, and was excellent. The parishes are
 commonly separated by a stream, and frequently the farms. I noticed
 that the fields were furrowed or thrown into beds seven or eight feet
 wide to dry the soil.
 
 At the Riviere du Sault a la Puce, which, I suppose, means the River
 of the Fall of the Flea, was advertised in English, as the sportsmen
 are English, "The best Snipe-shooting grounds," over the door of a
 small public house. These words being English affected me as if I had
 been absent now ten years from my country, and for so long had not
 heard the sound of my native language, and every one of them was as
 interesting to me as if I had been a snipe-shooter, and they had been
 snipes. The prunella, or self-heal, in the grass here, was an old
 acquaintance. We frequently saw the inhabitants washing or cooking
 for their pigs, and in one place hackling flax by the roadside. It was
 pleasant to see these usually domestic operations carried on out of
 doors, even in that cold country.
 
 At twilight we reached a bridge over a little river, the boundary
 between Chateau Richer and St. Anne, _le premier pont de Ste. Anne_,
 and at dark the church of _La Bonne Ste. Anne_. Formerly vessels from
 France, when they came in sight of this church, gave "a general
 discharge of their artillery," as a sign of joy that they had escaped
 all the dangers of the river. Though all the while we had grand views
 of the adjacent country far up and down the river, and, for the most
 part, when we turned about, of Quebec in the horizon behind us, and we
 never beheld it without new surprise and admiration; yet, throughout
 our walk, the Great River of Canada on our right hand was the main
 feature in the landscape, and this expands so rapidly below the Isle
 of Orleans, and creates such a breadth of level horizon above its
 waters in that direction, that, looking down the river as we
 approached the extremity of that island, the St. Lawrence seemed to be
 opening into the ocean, though we were still about three hundred and
 twenty-five miles from what can be called its mouth.[2]
 
 When we inquired here for a _maison publique_ we were directed
 apparently to that private house where we were most likely to find
 entertainment. There were no guide-boards where we walked, because
 there was but one road; there were no shops nor signs, because there
 were no artisans to speak of, and the people raised their own
 provisions; and there were no taverns, because there were no
 travelers. We here bespoke lodging and breakfast. They had, as usual,
 a large, old-fashioned, two-storied box stove in the middle of the
 room, out of which, in due time, there was sure to be forthcoming a
 supper, breakfast, or dinner. The lower half held the fire, the upper
 the hot air, and as it was a cool Canadian evening, this was a
 comforting sight to us. Being four or five feet high it warmed the
 whole person as you stood by it. The stove was plainly a very
 important article of furniture in Canada, and was not set aside during
 the summer. Its size, and the respect which was paid to it, told of
 the severe winters which it had seen and prevailed over. The master of
 the house, in his long-pointed red woolen cap, had a thoroughly
 antique physiognomy of the old Norman stamp. He might have come over
 with Jacques Cartier. His was the hardest French to understand of any
 we had heard yet, for there was a great difference between one speaker
 and another, and this man talked with a pipe in his mouth beside,--a
 kind of tobacco French. I asked him what he called his dog. He shouted
 _Brock_! (the name of the breed). We like to hear the cat called
 _min_, "Min! min! min!" I inquired if we could cross the river here to
 the Isle of Orleans, thinking to return that way when we had been to
 the falls. He answered, "S'il ne fait pas un trop grand vent" (If
 there is not too much wind). They use small boats, or pirogues, and
 the waves are often too high for them. He wore, as usual, something
 between a moccasin and a boot, which he called _bottes Indiennes_,
 Indian boots, and had made himself. The tops were of calf or
 sheepskin, and the soles of cowhide turned up like a moccasin. They
 were yellow or reddish, the leather never having been tanned nor
 colored. The women wore the same. He told us that he had traveled ten
 leagues due north into the bush. He had been to the Falls of St. Anne,
 and said that they were more beautiful, but not greater, than
 Montmorenci, _plus beau, mais non plus grand, que Montmorenci_. As
 soon as we had retired, the family commenced their devotions. A little
 boy officiated, and for a long time we heard him muttering over his
 prayers.
 
 In the morning, after a breakfast of tea, maple-sugar, bread and
 butter, and what I suppose is called _potage_ (potatoes and meat
 boiled with flour), the universal dish as we found, perhaps the
 national one, I ran over to the Church of La Bonne Ste. Anne, whose
 matin bell we had heard, it being Sunday morning. Our book said that
 this church had "long been an object of interest, from the miraculous
 cures said to have been wrought on visitors to the shrine." There was
 a profusion of gilding, and I counted more than twenty-five crutches
 suspended on the walls, some for grown persons, some for children,
 which it was to be inferred so many sick had been able to dispense
 with; but they looked as if they had been made to order by the
 carpenter who made the church. There were one or two villagers at
 their devotions at that early hour, who did not look up, but when they
 had sat a long time with their little book before the picture of one
 saint, went to another. Our whole walk was through a thoroughly
 Catholic country, and there was no trace of any other religion. I
 doubt if there are any more simple and unsophisticated Catholics
 anywhere. Emery de Caen, Champlain's contemporary, told the Huguenot
 sailors that "Monseigneur the Duke de Ventadour (Viceroy) did not wish
 that they should sing psalms in the Great River."
 
 On our way to the falls, we met the habitans coming to the Church of
 La Bonne Ste. Anne, walking or riding in charettes by families. I
 remarked that they were universally of small stature. The toll-man at
 the bridge over the St. Anne was the first man we had chanced to meet,
 since we left Quebec, who could speak a word of English. How good
 French the inhabitants of this part of Canada speak, I am not
 competent to say; I only know that it is not made impure by being
 mixed with English. I do not know why it should not be as good as is
 spoken in Normandy. Charlevoix, who was here a hundred years ago,
 observes, "The French language is nowhere spoken with greater purity,
 there being no accent perceptible;" and Potherie said "they had no
 dialect, which, indeed, is generally lost in a colony."
 
 The falls, which we were in search of, are three miles up the St.
 Anne. We followed for a short distance a foot-path up the east bank of
 this river, through handsome sugar maple and arbor-vitae groves. Having
 lost the path which led to a house where we were to get further
 directions, we dashed at once into the woods, steering by guess and by
 compass, climbing directly through woods a steep hill, or mountain,
 five or six hundred feet high, which was, in fact, only the bank of
 the St. Lawrence. Beyond this we by good luck fell into another path,
 and following this or a branch of it, at our discretion, through a
 forest consisting of large white pines,--the first we had seen in our
 walk,--we at length heard the roar of falling water, and came out at
 the head of the Falls of St. Anne. We had descended into a ravine or
 cleft in the mountain, whose walls rose still a hundred feet above us,
 though we were near its top, and we now stood on a very rocky shore,
 where the water had lately flowed a dozen feet higher, as appeared by
 the stones and driftwood, and large birches twisted and splintered as
 a farmer twists a withe. Here the river, one or two hundred feet wide,
 came flowing rapidly over a rocky bed out of that interesting
 wilderness which stretches toward Hudson's Bay and Davis's Straits.
 Ha-ha Bay, on the Saguenay, was about one hundred miles north of where
 we stood. Looking on the map, I find that the first country on the
 north which bears a name is that part of Rupert's Land called East
 Main. This river, called after the holy Anne, flowing from such a
 direction, here tumbled over a precipice, at present by three
 channels, how far down I do not know, but far enough for all our
 purposes, and to as good a distance as if twice as far. It matters
 little whether you call it one, or two, or three hundred feet; at any
 rate, it was a sufficient water privilege for us. I crossed the
 principal channel directly over the verge of the fall, where it was
 contracted to about fifteen feet in width, by a dead tree which had
 been dropped across and secured in a cleft of the opposite rock, and
 a smaller one a few feet higher, which served for a hand-rail. This
 bridge was rotten as well as small and slippery, being stripped of
 bark, and I was obliged to seize a moment to pass when the falling
 water did not surge over it, and midway, though at the expense of wet
 feet, I looked down probably more than a hundred feet, into the mist
 and foam below. This gave me the freedom of an island of precipitous
 rock by which I descended as by giant steps,--the rock being composed
 of large cubical masses, clothed with delicate close-hugging lichens
 of various colors, kept fresh and bright by the moisture,--till I
 viewed the first fall from the front, and looked down still deeper to
 where the second and third channels fell into a remarkably large
 circular basin worn in the stone. The falling water seemed to jar the
 very rocks, and the noise to be ever increasing. The vista down-stream
 was through a narrow and deep cleft in the mountain, all white suds at
 the bottom; but a sudden angle in this gorge prevented my seeing
 through to the bottom of the fall. Returning to the shore, I made my
 way down-stream through the forest to see how far the fall extended,
 and how the river came out of that adventure. It was to clamber along
 the side of a precipitous mountain of loose mossy rocks, covered with
 a damp primitive forest, and terminating at the bottom in an abrupt
 precipice over the stream. This was the east side of the fall. At
 length, after a quarter of a mile, I got down to still water, and, on
 looking up through the winding gorge, I could just see to the foot of
 the fall which I had before examined; while from the opposite side of
 the stream, here much contracted, rose a perpendicular wall, I will
 not venture to say how many hundred feet, but only that it was the
 highest perpendicular wall of bare rock that I ever saw. In front of
 me tumbled in from the summit of the cliff a tributary stream, making
 a beautiful cascade, which was a remarkable fall in itself, and there
 was a cleft in this precipice, apparently four or five feet wide,
 perfectly straight up and down from top to bottom, which, from its
 cavernous depth and darkness, appeared merely as _a black streak_.
 This precipice is not sloped, nor is the material soft and crumbling
 slate as at Montmorenci, but it rises perpendicular, like the side of
 a mountain fortress, and is cracked into vast cubical masses of gray
 and black rock shining with moisture, as if it were the ruin of an
 ancient wall built by Titans. Birches, spruces, mountain-ashes with
 their bright red berries, arbor-vitaes, white pines, alders, etc.,
 overhung this chasm on the very verge of the cliff and in the
 crevices, and here and there were buttresses of rock supporting trees
 part way down, yet so as to enhance, not injure, the effect of the
 bare rock. Take it altogether, it was a most wild and rugged and
 stupendous chasm, so deep and narrow, where a river had worn itself a
 passage through a mountain of rock, and all around was the
 comparatively untrodden wilderness.
 
 This was the limit of our walk down the St. Lawrence. Early in the
 afternoon we began to retrace our steps, not being able to cross the
 north channel and return by the Isle of Orleans, on account of the
 _trop grand vent_, or too great wind. Though the waves did run pretty
 high, it was evident that the inhabitants of Montmorenci County were
 no sailors, and made but little use of the river. When we reached the
 bridge between St. Anne and Chateau Richer, I ran back a little way to
 ask a man in the field the name of the river which we were crossing,
 but for a long time I could not make out what he said, for he was one
 of the more unintelligible Jacques Cartier men. At last it flashed
 upon me that it was _La Riviere au Chien_, or the Dog River, which my
 eyes beheld, which brought to my mind the life of the Canadian
 voyageur and _coureur de bois_, a more western and wilder Arcadia,
 methinks, than the world has ever seen; for the Greeks, with all their
 wood and river gods, were not so qualified to name the natural
 features of a country as the ancestors of these French Canadians; and
 if any people had a right to substitute their own for the Indian
 names, it was they. They have preceded the pioneer on our own
 frontiers, and named the _prairie_ for us. _La Riviere au Chien_
 cannot, by any license of language, be translated into Dog River, for
 that is not such a giving it to the dogs, and recognizing their place
 in creation, as the French implies. One of the tributaries of the St.
 Anne is named _La Riviere de la Rose_; and farther east are _La
 Riviere de la Blondelle_ and _La Riviere de la Friponne_. Their very
 _riviere_ meanders more than our _river_.
 
 Yet the impression which this country made on me was commonly
 different from this. To a traveler from the Old World, Canada East may
 appear like a new country, and its inhabitants like colonists, but to
 me, coming from New England and being a very green traveler
 withal,--notwithstanding what I have said about Hudson's Bay,--it
 appeared as old as Normandy itself, and realized much that I had heard
 of Europe and the Middle Ages. Even the names of humble Canadian
 villages affected me as if they had been those of the renowned cities
 of antiquity. To be told by a habitan, when I asked the name of a
 village in sight, that it is _St. Fereol_ or _St. Anne_, the _Guardian
 Angel_ or the _Holy Joseph's_; or of a mountain, that it was _Belange_
 or _St. Hyacinthe_! As soon as you leave the States, these saintly
 names begin. _St. Johns_ is the first town you stop at (fortunately we
 did not see it), and thenceforward, the names of the mountains, and
 streams, and villages reel, if I may so speak, with the intoxication
 of poetry,--_Chambly_, _Longueuil_, _Pointe aux Trembles_,
 _Bartholomy_, etc., etc.; as if it needed only a little foreign
 accent, a few more liquids and vowels perchance in the language, to
 make us locate our ideals at once. I began to dream of Provence and
 the Troubadours, and of places and things which have no existence on
 the earth. They veiled the Indian and the primitive forest, and the
 woods toward Hudson's Bay were only as the forests of France and
 Germany. I could not at once bring myself to believe that the
 inhabitants who pronounced daily those beautiful and, to me,
 significant names lead as prosaic lives as we of New England. In
 short, the Canada which I saw was not merely a place for railroads to
 terminate in and for criminals to run to.
 
 When I asked the man to whom I have referred, if there were any falls
 on the Riviere au Chien,--for I saw that it came over the same high
 bank with the Montmorenci and St. Anne,--he answered that there were.
 How far? I inquired. "Trois quatres lieue." How high? "Je
 pense-quatre-vingt-dix pieds;" that is, ninety feet. We turned aside
 to look at the falls of the Riviere du Sault a la Puce, half a mile
 from the road, which before we had passed in our haste and ignorance,
 and we pronounced them as beautiful as any that we saw; yet they
 seemed to make no account of them there, and, when first we inquired
 the way to the falls, directed us to Montmorenci, seven miles distant.
 It was evident that this was the country for waterfalls; that every
 stream that empties into the St. Lawrence, for some hundreds of miles,
 must have a great fall or cascade on it, and in its passage through
 the mountains was, for a short distance, a small Saguenay, with its
 upright walls. This fall of La Puce, the least remarkable of the four
 which we visited in this vicinity, we had never heard of till we came
 to Canada, and yet, so far as I know, there is nothing of the kind in
 New England to be compared with it. Most travelers in Canada would not
 hear of it, though they might go so near as to hear it. Since my
 return I find that in the topographical description of the country
 mention is made of "two or three romantic falls" on this stream,
 though we saw and heard of but this one. Ask the inhabitants
 respecting any stream, if there is a fall on it, and they will
 perchance tell you of something as interesting as Bashpish or the
 Catskill, which no traveler has ever seen, or if they have not found
 it, you may possibly trace up the stream and discover it yourself.
 Falls there are a drug, and we became quite dissipated in respect to
 them. We had drank too much of them. Beside these which I have
 referred to, there are a thousand other falls on the St. Lawrence and
 its tributaries which I have not seen nor heard of; and above all
 there is one which I have heard of, called Niagara, so that I think
 that this river must be the most remarkable for its falls of any in
 the world.
 
 At a house near the western boundary of Chateau Richer, whose master
 was said to speak a very little English, having recently lived at
 Quebec, we got lodging for the night. As usual, we had to go down a
 lane to get round to the south side of the house, where the door was,
 away from the road. For these Canadian houses have no front door,
 properly speaking. Every part is for the use of the occupant
 exclusively, and no part has reference to the traveler or to travel.
 Every New England house, on the contrary, has a front and principal
 door opening to the great world, though it may be on the cold side,
 for it stands on the highway of nations, and the road which runs by it
 comes from the Old World and goes to the far West; but the Canadian's
 door opens into his backyard and farm alone, and the road which runs
 behind his house leads only from the church of one saint to that of
 another. We found a large family, hired men, wife, and children, just
 eating their supper. They prepared some for us afterwards. The hired
 men were a merry crew of short, black-eyed fellows, and the wife a
 thin-faced, sharp-featured French-Canadian woman. Our host's English
 staggered us rather more than any French we had heard yet; indeed, we
 found that even we spoke better French than he did English, and we
 concluded that a less crime would be committed on the whole if we
 spoke French with him, and in no respect aided or abetted his attempts
 to speak English. We had a long and merry chat with the family this
 Sunday evening in their spacious kitchen. While my companion smoked a
 pipe and parlez-vous'd with one party, I parleyed and gesticulated to
 another. The whole family was enlisted, and I kept a little girl
 writing what was otherwise unintelligible. The geography getting
 obscure, we called for chalk, and the greasy oiled table-cloth having
 been wiped,--for it needed no French, but only a sentence from the
 universal language of looks on my part, to indicate that it needed
 it,--we drew the St. Lawrence, with its parishes, thereon, and
 thenceforward went on swimmingly, by turns handling the chalk and
 committing to the table-cloth what would otherwise have been left in a
 limbo of unintelligibility. This was greatly to the entertainment of
 all parties. I was amused to hear how much use they made of the word
 oui in conversation with one another. After repeated single insertions
 of it, one would suddenly throw back his head at the same time with
 his chair, and exclaim rapidly, "Oui! oui! oui! oui!" like a Yankee
 driving pigs. Our host told us that the farms thereabouts were
 generally two acres or three hundred and sixty French feet wide, by
 one and a half leagues (?), or a little more than four and a half of
 our miles deep. This use of the word _acre_ as long measure arises
 from the fact that the French acre or arpent, the arpent of Paris,
 makes a square of ten perches, of eighteen feet each, on a side, a
 Paris foot being equal to 1.06575 English feet. He said that the wood
 was cut off about one mile from the river. The rest was "bush," and
 beyond that the "Queen's bush." Old as the country is, each landholder
 bounds on the primitive forest, and fuel bears no price. As I had
 forgotten the French for _sickle_, they went out in the evening to the
 barn and got one, and so clenched the certainty of our understanding
 one another. Then, wishing to learn if they used the cradle, and not
 knowing any French word for this instrument, I set up the knives and
 forks on the blade of the sickle to represent one; at which they all
 exclaimed that they knew and had used it. When _snells_ were mentioned
 they went out in the dark and plucked some. They were pretty good.
 They said they had three kinds of plums growing wild,--blue, white,
 and red, the two former much alike and the best. Also they asked me if
 I would have _des pommes_, some apples, and got me some. They were
 exceedingly fair and glossy, and it was evident that there was no worm
 in them; but they were as hard almost as a stone, as if the season was
 too short to mellow them. We had seen no soft and yellow apples by the
 roadside. I declined eating one, much as I admired it, observing that
 it would be good _dans le printemps_, in the spring. In the morning
 when the mistress had set the eggs a-frying she nodded to a thick-set,
 jolly-looking fellow, who rolled up his sleeves, seized the
 long-handled griddle, and commenced a series of revolutions and
 evolutions with it, ever and anon tossing its contents into the air,
 where they turned completely topsy-turvy and came down t'other side
 up; and this he repeated till they were done. That appeared to be his
 duty when eggs were concerned. I did not chance to witness this
 performance, but my companion did, and he pronounced it a masterpiece
 in its way. This man's farm, with the buildings, cost seven hundred
 pounds; some smaller ones, two hundred.
 
 In 1827, Montmorenci County, to which the Isle of Orleans has since
 been added, was nearly as large as Massachusetts, being the eighth
 county out of forty (in Lower Canada) in extent; but by far the
 greater part still must continue to be waste land, lying as it were
 under the walls of Quebec.
 
 I quote these old statistics, not merely because of the difficulty of
 obtaining more recent ones, but also because I saw there so little
 evidence of any recent growth. There were in this county, at the same
 date, five Roman Catholic churches, and no others, five cures and five
 presbyteries, two schools, two corn-mills, four sawmills, one
 carding-mill,--no medical man or notary or lawyer,--five shopkeepers,
 four taverns (we saw no sign of any, though, after a little
 hesitation, we were sometimes directed to some undistinguished hut as
 such), thirty artisans, and five river crafts, whose tonnage amounted
 to sixty-nine tons! This, notwithstanding that it has a frontage of
 more than thirty miles on the river, and the population is almost
 wholly confined to its banks. This describes nearly enough what we
 saw. But double some of these figures, which, however, its growth will
 not warrant, and you have described a poverty which not even its
 severity of climate and ruggedness of soil will suffice to account
 for. The principal productions were wheat, potatoes, oats, hay, peas,
 flax, maple-sugar, etc., etc.; linen cloth, or _etoffe du pays_,
 flannel, and homespun, or _petite etoffe_.
 
 In Lower Canada, according to Bouchette, there are two tenures,--the
 feudal and the socage. _Tenanciers_, _censitaires_, or holders of land
 _en roture_ pay a small annual rent to the seigneurs, to which "is
 added some articles of provision, such as a couple of fowls, or a
 goose, or a bushel of wheat." "They are also bound to grind their corn
 at the _moulin banal_, or the lord's mill, where one fourteenth part
 of it is taken for his use" as toll. He says that the toll is one
 twelfth in the United States where competition exists. It is not
 permitted to exceed one sixteenth in Massachusetts. But worse than
 this monopolizing of mill rents is what are called _lods et ventes_,
 or mutation fines,--according to which the seigneur has "a right to a
 twelfth part of the purchase-money of every estate within his
 seigniory that changes its owner by sale." This is over and above the
 sum paid to the seller. In such cases, moreover, "the lord possesses
 the _droit de retrait_, which is the privilege of preemption at the
 highest bidden price within forty days after the sale has taken
 place,"--a right which, however, is said to be seldom exercised.
 "Lands held by Roman Catholics are further subject to the payment to
 their curates of one twenty-sixth part of all the grain produced upon
 them, and to occasional assessments for building and repairing
 churches," etc.,--a tax to which they are not subject if the
 proprietors change their faith; but they are not the less attached to
 their church in consequence. There are, however, various modifications
 of the feudal tenure. Under the socage tenure, which is that of the
 townships or more recent settlements, English, Irish, Scotch, and
 others, and generally of Canada West, the landholder is wholly
 unshackled by such conditions as I have quoted, and "is bound to no
 other obligations than those of allegiance to the king and obedience
 to the laws." Throughout Canada "a freehold of forty shillings yearly
 value, or the payment of ten pounds rent annually, is the
 qualification for voters." In 1846 more than one sixth of the whole
 population of Canada East were qualified to vote for members of
 Parliament,--a greater proportion than enjoy a similar privilege in
 the United States.
 
 The population which we had seen the last two days--I mean the
 habitans of Montmorenci County--appeared very inferior, intellectually
 and even physically, to that of New England. In some respects they
 were incredibly filthy. It was evident that they had not advanced
 since the settlement of the country, that they were quite behind the
 age, and fairly represented their ancestors in Normandy a thousand
 years ago. Even in respect to the common arts of life, they are not so
 far advanced as a frontier town in the West three years old. They have
 no money invested in railroad stock, and probably never will have. If
 they have got a French phrase for a railroad, it is as much as you can
 expect of them. They are very far from a revolution, have no quarrel
 with Church or State, but their vice and their virtue is content. As
 for annexation, they have never dreamed of it; indeed, they have not a
 clear idea what or where the States are. The English government has
 been remarkably liberal to its Catholic subjects in Canada, permitting
 them to wear their own fetters, both political and religious, as far
 as was possible for subjects. Their government is even too good for
 them. Parliament passed "an act [in 1825] to provide for the
 extinction of feudal and seigniorial rights and burdens on lands in
 Lower Canada, and for the gradual conversion of those tenures into the
 tenure of free and common socage," etc. But as late as 1831, at least,
 the design of the act was likely to be frustrated, owing to the
 reluctance of the seigniors and peasants. It has been observed by
 another that the French Canadians do not extend nor perpetuate their
 influence. The British, Irish, and other immigrants, who have settled
 the townships, are found to have imitated the American settlers and
 not the French. They reminded me in this of the Indians, whom they
 were slow to displace, and to whose habits of life they themselves more
 readily conformed than the Indians to theirs. The Governor-General
 Denouville remarked, in 1685, that some had long thought that it was
 necessary to bring the Indians near them in order to Frenchify
 (_franciser_) them, but that they had every reason to think themselves
 in an error; for those who had come near them and were even collected
 in villages in the midst of the colony had not become French, but the
 French who had haunted them had become savages. Kalm said, "Though
 many nations imitate the French customs, yet I observed, on the
 contrary, that the French in Canada, in many respects, follow the
 customs of the Indians, with whom they converse every day. They make
 use of the tobacco-pipes, shoes, garters, and girdles of the Indians.
 They follow the Indian way of making war with exactness; they mix the
 same things with tobacco [he might have said that both French and
 English learned the use itself of this weed of the Indian]; they make
 use of the Indian bark-boats, and row them in the Indian way; they
 wrap square pieces of cloth round their feet instead of stockings; and
 have adopted many other Indian fashions." Thus, while the descendants
 of the Pilgrims are teaching the English to make pegged boots, the
 descendants of the French in Canada are wearing the Indian moccasin
 still. The French, to their credit be it said, to a certain extent
 respected the Indians as a separate and independent people, and spoke
 of them and contrasted themselves with them as the English have never
 done. They not only went to war with them as allies, but they lived at
 home with them as neighbors. In 1627 the French king declared "that
 the descendants" of the French, settled in New France, "and the
 savages who should be brought to the knowledge of the faith, and
 should make profession of it, should be counted and reputed French
 born (_Naturels Francois_); and as such could emigrate to France, when
 it seemed good to them, and there acquire, will, inherit, etc., etc.,
 without obtaining letters of naturalization." When the English had
 possession of Quebec, in 1630, the Indians, attempting to practice the
 same familiarity with them that they had with the French, were driven
 out of their houses with blows; which accident taught them a
 difference between the two races, and attached them yet more to the
 French. The impression made on me was that the French Canadians were
 even sharing the fate of the Indians, or at least gradually
 disappearing in what is called the Saxon current.
 
 The English did not come to America from a mere love of adventure,
 nor to truck with or convert the savages, nor to hold offices under
 the crown, as the French to a great extent did, but to live in earnest
 and with freedom. The latter overran a great extent of country,
 selling strong water, and collecting its furs, and converting its
 inhabitants,--or at least baptizing its dying infants (_enfans
 moribonds_),--without _improving_ it. First went the _coureur de bois_
 with the _eau de vie_; then followed, if he did not precede, the
 heroic missionary with the _eau d'immortalite_. It was freedom to
 hunt, and fish, and convert, not to work, that they sought. Hontan
 says that the _coureurs de bois_ lived like sailors ashore. In no part
 of the Seventeenth Century could the French be said to have had a
 foothold in Canada; they held only by the fur of the wild animals
 which they were exterminating. To enable the poor seigneurs to get
 their living, it was permitted by a decree passed in the reign of
 Louis the Fourteenth, in 1685, "to all nobles and gentlemen settled in
 Canada, to engage in commerce, without being called to account or
 reputed to have done anything derogatory." The reader can infer to
 what extent they had engaged in agriculture, and how their farms must
 have shone by this time. The New England youth, on the other hand,
 were never _coureurs de bois_ nor _voyageurs_, but backwoodsmen and
 sailors rather. Of all nations the English undoubtedly have proved
 hitherto that they had the most business here.
 
 Yet I am not sure but I have most sympathy with that spirit of adventure
 which distinguished the French and Spaniards of those days, and made
 them especially the explorers of the American Continent,--which so
 early carried the former to the Great Lakes and the Mississippi on the
 north, and the latter to the same river on the south. It was long
 before our frontiers reached their settlements in the West. So far as
 inland discovery was concerned, the adventurous spirit of the English
 was that of sailors who land but for a day, and their enterprise the
 enterprise of traders.
 
 There was apparently a greater equality of condition among the
 habitans of Montmorenci County than in New England. They are an almost
 exclusively agricultural, and so far independent population, each
 family producing nearly all the necessaries of life for itself. If the
 Canadian wants energy, perchance he possesses those virtues, social
 and others, which the Yankee lacks, in which case he cannot be
 regarded as a poor man.
 
 FOOTNOTE:
 
 [2] From McCulloch's Geographical Dictionary we learn that
 "immediately beyond the Island of Orleans it is a mile broad; where
 the Saguenay joins it, eighteen miles; at Point Peter, upward of
 thirty; at the Bay of Seven Islands, seventy miles; and at the Island
 of Anticosti (above three hundred and fifty miles from Quebec), it
 rolls a flood into the ocean nearly one hundred miles across."
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER IV
 
 THE WALLS OF QUEBEC
 
 
 After spending the night at a farmhouse in Chateau Richer, about a
 dozen miles northeast of Quebec, we set out on our return to the city.
 We stopped at the next house, a picturesque old stone mill, over the
 _Chipre_,--for so the name sounded,--such as you will nowhere see in
 the States, and asked the millers the age of the mill. They went
 upstairs to call the master; but the crabbed old miser asked why we
 wanted to know, and would tell us only for some compensation. I wanted
 French to give him a piece of my mind. I had got enough to talk on a
 pinch, but not to quarrel, so I had to come away, looking all I would
 have said. This was the utmost incivility we met with in Canada. In
 Beauport, within a few miles of Quebec, we turned aside to look at a
 church which was just being completed,--a very large and handsome
 edifice of stone, with a green bough stuck in its gable, of some
 significance to Catholics. The comparative wealth of the Church in
 this country was apparent; for in this village we did not see one good
 house besides. They were all humble cottages; and yet this appeared to
 me a more imposing structure than any church in Boston. But I am no
 judge of these things.
 
 Reentering Quebec through St. John's Gate, we took a caleche in Market
 Square for the Falls of the Chaudiere, about nine miles southwest of
 the city, for which we were to pay so much, besides forty sous for
 tolls. The driver, as usual, spoke French only. The number of these
 vehicles is very great for so small a town. They are like one of our
 chaises that has lost its top, only stouter and longer in the body,
 with a seat for the driver where the dasher is with us, and broad
 leather ears on each side to protect the riders from the wheel and
 keep children from falling out. They had an easy jaunting look, which,
 as our hours were numbered, persuaded us to be riders. We met with
 them on every road near Quebec these days, each with its complement of
 two inquisitive-looking foreigners and a Canadian driver, the former
 evidently enjoying their novel experience, for commonly it is only the
 horse whose language you do not understand; but they were one remove
 further from him by the intervention of an equally unintelligible
 driver. We crossed the St. Lawrence to Point Levi in a French-Canadian
 ferry-boat, which was inconvenient and dirty, and managed with great
 noise and bustle. The current was very strong and tumultuous; and the
 boat tossed enough to make some sick, though it was only a mile
 across; yet the wind was not to be compared with that of the day
 before, and we saw that the Canadians had a good excuse for not taking
 us over to the Isle of Orleans in a pirogue, however shiftless they
 may be for not having provided any other conveyance. The route which
 we took to the Chaudiere did not afford us those views of Quebec which
 we had expected, and the country and inhabitants appeared less
 interesting to a traveler than those we had seen. The Falls of the
 Chaudiere are three miles from its mouth on the south side of the St.
 Lawrence. Though they were the largest which I saw in Canada, I was
 not proportionately interested by them, probably from satiety. I did
 not see any peculiar propriety in the name _Chaudiere_, or caldron. I
 saw here the most brilliant rainbow that I ever imagined. It was just
 across the stream below the precipice, formed on the mist which this
 tremendous fall produced; and I stood on a level with the keystone of
 its arch. It was not a few faint prismatic colors merely, but a full
 semicircle, only four or five rods in diameter, though as wide as
 usual, so intensely bright as to pain the eye, and apparently as
 substantial as an arch of stone. It changed its position and colors as
 we moved, and was the brighter because the sun shone so clearly and
 the mist was so thick. Evidently a picture painted on mist for the men
 and animals that came to the falls to look at; but for what special
 purpose beyond this, I know not. At the farthest point in this ride,
 and when most inland, unexpectedly at a turn in the road we descried
 the frowning citadel of Quebec in the horizon, like the beak of a bird
 of prey. We returned by the river road under the bank, which is very
 high, abrupt, and rocky. When we were opposite to Quebec, I was
 surprised to see that in the Lower Town, under the shadow of the rock,
 the lamps were lit, twinkling not unlike crystals in a cavern, while
 the citadel high above, and we, too, on the south shore, were in broad
 daylight. As we were too late for the ferry-boat that night, we put up
 at a _maison de pension_ at Point Levi. The usual two-story stove was
 here placed against an opening in the partition shaped like a
 fireplace, and so warmed several rooms. We could not understand their
 French here very well, but the _potage_ was just like what we had had
 before. There were many small chambers with doorways, but no doors.
 The walls of our chamber, all around and overhead, were neatly ceiled,
 and the timbers cased with wood unpainted. The pillows were checkered
 and tasseled, and the usual long-pointed red woolen or worsted
 nightcap was placed on each. I pulled mine out to see how it was made.
 It was in the form of a double cone, one end tucked into the other;
 just such, it appeared, as I saw men wearing all day in the streets.
 Probably I should have put it on if the cold had been then, as it is
 sometimes there, thirty or forty degrees below zero.
 
 When we landed at Quebec the next morning a man lay on his back on the
 wharf, apparently dying, in the midst of a crowd and directly in the
 path of the horses, groaning, "O ma conscience!" I thought that he
 pronounced his French more distinctly than any I heard, as if the
 dying had already acquired the accents of a universal language. Having
 secured the only unengaged berths in the Lord Sydenham steamer, which
 was to leave Quebec before sundown, and being resolved, now that I had
 seen somewhat of the country, to get an idea of the city, I proceeded
 to walk round the Upper Town, or fortified portion, which is two miles
 and three quarters in circuit, alone, as near as I could get to the
 cliff and the walls, like a rat looking for a hole; going round by the
 southwest, where there is but a single street between the cliff and
 the water, and up the long wooden stairs, through the suburbs
 northward to the King's Woodyard, which I thought must have been a
 long way from his fireplace, and under the cliffs of the St. Charles,
 where the drains issue under the walls, and the walls are loopholed
 for musketry; so returning by Mountain Street and Prescott Gate to the
 Upper Town. Having found my way by an obscure passage near the St.
 Louis Gate to the glacis on the north of the citadel proper,--I
 believe that I was the only visitor then in the city who got in
 there,--I enjoyed a prospect nearly as good as from within the citadel
 itself, which I had explored some days before. As I walked on the
 glacis I heard the sound of a bagpipe from the soldiers' dwellings in
 the rock, and was further soothed and affected by the sight of a
 soldier's cat walking up a cleated plank into a high loophole designed
 for _mus-catry_, as serene as Wisdom herself, and with a gracefully
 waving motion of her tail, as if her ways were ways of pleasantness
 and all her paths were peace. Scaling a slat fence, where a small
 force might have checked me, I got out of the esplanade into the
 Governor's Garden, and read the well-known inscription on Wolfe and
 Montcalm's monument, which for saying much in little, and that to the
 purpose, undoubtedly deserved the prize medal which it received:--
 
      MORTEM . VIRTUS . COMMUNEM .
           FAMAM . HISTORIA .
      MONUMENTUM . POSTERITAS .
              DEDIT
 
 (Valor gave them one death, history one fame, posterity one monument.)
 The Government Garden has for nosegays, amid kitchen vegetables,
 beside the common garden flowers, the usual complement of cannon
 directed toward some future and possible enemy. I then returned up St.
 Louis Street to the esplanade and ramparts there, and went round the
 Upper Town once more, though I was very tired, this time on the
 _inside_ of the wall; for I knew that the wall was the main thing in
 Quebec, and had cost a great deal of money, and therefore I must make
 the most of it. In fact, these are the only remarkable walls we have
 in North America, though we have a good deal of Virginia fence, it is
 true. Moreover, I cannot say but I yielded in some measure to the
 soldier instinct, and, having but a short time to spare, thought it
 best to examine the wall thoroughly, that I might be the better
 prepared if I should ever be called that way again in the service of
 my country. I committed all the gates to memory, in their order, which
 did not cost me so much trouble as it would have done at the
 hundred-gated city, there being only five; nor were they so hard to
 remember as those seven of Boeotian Thebes; and, moreover, I thought
 that, if seven champions were enough against the latter, one would be
 enough against Quebec, though he bore for all armor and device only an
 umbrella and a bundle. I took the nunneries as I went, for I had
 learned to distinguish them by the blinds; and I observed also the
 foundling hospitals and the convents, and whatever was attached to, or
 in the vicinity of the walls. All the rest I omitted, as naturally as
 one would the inside of an inedible shell-fish. These were the only
 pearls, and the wall the only mother-of-pearl for me. Quebec is
 chiefly famous for the thickness of its parietal bones. The technical
 terms of its conchology may stagger a beginner a little at first, such
 as _banlieue_, _esplanade_, _glacis_, _ravelin_, _cavalier_, etc.,
 etc., but with the aid of a comprehensive dictionary you soon learn
 the nature of your ground. I was surprised at the extent of the
 artillery barracks, built so long ago,--_Casernes Nouvelles_, they
 used to be called,--nearly six hundred feet in length by forty in
 depth, where the sentries, like peripatetic philosophers, were so
 absorbed in thought as not to notice me when I passed in and out at
 the gates. Within are "small arms of every description, sufficient for
 the equipment of twenty thousand men," so arranged as to give a
 startling _coup d'oeil_ to strangers. I did not enter, not wishing
 to get a black eye; for they are said to be "in a state of complete
 repair and readiness for immediate use." Here, for a short time, I
 lost sight of the wall, but I recovered it again on emerging from the
 barrack yard. There I met with a Scotchman who appeared to have
 business with the wall, like myself; and, being thus mutually drawn
 together by a similarity of tastes, we had a little conversation _sub
 moenibus_, that is, by an angle of the wall, which sheltered us. He
 lived about thirty miles northwest of Quebec; had been nineteen years
 in the country; said he was disappointed that he was not brought to
 America after all, but found himself still under British rule and
 where his own language was not spoken; that many Scotch, Irish, and
 English were disappointed in like manner, and either went to the
 States or pushed up the river to Canada West, nearer to the States,
 and where their language was spoken. He talked of visiting the States
 some time; and, as he seemed ignorant of geography, I warned him that
 it was one thing to visit the State of Massachusetts, and another to
 visit the State of California. He said it was colder there than usual
 at that season, and he was lucky to have brought his thick togue, or
 frock-coat, with him; thought it would snow, and then be pleasant and
 warm. That is the way we are always thinking. However, his words were
 music to me in my thin hat and sack.
 
 At the ramparts on the cliff near the old Parliament House I counted
 twenty-four thirty-two-pounders in a row, pointed over the harbor,
 with their balls piled pyramid-wise between them,--there are said to
 be in all about one hundred and eighty guns mounted at Quebec,--all
 which were faithfully kept dusted by officials, in accordance with the
 motto, "In time of peace prepare for war;" but I saw no preparations
 for peace: she was plainly an uninvited guest.
 
 Having thus completed the circuit of this fortress, both within and
 without, I went no farther by the wall for fear that I should become
 wall-eyed. However, I think that I deserve to be made a member of the
 Royal Sappers and Miners.
 
 In short, I observed everywhere the most perfect arrangements for
 keeping a wall in order, not even permitting the lichens to grow on
 it, which some think an ornament; but then I saw no cultivation nor
 pasturing within it to pay for the outlay, and cattle were strictly
 forbidden to feed on the glacis under the severest penalties. Where
 the dogs get their milk I don't know, and I fear it is bloody at best.
 
 The citadel of Quebec says, "I _will_ live here, and you shan't
 prevent me." To which you return, that you have not the slightest
 objection; live and let live. The Martello towers looked, for all the
 world, exactly like abandoned windmills which had not had a grist to
 grind these hundred years. Indeed, the whole castle here was a
 "folly,"--England's folly,--and, in more senses than one, a castle in
 the air. The inhabitants and the government are gradually waking up to
 a sense of this truth; for I heard something said about their
 abandoning the wall around the Upper Town, and confining the
 fortifications to the citadel of forty acres. Of course they will
 finally reduce their intrenchments to the circumference of their own
 brave hearts.
 
 The most modern fortifications have an air of antiquity about them;
 they have the aspect of ruins in better or worse repair from the day
 they are built, because they are not really the work of this age. The
 very place where the soldier resides has a peculiar tendency to become
 old and dilapidated, as the word _barrack_ implies. I couple all
 fortifications in my mind with the dismantled Spanish forts to be
 found in so many parts of the world; and if in any place they are not
 actually dismantled, it is because that there the intellect of the
 inhabitants is dismantled. The commanding officer of an old fort near
 Valdivia in South America, when a traveler remarked to him that, with
 one discharge, his gun-carriages would certainly fall to pieces,
 gravely replied, "No, I am sure, sir, they would stand two." Perhaps
 the guns of Quebec would stand three. Such structures carry us back to
 the Middle Ages, the siege of Jerusalem, and St. Jean d'Acre, and the
 days of the Bucaniers. In the armory of the citadel they showed me a
 clumsy implement, long since useless, which they called a Lombard gun.
 I thought that their whole citadel was such a Lombard gun, fit object
 for the museums of the curious. Such works do not consist with the
 development of the intellect. Huge stone structures of all kinds, both
 in their erection and by their influence when erected, rather oppress
 than liberate the mind. They are tombs for the souls of men, as
 frequently for their bodies also. The sentinel with his musket beside
 a man with his umbrella is spectral. There is not sufficient reason
 for his existence. Does my friend there, with a bullet resting on half
 an ounce of powder, think that he needs that argument in conversing
 with me? The fort was the first institution that was founded here, and
 it is amusing to read in Champlain how assiduously they worked at it
 almost from the first day of the settlement. The founders of the
 colony thought this an excellent site for a wall,--and no doubt it was
 a better site, in some respects, for a wall than for a city,--but it
 chanced that a city got behind it. It chanced, too, that a Lower Town
 got before it, and clung like an oyster to the outside of the crags,
 as you may see at low tide. It is as if you were to come to a country
 village surrounded by palisades in the old Indian fashion,--interesting
 only as a relic of antiquity and barbarism. A fortified town is like a
 man cased in the heavy armor of antiquity, with a horse-load of
 broadswords and small arms slung to him, endeavoring to go about his
 business. Or is this an indispensable machinery for the good
 government of the country? The inhabitants of California succeed
 pretty well, and are doing better and better every day, without any
 such institution. What use has this fortress served, to look at it
 even from the soldiers' point of view? At first the French took care
 of it; yet Wolfe sailed by it with impunity, and took the town of
 Quebec without experiencing any hindrance at last from its
 fortifications. They were only the bone for which the parties fought.
 Then the English began to take care of it. So of any fort in the
 world,--that in Boston Harbor, for instance. We shall at length hear
 that an enemy sailed by it in the night, for it cannot sail itself,
 and both it and its inhabitants are always benighted. How often we
 read that the enemy occupied a position which commanded the old, and
 so the fort was evacuated! Have not the schoolhouse and the
 printing-press occupied a position which commands such a fort as this?
 
 However, this is a ruin kept in remarkably good repair. There are some
 eight hundred or thousand men there to exhibit it. One regiment goes
 bare-legged to increase the attraction. If you wish to study the
 muscles of the leg about the knee, repair to Quebec. This universal
 exhibition in Canada of the tools and sinews of war reminded me of the
 keeper of a menagerie showing his animals' claws. It was the English
 leopard showing his claws. Always the royal something or other; as at
 the menagerie, the Royal Bengal Tiger. Silliman states that "the cold
 is so intense in the winter nights, particularly on Cape Diamond, that
 the sentinels cannot stand it more than one hour, and are relieved at
 the expiration of that time;" "and even, as it is said, at much
 shorter intervals, in case of the most extreme cold." What a natural
 or unnatural fool must that soldier be--to say nothing of his
 government--who, when quicksilver is freezing and blood is ceasing to
 be quick, will stand to have his face frozen, watching the walls of
 Quebec, though, so far as they are concerned, both honest and
 dishonest men all the world over have been in their beds nearly half a
 century,--or at least for that space travelers have visited Quebec
 only as they would read history! I shall never again wake up in a
 colder night than usual, but I shall think how rapidly the sentinels
 are relieving one another on the walls of Quebec, their quicksilver
 being all frozen, as if apprehensive that some hostile Wolfe may even
 then be scaling the Heights of Abraham, or some persevering Arnold
 about to issue from the wilderness; some Malay or Japanese, perchance,
 coming round by the northwest coast, have chosen that moment to
 assault the citadel! Why, I should as soon expect to find the
 sentinels still relieving one another on the walls of Nineveh, which
 have so long been buried to the world. What a troublesome thing a wall
 is! I thought it was to defend me, and not I it! Of course, if they
 had no wall, they would not need to have any sentinels.
 
 You might venture to advertise this farm as well fenced with
 substantial stone walls (saying nothing about the eight hundred
 Highlanders and Royal Irish who are required to keep them from
 toppling down); stock and tools to go with the land if desired. But it
 would not be wise for the seller to exhibit his farm-book.
 
 Why should Canada, wild and unsettled as it is, impress us as an older
 country than the States, unless because her institutions are old? All
 things appeared to contend there, as I have implied, with a certain
 rust of antiquity, such as forms on old armor and iron guns,--the rust
 of conventions and formalities. It is said that the metallic roofs of
 Montreal and Quebec keep sound and bright for forty years in some
 cases. But if the rust was not on the tinned roofs and spires, it was
 on the inhabitants and their institutions. Yet the work of burnishing
 goes briskly forward. I imagined that the government vessels at the
 wharves were laden with rottenstone and oxalic acid,--that is what the
 first ship from England in the spring comes freighted with,--and the
 hands of the Colonial legislature are cased in wash-leather. The
 principal exports must be _gun_ny bags, verdigris, and iron rust.
 Those who first built this fort, coming from Old France with the
 memory and tradition of feudal days and customs weighing on them, were
 unquestionably behind their age; and those who now inhabit and repair
 it are behind their ancestors or predecessors. Those old chevaliers
 thought that they could transplant the feudal system to America. It
 has been set out, but it has not thriven. Notwithstanding that Canada
 was settled first, and, unlike New England, for a long series of years
 enjoyed the fostering care of the mother country; notwithstanding
 that, as Charlevoix tells us, it had more of the ancient _noblesse_
 among its early settlers than any other of the French colonies, and
 perhaps than all the others together, there are in both the Canadas
 but 600,000 of French descent to-day,--about half so many as the
 population of Massachusetts. The whole population of both Canadas is
 but about 1,700,000 Canadians, English, Irish, Scotch, Indians, and
 all, put together! Samuel Laing, in his essay on the Northmen, to
 whom especially, rather than the Saxons, he refers the energy and
 indeed the excellence of the English character, observes that, when
 they occupied Scandinavia, "each man possessed his lot of land without
 reference to, or acknowledgment of, any other man, without any local
 chief to whom his military service or other quit-rent for his land was
 due,--without tenure from, or duty or obligation to, any superior,
 real or fictitious, except the general sovereign. The individual
 settler held his land, as his descendants in Norway still express it,
 by the same right as the King held his crown, by udal right, or
 adel,--that is, noble right." The French have occupied Canada, not
 _udally_, or by noble right, but _feudally_, or by ignoble right. They
 are a nation of peasants.
 
 It was evident that, both on account of the feudal system and the
 aristocratic government, a private man was not worth so much in Canada
 as in the United States; and, if your wealth in any measure consists
 in manliness, in originality and independence, you had better stay
 here. How could a peaceable, freethinking man live neighbor to the
 Forty-ninth Regiment? A New-Englander would naturally be a bad
 citizen, probably a rebel, there,--certainly if he were already a
 rebel at home. I suspect that a poor man who is not servile is a much
 rarer phenomenon there and in England than in the Northern United
 States. An Englishman, methinks,--not to speak of other European
 nations,--habitually regards himself merely as a constituent part of
 the English nation; he is a member of the royal regiment of
 Englishmen, and is proud of his company, as he has reason to be proud
 of it. But an American--one who has made a tolerable use of his
 opportunities--cares, comparatively, little about such things, and is
 advantageously nearer to the primitive and the ultimate condition of
 man in these respects. It is a government, that English one,--like
 most other European ones,--that cannot afford to be forgotten, as you
 would naturally forget it; under which one cannot be wholesomely
 neglected, and grow up a man and not an Englishman merely,--cannot be
 a poet even without danger of being made poet-laureate! Give me a
 country where it is the most natural thing in the world for a
 government that does not understand you to let you alone. One would
 say that a true Englishman could speculate only within bounds. (It is
 true the Americans have proved that they, in more than one sense, can
 _speculate_ without bounds.) He has to pay his respects to so many
 things, that, before he knows it, he _may_ have paid away all he is
 worth. What makes the United States government, on the whole, more
 tolerable--I mean for us lucky white men--is the fact that there is so
 much less of government with us. Here it is only once in a month or a
 year that a man _needs_ remember that institution; and those who go to
 Congress can play the game of the Kilkenny cats there without fatal
 consequences to those who stay at home, their term is so short; but in
 Canada you are reminded of the government every day. It parades itself
 before you. It is not content to be the servant, but will be the
 master; and every day it goes out to the Plains of Abraham or to the
 Champ de Mars and exhibits itself and toots. Everywhere there appeared
 an attempt to make and to preserve trivial and otherwise transient
 distinctions. In the streets of Montreal and Quebec you met not only
 with soldiers in red, and shuffling priests in unmistakable black and
 white, with Sisters of Charity gone into mourning for their deceased
 relative,--not to mention the nuns of various orders depending on the
 fashion of a tear, of whom you heard,--but youths belonging to some
 seminary or other, wearing coats edged with white, who looked as if
 their expanding hearts were already repressed with a piece of tape. In
 short, the inhabitants of Canada appeared to be suffering between two
 fires,--the soldiery and the priesthood.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER V
 
 THE SCENERY OF QUEBEC; AND THE RIVER ST. LAWRENCE
 
 
 About twelve o'clock this day, being in the Lower Town, I looked up at
 the signal-gun by the flagstaff on Cape Diamond, and saw a soldier up
 in the heavens there making preparations to fire it,--both he and the
 gun in bold relief against the sky. Soon after, being warned by the
 boom of the gun to look up again, there was only the cannon in the
 sky, the smoke just blowing away from it, as if the soldier, having
 touched it off, had concealed himself for effect, leaving the sound to
 echo grandly from shore to shore, and far up and down the river. This
 answered the purpose of a dinner-horn.
 
 There are no such restaurants in Quebec or Montreal as there are in
 Boston. I hunted an hour or two in vain in this town to find one, till
 I lost my appetite. In one house, called a restaurant, where lunches
 were advertised, I found only tables covered with bottles and glasses
 innumerable, containing apparently a sample of every liquid that has
 been known since the earth dried up after the flood, but no scent of
 solid food did I perceive gross enough to excite a hungry mouse. In
 short, I saw nothing to tempt me there, but a large map of Canada
 against the wall. In another place I once more got as far as the
 bottles, and then asked for a bill of fare; was told to walk up
 stairs; had no bill of fare, nothing but fare. "Have you any pies or
 puddings?" I inquired, for I am obliged to keep my savageness in check
 by a low diet. "No, sir; we've nice mutton-chop, roast beef,
 beefsteak, cutlets," and so on. A burly Englishman, who was in the
 midst of the siege of a piece of roast beef, and of whom I have never
 had a front view to this day, turned half round, with his mouth half
 full, and remarked, "You'll find no pies nor puddings in Quebec, sir;
 they don't make any here." I found that it was even so, and therefore
 bought some musty cake and some fruit in the open market-place. This
 market-place by the waterside, where the old women sat by their tables
 in the open air, amid a dense crowd jabbering all languages, was the
 best place in Quebec to observe the people; and the ferry-boats,
 continually coming and going with their motley crews and cargoes,
 added much to the entertainment. I also saw them getting water from
 the river, for Quebec is supplied with water by cart and barrel. This
 city impressed me as wholly foreign and French, for I scarcely heard
 the sound of the English language in the streets. More than three
 fifths of the inhabitants are of French origin; and if the traveler
 did not visit the fortifications particularly, he might not be
 reminded that the English have any foothold here; and, in any case, if
 he looked no farther than Quebec, they would appear to have planted
 themselves in Canada only as they have in Spain at Gibraltar; and he
 who plants upon a rock cannot expect much increase. The novel sights
 and sounds by the waterside made me think of such ports as Boulogne,
 Dieppe, Rouen, and Havre-de-Grace, which I have never seen; but I
 have no doubt that they present similar scenes. I was much amused from
 first to last with the sounds made by the charette and caleche
 drivers. It was that part of their foreign language that you heard the
 most of,--the French they talked to their horses,--and which they
 talked the loudest. It was a more novel sound to me than the French of
 conversation. The streets resounded with the cries, "_Qui donc!_"
 "_Marche tot!_" I suspect that many of our horses which came from
 Canada would prick up their ears at these sounds. Of the shops, I was
 most attracted by those where furs and Indian works were sold, as
 containing articles of genuine Canadian manufacture. I have been told
 that two townsmen of mine, who were interested in horticulture,
 traveling once in Canada, and being in Quebec, thought it would be a
 good opportunity to obtain seeds of the real Canada crookneck squash.
 So they went into a shop where such things were advertised, and
 inquired for the same. The shopkeeper had the very thing they wanted.
 "But are you sure," they asked, "that these are the genuine Canada
 crookneck?" "Oh, yes, gentlemen," answered he, "they are a lot which I
 have received directly from Boston." I resolved that my Canada
 crookneck seeds should be such as had grown in Canada.
 
 Too much has not been said about the scenery of Quebec. The
 fortifications of Cape Diamond are omnipresent. They preside, they
 frown over the river and surrounding country. You travel ten, twenty,
 thirty miles up or down the river's banks, you ramble fifteen miles
 amid the hills on either side, and then, when you have long since
 forgotten them, perchance slept on them by the way, at a turn of the
 road or of your body, there they are still, with their geometry
 against the sky. The child that is born and brought up thirty miles
 distant, and has never traveled to the city, reads his country's
 history, sees the level lines of the citadel amid the cloud-built
 citadels in the western horizon, and is told that that is Quebec. No
 wonder if Jacques Cartier's pilot exclaimed in Norman French, "Que
 bec!" (What a beak!) when he saw this cape, as some suppose. Every
 modern traveler involuntarily uses a similar expression. Particularly
 it is said that its sudden apparition on turning Point Levi makes a
 memorable impression on him who arrives by water. The view from Cape
 Diamond has been compared by European travelers with the most
 remarkable views of a similar kind in Europe, such as from Edinburgh
 Castle, Gibraltar, Cintra, and others, and preferred by many. A main
 peculiarity in this, compared with other views which I have beheld, is
 that it is from the ramparts of a fortified city, and not from a
 solitary and majestic river cape alone, that this view is obtained. I
 associate the beauty of Quebec with the steel-like and flashing air,
 which may be peculiar to that season of the year, in which the blue
 flowers of the succory and some late goldenrods and buttercups on the
 summit of Cape Diamond were almost my only companions,--the former
 bluer than the heavens they faced. Yet even I yielded in some degree
 to the influence of historical associations, and found it hard to
 attend to the geology of Cape Diamond or the botany of the Plains of
 Abraham. I still remember the harbor far beneath me, sparkling like
 silver in the sun, the answering highlands of Point Levi on the
 southeast, the frowning Cap Tourmente abruptly bounding the seaward
 view far in the northeast, the villages of Lorette and Charlesbourg on
 the north, and, further west, the distant Val Cartier, sparkling with
 white cottages, hardly removed by distance through the clear air,--not
 to mention a few blue mountains along the horizon in that direction.
 You look out from the ramparts of the citadel beyond the frontiers of
 civilization. Yonder small group of hills, according to the
 guide-book, forms "the portal of the wilds which are trodden only by
 the feet of the Indian hunters as far as Hudson's Bay." It is but a
 few years since Bouchette declared that the country ten leagues north
 of the British capital of North America was as little known as the
 middle of Africa. Thus the citadel under my feet, and all historical
 associations, were swept away again by an influence from the wilds and
 from Nature, as if the beholder had read her history,--an influence
 which, like the Great River itself, flowed from the Arctic fastnesses
 and Western forests with irresistible tide over all.
 
 The most interesting object in Canada to me was the River St.
 Lawrence, known far and wide, and for centuries, as the Great River.
 Cartier, its discoverer, sailed up it as far as Montreal in
 1535,--nearly a century before the coming of the Pilgrims; and I have
 seen a pretty accurate map of it so far, containing the city of
 "Hochelaga" and the river "Saguenay," in Ortelius's _Theatrum Orbis
 Terrarum_, printed at Antwerp in 1575,--the first edition having
 appeared in 1570,--in which the famous cities of "Norumbega" and
 "Orsinora" stand on the rough-blocked continent where New England is
 to-day, and the fabulous but unfortunate Isle of Demons, and Frislant,
 and others, lie off and on in the unfrequented sea, some of them
 prowling near what is now the course of the Cunard steamers. In this
 ponderous folio of the "Ptolemy of his age," said to be the first
 general atlas published after the revival of the sciences in Europe,
 only one page of which is devoted to the topography of the _Novus
 Orbis_, the St. Lawrence is the only large river, whether drawn from
 fancy or from observation, on the east side of North America. It was
 famous in Europe before the other rivers of North America were heard
 of, notwithstanding that the mouth of the Mississippi is said to have
 been discovered first, and its stream was reached by Soto not long
 after; but the St. Lawrence had attracted settlers to its cold shores
 long before the Mississippi, or even the Hudson, was known to the
 world. Schoolcraft was misled by Gallatin into saying that Narvaez
 discovered the Mississippi. De Vega does _not_ say so. The first
 explorers declared that the summer in that country was as warm as
 France, and they named one of the bays in the Gulf of St. Lawrence the
 Bay of Chaleur, or of warmth; but they said nothing about the winter
 being as cold as Greenland. In the manuscript account of Cartier's
 second voyage, attributed by some to that navigator himself, it is
 called "the greatest river, without comparison, that is known to have
 ever been seen." The savages told him that it was the "chemin du
 Canada,"--the highway to Canada,--"which goes so far that no man had
 ever been to the end that they had heard." The Saguenay, one of its
 tributaries, which the panorama has made known to New England within
 three years, is described by Cartier, in 1535, and still more
 particularly by Jean Alphonse, in 1542, who adds, "I think that this
 river comes from the sea of Cathay, for in this place there issues a
 strong current, and there runs there a terrible tide." The early
 explorers saw many whales and other sea-monsters far up the St.
 Lawrence. Champlain, in his map, represents a whale spouting in the
 harbor of Quebec, three hundred and sixty miles from what is called
 the mouth of the river; and Charlevoix takes his reader to the summit
 of Cape Diamond to see the "porpoises, white as snow," sporting on the
 surface of the harbor of Quebec. And Boucher says in 1664, "from there
 [Tadoussac] to Montreal is found a great quantity of _Marsouins
 blancs_." Several whales have been taken pretty high up the river
 since I was there. P. A. Gosse, in his "Canadian Naturalist," p. 171
 (London, 1840), speaks of "the white dolphin of the St. Lawrence
 (_Delphinus Canadensis_)," as considered different from those of the
 sea. "The Natural History Society of Montreal offered a prize, a few
 years ago, for an essay on the _Cetacea_ of the St. Lawrence, which
 was, I believe, handed in." In Champlain's day it was commonly called
 "the Great River of Canada." More than one nation has claimed it. In
 Ogilby's "America of 1670," in the map _Novi Belgii_, it is called "De
 Groote River van Niew Nederlandt." It bears different names in
 different parts of its course, as it flows through what were formerly
 the territories of different nations. From the Gulf to Lake Ontario
 it is called at present the St. Lawrence; from Montreal to the same
 place it is frequently called the Cateraqui; and higher up it is known
 successively as the Niagara, Detroit, St. Clair, St. Mary's, and St.
 Louis rivers. Humboldt, speaking of the Orinoco, says that this name
 is unknown in the interior of the country; so likewise the tribes that
 dwell about the sources of the St. Lawrence have never heard the name
 which it bears in the lower part of its course. It rises near another
 father of waters,--the Mississippi,--issuing from a remarkable spring
 far up in the woods, called Lake Superior, fifteen hundred miles in
 circumference; and several other springs there are thereabouts which
 feed it. It makes such a noise in its tumbling down at one place as is
 heard all round the world. Bouchette, the Surveyor-General of the
 Canadas, calls it "the most splendid river on the globe;" says that it
 is two thousand statute miles long (more recent geographers make it
 four or five hundred miles longer); that at the Riviere du Sud it is
 eleven miles wide; at the Traverse, thirteen; at the Paps of Matane,
 twenty-five; at the Seven Islands, seventy-three; and at its mouth,
 from Cape Rosier to the Mingan Settlements in Labrador, near one
 hundred and five (?) miles wide. According to Captain Bayfield's
 recent chart it is about _ninety-six_ geographical miles wide at the
 latter place, measuring at right angles with the stream. It has much
 the largest estuary, regarding both length and breadth, of any river
 on the globe. Humboldt says that the River Plate, which has the
 broadest estuary of the South American rivers, is ninety-two
 geographical miles wide at its mouth; also he found the Orinoco to be
 more than three miles wide at five hundred and sixty miles from its
 mouth; but he does not tell us that ships of six hundred tons can sail
 up it so far, as they can up the St. Lawrence to Montreal,--an equal
 distance. If he had described a fleet of such ships at anchor in a
 city's port so far inland, we should have got a very different idea of
 the Orinoco. Perhaps Charlevoix describes the St. Lawrence truly as
 the most _navigable_ river in the world. Between Montreal and Quebec
 it averages about two miles wide. The tide is felt as far up as Three
 Rivers, four hundred and thirty-two miles, which is as far as from
 Boston to Washington. As far up as Cap aux Oyes, sixty or seventy
 miles below Quebec, Kalm found a great part of the plants near the
 shore to be marine, as glasswort (_Salicornia_), seaside pease (_Pisum
 maritimum_), sea-milkwort (_Glaux_), beach-grass (_Psamma arenaria_),
 seaside plantain (_Plantago maritima_), the sea-rocket (_Bunias
 cakile_), etc.
 
 The geographer Guyot observes that the Maranon is three thousand miles
 long, and gathers its waters from a surface of a million and a half
 square miles; that the Mississippi is also three thousand miles long,
 but its basin covers only from eight to nine hundred thousand square
 miles; that the St. Lawrence is eighteen hundred miles long, and its
 basin covers more than a million square miles (Darby says five hundred
 thousand); and speaking of the lakes, he adds, "These vast fresh-water
 seas, together with the St. Lawrence, cover a surface of nearly one
 hundred thousand square miles, and it has been calculated that they
 contain about one half of all the fresh water on the surface of our
 planet." But all these calculations are necessarily very rude and
 inaccurate. Its tributaries, the Ottawa, St. Maurice, and Saguenay,
 are great rivers themselves. The latter is said to be more than one
 thousand (?) feet deep at its mouth, while its cliffs rise
 perpendicularly an equal distance above its surface. Pilots say there
 are no soundings till one hundred and fifty miles up the St. Lawrence.
 The greatest sounding in the river, given on Bayfield's chart of the
 gulf and river, is two hundred and twenty-eight fathoms. McTaggart, an
 engineer, observes that "the Ottawa is larger than all the rivers in
 Great Britain, were they running in one." The traveler Grey writes: "A
 dozen Danubes, Rhines, Taguses, and Thameses would be nothing to
 twenty miles of fresh water in breadth [as where he happened to be],
 from ten to forty fathoms in depth." And again: "There is not perhaps
 in the whole extent of this immense continent so fine an approach to
 it as by the river St. Lawrence. In the Southern States you have, in
 general, a level country for many miles inland; here you are
 introduced at once into a majestic scenery, where everything is on a
 grand scale,--mountains, woods, lakes, rivers, precipices,
 waterfalls."
 
 We have not yet the data for a minute comparison of the St. Lawrence
 with the South American rivers; but it is obvious that, taking it in
 connection with its lakes, its estuary, and its falls, it easily bears
 off the palm from all the rivers on the globe; for though, as
 Bouchette observes, it may not carry to the ocean a greater volume of
 water than the Amazon and Mississippi, its surface and cubic mass are
 far greater than theirs. But, unfortunately, this noble river is
 closed by ice from the beginning of December to the middle of April.
 The arrival of the first vessel from England when the ice breaks up
 is, therefore, a great event, as when the salmon, shad, and alewives
 come up a river in the spring to relieve the famishing inhabitants on
 its banks. Who can say what would have been the history of this
 continent if, as has been suggested, this river had emptied into the
 sea where New York stands!
 
 After visiting the Museum and taking one more look at the wall, I made
 haste to the Lord Sydenham steamer, which at five o'clock was to leave
 for Montreal. I had already taken a seat on deck, but finding that I
 had still an hour and a half to spare, and remembering that large map
 of Canada which I had seen in the parlor of the restaurant in my
 search after pudding, and realizing that I might never see the like
 out of the country, I returned thither, asked liberty to look at the
 map, rolled up the mahogany table, put my handkerchief on it, stood on
 it, and copied all I wanted before the maid came in and said to me
 standing on the table, "Some gentlemen want the room, sir;" and I
 retreated without having broken the neck of a single bottle, or my
 own, very thankful and willing to pay for all the solid food I had
 got. We were soon abreast of Cap Rouge, eight miles above Quebec,
 after we got under weigh. It was in this place, then called _Fort du
 France Roy_, that the Sieur de Roberval with his company, having sent
 home two of his three ships, spent the winter of 1542-43. It appears
 that they fared in the following manner (I translate from the
 original): "Each mess had only two loaves, weighing each a pound, and
 half a pound of beef. They ate pork for dinner, with half a pound of
 butter, and beef for supper, with about two handfuls of beans without
 butter. Wednesdays, Fridays, and Saturdays they ate salted cod, and
 sometimes green, for dinner, with butter; and porpoise and beans for
 supper. Monsieur Roberval administered good justice, and punished each
 according to his offense. One, named Michel Gaillon, was hung for
 theft; John of Nantes was put in irons and imprisoned for his fault;
 and others were likewise put in irons; and many were whipped, both men
 and women; by which means they lived in peace and tranquillity." In an
 account of a voyage up this river, printed in the Jesuit Relations in
 the year 1664, it is said: "It was an interesting navigation for us in
 ascending the river from Cap Tourmente to Quebec, to see on this side
 and on that, for the space of eight leagues, the farms and the houses
 of the company, built by our French, all along these shores. On the
 right, the seigniories of Beauport, of Notre Dame des Anges; and on
 the left, this beautiful Isle of Orleans." The same traveler names
 among the fruits of the country observed at the Isles of Richelieu, at
 the head of Lake St. Peter, "kinds (_des especes_) of little apples or
 haws (_senelles_), and of pears, which only ripen with the frost."
 
 Night came on before we had passed the high banks. We had come from
 Montreal to Quebec in one night. The return voyage, against the
 stream, takes but an hour longer. Jacques Cartier, the first white man
 who is known to have ascended this river, thus speaks of his voyage
 from what is now Quebec to the foot of Lake St. Peter, or about
 half-way to Montreal: "From the said day, the 19th, even to the 28th
 of the said month [September, 1535], we had been navigating up the
 said river without losing hour or day, during which time we had seen
 and found as much country and lands as level as we could desire, full
 of the most beautiful trees in the world," which he goes on to
 describe. But we merely slept and woke again to find that we had
 passed through all that country which he was eight days in sailing
 through. He must have had a troubled sleep. We were not long enough on
 the river to realize that it had length; we got only the impression of
 its breadth, as if we had passed over a lake a mile or two in breadth
 and several miles long, though we might thus have slept through a
 European kingdom. Being at the head of Lake St. Peter, on the
 above-mentioned 28th of September, dealing with the natives, Cartier
 says: "We inquired of them by signs if this was the route to Hochelaga
 [Montreal]; and they answered that it was, and that there were yet
 three days' journeys to go there." He finally arrived at Hochelaga on
 the 2d of October.
 
 When I went on deck at dawn we had already passed through Lake St.
 Peter, and saw islands ahead of us. Our boat advancing with a strong
 and steady pulse over the calm surface, we felt as if we were
 permitted to be awake in the scenery of a dream. Many vivacious
 Lombardy poplars along the distant shores gave them a novel and
 lively, though artificial, look, and contrasted strangely with the
 slender and graceful elms on both shores and islands. The church of
 Varennes, fifteen miles from Montreal, was conspicuous at a great
 distance before us, appearing to belong to, and rise out of, the
 river; and now, and before, Mount Royal indicated where the city was.
 We arrived about seven o'clock, and set forth immediately to ascend
 the mountain, two miles distant, going across lots in spite of
 numerous signs threatening the severest penalties to trespassers, past
 an old building known as the MacTavish property,--Simon MacTavish, I
 suppose, whom Silliman refers to as "in a sense the founder of the
 Northwestern Company." His tomb was behind in the woods, with a
 remarkably high wall and higher monument. The family returned to
 Europe. He could not have imagined how dead he would be in a few
 years, and all the more dead and forgotten for being buried under such
 a mass of gloomy stone, where not even memory could get at him without
 a crowbar. Ah! poor man, with that last end of his! However, he may
 have been the worthiest of mortals for aught that I know. From the
 mountain-top we got a view of the whole city; the flat, fertile,
 extensive island; the noble sea of the St. Lawrence swelling into
 lakes; the mountains about St. Hyacinthe, and in Vermont and New York;
 and the mouth of the Ottawa in the west, overlooking that St. Anne's
 where the voyageur sings his "parting hymn," and bids adieu to
 civilization,--a name, thanks to Moore's verses, the most suggestive
 of poetic associations of any in Canada. We, too, climbed the hill
 which Cartier, first of white men, ascended, and named Mont-real (the
 3d of October, O. S., 1535), and, like him, "we saw the said river as
 far as we could see, _grand_, _large_, _et spacieux_, going to
 the southwest," toward that land whither Donnacona had told the
 discoverer that he had been a month's journey from Canada, where there
 grew "_force Canelle et Girofle_," much cinnamon and cloves, and where
 also, as the natives told him, were three great lakes and afterward
 _une mer douce_,--a sweet sea,--_de laquelle n'est mention avoir vu le
 bout_, of which there is no mention to have seen the end. But instead
 of an Indian town far in the interior of a new world, with guides to
 show us where the river came from, we found a splendid and bustling
 stone-built city of white men, and only a few squalid Indians offered
 to sell us baskets at the Lachine Railroad Depot, and Hochelaga is,
 perchance, but the fancy name of an engine company or an eating-house.
 
   [Illustration: _Montreal from Mount Royal_]
 
 We left Montreal Wednesday, the 2d of October, late in the afternoon.
 In the La Prairie cars the Yankees made themselves merry, imitating
 the cries of the charette-drivers to perfection, greatly to the
 amusement of some French-Canadian travelers, and they kept it up all
 the way to Boston. I saw one person on board the boat at St. Johns,
 and one or two more elsewhere in Canada, wearing homespun gray
 greatcoats, or capotes, with conical and comical hoods, which fell
 back between their shoulders like small bags, ready to be turned up
 over the head when occasion required, though a hat usurped that place
 now. They looked as if they would be convenient and proper enough as
 long as the coats were new and tidy, but would soon come to have a
 beggarly and unsightly look, akin to rags and dust-holes. We reached
 Burlington early in the morning, where the Yankees tried to pass off
 their Canada coppers, but the newsboys knew better. Returning through
 the Green Mountains, I was reminded that I had not seen in Canada such
 brilliant autumnal tints as I had previously seen in Vermont. Perhaps
 there was not yet so great and sudden a contrast with the summer heats
 in the former country as in these mountain valleys. As we were passing
 through Ashburnham, by a new white house which stood at some distance
 in a field, one passenger exclaimed, so that all in the car could hear
 him, "There, there's not so good a house as that in all Canada!" I did
 not much wonder at his remark, for there is a neatness, as well as
 evident prosperity, a certain elastic easiness of circumstances, so to
 speak, when not rich, about a New England house, as if the proprietor
 could at least afford to make repairs in the spring, which the
 Canadian houses do not suggest. Though of stone, they are no better
 constructed than a stone barn would be with us; the only building,
 except the chateau, on which money and taste are expended, being the
 church. In Canada an ordinary New England house would be mistaken for
 the chateau, and while every village here contains at least several
 gentlemen or "squires," _there_ there is but one to a seigniory.
 
 I got home this Thursday evening, having spent just one week in Canada
 and traveled eleven hundred miles. The whole expense of this journey,
 including two guide-books and a map, which cost one dollar twelve and
 a half cents, was twelve dollars seventy-five cents. I do not suppose
 that I have seen all British America; that could not be done by a
 cheap excursion, unless it were a cheap excursion to the Icy Sea, as
 seen by Hearne or Mackenzie, and then, no doubt, some interesting
 features would be omitted. I wished to go a little way behind the word
 _Canadense_, of which naturalists make such frequent use; and I should
 like still right well to make a longer excursion on foot through the
 wilder parts of Canada, which perhaps might be called _Iter
 Canadense_.
 
 
 
 
 NATURAL HISTORY OF MASSACHUSETTS[3]
 
 
 Books of natural history make the most cheerful winter reading. I read
 in Audubon with a thrill of delight, when the snow covers the ground,
 of the magnolia, and the Florida keys, and their warm sea-breezes; of
 the fence-rail, and the cotton-tree, and the migrations of the
 rice-bird; of the breaking up of winter in Labrador, and the melting
 of the snow on the forks of the Missouri; and owe an accession of
 health to these reminiscences of luxuriant nature.
 
      Within the circuit of this plodding life,
      There enter moments of an azure hue,
      Untarnished fair as is the violet
      Or anemone, when the spring strews them
      By some meandering rivulet, which make
      The best philosophy untrue that aims
      But to console man for his grievances.
      I have remembered, when the winter came,
      High in my chamber in the frosty nights,
      When in the still light of the cheerful moon,
      On every twig and rail and jutting spout,
      The icy spears were adding to their length
      Against the arrows of the coming sun,
      How in the shimmering noon of summer past
      Some unrecorded beam slanted across
      The upland pastures where the Johnswort grew;
      Or heard, amid the verdure of my mind,
      The bee's long smothered hum, on the blue flag
      Loitering amidst the mead; or busy rill,
      Which now through all its course stands still and dumb,
      Its own memorial,--purling at its play
      Along the slopes, and through the meadows next,
      Until its youthful sound was hushed at last
      In the staid current of the lowland stream;
      Or seen the furrows shine but late upturned,
      And where the fieldfare followed in the rear,
      When all the fields around lay bound and hoar
      Beneath a thick integument of snow.
      So by God's cheap economy made rich
      To go upon my winter's task again.
 
 I am singularly refreshed in winter when I hear of service-berries,
 poke-weed, juniper. Is not heaven made up of these cheap summer
 glories? There is a singular health in those words, Labrador and East
 Main, which no desponding creed recognizes. How much more than Federal
 are these States! If there were no other vicissitudes than the
 seasons, our interest would never tire. Much more is adoing than
 Congress wots of. What journal do the persimmon and the buckeye keep,
 and the sharp-shinned hawk? What is transpiring from summer to winter
 in the Carolinas, and the Great Pine Forest, and the Valley of the
 Mohawk? The merely political aspect of the land is never very
 cheering; men are degraded when considered as the members of a
 political organization. On this side all lands present only the
 symptoms of decay. I see but Bunker Hill and Sing-Sing, the District
 of Columbia and Sullivan's Island, with a few avenues connecting them.
 But paltry are they all beside one blast of the east or the south wind
 which blows over them.
 
 In society you will not find health, but in nature. Unless our feet at
 least stood in the midst of nature, all our faces would be pale and
 livid. Society is always diseased, and the best is the most so. There
 is no scent in it so wholesome as that of the pines, nor any fragrance
 so penetrating and restorative as the life-everlasting in high
 pastures. I would keep some book of natural history always by me as a
 sort of elixir, the reading of which should restore the tone of the
 system. To the sick, indeed, nature is sick, but to the well, a
 fountain of health. To him who contemplates a trait of natural beauty
 no harm nor disappointment can come. The doctrines of despair, of
 spiritual or political tyranny or servitude, were never taught by such
 as shared the serenity of nature. Surely good courage will not flag
 here on the Atlantic border, as long as we are flanked by the Fur
 Countries. There is enough in that sound to cheer one under any
 circumstances. The spruce, the hemlock, and the pine will not
 countenance despair. Methinks some creeds in vestries and churches do
 forget the hunter wrapped in furs by the Great Slave Lake, and that
 the Esquimaux sledges are drawn by dogs, and in the twilight of the
 northern night the hunter does not give over to follow the seal and
 walrus on the ice. They are of sick and diseased imaginations who
 would toll the world's knell so soon. Cannot these sedentary sects do
 better than prepare the shrouds and write the epitaphs of those other
 busy living men? The practical faith of all men belies the preacher's
 consolation. What is any man's discourse to me, if I am not sensible
 of something in it as steady and cheery as the creak of crickets? In
 it the woods must be relieved against the sky. Men tire me when I am
 not constantly greeted and refreshed as by the flux of sparkling
 streams. Surely joy is the condition of life. Think of the young fry
 that leap in ponds, the myriads of insects ushered into being on a
 summer evening, the incessant note of the hyla with which the woods
 ring in the spring, the nonchalance of the butterfly carrying accident
 and change painted in a thousand hues upon its wings, or the brook
 minnow stoutly stemming the current, the lustre of whose scales, worn
 bright by the attrition, is reflected upon the bank!
 
 We fancy that this din of religion, literature, and philosophy, which
 is heard in pulpits, lyceums, and parlors, vibrates through the
 universe, and is as catholic a sound as the creaking of the earth's
 axle; but if a man sleep soundly, he will forget it all between sunset
 and dawn. It is the three-inch swing of a pendulum in a cupboard,
 which the great pulse of nature vibrates by and through each instant.
 When we lift our eyelids and open our ears, it disappears with smoke
 and rattle like the cars on a railroad. When I detect a beauty in any
 of the recesses of nature, I am reminded, by the serene and retired
 spirit in which it requires to be contemplated, of the inexpressible
 privacy of a life,--how silent and unambitious it is. The beauty there
 is in mosses must be considered from the holiest, quietest nook. What
 an admirable training is science for the more active warfare of life!
 Indeed, the unchallenged bravery which these studies imply, is far
 more impressive than the trumpeted valor of the warrior. I am pleased
 to learn that Thales was up and stirring by night not unfrequently,
 as his astronomical discoveries prove. Linnaeus, setting out for
 Lapland, surveys his "comb" and "spare shirt," "leathern breeches" and
 "gauze cap to keep off gnats," with as much complacency as Bonaparte a
 park of artillery for the Russian campaign. The quiet bravery of the
 man is admirable. His eye is to take in fish, flower, and bird,
 quadruped and biped. Science is always brave; for to know is to know
 good; doubt and danger quail before her eye. What the coward overlooks
 in his hurry, she calmly scrutinizes, breaking ground like a pioneer
 for the array of arts that follow in her train. But cowardice is
 unscientific; for there cannot be a science of ignorance. There may be
 a science of bravery, for that advances; but a retreat is rarely well
 conducted; if it is, then is it an orderly advance in the face of
 circumstances.
 
 But to draw a little nearer to our promised topics. Entomology extends
 the limits of being in a new direction, so that I walk in nature with
 a sense of greater space and freedom. It suggests besides, that the
 universe is not rough-hewn, but perfect in its details. Nature will
 bear the closest inspection; she invites us to lay our eye level with
 the smallest leaf, and take an insect view of its plain. She has no
 interstices; every part is full of life. I explore, too, with
 pleasure, the sources of the myriad sounds which crowd the summer
 noon, and which seem the very grain and stuff of which eternity is
 made. Who does not remember the shrill roll-call of the harvest-fly?
 There were ears for these sounds in Greece long ago, as Anacreon's ode
 will show.
 
      "We pronounce thee happy, Cicada,
      For on the tops of the trees,
      Drinking a little dew,
      Like any king thou singest,
      For thine are they all,
      Whatever thou seest in the fields,
      And whatever the woods bear.
      Thou art the friend of the husbandmen,
      In no respect injuring any one;
      And thou art honored among men,
      Sweet prophet of summer.
      The Muses love thee,
      And Phoebus himself loves thee,
      And has given thee a shrill song;
      Age does not wrack thee,
      Thou skillful, earthborn, song-loving,
      Unsuffering, bloodless one;
      Almost thou art like the gods."
 
 In the autumn days, the creaking of crickets is heard at noon over all
 the land, and as in summer they are heard chiefly at nightfall, so
 then by their incessant chirp they usher in the evening of the year.
 Nor can all the vanities that vex the world alter one whit the measure
 that night has chosen. Every pulse-beat is in exact time with the
 cricket's chant and the tickings of the deathwatch in the wall.
 Alternate with these if you can.
 
 About two hundred and eighty birds either reside permanently in the
 State, or spend the summer only, or make us a passing visit. Those
 which spend the winter with us have obtained our warmest sympathy. The
 nuthatch and chickadee flitting in company through the dells of the
 wood, the one harshly scolding at the intruder, the other with a faint
 lisping note enticing him on; the jay screaming in the orchard; the
 crow cawing in unison with the storm; the partridge, like a russet
 link extended over from autumn to spring, preserving unbroken the
 chain of summers; the hawk with warrior-like firmness abiding the
 blasts of winter; the robin[4] and lark lurking by warm springs in the
 woods; the familiar snowbird culling a few seeds in the garden or a
 few crumbs in the yard; and occasionally the shrike, with heedless and
 unfrozen melody bringing back summer again:--
 
      His steady sails he never furls
      At any time o' year,
      And perching now on Winter's curls,
      He whistles in his ear.
 
 As the spring advances, and the ice is melting in the river, our
 earliest and straggling visitors make their appearance. Again does the
 old Teian poet sing as well for New England as for Greece, in the
 
 RETURN OF SPRING
 
      Behold, how, Spring appearing,
      The Graces send forth roses;
      Behold, how the wave of the sea
      Is made smooth by the calm;
      Behold, how the duck dives;
      Behold, how the crane travels;
      And Titan shines constantly bright.
      The shadows of the clouds are moving;
      The works of man shine;
      The earth puts forth fruits;
      The fruit of the olive puts forth.
      The cup of Bacchus is crowned,
      Along the leaves, along the branches,
      The fruit, bending them down, flourishes.
 
 The ducks alight at this season in the still water, in company with
 the gulls, which do not fail to improve an east wind to visit our
 meadows, and swim about by twos and threes, pluming themselves, and
 diving to peck at the root of the lily, and the cranberries which the
 frost has not loosened. The first flock of geese is seen beating to
 north, in long harrows and waving lines; the jingle of the song
 sparrow salutes us from the shrubs and fences; the plaintive note of
 the lark comes clear and sweet from the meadow; and the bluebird, like
 an azure ray, glances past us in our walk. The fish hawk, too, is
 occasionally seen at this season sailing majestically over the water,
 and he who has once observed it will not soon forget the majesty of
 its flight. It sails the air like a ship of the line, worthy to
 struggle with the elements, falling back from time to time like a ship
 on its beam ends, and holding its talons up as if ready for the
 arrows, in the attitude of the national bird. It is a great presence,
 as of the master of river and forest. Its eye would not quail before
 the owner of the soil, but make him feel like an intruder on its
 domains. And then its retreat, sailing so steadily away, is a kind of
 advance. I have by me one of a pair of ospreys, which have for some
 years fished in this vicinity, shot by a neighboring pond, measuring
 more than two feet in length, and six in the stretch of its wings.
 Nuttall mentions that "the ancients, particularly Aristotle, pretended
 that the ospreys taught their young to gaze at the sun, and those who
 were unable to do so were destroyed. Linnaeus even believed, on ancient
 authority, that one of the feet of this bird had all the toes divided,
 while the other was partly webbed, so that it could swim with one
 foot, and grasp a fish with the other." But that educated eye is now
 dim, and those talons are nerveless. Its shrill scream seems yet to
 linger in its throat, and the roar of the sea in its wings. There is
 the tyranny of Jove in its claws, and his wrath in the erectile
 feathers of the head and neck. It reminds me of the Argonautic
 expedition, and would inspire the dullest to take flight over
 Parnassus.
 
 The booming of the bittern, described by Goldsmith and Nuttall, is
 frequently heard in our fens, in the morning and evening, sounding
 like a pump, or the chopping of wood in a frosty morning in some
 distant farm-yard. The manner in which this sound is produced I have
 not seen anywhere described. On one occasion, the bird has been seen
 by one of my neighbors to thrust its bill into the water, and suck up
 as much as it could hold, then, raising its head, it pumped it out
 again with four or five heaves of the neck, throwing it two or three
 feet, and making the sound each time.
 
 At length the summer's eternity is ushered in by the cackle of the
 flicker among the oaks on the hillside, and a new dynasty begins with
 calm security.
 
 In May and June the woodland quire is in full tune, and, given the
 immense spaces of hollow air, and this curious human ear, one does
 not see how the void could be better filled.
 
      Each summer sound
      Is a summer round.
 
 As the season advances, and those birds which make us but a passing
 visit depart, the woods become silent again, and but few feathers
 ruffle the drowsy air. But the solitary rambler may still find a
 response and expression for every mood in the depths of the wood.
 
      Sometimes I hear the veery's[5] clarion,
      Or brazen trump of the impatient jay,
      And in secluded woods the chickadee
      Doles out her scanty notes, which sing the praise
      Of heroes, and set forth the loveliness
      Of virtue evermore.
 
 The phoebe still sings in harmony with the sultry weather by the
 brink of the pond, nor are the desultory hours of noon in the midst of
 the village without their minstrel.
 
      Upon the lofty elm-tree sprays
      The vireo rings the changes sweet,
      During the trivial summer days,
      Striving to lift our thoughts above the street.
 
 With the autumn begins in some measure a new spring. The plover is
 heard whistling high in the air over the dry pastures, the finches
 flit from tree to tree, the bobolinks and flickers fly in flocks, and
 the goldfinch rides on the earliest blast, like a winged hyla peeping
 amid the rustle of the leaves. The crows, too, begin now to
 congregate; you may stand and count them as they fly low and
 straggling over the landscape, singly or by twos and threes, at
 intervals of half a mile, until a hundred have passed.
 
 I have seen it suggested somewhere that the crow was brought to this
 country by the white man; but I shall as soon believe that the white
 man planted these pines and hemlocks. He is no spaniel to follow our
 steps; but rather flits about the clearings like the dusky spirit of
 the Indian, reminding me oftener of Philip and Powhatan than of
 Winthrop and Smith. He is a relic of the dark ages. By just so slight,
 by just so lasting a tenure does superstition hold the world ever;
 there is the rook in England, and the crow in New England.
 
      Thou dusky spirit of the wood,
      Bird of an ancient brood,
      Flitting thy lonely way,
      A meteor in the summer's day,
      From wood to wood, from hill to hill,
      Low over forest, field, and rill,
      What wouldst thou say?
      Why shouldst thou haunt the day?
      What makes thy melancholy float?
      What bravery inspires thy throat,
      And bears thee up above the clouds,
      Over desponding human crowds,
      Which far below
      Lay thy haunts low?
 
 The late walker or sailor, in the October evenings, may hear the
 murmurings of the snipe, circling over the meadows, the most
 spirit-like sound in nature; and still later in the autumn, when the
 frosts have tinged the leaves, a solitary loon pays a visit to our
 retired ponds, where he may lurk undisturbed till the season of
 moulting is passed, making the woods ring with his wild laughter. This
 bird, the Great Northern Diver, well deserves its name; for when
 pursued with a boat, it will dive, and swim like a fish under water,
 for sixty rods or more, as fast as a boat can be paddled, and its
 pursuer, if he would discover his game again, must put his ear to the
 surface to hear where it comes up. When it comes to the surface, it
 throws the water off with one shake of its wings, and calmly swims
 about until again disturbed.
 
 These are the sights and sounds which reach our senses oftenest during
 the year. But sometimes one hears a quite new note, which has for
 background other Carolinas and Mexicos than the books describe, and
 learns that his ornithology has done him no service.
 
 It appears from the Report that there are about forty quadrupeds
 belonging to the State, and among these one is glad to hear of a few
 bears, wolves, lynxes, and wildcats.
 
 When our river overflows its banks in the spring, the wind from the
 meadows is laden with a strong scent of musk, and by its freshness
 advertises me of an unexplored wildness. Those backwoods are not far
 off then. I am affected by the sight of the cabins of the muskrat,
 made of mud and grass, and raised three or four feet along the river,
 as when I read of the barrows of Asia. The muskrat is the beaver of
 the settled States. Their number has even increased within a few
 years in this vicinity. Among the rivers which empty into the
 Merrimack, the Concord is known to the boatmen as a dead stream. The
 Indians are said to have called it Musketaquid, or Prairie River. Its
 current being much more sluggish and its water more muddy than the
 rest, it abounds more in fish and game of every kind. According to the
 History of the town, "The fur-trade was here once very important. As
 early as 1641, a company was formed in the colony, of which Major
 Willard of Concord was superintendent, and had the exclusive right to
 trade with the Indians in furs and other articles; and for this right
 they were obliged to pay into the public treasury one twentieth of all
 the furs they obtained." There are trappers in our midst still, as
 well as on the streams of the far West, who night and morning go the
 round of their traps, without fear of the Indian. One of these takes
 from one hundred and fifty to two hundred muskrats in a year, and even
 thirty-six have been shot by one man in a day. Their fur, which is not
 nearly as valuable as formerly, is in good condition in the winter and
 spring only; and upon the breaking up of the ice, when they are driven
 out of their holes by the water, the greatest number is shot from
 boats, either swimming or resting on their stools, or slight supports
 of grass and reeds, by the side of the stream. Though they exhibit
 considerable cunning at other times, they are easily taken in a trap,
 which has only to be placed in their holes, or wherever they frequent,
 without any bait being used, though it is sometimes rubbed with their
 musk. In the winter the hunter cuts holes in the ice, and shoots them
 when they come to the surface. Their burrows are usually in the high
 banks of the river, with the entrance under water, and rising within
 to above the level of high water. Sometimes their nests, composed of
 dried meadow-grass and flags, may be discovered where the bank is low
 and spongy, by the yielding of the ground under the feet. They have
 from three to seven or eight young in the spring.
 
 Frequently, in the morning or evening, a long ripple is seen in the
 still water, where a muskrat is crossing the stream, with only its
 nose above the surface, and sometimes a green bough in its mouth to
 build its house with. When it finds itself observed, it will dive and
 swim five or six rods under water, and at length conceal itself in its
 hole, or the weeds. It will remain under water for ten minutes at a
 time, and on one occasion has been seen, when undisturbed, to form an
 air-bubble under the ice, which contracted and expanded as it breathed
 at leisure. When it suspects danger on shore, it will stand erect like
 a squirrel, and survey its neighborhood for several minutes, without
 moving.
 
 In the fall, if a meadow intervene between their burrows and the
 stream, they erect cabins of mud and grass, three or four feet high,
 near its edge. These are not their breeding-places, though young are
 sometimes found in them in late freshets, but rather their
 hunting-lodges, to which they resort in the winter with their food,
 and for shelter. Their food consists chiefly of flags and fresh-water
 mussels, the shells of the latter being left in large quantities
 around their lodges in the spring.
 
 The Penobscot Indian wears the entire skin of a muskrat, with the
 legs and tail dangling, and the head caught under his girdle, for a
 pouch, into which he puts his fishing-tackle, and essences to scent
 his traps with.
 
 The bear, wolf, lynx, wildcat, deer, beaver, and marten have
 disappeared; the otter is rarely if ever seen here at present; and the
 mink is less common than formerly.
 
 Perhaps of all our untamed quadrupeds, the fox has obtained the widest
 and most familiar reputation, from the time of Pilpay and Aesop to the
 present day. His recent tracks still give variety to a winter's walk.
 I tread in the steps of the fox that has gone before me by some hours,
 or which perhaps I have started, with such a tiptoe of expectation as
 if I were on the trail of the Spirit itself which resides in the wood,
 and expected soon to catch it in its lair. I am curious to know what
 has determined its graceful curvatures, and how surely they were
 coincident with the fluctuations of some mind. I know which way a mind
 wended, what horizon it faced, by the setting of these tracks, and
 whether it moved slowly or rapidly, by their greater or less intervals
 and distinctness; for the swiftest step leaves yet a lasting trace.
 Sometimes you will see the trails of many together, and where they
 have gamboled and gone through a hundred evolutions, which testify to
 a singular listlessness and leisure in nature.
 
 When I see a fox run across the pond on the snow, with the
 carelessness of freedom, or at intervals trace his course in the
 sunshine along the ridge of a hill, I give up to him sun and earth as
 to their true proprietor. He does not go in the sun, but it seems to
 follow him, and there is a visible sympathy between him and it.
 Sometimes, when the snow lies light and but five or six inches deep,
 you may give chase and come up with one on foot. In such a case he
 will show a remarkable presence of mind, choosing only the safest
 direction, though he may lose ground by it. Notwithstanding his
 fright, he will take no step which is not beautiful. His pace is a
 sort of leopard canter, as if he were in no wise impeded by the snow,
 but were husbanding his strength all the while. When the ground is
 uneven, the course is a series of graceful curves, conforming to the
 shape of the surface. He runs as though there were not a bone in his
 back. Occasionally dropping his muzzle to the ground for a rod or two,
 and then tossing his head aloft, when satisfied of his course. When he
 comes to a declivity, he will put his fore feet together, and slide
 swiftly down it, shoving the snow before him. He treads so softly that
 you would hardly hear it from any nearness, and yet with such
 expression that it would not be quite inaudible at any distance.
 
 Of fishes, seventy-five genera and one hundred and seven species are
 described in the Report. The fisherman will be startled to learn that
 there are but about a dozen kinds in the ponds and streams of any
 inland town; and almost nothing is known of their habits. Only their
 names and residence make one love fishes. I would know even the number
 of their fin-rays, and how many scales compose the lateral line. I am
 the wiser in respect to all knowledges, and the better qualified for
 all fortunes, for knowing that there is a minnow in the brook.
 Methinks I have need even of his sympathy, and to be his fellow in a
 degree.
 
 I have experienced such simple delight in the trivial matters of
 fishing and sporting, formerly, as might have inspired the muse of
 Homer or Shakespeare; and now, when I turn the pages and ponder the
 plates of the Angler's Souvenir, I am fain to exclaim,--
 
                          "Can such things be,
      And overcome us like a summer's cloud?"
 
 Next to nature, it seems as if man's actions were the most natural,
 they so gently accord with her. The small seines of flax stretched
 across the shallow and transparent parts of our river are no more
 intrusion than the cobweb in the sun. I stay my boat in mid-current,
 and look down in the sunny water to see the civil meshes of his nets,
 and wonder how the blustering people of the town could have done this
 elvish work. The twine looks like a new river-weed, and is to the
 river as a beautiful memento of man's presence in nature, discovered
 as silently and delicately as a footprint in the sand.
 
 When the ice is covered with snow, I do not suspect the wealth under
 my feet; that there is as good as a mine under me wherever I go. How
 many pickerel are poised on easy fin fathoms below the loaded wain!
 The revolution of the seasons must be a curious phenomenon to them. At
 length the sun and wind brush aside their curtain, and they see the
 heavens again.
 
 Early in the spring, after the ice has melted, is the time for
 spearing fish. Suddenly the wind shifts from northeast and east to
 west and south, and every icicle, which has tinkled on the meadow
 grass so long, trickles down its stem, and seeks its level unerringly
 with a million comrades. The steam curls up from every roof and
 fence.
 
      I see the civil sun drying earth's tears,
      Her tears of joy, which only faster flow.
 
 In the brooks is heard the slight grating sound of small cakes of ice,
 floating with various speed, full of content and promise, and where
 the water gurgles under a natural bridge, you may hear these hasty
 rafts hold conversation in an undertone. Every rill is a channel for
 the juices of the meadow. In the ponds the ice cracks with a merry and
 inspiriting din, and down the larger streams is whirled grating
 hoarsely, and crashing its way along, which was so lately a highway
 for the woodman's team and the fox, sometimes with the tracks of the
 skaters still fresh upon it, and the holes cut for pickerel. Town
 committees anxiously inspect the bridges and causeways, as if by mere
 eye-force to intercede with the ice and save the treasury.
 
      The river swelleth more and more,
      Like some sweet influence stealing o'er
      The passive town; and for a while
      Each tussock makes a tiny isle,
      Where, on some friendly Ararat,
      Resteth the weary water-rat.
 
      No ripple shows Musketaquid,
      Her very current e'en is hid,
      As deepest souls do calmest rest
      When thoughts are swelling in the breast,
      And she that in the summer's drought
      Doth make a rippling and a rout,
      Sleeps from Nahshawtuck to the Cliff,
      Unruffled by a single skiff.
      But by a thousand distant hills
      The louder roar a thousand rills,
      And many a spring which now is dumb,
      And many a stream with smothered hum,
      Doth swifter well and faster glide,
      Though buried deep beneath the tide.
      Our village shows a rural Venice,
      Its broad lagoons where yonder fen is;
      As lovely as the Bay of Naples
      Yon placid cove amid the maples;
      And in my neighbor's field of corn
      I recognize the Golden Horn.
 
      Here Nature taught from year to year,
      When only red men came to hear,--
      Methinks 't was in this school of art
      Venice and Naples learned their part;
      But still their mistress, to my mind,
      Her young disciples leaves behind.
 
 The fisherman now repairs and launches his boat. The best time for
 spearing is at this season, before the weeds have begun to grow, and
 while the fishes lie in the shallow water, for in summer they prefer
 the cool depths, and in the autumn they are still more or less
 concealed by the grass. The first requisite is fuel for your crate;
 and for this purpose the roots of the pitch pine are commonly used,
 found under decayed stumps, where the trees have been felled eight or
 ten years.
 
 With a crate, or jack, made of iron hoops, to contain your fire, and
 attached to the bow of your boat about three feet from the water, a
 fish-spear with seven tines and fourteen feet long, a large basket or
 barrow to carry your fuel and bring back your fish, and a thick outer
 garment, you are equipped for a cruise. It should be a warm and still
 evening; and then, with a fire crackling merrily at the prow, you may
 launch forth like a cucullo into the night. The dullest soul cannot
 go upon such an expedition without some of the spirit of adventure; as
 if he had stolen the boat of Charon and gone down the Styx on a
 midnight expedition into the realms of Pluto. And much speculation
 does this wandering star afford to the musing night-walker, leading
 him on and on, jack-o'-lantern-like, over the meadows; or, if he is
 wiser, he amuses himself with imagining what of human life, far in the
 silent night, is flitting moth-like round its candle. The silent
 navigator shoves his craft gently over the water, with a smothered
 pride and sense of benefaction, as if he were the phosphor, or
 light-bringer, to these dusky realms, or some sister moon, blessing
 the spaces with her light. The waters, for a rod or two on either hand
 and several feet in depth, are lit up with more than noonday
 distinctness, and he enjoys the opportunity which so many have
 desired, for the roofs of a city are indeed raised, and he surveys the
 midnight economy of the fishes. There they lie in every variety of
 posture; some on their backs, with their white bellies uppermost, some
 suspended in mid-water, some sculling gently along with a dreamy
 motion of the fins, and others quite active and wide awake,--a scene
 not unlike what the human city would present. Occasionally he will
 encounter a turtle selecting the choicest morsels, or a muskrat
 resting on a tussock. He may exercise his dexterity, if he sees fit,
 on the more distant and active fish, or fork the nearer into his boat,
 as potatoes out of a pot, or even take the sound sleepers with his
 hands. But these last accomplishments he will soon learn to dispense
 with, distinguishing the real object of his pursuit, and find
 compensation in the beauty and never-ending novelty of his position.
 The pines growing down to the water's edge will show newly as in the
 glare of a conflagration; and as he floats under the willows with his
 light, the song sparrow will often wake on her perch, and sing that
 strain at midnight which she had meditated for the morning. And when
 he has done, he may have to steer his way home through the dark by the
 north star, and he will feel himself some degrees nearer to it for
 having lost his way on the earth.
 
 The fishes commonly taken in this way are pickerel, suckers, perch,
 eels, pouts, breams, and shiners,--from thirty to sixty weight in a
 night. Some are hard to be recognized in the unnatural light,
 especially the perch, which, his dark bands being exaggerated,
 acquires a ferocious aspect. The number of these transverse bands,
 which the Report states to be seven, is, however, very variable, for
 in some of our ponds they have nine and ten even.
 
 It appears that we have eight kinds of tortoises, twelve snakes,--but
 one of which is venomous,--nine frogs and toads, nine salamanders, and
 one lizard, for our neighbors.
 
 I am particularly attracted by the motions of the serpent tribe. They
 make our hands and feet, the wings of the bird, and the fins of the
 fish seem very superfluous, as if Nature had only indulged her fancy
 in making them. The black snake will dart into a bush when pursued,
 and circle round and round with an easy and graceful motion, amid the
 thin and bare twigs, five or six feet from the ground, as a bird flits
 from bough to bough, or hang in festoons between the forks.
 Elasticity and flexibleness in the simpler forms of animal life are
 equivalent to a complex system of limbs in the higher; and we have
 only to be as wise and wily as the serpent, to perform as difficult
 feats without the vulgar assistance of hands and feet.
 
 In May, the snapping turtle (_Emysaurus serpentina_) is frequently
 taken on the meadows and in the river. The fisherman, taking sight
 over the calm surface, discovers its snout projecting above the water,
 at the distance of many rods, and easily secures his prey through its
 unwillingness to disturb the water by swimming hastily away, for,
 gradually drawing its head under, it remains resting on some limb or
 clump of grass. Its eggs, which are buried at a distance from the
 water, in some soft place, as a pigeon-bed, are frequently devoured by
 the skunk. It will catch fish by daylight, as a toad catches flies,
 and is said to emit a transparent fluid from its mouth to attract
 them.
 
 Nature has taken more care than the fondest parent for the education
 and refinement of her children. Consider the silent influence which
 flowers exert, no less upon the ditcher in the meadow than the lady in
 the bower. When I walk in the woods, I am reminded that a wise
 purveyor has been there before me; my most delicate experience is
 typified there. I am struck with the pleasing friendships and
 unanimities of nature, as when the lichen on the trees takes the form
 of their leaves. In the most stupendous scenes you will see delicate
 and fragile features, as slight wreaths of vapor, dew-lines, feathery
 sprays, which suggest a high refinement, a noble blood and breeding,
 as it were. It is not hard to account for elves and fairies; they
 represent this light grace, this ethereal gentility. Bring a spray
 from the wood, or a crystal from the brook, and place it on your
 mantel, and your household ornaments will seem plebeian beside its
 nobler fashion and bearing. It will wave superior there, as if used to
 a more refined and polished circle. It has a salute and a response to
 all your enthusiasm and heroism.
 
 In the winter, I stop short in the path to admire how the trees grow
 up without forethought, regardless of the time and circumstances. They
 do not wait as man does, but now is the golden age of the sapling.
 Earth, air, sun, and rain are occasion enough; they were no better in
 primeval centuries. The "winter of _their_ discontent" never comes.
 Witness the buds of the native poplar standing gayly out to the frost
 on the sides of its bare switches. They express a naked confidence.
 With cheerful heart one could be a sojourner in the wilderness, if he
 were sure to find there the catkins of the willow or the alder. When I
 read of them in the accounts of northern adventurers, by Baffin's Bay
 or Mackenzie's River, I see how even there, too, I could dwell. They
 are our little vegetable redeemers. Methinks our virtue will hold out
 till they come again. They are worthy to have had a greater than
 Minerva or Ceres for their inventor. Who was the benignant goddess
 that bestowed them on mankind?
 
 Nature is mythical and mystical always, and works with the license and
 extravagance of genius. She has her luxurious and florid style as well
 as art. Having a pilgrim's cup to make, she gives to the whole--stem,
 bowl, handle, and nose--some fantastic shape, as if it were to be the
 car of some fabulous marine deity, a Nereus or Triton.
 
 In the winter, the botanist need not confine himself to his books and
 herbarium, and give over his outdoor pursuits, but may study a new
 department of vegetable physiology, what may be called crystalline
 botany, then. The winter of 1837 was unusually favorable for this. In
 December of that year, the Genius of vegetation seemed to hover by
 night over its summer haunts with unusual persistency. Such a
 hoar-frost as is very uncommon here or anywhere, and whose full
 effects can never be witnessed after sunrise, occurred several times.
 As I went forth early on a still and frosty morning, the trees looked
 like airy creatures of darkness caught napping; on this side huddled
 together, with their gray hairs streaming, in a secluded valley which
 the sun had not penetrated; on that, hurrying off in Indian file along
 some watercourse, while the shrubs and grasses, like elves and fairies
 of the night, sought to hide their diminished heads in the snow. The
 river, viewed from the high bank, appeared of a yellowish-green color,
 though all the landscape was white. Every tree, shrub, and spire of
 grass, that could raise its head above the snow, was covered with a
 dense ice-foliage, answering, as it were, leaf for leaf to its summer
 dress. Even the fences had put forth leaves in the night. The centre,
 diverging, and more minute fibres were perfectly distinct, and the
 edges regularly indented. These leaves were on the side of the twig or
 stubble opposite to the sun, meeting it for the most part at right
 angles, and there were others standing out at all possible angles upon
 these and upon one another, with no twig or stubble supporting them.
 When the first rays of the sun slanted over the scene, the grasses
 seemed hung with innumerable jewels, which jingled merrily as they
 were brushed by the foot of the traveler, and reflected all the hues
 of the rainbow, as he moved from side to side. It struck me that these
 ghost leaves, and the green ones whose forms they assume, were the
 creatures of but one law; that in obedience to the same law the
 vegetable juices swell gradually into the perfect leaf, on the one
 hand, and the crystalline particles troop to their standard in the
 same order, on the other. As if the material were indifferent, but the
 law one and invariable, and every plant in the spring but pushed up
 into and filled a permanent and eternal mould, which, summer and
 winter forever, is waiting to be filled.
 
 This foliate structure is common to the coral and the plumage of
 birds, and to how large a part of animate and inanimate nature. The
 same independence of law on matter is observable in many other
 instances, as in the natural rhymes, when some animal form, color, or
 odor has its counterpart in some vegetable. As, indeed, all rhymes
 imply an eternal melody, independent of any particular sense.
 
 As confirmation of the fact that vegetation is but a kind of
 crystallization, every one may observe how, upon the edge of the
 melting frost on the window, the needle-shaped particles are bundled
 together so as to resemble fields waving with grain, or shocks rising
 here and there from the stubble; on one side the vegetation of the
 torrid zone, high-towering palms and wide-spread banyans, such as are
 seen in pictures of oriental scenery; on the other, arctic pines stiff
 frozen, with downcast branches.
 
 Vegetation has been made the type of all growth; but as in crystals
 the law is more obvious, their material being more simple, and for the
 most part more transient and fleeting, would it not be as
 philosophical as convenient to consider all growth, all filling up
 within the limits of nature, but a crystallization more or less rapid?
 
 On this occasion, in the side of the high bank of the river, wherever
 the water or other cause had formed a cavity, its throat and outer
 edge, like the entrance to a citadel, bristled with a glistening
 ice-armor. In one place you might see minute ostrich-feathers, which
 seemed the waving plumes of the warriors filing into the fortress; in
 another, the glancing, fan-shaped banners of the Lilliputian host; and
 in another, the needle-shaped particles collected into bundles,
 resembling the plumes of the pine, might pass for a phalanx of spears.
 From the under side of the ice in the brooks, where there was a
 thicker ice below, depended a mass of crystallization, four or five
 inches deep, in the form of prisms, with their lower ends open, which,
 when the ice was laid on its smooth side, resembled the roofs and
 steeples of a Gothic city, or the vessels of a crowded haven under a
 press of canvas. The very mud in the road, where the ice had melted,
 was crystallized with deep rectilinear fissures, and the crystalline
 masses in the sides of the ruts resembled exactly asbestos in the
 disposition of their needles. Around the roots of the stubble and
 flower-stalks, the frost was gathered into the form of irregular
 conical shells, or fairy rings. In some places the ice-crystals were
 lying upon granite rocks, directly over crystals of quartz, the
 frostwork of a longer night, crystals of a longer period, but, to some
 eye unprejudiced by the short term of human life, melting as fast as
 the former.
 
 In the Report on the Invertebrate Animals, this singular fact is
 recorded, which teaches us to put a new value on time and space: "The
 distribution of the marine shells is well worthy of notice as a
 geological fact. Cape Cod, the right arm of the Commonwealth, reaches
 out into the ocean, some fifty or sixty miles. It is nowhere many
 miles wide; but this narrow point of land has hitherto proved a
 barrier to the migrations of many species of Mollusca. Several genera
 and numerous species, which are separated by the intervention of only
 a few miles of land, are effectually prevented from mingling by the
 Cape, and do not pass from one side to the other.... Of the one
 hundred and ninety-seven marine species, eighty-three do not pass to
 the south shore, and fifty are not found on the north shore of the
 Cape."
 
 That common mussel, the _Unio complanatus_, or more properly
 _fluviatilis_, left in the spring by the muskrat upon rocks and
 stumps, appears to have been an important article of food with the
 Indians. In one place, where they are said to have feasted, they are
 found in large quantities, at an elevation of thirty feet above the
 river, filling the soil to the depth of a foot, and mingled with ashes
 and Indian remains.
 
 The works we have placed at the head of our chapter, with as much
 license as the preacher selects his text, are such as imply more
 labor than enthusiasm. The State wanted complete catalogues of its
 natural riches, with such additional facts merely as would be directly
 useful.
 
 The reports on Fishes, Reptiles, Insects, and Invertebrate Animals,
 however, indicate labor and research, and have a value independent of
 the object of the legislature.
 
 Those on Herbaceous Plants and Birds cannot be of much value, as long
 as Bigelow and Nuttall are accessible. They serve but to indicate,
 with more or less exactness, what species are found in the State. We
 detect several errors ourselves, and a more practiced eye would no
 doubt expand the list.
 
 The Quadrupeds deserved a more final and instructive report than they
 have obtained.
 
 These volumes deal much in measurements and minute descriptions, not
 interesting to the general reader, with only here and there a colored
 sentence to allure him, like those plants growing in dark forests,
 which bear only leaves without blossoms. But the ground was
 comparatively unbroken, and we will not complain of the pioneer, if he
 raises no flowers with his first crop. Let us not underrate the value
 of a fact; it will one day flower in a truth. It is astonishing how
 few facts of importance are added in a century to the natural history
 of any animal. The natural history of man himself is still being
 gradually written. Men are knowing enough after their fashion. Every
 countryman and dairy-maid knows that the coats of the fourth stomach
 of the calf will curdle milk, and what particular mushroom is a safe
 and nutritious diet. You cannot go into any field or wood, but it
 will seem as if every stone had been turned, and the bark on every
 tree ripped up. But, after all, it is much easier to discover than to
 see when the cover is off. It has been well said that "the attitude of
 inspection is prone." Wisdom does not inspect, but behold. We must
 look a long time before we can see. Slow are the beginnings of
 philosophy. He has something demoniacal in him, who can discern a law
 or couple two facts. We can imagine a time when "Water runs down hill"
 may have been taught in the schools. The true man of science will know
 nature better by his finer organization; he will smell, taste, see,
 hear, feel, better than other men. His will be a deeper and finer
 experience. We do not learn by inference and deduction and the
 application of mathematics to philosophy, but by direct intercourse
 and sympathy. It is with science as with ethics,--we cannot know truth
 by contrivance and method; the Baconian is as false as any other, and
 with all the helps of machinery and the arts, the most scientific will
 still be the healthiest and friendliest man, and possess a more
 perfect Indian wisdom.
 
 FOOTNOTES:
 
 [3] _Reports--on the Fishes, Reptiles, and Birds; the Herbaceous
 Plants and Quadrupeds; the Insects Injurious to Vegetation; and the
 Invertebrate Animals of Massachusetts._ Published agreeably to an
 Order of the Legislature, by the Commissioners on the Zoological and
 Botanical Survey of the State.
 
 [4] A white robin and a white quail have occasionally been seen. It is
 mentioned in Audubon as remarkable that the nest of a robin should be
 found on the ground; but this bird seems to be less particular than
 most in the choice of a building-spot. I have seen its nest placed
 under the thatched roof of a deserted barn, and in one instance, where
 the adjacent country was nearly destitute of trees, together with two
 of the phoebe, upon the end of a board in the loft of a sawmill, but
 a few feet from the saw, which vibrated several inches with the motion
 of the machinery.
 
 [5] This bird, which is so well described by Nuttall, but is
 apparently unknown by the author of the Report, is one of the most
 common in the woods in this vicinity, and in Cambridge I have heard
 the college yard ring with its trill. The boys call it "yorrick," from
 the sound of its querulous and chiding note, as it flits near the
 traveler through the underwood. The cowbird's egg is occasionally
 found in its nest, as mentioned by Audubon.
 
 
 
 
 A WALK TO WACHUSETT
 
           CONCORD, July 19, 1842.
 
      The needles of the pine
      All to the west incline.
 
 
 Summer and winter our eyes had rested on the dim outline of the
 mountains in our horizon, to which distance and indistinctness lent a
 grandeur not their own, so that they served equally to interpret all
 the allusions of poets and travelers; whether with Homer, on a spring
 morning, we sat down on the many-peaked Olympus, or with Virgil and
 his compeers roamed the Etrurian and Thessalian hills, or with
 Humboldt measured the more modern Andes and Teneriffe. Thus we spoke
 our mind to them, standing on the Concord cliffs:--
 
      With frontier strength ye stand your ground,
      With grand content ye circle round,
      Tumultuous silence for all sound,
      Ye distant nursery of rills,
      Monadnock, and the Peterboro' hills;
      Like some vast fleet,
      Sailing through rain and sleet,
      Through winter's cold and summer's heat;
      Still holding on, upon your high emprise,
      Until ye find a shore amid the skies;
      Not skulking close to land,
      With cargo contraband,
      For they who sent a venture out by ye
      Have set the sun to see
      Their honesty.
      Ships of the line, each one,
      Ye to the westward run,
      Always before the gale,
      Under a press of sail,
      With weight of metal all untold.
      I seem to feel ye, in my firm seat here,
      Immeasurable depth of hold,
      And breadth of beam, and length of running gear.
 
      Methinks ye take luxurious pleasure
      In your novel western leisure;
      So cool your brows, and freshly blue,
      As Time had nought for ye to do;
      For ye lie at your length,
      An unappropriated strength,
      Unhewn primeval timber,
      For knees so stiff, for masts so limber;
      The stock of which new earths are made
      One day to be our western trade,
      Fit for the stanchions of a world
      Which through the seas of space is hurled.
 
      While we enjoy a lingering ray,
      Ye still o'ertop the western day,
      Reposing yonder, on God's croft,
      Like solid stacks of hay.
      Edged with silver, and with gold,
      The clouds hang o'er in damask fold,
      And with such depth of amber light
      The west is dight,
      Where still a few rays slant,
      That even heaven seems extravagant.
      On the earth's edge mountains and trees
      Stand as they were on air graven,
      Or as the vessels in a haven
      Await the morning breeze.
      I fancy even
      Through your defiles windeth the way to heaven;
      And yonder still, in spite of history's page,
      Linger the golden and the silver age;
      Upon the laboring gale
      The news of future centuries is brought,
      And of new dynasties of thought,
      From your remotest vale.
 
      But special I remember thee,
      Wachusett, who like me
      Standest alone without society.
      Thy far blue eye,
      A remnant of the sky,
      Seen through the clearing or the gorge
      Or from the windows of the forge,
      Doth leaven all it passes by.
      Nothing is true,
      But stands 'tween me and you,
      Thou western pioneer,
      Who know'st not shame nor fear
      By venturous spirit driven,
      Under the eaves of heaven.
      And canst expand thee there,
      And breathe enough of air?
      Upholding heaven, holding down earth,
      Thy pastime from thy birth,
      Not steadied by the one, nor leaning on the other;
      May I approve myself thy worthy brother!
 
   [Illustration: _Mount Wachusett from the Wayland Hills_]
 
 At length, like Rasselas, and other inhabitants of happy valleys, we
 resolved to scale the blue wall which bounded the western horizon,
 though not without misgivings that thereafter no visible fairyland
 would exist for us. But we will not leap at once to our journey's end,
 though near, but imitate Homer, who conducts his reader over the
 plain, and along the resounding sea, though it be but to the tent of
 Achilles. In the spaces of thought are the reaches of land and water,
 where men go and come. The landscape lies far and fair within, and the
 deepest thinker is the farthest traveled.
 
 At a cool and early hour on a pleasant morning in July, my companion
 and I passed rapidly through Acton and Stow, stopping to rest and
 refresh us on the bank of a small stream, a tributary of the Assabet,
 in the latter town. As we traversed the cool woods of Acton, with
 stout staves in our hands, we were cheered by the song of the red-eye,
 the thrushes, the phoebe, and the cuckoo; and as we passed through
 the open country, we inhaled the fresh scent of every field, and all
 nature lay passive, to be viewed and traveled. Every rail, every
 farmhouse, seen dimly in the twilight, every tinkling sound told of
 peace and purity, and we moved happily along the dank roads, enjoying
 not such privacy as the day leaves when it withdraws, but such as it
 has not profaned. It was solitude with light; which is better than
 darkness. But anon, the sound of the mower's rifle was heard in the
 fields, and this, too, mingled with the lowing of kine.
 
 This part of our route lay through the country of hops, which plant
 perhaps supplies the want of the vine in American scenery, and may
 remind the traveler of Italy and the South of France, whether he
 traverses the country when the hop-fields, as then, present solid and
 regular masses of verdure, hanging in graceful festoons from pole to
 pole, the cool coverts where lurk the gales which refresh the
 wayfarer; or in September, when the women and children, and the
 neighbors from far and near, are gathered to pick the hops into long
 troughs; or later still, when the poles stand piled in vast pyramids
 in the yards, or lie in heaps by the roadside.
 
 The culture of the hop, with the processes of picking, drying in the
 kiln, and packing for the market, as well as the uses to which it is
 applied, so analogous to the culture and uses of the grape, may afford
 a theme for future poets.
 
 The mower in the adjacent meadow could not tell us the name of the
 brook on whose banks we had rested, or whether it had any, but his
 younger companion, perhaps his brother, knew that it was Great Brook.
 Though they stood very near together in the field, the things they
 knew were very far apart; nor did they suspect each other's reserved
 knowledge, till the stranger came by. In Bolton, while we rested on
 the rails of a cottage fence, the strains of music which issued from
 within, probably in compliment to us, sojourners, reminded us that
 thus far men were fed by the accustomed pleasures. So soon did we,
 wayfarers, begin to learn that man's life is rounded with the same few
 facts, the same simple relations everywhere, and it is vain to travel
 to find it new. The flowers grow more various ways than he. But coming
 soon to higher land, which afforded a prospect of the mountains, we
 thought we had not traveled in vain, if it were only to hear a truer
 and wilder pronunciation of their names from the lips of the
 inhabitants; not _Way_-tatic, _Way_-chusett, but _Wor_-tatic,
 _Wor_-chusett. It made us ashamed of our tame and civil pronunciation,
 and we looked upon them as born and bred farther west than we. Their
 tongues had a more generous accent than ours, as if breath was cheaper
 where they wagged. A countryman, who speaks but seldom, talks
 copiously, as it were, as his wife sets cream and cheese before you
 without stint. Before noon we had reached the highlands overlooking
 the valley of Lancaster (affording the first fair and open prospect
 into the west), and there, on the top of a hill, in the shade of some
 oaks, near to where a spring bubbled out from a leaden pipe, we rested
 during the heat of the day, reading Virgil and enjoying the scenery.
 It was such a place as one feels to be on the outside of the earth;
 for from it we could, in some measure, see the form and structure of
 the globe. There lay Wachusett, the object of our journey, lowering
 upon us with unchanged proportions, though with a less ethereal aspect
 than had greeted our morning gaze, while further north, in successive
 order, slumbered its sister mountains along the horizon.
 
 We could get no further into the Aeneid than
 
      -- atque altae moenia Romae,
      -- and the wall of high Rome,
 
 before we were constrained to reflect by what myriad tests a work of
 genius has to be tried; that Virgil, away in Rome, two thousand years
 off, should have to unfold his meaning, the inspiration of Italian
 vales, to the pilgrim on New England hills. This life so raw and
 modern, that so civil and ancient; and yet we read Virgil mainly to be
 reminded of the identity of human nature in all ages, and, by the
 poet's own account, we are both the children of a late age, and live
 equally under the reign of Jupiter.
 
      "He shook honey from the leaves, and removed fire,
      And stayed the wine, everywhere flowing in rivers;
      That experience, by meditating, might invent various arts
      By degrees, and seek the blade of corn in furrows,
      And strike out hidden fire from the veins of the flint."
 
 The old world stands serenely behind the new, as one mountain yonder
 towers behind another, more dim and distant. Rome imposes her story
 still upon this late generation. The very children in the school we
 had that morning passed had gone through her wars, and recited her
 alarms, ere they had heard of the wars of neighboring Lancaster. The
 roving eye still rests inevitably on her hills, and she still holds up
 the skirts of the sky on that side, and makes the past remote.
 
 The lay of the land hereabouts is well worthy the attention of the
 traveler. The hill on which we were resting made part of an extensive
 range, running from southwest to northeast, across the country, and
 separating the waters of the Nashua from those of the Concord, whose
 banks we had left in the morning, and by bearing in mind this fact, we
 could easily determine whither each brook was bound that crossed our
 path. Parallel to this, and fifteen miles further west, beyond the
 deep and broad valley in which lie Groton, Shirley, Lancaster, and
 Boylston, runs the Wachusett range, in the same general direction. The
 descent into the valley on the Nashua side is by far the most sudden;
 and a couple of miles brought us to the southern branch of the Nashua,
 a shallow but rapid stream, flowing between high and gravelly banks.
 But we soon learned that these were no _gelidae valles_ into which we
 had descended, and, missing the coolness of the morning air, feared it
 had become the sun's turn to try his power upon us.
 
      "The sultry sun had gained the middle sky,
      And not a tree, and not an herb was nigh,"
 
 and with melancholy pleasure we echoed the melodious plaint of our
 fellow-traveler, Hassan, in the desert,--
 
      "Sad was the hour, and luckless was the day,
      When first from Schiraz' walls I bent my way."
 
 The air lay lifeless between the hills, as in a seething caldron, with
 no leaf stirring, and instead of the fresh odor of grass and clover,
 with which we had before been regaled, the dry scent of every herb
 seemed merely medicinal. Yielding, therefore, to the heat, we strolled
 into the woods, and along the course of a rivulet, on whose banks we
 loitered, observing at our leisure the products of these new fields.
 He who traverses the woodland paths, at this season, will have
 occasion to remember the small, drooping, bell-like flowers and
 slender red stem of the dogsbane, and the coarser stem and berry of
 the poke, which are both common in remoter and wilder scenes; and if
 "the sun casts such a reflecting heat from the sweet-fern" as makes
 him faint, when he is climbing the bare hills, as they complained who
 first penetrated into these parts, the cool fragrance of the
 swamp-pink restores him again, when traversing the valleys between.
 
 As we went on our way late in the afternoon, we refreshed ourselves by
 bathing our feet in every rill that crossed the road, and anon, as we
 were able to walk in the shadows of the hills, recovered our morning
 elasticity. Passing through Sterling, we reached the banks of the
 Stillwater, in the western part of the town, at evening, where is a
 small village collected. We fancied that there was already a certain
 western look about this place, a smell of pines and roar of water,
 recently confined by dams, belying its name, which were exceedingly
 grateful. When the first inroad has been made, a few acres leveled,
 and a few houses erected, the forest looks wilder than ever. Left to
 herself, nature is always more or less civilized, and delights in a
 certain refinement; but where the axe has encroached upon the edge of
 the forest, the dead and unsightly limbs of the pine, which she had
 concealed with green banks of verdure, are exposed to sight. This
 village had, as yet, no post-office, nor any settled name. In the
 small villages which we entered, the villagers gazed after us, with a
 complacent, almost compassionate look, as if we were just making our
 _debut_ in the world at a late hour. "Nevertheless," did they seem to
 say, "come and study us, and learn men and manners." So is each one's
 world but a clearing in the forest, so much open and inclosed ground.
 The landlord had not yet returned from the field with his men, and the
 cows had yet to be milked. But we remembered the inscription on the
 wall of the Swedish inn, "You will find at Trolhate excellent bread,
 meat, and wine, provided you bring them with you," and were contented.
 But I must confess it did somewhat disturb our pleasure, in this
 withdrawn spot, to have our own village newspaper handed us by our
 host, as if the greatest charm the country offered to the traveler was
 the facility of communication with the town. Let it recline on its own
 everlasting hills, and not be looking out from their summits for some
 petty Boston or New York in the horizon.
 
 At intervals we heard the murmuring of water, and the slumberous
 breathing of crickets, throughout the night; and left the inn the next
 morning in the gray twilight, after it had been hallowed by the night
 air, and when only the innocent cows were stirring, with a kind of
 regret. It was only four miles to the base of the mountain, and the
 scenery was already more picturesque. Our road lay along the course of
 the Stillwater, which was brawling at the bottom of a deep ravine,
 filled with pines and rocks, tumbling fresh from the mountains, so
 soon, alas! to commence its career of usefulness. At first, a cloud
 hung between us and the summit, but it was soon blown away. As we
 gathered the raspberries, which grew abundantly by the roadside, we
 fancied that that action was consistent with a lofty prudence; as if
 the traveler who ascends into a mountainous region should fortify
 himself by eating of such light ambrosial fruits as grow there, and
 drinking of the springs which gush out from the mountain-sides, as he
 gradually inhales the subtler and purer atmosphere of those elevated
 places, thus propitiating the mountain gods by a sacrifice of their
 own fruits. The gross products of the plains and valleys are for such
 as dwell therein; but it seemed to us that the juices of this berry
 had relation to the thin air of the mountain-tops.
 
 In due time we began to ascend the mountain, passing, first, through a
 grand sugar maple wood, which bore the marks of the auger, then a
 denser forest, which gradually became dwarfed, till there were no
 trees whatever. We at length pitched our tent on the summit. It is but
 nineteen hundred feet above the village of Princeton, and three
 thousand above the level of the sea; but by this slight elevation it
 is infinitely removed from the plain, and when we reached it we felt a
 sense of remoteness, as if we had traveled into distant regions, to
 Arabia Petraea, or the farthest East. A robin upon a staff was the
 highest object in sight. Swallows were flying about us, and the
 chewink and cuckoo were heard near at hand. The summit consists of a
 few acres, destitute of trees, covered with bare rocks, interspersed
 with blueberry bushes, raspberries, gooseberries, strawberries, moss,
 and a fine, wiry grass. The common yellow lily and dwarf cornel grow
 abundantly in the crevices of the rocks. This clear space, which is
 gently rounded, is bounded a few feet lower by a thick shrubbery of
 oaks, with maples, aspens, beeches, cherries, and occasionally a
 mountain-ash intermingled, among which we found the bright blue
 berries of the Solomon's-seal, and the fruit of the pyrola. From the
 foundation of a wooden observatory, which was formerly erected on the
 highest point, forming a rude, hollow structure of stone, a dozen feet
 in diameter, and five or six in height, we could see Monadnock, in
 simple grandeur, in the northwest, rising nearly a thousand feet
 higher, still the "far blue mountain," though with an altered profile.
 The first day the weather was so hazy that it was in vain we
 endeavored to unravel the obscurity. It was like looking into the sky
 again, and the patches of forest here and there seemed to flit like
 clouds over a lower heaven. As to voyagers of an aerial Polynesia, the
 earth seemed like a larger island in the ether; on every side, even as
 low as we, the sky shutting down, like an unfathomable deep, around
 it, a blue Pacific island, where who knows what islanders inhabit? and
 as we sail near its shores we see the waving of trees and hear the
 lowing of kine.
 
 We read Virgil and Wordsworth in our tent, with new pleasure there,
 while waiting for a clearer atmosphere, nor did the weather prevent
 our appreciating the simple truth and beauty of Peter Bell:--
 
      "And he had lain beside his asses,
      On lofty Cheviot Hills:
 
      "And he had trudged through Yorkshire dales,
      Among the rocks and winding _scars_;
      Where deep and low the hamlets lie
      Beneath their little patch of sky
      And little lot of stars."
 
 Who knows but this hill may one day be a Helvellyn, or even a
 Parnassus, and the Muses haunt here, and other Homers frequent the
 neighboring plains?
 
      Not unconcerned Wachusett rears his head
        Above the field, so late from nature won,
      With patient brow reserved, as one who read
        New annals in the history of man.
 
 The blueberries which the mountain afforded, added to the milk we had
 brought, made our frugal supper, while for entertainment the even-song
 of the wood thrush rang along the ridge. Our eyes rested on no painted
 ceiling nor carpeted hall, but on skies of Nature's painting, and
 hills and forests of her embroidery. Before sunset, we rambled along
 the ridge to the north, while a hawk soared still above us. It was a
 place where gods might wander, so solemn and solitary, and removed
 from all contagion with the plain. As the evening came on, the haze
 was condensed in vapor, and the landscape became more distinctly
 visible, and numerous sheets of water were brought to light.
 
      "Et jam summa procul villarum culmina fumant,
      Majoresque cadunt altis de montibus umbrae."
 
      And now the tops of the villas smoke afar off,
      And the shadows fall longer from the high mountains.
 
 As we stood on the stone tower while the sun was setting, we saw the
 shades of night creep gradually over the valleys of the east; and the
 inhabitants went into their houses, and shut their doors, while the
 moon silently rose up, and took possession of that part. And then the
 same scene was repeated on the west side, as far as the Connecticut
 and the Green Mountains, and the sun's rays fell on us two alone, of
 all New England men.
 
 It was the night but one before the full of the moon, so bright that
 we could see to read distinctly by moonlight, and in the evening
 strolled over the summit without danger. There was, by chance, a fire
 blazing on Monadnock that night, which lighted up the whole western
 horizon, and, by making us aware of a community of mountains, made our
 position seem less solitary. But at length the wind drove us to the
 shelter of our tent, and we closed its door for the night, and fell
 asleep.
 
 It was thrilling to hear the wind roar over the rocks, at intervals
 when we waked, for it had grown quite cold and windy. The night was,
 in its elements, simple even to majesty in that bleak place,--a bright
 moonlight and a piercing wind. It was at no time darker than twilight
 within the tent, and we could easily see the moon through its
 transparent roof as we lay; for there was the moon still above us,
 with Jupiter and Saturn on either hand, looking down on Wachusett, and
 it was a satisfaction to know that they were our fellow-travelers
 still, as high and out of our reach as our own destiny. Truly the
 stars were given for a consolation to man. We should not know but our
 life were fated to be always groveling, but it is permitted to behold
 them, and surely they are deserving of a fair destiny. We see laws
 which never fail, of whose failure we never conceived; and their lamps
 burn all the night, too, as well as all day,--so rich and lavish is
 that nature which can afford this superfluity of light.
 
 The morning twilight began as soon as the moon had set, and we arose
 and kindled our fire, whose blaze might have been seen for thirty
 miles around. As the daylight increased, it was remarkable how rapidly
 the wind went down. There was no dew on the summit, but coldness
 supplied its place. When the dawn had reached its prime, we enjoyed
 the view of a distinct horizon line, and could fancy ourselves at sea,
 and the distant hills the waves in the horizon, as seen from the deck
 of a vessel. The cherry-birds flitted around us, the nuthatch and
 flicker were heard among the bushes, the titmouse perched within a few
 feet, and the song of the wood thrush again rang along the ridge. At
 length we saw the run rise up out of the sea, and shine on
 Massachusetts; and from this moment the atmosphere grew more and more
 transparent till the time of our departure, and we began to realize
 the extent of the view, and how the earth, in some degree, answered to
 the heavens in breadth, the white villages to the constellations in
 the sky. There was little of the sublimity and grandeur which belong
 to mountain scenery, but an immense landscape to ponder on a summer's
 day. We could see how ample and roomy is nature. As far as the eye
 could reach there was little life in the landscape; the few birds
 that flitted past did not crowd. The travelers on the remote highways,
 which intersect the country on every side, had no fellow-travelers for
 miles, before or behind. On every side, the eye ranged over successive
 circles of towns, rising one above another, like the terraces of a
 vineyard, till they were lost in the horizon. Wachusett is, in fact,
 the observatory of the State. There lay Massachusetts, spread out
 before us in its length and breadth, like a map. There was the level
 horizon which told of the sea on the east and south, the well-known
 hills of New Hampshire on the north, and the misty summits of the
 Hoosac and Green Mountains, first made visible to us the evening
 before, blue and unsubstantial, like some bank of clouds which the
 morning wind would dissipate, on the northwest and west. These last
 distant ranges, on which the eye rests unwearied, commence with an
 abrupt boulder in the north, beyond the Connecticut, and travel
 southward, with three or four peaks dimly seen. But Monadnock, rearing
 its masculine front in the northwest, is the grandest feature. As we
 beheld it, we knew that it was the height of land between the two
 rivers, on this side the valley of the Merrimack, on that of the
 Connecticut, fluctuating with their blue seas of air,--these rival
 vales, already teeming with Yankee men along their respective streams,
 born to what destiny who shall tell? Watatic and the neighboring
 hills, in this State and in New Hampshire, are a continuation of the
 same elevated range on which we were standing. But that New Hampshire
 bluff,--that promontory of a State,--lowering day and night on this
 our State of Massachusetts, will longest haunt our dreams.
 
 We could at length realize the place mountains occupy on the land, and
 how they come into the general scheme of the universe. When first we
 climb their summits and observe their lesser irregularities, we do not
 give credit to the comprehensive intelligence which shaped them; but
 when afterward we behold their outlines in the horizon, we confess
 that the hand which moulded their opposite slopes, making one to
 balance the other, worked round a deep centre, and was privy to the
 plan of the universe. So is the least part of nature in its bearings
 referred to all space. These lesser mountain ranges, as well as the
 Alleghanies, run from northeast to southwest, and parallel with these
 mountain streams are the more fluent rivers, answering to the general
 direction of the coast, the bank of the great ocean stream itself.
 Even the clouds, with their thin bars, fall into the same direction by
 preference, and such even is the course of the prevailing winds, and
 the migration of men and birds. A mountain chain determines many
 things for the statesman and philosopher. The improvements of
 civilization rather creep along its sides than cross its summit. How
 often is it a barrier to prejudice and fanaticism! In passing over
 these heights of land, through their thin atmosphere, the follies of
 the plain are refined and purified; and as many species of plants do
 not scale their summits, so many species of folly, no doubt, do not
 cross the Alleghanies; it is only the hardy mountain-plant that creeps
 quite over the ridge, and descends into the valley beyond.
 
 We get a dim notion of the flight of birds, especially of such as fly
 high in the air, by having ascended a mountain. We can now see what
 landmarks mountains are to their migrations; how the Catskills and
 Highlands have hardly sunk to them, when Wachusett and Monadnock open
 a passage to the northeast; how they are guided, too, in their course
 by the rivers and valleys; and who knows but by the stars, as well as
 the mountain ranges, and not by the petty landmarks which we use. The
 bird whose eye takes in the Green Mountains on the one side, and the
 ocean on the other, need not be at a loss to find its way.
 
 At noon we descended the mountain, and, having returned to the abodes
 of men, turned our faces to the east again; measuring our progress,
 from time to time, by the more ethereal hues which the mountain
 assumed. Passing swiftly through Stillwater and Sterling, as with a
 downward impetus, we found ourselves almost at home again in the green
 meadows of Lancaster, so like our own Concord, for both are watered by
 two streams which unite near their centres, and have many other
 features in common. There is an unexpected refinement about this
 scenery; level prairies of great extent, interspersed with elms and
 hop-fields and groves of trees, give it almost a classic appearance.
 This, it will be remembered, was the scene of Mrs. Rowlandson's
 capture, and of other events in the Indian wars, but from this July
 afternoon, and under that mild exterior, those times seemed as remote
 as the irruption of the Goths. They were the dark age of New England.
 On beholding a picture of a New England village as it then appeared,
 with a fair open prospect, and a light on trees and river, as if it
 were broad noon, we find we had not thought the sun shone in those
 days, or that men lived in broad daylight then. We do not imagine the
 sun shining on hill and valley during Philip's war, nor on the
 war-path of Paugus, or Standish, or Church, or Lovell, with serene
 summer weather, but a dim twilight or night did those events transpire
 in. They must have fought in the shade of their own dusky deeds.
 
 At length, as we plodded along the dusty roads, our thoughts became as
 dusty as they; all thought indeed stopped, thinking broke down, or
 proceeded only passively in a sort of rhythmical cadence of the
 confused material of thought, and we found ourselves mechanically
 repeating some familiar measure which timed with our tread; some verse
 of the Robin Hood ballads, for instance, which one can recommend to
 travel by:--
 
      "Sweavens are swift, sayd lyttle John,
        As the wind blows over the hill;
      For if it be never so loud this night,
        To-morrow it may be still."
 
 And so it went, up-hill and down, till a stone interrupted the line,
 when a new verse was chosen:--
 
      "His shoote it was but loosely shott,
        Yet flewe not the arrowe in vaine,
      For it mett one of the sheriffe's men,
        And William a Trent was slaine."
 
 There is, however, this consolation to the most wayworn traveler, upon
 the dustiest road, that the path his feet describe is so perfectly
 symbolical of human life,--now climbing the hills, now descending into
 the vales. From the summits he beholds the heavens and the horizon,
 from the vales he looks up to the heights again. He is treading his
 old lessons still, and though he may be very weary and travel-worn, it
 is yet sincere experience.
 
 Leaving the Nashua, we changed our route a little, and arrived at
 Stillriver Village, in the western part of Harvard, just as the sun
 was setting. From this place, which lies to the northward, upon the
 western slope of the same range of hills on which we had spent the
 noon before, in the adjacent town, the prospect is beautiful, and the
 grandeur of the mountain outlines unsurpassed. There was such a repose
 and quiet here at this hour, as if the very hillsides were enjoying
 the scene; and as we passed slowly along, looking back over the
 country we had traversed, and listening to the evening song of the
 robin, we could not help contrasting the equanimity of Nature with the
 bustle and impatience of man. His words and actions presume always a
 crisis near at hand, but she is forever silent and unpretending.
 
 And now that we have returned to the desultory life of the plain, let
 us endeavor to import a little of that mountain grandeur into it. We
 will remember within what walls we lie, and understand that this level
 life too has its summit, and why from the mountain-top the deepest
 valleys have a tinge of blue; that there is elevation in every hour,
 as no part of the earth is so low that the heavens may not be seen
 from, and we have only to stand on the summit of our hour to command
 an uninterrupted horizon.
 
 We rested that night at Harvard, and the next morning, while one bent
 his steps to the nearer village of Groton, the other took his
 separate and solitary way to the peaceful meadows of Concord; but let
 him not forget to record the brave hospitality of a farmer and his
 wife, who generously entertained him at their board, though the poor
 wayfarer could only congratulate the one on the continuance of hay
 weather, and silently accept the kindness of the other. Refreshed by
 this instance of generosity, no less than by the substantial viands
 set before him, he pushed forward with new vigor, and reached the
 banks of the Concord before the sun had climbed many degrees into the
 heavens.
 
 
 
 
 THE LANDLORD
 
 
 Under the one word "house" are included the schoolhouse, the
 almshouse, the jail, the tavern, the dwelling-house; and the meanest
 shed or cave in which men live contains the elements of all these. But
 nowhere on the earth stands the entire and perfect house. The
 Parthenon, St. Peter's, the Gothic minster, the palace, the hovel, are
 but imperfect executions of an imperfect idea. Who would dwell in
 them? Perhaps to the eye of the gods the cottage is more holy than the
 Parthenon, for they look down with no especial favor upon the shrines
 formally dedicated to them, and that should be the most sacred roof
 which shelters most of humanity. Surely, then, the gods who are most
 interested in the human race preside over the Tavern, where especially
 men congregate. Methinks I see the thousand shrines erected to
 Hospitality shining afar in all countries, as well Mahometan and
 Jewish as Christian, khans and caravansaries and inns, whither all
 pilgrims without distinction resort.
 
 Likewise we look in vain, east or west over the earth, to find the
 perfect man; but each represents only some particular excellence. The
 Landlord is a man of more open and general sympathies, who possesses a
 spirit of hospitality which is its own reward, and feeds and shelters
 men from pure love of the creatures. To be sure, this profession is as
 often filled by imperfect characters, and such as have sought it from
 unworthy motives, as any other, but so much the more should we prize
 the true and honest Landlord when we meet with him.
 
 Who has not imagined to himself a country inn, where the traveler
 shall really feel _in_, and at home, and at his public house, who was
 before at his private house?--whose host is indeed a _host_, and a
 _lord_ of the _land_, a self-appointed brother of his race; called to
 his place, beside, by all the winds of heaven and his good genius, as
 truly as the preacher is called to preach; a man of such universal
 sympathies, and so broad and genial a human nature, that he would fain
 sacrifice the tender but narrow ties of private friendship to a broad,
 sunshiny, fair-weather-and-foul friendship for his race; who loves
 men, not as a philosopher, with philanthropy, nor as an overseer of
 the poor, with charity, but by a necessity of his nature, as he loves
 dogs and horses; and standing at his open door from morning till night
 would fain see more and more of them come along the highway, and is
 never satiated. To him the sun and moon are but travelers, the one by
 day and the other by night; and they too patronize his house. To his
 imagination all things travel save his sign-post and himself; and
 though you may be his neighbor for years, he will show you only the
 civilities of the road. But on the other hand, while nations and
 individuals are alike selfish and exclusive, he loves all men equally;
 and if he treats his nearest neighbor as a stranger, since he has
 invited all nations to share his hospitality, the farthest-traveled is
 in some measure kindred to him who takes him into the bosom of his
 family.
 
 He keeps a house of entertainment at the sign of the Black Horse or
 the Spread Eagle, and is known far and wide, and his fame travels with
 increasing radius every year. All the neighborhood is in his interest,
 and if the traveler ask how far to a tavern, he receives some such
 answer as this: "Well, sir, there's a house about three miles from
 here, where they haven't taken down their sign yet; but it's only ten
 miles to Slocum's, and that's a capital house, both for man and
 beast." At three miles he passes a cheerless barrack, standing
 desolate behind its sign-post, neither public nor private, and has
 glimpses of a discontented couple who have mistaken their calling. At
 ten miles see where the Tavern stands,--really an _entertaining_
 prospect,--so public and inviting that only the rain and snow do not
 enter. It is no gay pavilion, made of bright stuffs, and furnished
 with nuts and gingerbread, but as plain and sincere as a caravansary;
 located in no Tarrytown, where you receive only the civilities of
 commerce, but far in the fields it exercises a primitive hospitality,
 amid the fresh scent of new hay and raspberries, if it be summer-time,
 and the tinkling of cow-bells from invisible pastures; for it is a
 land flowing with milk and honey, and the newest milk courses in a
 broad, deep stream across the premises.
 
 In these retired places the tavern is first of all a
 house,--elsewhere, last of all, or never,--and warms and shelters its
 inhabitants. It is as simple and sincere in its essentials as the
 caves in which the first men dwelt, but it is also as open and public.
 The traveler steps across the threshold, and lo! he too is master, for
 he only can be called proprietor of the house here who behaves with
 most propriety in it. The Landlord stands clear back in nature, to my
 imagination, with his axe and spade felling trees and raising potatoes
 with the vigor of a pioneer; with Promethean energy making nature
 yield her increase to supply the wants of so many; and he is not so
 exhausted, nor of so short a stride, but that he comes forward even to
 the highway to this wide hospitality and publicity. Surely, he has
 solved some of the problems of life. He comes in at his back door,
 holding a log fresh cut for the hearth upon his shoulder with one
 hand, while he greets the newly arrived traveler with the other.
 
 Here at length we have free range, as not in palaces, nor cottages,
 nor temples, and intrude nowhere. All the secrets of housekeeping are
 exhibited to the eyes of men, above and below, before and behind. This
 is the necessary way to live, men have confessed, in these days, and
 shall he skulk and hide? And why should we have any serious disgust at
 kitchens? Perhaps they are the holiest recess of the house. There is
 the hearth, after all,--and the settle, and the fagots, and the
 kettle, and the crickets. We have pleasant reminiscences of these.
 They are the heart, the left ventricle, the very vital part of the
 house. Here the real and sincere life which we meet in the streets was
 actually fed and sheltered. Here burns the taper that cheers the
 lonely traveler by night, and from this hearth ascend the smokes that
 populate the valley to his eyes by day. On the whole, a man may not be
 so little ashamed of any other part of his house, for here is his
 sincerity and earnest, at least. It may not be here that the besoms
 are plied most,--it is not here that they need to be, for dust will
 not settle on the kitchen floor more than in nature.
 
 Hence it will not do for the Landlord to possess too fine a nature. He
 must have health above the common accidents of life, subject to no
 modern fashionable diseases; but no taste, rather a vast relish or
 appetite. His sentiments on all subjects will be delivered as freely
 as the wind blows; there is nothing private or individual in them,
 though still original, but they are public, and of the hue of the
 heavens over his house,--a certain out-of-door obviousness and
 transparency not to be disputed. What he does, his manners are not to
 be complained of, though abstractly offensive, for it is what man
 does, and in him the race is exhibited. When he eats, he is liver and
 bowels and the whole digestive apparatus to the company, and so all
 admit the thing is done. He must have no idiosyncrasies, no particular
 bents or tendencies to this or that, but a general, uniform, and
 healthy development, such as his portly person indicates, offering
 himself equally on all sides to men. He is not one of your peaked and
 inhospitable men of genius, with particular tastes, but, as we said
 before, has one uniform relish, and taste which never aspires higher
 than a tavern-sign, or the cut of a weather-cock. The man of genius,
 like a dog with a bone, or the slave who has swallowed a diamond, or a
 patient with the gravel, sits afar and retired, off the road, hangs
 out no sign of refreshment for man and beast, but says, by all
 possible hints and signs, I wish to be alone,--good-by,--farewell. But
 the Landlord can afford to live without privacy. He entertains no
 private thought, he cherishes no solitary hour, no Sabbath-day, but
 thinks,--enough to assert the dignity of reason,--and talks, and reads
 the newspaper. What he does not tell to one traveler he tells to
 another. He never wants to be alone, but sleeps, wakes, eats, drinks,
 sociably, still remembering his race. He walks abroad through the
 thoughts of men, and the Iliad and Shakespeare are tame to him, who
 hears the rude but homely incidents of the road from every traveler.
 The mail might drive through his brain in the midst of his most lonely
 soliloquy without disturbing his equanimity, provided it brought
 plenty of news and passengers. There can be no _pro_fanity where there
 is no fane behind, and the whole world may see quite round him.
 Perchance his lines have fallen to him in dustier places, and he has
 heroically sat down where two roads meet, or at the Four Corners or
 the Five Points, and his life is sublimely trivial for the good of
 men. The dust of travel blows ever in his eyes, and they preserve
 their clear, complacent look. The hourlies and half-hourlies, the
 dailies and weeklies, whirl on well-worn tracks, round and round his
 house, as if it were the goal in the stadium, and still he sits within
 in unruffled serenity, with no show of retreat. His neighbor dwells
 timidly behind a screen of poplars and willows, and a fence with
 sheaves of spears at regular intervals, or defended against the tender
 palms of visitors by sharp spikes,--but the traveler's wheels rattle
 over the door-step of the tavern, and he cracks his whip in the entry.
 He is truly glad to see you, and sincere as the bull's-eye over his
 door. The traveler seeks to find, wherever he goes, some one who will
 stand in this broad and catholic relation to him, who will be an
 inhabitant of the land to him a stranger, and represent its human
 nature, as the rock stands for its inanimate nature; and this is he.
 As his crib furnishes provender for the traveler's horse, and his
 larder provisions for his appetite, so his conversation furnishes the
 necessary aliment to his spirits. He knows very well what a man wants,
 for he is a man himself, and as it were the farthest-traveled, though
 he has never stirred from his door. He understands his needs and
 destiny. He would be well fed and lodged, there can be no doubt, and
 have the transient sympathy of a cheerful companion, and of a heart
 which always prophesies fair weather. And after all the greatest men,
 even, want much more the sympathy which every honest fellow can give,
 than that which the great only can impart. If he is not the most
 upright, let us allow him this praise, that he is the most downright
 of men. He has a hand to shake and to be shaken, and takes a sturdy
 and unquestionable interest in you, as if he had assumed the care of
 you, but if you will break your neck, he will even give you the best
 advice as to the method.
 
 The great poets have not been ungrateful to their landlords. Mine host
 of the Tabard Inn, in the Prologue to the Canterbury Tales, was an
 honor to his profession:--
 
      "A semely man our Hoste was, with alle,
      For to han been a marshal in an halle.
      A large man he was, with eyen stepe;
      A fairer burgeis was ther non in Chepe:
      Bold of his speche, and wise, and well ytaught,
      And of manhood him lacked righte naught.
      Eke thereto was he right a mery man,
      And after souper plaien he began,
      And spake of mirthe amonges other thinges,
      Whan that we hadden made our reckoninges."
 
 He is the true house-band, and centre of the company,--of greater
 fellowship and practical social talent than any. He it is that
 proposes that each shall tell a tale to while away the time to
 Canterbury, and leads them himself, and concludes with his own tale,--
 
      "Now, by my fader's soule that is ded,
      But ye be mery, smiteth of my hed:
      Hold up your hondes withouten more speche."
 
 If we do not look up to the Landlord, we look round for him on all
 emergencies, for he is a man of infinite experience, who unites hands
 with wit. He is a more public character than a statesman,--a publican,
 and not consequently a sinner; and surely, he, if any, should be
 exempted from taxation and military duty.
 
 Talking with our host is next best and instructive to talking with
 one's self. It is a more conscious soliloquy; as it were, to speak
 generally, and try what we would say provided we had an audience. He
 has indulgent and open ears, and does not require petty and particular
 statements. "Heigh-ho!" exclaims the traveler. Them's my sentiments,
 thinks mine host, and stands ready for what may come next, expressing
 the purest sympathy by his demeanor. "Hot as blazes!" says the other.
 "Hard weather, sir,--not much stirring nowadays," says he. He is wiser
 than to contradict his guest in any case; he lets him go on; he lets
 him travel.
 
 The latest sitter leaves him standing far in the night, prepared to
 live right on, while suns rise and set, and his "good-night" has as
 brisk a sound as his "good-morning;" and the earliest riser finds him
 tasting his liquors in the bar ere flies begin to buzz, with a
 countenance fresh as the morning star over the sanded floor,--and not
 as one who had watched all night for travelers. And yet, if beds be
 the subject of conversation, it will appear that no man has been a
 sounder sleeper in his time.
 
 Finally, as for his moral character, we do not hesitate to say that he
 has no grain of vice or meanness in him, but represents just that
 degree of virtue which all men relish without being obliged to
 respect. He is a good man, as his bitters are good,--an unquestionable
 goodness. Not what is called a good man,--good to be considered, as a
 work of art in galleries and museums,--but a good fellow, that is,
 good to be associated with. Who ever thought of the religion of an
 innkeeper,--whether he was joined to the Church, partook of the
 sacrament, said his prayers, feared God, or the like? No doubt he has
 had his experiences, has felt a change, and is a firm believer in the
 perseverance of the saints. In this last, we suspect, does the
 peculiarity of his religion consist. But he keeps an inn, and not a
 conscience. How many fragrant charities and sincere social virtues are
 implied in this daily offering of himself to the public! He cherishes
 good-will to all, and gives the wayfarer as good and honest advice to
 direct him on his road as the priest.
 
 To conclude, the tavern will compare favorably with the church. The
 church is the place where prayers and sermons are delivered, but the
 tavern is where they are to take effect, and if the former are good,
 the latter cannot be bad.
 
 
 
 
 A WINTER WALK
 
 
 The wind has gently murmured through the blinds, or puffed with
 feathery softness against the windows, and occasionally sighed like a
 summer zephyr lifting the leaves along, the livelong night. The meadow
 mouse has slept in his snug gallery in the sod, the owl has sat in a
 hollow tree in the depth of the swamp, the rabbit, the squirrel, and
 the fox have all been housed. The watch-dog has lain quiet on the
 hearth, and the cattle have stood silent in their stalls. The earth
 itself has slept, as it were its first, not its last sleep, save when
 some street-sign or wood-house door has faintly creaked upon its
 hinge, cheering forlorn nature at her midnight work,--the only sound
 awake 'twixt Venus and Mars,--advertising us of a remote inward
 warmth, a divine cheer and fellowship, where gods are met together,
 but where it is very bleak for men to stand. But while the earth has
 slumbered, all the air has been alive with feathery flakes descending,
 as if some northern Ceres reigned, showering her silvery grain over
 all the fields.
 
 We sleep, and at length awake to the still reality of a winter
 morning. The snow lies warm as cotton or down upon the window-sill;
 the broadened sash and frosted panes admit a dim and private light,
 which enhances the snug cheer within. The stillness of the morning is
 impressive. The floor creaks under our feet as we move toward the
 window to look abroad through some clear space over the fields. We
 see the roofs stand under their snow burden. From the eaves and fences
 hang stalactites of snow, and in the yard stand stalagmites covering
 some concealed core. The trees and shrubs rear white arms to the sky
 on every side; and where were walls and fences, we see fantastic forms
 stretching in frolic gambols across the dusky landscape, as if Nature
 had strewn her fresh designs over the fields by night as models for
 man's art.
 
 Silently we unlatch the door, letting the drift fall in, and step
 abroad to face the cutting air. Already the stars have lost some of
 their sparkle, and a dull, leaden mist skirts the horizon. A lurid
 brazen light in the east proclaims the approach of day, while the
 western landscape is dim and spectral still, and clothed in a sombre
 Tartarean light, like the shadowy realms. They are Infernal sounds
 only that you hear,--the crowing of cocks, the barking of dogs, the
 chopping of wood, the lowing of kine, all seem to come from Pluto's
 barnyard and beyond the Styx,--not for any melancholy they suggest,
 but their twilight bustle is too solemn and mysterious for earth. The
 recent tracks of the fox or otter, in the yard, remind us that each
 hour of the night is crowded with events, and the primeval nature is
 still working and making tracks in the snow. Opening the gate, we
 tread briskly along the lone country road, crunching the dry and
 crisped snow under our feet, or aroused by the sharp, clear creak of
 the wood-sled, just starting for the distant market, from the early
 farmer's door, where it has lain the summer long, dreaming amid the
 chips and stubble; while far through the drifts and powdered windows
 we see the farmer's early candle, like a paled star, emitting a lonely
 beam, as if some severe virtue were at its matins there. And one by
 one the smokes begin to ascend from the chimneys amid the trees and
 snows.
 
      The sluggish smoke curls up from some deep dell,
      The stiffened air exploring in the dawn,
      And making slow acquaintance with the day
      Delaying now upon its heavenward course,
      In wreathed loiterings dallying with itself,
      With as uncertain purpose and slow deed
      As its half-wakened master by the hearth,
      Whose mind still slumbering and sluggish thoughts
      Have not yet swept into the onward current
      Of the new day;--and now it streams afar,
      The while the chopper goes with step direct,
      And mind intent to swing the early axe.
        First in the dusky dawn he sends abroad
      His early scout, his emissary, smoke,
      The earliest, latest pilgrim from the roof,
      To feel the frosty air, inform the day;
      And while he crouches still beside the hearth,
      Nor musters courage to unbar the door,
      It has gone down the glen with the light wind,
      And o'er the plain unfurled its venturous wreath,
      Draped the tree-tops, loitered upon the hill,
      And warmed the pinions of the early bird;
      And now, perchance, high in the crispy air,
      Has caught sight of the day o'er the earth's edge,
      And greets its master's eye at his low door,
      As some refulgent cloud in the upper sky.
 
 We hear the sound of wood-chopping at the farmers' doors, far over the
 frozen earth, the baying of the house-dog, and the distant clarion of
 the cock,--though the thin and frosty air conveys only the finer
 particles of sound to our ears, with short and sweet vibrations, as
 the waves subside soonest on the purest and lightest liquids, in which
 gross substances sink to the bottom. They come clear and bell-like,
 and from a greater distance in the horizon, as if there were fewer
 impediments than in summer to make them faint and ragged. The ground
 is sonorous, like seasoned wood, and even the ordinary rural sounds
 are melodious, and the jingling of the ice on the trees is sweet and
 liquid. There is the least possible moisture in the atmosphere, all
 being dried up or congealed, and it is of such extreme tenuity and
 elasticity that it becomes a source of delight. The withdrawn and
 tense sky seems groined like the aisles of a cathedral, and the
 polished air sparkles as if there were crystals of ice floating in it.
 As they who have resided in Greenland tell us that when it freezes
 "the sea smokes like burning turf-land, and a fog or mist arises,
 called frost-smoke," which "cutting smoke frequently raises blisters
 on the face and hands, and is very pernicious to the health." But this
 pure, stinging cold is an elixir to the lungs, and not so much a
 frozen mist as a crystallized midsummer haze, refined and purified by
 cold.
 
 The sun at length rises through the distant woods, as if with the
 faint clashing, swinging sound of cymbals, melting the air with his
 beams, and with such rapid steps the morning travels, that already his
 rays are gilding the distant western mountains. Meanwhile we step
 hastily along through the powdery snow, warmed by an inward heat,
 enjoying an Indian summer still, in the increased glow of thought and
 feeling. Probably if our lives were more conformed to nature, we
 should not need to defend ourselves against her heats and colds, but
 find her our constant nurse and friend, as do plants and quadrupeds.
 If our bodies were fed with pure and simple elements, and not with a
 stimulating and heating diet, they would afford no more pasture for
 cold than a leafless twig, but thrive like the trees, which find even
 winter genial to their expansion.
 
 The wonderful purity of nature at this season is a most pleasing fact.
 Every decayed stump and moss-grown stone and rail, and the dead leaves
 of autumn, are concealed by a clean napkin of snow. In the bare fields
 and tinkling woods, see what virtue survives. In the coldest and
 bleakest places, the warmest charities still maintain a foothold. A
 cold and searching wind drives away all contagion, and nothing can
 withstand it but what has a virtue in it, and accordingly, whatever we
 meet with in cold and bleak places, as the tops of mountains, we
 respect for a sort of sturdy innocence, a Puritan toughness. All
 things beside seem to be called in for shelter, and what stays out
 must be part of the original frame of the universe, and of such valor
 as God himself. It is invigorating to breathe the cleansed air. Its
 greater fineness and purity are visible to the eye, and we would fain
 stay out long and late, that the gales may sigh through us, too, as
 through the leafless trees, and fit us for the winter,--as if we hoped
 so to borrow some pure and steadfast virtue, which will stead us in
 all seasons.
 
 There is a slumbering subterranean fire in nature which never goes
 out, and which no cold can chill. It finally melts the great snow,
 and in January or July is only buried under a thicker or thinner
 covering. In the coldest day it flows somewhere, and the snow melts
 around every tree. This field of winter rye, which sprouted late in
 the fall, and now speedily dissolves the snow, is where the fire is
 very thinly covered. We feel warmed by it. In the winter, warmth
 stands for all virtue, and we resort in thought to a trickling rill,
 with its bare stones shining in the sun, and to warm springs in the
 woods, with as much eagerness as rabbits and robins. The steam which
 rises from swamps and pools is as dear and domestic as that of our own
 kettle. What fire could ever equal the sunshine of a winter's day,
 when the meadow mice come out by the wall-sides, and the chickadee
 lisps in the defiles of the wood? The warmth comes directly from the
 sun, and is not radiated from the earth, as in summer; and when we
 feel his beams on our backs as we are treading some snowy dell, we are
 grateful as for a special kindness, and bless the sun which has
 followed us into that by-place.
 
 This subterranean fire has its altar in each man's breast; for in the
 coldest day, and on the bleakest hill, the traveler cherishes a warmer
 fire within the folds of his cloak than is kindled on any hearth. A
 healthy man, indeed, is the complement of the seasons, and in winter,
 summer is in his heart. There is the south. Thither have all birds and
 insects migrated, and around the warm springs in his breast are
 gathered the robin and the lark.
 
 At length, having reached the edge of the woods, and shut out the
 gadding town, we enter within their covert as we go under the roof of
 a cottage, and cross its threshold, all ceiled and banked up with
 snow. They are glad and warm still, and as genial and cheery in winter
 as in summer. As we stand in the midst of the pines in the flickering
 and checkered light which straggles but little way into their maze, we
 wonder if the towns have ever heard their simple story. It seems to us
 that no traveler has ever explored them, and notwithstanding the
 wonders which science is elsewhere revealing every day, who would not
 like to hear their annals? Our humble villages in the plain are their
 contribution. We borrow from the forest the boards which shelter and
 the sticks which warm us. How important is their evergreen to the
 winter, that portion of the summer which does not fade, the permanent
 year, the unwithered grass! Thus simply, and with little expense of
 altitude, is the surface of the earth diversified. What would human
 life be without forests, those natural cities? From the tops of
 mountains they appear like smooth-shaven lawns, yet whither shall we
 walk but in this taller grass?
 
 In this glade covered with bushes of a year's growth, see how the
 silvery dust lies on every seared leaf and twig, deposited in such
 infinite and luxurious forms as by their very variety atone for the
 absence of color. Observe the tiny tracks of mice around every stem,
 and the triangular tracks of the rabbit. A pure elastic heaven hangs
 over all, as if the impurities of the summer sky, refined and shrunk
 by the chaste winter's cold, had been winnowed from the heavens upon
 the earth.
 
 Nature confounds her summer distinctions at this season. The heavens
 seem to be nearer the earth. The elements are less reserved and
 distinct. Water turns to ice, rain to snow. The day is but a
 Scandinavian night. The winter is an arctic summer.
 
 How much more living is the life that is in nature, the furred life
 which still survives the stinging nights, and, from amidst fields and
 woods covered with frost and snow, sees the sun rise!
 
          "The foodless wilds
      Pour forth their brown inhabitants."
 
 The gray squirrel and rabbit are brisk and playful in the remote
 glens, even on the morning of the cold Friday. Here is our Lapland and
 Labrador, and for our Esquimaux and Knistenaux, Dog-ribbed Indians,
 Novazemblaites, and Spitzbergeners, are there not the ice-cutter and
 woodchopper, the fox, muskrat, and mink?
 
 Still, in the midst of the arctic day, we may trace the summer to its
 retreats, and sympathize with some contemporary life. Stretched over
 the brooks, in the midst of the frost-bound meadows, we may observe
 the submarine cottages of the caddis-worms, the larvae of the
 Plicipennes; their small cylindrical cases built around themselves,
 composed of flags, sticks, grass, and withered leaves, shells, and
 pebbles, in form and color like the wrecks which strew the
 bottom,--now drifting along over the pebbly bottom, now whirling in
 tiny eddies and dashing down steep falls, or sweeping rapidly along
 with the current, or else swaying to and fro at the end of some
 grass-blade or root. Anon they will leave their sunken habitations,
 and, crawling up the stems of plants, or to the surface, like gnats,
 as perfect insects henceforth, flutter over the surface of the water,
 or sacrifice their short lives in the flame of our candles at evening.
 Down yonder little glen the shrubs are drooping under their burden,
 and the red alderberries contrast with the white ground. Here are the
 marks of a myriad feet which have already been abroad. The sun rises
 as proudly over such a glen as over the valley of the Seine or the
 Tiber, and it seems the residence of a pure and self-subsistent valor,
 such as they never witnessed,--which never knew defeat nor fear. Here
 reign the simplicity and purity of a primitive age, and a health and
 hope far remote from towns and cities. Standing quite alone, far in
 the forest, while the wind is shaking down snow from the trees, and
 leaving the only human tracks behind us, we find our reflections of a
 richer variety than the life of cities. The chickadee and nuthatch are
 more inspiring society than statesmen and philosophers, and we shall
 return to these last as to more vulgar companions. In this lonely
 glen, with its brook draining the slopes, its creased ice and crystals
 of all hues, where the spruces and hemlocks stand up on either side,
 and the rush and sere wild oats in the rivulet itself, our lives are
 more serene and worthy to contemplate.
 
 As the day advances, the heat of the sun is reflected by the
 hillsides, and we hear a faint but sweet music, where flows the rill
 released from its fetters, and the icicles are melting on the trees;
 and the nuthatch and partridge are heard and seen. The south wind
 melts the snow at noon, and the bare ground appears with its withered
 grass and leaves, and we are invigorated by the perfume which exhales
 from it, as by the scent of strong meats.
 
 Let us go into this deserted woodman's hut, and see how he has passed
 the long winter nights and the short and stormy days. For here man has
 lived under this south hillside, and it seems a civilized and public
 spot. We have such associations as when the traveler stands by the
 ruins of Palmyra or Hecatompolis. Singing birds and flowers perchance
 have begun to appear here, for flowers as well as weeds follow in the
 footsteps of man. These hemlocks whispered over his head, these
 hickory logs were his fuel, and these pitch pine roots kindled his
 fire; yonder fuming rill in the hollow, whose thin and airy vapor
 still ascends as busily as ever, though he is far off now, was his
 well. These hemlock boughs, and the straw upon this raised platform,
 were his bed, and this broken dish held his drink. But he has not been
 here this season, for the phoebes built their nest upon this shelf
 last summer. I find some embers left as if he had but just gone out,
 where he baked his pot of beans; and while at evening he smoked his
 pipe, whose stemless bowl lies in the ashes, chatted with his only
 companion, if perchance he had any, about the depth of the snow on the
 morrow, already falling fast and thick without, or disputed whether
 the last sound was the screech of an owl, or the creak of a bough, or
 imagination only; and through his broad chimney-throat, in the late
 winter evening, ere he stretched himself upon the straw, he looked up
 to learn the progress of the storm, and, seeing the bright stars of
 Cassiopeia's Chair shining brightly down upon him, fell contentedly
 asleep.
 
 See how many traces from which we may learn the chopper's history!
 From this stump we may guess the sharpness of his axe, and from the
 slope of the stroke, on which side he stood, and whether he cut down
 the tree without going round it or changing hands; and, from the
 flexure of the splinters, we may know which way it fell. This one chip
 contains inscribed on it the whole history of the woodchopper and of
 the world. On this scrap of paper, which held his sugar or salt,
 perchance, or was the wadding of his gun, sitting on a log in the
 forest, with what interest we read the tattle of cities, of those
 larger huts, empty and to let, like this, in High Streets and
 Broadways. The eaves are dripping on the south side of this simple
 roof, while the titmouse lisps in the pine and the genial warmth of
 the sun around the door is somewhat kind and human.
 
 After two seasons, this rude dwelling does not deform the scene.
 Already the birds resort to it, to build their nests, and you may
 track to its door the feet of many quadrupeds. Thus, for a long time,
 nature overlooks the encroachment and profanity of man. The wood still
 cheerfully and unsuspiciously echoes the strokes of the axe that fells
 it, and while they are few and seldom, they enhance its wildness, and
 all the elements strive to naturalize the sound.
 
 Now our path begins to ascend gradually to the top of this high hill,
 from whose precipitous south side we can look over the broad country
 of forest and field and river, to the distant snowy mountains. See
 yonder thin column of smoke curling up through the woods from some
 invisible farmhouse, the standard raised over some rural homestead.
 There must be a warmer and more genial spot there below, as where we
 detect the vapor from a spring forming a cloud above the trees. What
 fine relations are established between the traveler who discovers this
 airy column from some eminence in the forest and him who sits below!
 Up goes the smoke as silently and naturally as the vapor exhales from
 the leaves, and as busy disposing itself in wreaths as the housewife
 on the hearth below. It is a hieroglyphic of man's life, and suggests
 more intimate and important things than the boiling of a pot. Where
 its fine column rises above the forest, like an ensign, some human
 life has planted itself,--and such is the beginning of Rome, the
 establishment of the arts, and the foundation of empires, whether on
 the prairies of America or the steppes of Asia.
 
 And now we descend again, to the brink of this woodland lake, which
 lies in a hollow of the hills, as if it were their expressed juice,
 and that of the leaves which are annually steeped in it. Without
 outlet or inlet to the eye, it has still its history, in the lapse of
 its waves, in the rounded pebbles on its shore, and in the pines which
 grow down to its brink. It has not been idle, though sedentary, but,
 like Abu Musa, teaches that "sitting still at home is the heavenly
 way; the going out is the way of the world." Yet in its evaporation it
 travels as far as any. In summer it is the earth's liquid eye, a
 mirror in the breast of nature. The sins of the wood are washed out
 in it. See how the woods form an amphitheatre about it, and it is an
 arena for all the genialness of nature. All trees direct the traveler
 to its brink, all paths seek it out, birds fly to it, quadrupeds flee
 to it, and the very ground inclines toward it. It is nature's saloon,
 where she has sat down to her toilet. Consider her silent economy and
 tidiness; how the sun comes with his evaporation to sweep the dust
 from its surface each morning, and a fresh surface is constantly
 welling up; and annually, after whatever impurities have accumulated
 herein, its liquid transparency appears again in the spring. In summer
 a hushed music seems to sweep across its surface. But now a plain
 sheet of snow conceals it from our eyes, except where the wind has
 swept the ice bare, and the sere leaves are gliding from side to side,
 tacking and veering on their tiny voyages. Here is one just keeled up
 against a pebble on shore, a dry beech leaf, rocking still, as if it
 would start again. A skillful engineer, methinks, might project its
 course since it fell from the parent stem. Here are all the elements
 for such a calculation. Its present position, the direction of the
 wind, the level of the pond, and how much more is given. In its
 scarred edges and veins is its log rolled up.
 
 We fancy ourselves in the interior of a larger house. The surface of
 the pond is our deal table or sanded floor, and the woods rise
 abruptly from its edge, like the walls of a cottage. The lines set to
 catch pickerel through the ice look like a larger culinary
 preparation, and the men stand about on the white ground like pieces
 of forest furniture. The actions of these men, at the distance of
 half a mile over the ice and snow, impress us as when we read the
 exploits of Alexander in history. They seem not unworthy of the
 scenery, and as momentous as the conquest of kingdoms.
 
 Again we have wandered through the arches of the wood, until from its
 skirts we hear the distant booming of ice from yonder bay of the
 river, as if it were moved by some other and subtler tide than oceans
 know. To me it has a strange sound of home, thrilling as the voice of
 one's distant and noble kindred. A mild summer sun shines over forest
 and lake, and though there is but one green leaf for many rods, yet
 nature enjoys a serene health. Every sound is fraught with the same
 mysterious assurance of health, as well now the creaking of the boughs
 in January, as the soft sough of the wind in July.
 
      When Winter fringes every bough
        With his fantastic wreath,
      And puts the seal of silence now
        Upon the leaves beneath;
 
      When every stream in its penthouse
        Goes gurgling on its way,
      And in his gallery the mouse
        Nibbleth the meadow hay;
 
      Methinks the summer still is nigh,
        And lurketh underneath,
      As that same meadow mouse doth lie
        Snug in that last year's heath.
 
      And if perchance the chickadee
        Lisp a faint note anon,
      The snow is summer's canopy,
        Which she herself put on.
 
      Fair blossoms deck the cheerful trees,
        And dazzling fruits depend;
      The north wind sighs a summer breeze,
        The nipping frosts to fend,
 
      Bringing glad tidings unto me,
        The while I stand all ear,
      Of a serene eternity,
        Which need not winter fear.
 
      Out on the silent pond straightway
        The restless ice doth crack,
      And pond sprites merry gambols play
        Amid the deafening rack.
 
      Eager I hasten to the vale,
        As if I heard brave news,
      How nature held high festival,
        Which it were hard to lose.
 
      I gambol with my neighbor ice,
        And sympathizing quake,
      As each new crack darts in a trice
        Across the gladsome lake.
 
      One with the cricket in the ground,
        And fagot on the hearth,
      Resounds the rare domestic sound
        Along the forest path.
 
 Before night we will take a journey on skates along the course of this
 meandering river, as full of novelty to one who sits by the cottage
 fire all the winter's day, as if it were over the polar ice, with
 Captain Parry or Franklin; following the winding of the stream, now
 flowing amid hills, now spreading out into fair meadows, and forming a
 myriad coves and bays where the pine and hemlock overarch. The river
 flows in the rear of the towns, and we see all things from a new and
 wilder side. The fields and gardens come down to it with a frankness,
 and freedom from pretension, which they do not wear on the highway. It
 is the outside and edge of the earth. Our eyes are not offended by
 violent contrasts. The last rail of the farmer's fence is some swaying
 willow bough, which still preserves its freshness, and here at length
 all fences stop, and we no longer cross any road. We may go far up
 within the country now by the most retired and level road, never
 climbing a hill, but by broad levels ascending to the upland meadows.
 It is a beautiful illustration of the law of obedience, the flow of a
 river; the path for a sick man, a highway down which an acorn cup may
 float secure with its freight. Its slight occasional falls, whose
 precipices would not diversify the landscape, are celebrated by mist
 and spray, and attract the traveler from far and near. From the remote
 interior, its current conducts him by broad and easy steps, or by one
 gentler inclined plane, to the sea. Thus by an early and constant
 yielding to the inequalities of the ground it secures itself the
 easiest passage.
 
 No domain of nature is quite closed to man at all times, and now we
 draw near to the empire of the fishes. Our feet glide swiftly over
 unfathomed depths, where in summer our line tempted the pout and
 perch, and where the stately pickerel lurked in the long corridors
 formed by the bulrushes. The deep, impenetrable marsh, where the heron
 waded and bittern squatted, is made pervious to our swift shoes, as if
 a thousand railroads had been made into it. With one impulse we are
 carried to the cabin of the muskrat, that earliest settler, and see
 him dart away under the transparent ice, like a furred fish, to his
 hole in the bank; and we glide rapidly over meadows where lately "the
 mower whet his scythe," through beds of frozen cranberries mixed with
 meadow-grass. We skate near to where the blackbird, the pewee, and the
 kingbird hung their nests over the water, and the hornets builded from
 the maple in the swamp. How many gay warblers, following the sun, have
 radiated from this nest of silver birch and thistle-down! On the
 swamp's outer edge was hung the supermarine village, where no foot
 penetrated. In this hollow tree the wood duck reared her brood, and
 slid away each day to forage in yonder fen.
 
 In winter, nature is a cabinet of curiosities, full of dried
 specimens, in their natural order and position. The meadows and
 forests are a _hortus siccus_. The leaves and grasses stand perfectly
 pressed by the air without screw or gum, and the birds' nests are not
 hung on an artificial twig, but where they builded them. We go about
 dry-shod to inspect the summer's work in the rank swamp, and see what
 a growth have got the alders, the willows, and the maples; testifying
 to how many warm suns, and fertilizing dews and showers. See what
 strides their boughs took in the luxuriant summer,--and anon these
 dormant buds will carry them onward and upward another span into the
 heavens.
 
 Occasionally we wade through fields of snow, under whose depths the
 river is lost for many rods, to appear again to the right or left,
 where we least expected; still holding on its way underneath, with a
 faint, stertorous, rumbling sound, as if, like the bear and marmot,
 it too had hibernated, and we had followed its faint summer trail to
 where it earthed itself in snow and ice. At first we should have
 thought that rivers would be empty and dry in midwinter, or else
 frozen solid till the spring thawed them; but their volume is not
 diminished even, for only a superficial cold bridges their surfaces.
 The thousand springs which feed the lakes and streams are flowing
 still. The issues of a few surface springs only are closed, and they
 go to swell the deep reservoirs. Nature's wells are below the frost.
 The summer brooks are not filled with snow-water, nor does the mower
 quench his thirst with that alone. The streams are swollen when the
 snow melts in the spring, because nature's work has been delayed, the
 water being turned into ice and snow, whose particles are less smooth
 and round, and do not find their level so soon.
 
 Far over the ice, between the hemlock woods and snow-clad hills,
 stands the pickerel-fisher, his lines set in some retired cove, like a
 Finlander, with his arms thrust into the pouches of his dreadnaught;
 with dull, snowy, fishy thoughts, himself a finless fish, separated a
 few inches from his race; dumb, erect, and made to be enveloped in
 clouds and snows, like the pines on shore. In these wild scenes, men
 stand about in the scenery, or move deliberately and heavily, having
 sacrificed the sprightliness and vivacity of towns to the dumb
 sobriety of nature. He does not make the scenery less wild, more than
 the jays and muskrats, but stands there as a part of it, as the
 natives are represented in the voyages of early navigators, at Nootka
 Sound, and on the Northwest coast, with their furs about them, before
 they were tempted to loquacity by a scrap of iron. He belongs to the
 natural family of man, and is planted deeper in nature and has more
 root than the inhabitants of towns. Go to him, ask what luck, and you
 will learn that he too is a worshiper of the unseen. Hear with what
 sincere deference and waving gesture in his tone he speaks of the lake
 pickerel, which he has never seen, his primitive and ideal race of
 pickerel. He is connected with the shore still, as by a fish-line, and
 yet remembers the season when he took fish through the ice on the
 pond, while the peas were up in his garden at home.
 
 But now, while we have loitered, the clouds have gathered again, and a
 few straggling snowflakes are beginning to descend. Faster and faster
 they fall, shutting out the distant objects from sight. The snow falls
 on every wood and field, and no crevice is forgotten; by the river and
 the pond, on the hill and in the valley. Quadrupeds are confined to
 their coverts and the birds sit upon their perches this peaceful hour.
 There is not so much sound as in fair weather, but silently and
 gradually every slope, and the gray walls and fences, and the polished
 ice, and the sere leaves, which were not buried before, are concealed,
 and the tracks of men and beasts are lost. With so little effort does
 nature reassert her rule and blot out the traces of men. Hear how
 Homer has described the same: "The snowflakes fall thick and fast on a
 winter's day. The winds are lulled, and the snow falls incessant,
 covering the tops of the mountains, and the hills, and the plains
 where the lotus-tree grows, and the cultivated fields, and they are
 falling by the inlets and shores of the foaming sea, but are silently
 dissolved by the waves." The snow levels all things, and infolds them
 deeper in the bosom of nature, as, in the slow summer, vegetation
 creeps up to the entablature of the temple, and the turrets of the
 castle, and helps her to prevail over art.
 
 The surly night-wind rustles through the wood, and warns us to retrace
 our steps, while the sun goes down behind the thickening storm, and
 birds seek their roosts, and cattle their stalls.
 
                          "Drooping the lab'rer ox
      Stands covered o'er with snow, and _now_ demands
      The fruit of all his toil."
 
 Though winter is represented in the almanac as an old man, facing the
 wind and sleet, and drawing his cloak about him, we rather think of
 him as a merry woodchopper, and warm-blooded youth, as blithe as
 summer. The unexplored grandeur of the storm keeps up the spirits of
 the traveler. It does not trifle with us, but has a sweet earnestness.
 In winter we lead a more inward life. Our hearts are warm and cheery,
 like cottages under drifts, whose windows and doors are half
 concealed, but from whose chimneys the smoke cheerfully ascends. The
 imprisoning drifts increase the sense of comfort which the house
 affords, and in the coldest days we are content to sit over the hearth
 and see the sky through the chimney-top, enjoying the quiet and serene
 life that may be had in a warm corner by the chimney-side, or feeling
 our pulse by listening to the low of cattle in the street, or the
 sound of the flail in distant barns all the long afternoon. No doubt a
 skillful physician could determine our health by observing how these
 simple and natural sounds affected us. We enjoy now, not an Oriental,
 but a Boreal leisure, around warm stoves and fireplaces, and watch the
 shadow of motes in the sunbeams.
 
 Sometimes our fate grows too homely and familiarly serious ever to be
 cruel. Consider how for three months the human destiny is wrapped in
 furs. The good Hebrew Revelation takes no cognizance of all this
 cheerful snow. Is there no religion for the temperate and frigid
 zones? We know of no scripture which records the pure benignity of the
 gods on a New England winter night. Their praises have never been
 sung, only their wrath deprecated. The best scripture, after all,
 records but a meagre faith. Its saints live reserved and austere. Let
 a brave, devout man spend the year in the woods of Maine or Labrador,
 and see if the Hebrew Scriptures speak adequately to his condition and
 experience, from the setting in of winter to the breaking up of the
 ice.
 
 Now commences the long winter evening around the farmer's hearth, when
 the thoughts of the indwellers travel far abroad, and men are by
 nature and necessity charitable and liberal to all creatures. Now is
 the happy resistance to cold, when the farmer reaps his reward, and
 thinks of his preparedness for winter, and, through the glittering
 panes, sees with equanimity "the mansion of the northern bear," for
 now the storm is over,--
 
                "The full ethereal round,
      Infinite worlds disclosing to the view,
      Shines out intensely keen; and all one cope
      Of starry glitter glows from pole to pole."
 
 
 
 
 THE SUCCESSION OF FOREST TREES[6]
 
 
 Every man is entitled to come to Cattle-Show, even a
 transcendentalist; and for my part I am more interested in the men
 than in the cattle. I wish to see once more those old familiar faces,
 whose names I do not know, which for me represent the Middlesex
 country, and come as near being indigenous to the soil as a white man
 can; the men who are not above their business, whose coats are not too
 black, whose shoes do not shine very much, who never wear gloves to
 conceal their hands. It is true, there are some queer specimens of
 humanity attracted to our festival, but all are welcome. I am pretty
 sure to meet once more that weak-minded and whimsical fellow,
 generally weak-bodied too, who prefers a crooked stick for a cane;
 perfectly useless, you would say, only _bizarre_, fit for a cabinet,
 like a petrified snake. A ram's horn would be as convenient, and is
 yet more curiously twisted. He brings that much indulged bit of the
 country with him, from some town's end or other, and introduces it to
 Concord groves, as if he had promised it so much sometime. So some, it
 seems to me, elect their rulers for their crookedness. But I think
 that a straight stick makes the best cane, and an upright man the best
 ruler. Or why choose a man to do plain work who is distinguished for
 his oddity? However, I do not know but you will think that they have
 committed this mistake who invited me to speak to you to-day.
 
 In my capacity of surveyor, I have often talked with some of you, my
 employers, at your dinner-tables, after having gone round and round
 and behind your farming, and ascertained exactly what its limits were.
 Moreover, taking a surveyor's and a naturalist's liberty, I have been
 in the habit of going across your lots much oftener than is usual, as
 many of you, perhaps to your sorrow, are aware. Yet many of you, to my
 relief, have seemed not to be aware of it; and, when I came across you
 in some out-of-the-way nook of your farms, have inquired, with an air
 of surprise, if I were not lost, since you had never seen me in that
 part of the town or county before; when, if the truth were known, and
 it had not been for betraying my secret, I might with more propriety
 have inquired if _you_ were not lost, since I had never seen _you_
 there before. I have several times shown the proprietor the shortest
 way out of his wood-lot.
 
 Therefore, it would seem that I have some title to speak to you
 to-day; and considering what that title is, and the occasion that has
 called us together, I need offer no apology if I invite your
 attention, for the few moments that are allotted me, to a purely
 scientific subject.
 
 At those dinner-tables referred to, I have often been asked, as many
 of you have been, if I could tell how it happened, that when a pine
 wood was cut down an oak one commonly sprang up, and _vice versa_. To
 which I have answered, and now answer, that I can tell,--that it is no
 mystery to me. As I am not aware that this has been clearly shown by
 any one, I shall lay the more stress on this point. Let me lead you
 back into your wood-lots again.
 
 When, hereabouts, a single forest tree or a forest springs up
 naturally where none of its kind grew before, I do not hesitate to
 say, though in some quarters still it may sound paradoxical, that it
 came from a seed. Of the various ways by which trees are _known_ to be
 propagated,--by transplanting, cuttings, and the like,--this is the
 only supposable one under these circumstances. No such tree has ever
 been known to spring from anything else. If any one asserts that it
 sprang from something else, or from nothing, the burden of proof lies
 with him.
 
 It remains, then, only to show how the seed is transported from where
 it grows to where it is planted. This is done chiefly by the agency of
 the wind, water, and animals. The lighter seeds, as those of pines and
 maples, are transported chiefly by wind and water; the heavier, as
 acorns and nuts, by animals.
 
 In all the pines, a very thin membrane, in appearance much like an
 insect's wing, grows over and around the seed, and independent of it,
 while the latter is being developed within its base. Indeed this is
 often perfectly developed, though the seed is abortive; nature being,
 you would say, more sure to provide the means of transporting the
 seed, than to provide the seed to be transported. In other words, a
 beautiful thin sack is woven around the seed, with a handle to it such
 as the wind can take hold of, and it is then committed to the wind,
 expressly that it may transport the seed and extend the range of the
 species; and this it does, as effectually as when seeds are sent by
 mail in a different kind of sack from the Patent Office. There is a
 patent office at the seat of government of the universe, whose
 managers are as much interested in the dispersion of seeds as anybody
 at Washington can be, and their operations are infinitely more
 extensive and regular.
 
 There is, then, no necessity for supposing that the pines have sprung
 up from nothing, and I am aware that I am not at all peculiar in
 asserting that they come from seeds, though the mode of their
 propagation _by nature_ has been but little attended to. They are very
 extensively raised from the seed in Europe, and are beginning to be
 here.
 
 When you cut down an oak wood, a pine wood will not _at once_ spring
 up there unless there are, or have been quite recently, seed-bearing
 pines near enough for the seeds to be blown from them. But, adjacent
 to a forest of pines, if you prevent other crops from growing there,
 you will surely have an extension of your pine forest, provided the
 soil is suitable.
 
 As for the heavy seeds and nuts which are not furnished with wings,
 the notion is still a very common one that, when the trees which bear
 these spring up where none of their kind were noticed before, they
 have come from seeds or other principles spontaneously generated there
 in an unusual manner, or which have lain dormant in the soil for
 centuries, or perhaps been called into activity by the heat of a
 burning. I do not believe these assertions, and I will state some of
 the ways in which, according to my observation, such forests are
 planted and raised.
 
 Every one of these seeds, too, will be found to be winged or legged in
 another fashion. Surely it is not wonderful that cherry trees of all
 kinds are widely dispersed, since their fruit is well known to be the
 favorite food of various birds. Many kinds are called bird cherries,
 and they appropriate many more kinds, which are not so called. Eating
 cherries is a bird-like employment, and unless we disperse the seeds
 occasionally, as they do, I shall think that the birds have the best
 right to them. See how artfully the seed of a cherry is placed in
 order that a bird may be compelled to transport it,--in the very midst
 of a tempting pericarp, so that the creature that would devour this
 must commonly take the stone also into its mouth or bill. If you ever
 ate a cherry, and did not make two bites of it, you must have
 perceived it,--right in the centre of the luscious morsel, a large
 earthy residuum left on the tongue. We thus take into our mouths
 cherry-stones as big as peas, a dozen at once, for Nature can persuade
 us to do almost anything when she would compass her ends. Some wild
 men and children instinctively swallow these, as the birds do when in
 a hurry, it being the shortest way to get rid of them. Thus, though
 these seeds are not provided with vegetable wings, Nature has impelled
 the thrush tribe to take them into their bills and fly away with them;
 and they are winged in another sense, and more effectually than the
 seeds of pines, for these are carried even against the wind. The
 consequence is, that cherry trees grow not only here but there. The
 same is true of a great many other seeds.
 
 But to come to the observation which suggested these remarks. As I
 have said, I suspect that I can throw some light on the fact that when
 hereabouts a dense pine wood is cut down, oaks and other hard woods
 may at once take its place. I have got only to show that the acorns
 and nuts, provided they are grown in the neighborhood, are regularly
 planted in such woods; for I assert that if an oak tree has not grown
 within ten miles, and man has not carried acorns thither, then an oak
 wood will not spring up _at once_, when a pine wood is cut down.
 
 Apparently, there were only pines there before. They are cut off, and
 after a year or two you see oaks and other hard woods springing up
 there, with scarcely a pine amid them, and the wonder commonly is, how
 the seed could have lain in the ground so long without decaying. But
 the truth is, that it has not lain in the ground so long, but is
 regularly planted each year by various quadrupeds and birds.
 
 In this neighborhood, where oaks and pines are about equally
 dispersed, if you look through the thickest pine wood, even the
 seemingly unmixed pitch pine ones, you will commonly detect many
 little oaks, birches, and other hard woods, sprung from seeds carried
 into the thicket by squirrels and other animals, and also blown
 thither, but which are overshadowed and choked by the pines. The
 denser the evergreen wood, the more likely it is to be well planted
 with these seeds, because the planters incline to resort with their
 forage to the closest covert. They also carry it into birch and other
 woods. This planting is carried on annually, and the oldest seedlings
 annually die; but when the pines are cleared off, the oaks, having got
 just the start they want, and now secured favorable conditions,
 immediately spring up to trees.
 
 The shade of a dense pine wood is more unfavorable to the springing up
 of pines of the same species than of oaks within it, though the former
 may come up abundantly when the pines are cut, if there chance to be
 sound seed in the ground.
 
 But when you cut off a lot of hard wood, very often the little pines
 mixed with it have a similar start, for the squirrels have carried off
 the nuts to the pines, and not to the more open wood, and they
 commonly make pretty clean work of it; and moreover, if the wood was
 old, the sprouts will be feeble or entirely fail; to say nothing about
 the soil being, in a measure, exhausted for this kind of crop.
 
 If a pine wood is surrounded by a white oak one chiefly, white oaks
 may be expected to succeed when the pines are cut. If it is surrounded
 instead by an edging of shrub oaks, then you will probably have a
 dense shrub oak thicket.
 
 I have no time to go into details, but will say, in a word, that while
 the wind is conveying the seeds of pines into hard woods and open
 lands, the squirrels and other animals are conveying the seeds of oaks
 and walnuts into the pine woods, and thus a rotation of crops is kept
 up.
 
 I affirmed this confidently many years ago, and an occasional
 examination of dense pine woods confirmed me in my opinion. It has
 long been known to observers that squirrels bury nuts in the ground,
 but I am not aware that any one has thus accounted for the regular
 succession of forests.
 
 On the 24th of September, in 1857, as I was paddling down the Assabet,
 in this town, I saw a red squirrel run along the bank under some
 herbage, with something large in its mouth. It stopped near the foot
 of a hemlock, within a couple of rods of me, and, hastily pawing a
 hole with its fore feet, dropped its booty into it, covered it up, and
 retreated part way up the trunk of the tree. As I approached the shore
 to examine the deposit, the squirrel, descending part way, betrayed no
 little anxiety about its treasure, and made two or three motions to
 recover it before it finally retreated. Digging there, I found two
 green pignuts joined together, with the thick husks on, buried about
 an inch and a half under the reddish soil of decayed hemlock
 leaves,--just the right depth to plant it. In short, this squirrel was
 then engaged in accomplishing two objects, to wit, laying up a store
 of winter food for itself, and planting a hickory wood for all
 creation. If the squirrel was killed, or neglected its deposit, a
 hickory would spring up. The nearest hickory tree was twenty rods
 distant. These nuts were there still just fourteen days later, but
 were gone when I looked again, November 21st, or six weeks later
 still.
 
 I have since examined more carefully several dense woods, which are
 said to be, and are apparently, exclusively pine, and always with the
 same result. For instance, I walked the same day to a small but very
 dense and handsome white pine grove, about fifteen rods square, in the
 east part of this town. The trees are large for Concord, being from
 ten to twenty inches in diameter, and as exclusively pine as any wood
 that I know. Indeed, I selected this wood because I thought it the
 least likely to contain anything else. It stands on an open plain or
 pasture, except that it adjoins another small pine wood, which has a
 few little oaks in it, on the southeast side. On every other side, it
 was at least thirty rods from the nearest woods. Standing on the edge
 of this grove and looking through it, for it is quite level and free
 from underwood, for the most part bare, red-carpeted ground, you would
 have said that there was not a hardwood tree in it, young or old. But
 on looking carefully along over its floor I discovered, though it was
 not till my eye had got used to the search, that, alternating with
 thin ferns, and small blueberry bushes, there was, not merely here and
 there, but as often as every five feet and with a degree of
 regularity, a little oak, from three to twelve inches high, and in one
 place I found a green acorn dropped by the base of a pine.
 
 I confess I was surprised to find my theory so perfectly proved in
 this case. One of the principal agents in this planting, the red
 squirrels, were all the while curiously inspecting me, while I was
 inspecting their plantation. Some of the little oaks had been browsed
 by cows, which resorted to this wood for shade.
 
 After seven or eight years, the hard woods evidently find such a
 locality unfavorable to their growth, the pines being allowed to
 stand. As an evidence of this, I observed a diseased red maple
 twenty-five feet long, which had been recently prostrated, though it
 was still covered with green leaves, the only maple in any position in
 the wood.
 
 But although these oaks almost invariably die if the pines are not cut
 down, it is probable that they do better for a few years under their
 shelter than they would anywhere else.
 
 The very extensive and thorough experiments of the English have at
 length led them to adopt a method of raising oaks almost precisely
 like this which somewhat earlier had been adopted by Nature and her
 squirrels here; they have simply rediscovered the value of pines as
 nurses for oaks. The English experimenters seem, early and generally,
 to have found out the importance of using trees of some kind as
 nurse-plants for the young oaks. I quote from Loudon what he describes
 as "the ultimatum on the subject of planting and sheltering
 oaks,"--"an abstract of the practice adopted by the government
 officers in the national forests" of England, prepared by Alexander
 Milne.
 
 At first some oaks had been planted by themselves, and others mixed
 with Scotch pines; "but in all cases," says Mr. Milne, "where oaks
 were planted actually among the pines and surrounded by them [though
 the soil might be inferior], the oaks were found to be much the best."
 "For several years past, the plan pursued has been to plant the
 inclosures with Scotch pines only [a tree very similar to our pitch
 pine], and when the pines have got to the height of five or six feet,
 then to put in good strong oak plants of about four or five years'
 growth among the pines,--not cutting away any pines at first, unless
 they happen to be so strong and thick as to overshadow the oaks. In
 about two years it becomes necessary to shred the branches of the
 pines, to give light and air to the oaks, and in about two or three
 more years to begin gradually to remove the pines altogether, taking
 out a certain number each year, so that, at the end of twenty or
 twenty-five years, not a single Scotch pine shall be left; although,
 for the first ten or twelve years, the plantation may have appeared to
 contain nothing else but pine. The advantage of this mode of planting
 has been found to be that the pines dry and ameliorate the soil,
 destroying the coarse grass and brambles which frequently choke and
 injure oaks; and that no mending over is necessary, as scarcely an oak
 so planted is found to fail."
 
 Thus much the English planters have discovered by patient experiment,
 and, for aught I know, they have taken out a patent for it; but they
 appear not to have discovered that it was discovered before, and that
 they are merely adopting the method of Nature, which she long ago made
 patent to all. She is all the while planting the oaks amid the pines
 without our knowledge, and at last, instead of government officers, we
 send a party of woodchoppers to cut down the pines, and so rescue an
 oak forest, at which we wonder as if it had dropped from the skies.
 
 As I walk amid hickories, even in August, I hear the sound of green
 pignuts falling from time to time, cut off by the chickaree over my
 head. In the fall, I notice on the ground, either within or in the
 neighborhood of oak woods, on all sides of the town, stout oak twigs
 three or four inches long, bearing half a dozen empty acorn-cups,
 which twigs have been gnawed off by squirrels, on both sides of the
 nuts, in order to make them more portable. The jays scream and the red
 squirrels scold while you are clubbing and shaking the chestnut trees,
 for they are there on the same errand, and two of a trade never agree.
 I frequently see a red or gray squirrel cast down a green chestnut
 bur, as I am going through the woods, and I used to think, sometimes,
 that they were cast at me. In fact, they are so busy about it, in the
 midst of the chestnut season, that you cannot stand long in the woods
 without hearing one fall. A sportsman told me that he had, the day
 before,--that was in the middle of October,--seen a green chestnut bur
 dropped on our great river meadow, fifty rods from the nearest wood,
 and much further from the nearest chestnut tree, and he could not tell
 how it came there. Occasionally, when chestnutting in midwinter, I
 find thirty or forty nuts in a pile, left in its gallery, just under
 the leaves, by the common wood mouse (_Mus leucopus_).
 
 But especially, in the winter, the extent to which this transportation
 and planting of nuts is carried on is made apparent by the snow. In
 almost every wood, you will see where the red or gray squirrels have
 pawed down through the snow in a hundred places, sometimes two feet
 deep, and almost always directly to a nut or a pine cone, as directly
 as if they had started from it and bored upward,--which you and I
 could not have done. It would be difficult for us to find one before
 the snow falls. Commonly, no doubt, they had deposited them there in
 the fall. You wonder if they remember the localities, or discover them
 by the scent. The red squirrel commonly has its winter abode in the
 earth under a thicket of evergreens, frequently under a small clump of
 evergreens in the midst of a deciduous wood. If there are any nut
 trees which still retain their nuts standing at a distance without the
 wood, their paths often lead directly to and from them. We therefore
 need not suppose an oak standing here and there _in_ the wood in order
 to seed it, but if a few stand within twenty or thirty rods of it, it
 is sufficient.
 
 I think that I may venture to say that every white pine cone that
 falls to the earth naturally in this town, before opening and losing
 its seeds, and almost every pitch pine one that falls at all, is cut
 off by a squirrel, and they begin to pluck them long before they are
 ripe, so that when the crop of white pine cones is a small one, as it
 commonly is, they cut off thus almost every one of these before it
 fairly ripens. I think, moreover, that their design, if I may so
 speak, in cutting them off green, is, partly, to prevent their opening
 and losing their seeds, for these are the ones for which they dig
 through the snow, and the only white pine cones which contain anything
 then. I have counted in one heap, within a diameter of four feet, the
 cores of 239 pitch pine cones which had been cut off and stripped by
 the red squirrel the previous winter.
 
 The nuts thus left on the surface, or buried just beneath it, are
 placed in the most favorable circumstances for germinating. I have
 sometimes wondered how those which merely fell on the surface of the
 earth got planted; but, by the end of December, I find the chestnut of
 the same year partially mixed with the mould, as it were, under the
 decaying and mouldy leaves, where there is all the moisture and manure
 they want, for the nuts fall fast. In a plentiful year, a large
 proportion of the nuts are thus covered loosely an inch deep, and are,
 of course, somewhat concealed from squirrels. One winter, when the
 crop had been abundant, I got, with the aid of a rake, many quarts of
 these nuts as late as the tenth of January, and though some bought at
 the store the same day were more than half of them mouldy, I did not
 find a single mouldy one among these which I picked from under the wet
 and mouldy leaves, where they had been snowed on once or twice. Nature
 knows how to pack them best. They were still plump and tender.
 Apparently, they do not heat there, though wet. In the spring they
 were all sprouting.
 
 Loudon says that "when the nut [of the common walnut of Europe] is to
 be preserved through the winter for the purpose of planting in the
 following spring, it should be laid in a rot-heap, as soon as
 gathered, with the husk on, and the heap should be turned over
 frequently in the course of the winter."
 
 Here, again, he is stealing Nature's "thunder." How can a poor mortal
 do otherwise? for it is she that finds fingers to steal with, and the
 treasure to be stolen. In the planting of the seeds of most trees, the
 best gardeners do no more than follow Nature, though they may not know
 it. Generally, both large and small ones are most sure to germinate,
 and succeed best, when only beaten into the earth with the back of a
 spade, and then covered with leaves or straw. These results to which
 planters have arrived remind us of the experience of Kane and his
 companions at the north, who, when learning to live in that climate,
 were surprised to find themselves steadily adopting the customs of the
 natives, simply becoming Esquimaux. So, when we experiment in planting
 forests, we find ourselves at last doing as Nature does. Would it not
 be well to consult with Nature in the outset? for she is the most
 extensive and experienced planter of us all, not excepting the Dukes
 of Athol.
 
 In short, they who have not attended particularly to this subject are
 but little aware to what an extent quadrupeds and birds are employed,
 especially in the fall, in collecting, and so disseminating and
 planting, the seeds of trees. It is the almost constant employment of
 the squirrels at that season, and you rarely meet with one that has
 not a nut in its mouth, or is not just going to get one. One
 squirrel-hunter of this town told me that he knew of a walnut tree
 which bore particularly good nuts, but that on going to gather them
 one fall, he found that he had been anticipated by a family of a dozen
 red squirrels. He took out of the tree, which was hollow, one bushel
 and three pecks by measurement, without the husks, and they supplied
 him and his family for the winter. It would be easy to multiply
 instances of this kind. How commonly in the fall you see the
 cheek-pouches of the striped squirrel distended by a quantity of nuts!
 This species gets its scientific name, _Tamias_, or the steward, from
 its habit of storing up nuts and other seeds. Look under a nut tree a
 month after the nuts have fallen, and see what proportion of sound
 nuts to the abortive ones and shells you will find ordinarily. They
 have been already eaten, or dispersed far and wide. The ground looks
 like a platform before a grocery, where the gossips of the village sit
 to crack nuts and less savory jokes. You have come, you would say,
 after the feast was over, and are presented with the shells only.
 
 Occasionally, when threading the woods in the fall, you will hear a
 sound as if some one had broken a twig, and, looking up, see a jay
 pecking at an acorn, or you will see a flock of them at once about it,
 in the top of an oak, and hear them break them off. They then fly to a
 suitable limb, and placing the acorn under one foot, hammer away at it
 busily, making a sound like a woodpecker's tapping, looking round from
 time to time to see if any foe is approaching, and soon reach the
 meat, and nibble at it, holding up their heads to swallow, while they
 hold the remainder very firmly with their claws. Nevertheless it often
 drops to the ground before the bird has done with it. I can confirm
 what William Bartram wrote to Wilson, the ornithologist, that "the jay
 is one of the most useful agents in the economy of nature, for
 disseminating forest trees and other nuciferous and hard-seeded
 vegetables on which they feed. Their chief employment during the
 autumnal season is foraging to supply their winter stores. In
 performing this necessary duty they drop abundance of seed in their
 flight over fields, hedges, and by fences, where they alight to
 deposit them in the post-holes, etc. It is remarkable what numbers of
 young trees rise up in fields and pastures after a wet winter and
 spring. These birds alone are capable, in a few years' time, to
 replant all the cleared lands."
 
 I have noticed that squirrels also frequently drop their nuts in open
 land, which will still further account for the oaks and walnuts which
 spring up in pastures, for, depend on it, every new tree comes from a
 seed. When I examine the little oaks, one or two years old, in such
 places, I invariably find the empty acorn from which they sprung.
 
 So far from the seed having lain dormant in the soil since oaks grew
 there before, as many believe, it is well known that it is difficult
 to preserve the vitality of acorns long enough to transport them to
 Europe; and it is recommended in Loudon's "Arboretum," as the safest
 course, to sprout them in pots on the voyage. The same authority
 states that "very few acorns of any species will germinate after
 having been kept a year," that beech mast "only retains its vital
 properties one year," and the black walnut "seldom more than six
 months after it has ripened." I have frequently found that in November
 almost every acorn left on the ground had sprouted or decayed. What
 with frost, drouth, moisture, and worms, the greater part are soon
 destroyed. Yet it is stated by one botanical writer that "acorns that
 have lain for centuries, on being ploughed up, have soon vegetated."
 
 Mr. George B. Emerson, in his valuable Report on the Trees and Shrubs
 of this State, says of the pines: "The tenacity of life of the seeds
 is remarkable. They will remain for many years unchanged in the
 ground, protected by the coolness and deep shade of the forest above
 them. But when the forest is removed, and the warmth of the sun
 admitted, they immediately vegetate." Since he does not tell us on
 what observation his remark is founded, I must doubt its truth.
 Besides, the experience of nursery-men makes it the more questionable.
 
 The stories of wheat raised from seed buried with an ancient Egyptian,
 and of raspberries raised from seed found in the stomach of a man in
 England, who is supposed to have died sixteen or seventeen hundred
 years ago, are generally discredited, simply because the evidence is
 not conclusive.
 
 Several men of science, Dr. Carpenter among them, have used the
 statement that beach plums sprang up in sand which was dug up forty
 miles inland in Maine, to prove that the seed had lain there a very
 long time, and some have inferred that the coast has receded so far.
 But it seems to me necessary to their argument to show, first, that
 beach plums grow only on a beach. They are not uncommon here, which is
 about half that distance from the shore; and I remember a dense patch
 a few miles north of us, twenty-five miles inland, from which the
 fruit was annually carried to market. How much further inland they
 grow, I know not. Dr. Charles T. Jackson speaks of finding "beach
 plums" (perhaps they were this kind) more than one hundred miles
 inland in Maine.
 
 It chances that similar objections lie against all the more notorious
 instances of the kind on record.
 
 Yet I am prepared to believe that some seeds, especially small ones,
 may retain their vitality for centuries under favorable circumstances.
 In the spring of 1859, the old Hunt house, so called, in this town,
 whose chimney bore the date 1703, was taken down. This stood on land
 which belonged to John Winthrop, the first governor of Massachusetts,
 and a part of the house was evidently much older than the above date,
 and belonged to the Winthrop family. For many years I have ransacked
 this neighborhood for plants, and I consider myself familiar with its
 productions. Thinking of the seeds which are said to be sometimes dug
 up at an unusual depth in the earth, and thus to reproduce long
 extinct plants, it occurred to me last fall that some new or rare
 plants might have sprung up in the cellar of this house, which had
 been covered from the light so long. Searching there on the 22d of
 September, I found, among other rank weeds, a species of nettle
 (_Urtica urens_) which I had not found before; dill, which I had not
 seen growing spontaneously; the Jerusalem oak (_Chenopodium Botrys_),
 which I had seen wild in but one place; black nightshade (_Solanum
 nigrum_), which is quite rare hereabouts, and common tobacco, which,
 though it was often cultivated here in the last century, has for fifty
 years been an unknown plant in this town, and a few months before this
 not even I had heard that one man, in the north part of the town, was
 cultivating a few plants for his own use. I have no doubt that some or
 all of these plants sprang from seeds which had long been buried under
 or about that house, and that that tobacco is an additional evidence
 that the plant was formerly cultivated here. The cellar has been
 filled up this year, and four of those plants, including the tobacco,
 are now again extinct in that locality.
 
 It is true, I have shown that the animals consume a great part of the
 seeds of trees, and so, at least, effectually prevent their becoming
 trees; but in all these cases, as I have said, the consumer is
 compelled to be at the same time the disperser and planter, and this
 is the tax which he pays to Nature. I think it is Linnaeus who says
 that while the swine is rooting for acorns he is planting acorns.
 
 Though I do not believe that a plant will spring up where no seed has
 been, I have great faith in a seed,--a, to me, equally mysterious
 origin for it. Convince me that you have a seed there, and I am
 prepared to expect wonders. I shall even believe that the millennium
 is at hand, and that the reign of justice is about to commence, when
 the Patent Office, or Government, begins to distribute, and the people
 to plant, the seeds of these things.
 
 In the spring of 1857 I planted six seeds sent to me from the Patent
 Office, and labeled, I think, _Poitrine jaune grosse_, large yellow
 squash. Two came up, and one bore a squash which weighed 123-1/2 pounds,
 the other bore four, weighing together 186-1/4 pounds. Who would have
 believed that there was 310 pounds of _poitrine jaune grosse_ in that
 corner of my garden? These seeds were the bait I used to catch it, my
 ferrets which I sent into its burrow, my brace of terriers which
 unearthed it. A little mysterious hoeing and manuring was all the
 _abracadabra presto-change_ that I used, and lo! true to the label,
 they found for me 310 pounds of _poitrine jaune grosse_ there, where
 it never was known to be, nor was before. These talismans had
 perchance sprung from America at first, and returned to it with
 unabated force. The big squash took a premium at your fair that fall,
 and I understood that the man who bought it, intended to sell the
 seeds for ten cents apiece. (Were they not cheap at that?) But I have
 more hounds of the same breed. I learn that one which I despatched to
 a distant town, true to its instincts, points to the large yellow
 squash there, too, where no hound ever found it before, as its
 ancestors did here and in France.
 
 Other seeds I have which will find other things in that corner of my
 garden, in like fashion, almost any fruit you wish, every year for
 ages, until the crop more than fills the whole garden. You have but
 little more to do than throw up your cap for entertainment these
 American days. Perfect alchemists I keep who can transmute substances
 without end, and thus the corner of my garden is an inexhaustible
 treasure-chest. Here you can dig, not gold, but the value which gold
 merely represents; and there is no Signor Blitz about it. Yet farmers'
 sons will stare by the hour to see a juggler draw ribbons from his
 throat, though he tells them it is all deception. Surely, men love
 darkness rather than light.
 
 FOOTNOTE:
 
 [6] An Address read to the Middlesex Agricultural Society in Concord,
 September, 1860.
 
 
 
 
 WALKING
 
 
 I wish to speak a word for Nature, for absolute freedom and wildness,
 as contrasted with a freedom and culture merely civil,--to regard man
 as an inhabitant, or a part and parcel of Nature, rather than a member
 of society. I wish to make an extreme statement, if so I may make an
 emphatic one, for there are enough champions of civilization: the
 minister and the school committee and every one of you will take care
 of that.
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 I have met with but one or two persons in the course of my life who
 understood the art of Walking, that is, of taking walks,--who had a
 genius, so to speak, for _sauntering_, which word is beautifully
 derived "from idle people who roved about the country, in the Middle
 Ages, and asked charity, under pretense of going _a la Sainte Terre_,"
 to the Holy Land, till the children exclaimed, "There goes a
 _Sainte-Terrer_," a Saunterer, a Holy-Lander. They who never go to the
 Holy Land in their walks, as they pretend, are indeed mere idlers and
 vagabonds; but they who do go there are saunterers in the good sense,
 such as I mean. Some, however, would derive the word from _sans
 terre_, without land or a home, which, therefore, in the good sense,
 will mean, having no particular home, but equally at home everywhere.
 For this is the secret of successful sauntering. He who sits still in
 a house all the time may be the greatest vagrant of all; but the
 saunterer, in the good sense, is no more vagrant than the meandering
 river, which is all the while sedulously seeking the shortest course
 to the sea. But I prefer the first, which, indeed, is the most
 probable derivation. For every walk is a sort of crusade, preached by
 some Peter the Hermit in us, to go forth and reconquer this Holy Land
 from the hands of the Infidels.
 
 It is true, we are but faint-hearted crusaders, even the walkers,
 nowadays, who undertake no persevering, never-ending enterprises. Our
 expeditions are but tours, and come round again at evening to the old
 hearth-side from which we set out. Half the walk is but retracing our
 steps. We should go forth on the shortest walk, perchance, in the
 spirit of undying adventure, never to return,--prepared to send back
 our embalmed hearts only as relics to our desolate kingdoms. If you
 are ready to leave father and mother, and brother and sister, and wife
 and child and friends, and never see them again,--if you have paid
 your debts, and made your will, and settled all your affairs, and are
 a free man, then you are ready for a walk.
 
 To come down to my own experience, my companion and I, for I sometimes
 have a companion, take pleasure in fancying ourselves knights of a
 new, or rather an old, order,--not Equestrians or Chevaliers, not
 Ritters or Riders, but Walkers, a still more ancient and honorable
 class, I trust. The chivalric and heroic spirit which once belonged to
 the Rider seems now to reside in, or perchance to have subsided into,
 the Walker,--not the Knight, but Walker, Errant. He is a sort of
 fourth estate, outside of Church and State and People.
 
 We have felt that we almost alone hereabouts practiced this noble
 art; though, to tell the truth, at least if their own assertions are
 to be received, most of my townsmen would fain walk sometimes, as I
 do, but they cannot. No wealth can buy the requisite leisure, freedom,
 and independence which are the capital in this profession. It comes
 only by the grace of God. It requires a direct dispensation from
 Heaven to become a walker. You must be born into the family of the
 Walkers. _Ambulator nascitur, non fit._ Some of my townsmen, it is
 true, can remember and have described to me some walks which they took
 ten years ago, in which they were so blessed as to lose themselves for
 half an hour in the woods; but I know very well that they have
 confined themselves to the highway ever since, whatever pretensions
 they may make to belong to this select class. No doubt they were
 elevated for a moment as by the reminiscence of a previous state of
 existence, when even they were foresters and outlaws.
 
      "When he came to grene wode,
        In a mery mornynge,
      There he herde the notes small
        Of byrdes mery syngynge.
 
      "It is ferre gone, sayd Robyn,
        That I was last here;
      Me lyste a lytell for to shote
        At the donne dere."
 
 I think that I cannot preserve my health and spirits, unless I spend
 four hours a day at least--and it is commonly more than
 that--sauntering through the woods and over the hills and fields,
 absolutely free from all worldly engagements. You may safely say, A
 penny for your thoughts, or a thousand pounds. When sometimes I am
 reminded that the mechanics and shopkeepers stay in their shops not
 only all the forenoon, but all the afternoon too, sitting with crossed
 legs, so many of them,--as if the legs were made to sit upon, and not
 to stand or walk upon,--I think that they deserve some credit for not
 having all committed suicide long ago.
 
 I, who cannot stay in my chamber for a single day without acquiring
 some rust, and when sometimes I have stolen forth for a walk at the
 eleventh hour, or four o'clock in the afternoon, too late to redeem
 the day, when the shades of night were already beginning to be mingled
 with the daylight, have felt as if I had committed some sin to be
 atoned for,--I confess that I am astonished at the power of endurance,
 to say nothing of the moral insensibility, of my neighbors who confine
 themselves to shops and offices the whole day for weeks and months,
 aye, and years almost together. I know not what manner of stuff they
 are of,--sitting there now at three o'clock in the afternoon, as if it
 were three o'clock in the morning. Bonaparte may talk of the
 three-o'clock-in-the-morning courage, but it is nothing to the courage
 which can sit down cheerfully at this hour in the afternoon over
 against one's self whom you have known all the morning, to starve out
 a garrison to whom you are bound by such strong ties of sympathy. I
 wonder that about this time, or say between four and five o'clock in
 the afternoon, too late for the morning papers and too early for the
 evening ones, there is not a general explosion heard up and down the
 street, scattering a legion of antiquated and house-bred notions and
 whims to the four winds for an airing,--and so the evil cure itself.
 
 How womankind, who are confined to the house still more than men,
 stand it I do not know; but I have ground to suspect that most of them
 do not _stand_ it at all. When, early in a summer afternoon, we have
 been shaking the dust of the village from the skirts of our garments,
 making haste past those houses with purely Doric or Gothic fronts,
 which have such an air of repose about them, my companion whispers
 that probably about these times their occupants are all gone to bed.
 Then it is that I appreciate the beauty and the glory of architecture,
 which itself never turns in, but forever stands out and erect, keeping
 watch over the slumberers.
 
 No doubt temperament, and, above all, age, have a good deal to do with
 it. As a man grows older, his ability to sit still and follow indoor
 occupations increases. He grows vespertinal in his habits as the
 evening of life approaches, till at last he comes forth only just
 before sundown, and gets all the walk that he requires in half an
 hour.
 
 But the walking of which I speak has nothing in it akin to taking
 exercise, as it is called, as the sick take medicine at stated
 hours,--as the swinging of dumbbells or chairs; but is itself the
 enterprise and adventure of the day. If you would get exercise, go in
 search of the springs of life. Think of a man's swinging dumbbells for
 his health, when those springs are bubbling up in far-off pastures
 unsought by him!
 
 Moreover, you must walk like a camel, which is said to be the only
 beast which ruminates when walking. When a traveler asked Wordsworth's
 servant to show him her master's study, she answered, "Here is his
 library, but his study is out of doors."
 
 Living much out of doors, in the sun and wind, will no doubt produce a
 certain roughness of character,--will cause a thicker cuticle to grow
 over some of the finer qualities of our nature, as on the face and
 hands, or as severe manual labor robs the hands of some of their
 delicacy of touch. So staying in the house, on the other hand, may
 produce a softness and smoothness, not to say thinness of skin,
 accompanied by an increased sensibility to certain impressions.
 Perhaps we should be more susceptible to some influences important to
 our intellectual and moral growth, if the sun had shone and the wind
 blown on us a little less; and no doubt it is a nice matter to
 proportion rightly the thick and thin skin. But methinks that is a
 scurf that will fall off fast enough,--that the natural remedy is to
 be found in the proportion which the night bears to the day, the
 winter to the summer, thought to experience. There will be so much the
 more air and sunshine in our thoughts. The callous palms of the
 laborer are conversant with finer tissues of self-respect and heroism,
 whose touch thrills the heart, than the languid fingers of idleness.
 That is mere sentimentality that lies abed by day and thinks itself
 white, far from the tan and callus of experience.
 
 When we walk, we naturally go to the fields and woods: what would
 become of us, if we walked only in a garden or a mall? Even some
 sects of philosophers have felt the necessity of importing the woods
 to themselves, since they did not go to the woods. "They planted
 groves and walks of Platanes," where they took _subdiales
 ambulationes_ in porticos open to the air. Of course it is of no use
 to direct our steps to the woods, if they do not carry us thither. I
 am alarmed when it happens that I have walked a mile into the woods
 bodily, without getting there in spirit. In my afternoon walk I would
 fain forget all my morning occupations and my obligations to society.
 But it sometimes happens that I cannot easily shake off the village.
 The thought of some work will run in my head and I am not where my
 body is,--I am out of my senses. In my walks I would fain return to my
 senses. What business have I in the woods, if I am thinking of
 something out of the woods? I suspect myself, and cannot help a
 shudder, when I find myself so implicated even in what are called good
 works,--for this may sometimes happen.
 
 My vicinity affords many good walks; and though for so many years I
 have walked almost every day, and sometimes for several days together,
 I have not yet exhausted them. An absolutely new prospect is a great
 happiness, and I can still get this any afternoon. Two or three hours'
 walking will carry me to as strange a country as I expect ever to see.
 A single farmhouse which I had not seen before is sometimes as good as
 the dominions of the King of Dahomey. There is in fact a sort of
 harmony discoverable between the capabilities of the landscape within
 a circle of ten miles' radius, or the limits of an afternoon walk, and
 the threescore years and ten of human life. It will never become
 quite familiar to you.
 
 Nowadays almost all man's improvements, so called, as the building of
 houses and the cutting down of the forest and of all large trees,
 simply deform the landscape, and make it more and more tame and cheap.
 A people who would begin by burning the fences and let the forest
 stand! I saw the fences half consumed, their ends lost in the middle
 of the prairie, and some worldly miser with a surveyor looking after
 his bounds, while heaven had taken place around him, and he did not
 see the angels going to and fro, but was looking for an old post-hole
 in the midst of paradise. I looked again, and saw him standing in the
 middle of a boggy Stygian fen, surrounded by devils, and he had found
 his bounds without a doubt, three little stones, where a stake had
 been driven, and looking nearer, I saw that the Prince of Darkness was
 his surveyor.
 
 I can easily walk ten, fifteen, twenty, any number of miles,
 commencing at my own door, without going by any house, without
 crossing a road except where the fox and the mink do: first along by
 the river, and then the brook, and then the meadow and the woodside.
 There are square miles in my vicinity which have no inhabitant. From
 many a hill I can see civilization and the abodes of man afar. The
 farmers and their works are scarcely more obvious than woodchucks and
 their burrows. Man and his affairs, church and state and school, trade
 and commerce, and manufactures and agriculture, even politics, the
 most alarming of them all,--I am pleased to see how little space they
 occupy in the landscape. Politics is but a narrow field, and that
 still narrower highway yonder leads to it. I sometimes direct the
 traveler thither. If you would go to the political world, follow the
 great road,--follow that market-man, keep his dust in your eyes, and
 it will lead you straight to it; for it, too, has its place merely,
 and does not occupy all space. I pass from it as from a bean-field
 into the forest, and it is forgotten. In one half-hour I can walk off
 to some portion of the earth's surface where a man does not stand from
 one year's end to another, and there, consequently, politics are not,
 for they are but as the cigar-smoke of a man.
 
 The village is the place to which the roads tend, a sort of expansion
 of the highway, as a lake of a river. It is the body of which roads
 are the arms and legs,--a trivial or quadrivial place, the
 thoroughfare and ordinary of travelers. The word is from the Latin
 _villa_, which together with _via_, a way, or more anciently _ved_ and
 _vella_, Varro derives from _veho_, to carry, because the villa is the
 place to and from which things are carried. They who got their living
 by teaming were said _vellaturam facere_. Hence, too, the Latin word
 _vilis_ and our vile, also _villain_. This suggests what kind of
 degeneracy villagers are liable to. They are wayworn by the travel
 that goes by and over them, without traveling themselves.
 
 Some do not walk at all; others walk in the highways; a few walk
 across lots. Roads are made for horses and men of business. I do not
 travel in them much, comparatively, because I am not in a hurry to get
 to any tavern or grocery or livery-stable or depot to which they
 lead. I am a good horse to travel, but not from choice a roadster. The
 landscape-painter uses the figures of men to mark a road. He would not
 make that use of my figure. I walk out into a nature such as the old
 prophets and poets, Menu, Moses, Homer, Chaucer, walked in. You may
 name it America, but it is not America; neither Americus Vespucius,
 nor Columbus, nor the rest were the discoverers of it. There is a
 truer account of it in mythology than in any history of America, so
 called, that I have seen.
 
 However, there are a few old roads that may be trodden with profit, as
 if they led somewhere now that they are nearly discontinued. There is
 the Old Marlborough Road, which does not go to Marlborough now,
 methinks, unless that is Marlborough where it carries me. I am the
 bolder to speak of it here, because I presume that there are one or
 two such roads in every town.
 
 
   [Illustration: _The Old Marlborough Road_]
 
 THE OLD MARLBOROUGH ROAD
 
      Where they once dug for money,
      But never found any;
      Where sometimes Martial Miles
      Singly files,
      And Elijah Wood,
      I fear for no good:
      No other man,
      Save Elisha Dugan,--
      O man of wild habits,
      Partridges and rabbits,
      Who hast no cares
      Only to set snares,
      Who liv'st all alone,
      Close to the bone,
              And where life is sweetest
              Constantly eatest.
      When the spring stirs my blood
            With the instinct to travel,
            I can get enough gravel
          On the Old Marlborough Road.
              Nobody repairs it,
              For nobody wears it;
              It is a living way,
              As the Christians say.
          Not many there be
            Who enter therein,
          Only the guests of the
            Irishman Quin.
          What is it, what is it,
            But a direction out there,
          And the bare possibility
            Of going somewhere?
              Great guide-boards of stone,
              But travelers none;
              Cenotaphs of the towns
              Named on their crowns.
              It is worth going to see
              Where you _might_ be.
              What king
              Did the thing,
              I am still wondering;
              Set up how or when,
              By what selectmen,
              Gourgas or Lee,
              Clark or Darby?
              They're a great endeavor
              To be something forever;
              Blank tablets of stone,
              Where a traveler might groan,
              And in one sentence
              Grave all that is known;
              Which another might read,
              In his extreme need.
          I know one or two
          Lines that would do,
          Literature that might stand
          All over the land,
          Which a man could remember
          Till next December,
          And read again in the spring,
          After the thawing.
      If with fancy unfurled
        You leave your abode,
      You may go round the world
        By the Old Marlborough Road.
 
 At present, in this vicinity, the best part of the land is not private
 property; the landscape is not owned, and the walker enjoys
 comparative freedom. But possibly the day will come when it will be
 partitioned off into so-called pleasure-grounds, in which a few will
 take a narrow and exclusive pleasure only,--when fences shall be
 multiplied, and man-traps and other engines invented to confine men to
 the _public_ road, and walking over the surface of God's earth shall
 be construed to mean trespassing on some gentleman's grounds. To enjoy
 a thing exclusively is commonly to exclude yourself from the true
 enjoyment of it. Let us improve our opportunities, then, before the
 evil days come.
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 What is it that makes it so hard sometimes to determine whither we
 will walk? I believe that there is a subtle magnetism in Nature,
 which, if we unconsciously yield to it, will direct us aright. It is
 not indifferent to us which way we walk. There is a right way; but we
 are very liable from heedlessness and stupidity to take the wrong one.
 We would fain take that walk, never yet taken by us through this
 actual world, which is perfectly symbolical of the path which we love
 to travel in the interior and ideal world; and sometimes, no doubt, we
 find it difficult to choose our direction, because it does not yet
 exist distinctly in our idea.
 
 When I go out of the house for a walk, uncertain as yet whither I will
 bend my steps, and submit myself to my instinct to decide for me, I
 find, strange and whimsical as it may seem, that I finally and
 inevitably settle southwest, toward some particular wood or meadow or
 deserted pasture or hill in that direction. My needle is slow to
 settle,--varies a few degrees, and does not always point due
 southwest, it is true, and it has good authority for this variation,
 but it always settles between west and south-southwest. The future
 lies that way to me, and the earth seems more unexhausted and richer
 on that side. The outline which would bound my walks would be, not a
 circle, but a parabola, or rather like one of those cometary orbits
 which have been thought to be non-returning curves, in this case
 opening westward, in which my house occupies the place of the sun. I
 turn round and round irresolute sometimes for a quarter of an hour,
 until I decide, for a thousandth time, that I will walk into the
 southwest or west. Eastward I go only by force; but westward I go
 free. Thither no business leads me. It is hard for me to believe that
 I shall find fair landscapes or sufficient wildness and freedom behind
 the eastern horizon. I am not excited by the prospect of a walk
 thither; but I believe that the forest which I see in the western
 horizon stretches uninterruptedly toward the setting sun, and there
 are no towns nor cities in it of enough consequence to disturb me.
 Let me live where I will, on this side is the city, on that the
 wilderness, and ever I am leaving the city more and more, and
 withdrawing into the wilderness. I should not lay so much stress on
 this fact, if I did not believe that something like this is the
 prevailing tendency of my countrymen. I must walk toward Oregon, and
 not toward Europe. And that way the nation is moving, and I may say
 that mankind progress from east to west. Within a few years we have
 witnessed the phenomenon of a southeastward migration, in the
 settlement of Australia; but this affects us as a retrograde movement,
 and, judging from the moral and physical character of the first
 generation of Australians, has not yet proved a successful experiment.
 The eastern Tartars think that there is nothing west beyond Thibet.
 "The world ends there," say they; "beyond there is nothing but a
 shoreless sea." It is unmitigated East where they live.
 
 We go eastward to realize history and study the works of art and
 literature, retracing the steps of the race; we go westward as into
 the future, with a spirit of enterprise and adventure. The Atlantic is
 a Lethean stream, in our passage over which we have had an opportunity
 to forget the Old World and its institutions. If we do not succeed
 this time, there is perhaps one more chance for the race left before
 it arrives on the banks of the Styx; and that is in the Lethe of the
 Pacific, which is three times as wide.
 
 I know not how significant it is, or how far it is an evidence of
 singularity, that an individual should thus consent in his pettiest
 walk with the general movement of the race; but I know that something
 akin to the migratory instinct in birds and quadrupeds,--which, in
 some instances, is known to have affected the squirrel tribe,
 impelling them to a general and mysterious movement, in which they
 were seen, say some, crossing the broadest rivers, each on its
 particular chip, with its tail raised for a sail, and bridging
 narrower streams with their dead,--that something like the _furor_
 which affects the domestic cattle in the spring, and which is referred
 to a worm in their tails, affects both nations and individuals, either
 perennially or from time to time. Not a flock of wild geese cackles
 over our town, but it to some extent unsettles the value of real
 estate here, and, if I were a broker, I should probably take that
 disturbance into account.
 
      "Than longen folk to gon on pilgrimages,
      And palmeres for to seken strange strondes."
 
 Every sunset which I witness inspires me with the desire to go to a
 West as distant and as fair as that into which the sun goes down. He
 appears to migrate westward daily, and tempt us to follow him. He is
 the Great Western Pioneer whom the nations follow. We dream all night
 of those mountain-ridges in the horizon, though they may be of vapor
 only, which were last gilded by his rays. The island of Atlantis, and
 the islands and gardens of the Hesperides, a sort of terrestrial
 paradise, appear to have been the Great West of the ancients,
 enveloped in mystery and poetry. Who has not seen in imagination, when
 looking into the sunset sky, the gardens of the Hesperides, and the
 foundation of all those fables?
 
 Columbus felt the westward tendency more strongly than any before. He
 obeyed it, and found a New World for Castile and Leon. The herd of men
 in those days scented fresh pastures from afar.
 
      "And now the sun had stretched out all the hills,
      And now was dropped into the western bay;
      At last _he_ rose, and twitched his mantle blue;
      To-morrow to fresh woods and pastures new."
 
 Where on the globe can there be found an area of equal extent with
 that occupied by the bulk of our States, so fertile and so rich and
 varied in its productions, and at the same time so habitable by the
 European, as this is? Michaux, who knew but part of them, says that
 "the species of large trees are much more numerous in North America
 than in Europe; in the United States there are more than one hundred
 and forty species that exceed thirty feet in height; in France there
 are but thirty that attain this size." Later botanists more than
 confirm his observations. Humboldt came to America to realize his
 youthful dreams of a tropical vegetation, and he beheld it in its
 greatest perfection in the primitive forests of the Amazon, the most
 gigantic wilderness on the earth, which he has so eloquently
 described. The geographer Guyot, himself a European, goes
 farther,--farther than I am ready to follow him; yet not when he says:
 "As the plant is made for the animal, as the vegetable world is made
 for the animal world, America is made for the man of the Old World....
 The man of the Old World sets out upon his way. Leaving the highlands
 of Asia, he descends from station to station towards Europe. Each of
 his steps is marked by a new civilization superior to the preceding,
 by a greater power of development. Arrived at the Atlantic, he pauses
 on the shore of this unknown ocean, the bounds of which he knows not,
 and turns upon his footprints for an instant." When he has exhausted
 the rich soil of Europe, and reinvigorated himself, "then recommences
 his adventurous career westward as in the earliest ages." So far
 Guyot.
 
 From this western impulse coming in contact with the barrier of the
 Atlantic sprang the commerce and enterprise of modern times. The
 younger Michaux, in his "Travels West of the Alleghanies in 1802,"
 says that the common inquiry in the newly settled West was, "'From
 what part of the world have you come?' As if these vast and fertile
 regions would naturally be the place of meeting and common country of
 all the inhabitants of the globe."
 
 To use an obsolete Latin word, I might say, _Ex Oriente lux; ex
 Occidente_ FRUX. From the East light; from the West fruit.
 
 Sir Francis Head, an English traveler and a Governor-General of
 Canada, tells us that "in both the northern and southern hemispheres
 of the New World, Nature has not only outlined her works on a larger
 scale, but has painted the whole picture with brighter and more costly
 colors than she used in delineating and in beautifying the Old
 World.... The heavens of America appear infinitely higher, the sky is
 bluer, the air is fresher, the cold is intenser, the moon looks
 larger, the stars are brighter, the thunder is louder, the lightning
 is vivider, the wind is stronger, the rain is heavier, the mountains
 are higher, the rivers longer, the forests bigger, the plains
 broader." This statement will do at least to set against Buffon's
 account of this part of the world and its productions.
 
 Linnaeus said long ago, "Nescio quae facies _laeta_, _glabra_ plantis
 Americanis" (I know not what there is of joyous and smooth in the
 aspect of American plants); and I think that in this country there are
 no, or at most very few, _Africanae bestiae_, African beasts, as the
 Romans called them, and that in this respect also it is peculiarly
 fitted for the habitation of man. We are told that within three miles
 of the centre of the East-Indian city of Singapore, some of the
 inhabitants are annually carried off by tigers; but the traveler can
 lie down in the woods at night almost anywhere in North America
 without fear of wild beasts.
 
 These are encouraging testimonies. If the moon looks larger here than
 in Europe, probably the sun looks larger also. If the heavens of
 America appear infinitely higher, and the stars brighter, I trust that
 these facts are symbolical of the height to which the philosophy and
 poetry and religion of her inhabitants may one day soar. At length,
 perchance, the immaterial heaven will appear as much higher to the
 American mind, and the intimations that star it as much brighter. For
 I believe that climate does thus react on man,--as there is something
 in the mountain air that feeds the spirit and inspires. Will not man
 grow to greater perfection intellectually as well as physically under
 these influences? Or is it unimportant how many foggy days there are
 in his life? I trust that we shall be more imaginative, that our
 thoughts will be clearer, fresher, and more ethereal, as our
 sky,--our understanding more comprehensive and broader, like our
 plains,--our intellect generally on a grander scale, like our thunder
 and lightning, our rivers and mountains and forests,--and our hearts
 shall even correspond in breadth and depth and grandeur to our inland
 seas. Perchance there will appear to the traveler something, he knows
 not what, of _laeta_ and _glabra_, of joyous and serene, in our very
 faces. Else to what end does the world go on, and why was America
 discovered?
 
 To Americans I hardly need to say,--
 
      "Westward the star of empire takes its way."
 
 As a true patriot, I should be ashamed to think that Adam in paradise
 was more favorably situated on the whole than the backwoodsman in this
 country.
 
 Our sympathies in Massachusetts are not confined to New England;
 though we may be estranged from the South, we sympathize with the
 West. There is the home of the younger sons, as among the
 Scandinavians they took to the sea for their inheritance. It is too
 late to be studying Hebrew; it is more important to understand even
 the slang of to-day.
 
 Some months ago I went to see a panorama of the Rhine. It was like a
 dream of the Middle Ages. I floated down its historic stream in
 something more than imagination, under bridges built by the Romans,
 and repaired by later heroes, past cities and castles whose very names
 were music to my ears, and each of which was the subject of a legend.
 There were Ehrenbreitstein and Rolandseck and Coblentz, which I knew
 only in history. They were ruins that interested me chiefly. There
 seemed to come up from its waters and its vine-clad hills and valleys
 a hushed music as of Crusaders departing for the Holy Land. I floated
 along under the spell of enchantment, as if I had been transported to
 an heroic age, and breathed an atmosphere of chivalry.
 
 Soon after, I went to see a panorama of the Mississippi, and as I
 worked my way up the river in the light of to-day, and saw the
 steamboats wooding up, counted the rising cities, gazed on the fresh
 ruins of Nauvoo, beheld the Indians moving west across the stream,
 and, as before I had looked up the Moselle, now looked up the Ohio and
 the Missouri and heard the legends of Dubuque and of Wenona's
 Cliff,--still thinking more of the future than of the past or
 present,--I saw that this was a Rhine stream of a different kind; that
 the foundations of castles were yet to be laid, and the famous bridges
 were yet to be thrown over the river; and I felt that _this was the
 heroic age itself_, though we know it not, for the hero is commonly
 the simplest and obscurest of men.
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 The West of which I speak is but another name for the Wild; and what I
 have been preparing to say is, that in Wildness is the preservation of
 the World. Every tree sends its fibres forth in search of the Wild.
 The cities import it at any price. Men plow and sail for it. From the
 forest and wilderness come the tonics and barks which brace mankind.
 Our ancestors were savages. The story of Romulus and Remus being
 suckled by a wolf is not a meaningless fable. The founders of every
 state which has risen to eminence have drawn their nourishment and
 vigor from a similar wild source. It was because the children of the
 Empire were not suckled by the wolf that they were conquered and
 displaced by the children of the northern forests who were.
 
 I believe in the forest, and in the meadow, and in the night in which
 the corn grows. We require an infusion of hemlock spruce or arbor-vitae
 in our tea. There is a difference between eating and drinking for
 strength and from mere gluttony. The Hottentots eagerly devour the
 marrow of the koodoo and other antelopes raw, as a matter of course.
 Some of our northern Indians eat raw the marrow of the Arctic
 reindeer, as well as various other parts, including the summits of the
 antlers, as long as they are soft. And herein, perchance, they have
 stolen a march on the cooks of Paris. They get what usually goes to
 feed the fire. This is probably better than stall-fed beef and
 slaughter-house pork to make a man of. Give me a wildness whose glance
 no civilization can endure,--as if we lived on the marrow of koodoos
 devoured raw.
 
 There are some intervals which border the strain of the wood thrush,
 to which I would migrate,--wild lands where no settler has squatted;
 to which, methinks, I am already acclimated.
 
 The African hunter Cumming tells us that the skin of the eland, as
 well as that of most other antelopes just killed, emits the most
 delicious perfume of trees and grass. I would have every man so much
 like a wild antelope, so much a part and parcel of nature, that his
 very person should thus sweetly advertise our senses of his presence,
 and remind us of those parts of nature which he most haunts. I feel
 no disposition to be satirical, when the trapper's coat emits the odor
 of musquash even; it is a sweeter scent to me than that which commonly
 exhales from the merchant's or the scholar's garments. When I go into
 their wardrobes and handle their vestments, I am reminded of no grassy
 plains and flowery meads which they have frequented, but of dusty
 merchants' exchanges and libraries rather.
 
 A tanned skin is something more than respectable, and perhaps olive is
 a fitter color than white for a man,--a denizen of the woods. "The
 pale white man!" I do not wonder that the African pitied him. Darwin
 the naturalist says, "A white man bathing by the side of a Tahitian
 was like a plant bleached by the gardener's art, compared with a fine,
 dark green one, growing vigorously in the open fields."
 
 Ben Jonson exclaims,--
 
       "How near to good is what is fair!"
 
 So I would say,--
 
       How near to good is what is _wild_!
 
 Life consists with wildness. The most alive is the wildest. Not yet
 subdued to man, its presence refreshes him. One who pressed forward
 incessantly and never rested from his labors, who grew fast and made
 infinite demands on life, would always find himself in a new country
 or wilderness, and surrounded by the raw material of life. He would be
 climbing over the prostrate stems of primitive forest-trees.
 
 Hope and the future for me are not in lawns and cultivated fields, not
 in towns and cities, but in the impervious and quaking swamps. When,
 formerly, I have analyzed my partiality for some farm which I had
 contemplated purchasing, I have frequently found that I was attracted
 solely by a few square rods of impermeable and unfathomable bog,--a
 natural sink in one corner of it. That was the jewel which dazzled me.
 I derive more of my subsistence from the swamps which surround my
 native town than from the cultivated gardens in the village. There are
 no richer parterres to my eyes than the dense beds of dwarf andromeda
 (_Cassandra calyculata_) which cover these tender places on the
 earth's surface. Botany cannot go farther than tell me the names of
 the shrubs which grow there,--the high blueberry, panicled andromeda,
 lambkill, azalea, and rhodora,--all standing in the quaking sphagnum.
 I often think that I should like to have my house front on this mass
 of dull red bushes, omitting other flower plots and borders,
 transplanted spruce and trim box, even graveled walks,--to have this
 fertile spot under my windows, not a few imported barrowfuls of soil
 only to cover the sand which was thrown out in digging the cellar. Why
 not put my house, my parlor, behind this plot, instead of behind that
 meagre assemblage of curiosities, that poor apology for a Nature and
 Art, which I call my front yard? It is an effort to clear up and make
 a decent appearance when the carpenter and mason have departed, though
 done as much for the passer-by as the dweller within. The most
 tasteful front-yard fence was never an agreeable object of study to
 me; the most elaborate ornaments, acorn tops, or what not, soon
 wearied and disgusted me. Bring your sills up to the very edge of the
 swamp, then (though it may not be the best place for a dry cellar), so
 that there be no access on that side to citizens. Front yards are not
 made to walk in, but, at most, through, and you could go in the back
 way.
 
 Yes, though you may think me perverse, if it were proposed to me to
 dwell in the neighborhood of the most beautiful garden that ever human
 art contrived, or else of a Dismal Swamp, I should certainly decide
 for the swamp. How vain, then, have been all your labors, citizens,
 for me!
 
 My spirits infallibly rise in proportion to the outward dreariness.
 Give me the ocean, the desert, or the wilderness! In the desert, pure
 air and solitude compensate for want of moisture and fertility. The
 traveler Burton says of it: "Your _morale_ improves; you become frank
 and cordial, hospitable and single-minded.... In the desert,
 spirituous liquors excite only disgust. There is a keen enjoyment in a
 mere animal existence." They who have been traveling long on the
 steppes of Tartary say, "On reentering cultivated lands, the
 agitation, perplexity, and turmoil of civilization oppressed and
 suffocated us; the air seemed to fail us, and we felt every moment as
 if about to die of asphyxia." When I would recreate myself, I seek the
 darkest wood, the thickest and most interminable and, to the citizen,
 most dismal, swamp. I enter a swamp as a sacred place, a _sanctum
 sanctorum_. There is the strength, the marrow, of Nature. The wildwood
 covers the virgin mould, and the same soil is good for men and for
 trees. A man's health requires as many acres of meadow to his prospect
 as his farm does loads of muck. There are the strong meats on which
 he feeds. A town is saved, not more by the righteous men in it than by
 the woods and swamps that surround it. A township where one primitive
 forest waves above while another primitive forest rots below,--such a
 town is fitted to raise not only corn and potatoes, but poets and
 philosophers for the coming ages. In such a soil grew Homer and
 Confucius and the rest, and out of such a wilderness comes the
 Reformer eating locusts and wild honey.
 
 To preserve wild animals implies generally the creation of a forest
 for them to dwell in or resort to. So it is with man. A hundred years
 ago they sold bark in our streets peeled from our own woods. In the
 very aspect of those primitive and rugged trees there was, methinks, a
 tanning principle which hardened and consolidated the fibres of men's
 thoughts. Ah! already I shudder for these comparatively degenerate
 days of my native village, when you cannot collect a load of bark of
 good thickness, and we no longer produce tar and turpentine.
 
 The civilized nations--Greece, Rome, England--have been sustained by
 the primitive forests which anciently rotted where they stand. They
 survive as long as the soil is not exhausted. Alas for human culture!
 little is to be expected of a nation, when the vegetable mould is
 exhausted, and it is compelled to make manure of the bones of its
 fathers. There the poet sustains himself merely by his own superfluous
 fat, and the philosopher comes down on his marrow-bones.
 
 It is said to be the task of the American "to work the virgin soil,"
 and that "agriculture here already assumes proportions unknown
 everywhere else." I think that the farmer displaces the Indian even
 because he redeems the meadow, and so makes himself stronger and in
 some respects more natural. I was surveying for a man the other day a
 single straight line one hundred and thirty-two rods long, through a
 swamp at whose entrance might have been written the words which Dante
 read over the entrance to the infernal regions, "Leave all hope, ye
 that enter,"--that is, of ever getting out again; where at one time I
 saw my employer actually up to his neck and swimming for his life in
 his property, though it was still winter. He had another similar swamp
 which I could not survey at all, because it was completely under
 water, and nevertheless, with regard to a third swamp, which I did
 _survey_ from a distance, he remarked to me, true to his instincts,
 that he would not part with it for any consideration, on account of
 the mud which it contained. And that man intends to put a girdling
 ditch round the whole in the course of forty months, and so redeem it
 by the magic of his spade. I refer to him only as the type of a class.
 
 The weapons with which we have gained our most important victories,
 which should be handed down as heirlooms from father to son, are not
 the sword and the lance, but the bushwhack, the turf-cutter, the
 spade, and the bog hoe, rusted with the blood of many a meadow, and
 begrimed with the dust of many a hard-fought field. The very winds
 blew the Indian's corn-field into the meadow, and pointed out the way
 which he had not the skill to follow. He had no better implement with
 which to intrench himself in the land than a clamshell. But the farmer
 is armed with plow and spade.
 
 In literature it is only the wild that attracts us. Dullness is but
 another name for tameness. It is the uncivilized free and wild
 thinking in Hamlet and the Iliad, in all the scriptures and
 mythologies, not learned in the schools, that delights us. As the wild
 duck is more swift and beautiful than the tame, so is the wild--the
 mallard--thought, which 'mid falling dews wings its way above the
 fens. A truly good book is something as natural, and as unexpectedly
 and unaccountably fair and perfect, as a wild-flower discovered on the
 prairies of the West or in the jungles of the East. Genius is a light
 which makes the darkness visible, like the lightning's flash, which
 perchance shatters the temple of knowledge itself,--and not a taper
 lighted at the hearth-stone of the race, which pales before the light
 of common day.
 
 English literature, from the days of the minstrels to the Lake
 Poets,--Chaucer and Spenser and Milton, and even Shakespeare,
 included,--breathes no quite fresh and, in this sense, wild strain. It
 is an essentially tame and civilized literature, reflecting Greece and
 Rome. Her wilderness is a greenwood, her wild man a Robin Hood. There
 is plenty of genial love of Nature, but not so much of Nature herself.
 Her chronicles inform us when her wild animals, but not when the wild
 man in her, became extinct.
 
 The science of Humboldt is one thing, poetry is another thing. The
 poet to-day, notwithstanding all the discoveries of science, and the
 accumulated learning of mankind, enjoys no advantage over Homer.
 
 Where is the literature which gives expression to Nature? He would be
 a poet who could impress the winds and streams into his service, to
 speak for him; who nailed words to their primitive senses, as farmers
 drive down stakes in the spring, which the frost has heaved; who
 derived his words as often as he used them,--transplanted them to his
 page with earth adhering to their roots; whose words were so true and
 fresh and natural that they would appear to expand like the buds at
 the approach of spring, though they lay half smothered between two
 musty leaves in a library,--aye, to bloom and bear fruit there, after
 their kind, annually, for the faithful reader, in sympathy with
 surrounding Nature.
 
 I do not know of any poetry to quote which adequately expresses this
 yearning for the Wild. Approached from this side, the best poetry is
 tame. I do not know where to find in any literature, ancient or
 modern, any account which contents me of that Nature with which even I
 am acquainted. You will perceive that I demand something which no
 Augustan nor Elizabethan age, which no _culture_, in short, can give.
 Mythology comes nearer to it than anything. How much more fertile a
 Nature, at least, has Grecian mythology its root in than English
 literature! Mythology is the crop which the Old World bore before its
 soil was exhausted, before the fancy and imagination were affected
 with blight; and which it still bears, wherever its pristine vigor is
 unabated. All other literatures endure only as the elms which
 overshadow our houses; but this is like the great dragon-tree of the
 Western Isles, as old as mankind, and, whether that does or not, will
 endure as long; for the decay of other literatures makes the soil in
 which it thrives.
 
 The West is preparing to add its fables to those of the East. The
 valleys of the Ganges, the Nile, and the Rhine having yielded their
 crop, it remains to be seen what the valleys of the Amazon, the Plate,
 the Orinoco, the St. Lawrence, and the Mississippi will produce.
 Perchance, when, in the course of ages, American liberty has become a
 fiction of the past,--as it is to some extent a fiction of the
 present,--the poets of the world will be inspired by American
 mythology.
 
 The wildest dreams of wild men, even, are not the less true, though
 they may not recommend themselves to the sense which is most common
 among Englishmen and Americans to-day. It is not every truth that
 recommends itself to the common sense. Nature has a place for the wild
 clematis as well as for the cabbage. Some expressions of truth are
 reminiscent,--others merely _sensible_, as the phrase is,--others
 prophetic. Some forms of disease, even, may prophesy forms of health.
 The geologist has discovered that the figures of serpents, griffins,
 flying dragons, and other fanciful embellishments of heraldry, have
 their prototypes in the forms of fossil species which were extinct
 before man was created, and hence "indicate a faint and shadowy
 knowledge of a previous state of organic existence." The Hindoos
 dreamed that the earth rested on an elephant, and the elephant on a
 tortoise, and the tortoise on a serpent; and though it may be an
 unimportant coincidence, it will not be out of place here to state,
 that a fossil tortoise has lately been discovered in Asia large enough
 to support an elephant. I confess that I am partial to these wild
 fancies, which transcend the order of time and development. They are
 the sublimest recreation of the intellect. The partridge loves peas,
 but not those that go with her into the pot.
 
 In short, all good things are wild and free. There is something in a
 strain of music, whether produced by an instrument or by the human
 voice,--take the sound of a bugle in a summer night, for
 instance,--which by its wildness, to speak without satire, reminds me
 of the cries emitted by wild beasts in their native forests. It is so
 much of their wildness as I can understand. Give me for my friends and
 neighbors wild men, not tame ones. The wildness of the savage is but a
 faint symbol of the awful ferity with which good men and lovers meet.
 
 I love even to see the domestic animals reassert their native
 rights,--any evidence that they have not wholly lost their original
 wild habits and vigor; as when my neighbor's cow breaks out of her
 pasture early in the spring and boldly swims the river, a cold, gray
 tide, twenty-five or thirty rods wide, swollen by the melted snow. It
 is the buffalo crossing the Mississippi. This exploit confers some
 dignity on the herd in my eyes,--already dignified. The seeds of
 instinct are preserved under the thick hides of cattle and horses,
 like seeds in the bowels of the earth, an indefinite period.
 
 Any sportiveness in cattle is unexpected. I saw one day a herd of a
 dozen bullocks and cows running about and frisking in unwieldy sport,
 like huge rats, even like kittens. They shook their heads, raised
 their tails, and rushed up and down a hill, and I perceived by their
 horns, as well as by their activity, their relation to the deer tribe.
 But, alas! a sudden loud _Whoa!_ would have damped their ardor at
 once, reduced them from venison to beef, and stiffened their sides and
 sinews like the locomotive. Who but the Evil One has cried "Whoa!" to
 mankind? Indeed, the life of cattle, like that of many men, is but a
 sort of locomotiveness; they move a side at a time, and man, by his
 machinery, is meeting the horse and the ox half-way. Whatever part the
 whip has touched is thenceforth palsied. Who would ever think of a
 _side_ of any of the supple cat tribe, as we speak of a _side_ of
 beef?
 
 I rejoice that horses and steers have to be broken before they can be
 made the slaves of men, and that men themselves have some wild oats
 still left to sow before they become submissive members of society.
 Undoubtedly, all men are not equally fit subjects for civilization;
 and because the majority, like dogs and sheep, are tame by inherited
 disposition, this is no reason why the others should have their
 natures broken that they may be reduced to the same level. Men are in
 the main alike, but they were made several in order that they might be
 various. If a low use is to be served, one man will do nearly or quite
 as well as another; if a high one, individual excellence is to be
 regarded. Any man can stop a hole to keep the wind away, but no other
 man could serve so rare a use as the author of this illustration did.
 Confucius says, "The skins of the tiger and the leopard, when they are
 tanned, are as the skins of the dog and the sheep tanned." But it is
 not the part of a true culture to tame tigers, any more than it is to
 make sheep ferocious; and tanning their skins for shoes is not the
 best use to which they can be put.
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 When looking over a list of men's names in a foreign language, as of
 military officers, or of authors who have written on a particular
 subject, I am reminded once more that there is nothing in a name. The
 name Menschikoff, for instance, has nothing in it to my ears more
 human than a whisker, and it may belong to a rat. As the names of the
 Poles and Russians are to us, so are ours to them. It is as if they
 had been named by the child's rigmarole, _Iery wiery ichery van,
 tittle-tol-tan_. I see in my mind a herd of wild creatures swarming
 over the earth, and to each the herdsman has affixed some barbarous
 sound in his own dialect. The names of men are, of course, as cheap
 and meaningless as _Bose_ and _Tray_, the names of dogs.
 
 Methinks it would be some advantage to philosophy if men were named
 merely in the gross, as they are known. It would be necessary only to
 know the genus and perhaps the race or variety, to know the
 individual. We are not prepared to believe that every private soldier
 in a Roman army had a name of his own,--because we have not supposed
 that he had a character of his own.
 
 At present our only true names are nicknames. I knew a boy who, from
 his peculiar energy, was called "Buster" by his playmates, and this
 rightly supplanted his Christian name. Some travelers tell us that an
 Indian had no name given him at first, but earned it, and his name was
 his fame; and among some tribes he acquired a new name with every new
 exploit. It is pitiful when a man bears a name for convenience merely,
 who has earned neither name nor fame.
 
 I will not allow mere names to make distinctions for me, but still see
 men in herds for all them. A familiar name cannot make a man less
 strange to me. It may be given to a savage who retains in secret his
 own wild title earned in the woods. We have a wild savage in us, and a
 savage name is perchance somewhere recorded as ours. I see that my
 neighbor, who bears the familiar epithet William or Edwin, takes it
 off with his jacket. It does not adhere to him when asleep or in
 anger, or aroused by any passion or inspiration. I seem to hear
 pronounced by some of his kin at such a time his original wild name in
 some jaw-breaking or else melodious tongue.
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 Here is this vast, savage, howling mother of ours, Nature, lying all
 around, with such beauty, and such affection for her children, as the
 leopard; and yet we are so early weaned from her breast to society, to
 that culture which is exclusively an interaction of man on man,--a
 sort of breeding in and in, which produces at most a merely English
 nobility, a civilization destined to have a speedy limit.
 
 In society, in the best institutions of men, it is easy to detect a
 certain precocity. When we should still be growing children, we are
 already little men. Give me a culture which imports much muck from
 the meadows, and deepens the soil,--not that which trusts to heating
 manures, and improved implements and modes of culture only!
 
 Many a poor sore-eyed student that I have heard of would grow faster,
 both intellectually and physically, if, instead of sitting up so very
 late, he honestly slumbered a fool's allowance.
 
 There may be an excess even of informing light. Niepce, a Frenchman,
 discovered "actinism," that power in the sun's rays which produces a
 chemical effect; that granite rocks, and stone structures, and statues
 of metal "are all alike destructively acted upon during the hours of
 sunshine, and, but for provisions of Nature no less wonderful, would
 soon perish under the delicate touch of the most subtile of the
 agencies of the universe." But he observed that "those bodies which
 underwent this change during the daylight possessed the power of
 restoring themselves to their original conditions during the hours of
 night, when this excitement was no longer influencing them." Hence it
 has been inferred that "the hours of darkness are as necessary to the
 inorganic creation as we know night and sleep are to the organic
 kingdom." Not even does the moon shine every night, but gives place to
 darkness.
 
 I would not have every man nor every part of a man cultivated, any
 more than I would have every acre of earth cultivated: part will be
 tillage, but the greater part will be meadow and forest, not only
 serving an immediate use, but preparing a mould against a distant
 future, by the annual decay of the vegetation which it supports.
 
 There are other letters for the child to learn than those which Cadmus
 invented. The Spaniards have a good term to express this wild and
 dusky knowledge, _Gramatica parda_, tawny grammar, a kind of
 mother-wit derived from that same leopard to which I have referred.
 
 We have heard of a Society for the Diffusion of Useful Knowledge. It
 is said that knowledge is power, and the like. Methinks there is equal
 need of a Society for the Diffusion of Useful Ignorance, what we will
 call Beautiful Knowledge, a knowledge useful in a higher sense: for
 what is most of our boasted so-called knowledge but a conceit that we
 know something, which robs us of the advantage of our actual
 ignorance? What we call knowledge is often our positive ignorance;
 ignorance our negative knowledge. By long years of patient industry
 and reading of the newspapers,--for what are the libraries of science
 but files of newspapers?--a man accumulates a myriad facts, lays them
 up in his memory, and then when in some spring of his life he saunters
 abroad into the Great Fields of thought, he, as it were, goes to grass
 like a horse and leaves all his harness behind in the stable. I would
 say to the Society for the Diffusion of Useful Knowledge,
 sometimes,--Go to grass. You have eaten hay long enough. The spring
 has come with its green crop. The very cows are driven to their
 country pastures before the end of May; though I have heard of one
 unnatural farmer who kept his cow in the barn and fed her on hay all
 the year round. So, frequently, the Society for the Diffusion of
 Useful Knowledge treats its cattle.
 
 A man's ignorance sometimes is not only useful, but beautiful,--while
 his knowledge, so called, is oftentimes worse than useless, besides
 being ugly. Which is the best man to deal with,--he who knows nothing
 about a subject, and, what is extremely rare, knows that he knows
 nothing, or he who really knows something about it, but thinks that he
 knows all?
 
 My desire for knowledge is intermittent, but my desire to bathe my
 head in atmospheres unknown to my feet is perennial and constant. The
 highest that we can attain to is not Knowledge, but Sympathy with
 Intelligence. I do not know that this higher knowledge amounts to
 anything more definite than a novel and grand surprise on a sudden
 revelation of the insufficiency of all that we called Knowledge
 before,--a discovery that there are more things in heaven and earth
 than are dreamed of in our philosophy. It is the lighting up of the
 mist by the sun. Man cannot _know_ in any higher sense than this, any
 more than he can look serenely and with impunity in the face of the
 sun: [Greek: Hos ti noon, ou keinon noeseis], "You will not perceive
 that, as perceiving a particular thing," say the Chaldean Oracles.
 
 There is something servile in the habit of seeking after a law which
 we may obey. We may study the laws of matter at and for our
 convenience, but a successful life knows no law. It is an unfortunate
 discovery certainly, that of a law which binds us where we did not
 know before that we were bound. Live free, child of the mist,--and
 with respect to knowledge we are all children of the mist. The man who
 takes the liberty to live is superior to all the laws, by virtue of
 his relation to the lawmaker. "That is active duty," says the Vishnu
 Purana, "which is not for our bondage; that is knowledge which is for
 our liberation: all other duty is good only unto weariness; all other
 knowledge is only the cleverness of an artist."
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 It is remarkable how few events or crises there are in our histories,
 how little exercised we have been in our minds, how few experiences we
 have had. I would fain be assured that I am growing apace and rankly,
 though my very growth disturb this dull equanimity,--though it be with
 struggle through long, dark, muggy nights or seasons of gloom. It
 would be well if all our lives were a divine tragedy even, instead of
 this trivial comedy or farce. Dante, Bunyan, and others appear to have
 been exercised in their minds more than we: they were subjected to a
 kind of culture such as our district schools and colleges do not
 contemplate. Even Mahomet, though many may scream at his name, had a
 good deal more to live for, aye, and to die for, than they have
 commonly.
 
 When, at rare intervals, some thought visits one, as perchance he is
 walking on a railroad, then, indeed, the cars go by without his
 hearing them. But soon, by some inexorable law, our life goes by and
 the cars return.
 
      "Gentle breeze, that wanderest unseen,
      And bendest the thistles round Loira of storms,
      Traveler of the windy glens,
      Why hast thou left my ear so soon?"
 
 While almost all men feel an attraction drawing them to society, few
 are attracted strongly to Nature. In their reaction to Nature men
 appear to me for the most part, notwithstanding their arts, lower than
 the animals. It is not often a beautiful relation, as in the case of
 the animals. How little appreciation of the beauty of the landscape
 there is among us! We have to be told that the Greeks called the world
 [Greek: Kosmos], Beauty, or Order, but we do not see clearly why they
 did so, and we esteem it at best only a curious philological fact.
 
 For my part, I feel that with regard to Nature I live a sort of border
 life, on the confines of a world into which I make occasional and
 transient forays only, and my patriotism and allegiance to the state
 into whose territories I seem to retreat are those of a moss-trooper.
 Unto a life which I call natural I would gladly follow even a
 will-o'-the-wisp through bogs and sloughs unimaginable, but no moon
 nor firefly has shown me the causeway to it. Nature is a personality
 so vast and universal that we have never seen one of her features. The
 walker in the familiar fields which stretch around my native town
 sometimes finds himself in another land than is described in their
 owners' deeds, as it were in some faraway field on the confines of the
 actual Concord, where her jurisdiction ceases, and the idea which the
 word Concord suggests ceases to be suggested. These farms which I have
 myself surveyed, these bounds which I have set up, appear dimly still
 as through a mist; but they have no chemistry to fix them; they fade
 from the surface of the glass, and the picture which the painter
 painted stands out dimly from beneath. The world with which we are
 commonly acquainted leaves no trace, and it will have no anniversary.
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 I took a walk on Spaulding's Farm the other afternoon. I saw the
 setting sun lighting up the opposite side of a stately pine wood. Its
 golden rays straggled into the aisles of the wood as into some noble
 hall. I was impressed as if some ancient and altogether admirable and
 shining family had settled there in that part of the land called
 Concord, unknown to me,--to whom the sun was servant,--who had not
 gone into society in the village,--who had not been called on. I saw
 their park, their pleasure-ground, beyond through the wood, in
 Spaulding's cranberry-meadow. The pines furnished them with gables as
 they grew. Their house was not obvious to vision; the trees grew
 through it. I do not know whether I heard the sounds of a suppressed
 hilarity or not. They seemed to recline on the sunbeams. They have
 sons and daughters. They are quite well. The farmer's cart-path, which
 leads directly through their hall, does not in the least put them out,
 as the muddy bottom of a pool is sometimes seen through the reflected
 skies. They never heard of Spaulding, and do not know that he is their
 neighbor,--notwithstanding I heard him whistle as he drove his team
 through the house. Nothing can equal the serenity of their lives.
 Their coat-of-arms is simply a lichen. I saw it painted on the pines
 and oaks. Their attics were in the tops of the trees. They are of no
 politics. There was no noise of labor. I did not perceive that they
 were weaving or spinning. Yet I did detect, when the wind lulled and
 hearing was done away, the finest imaginable sweet musical hum,--as of
 a distant hive in May,--which perchance was the sound of their
 thinking. They had no idle thoughts, and no one without could see
 their work, for their industry was not as in knots and excrescences
 embayed.
 
 But I find it difficult to remember them. They fade irrevocably out of
 my mind even now while I speak, and endeavor to recall them and
 recollect myself. It is only after a long and serious effort to
 recollect my best thoughts that I become again aware of their
 cohabitancy. If it were not for such families as this, I think I
 should move out of Concord.
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 We are accustomed to say in New England that few and fewer pigeons
 visit us every year. Our forests furnish no mast for them. So, it
 would seem, few and fewer thoughts visit each growing man from year to
 year, for the grove in our minds is laid waste,--sold to feed
 unnecessary fires of ambition, or sent to mill,--and there is scarcely
 a twig left for them to perch on. They no longer build nor breed with
 us. In some more genial season, perchance, a faint shadow flits across
 the landscape of the mind, cast by the _wings_ of some thought in its
 vernal or autumnal migration, but, looking up, we are unable to detect
 the substance of the thought itself. Our winged thoughts are turned to
 poultry. They no longer soar, and they attain only to a Shanghai and
 Cochin-China grandeur. Those _gra-a-ate thoughts_, those _gra-a-ate
 men_ you hear of!
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 We hug the earth,--how rarely we mount! Methinks we might elevate
 ourselves a little more. We might climb a tree, at least. I found my
 account in climbing a tree once. It was a tall white pine, on the top
 of a hill; and though I got well pitched, I was well paid for it, for
 I discovered new mountains in the horizon which I had never seen
 before,--so much more of the earth and the heavens. I might have
 walked about the foot of the tree for threescore years and ten, and
 yet I certainly should never have seen them. But, above all, I
 discovered around me,--it was near the end of June,--on the ends of
 the topmost branches only, a few minute and delicate red cone-like
 blossoms, the fertile flower of the white pine looking heavenward. I
 carried straightway to the village the topmost spire, and showed it to
 stranger jurymen who walked the streets,--for it was court week,--and
 to farmers and lumber-dealers and woodchoppers and hunters, and not
 one had ever seen the like before, but they wondered as at a star
 dropped down. Tell of ancient architects finishing their works on the
 tops of columns as perfectly as on the lower and more visible parts!
 Nature has from the first expanded the minute blossoms of the forest
 only toward the heavens, above men's heads and unobserved by them. We
 see only the flowers that are under our feet in the meadows. The pines
 have developed their delicate blossoms on the highest twigs of the
 wood every summer for ages, as well over the heads of Nature's red
 children as of her white ones; yet scarcely a farmer or hunter in the
 land has ever seen them.
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 Above all, we cannot afford not to live in the present. He is blessed
 over all mortals who loses no moment of the passing life in
 remembering the past. Unless our philosophy hears the cock crow in
 every barn-yard within our horizon, it is belated. That sound commonly
 reminds us that we are growing rusty and antique in our employments
 and habits of thought. His philosophy comes down to a more recent time
 than ours. There is something suggested by it that is a newer
 testament,--the gospel according to this moment. He has not fallen
 astern; he has got up early and kept up early, and to be where he is
 is to be in season, in the foremost rank of time. It is an expression
 of the health and soundness of Nature, a brag for all the
 world,--healthiness as of a spring burst forth, a new fountain of the
 Muses, to celebrate this last instant of time. Where he lives no
 fugitive slave laws are passed. Who has not betrayed his master many
 times since last he heard that note?
 
 The merit of this bird's strain is in its freedom from all
 plaintiveness. The singer can easily move us to tears or to laughter,
 but where is he who can excite in us a pure morning joy? When, in
 doleful dumps, breaking the awful stillness of our wooden sidewalk on
 a Sunday, or, perchance, a watcher in the house of mourning, I hear a
 cockerel crow far or near, I think to myself, "There is one of us
 well, at any rate,"--and with a sudden gush return to my senses.
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 We had a remarkable sunset one day last November. I was walking in a
 meadow, the source of a small brook, when the sun at last, just before
 setting, after a cold, gray day, reached a clear stratum in the
 horizon, and the softest, brightest morning sunlight fell on the dry
 grass and on the stems of the trees in the opposite horizon and on the
 leaves of the shrub oaks on the hillside, while our shadows stretched
 long over the meadow eastward, as if we were the only motes in its
 beams. It was such a light as we could not have imagined a moment
 before, and the air also was so warm and serene that nothing was
 wanting to make a paradise of that meadow. When we reflected that this
 was not a solitary phenomenon, never to happen again, but that it
 would happen forever and ever, an infinite number of evenings, and
 cheer and reassure the latest child that walked there, it was more
 glorious still.
 
 The sun sets on some retired meadow, where no house is visible, with
 all the glory and splendor that it lavishes on cities, and perchance
 as it has never set before,--where there is but a solitary marsh hawk
 to have his wings gilded by it, or only a musquash looks out from his
 cabin, and there is some little black-veined brook in the midst of the
 marsh, just beginning to meander, winding slowly round a decaying
 stump. We walked in so pure and bright a light, gilding the withered
 grass and leaves, so softly and serenely bright, I thought I had never
 bathed in such a golden flood, without a ripple or a murmur to it. The
 west side of every wood and rising ground gleamed like the boundary of
 Elysium, and the sun on our backs seemed like a gentle herdsman
 driving us home at evening.
 
 So we saunter toward the Holy Land, till one day the sun shall shine
 more brightly than ever he has done, shall perchance shine into our
 minds and hearts, and light up our whole lives with a great awakening
 light, as warm and serene and golden as on a bankside in autumn.
 
 
 
 
 AUTUMNAL TINTS
 
 
 Europeans coming to America are surprised by the brilliancy of our
 autumnal foliage. There is no account of such a phenomenon in English
 poetry, because the trees acquire but few bright colors there. The
 most that Thomson says on this subject in his "Autumn" is contained in
 the lines,--
 
      "But see the fading many-colored woods
      Shade deepening over shade, the country round
      Imbrown; a crowded umbrage, dusk and dun,
      Of every hue, from wan declining green
      To sooty dark;"
 
 and in the line in which he speaks of
 
      "Autumn beaming o'er the yellow woods."
 
 The autumnal change of our woods has not made a deep impression on our
 own literature yet. October has hardly tinged our poetry.
 
 A great many, who have spent their lives in cities, and have never
 chanced to come into the country at this season, have never seen this,
 the flower, or rather the ripe fruit, of the year. I remember riding
 with one such citizen, who, though a fortnight too late for the most
 brilliant tints, was taken by surprise, and would not believe that
 there had been any brighter. He had never heard of this phenomenon
 before. Not only many in our towns have never witnessed it, but it is
 scarcely remembered by the majority from year to year.
 
 Most appear to confound changed leaves with withered ones, as if they
 were to confound ripe apples with rotten ones. I think that the change
 to some higher color in a leaf is an evidence that it has arrived at a
 late and perfect maturity, answering to the maturity of fruits. It is
 generally the lowest and oldest leaves which change first. But as the
 perfect-winged and usually bright-colored insect is short-lived, so
 the leaves ripen but to fall.
 
 Generally, every fruit, on ripening, and just before it falls, when it
 commences a more independent and individual existence, requiring less
 nourishment from any source, and that not so much from the earth
 through its stem as from the sun and air, acquires a bright tint. So
 do leaves. The physiologist says it is "due to an increased absorption
 of oxygen." That is the scientific account of the matter,--only a
 reassertion of the fact. But I am more interested in the rosy cheek
 than I am to know what particular diet the maiden fed on. The very
 forest and herbage, the pellicle of the earth, must acquire a bright
 color, an evidence of its ripeness,--as if the globe itself were a
 fruit on its stem, with ever a cheek toward the sun.
 
 Flowers are but colored leaves, fruits but ripe ones. The edible part
 of most fruits is, as the physiologist says, "the parenchyma or fleshy
 tissue of the leaf," of which they are formed.
 
 Our appetites have commonly confined our views of ripeness and its
 phenomena, color, mellowness, and perfectness, to the fruits which we
 eat, and we are wont to forget that an immense harvest which we do not
 eat, hardly use at all, is annually ripened by Nature. At our annual
 cattle-shows and horticultural exhibitions, we make, as we think, a
 great show of fair fruits, destined, however, to a rather ignoble end,
 fruits not valued for their beauty chiefly. But round about and within
 our towns there is annually another show of fruits, on an infinitely
 grander scale, fruits which address our taste for beauty alone.
 
 October is the month for painted leaves. Their rich glow now flashes
 round the world. As fruits and leaves and the day itself acquire a
 bright tint just before they fall, so the year near its setting.
 October is its sunset sky; November the later twilight.
 
 I formerly thought that it would be worth the while to get a specimen
 leaf from each changing tree, shrub, and herbaceous plant, when it had
 acquired its brightest characteristic color, in its transition from
 the green to the brown state, outline it, and copy its color exactly,
 with paint, in a book, which should be entitled "October, or Autumnal
 Tints,"--beginning with the earliest reddening woodbine and the lake
 of radical leaves, and coming down through the maples, hickories, and
 sumachs, and many beautifully freckled leaves less generally known, to
 the latest oaks and aspens. What a memento such a book would be! You
 would need only to turn over its leaves to take a ramble through the
 autumn woods whenever you pleased. Or if I could preserve the leaves
 themselves, unfaded, it would be better still. I have made but little
 progress toward such a book, but I have endeavored, instead, to
 describe all these bright tints in the order in which they present
 themselves. The following are some extracts from my notes.
 
 
 THE PURPLE GRASSES
 
 By the twentieth of August, everywhere in woods and swamps we are
 reminded of the fall, both by the richly spotted sarsaparilla leaves
 and brakes, and the withering and blackened skunk-cabbage and
 hellebore, and, by the riverside, the already blackening pontederia.
 
 The purple grass (_Eragrostis pectinacea_) is now in the height of its
 beauty. I remember still when I first noticed this grass particularly.
 Standing on a hillside near our river, I saw, thirty or forty rods
 off, a stripe of purple half a dozen rods long, under the edge of a
 wood, where the ground sloped toward a meadow. It was as high-colored
 and interesting, though not quite so bright, as the patches of rhexia,
 being a darker purple, like a berry's stain laid on close and thick.
 On going to and examining it, I found it to be a kind of grass in
 bloom, hardly a foot high, with but few green blades, and a fine
 spreading panicle of purple flowers, a shallow, purplish mist
 trembling around me. Close at hand it appeared but a dull purple, and
 made little impression on the eye; it was even difficult to detect;
 and if you plucked a single plant, you were surprised to find how thin
 it was, and how little color it had. But viewed at a distance in a
 favorable light, it was of a fine lively purple, flower-like,
 enriching the earth. Such puny causes combine to produce these decided
 effects. I was the more surprised and charmed because grass is
 commonly of a sober and humble color.
 
 With its beautiful purple blush it reminds me, and supplies the
 place, of the rhexia, which is now leaving off, and it is one of the
 most interesting phenomena of August. The finest patches of it grow on
 waste strips or selvages of land at the base of dry hills, just above
 the edge of the meadows, where the greedy mower does not deign to
 swing his scythe; for this is a thin and poor grass, beneath his
 notice. Or, it may be, because it is so beautiful he does not know
 that it exists; for the same eye does not see this and timothy. He
 carefully gets the meadow-hay and the more nutritious grasses which
 grow next to that, but he leaves this fine purple mist for the
 walker's harvest,--fodder for his fancy stock. Higher up the hill,
 perchance, grow also blackberries, John's-wort, and neglected,
 withered, and wiry June-grass. How fortunate that it grows in such
 places, and not in the midst of the rank grasses which are annually
 cut! Nature thus keeps use and beauty distinct. I know many such
 localities, where it does not fail to present itself annually, and
 paint the earth with its blush. It grows on the gentle slopes, either
 in a continuous patch or in scattered and rounded tufts a foot in
 diameter, and it lasts till it is killed by the first smart frosts.
 
 In most plants the corolla or calyx is the part which attains the
 highest color, and is the most attractive; in many it is the
 seed-vessel or fruit; in others, as the red maple, the leaves; and in
 others still it is the very culm itself which is the principal flower
 or blooming part.
 
 The last is especially the case with the poke or garget (_Phytolacca
 decandra_). Some which stand under our cliffs quite dazzle me with
 their purple stems now and early in September. They are as interesting
 to me as most flowers, and one of the most important fruits of our
 autumn. Every part is flower (or fruit), such is its superfluity of
 color,--stem, branch, peduncle, pedicel, petiole, and even the at
 length yellowish, purple-veined leaves. Its cylindrical racemes of
 berries of various hues, from green to dark purple, six or seven
 inches long, are gracefully drooping on all sides, offering repasts to
 the birds; and even the sepals from which the birds have picked the
 berries are a brilliant lake red, with crimson flame-like reflections,
 equal to anything of the kind,--all on fire with ripeness. Hence the
 _lacca_, from _lac_, lake. There are at the same time flower-buds,
 flowers, green berries, dark-purple or ripe ones, and these
 flower-like sepals, all on the same plant.
 
 We love to see any redness in the vegetation of the temperate zone. It
 is the color of colors. This plant speaks to our blood. It asks a
 bright sun on it to make it show to best advantage, and it must be
 seen at this season of the year. On warm hillsides its stems are ripe
 by the twenty-third of August. At that date I walked through a
 beautiful grove of them, six or seven feet high, on the side of one of
 our cliffs, where they ripen early. Quite to the ground they were a
 deep, brilliant purple, with a bloom contrasting with the still clear
 green leaves. It appears a rare triumph of Nature to have produced and
 perfected such a plant, as if this were enough for a summer. What a
 perfect maturity it arrives at! It is the emblem of a successful life
 concluded by a death not premature, which is an ornament to Nature.
 What if we were to mature as perfectly, root and branch, glowing in
 the midst of our decay, like the poke! I confess that it excites me to
 behold them. I cut one for a cane, for I would fain handle and lean on
 it. I love to press the berries between my fingers, and see their
 juice staining my hand. To walk amid these upright, branching casks of
 purple wine, which retain and diffuse a sunset glow, tasting each one
 with your eye, instead of counting the pipes on a London dock, what a
 privilege! For Nature's vintage is not confined to the vine. Our poets
 have sung of wine, the product of a foreign plant which commonly they
 never saw, as if our own plants had no juice in them more than the
 singers. Indeed, this has been called by some the American grape, and,
 though a native of America, its juices are used in some foreign
 countries to improve the color of the wine; so that the poetaster may
 be celebrating the virtues of the poke without knowing it. Here are
 berries enough to paint afresh the western sky, and play the bacchanal
 with, if you will. And what flutes its ensanguined stems would make,
 to be used in such a dance! It is truly a royal plant. I could spend
 the evening of the year musing amid the poke stems. And perchance amid
 these groves might arise at last a new school of philosophy or poetry.
 It lasts all through September.
 
 At the same time with this, or near the end of August, a to me very
 interesting genus of grasses, andropogons, or beard-grasses, is in its
 prime: _Andropogon furcatus_, forked beard-grass, or call it
 purple-fingered grass; _Andropogon scoparius_, purple wood-grass; and
 _Andropogon_ (now called _Sorghum_) _nutans_, Indian-grass. The first
 is a very tall and slender-culmed grass, three to seven feet high,
 with four or five purple finger-like spikes raying upward from the
 top. The second is also quite slender, growing in tufts two feet high
 by one wide, with culms often somewhat curving, which, as the spikes
 go out of bloom, have a whitish, fuzzy look. These two are prevailing
 grasses at this season on dry and sandy fields and hillsides. The
 culms of both, not to mention their pretty flowers, reflect a purple
 tinge, and help to declare the ripeness of the year. Perhaps I have
 the more sympathy with them because they are despised by the farmer,
 and occupy sterile and neglected soil. They are high-colored, like
 ripe grapes, and express a maturity which the spring did not suggest.
 Only the August sun could have thus burnished these culms and leaves.
 The farmer has long since done his upland haying, and he will not
 condescend to bring his scythe to where these slender wild grasses
 have at length flowered thinly; you often see spaces of bare sand amid
 them. But I walk encouraged between the tufts of purple wood-grass
 over the sandy fields, and along the edge of the shrub oaks, glad to
 recognize these simple contemporaries. With thoughts cutting a broad
 swathe I "get" them, with horse-raking thoughts I gather them into
 windrows. The fine-eared poet may hear the whetting of my scythe.
 These two were almost the first grasses that I learned to distinguish,
 for I had not known by how many friends I was surrounded; I had seen
 them simply as grasses standing. The purple of their culms also
 excites me like that of the poke-weed stems.
 
 Think what refuge there is for one, before August is over, from
 college commencements and society that isolates! I can skulk amid the
 tufts of purple wood-grass on the borders of the "Great Fields."
 Wherever I walk these afternoons, the purple-fingered grass also
 stands like a guide-board, and points my thoughts to more poetic paths
 than they have lately traveled.
 
 A man shall perhaps rush by and trample down plants as high as his
 head, and cannot be said to know that they exist, though he may have
 cut many tons of them, littered his stables with them, and fed them to
 his cattle for years. Yet, if he ever favorably attends to them, he
 may be overcome by their beauty. Each humblest plant, or weed, as we
 call it, stands there to express some thought or mood of ours; and yet
 how long it stands in vain! I had walked over those Great Fields so
 many Augusts, and never yet distinctly recognized these purple
 companions that I had there. I had brushed against them and trodden on
 them, forsooth; and now, at last, they, as it were, rose up and
 blessed me. Beauty and true wealth are always thus cheap and despised.
 Heaven might be defined as the place which men avoid. Who can doubt
 that these grasses, which the farmer says are of no account to him,
 find some compensation in your appreciation of them? I may say that I
 never saw them before; though, when I came to look them face to face,
 there did come down to me a purple gleam from previous years; and now,
 wherever I go, I see hardly anything else. It is the reign and
 presidency of the andropogons.
 
 Almost the very sands confess the ripening influence of the August
 sun, and methinks, together with the slender grasses waving over them,
 reflect a purple tinge. The impurpled sands! Such is the consequence
 of all this sunshine absorbed into the pores of plants and of the
 earth. All sap or blood is now wine-colored. At last we have not only
 the purple sea, but the purple land.
 
 The chestnut beard-grass, Indian-grass, or wood-grass, growing here
 and there in waste places, but more rare than the former (from two to
 four or five feet high), is still handsomer and of more vivid colors
 than its congeners, and might well have caught the Indian's eye. It
 has a long, narrow, one-sided, and slightly nodding panicle of bright
 purple and yellow flowers, like a banner raised above its reedy
 leaves. These bright standards are now advanced on the distant
 hillsides, not in large armies, but in scattered troops or single
 file, like the red men. They stand thus fair and bright,
 representative of the race which they are named after, but for the
 most part unobserved as they. The expression of this grass haunted me
 for a week, after I first passed and noticed it, like the glance of an
 eye. It stands like an Indian chief taking a last look at his favorite
 hunting-grounds.
 
 
 THE RED MAPLE
 
 By the twenty-fifth of September, the red maples generally are
 beginning to be ripe. Some large ones have been conspicuously changing
 for a week, and some single trees are now very brilliant. I notice a
 small one, half a mile off across a meadow, against the green woodside
 there, a far brighter red than the blossoms of any tree in summer,
 and more conspicuous. I have observed this tree for several autumns
 invariably changing earlier than its fellows, just as one tree ripens
 its fruit earlier than another. It might serve to mark the season,
 perhaps. I should be sorry if it were cut down. I know of two or three
 such trees in different parts of our town, which might, perhaps, be
 propagated from, as early ripeners or September trees, and their seed
 be advertised in the market, as well as that of radishes, if we cared
 as much about them.
 
 At present these burning bushes stand chiefly along the edge of the
 meadows, or I distinguish them afar on the hillsides here and there.
 Sometimes you will see many small ones in a swamp turned quite crimson
 when all other trees around are still perfectly green, and the former
 appear so much the brighter for it. They take you by surprise, as you
 are going by on one side, across the fields, thus early in the season,
 as if it were some gay encampment of the red men, or other foresters,
 of whose arrival you had not heard.
 
 Some single trees, wholly bright scarlet, seen against others of their
 kind still freshly green, or against evergreens, are more memorable
 than whole groves will be by and by. How beautiful, when a whole tree
 is like one great scarlet fruit full of ripe juices, every leaf, from
 lowest limb to topmost spire, all aglow, especially if you look toward
 the sun! What more remarkable object can there be in the landscape?
 Visible for miles, too fair to be believed. If such a phenomenon
 occurred but once, it would be handed down by tradition to posterity,
 and get into the mythology at last.
 
 The whole tree thus ripening in advance of its fellows attains a
 singular preeminence, and sometimes maintains it for a week or two. I
 am thrilled at the sight of it, bearing aloft its scarlet standard for
 the regiment of green-clad foresters around, and I go half a mile out
 of my way to examine it. A single tree becomes thus the crowning
 beauty of some meadowy vale, and the expression of the whole
 surrounding forest is at once more spirited for it.
 
 A small red maple has grown, perchance, far away at the head of some
 retired valley, a mile from any road, unobserved. It has faithfully
 discharged the duties of a maple there, all winter and summer,
 neglected none of its economies, but added to its stature in the
 virtue which belongs to a maple, by a steady growth for so many
 months, never having gone gadding abroad, and is nearer heaven than it
 was in the spring. It has faithfully husbanded its sap, and afforded a
 shelter to the wandering bird, has long since ripened its seeds and
 committed them to the winds, and has the satisfaction of knowing,
 perhaps, that a thousand little well-behaved maples are already
 settled in life somewhere. It deserves well of Mapledom. Its leaves
 have been asking it from time to time, in a whisper, "When shall we
 redden?" And now, in this month of September, this month of traveling,
 when men are hastening to the seaside, or the mountains, or the lakes,
 this modest maple, still without budging an inch, travels in its
 reputation,--runs up its scarlet flag on that hillside, which shows
 that it has finished its summer's work before all other trees, and
 withdraws from the contest. At the eleventh hour of the year, the
 tree which no scrutiny could have detected here when it was most
 industrious is thus, by the tint of its maturity, by its very blushes,
 revealed at last to the careless and distant traveler, and leads his
 thoughts away from the dusty road into those brave solitudes which it
 inhabits. It flashes out conspicuous with all the virtue and beauty of
 a maple,--_Acer rubrum_. We may now read its title, or _rubric_,
 clear. Its _virtues_, not its sins, are as scarlet.
 
 Notwithstanding the red maple is the most intense scarlet of any of
 our trees, the sugar maple has been the most celebrated, and Michaux
 in his "Sylva" does not speak of the autumnal color of the former.
 About the second of October, these trees, both large and small, are
 most brilliant, though many are still green. In "sprout-lands" they
 seem to vie with one another, and ever some particular one in the
 midst of the crowd will be of a peculiarly pure scarlet, and by its
 more intense color attract our eye even at a distance, and carry off
 the palm. A large red maple swamp, when at the height of its change,
 is the most obviously brilliant of all tangible things, where I dwell,
 so abundant is this tree with us. It varies much both in form and
 color. A great many are merely yellow; more, scarlet; others, scarlet
 deepening into crimson, more red than common. Look at yonder swamp of
 maples mixed with pines, at the base of a pine-clad hill, a quarter of
 a mile off, so that you get the full effect of the bright colors,
 without detecting the imperfections of the leaves, and see their
 yellow, scarlet, and crimson fires, of all tints, mingled and
 contrasted with the green. Some maples are yet green, only yellow or
 crimson-tipped on the edges of their flakes, like the edges of a
 hazelnut bur; some are wholly brilliant scarlet, raying out regularly
 and finely every way, bilaterally, like the veins of a leaf; others,
 of more irregular form, when I turn my head slightly, emptying out
 some of its earthiness and concealing the trunk of the tree, seem to
 rest heavily flake on flake, like yellow and scarlet clouds, wreath
 upon wreath, or like snow-drifts driving through the air, stratified
 by the wind. It adds greatly to the beauty of such a swamp at this
 season, that, even though there may be no other trees interspersed, it
 is not seen as a simple mass of color, but, different trees being of
 different colors and hues, the outline of each crescent treetop is
 distinct, and where one laps on to another. Yet a painter would hardly
 venture to make them thus distinct a quarter of a mile off.
 
 As I go across a meadow directly toward a low rising ground this
 bright afternoon, I see, some fifty rods off toward the sun, the top
 of a maple swamp just appearing over the sheeny russet edge of the
 hill, a stripe apparently twenty rods long by ten feet deep, of the
 most intensely brilliant scarlet, orange, and yellow, equal to any
 flowers or fruits, or any tints ever painted. As I advance, lowering
 the edge of the hill which makes the firm foreground or lower frame of
 the picture, the depth of the brilliant grove revealed steadily
 increases, suggesting that the whole of the inclosed valley is filled
 with such color. One wonders that the tithing-men and fathers of the
 town are not out to see what the trees mean by their high colors and
 exuberance of spirits, fearing that some mischief is brewing. I do not
 see what the Puritans did at this season, when the maples blaze out in
 scarlet. They certainly could not have worshiped in groves then.
 Perhaps that is what they built meeting-houses and fenced them round
 with horse-sheds for.
 
 
 THE ELM
 
 Now too, the first of October, or later, the elms are at the height of
 their autumnal beauty,--great brownish-yellow masses, warm from their
 September oven, hanging over the highway. Their leaves are perfectly
 ripe. I wonder if there is any answering ripeness in the lives of the
 men who live beneath them. As I look down our street, which is lined
 with them, they remind me both by their form and color of yellowing
 sheaves of grain, as if the harvest had indeed come to the village
 itself, and we might expect to find some maturity and _flavor_ in the
 thoughts of the villagers at last. Under those bright rustling yellow
 piles just ready to fall on the heads of the walkers, how can any
 crudity or greenness of thought or act prevail? When I stand where
 half a dozen large elms droop over a house, it is as if I stood within
 a ripe pumpkin-rind, and I feel as mellow as if I were the pulp,
 though I may be somewhat stringy and seedy withal. What is the late
 greenness of the English elm, like a cucumber out of season, which
 does not know when to have done, compared with the early and golden
 maturity of the American tree? The street is the scene of a great
 harvest-home. It would be worth the while to set out these trees, if
 only for their autumnal value. Think of these great yellow canopies
 or parasols held over our heads and houses by the mile together,
 making the village all one and compact,--an _ulmarium_, which is at
 the same time a nursery of men! And then how gently and unobserved
 they drop their burden and let in the sun when it is wanted, their
 leaves not heard when they fall on our roofs and in our streets; and
 thus the village parasol is shut up and put away! I see the market-man
 driving into the village, and disappearing under its canopy of
 elm-tops, with _his_ crop, as into a great granary or barn-yard. I am
 tempted to go thither as to a husking of thoughts, now dry and ripe,
 and ready to be separated from their integuments; but, alas! I foresee
 that it will be chiefly husks and little thought, blasted pig-corn,
 fit only for cob-meal,--for, as you sow, so shall you reap.
 
 
 FALLEN LEAVES
 
 By the sixth of October the leaves generally begin to fall, in
 successive showers, after frost or rain; but the principal
 leaf-harvest, the acme of the _Fall_, is commonly about the sixteenth.
 Some morning at that date there is perhaps a harder frost than we have
 seen, and ice formed under the pump, and now, when the morning wind
 rises, the leaves come down in denser showers than ever. They suddenly
 form thick beds or carpets on the ground, in this gentle air, or even
 without wind, just the size and form of the tree above. Some trees, as
 small hickories, appear to have dropped their leaves instantaneously,
 as a soldier grounds arms at a signal; and those of the hickory,
 being bright yellow still, though withered, reflect a blaze of light
 from the ground where they lie. Down they have come on all sides, at
 the first earnest touch of autumn's wand, making a sound like rain.
 
 Or else it is after moist and rainy weather that we notice how great a
 fall of leaves there has been in the night, though it may not yet be
 the touch that loosens the rock maple leaf. The streets are thickly
 strewn with the trophies, and fallen elm leaves make a dark brown
 pavement under our feet. After some remarkably warm Indian-summer day
 or days, I perceive that it is the unusual heat which, more than
 anything, causes the leaves to fall, there having been, perhaps, no
 frost nor rain for some time. The intense heat suddenly ripens and
 wilts them, just as it softens and ripens peaches and other fruits,
 and causes them to drop.
 
 The leaves of late red maples, still bright, strew the earth, often
 crimson-spotted on a yellow ground, like some wild apples,--though
 they preserve these bright colors on the ground but a day or two,
 especially if it rains. On causeways I go by trees here and there all
 bare and smoke-like, having lost their brilliant clothing; but there
 it lies, nearly as bright as ever, on the ground on one side, and
 making nearly as regular a figure as lately on the tree. I would
 rather say that I first observe the trees thus flat on the ground like
 a permanent colored shadow, and they suggest to look for the boughs
 that bore them. A queen might be proud to walk where these gallant
 trees have spread their bright cloaks in the mud. I see wagons roll
 over them as a shadow or a reflection, and the drivers heed them just
 as little as they did their shadows before.
 
 Birds' nests, in the huckleberry and other shrubs, and in trees, are
 already being filled with the withered leaves. So many have fallen in
 the woods that a squirrel cannot run after a falling nut without being
 heard. Boys are raking them in the streets, if only for the pleasure
 of dealing with such clean, crisp substances. Some sweep the paths
 scrupulously neat, and then stand to see the next breath strew them
 with new trophies. The swamp floor is thickly covered, and the
 _Lycopodium lucidulum_ looks suddenly greener amid them. In dense
 woods they half cover pools that are three or four rods long. The
 other day I could hardly find a well-known spring, and even suspected
 that it had dried up, for it was completely concealed by freshly
 fallen leaves; and when I swept them aside and revealed it, it was
 like striking the earth, with Aaron's rod, for a new spring. Wet
 grounds about the edges of swamps look dry with them. At one swamp,
 where I was surveying, thinking to step on a leafy shore from a rail,
 I got into the water more than a foot deep.
 
 When I go to the river the day after the principal fall of leaves, the
 sixteenth, I find my boat all covered, bottom and seats, with the
 leaves of the golden willow under which it is moored, and I set sail
 with a cargo of them rustling under my feet. If I empty it, it will be
 full again to-morrow. I do not regard them as litter, to be swept out,
 but accept them as suitable straw or matting for the bottom of my
 carriage. When I turn up into the mouth of the Assabet, which is
 wooded, large fleets of leaves are floating on its surface, as it
 were getting out to sea, with room to tack; but next the shore, a
 little farther up, they are thicker than foam, quite concealing the
 water for a rod in width, under and amid the alders, button-bushes,
 and maples, still perfectly light and dry, with fibre unrelaxed; and
 at a rocky bend where they are met and stopped by the morning wind,
 they sometimes form a broad and dense crescent quite across the river.
 When I turn my prow that way, and the wave which it makes strikes
 them, list what a pleasant rustling from these dry substances getting
 on one another! Often it is their undulation only which reveals the
 water beneath them. Also every motion of the wood turtle on the shore
 is betrayed by their rustling there. Or even in mid-channel, when the
 wind rises, I hear them blown with a rustling sound. Higher up they
 are slowly moving round and round in some great eddy which the river
 makes, as that at the "Leaning Hemlocks," where the water is deep, and
 the current is wearing into the bank.
 
 Perchance, in the afternoon of such a day, when the water is perfectly
 calm and full of reflections, I paddle gently down the main stream,
 and, turning up the Assabet, reach a quiet cove, where I unexpectedly
 find myself surrounded by myriads of leaves, like fellow-voyagers,
 which seem to have the same purpose, or want of purpose, with myself.
 See this great fleet of scattered leaf-boats which we paddle amid, in
 this smooth river-bay, each one curled up on every side by the sun's
 skill, each nerve a stiff spruce knee,--like boats of hide, and of all
 patterns,--Charon's boat probably among the rest,--and some with
 lofty prows and poops, like the stately vessels of the ancients,
 scarcely moving in the sluggish current,--like the great fleets, the
 dense Chinese cities of boats, with which you mingle on entering some
 great mart, some New York or Canton, which we are all steadily
 approaching together. How gently each has been deposited on the water!
 No violence has been used towards them yet, though, perchance,
 palpitating hearts were present at the launching. And painted ducks,
 too, the splendid wood duck among the rest, often come to sail and
 float amid the painted leaves,--barks of a nobler model still!
 
 What wholesome herb drinks are to be had in the swamps now! What
 strong medicinal but rich scents from the decaying leaves! The rain
 falling on the freshly dried herbs and leaves, and filling the pools
 and ditches into which they have dropped thus clean and rigid, will
 soon convert them into tea,--green, black, brown, and yellow teas, of
 all degrees of strength, enough to set all Nature a-gossiping. Whether
 we drink them or not, as yet, before their strength is drawn, these
 leaves, dried on great Nature's coppers, are of such various pure and
 delicate tints as might make the fame of Oriental teas.
 
 How they are mixed up, of all species, oak and maple and chestnut and
 birch! But Nature is not cluttered with them; she is a perfect
 husbandman; she stores them all. Consider what a vast crop is thus
 annually shed on the earth! This, more than any mere grain or seed, is
 the great harvest of the year. The trees are now repaying the earth
 with interest what they have taken from it. They are discounting.
 They are about to add a leaf's thickness to the depth of the soil.
 This is the beautiful way in which Nature gets her muck, while I
 chaffer with this man and that, who talks to me about sulphur and the
 cost of carting. We are all the richer for their decay. I am more
 interested in this crop than in the English grass alone or in the
 corn. It prepares the virgin mould for future corn-fields and forests,
 on which the earth fattens. It keeps our homestead in good heart.
 
 For beautiful variety no crop can be compared with this. Here is not
 merely the plain yellow of the grains, but nearly all the colors that
 we know, the brightest blue not excepted: the early blushing maple,
 the poison sumach blazing its sins as scarlet, the mulberry ash, the
 rich chrome yellow of the poplars, the brilliant red huckleberry, with
 which the hills' backs are painted, like those of sheep. The frost
 touches them, and, with the slightest breath of returning day or
 jarring of earth's axle, see in what showers they come floating down!
 The ground is all parti-colored with them. But they still live in the
 soil, whose fertility and bulk they increase, and in the forests that
 spring from it. They stoop to rise, to mount higher in coming years,
 by subtle chemistry, climbing by the sap in the trees; and the
 sapling's first fruits thus shed, transmuted at last, may adorn its
 crown, when, in after years, it has become the monarch of the forest.
 
 It is pleasant to walk over the beds of these fresh, crisp, and
 rustling leaves. How beautifully they go to their graves! how gently
 lay themselves down and turn to mould!--painted of a thousand hues,
 and fit to make the beds of us living. So they troop to their last
 resting-place, light and frisky. They put on no weeds, but merrily
 they go scampering over the earth, selecting the spot, choosing a lot,
 ordering no iron fence, whispering all through the woods about
 it,--some choosing the spot where the bodies of men are mouldering
 beneath, and meeting them half-way. How many flutterings before they
 rest quietly in their graves! They that soared so loftily, how
 contentedly they return to dust again, and are laid low, resigned to
 lie and decay at the foot of the tree, and afford nourishment to new
 generations of their kind, as well as to flutter on high! They teach
 us how to die. One wonders if the time will ever come when men, with
 their boasted faith in immortality, will lie down as gracefully and as
 ripe,--with such an Indian-summer serenity will shed their bodies, as
 they do their hair and nails.
 
 When the leaves fall, the whole earth is a cemetery pleasant to walk
 in. I love to wander and muse over them in their graves. Here are no
 lying nor vain epitaphs. What though you own no lot at Mount Auburn?
 Your lot is surely cast somewhere in this vast cemetery, which has
 been consecrated from of old. You need attend no auction to secure a
 place. There is room enough here. The loosestrife shall bloom and the
 huckleberry-bird sing over your bones. The woodman and hunter shall be
 your sextons, and the children shall tread upon the borders as much as
 they will. Let us walk in the cemetery of the leaves; this is your
 true Greenwood Cemetery.
 
 
   [Illustration: _Fallen Leaves_]
 
 THE SUGAR MAPLE
 
 But think not that the splendor of the year is over; for as one leaf
 does not make a summer, neither does one falling leaf make an autumn.
 The smallest sugar maples in our streets make a great show as early as
 the fifth of October, more than any other trees there. As I look up
 the main street, they appear like painted screens standing before the
 houses; yet many are green. But now, or generally by the seventeenth
 of October, when almost all red maples and some white maples are bare,
 the large sugar maples also are in their glory, glowing with yellow
 and red, and show unexpectedly bright and delicate tints. They are
 remarkable for the contrast they often afford of deep blushing red on
 one half and green on the other. They become at length dense masses of
 rich yellow with a deep scarlet blush, or more than blush, on the
 exposed surfaces. They are the brightest trees now in the street.
 
 The large ones on our Common are particularly beautiful. A delicate
 but warmer than golden yellow is now the prevailing color, with
 scarlet cheeks. Yet, standing on the east side of the Common just
 before sundown, when the western light is transmitted through them, I
 see that their yellow even, compared with the pale lemon yellow of an
 elm close by, amounts to a scarlet, without noticing the bright
 scarlet portions. Generally, they are great regular oval masses of
 yellow and scarlet. All the sunny warmth of the season, the Indian
 summer, seems to be absorbed in their leaves. The lowest and inmost
 leaves next the bole are, as usual, of the most delicate yellow and
 green, like the complexion of young men brought up in the house. There
 is an auction on the Common to-day, but its red flag is hard to be
 discerned amid this blaze of color.
 
 Little did the fathers of the town anticipate this brilliant success,
 when they caused to be imported from farther in the country some
 straight poles with their tops cut off, which they called sugar
 maples; and, as I remember, after they were set out, a neighboring
 merchant's clerk, by way of jest, planted beans about them. Those
 which were then jestingly called bean-poles are to-day far the most
 beautiful objects noticeable in our streets. They are worth all and
 more than they have cost,--though one of the selectmen, while setting
 them out, took the cold which occasioned his death,--if only because
 they have filled the open eyes of children with their rich color
 unstintedly so many Octobers. We will not ask them to yield us sugar
 in the spring, while they afford us so fair a prospect in the autumn.
 Wealth indoors may be the inheritance of few, but it is equally
 distributed on the Common. All children alike can revel in this golden
 harvest.
 
 Surely trees should be set in our streets with a view to their October
 splendor, though I doubt whether this is ever considered by the "Tree
 Society." Do you not think it will make some odds to these children
 that they were brought up under the maples? Hundreds of eyes are
 steadily drinking in this color, and by these teachers even the
 truants are caught and educated the moment they step abroad. Indeed,
 neither the truant nor the studious is at present taught color in the
 schools. These are instead of the bright colors in apothecaries'
 shops and city windows. It is a pity that we have no more _red_
 maples, and some hickories, in our streets as well. Our paint-box is
 very imperfectly filled. Instead of, or beside, supplying such
 paint-boxes as we do, we might supply these natural colors to the
 young. Where else will they study color under greater advantages? What
 School of Design can vie with this? Think how much the eyes of
 painters of all kinds, and of manufacturers of cloth and paper, and
 paper-stainers, and countless others, are to be educated by these
 autumnal colors. The stationer's envelopes may be of very various
 tints, yet not so various as those of the leaves of a single tree. If
 you want a different shade or tint of a particular color, you have
 only to look farther within or without the tree or the wood. These
 leaves are not many dipped in one dye, as at the dye-house, but they
 are dyed in light of infinitely various degrees of strength and left
 to set and dry there.
 
 Shall the names of so many of our colors continue to be derived from
 those of obscure foreign localities, as Naples yellow, Prussian blue,
 raw Sienna, burnt Umber, Gamboge? (surely the Tyrian purple must have
 faded by this time), or from comparatively trivial articles of
 commerce,--chocolate, lemon, coffee, cinnamon, claret? (shall we
 compare our hickory to a lemon, or a lemon to a hickory?) or from ores
 and oxides which few ever see? Shall we so often, when describing to
 our neighbors the color of something we have seen, refer them, not to
 some natural object in our neighborhood, but perchance to a bit of
 earth fetched from the other side of the planet, which possibly they
 may find at the apothecary's, but which probably neither they nor we
 ever saw? Have we not an _earth_ under our feet,--aye, and a sky over
 our heads? Or is the last _all_ ultramarine? What do we know of
 sapphire, amethyst, emerald, ruby, amber, and the like,--most of us
 who take these names in vain? Leave these precious words to
 cabinet-keepers, virtuosos, and maids-of-honor,--to the Nabobs,
 Begums, and Chobdars of Hindostan, or wherever else. I do not see why,
 since America and her autumn woods have been discovered, our leaves
 should not compete with the precious stones in giving names to colors;
 and, indeed, I believe that in course of time the names of some of our
 trees and shrubs, as well as flowers, will get into our popular
 chromatic nomenclature.
 
 But of much more importance than a knowledge of the names and
 distinctions of color is the joy and exhilaration which these colored
 leaves excite. Already these brilliant trees throughout the street,
 without any more variety, are at least equal to an annual festival and
 holiday, or a week of such. These are cheap and innocent gala-days,
 celebrated by one and all without the aid of committees or marshals,
 such a show as may safely be licensed, not attracting gamblers or
 rum-sellers, not requiring any special police to keep the peace. And
 poor indeed must be that New England village's October which has not
 the maple in its streets. This October festival costs no powder, nor
 ringing of bells, but every tree is a living liberty-pole on which a
 thousand bright flags are waving.
 
 No wonder that we must have our annual cattle-show, and fall training,
 and perhaps cornwallis, our September courts, and the like. Nature
 herself holds her annual fair in October, not only in the streets, but
 in every hollow and on every hillside. When lately we looked into that
 red maple swamp all ablaze, where the trees were clothed in their
 vestures of most dazzling tints, did it not suggest a thousand gypsies
 beneath,--a race capable of wild delight,--or even the fabled fauns,
 satyrs, and wood-nymphs come back to earth? Or was it only a
 congregation of wearied woodchoppers, or of proprietors come to
 inspect their lots, that we thought of? Or, earlier still, when we
 paddled on the river through that fine-grained September air, did
 there not appear to be something new going on under the sparkling
 surface of the stream, a shaking of props, at least, so that we made
 haste in order to be up in time? Did not the rows of yellowing willows
 and button-bushes on each side seem like rows of booths, under which,
 perhaps, some fluviatile egg-pop equally yellow was effervescing? Did
 not all these suggest that man's spirits should rise as high as
 Nature's,--should hang out their flag, and the routine of his life be
 interrupted by an analogous expression of joy and hilarity?
 
 No annual training or muster of soldiery, no celebration with its
 scarfs and banners, could import into the town a hundredth part of the
 annual splendor of our October. We have only to set the trees, or let
 them stand, and Nature will find the colored drapery,--flags of all
 her nations, some of whose private signals hardly the botanist can
 read,--while we walk under the triumphal arches of the elms. Leave it
 to Nature to appoint the days, whether the same as in neighboring
 States or not, and let the clergy read her proclamations, if they can
 understand them. Behold what a brilliant drapery is her woodbine flag!
 What public-spirited merchant, think you, has contributed this part of
 the show? There is no handsomer shingling and paint than this vine, at
 present covering a whole side of some houses. I do not believe that
 the ivy _never sere_ is comparable to it. No wonder it has been
 extensively introduced into London. Let us have a good many maples and
 hickories and scarlet oaks, then, I say. Blaze away! Shall that dirty
 roll of bunting in the gun-house be all the colors a village can
 display? A village is not complete, unless it have these trees to mark
 the season in it. They are important, like the town clock. A village
 that has them not will not be found to work well. It has a screw
 loose, an essential part is wanting. Let us have willows for spring,
 elms for summer, maples and walnuts and tupeloes for autumn,
 evergreens for winter, and oaks for all seasons. What is a gallery in
 a house to a gallery in the streets, which every market-man rides
 through, whether he will or not? Of course, there is not a
 picture-gallery in the country which would be worth so much to us as
 is the western view at sunset under the elms of our main street. They
 are the frame to a picture which is daily painted behind them. An
 avenue of elms as large as our largest and three miles long would seem
 to lead to some admirable place, though only C---- were at the end of
 it.
 
 A village needs these innocent stimulants of bright and cheering
 prospects to keep off melancholy and superstition. Show me two
 villages, one embowered in trees and blazing with all the glories of
 October, the other a merely trivial and treeless waste, or with only a
 single tree or two for suicides, and I shall be sure that in the
 latter will be found the most starved and bigoted religionists and the
 most desperate drinkers. Every wash-tub and milk-can and gravestone
 will be exposed. The inhabitants will disappear abruptly behind their
 barns and houses, like desert Arabs amid their rocks, and I shall look
 to see spears in their hands. They will be ready to accept the most
 barren and forlorn doctrine,--as that the world is speedily coming to
 an end, or has already got to it, or that they themselves are turned
 wrong side outward. They will perchance crack their dry joints at one
 another and call it a spiritual communication.
 
 But to confine ourselves to the maples. What if we were to take half
 as much pains in protecting them as we do in setting them out,--not
 stupidly tie our horses to our dahlia stems?
 
 What meant the fathers by establishing this _perfectly living_
 institution before the church,--this institution which needs no
 repairing nor repainting, which is continually enlarged and repaired
 by its growth? Surely they
 
      "Wrought in a sad sincerity;
      Themselves from God they could not free;
      They _planted_ better than they knew;--
      The conscious _trees_ to beauty grew."
 
 Verily these maples are cheap preachers, permanently settled, which
 preach their half-century, and century, aye, and century-and-a-half
 sermons, with constantly increasing unction and influence, ministering
 to many generations of men; and the least we can do is to supply them
 with suitable colleagues as they grow infirm.
 
 
 THE SCARLET OAK
 
 Belonging to a genus which is remarkable for the beautiful form of its
 leaves, I suspect that some scarlet oak leaves surpass those of all
 other oaks in the rich and wild beauty of their outlines. I judge from
 an acquaintance with twelve species, and from drawings which I have
 seen of many others.
 
 Stand under this tree and see how finely its leaves are cut against
 the sky,--as it were, only a few sharp points extending from a midrib.
 They look like double, treble, or quadruple crosses. They are far more
 ethereal than the less deeply scalloped oak leaves. They have so
 little leafy _terra firma_ that they appear melting away in the light,
 and scarcely obstruct our view. The leaves of very young plants are,
 like those of full-grown oaks of other species, more entire, simple,
 and lumpish in their outlines, but these, raised high on old trees,
 have solved the leafy problem. Lifted higher and higher, and
 sublimated more and more, putting off some earthiness and cultivating
 more intimacy with the light each year, they have at length the least
 possible amount of earthy matter, and the greatest spread and grasp of
 skyey influences. There they dance, arm in arm with the
 light,--tripping it on fantastic points, fit partners in those aerial
 halls. So intimately mingled are they with it, that, what with their
 slenderness and their glossy surfaces, you can hardly tell at last
 what in the dance is leaf and what is light. And when no zephyr stirs,
 they are at most but a rich tracery to the forest windows.
 
 I am again struck with their beauty, when, a month later, they thickly
 strew the ground in the woods, piled one upon another under my feet.
 They are then brown above, but purple beneath. With their narrow lobes
 and their bold, deep scallops reaching almost to the middle, they
 suggest that the material must be cheap, or else there has been a
 lavish expense in their creation, as if so much had been cut out. Or
 else they seem to us the remnants of the stuff out of which leaves
 have been cut with a die. Indeed, when they lie thus one upon another,
 they remind me of a pile of scrap-tin.
 
 Or bring one home, and study it closely at your leisure, by the
 fireside. It is a type, not from any Oxford font, not in the Basque
 nor the arrow-headed character, not found on the Rosetta Stone, but
 destined to be copied in sculpture one day, if they ever get to
 whittling stone here. What a wild and pleasing outline, a combination
 of graceful curves and angles! The eye rests with equal delight on
 what is not leaf and on what is leaf,--on the broad, free, open
 sinuses, and on the long, sharp, bristle-pointed lobes. A simple oval
 outline would include it all, if you connected the points of the leaf;
 but how much richer is it than that, with its half-dozen deep
 scallops, in which the eye and thought of the beholder are embayed! If
 I were a drawing-master, I would set my pupils to copying these
 leaves, that they might learn to draw firmly and gracefully.
 
 Regarded as water, it is like a pond with half a dozen broad rounded
 promontories extending nearly to its middle, half from each side,
 while its watery bays extend far inland, like sharp friths, at each of
 whose heads several fine streams empty in,--almost a leafy
 archipelago.
 
 But it oftener suggests land, and, as Dionysius and Pliny compared the
 form of the Morea to that of the leaf of the Oriental plane tree, so
 this leaf reminds me of some fair wild island in the ocean, whose
 extensive coast, alternate rounded bays with smooth strands, and
 sharp-pointed rocky capes, mark it as fitted for the habitation of
 man, and destined to become a centre of civilization at last. To the
 sailor's eye, it is a much indented shore. Is it not, in fact, a shore
 to the aerial ocean, on which the windy surf beats? At sight of this
 leaf we are all mariners,--if not vikings, buccaneers, and
 filibusters. Both our love of repose and our spirit of adventure are
 addressed. In our most casual glance, perchance, we think that if we
 succeed in doubling those sharp capes we shall find deep, smooth, and
 secure havens in the ample bays. How different from the white oak
 leaf, with its rounded headlands, on which no lighthouse need be
 placed! That is an England, with its long civil history, that may be
 read. This is some still unsettled New-found Island or Celebes. Shall
 we go and be rajahs there?
 
 By the twenty-sixth of October the large scarlet oaks are in their
 prime, when other oaks are usually withered. They have been kindling
 their fires for a week past, and now generally burst into a blaze.
 This alone of _our_ indigenous deciduous trees (excepting the
 dogwood, of which I do not know half a dozen, and they are but large
 bushes) is now in its glory. The two aspens and the sugar maple come
 nearest to it in date, but they have lost the greater part of their
 leaves. Of evergreens, only the pitch pine is still commonly bright.
 
 But it requires a particular alertness, if not devotion to these
 phenomena, to appreciate the wide-spread, but late and unexpected
 glory of the scarlet oaks. I do not speak here of the small trees and
 shrubs, which are commonly observed, and which are now withered, but
 of the large trees. Most go in and shut their doors, thinking that
 bleak and colorless November has already come, when some of the most
 brilliant and memorable colors are not yet lit.
 
 This very perfect and vigorous one, about forty feet high, standing in
 an open pasture, which was quite glossy green on the twelfth, is now,
 the twenty-sixth, completely changed to bright dark-scarlet,--every
 leaf, between you and the sun, as if it had been dipped into a scarlet
 dye. The whole tree is much like a heart in form, as well as color.
 Was not this worth waiting for? Little did you think, ten days ago,
 that that cold green tree would assume such color as this. Its leaves
 are still firmly attached, while those of other trees are falling
 around it. It seems to say: "I am the last to blush, but I blush
 deeper than any of ye. I bring up the rear in my red coat. We scarlet
 ones, alone of oaks, have not given up the fight."
 
 The sap is now, and even far into November, frequently flowing fast in
 these trees, as in maples in the spring; and apparently their bright
 tints, now that most other oaks are withered, are connected with this
 phenomenon. They are full of life. It has a pleasantly astringent,
 acorn-like taste, this strong oak wine, as I find on tapping them with
 my knife.
 
 Looking across this woodland valley, a quarter of a mile wide, how
 rich those scarlet oaks embosomed in pines, their bright red branches
 intimately intermingled with them! They have their full effect there.
 The pine boughs are the green calyx to their red petals. Or, as we go
 along a road in the woods, the sun striking endwise through it, and
 lighting up the red tents of the oaks, which on each side are mingled
 with the liquid green of the pines, makes a very gorgeous scene.
 Indeed, without the evergreens for contrast, the autumnal tints would
 lose much of their effect.
 
 The scarlet oak asks a clear sky and the brightness of late October
 days. These bring out its colors. If the sun goes into a cloud they
 become comparatively indistinct. As I sit on a cliff in the southwest
 part of our town, the sun is now getting low, and the woods in
 Lincoln, south and east of me, are lit up by its more level rays; and
 in the scarlet oaks, scattered so equally over the forest, there is
 brought out a more brilliant redness than I had believed was in them.
 Every tree of this species which is visible in those directions, even
 to the horizon, now stands out distinctly red. Some great ones lift
 their red backs high above the woods, in the next town, like huge
 roses with a myriad of fine petals; and some more slender ones, in a
 small grove of white pines on Pine Hill in the east, on the very verge
 of the horizon, alternating with the pines on the edge of the grove,
 and shouldering them with their red coats, look like soldiers in red
 amid hunters in green. This time it is Lincoln green, too. Till the
 sun got low, I did not believe that there were so many redcoats in the
 forest army. Theirs is an intense, burning red, which would lose some
 of its strength, methinks, with every step you might take toward them;
 for the shade that lurks amid their foliage does not report itself at
 this distance, and they are unanimously red. The focus of their
 reflected color is in the atmosphere far on this side. Every such tree
 becomes a nucleus of red, as it were, where, with the declining sun,
 that color grows and glows. It is partly borrowed fire, gathering
 strength from the sun on its way to your eye. It has only some
 comparatively dull red leaves for a rallying-point, or kindling-stuff,
 to start it, and it becomes an intense scarlet or red mist, or fire,
 which finds fuel for itself in the very atmosphere. So vivacious is
 redness. The very rails reflect a rosy light at this hour and season.
 You see a redder tree than exists.
 
 If you wish to count the scarlet oaks, do it now. In a clear day stand
 thus on a hilltop in the woods, when the sun is an hour high, and
 every one within range of your vision, excepting in the west, will be
 revealed. You might live to the age of Methuselah and never find a
 tithe of them, otherwise. Yet sometimes even in a dark day I have
 thought them as bright as I ever saw them. Looking westward, their
 colors are lost in a blaze of light; but in other directions the whole
 forest is a flower-garden, in which these late roses burn, alternating
 with green, while the so-called "gardeners," walking here and there,
 perchance, beneath, with spade and water-pot, see only a few little
 asters amid withered leaves.
 
 These are _my_ China-asters, _my_ late garden-flowers. It costs me
 nothing for a gardener. The falling leaves, all over the forest, are
 protecting the roots of my plants. Only look at what is to be seen,
 and you will have garden enough, without deepening the soil in your
 yard. We have only to elevate our view a little, to see the whole
 forest as a garden. The blossoming of the scarlet oak,--the
 forest-flower, surpassing all in splendor (at least since the maple)!
 I do not know but they interest me more than the maples, they are so
 widely and equally dispersed throughout the forest; they are so hardy,
 a nobler tree on the whole; our chief November flower, abiding the
 approach of winter with us, imparting warmth to early November
 prospects. It is remarkable that the latest bright color that is
 general should be this deep, dark scarlet and red, the intensest of
 colors. The ripest fruit of the year; like the cheek of a hard, glossy
 red apple, from the cold Isle of Orleans, which will not be mellow for
 eating till next spring! When I rise to a hilltop, a thousand of these
 great oak roses, distributed on every side, as far as the horizon! I
 admire them four or five miles off! This my unfailing prospect for a
 fortnight past! This late forest-flower surpasses all that spring or
 summer could do. Their colors were but rare and dainty specks
 comparatively (created for the near-sighted, who walk amid the
 humblest herbs and underwoods), and made no impression on a distant
 eye. Now it is an extended forest or a mountain-side, through or along
 which we journey from day to day, that bursts into bloom.
 Comparatively, our gardening is on a petty scale,--the gardener still
 nursing a few asters amid dead weeds, ignorant of the gigantic asters
 and roses which, as it were, overshadow him, and ask for none of his
 care. It is like a little red paint ground on a saucer, and held up
 against the sunset sky. Why not take more elevated and broader views,
 walk in the great garden; not skulk in a little "debauched" nook of
 it? consider the beauty of the forest, and not merely of a few
 impounded herbs?
 
 Let your walks now be a little more adventurous; ascend the hills. If,
 about the last of October, you ascend any hill in the outskirts of our
 town, and probably of yours, and look over the forest, you may
 see--well, what I have endeavored to describe. All this you surely
 _will_ see, and much more, if you are prepared to see it,--if you
 _look_ for it. Otherwise, regular and universal as this phenomenon is,
 whether you stand on the hilltop or in the hollow, you will think for
 threescore years and ten that all the wood is, at this season, sere
 and brown. Objects are concealed from our view, not so much because
 they are out of the course of our visual ray as because we do not
 bring our minds and eyes to bear on them; for there is no power to see
 in the eye itself, any more than in any other jelly. We do not realize
 how far and widely, or how near and narrowly, we are to look. The
 greater part of the phenomena of Nature are for this reason concealed
 from us all our lives. The gardener sees only the gardener's garden.
 Here, too, as in political economy, the supply answers to the demand.
 Nature does not cast pearls before swine. There is just as much
 beauty visible to us in the landscape as we are prepared to
 appreciate,--not a grain more. The actual objects which one man will
 see from a particular hilltop are just as different from those which
 another will see as the beholders are different. The scarlet oak must,
 in a sense, be in your eye when you go forth. We cannot see anything
 until we are possessed with the idea of it, take it into our
 heads,--and then we can hardly see anything else. In my botanical
 rambles I find that, first, the idea, or image, of a plant occupies my
 thoughts, though it may seem very foreign to this locality,--no nearer
 than Hudson's Bay,--and for some weeks or months I go thinking of it,
 and expecting it, unconsciously, and at length I surely see it. This
 is the history of my finding a score or more of rare plants which I
 could name. A man sees only what concerns him. A botanist absorbed in
 the study of grasses does not distinguish the grandest pasture oaks.
 He, as it were, tramples down oaks unwittingly in his walk, or at most
 sees only their shadows. I have found that it required a different
 intention of the eye, in the same locality, to see different plants,
 even when they were closely allied, as _Juncaceae_ and _Gramineae_:
 when I was looking for the former, I did not see the latter in the
 midst of them. How much more, then, it requires different intentions
 of the eye and of the mind to attend to different departments of
 knowledge! How differently the poet and the naturalist look at
 objects!
 
 Take a New England selectman, and set him on the highest of our hills,
 and tell him to look,--sharpening his sight to the utmost, and putting
 on the glasses that suit him best (aye, using a spy-glass, if he
 likes),--and make a full report. What, probably, will he _spy_?--what
 will he _select_ to look at? Of course, he will see a Brocken spectre
 of himself. He will see several meeting-houses, at least, and,
 perhaps, that somebody ought to be assessed higher than he is, since
 he has so handsome a wood-lot. Now take Julius Caesar, or Emanuel
 Swedenborg, or a Fiji-Islander, and set him up there. Or suppose all
 together, and let them compare notes afterward. Will it appear that
 they have enjoyed the same prospect? What they will see will be as
 different as Rome was from heaven or hell, or the last from the Fiji
 Islands. For aught we know, as strange a man as any of these is always
 at our elbow.
 
 Why, it takes a sharpshooter to bring down even such trivial game as
 snipes and woodcocks; he must take very particular aim, and know what
 he is aiming at. He would stand a very small chance, if he fired at
 random into the sky, being told that snipes were flying there. And so
 is it with him that shoots at beauty; though he wait till the sky
 falls, he will not bag any, if he does not already know its seasons
 and haunts, and the color of its wing,--if he has not dreamed of it,
 so that he can _anticipate_ it; then, indeed, he flushes it at every
 step, shoots double and on the wing, with both barrels, even in
 corn-fields. The sportsman trains himself, dresses, and watches
 unweariedly, and loads and primes for his particular game. He prays
 for it, and offers sacrifices, and so he gets it. After due and long
 preparation, schooling his eye and hand, dreaming awake and asleep,
 with gun and paddle and boat, he goes out after meadow-hens, which
 most of his townsmen never saw nor dreamed of, and paddles for miles
 against a head wind, and wades in water up to his knees, being out all
 day without his dinner, and _therefore_ he gets them. He had them
 half-way into his bag when he started, and has only to shove them
 down. The true sportsman can shoot you almost any of his game from his
 windows: what else has he windows or eyes for? It comes and perches at
 last on the barrel of his gun; but the rest of the world never see it
 _with the feathers on_. The geese fly exactly under his zenith, and
 honk when they get there, and he will keep himself supplied by firing
 up his chimney; twenty musquash have the refusal of each one of his
 traps before it is empty. If he lives, and his game spirit increases,
 heaven and earth shall fail him sooner than game; and when he dies, he
 will go to more extensive and, perchance, happier hunting-grounds. The
 fisherman, too, dreams of fish, sees a bobbing cork in his dreams,
 till he can almost catch them in his sink-spout. I knew a girl who,
 being sent to pick huckleberries, picked wild gooseberries by the
 quart, where no one else knew that there were any, because she was
 accustomed to pick them up-country where she came from. The astronomer
 knows where to go star-gathering, and sees one clearly in his mind
 before any have seen it with a glass. The hen scratches and finds her
 food right under where she stands; but such is not the way with the
 hawk.
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 These bright leaves which I have mentioned are not the exception, but
 the rule; for I believe that all leaves, even grasses and mosses,
 acquire brighter colors just before their fall. When you come to
 observe faithfully the changes of each humblest plant, you find that
 each has, sooner or later, its peculiar autumnal tint; and if you
 undertake to make a complete list of the bright tints, it will be
 nearly as long as a catalogue of the plants in your vicinity.
 
 
 
 
 WILD APPLES
 
 THE HISTORY OF THE APPLE TREE
 
 
 It is remarkable how closely the history of the apple tree is
 connected with that of man. The geologist tells us that the order of
 the _Rosaceae_, which includes the apple, also the true grasses, and
 the _Labiatae_, or mints, were introduced only a short time previous
 to the appearance of man on the globe.
 
 It appears that apples made a part of the food of that unknown
 primitive people whose traces have lately been found at the bottom of
 the Swiss lakes, supposed to be older than the foundation of Rome, so
 old that they had no metallic implements. An entire black and
 shriveled crab-apple has been recovered from their stores.
 
 Tacitus says of the ancient Germans that they satisfied their hunger
 with wild apples (_agrestia poma_), among other things.
 
 Niebuhr observes that "the words for a house, a field, a plow,
 plowing, wine, oil, milk, sheep, apples, and others relating to
 agriculture and the gentler way of life, agree in Latin and Greek,
 while the Latin words for all objects pertaining to war or the chase
 are utterly alien from the Greek." Thus the apple tree may be
 considered a symbol of peace no less than the olive.
 
 The apple was early so important, and generally distributed, that its
 name traced to its root in many languages signifies fruit in general.
 [Greek: Melon], in Greek, means an apple, also the fruit of other
 trees, also a sheep and any cattle, and finally riches in general.
 
 The apple tree has been celebrated by the Hebrews, Greeks, Romans, and
 Scandinavians. Some have thought that the first human pair were
 tempted by its fruit. Goddesses are fabled to have contended for it,
 dragons were set to watch it, and heroes were employed to pluck it.
 
 The tree is mentioned in at least three places in the Old Testament,
 and its fruit in two or three more. Solomon sings, "As the apple-tree
 among the trees of the wood, so is my beloved among the sons." And
 again, "Stay me with flagons, comfort me with apples." The noblest
 part of man's noblest feature is named from this fruit, "the apple of
 the eye."
 
 The apple tree is also mentioned by Homer and Herodotus. Ulysses saw
 in the glorious garden of Alcinous "pears and pomegranates, and apple
 trees bearing beautiful fruit" ([Greek: kai meleai aglaokarpoi]). And
 according to Homer, apples were among the fruits which Tantalus could
 not pluck, the wind ever blowing their boughs away from him.
 Theophrastus knew and described the apple tree as a botanist.
 
 According to the Prose Edda, "Iduna keeps in a box the apples which
 the gods, when they feel old age approaching, have only to taste of to
 become young again. It is in this manner that they will be kept in
 renovated youth until Ragnarok" (or the destruction of the gods).
 
 I learn from Loudon that "the ancient Welsh bards were rewarded for
 excelling in song by the token of the apple-spray;" and "in the
 Highlands of Scotland the apple-tree is the badge of the clan Lamont."
 
 The apple tree (_Pyrus malus_) belongs chiefly to the northern
 temperate zone. Loudon says that "it grows spontaneously in every part
 of Europe except the frigid zone, and throughout Western Asia, China,
 and Japan." We have also two or three varieties of the apple
 indigenous in North America. The cultivated apple tree was first
 introduced into this country by the earliest settlers, and is thought
 to do as well or better here than anywhere else. Probably some of the
 varieties which are now cultivated were first introduced into Britain
 by the Romans.
 
 Pliny, adopting the distinction of Theophrastus, says, "Of trees there
 are some which are altogether wild (_sylvestres_), some more civilized
 (_urbaniores_)." Theophrastus includes the apple among the last; and,
 indeed, it is in this sense the most civilized of all trees. It is as
 harmless as a dove, as beautiful as a rose, and as valuable as flocks
 and herds. It has been longer cultivated than any other, and so is
 more humanized; and who knows but, like the dog, it will at length be
 no longer traceable to its wild original? It migrates with man, like
 the dog and horse and cow: first, perchance, from Greece to Italy,
 thence to England, thence to America; and our Western emigrant is
 still marching steadily toward the setting sun with the seeds of the
 apple in his pocket, or perhaps a few young trees strapped to his
 load. At least a million apple trees are thus set farther westward
 this year than any cultivated ones grew last year. Consider how the
 Blossom Week, like the Sabbath, is thus annually spreading over the
 prairies; for when man migrates, he carries with him not only his
 birds, quadrupeds, insects, vegetables, and his very sward, but his
 orchard also.
 
 The leaves and tender twigs are an agreeable food to many domestic
 animals, as the cow, horse, sheep, and goat; and the fruit is sought
 after by the first, as well as by the hog. Thus there appears to have
 existed a natural alliance between these animals and this tree from
 the first. "The fruit of the crab in the forests of France" is said to
 be "a great resource for the wild boar."
 
 Not only the Indian, but many indigenous insects, birds, and
 quadrupeds, welcomed the apple tree to these shores. The tent
 caterpillar saddled her eggs on the very first twig that was formed,
 and it has since shared her affections with the wild cherry; and the
 canker-worm also in a measure abandoned the elm to feed on it. As it
 grew apace, the bluebird, robin, cherry-bird, kingbird, and many more
 came with haste and built their nests and warbled in its boughs, and
 so became orchard-birds, and multiplied more than ever. It was an era
 in the history of their race. The downy woodpecker found such a savory
 morsel under its bark that he perforated it in a ring quite round the
 tree, before he left it,--a thing which he had never done before, to
 my knowledge. It did not take the partridge long to find out how sweet
 its buds were, and every winter eve she flew, and still flies, from
 the wood, to pluck them, much to the farmer's sorrow. The rabbit, too,
 was not slow to learn the taste of its twigs and bark; and when the
 fruit was ripe, the squirrel half rolled, half carried it to his hole;
 and even the musquash crept up the bank from the brook at evening, and
 greedily devoured it, until he had worn a path in the grass there; and
 when it was frozen and thawed, the crow and the jay were glad to taste
 it occasionally. The owl crept into the first apple tree that became
 hollow, and fairly hooted with delight, finding it just the place for
 him; so, settling down into it, he has remained there ever since.
 
 My theme being the Wild Apple, I will merely glance at some of the
 seasons in the annual growth of the cultivated apple, and pass on to
 my special province.
 
 The flowers of the apple are perhaps the most beautiful of any tree's,
 so copious and so delicious to both sight and scent. The walker is
 frequently tempted to turn and linger near some more than usually
 handsome one, whose blossoms are two-thirds expanded. How superior it
 is in these respects to the pear, whose blossoms are neither colored
 nor fragrant!
 
 By the middle of July, green apples are so large as to remind us of
 coddling, and of the autumn. The sward is commonly strewed with little
 ones which fall stillborn, as it were,--Nature thus thinning them for
 us. The Roman writer Palladius said, "If apples are inclined to fall
 before their time, a stone placed in a split root will retain them."
 Some such notion, still surviving, may account for some of the stones
 which we see placed, to be overgrown, in the forks of trees. They have
 a saying in Suffolk, England,--
 
      "At Michaelmas time, or a little before,
      Half an apple goes to the core."
 
 Early apples begin to be ripe about the first of August; but I think
 that none of them are so good to eat as some to smell. One is worth
 more to scent your handkerchief with than any perfume which they sell
 in the shops. The fragrance of some fruits is not to be forgotten,
 along with that of flowers. Some gnarly apple which I pick up in the
 road reminds me by its fragrance of all the wealth of Pomona,--carrying
 me forward to those days when they will be collected in golden and
 ruddy heaps in the orchards and about the cider-mills.
 
 A week or two later, as you are going by orchards or gardens,
 especially in the evenings, you pass through a little region possessed
 by the fragrance of ripe apples, and thus enjoy them without price,
 and without robbing anybody.
 
 There is thus about all natural products a certain volatile and
 ethereal quality which represents their highest value, and which
 cannot be vulgarized, or bought and sold. No mortal has ever enjoyed
 the perfect flavor of any fruit, and only the godlike among men begin
 to taste its ambrosial qualities. For nectar and ambrosia are only
 those fine flavors of every earthly fruit which our coarse palates
 fail to perceive,--just as we occupy the heaven of the gods without
 knowing it. When I see a particularly mean man carrying a load of fair
 and fragrant early apples to market, I seem to see a contest going on
 between him and his horse, on the one side, and the apples on the
 other, and, to my mind, the apples always gain it. Pliny says that
 apples are the heaviest of all things, and that the oxen begin to
 sweat at the mere sight of a load of them. Our driver begins to lose
 his load the moment he tries to transport them to where they do not
 belong, that is, to any but the most beautiful. Though he gets out
 from time to time, and feels of them, and thinks they are all there, I
 see the stream of their evanescent and celestial qualities going to
 heaven from his cart, while the pulp and skin and core only are going
 to market. They are not apples, but pomace. Are not these still
 Iduna's apples, the taste of which keeps the gods forever young? and
 think you that they will let Loki or Thjassi carry them off to
 Joetunheim, while they grow wrinkled and gray? No, for Ragnaroek, or the
 destruction of the gods, is not yet.
 
 There is another thinning of the fruit, commonly near the end of
 August or in September, when the ground is strewn with windfalls; and
 this happens especially when high winds occur after rain. In some
 orchards you may see fully three quarters of the whole crop on the
 ground, lying in a circular form beneath the trees, yet hard and
 green, or, if it is a hillside, rolled far down the hill. However, it
 is an ill wind that blows nobody any good. All the country over,
 people are busy picking up the windfalls, and this will make them
 cheap for early apple pies.
 
 In October, the leaves falling, the apples are more distinct on the
 trees. I saw one year in a neighboring town some trees fuller of fruit
 than I remember to have ever seen before, small yellow apples hanging
 over the road. The branches were gracefully drooping with their
 weight, like a barberry bush, so that the whole tree acquired a new
 character. Even the topmost branches, instead of standing erect,
 spread and drooped in all directions; and there were so many poles
 supporting the lower ones that they looked like pictures of banyan
 trees. As an old English manuscript says, "The mo appelen the tree
 bereth the more sche boweth to the folk."
 
 Surely the apple is the noblest of fruits. Let the most beautiful or
 the swiftest have it. That should be the "going" price of apples.
 
 Between the 5th and 20th of October I see the barrels lie under the
 trees. And perhaps I talk with one who is selecting some choice
 barrels to fulfill an order. He turns a specked one over many times
 before he leaves it out. If I were to tell what is passing in my mind,
 I should say that every one was specked which he had handled; for he
 rubs off all the bloom, and those fugacious ethereal qualities leave
 it. Cool evenings prompt the farmers to make haste, and at length I
 see only the ladders here and there left leaning against the trees.
 
 It would be well, if we accepted these gifts with more joy and
 gratitude, and did not think it enough simply to put a fresh load of
 compost about the tree. Some old English customs are suggestive at
 least. I find them described chiefly in Brand's "Popular Antiquities."
 It appears that "on Christmas Eve the farmers and their men in
 Devonshire take a large bowl of cider, with a toast in it, and
 carrying it in state to the orchard, they salute the apple-trees with
 much ceremony, in order to make them bear well the next season." This
 salutation consists in "throwing some of the cider about the roots of
 the tree, placing bits of the toast on the branches," and then,
 "encircling one of the best bearing trees in the orchard, they drink
 the following toast three several times:--
 
        'Here's to thee, old apple tree,
      Whence thou mayst bud, and whence thou mayst blow,
      And whence thou mayst bear apples enow!
        Hats-full! caps-full!
        Bushel, bushel, sacks-full!
        And my pockets full, too! Hurra!'"
 
 Also what was called "apple-howling" used to be practiced in various
 counties of England on New Year's Eve. A troop of boys visited the
 different orchards, and, encircling the apple trees, repeated the
 following words:--
 
      "Stand fast, root! bear well, top!
      Pray God send us a good howling crop:
      Every twig, apples big;
      Every bough, apples enow!"
 
 "They then shout in chorus, one of the boys accompanying them on a
 cow's horn. During this ceremony they rap the trees with their
 sticks." This is called "wassailing" the trees, and is thought by some
 to be "a relic of the heathen sacrifice to Pomona."
 
 Herrick sings,--
 
      "Wassaile the trees that they may beare
      You many a plum and many a peare;
      For more or less fruits they will bring
      As you so give them wassailing."
 
 Our poets have as yet a better right to sing of cider than of wine;
 but it behooves them to sing better than English Phillips did, else
 they will do no credit to their Muse.
 
 
 THE WILD APPLE
 
 So much for the more civilized apple trees (_urbaniores_, as Pliny
 calls them). I love better to go through the old orchards of ungrafted
 apple trees, at what ever season of the year,--so irregularly planted:
 sometimes two trees standing close together; and the rows so devious
 that you would think that they not only had grown while the owner was
 sleeping, but had been set out by him in a somnambulic state. The rows
 of grafted fruit will never tempt me to wander amid them like these.
 But I now, alas, speak rather from memory than from any recent
 experience, such ravages have been made!
 
 Some soils, like a rocky tract called the Easterbrooks Country in my
 neighborhood, are so suited to the apple, that it will grow faster in
 them without any care, or if only the ground is broken up once a year,
 than it will in many places with any amount of care. The owners of
 this tract allow that the soil is excellent for fruit, but they say
 that it is so rocky that they have not patience to plow it, and that,
 together with the distance, is the reason why it is not cultivated.
 There are, or were recently, extensive orchards there standing without
 order. Nay, they spring up wild and bear well there in the midst of
 pines, birches, maples, and oaks. I am often surprised to see rising
 amid these trees the rounded tops of apple trees glowing with red or
 yellow fruit, in harmony with the autumnal tints of the forest.
 
 Going up the side of a cliff about the first of November, I saw a
 vigorous young apple tree, which, planted by birds or cows, had shot
 up amid the rocks and open woods there, and had now much fruit on it,
 uninjured by the frosts, when all cultivated apples were gathered. It
 was a rank, wild growth, with many green leaves on it still, and made
 an impression of thorniness. The fruit was hard and green, but looked
 as if it would be palatable in the winter. Some was dangling on the
 twigs, but more half buried in the wet leaves under the tree, or
 rolled far down the hill amid the rocks. The owner knows nothing of
 it. The day was not observed when it first blossomed, nor when it
 first bore fruit, unless by the chickadee. There was no dancing on the
 green beneath it in its honor, and now there is no hand to pluck its
 fruit,--which is only gnawed by squirrels, as I perceive. It has done
 double duty,--not only borne this crop, but each twig has grown a foot
 into the air. And this is _such_ fruit! bigger than many berries, we
 must admit, and carried home will be sound and palatable next spring.
 What care I for Iduna's apples so long as I can get these?
 
 When I go by this shrub thus late and hardy, and see its dangling
 fruit, I respect the tree, and I am grateful for Nature's bounty, even
 though I cannot eat it. Here on this rugged and woody hillside has
 grown an apple tree, not planted by man, no relic of a former orchard,
 but a natural growth, like the pines and oaks. Most fruits which we
 prize and use depend entirely on our care. Corn and grain, potatoes,
 peaches, melons, etc., depend altogether on our planting; but the
 apple emulates man's independence and enterprise. It is not simply
 carried, as I have said, but, like him, to some extent, it has
 migrated to this New World, and is even, here and there, making its
 way amid the aboriginal trees; just as the ox and dog and horse
 sometimes run wild and maintain themselves.
 
   [Illustration: _Wild Apple Tree_]
 
 Even the sourest and crabbedest apple, growing in the most unfavorable
 position, suggests such thoughts as these, it is so noble a fruit.
 
 
 THE CRAB
 
 Nevertheless, _our_ wild apple is wild only like myself, perchance,
 who belong not to the aboriginal race here, but have strayed into the
 woods from the cultivated stock. Wilder still, as I have said, there
 grows elsewhere in this country a native and aboriginal crab-apple,
 _Malus coronaria_, "whose nature has not yet been modified by
 cultivation." It is found from western New York to Minnesota, and
 southward. Michaux says that its ordinary height "is fifteen or
 eighteen feet, but it is sometimes found twenty-five or thirty feet
 high," and that the large ones "exactly resemble the common apple
 tree." "The flowers are white mingled with rose color, and are
 collected in corymbs." They are remarkable for their delicious odor.
 The fruit, according to him, is about an inch and a half in diameter,
 and is intensely acid. Yet they make fine sweetmeats and also cider of
 them. He concludes that "if, on being cultivated, it does not yield
 new and palatable varieties, it will at least be celebrated for the
 beauty of its flowers, and for the sweetness of its perfume."
 
 I never saw the crab-apple till May, 1861. I had heard of it through
 Michaux, but more modern botanists, so far as I know, have not
 treated it as of any peculiar importance. Thus it was a half-fabulous
 tree to me. I contemplated a pilgrimage to the "Glades," a portion of
 Pennsylvania where it was said to grow to perfection. I thought of
 sending to a nursery for it, but doubted if they had it, or would
 distinguish it from European varieties. At last I had occasion to go
 to Minnesota, and on entering Michigan I began to notice from the cars
 a tree with handsome rose-colored flowers. At first I thought it some
 variety of thorn; but it was not long before the truth flashed on me,
 that this was my long-sought crab-apple. It was the prevailing
 flowering shrub or tree to be seen from the cars at that season of the
 year,--about the middle of May. But the cars never stopped before one,
 and so I was launched on the bosom of the Mississippi without having
 touched one, experiencing the fate of Tantalus. On arriving at St.
 Anthony's Falls, I was sorry to be told that I was too far north for
 the crab-apple. Nevertheless I succeeded in finding it about eight
 miles west of the Falls; touched it and smelled it, and secured a
 lingering corymb of flowers for my herbarium. This must have been near
 its northern limit.
 
 
 HOW THE WILD APPLE GROWS
 
 But though these are indigenous, like the Indians, I doubt whether
 they are any hardier than those backwoodsmen among the apple trees,
 which, though descended from cultivated stocks, plant themselves in
 distant fields and forests, where the soil is favorable to them. I
 know of no trees which have more difficulties to contend with, and
 which more sturdily resist their foes. These are the ones whose story
 we have to tell. It oftentimes reads thus:--
 
 Near the beginning of May, we notice little thickets of apple trees
 just springing up in the pastures where cattle have been,--as the
 rocky ones of our Easterbrooks Country, or the top of Nobscot Hill, in
 Sudbury. One or two of these, perhaps, survive the drought and other
 accidents,--their very birthplace defending them against the
 encroaching grass and some other dangers, at first.
 
      In two years' time 't had thus
        Reached the level of the rocks,
      Admired the stretching world,
        Nor feared the wandering flocks.
 
      But at this tender age
        Its sufferings began:
      There came a browsing ox
        And cut it down a span.
 
 This time, perhaps, the ox does not notice it amid the grass; but the
 next year, when it has grown more stout, he recognizes it for a
 fellow-emigrant from the old country, the flavor of whose leaves and
 twigs he well knows; and though at first he pauses to welcome it, and
 express his surprise, and gets for answer, "The same cause that
 brought you here brought me," he nevertheless browses it again,
 reflecting, it may be, that he has some title to it.
 
 Thus cut down annually, it does not despair; but, putting forth two
 short twigs for every one cut off, it spreads out low along the ground
 in the hollows or between the rocks, growing more stout and scrubby,
 until it forms, not a tree as yet, but a little pyramidal, stiff,
 twiggy mass, almost as solid and impenetrable as a rock. Some of the
 densest and most impenetrable clumps of bushes that I have ever seen,
 as well on account of the closeness and stubbornness of their branches
 as of their thorns, have been these wild apple scrubs. They are more
 like the scrubby fir and black spruce on which you stand, and
 sometimes walk, on the tops of mountains, where cold is the demon they
 contend with, than anything else. No wonder they are prompted to grow
 thorns at last, to defend themselves against such foes. In their
 thorniness, however, there is no malice, only some malic acid.
 
 The rocky pastures of the tract I have referred to--for they maintain
 their ground best in a rocky field--are thickly sprinkled with these
 little tufts, reminding you often of some rigid gray mosses or
 lichens, and you see thousands of little trees just springing up
 between them, with the seed still attached to them.
 
 Being regularly clipped all around each year by the cows, as a hedge
 with shears, they are often of a perfect conical or pyramidal form,
 from one to four feet high, and more or less sharp, as if trimmed by
 the gardener's art. In the pastures on Nobscot Hill and its spurs,
 they make fine dark shadows when the sun is low. They are also an
 excellent covert from hawks for many small birds that roost and build
 in them. Whole flocks perch in them at night, and I have seen three
 robins' nests in one which was six feet in diameter.
 
 No doubt many of these are already old trees, if you reckon from the
 day they were planted, but infants still when you consider their
 development and the long life before them. I counted the annual rings
 of some which were just one foot high, and as wide as high, and found
 that they were about twelve years old, but quite sound and thrifty!
 They were so low that they were unnoticed by the walker, while many of
 their contemporaries from the nurseries were already bearing
 considerable crops. But what you gain in time is perhaps in this case,
 too, lost in power,--that is, in the vigor of the tree. This is their
 pyramidal state.
 
 The cows continue to browse them thus for twenty years or more,
 keeping them down and compelling them to spread, until at last they
 are so broad that they become their own fence, when some interior
 shoot, which their foes cannot reach, darts upward with joy: for it
 has not forgotten its high calling, and bears its own peculiar fruit
 in triumph.
 
 Such are the tactics by which it finally defeats its bovine foes. Now,
 if you have watched the progress of a particular shrub, you will see
 that it is no longer a simple pyramid or cone, but that out of its
 apex there rises a sprig or two, growing more lustily perchance than
 an orchard-tree, since the plant now devotes the whole of its
 repressed energy to these upright parts. In a short time these become
 a small tree, an inverted pyramid resting on the apex of the other, so
 that the whole has now the form of a vast hour-glass. The spreading
 bottom, having served its purpose, finally disappears, and the
 generous tree permits the now harmless cows to come in and stand in
 its shade, and rub against and redden its trunk, which has grown in
 spite of them, and even to taste a part of its fruit, and so disperse
 the seed.
 
 Thus the cows create their own shade and food; and the tree, its
 hour-glass being inverted, lives a second life, as it were.
 
 It is an important question with some nowadays, whether you should
 trim young apple trees as high as your nose or as high as your eyes.
 The ox trims them up as high as he can reach, and that is about the
 right height, I think.
 
 In spite of wandering kine, and other adverse circumstances, that
 despised shrub, valued only by small birds as a covert and shelter
 from hawks, has its blossom week at last, and in course of time its
 harvest, sincere, though small.
 
 By the end of some October, when its leaves have fallen, I frequently
 see such a central sprig, whose progress I have watched, when I
 thought it had forgotten its destiny, as I had, bearing its first crop
 of small green or yellow or rosy fruit, which the cows cannot get at
 over the bushy and thorny hedge which surrounds it, and I make haste
 to taste the new and undescribed variety. We have all heard of the
 numerous varieties of fruit invented by Van Mons and Knight. This is
 the system of Van Cow, and she has invented far more and more
 memorable varieties than both of them.
 
 Through what hardships it may attain to bear a sweet fruit! Though
 somewhat small, it may prove equal, if not superior, in flavor to that
 which has grown in a garden,--will perchance be all the sweeter and
 more palatable for the very difficulties it has had to contend with.
 Who knows but this chance wild fruit, planted by a cow or a bird on
 some remote and rocky hillside, where it is as yet unobserved by man,
 may be the choicest of all its kind, and foreign potentates shall hear
 of it, and royal societies seek to propagate it, though the virtues of
 the perhaps truly crabbed owner of the soil may never be heard of,--at
 least, beyond the limits of his village? It was thus the Porter and
 the Baldwin grew.
 
 Every wild apple shrub excites our expectation thus, somewhat as every
 wild child. It is, perhaps, a prince in disguise. What a lesson to
 man! So are human beings, referred to the highest standard, the
 celestial fruit which they suggest and aspire to bear, browsed on by
 fate; and only the most persistent and strongest genius defends itself
 and prevails, sends a tender scion upward at last, and drops its
 perfect fruit on the ungrateful earth. Poets and philosophers and
 statesmen thus spring up in the country pastures, and outlast the
 hosts of unoriginal men.
 
 Such is always the pursuit of knowledge. The celestial fruits, the
 golden apples of the Hesperides, are ever guarded by a hundred-headed
 dragon which never sleeps, so that it is an Herculean labor to pluck
 them.
 
 This is one, and the most remarkable way in which the wild apple is
 propagated; but commonly it springs up at wide intervals in woods and
 swamp, and by the sides of roads, as the soil may suit it, and grows
 with comparative rapidity. Those which grow in dense woods are very
 tall and slender. I frequently pluck from these trees a perfectly
 mild and tamed fruit. As Palladius says, "_Et injussu consternitur
 ubere mali_:" And the ground is strewn with the fruit of an unbidden
 apple tree.
 
 It is an old notion that, if these wild trees do not bear a valuable
 fruit of their own, they are the best stocks by which to transmit to
 posterity the most highly prized qualities of others. However, I am
 not in search of stocks, but the wild fruit itself, whose fierce gust
 has suffered no "inteneration." It is not my
 
                  "highest plot
      To plant the Bergamot."
 
 
 THE FRUIT, AND ITS FLAVOR
 
 The time for wild apples is the last of October and the first of
 November. They then get to be palatable, for they ripen late, and they
 are still perhaps as beautiful as ever. I make a great account of
 these fruits, which the farmers do not think it worth the while to
 gather,--wild flavors of the Muse, vivacious and inspiriting. The
 farmer thinks that he has better in his barrels, but he is mistaken,
 unless he has a walker's appetite and imagination, neither of which
 can he have.
 
 Such as grow quite wild, and are left out till the first of November,
 I presume that the owner does not mean to gather. They belong to
 children as wild as themselves,--to certain active boys that I
 know,--to the wild-eyed woman of the fields, to whom nothing comes
 amiss, who gleans after all the world, and, moreover, to us walkers.
 We have met with them, and they are ours. These rights, long enough
 insisted upon, have come to be an institution in some old countries,
 where they have learned how to live. I hear that "the custom of
 grippling, which may be called apple-gleaning, is, or was formerly,
 practiced in Herefordshire. It consists in leaving a few apples, which
 are called the gripples, on every tree, after the general gathering,
 for the boys, who go with climbing-poles and bags to collect them."
 
 As for those I speak of, I pluck them as a wild fruit, native to this
 quarter of the earth,--fruit of old trees that have been dying ever
 since I was a boy and are not yet dead, frequented only by the
 woodpecker and the squirrel, deserted now by the owner, who has not
 faith enough to look under their boughs. From the appearance of the
 tree-top, at a little distance, you would expect nothing but lichens
 to drop from it, but your faith is rewarded by finding the ground
 strewn with spirited fruit,--some of it, perhaps, collected at
 squirrel-holes, with the marks of their teeth by which they carried
 them,--some containing a cricket or two silently feeding within, and
 some, especially in damp days, a shell-less snail. The very sticks and
 stones lodged in the tree-top might have convinced you of the
 savoriness of the fruit which has been so eagerly sought after in past
 years.
 
 I have seen no account of these among the "Fruits and Fruit-Trees of
 America," though they are more memorable to my taste than the grafted
 kinds; more racy and wild American flavors do they possess when
 October and November, when December and January, and perhaps February
 and March even, have assuaged them somewhat. An old farmer in my
 neighborhood, who always selects the right word, says that "they have
 a kind of bow-arrow tang."
 
 Apples for grafting appear to have been selected commonly, not so much
 for their spirited flavor, as for their mildness, their size, and
 bearing qualities,--not so much for their beauty, as for their
 fairness and soundness. Indeed, I have no faith in the selected lists
 of pomological gentlemen. Their "Favorites" and "None-suches" and
 "Seek-no-farthers," when I have fruited them, commonly turn out very
 tame and forgettable. They are eaten with comparatively little zest,
 and have no real _tang_ nor _smack_ to them.
 
 What if some of these wildings are acrid and puckery, genuine
 _verjuice_, do they not still belong to the _Pomaceae_, which are
 uniformly innocent and kind to our race? I still begrudge them to the
 cider-mill. Perhaps they are not fairly ripe yet.
 
 No wonder that these small and high-colored apples are thought to make
 the best cider. Loudon quotes from the "Herefordshire Report," that
 "apples of a small size are always, if equal in quality, to be
 preferred to those of a larger size, in order that the rind and kernel
 may bear the greatest proportion to the pulp, which affords the
 weakest and most watery juice." And he says that, "to prove this, Dr.
 Symonds, of Hereford, about the year 1800, made one hogshead of cider
 entirely from the rinds and cores of apples, and another from the pulp
 only, when the first was found of extraordinary strength and flavor,
 while the latter was sweet and insipid."
 
 Evelyn says that the "Red-strake" was the favorite cider-apple in his
 day; and he quotes one Dr. Newburg as saying, "In Jersey 'tis a
 general observation, as I hear, that the more of red any apple has in
 its rind, the more proper it is for this use. Pale-faced apples they
 exclude as much as may be from their cider-vat." This opinion still
 prevails.
 
 All apples are good in November. Those which the farmer leaves out as
 unsalable and unpalatable to those who frequent the markets are
 choicest fruit to the walker. But it is remarkable that the wild apple,
 which I praise as so spirited and racy when eaten in the fields or
 woods, being brought into the house has frequently a harsh and crabbed
 taste. The Saunterer's Apple not even the saunterer can eat in the
 house. The palate rejects it there, as it does haws and acorns, and
 demands a tamed one; for there you miss the November air, which is the
 sauce it is to be eaten with. Accordingly, when Tityrus, seeing the
 lengthening shadows, invites Meliboeus to go home and pass the night
 with him, he promises him _mild_ apples and soft chestnuts,--_mitia
 poma_, _castaneae molles_. I frequently pluck wild apples of so rich
 and spicy a flavor that I wonder all orchardists do not get a scion
 from that tree, and I fail not to bring home my pockets full. But
 perchance, when I take one out of my desk and taste it in my chamber,
 I find it unexpectedly crude,--sour enough to set a squirrel's teeth
 on edge and make a jay scream.
 
 These apples have hung in the wind and frost and rain till they have
 absorbed the qualities of the weather or season, and thus are highly
 _seasoned_, and they _pierce_ and _sting_ and _permeate_ us with their
 spirit. They must be eaten in _season_, accordingly,--that is,
 out-of-doors.
 
 To appreciate the wild and sharp flavors of these October fruits, it
 is necessary that you be breathing the sharp October or November air.
 The outdoor air and exercise which the walker gets give a different
 tone to his palate, and he craves a fruit which the sedentary would
 call harsh and crabbed. They must be eaten in the fields, when your
 system is all aglow with exercise, when the frosty weather nips your
 fingers, the wind rattles the bare boughs or rustles the few remaining
 leaves, and the jay is heard screaming around. What is sour in the
 house a bracing walk makes sweet. Some of these apples might be
 labeled, "To be eaten in the wind."
 
 Of course no flavors are thrown away; they are intended for the taste
 that is up to them. Some apples have two distinct flavors, and perhaps
 one half of them must be eaten in the house, the other outdoors. One
 Peter Whitney wrote from Northborough in 1782, for the Proceedings of
 the Boston Academy, describing an apple tree in that town "producing
 fruit of opposite qualities, part of the same apple being frequently
 sour and the other sweet;" also some all sour, and others all sweet,
 and this diversity on all parts of the tree.
 
 There is a wild apple on Nawshawtuct Hill in my town which has to me a
 peculiarly pleasant bitter tang, not perceived till it is
 three-quarters tasted. It remains on the tongue. As you eat it, it
 smells exactly like a squash-bug. It is a sort of triumph to eat and
 relish it.
 
 I hear that the fruit of a kind of plum tree in Provence is "called
 _Prunes sibarelles_, because it is impossible to whistle after having
 eaten them, from their sourness." But perhaps they were only eaten in
 the house and in summer, and if tried out-of-doors in a stinging
 atmosphere, who knows but you could whistle an octave higher and
 clearer?
 
 In the fields only are the sours and bitters of Nature appreciated;
 just as the woodchopper eats his meal in a sunny glade, in the middle
 of a winter day, with content, basks in a sunny ray there, and dreams
 of summer in a degree of cold which, experienced in a chamber, would
 make a student miserable. They who are at work abroad are not cold,
 but rather it is they who sit shivering in houses. As with
 temperatures, so with flavors; as with cold and heat, so with sour and
 sweet. This natural raciness, the sours and bitters which the diseased
 palate refuses, are the true condiments.
 
 Let your condiments be in the condition of your senses. To appreciate
 the flavor of these wild apples requires vigorous and healthy senses,
 _papillae_ firm and erect on the tongue and palate, not easily
 flattened and tamed.
 
 From my experience with wild apples, I can understand that there may
 be reason for a savage's preferring many kinds of food which the
 civilized man rejects. The former has the palate of an outdoor man. It
 takes a savage or wild taste to appreciate a wild fruit.
 
 What a healthy out-of-door appetite it takes to relish the apple of
 life, the apple of the world, then!
 
      "Nor is it every apple I desire,
        Nor that which pleases every palate best;
      'Tis not the lasting Deuxan I require,
        Nor yet the red-cheeked Greening I request,
      Nor that which first beshrewed the name of wife,
      Nor that whose beauty caused the golden strife:
      No, no! bring me an apple from the tree of life."
 
 So there is one _thought_ for the field, another for the house. I
 would have my thoughts, like wild apples, to be food for walkers, and
 will not warrant them to be palatable if tasted in the house.
 
 
 THEIR BEAUTY
 
 Almost all wild apples are handsome. They cannot be too gnarly and
 crabbed and rusty to look at. The gnarliest will have some redeeming
 traits even to the eye. You will discover some evening redness dashed
 or sprinkled on some protuberance or in some cavity. It is rare that
 the summer lets an apple go without streaking or spotting it on some
 part of its sphere. It will have some red stains, commemorating the
 mornings and evenings it has witnessed; some dark and rusty blotches,
 in memory of the clouds and foggy, mildewy days that have passed over
 it; and a spacious field of green reflecting the general face of
 nature,--green even as the fields; or a yellow ground, which implies a
 milder flavor,--yellow as the harvest, or russet as the hills.
 
 Apples, these I mean, unspeakably fair,--apples not of Discord, but of
 Concord! Yet not so rare but that the homeliest may have a share.
 Painted by the frosts, some a uniform clear bright yellow, or red, or
 crimson, as if their spheres had regularly revolved, and enjoyed the
 influence of the sun on all sides alike,--some with the faintest pink
 blush imaginable,--some brindled with deep red streaks like a cow, or
 with hundreds of fine blood-red rays running regularly from the
 stem-dimple to the blossom end, like meridional lines, on a
 straw-colored ground,--some touched with a greenish rust, like a fine
 lichen, here and there, with crimson blotches or eyes more or less
 confluent and fiery when wet,--and others gnarly, and freckled or
 peppered all over on the stem side with fine crimson spots on a white
 ground, as if accidentally sprinkled from the brush of Him who paints
 the autumn leaves. Others, again, are sometimes red inside, perfused
 with a beautiful blush, fairy food, too beautiful to eat,--apple of
 the Hesperides, apple of the evening sky! But like shells and pebbles
 on the seashore, they must be seen as they sparkle amid the withering
 leaves in some dell in the woods, in the autumnal air, or as they lie
 in the wet grass, and not when they have wilted and faded in the
 house.
 
 
 THE NAMING OF THEM
 
 It would be a pleasant pastime to find suitable names for the hundred
 varieties which go to a single heap at the cider-mill. Would it not
 tax a man's invention,--no one to be named after a man, and all in the
 _lingua vernacula_? Who shall stand godfather at the christening of
 the wild apples? It would exhaust the Latin and Greek languages, if
 they were used, and make the _lingua vernacula_ flag. We should have
 to call in the sunrise and the sunset, the rainbow and the autumn
 woods and the wild-flowers, and the woodpecker and the purple finch
 and the squirrel and the jay and the butterfly, the November traveler
 and the truant boy, to our aid.
 
 In 1836 there were in the garden of the London Horticultural Society
 more than fourteen hundred distinct sorts. But here are species which
 they have not in their catalogue, not to mention the varieties which
 our crab might yield to cultivation.
 
 Let us enumerate a few of these. I find myself compelled, after all,
 to give the Latin names of some for the benefit of those who live
 where English is not spoken,--for they are likely to have a world-wide
 reputation.
 
 There is, first of all, the Wood Apple (_Malus sylvatica_); the
 Blue-Jay Apple; the Apple which grows in Dells in the Woods
 (_sylvestrivallis_), also in Hollows in Pastures (_campestrivallis_);
 the Apple that grows in an old Cellar-Hole (_Malus cellaris_); the
 Meadow Apple; the Partridge Apple; the Truant's Apple (_cessatoris_),
 which no boy will ever go by without knocking off some, however _late_
 it may be; the Saunterer's Apple,--you must lose yourself before you
 can find the way to that; the Beauty of the Air (_decus aeris_);
 December-Eating; the Frozen-Thawed (_gelato-soluta_), good only in
 that state; the Concord Apple, possibly the same with the
 _Musketaquidensis_; the Assabet Apple; the Brindled Apple; Wine of New
 England; the Chickaree Apple; the Green Apple (_Malus viridis_),--this
 has many synonyms: in an imperfect state, it is the _choleramorbifera
 aut dysenterifera_, _puerulis dilectissima_; the Apple which Atalanta
 stopped to pick up; the Hedge Apple (_Malus sepium_); the Slug Apple
 (_limacea_); the Railroad Apple, which perhaps came from a core thrown
 out of the cars; the Apple whose Fruit we tasted in our Youth; our
 Particular Apple, not to be found in any catalogue; _pedestrium
 solatium_; also the Apple where hangs the Forgotten Scythe; Iduna's
 Apples, and the Apples which Loki found in the Wood; and a great many
 more I have on my list, too numerous to mention,--all of them good. As
 Bodaeus exclaims, referring to the cultivated kinds, and adapting
 Virgil to his case, so I, adapting Bodaeus,--
 
      "Not if I had a hundred tongues, a hundred mouths,
      An iron voice, could I describe all the forms
      And reckon up all the names of these _wild apples_."
 
 
 THE LAST GLEANING
 
 By the middle of November the wild apples have lost some of their
 brilliancy, and have chiefly fallen. A great part are decayed on the
 ground, and the sound ones are more palatable than before. The note of
 the chickadee sounds now more distinct, as you wander amid the old
 trees, and the autumnal dandelion is half closed and tearful. But
 still, if you are a skillful gleaner, you may get many a pocketful
 even of grafted fruit, long after apples are supposed to be gone
 out-of-doors. I know a Blue Pearmain tree, growing within the edge of
 a swamp, almost as good as wild. You would not suppose that there was
 any fruit left there, on the first survey, but you must look according
 to system. Those which lie exposed are quite brown and rotten now, or
 perchance a few still show one blooming cheek here and there amid the
 wet leaves. Nevertheless, with experienced eyes, I explore amid the
 bare alders and the huckleberry bushes and the withered sedge, and in
 the crevices of the rocks, which are full of leaves, and pry under
 the fallen and decaying ferns, which, with apple and alder leaves,
 thickly strew the ground. For I know that they lie concealed, fallen
 into hollows long since and covered up by the leaves of the tree
 itself,--a proper kind of packing. From these lurking-places, anywhere
 within the circumference of the tree, I draw forth the fruit, all wet
 and glossy, maybe nibbled by rabbits and hollowed out by crickets, and
 perhaps with a leaf or two cemented to it (as Curzon an old manuscript
 from a monastery's mouldy cellar), but still with a rich bloom on it,
 and at least as ripe and well-kept, if not better than those in
 barrels, more crisp and lively than they. If these resources fail to
 yield anything, I have learned to look between the bases of the
 suckers which spring thickly from some horizontal limb, for now and
 then one lodges there, or in the very midst of an alder-clump, where
 they are covered by leaves, safe from cows which may have smelled them
 out. If I am sharp-set, for I do not refuse the Blue Pearmain, I fill
 my pockets on each side; and as I retrace my steps in the frosty eve,
 being perhaps four or five miles from home, I eat one first from this
 side, and then from that, to keep my balance.
 
 I learn from Topsell's Gesner, whose authority appears to be Albertus,
 that the following is the way in which the hedgehog collects and
 carries home his apples. He says,--"His meat is apples, worms, or
 grapes: when he findeth apples or grapes on the earth, he rolleth
 himself upon them, until he have filled all his prickles, and then
 carrieth them home to his den, never bearing above one in his mouth;
 and if it fortune that one of them fall off by the way, he likewise
 shaketh off all the residue, and walloweth upon them afresh, until
 they be all settled upon his back again. So, forth he goeth, making a
 noise like a cart-wheel; and if he have any young ones in his nest,
 they pull off his load wherewithal he is loaded, eating thereof what
 they please, and laying up the residue for the time to come."
 
 
 THE "FROZEN-THAWED" APPLE
 
 Toward the end of November, though some of the sound ones are yet more
 mellow and perhaps more edible, they have generally, like the leaves,
 lost their beauty, and are beginning to freeze. It is finger-cold, and
 prudent farmers get in their barreled apples, and bring you the apples
 and cider which they have engaged; for it is time to put them into the
 cellar. Perhaps a few on the ground show their red cheeks above the
 early snow, and occasionally some even preserve their color and
 soundness under the snow throughout the winter. But generally at the
 beginning of the winter they freeze hard, and soon, though undecayed,
 acquire the color of a baked apple.
 
 Before the end of December, generally, they experience their first
 thawing. Those which a month ago were sour, crabbed, and quite
 unpalatable to the civilized taste, such at least as were frozen while
 sound, let a warmer sun come to thaw them,--for they are extremely
 sensitive to its rays,--are found to be filled with a rich, sweet
 cider, better than any bottled cider that I know of, and with which I
 am better acquainted than with wine. All apples are good in this
 state, and your jaws are the cider-press. Others, which have more
 substance, are a sweet and luscious food,--in my opinion of more worth
 than the pineapples which are imported from the West Indies. Those
 which lately even I tasted only to repent of it,--for I am
 semicivilized,--which the farmer willingly left on the tree, I am now
 glad to find have the property of hanging on like the leaves of the
 young oaks. It is a way to keep cider sweet without boiling. Let the
 frost come to freeze them first, solid as stones, and then the rain or
 a warm winter day to thaw them, and they will seem to have borrowed a
 flavor from heaven through the medium of the air in which they hang.
 Or perchance you find, when you get home, that those which rattled in
 your pocket have thawed, and the ice is turned to cider. But after the
 third or fourth freezing and thawing they will not be found so good.
 
 What are the imported half-ripe fruits of the torrid south, to this
 fruit matured by the cold of the frigid north? These are those crabbed
 apples with which I cheated my companion, and kept a smooth face that
 I might tempt him to eat. Now we both greedily fill our pockets with
 them,--bending to drink the cup and save our lappets from the
 overflowing juice,--and grow more social with their wine. Was there
 one that hung so high and sheltered by the tangled branches that our
 sticks could not dislodge it?
 
 It is a fruit never carried to market, that I am aware of,--quite
 distinct from the apple of the markets, as from dried apple and
 cider,--and it is not every winter that produces it in perfection.
 
 The era of the Wild Apple will soon be past. It is a fruit which will
 probably become extinct in New England. You may still wander through
 old orchards of native fruit of great extent, which for the most part
 went to the cider-mill, now all gone to decay. I have heard of an
 orchard in a distant town, on the side of a hill, where the apples
 rolled down and lay four feet deep against a wall on the lower side,
 and this the owner cut down for fear they should be made into cider.
 Since the temperance reform and the general introduction of grafted
 fruit, no native apple trees, such as I see everywhere in deserted
 pastures, and where the woods have grown up around them, are set out.
 I fear that he who walks over these fields a century hence will not
 know the pleasure of knocking off wild apples. Ah, poor man, there are
 many pleasures which he will not know! Notwithstanding the prevalence
 of the Baldwin and the Porter, I doubt if so extensive orchards are
 set out to-day in my town as there were a century ago, when those vast
 straggling cider-orchards were planted, when men both ate and drank
 apples, when the pomace-heap was the only nursery, and trees cost
 nothing but the trouble of setting them out. Men could afford then to
 stick a tree by every wall-side and let it take its chance. I see
 nobody planting trees to-day in such out of the way places, along the
 lonely roads and lanes, and at the bottom of dells in the wood. Now
 that they have grafted trees, and pay a price for them, they collect
 them into a plat by their houses, and fence them in,--and the end of
 it all will be that we shall be compelled to look for our apples in a
 barrel.
 
 This is "The word of the Lord that came to Joel the son of Pethuel.
 
 "Hear this, ye old men, and give ear, all ye inhabitants of the land!
 Hath this been in your days, or even in the days of your fathers?...
 
 "That which the palmerworm hath left hath the locust eaten; and that
 which the locust hath left hath the cankerworm eaten; and that which
 the cankerworm hath left hath the caterpillar eaten.
 
 "Awake, ye drunkards, and weep; and howl, all ye drinkers of wine,
 because of the new wine; for it is cut off from your mouth.
 
 "For a nation is come up upon my land, strong, and without number,
 whose teeth are the teeth of a lion, and he hath the cheek teeth of a
 great lion.
 
 "He hath laid my vine waste, and barked my fig tree: he hath made it
 clean bare, and cast it away; the branches thereof are made white....
 
 "Be ye ashamed, O ye husbandmen; howl, O ye vinedressers....
 
 "The vine is dried up, and the fig tree languisheth; the pomegranate
 tree, the palm tree also, and the apple tree, even all the trees of
 the field, are withered: because joy is withered away from the sons of
 men."
 
 
 
 
 NIGHT AND MOONLIGHT
 
 
 Chancing to take a memorable walk by moonlight some years ago, I
 resolved to take more such walks, and make acquaintance with another
 side of nature: I have done so.
 
 According to Pliny, there is a stone in Arabia called Selenites,
 "wherein is a white, which increases and decreases with the moon." My
 journal for the last year or two has been _selenitic_ in this sense.
 
 Is not the midnight like Central Africa to most of us? Are we not
 tempted to explore it,--to penetrate to the shores of its Lake Tchad,
 and discover the source of its Nile, perchance the Mountains of the
 Moon? Who knows what fertility and beauty, moral and natural, are
 there to be found? In the Mountains of the Moon, in the Central Africa
 of the night, there is where all Niles have their hidden heads. The
 expeditions up the Nile as yet extend but to the Cataracts, or
 perchance to the mouth of the White Nile; but it is the Black Nile
 that concerns us.
 
 I shall be a benefactor if I conquer some realms from the night, if I
 report to the gazettes anything transpiring about us at that season
 worthy of their attention,--if I can show men that there is some
 beauty awake while they are asleep,--if I add to the domains of
 poetry.
 
 Night is certainly more novel and less profane than day. I soon
 discovered that I was acquainted only with its complexion, and as for
 the moon, I had seen her only as it were through a crevice in a
 shutter, occasionally. Why not walk a little way in her light?
 
 Suppose you attend to the suggestions which the moon makes for one
 month, commonly in vain, will it not be very different from anything
 in literature or religion? But why not study this Sanskrit? What if
 one moon has come and gone with its world of poetry, its weird
 teachings, its oracular suggestions,--so divine a creature freighted
 with hints for me, and I have not used her? One moon gone by
 unnoticed?
 
 I think it was Dr. Chalmers who said, criticising Coleridge, that for
 his part he wanted ideas which he could see all round, and not such as
 he must look at away up in the heavens. Such a man, one would say,
 would never look at the moon, because she never turns her other side
 to us. The light which comes from ideas which have their orbit as
 distant from the earth, and which is no less cheering and enlightening
 to the benighted traveler than that of the moon and stars, is
 naturally reproached or nicknamed as moonshine by such. They are
 moonshine, are they? Well, then, do your night traveling when there is
 no moon to light you; but I will be thankful for the light that
 reaches me from the star of least magnitude. Stars are lesser or
 greater only as they appear to us so. I will be thankful that I see so
 much as one side of a celestial idea, one side of the rainbow and the
 sunset sky.
 
 Men talk glibly enough about moonshine, as if they knew its qualities
 very well, and despised them; as owls might talk of sunshine,--none of
 your sunshine!--but this word commonly means merely something which
 they do not understand,--which they are abed and asleep to, however
 much it may be worth their while to be up and awake to it.
 
 It must be allowed that the light of the moon, sufficient though it is
 for the pensive walker, and not disproportionate to the inner light we
 have, is very inferior in quality and intensity to that of the sun.
 But the moon is not to be judged alone by the quantity of light she
 sends to us, but also by her influence on the earth and its
 inhabitants. "The moon gravitates toward the earth, and the earth
 reciprocally toward the moon." The poet who walks by moonlight is
 conscious of a tide in his thought which is to be referred to lunar
 influence. I will endeavor to separate the tide in my thoughts from
 the current distractions of the day. I would warn my hearers that they
 must not try my thoughts by a daylight standard, but endeavor to
 realize that I speak out of the night. All depends on your point of
 view. In Drake's "Collection of Voyages," Wafer says of some albinos
 among the Indians of Darien: "They are quite white, but their
 whiteness is like that of a horse, quite different from the fair or
 pale European, as they have not the least tincture of a blush or
 sanguine complexion.... Their eyebrows are milk-white, as is likewise
 the hair of their heads, which is very fine.... They seldom go abroad
 in the daytime, the sun being disagreeable to them, and causing their
 eyes, which are weak and poring, to water, especially if it shines
 towards them, yet they see very well by moonlight, from which we call
 them moon-eyed."
 
 Neither in our thoughts in these moonlight walks, methinks, is there
 "the least tincture of a blush or sanguine complexion," but we are
 intellectually and morally albinos, children of Endymion, such is the
 effect of conversing much with the moon.
 
 I complain of arctic voyagers that they do not enough remind us of the
 constant peculiar dreariness of the scenery, and the perpetual
 twilight of the arctic night. So he whose theme is moonlight, though
 he may find it difficult, must, as it were, illustrate it with the
 light of the moon alone.
 
 Many men walk by day; few walk by night. It is a very different
 season. Take a July night, for instance. About ten o'clock,--when man
 is asleep, and day fairly forgotten,--the beauty of moonlight is seen
 over lonely pastures where cattle are silently feeding. On all sides
 novelties present themselves. Instead of the sun there are the moon
 and stars; instead of the wood thrush there is the whip-poor-will;
 instead of butterflies in the meadows, fireflies, winged sparks of
 fire! who would have believed it? What kind of cool deliberate life
 dwells in those dewy abodes associated with a spark of fire? So man
 has fire in his eyes, or blood, or brain. Instead of singing birds,
 the half-throttled note of a cuckoo flying over, the croaking of
 frogs, and the intenser dream of crickets. But above all, the
 wonderful trump of the bullfrog, ringing from Maine to Georgia. The
 potato vines stand upright, the corn grows apace, the bushes loom, the
 grain-fields are boundless. On our open river terraces once cultivated
 by the Indian, they appear to occupy the ground like an army, their
 heads nodding in the breeze. Small trees and shrubs are seen in the
 midst overwhelmed as by an inundation. The shadows of rocks and trees,
 and shrubs and hills, are more conspicuous than the objects
 themselves. The slightest irregularities in the ground are revealed by
 the shadows, and what the feet find comparatively smooth appears rough
 and diversified in consequence. For the same reason the whole
 landscape is more variegated and picturesque than by day. The smallest
 recesses in the rocks are dim and cavernous; the ferns in the wood
 appear of tropical size. The sweet-fern and indigo in overgrown
 wood-paths wet you with dew up to your middle. The leaves of the shrub
 oak are shining as if a liquid were flowing over them. The pools seen
 through the trees are as full of light as the sky. "The light of the
 day takes refuge in their bosoms," as the Purana says of the ocean.
 All white objects are more remarkable than by day. A distant cliff
 looks like a phosphorescent space on a hillside. The woods are heavy
 and dark. Nature slumbers. You see the moonlight reflected from
 particular stumps in the recesses of the forest, as if she selected
 what to shine on. These small fractions of her light remind one of the
 plant called moonseed,--as if the moon were sowing it in such places.
 
 In the night the eyes are partly closed or retire into the head. Other
 senses take the lead. The walker is guided as well by the sense of
 smell. Every plant and field and forest emits its odor now, swamp-pink
 in the meadow and tansy in the road; and there is the peculiar dry
 scent of corn which has begun to show its tassels. The senses both of
 hearing and smelling are more alert. We hear the tinkling of rills
 which we never detected before. From time to time, high up on the
 sides of hills, you pass through a stratum of warm air, a blast which
 has come up from the sultry plains of noon. It tells of the day, of
 sunny noontide hours and banks, of the laborer wiping his brow and the
 bee humming amid flowers. It is an air in which work has been
 done,--which men have breathed. It circulates about from woodside to
 hillside like a dog that has lost its master, now that the sun is
 gone. The rocks retain all night the warmth of the sun which they have
 absorbed. And so does the sand. If you dig a few inches into it you
 find a warm bed. You lie on your back on a rock in a pasture on the
 top of some bare hill at midnight, and speculate on the height of the
 starry canopy. The stars are the jewels of the night, and perchance
 surpass anything which day has to show. A companion with whom I was
 sailing one very windy but bright moonlight night, when the stars were
 few and faint, thought that a man could get along with _them_, though
 he was considerably reduced in his circumstances,--that they were a
 kind of bread and cheese that never failed.
 
 No wonder that there have been astrologers, that some have conceived
 that they were personally related to particular stars. Dubartas, as
 translated by Sylvester, says he'll
 
              "not believe that the great architect
      With all these fires the heavenly arches decked
      Only for show, and with these glistering shields,
      T' awake poor shepherds, watching in the fields."
      He'll "not believe that the least flower which pranks
      Our garden borders, or our common banks,
      And the least stone, that in her warming lap
      Our mother earth doth covetously wrap,
      Hath some peculiar virtue of its own,
      And that the glorious stars of heav'n have none."
 
 And Sir Walter Raleigh well says, "The stars are instruments of far
 greater use than to give an obscure light, and for men to gaze on
 after sunset;" and he quotes Plotinus as affirming that they "are
 significant, but not efficient;" and also Augustine as saying, "_Deus
 regit inferiora corpora per superiora_:" God rules the bodies below by
 those above. But best of all is this which another writer has
 expressed: "_Sapiens adjuvabit opus astrorum quemadmodum agricola
 terrae naturam_:" a wise man assisteth the work of the stars as the
 husbandman helpeth the nature of the soil.
 
 It does not concern men who are asleep in their beds, but it is very
 important to the traveler, whether the moon shines brightly or is
 obscured. It is not easy to realize the serene joy of all the earth,
 when she commences to shine unobstructedly, unless you have often been
 abroad alone in moonlight nights. She seems to be waging continual war
 with the clouds in your behalf. Yet we fancy the clouds to be _her_
 foes also. She comes on magnifying her dangers by her light,
 revealing, displaying them in all their hugeness and blackness, then
 suddenly casts them behind into the light concealed, and goes her way
 triumphant through a small space of clear sky.
 
 In short, the moon traversing, or appearing to traverse, the small
 clouds which lie in her way, now obscured by them, now easily
 dissipating and shining through them, makes the drama of the moonlight
 night to all watchers and night-travelers. Sailors speak of it as the
 moon eating up the clouds. The traveler all alone, the moon all alone,
 except for his sympathy, overcoming with incessant victory whole
 squadrons of clouds above the forests and lakes and hills. When she is
 obscured he so sympathizes with her that he could whip a dog for her
 relief, as Indians do. When she enters on a clear field of great
 extent in the heavens, and shines unobstructedly, he is glad. And when
 she has fought her way through all the squadron of her foes, and rides
 majestic in a clear sky unscathed, and there are no more any
 obstructions in her path, he cheerfully and confidently pursues his
 way, and rejoices in his heart, and the cricket also seems to express
 joy in its song.
 
 How insupportable would be the days, if the night with its dews and
 darkness did not come to restore the drooping world. As the shades
 begin to gather around us, our primeval instincts are aroused, and we
 steal forth from our lairs, like the inhabitants of the jungle, in
 search of those silent and brooding thoughts which are the natural
 prey of the intellect.
 
 Richter says that "the earth is every day overspread with the veil of
 night for the same reason as the cages of birds are darkened, viz.,
 that we may the more readily apprehend the higher harmonies of thought
 in the hush and quiet of darkness. Thoughts which day turns into smoke
 and mist stand about us in the night as light and flames; even as the
 column which fluctuates above the crater of Vesuvius, in the daytime
 appears a pillar of cloud, but by night a pillar of fire."
 
 There are nights in this climate of such serene and majestic beauty,
 so medicinal and fertilizing to the spirit, that methinks a sensitive
 nature would not devote them to oblivion, and perhaps there is no man
 but would be better and wiser for spending them out-of-doors, though
 he should sleep all the next day to pay for it,--should sleep an
 Endymion sleep, as the ancients expressed it,--nights which warrant
 the Grecian epithet ambrosial, when, as in the land of Beulah, the
 atmosphere is charged with dewy fragrance, and with music, and we take
 our repose and have our dreams awake,--when the moon, not secondary to
 the sun,--
 
              "gives us his blaze again,
      Void of its flame, and sheds a softer day.
      Now through the passing cloud she seems to stoop,
      Now up the pure cerulean rides sublime."
 
 Diana still hunts in the New England sky.
 
      "In Heaven queen she is among the spheres.
        She, mistress-like, makes all things to be pure.
      Eternity in her oft change she bears;
        She Beauty is; by her the fair endure.
 
      "Time wears her not; she doth his chariot guide;
        Mortality below her orb is placed;
      By her the virtues of the stars down slide;
        By her is Virtue's perfect image cast."
 
 The Hindoos compare the moon to a saintly being who has reached the
 last stage of bodily existence.
 
 Great restorer of antiquity, great enchanter! In a mild night when the
 harvest or hunter's moon shines unobstructedly, the houses in our
 village, whatever architect they may have had by day, acknowledge only
 a master. The village street is then as wild as the forest. New and
 old things are confounded. I know not whether I am sitting on the
 ruins of a wall, or on the material which is to compose a new one.
 Nature is an instructed and impartial teacher, spreading no crude
 opinions, and flattering none; she will be neither radical nor
 conservative. Consider the moonlight, so civil, yet so savage!
 
 The light is more proportionate to our knowledge than that of day. It
 is no more dusky in ordinary nights than our mind's habitual
 atmosphere, and the moonlight is as bright as our most illuminated
 moments are.
 
      "In such a night let me abroad remain
      Till morning breaks, and all's confused again."
 
 Of what significance the light of day, if it is not the reflection of
 an inward dawn?--to what purpose is the veil of night withdrawn, if
 the morning reveals nothing to the soul? It is merely garish and
 glaring.
 
 When Ossian, in his address to the sun, exclaims,--
 
      "Where has darkness its dwelling?
      Where is the cavernous home of the stars,
      When thou quickly followest their steps,
      Pursuing them like a hunter in the sky,--
      Thou climbing the lofty hills,
      They descending on barren mountains?"
 
 who does not in his thought accompany the stars to their "cavernous
 home," "descending" with them "on barren mountains"?
 
 Nevertheless, even by night the sky is blue and not black, for we see
 through the shadow of the earth into the distant atmosphere of day,
 where the sunbeams are reveling.
 
 
 
 
 TRANSLATIONS
 
 
 
 
 THE PROMETHEUS BOUND OF AESCHYLUS
 
 
 PERSONS OF THE DRAMA
 
      KRATOS _and_ BIA (Strength and Force).
      HEPHAISTUS (Vulcan).
      PROMETHEUS.
      CHORUS OF OCEAN NYMPHS.
      OCEANUS.
      IO, _Daughter of Inachus_.
      HERMES.
 
 KRATOS _and_ BIA, HEPHAISTUS, PROMETHEUS.
 
      _Kr._ We are come to the far-bounding plain of earth,
      To the Scythian way, to the unapproached solitude.
      Hephaistus, orders must have thy attention,
      Which the Father has enjoined on thee, this bold one
      To the high-hanging rocks to bind
      In indissoluble fetters of adamantine bonds.
      For thy flower, the splendor of fire useful in all arts,
      Stealing, he bestowed on mortals; and for such
      A crime 't is fit he should give satisfaction to the gods;
      That he may learn the tyranny of Zeus
      To love, and cease from his man-loving ways.
 
      _Heph._ Kratos and Bia, your charge from Zeus
      Already has its end, and nothing further in the way;
      But I cannot endure to bind
      A kindred god by force to a bleak precipice,--
      Yet absolutely there's necessity that I have courage for
           these things;
      For it is hard the Father's words to banish.
      High-plotting son of the right-counseling Themis,
      Unwilling thee unwilling in brazen fetters hard to be loosed
      I am about to nail to this inhuman hill,
      Where neither voice [you'll hear], nor form of any mortal
      See, but, scorched by the sun's clear flame,
      Will change your color's bloom; and to you glad
      The various-robed night will conceal the light,
      And sun disperse the morning frost again;
      And always the burden of the present ill
      Will wear you; for he that will relieve you has not yet been born.
      Such fruits you've reaped from your man-loving ways,
      For a god, not shrinking from the wrath of gods,
      You have bestowed honors on mortals more than just,
      For which this pleasureless rock you'll sentinel,
      Standing erect, sleepless, not bending a knee;
      And many sighs and lamentations to no purpose
      Will you utter; for the mind of Zeus is hard to be changed;
      And he is wholly rugged who may newly rule.
 
      _Kr._ Well, why dost thou delay and pity in vain?
      Why not hate the god most hostile to gods,
      Who has betrayed thy prize to mortals?
 
      _Heph._ The affinity indeed is appalling, and the familiarity.
 
      _Kr._ I agree, but to disobey the Father's words
      How is it possible? Fear you not this more?
 
      _Heph._ Ay, you are always without pity, and full of confidence.
 
      _Kr._ For 't is no remedy to bewail this one;
      Cherish not vainly troubles which avail naught.
 
      _Heph._ O much hated handicraft!
 
      _Kr._ Why hatest it? for in simple truth, for these misfortunes
      Which are present now Art's not to blame.
 
      _Heph._ Yet I would 't had fallen to another's lot.
 
      _Kr._ All things were done but to rule the gods,
      For none is free but Zeus.
 
      _Heph._ I knew it, and have naught to say against these things.
 
      _Kr._ Will you not haste, then, to put the bonds about him,
      That the Father may not observe you loitering?
 
      _Heph._ Already at hand the shackles you may see.
 
      _Kr._ Taking them, about his hands with firm strength
      Strike with the hammer, and nail him to the rocks.
 
      _Heph._ 'T is done, and not in vain this work.
 
      _Kr._ Strike harder, tighten, nowhere relax,
      For he is skillful to find out ways e'en from the impracticable.
 
      _Heph._ Ay, but this arm is fixed inextricably.
 
      _Kr._ And this now clasp securely, that
      He may learn he is a duller schemer than is Zeus.
 
      _Heph._ Except him would none justly blame me.
 
      _Kr._ Now with an adamantine wedge's stubborn fang
      Through the breasts nail strongly.
 
      _Heph._ Alas! alas! Prometheus, I groan for thy afflictions.
 
      _Kr._ And do you hesitate? for Zeus' enemies
      Do you groan? Beware lest one day you yourself will pity.
 
      _Heph._ You see a spectacle hard for eyes to behold.
 
      _Kr._ I see him meeting his deserts;
      But round his sides put straps.
 
      _Heph._ To do this is necessity, insist not much.
 
      _Kr._ Surely I will insist and urge beside;
      Go downward, and the thighs surround with force.
 
      _Heph._ Already it is done, the work, with no long labor.
 
      _Kr._ Strongly now drive the fetters, through and through,
      For the critic of the works is difficult.
 
      _Heph._ Like your form your tongue speaks.
 
      _Kr._ Be thou softened, but for my stubbornness
      Of temper and harshness reproach me not.
 
      _Heph._ Let us withdraw, for he has a net about his limbs.
 
      _Kr._ There now insult, and the shares of gods
      Plundering on ephemerals bestow; what thee
      Can mortals in these ills relieve?
      Falsely thee the divinities Prometheus
      Call; for you yourself need one _foreseeing_
      In what manner you will escape this fortune.
 
 PROMETHEUS, _alone_.
 
      O divine ether, and ye swift-winged winds,
      Fountains of rivers, and countless smilings
      Of the ocean waves, and earth, mother of all,
      And thou all-seeing orb of the sun I call.
      Behold me what a god I suffer at the hands of gods.
      See by what outrages
      Tormented the myriad-yeared
      Time I shall endure; such the new
      Ruler of the blessed has contrived for me,
      Unseemly bonds.
      Alas! alas! the present and the coming
      Woe I groan; where ever of these sufferings
      Must an end appear.
      But what say I? I know beforehand all,
      Exactly what will be, nor to me strange
      Will any evil come. The destined fate
      As easily as possible it behooves to bear, knowing
      Necessity's is a resistless strength.
      But neither to be silent nor unsilent about this
      Lot is possible for me; for a gift to mortals
      Giving, I wretched have been yoked to these necessities;
      Within a hollow reed by stealth I carry off fire's
      Stolen source, which seemed the teacher
      Of all art to mortals, and a great resource.
      For such crimes penalty I pay,
      Under the sky, riveted in chains.
      Ah! ah! alas! alas!
      What echo, what odor has flown to me obscure,
      Of god, or mortal, or else mingled,--
      Came it to this terminal hill
      A witness of my sufferings, or wishing what?
      Behold bound me an unhappy god,
      The enemy of Zeus, fallen under
      The ill will of all the gods, as many as
      Enter into the hall of Zeus,
      Through too great love of mortals.
      Alas! alas! what fluttering do I hear
      Of birds near? for the air rustles
      With the soft rippling of wings.
      Everything to me is fearful which creeps this way.
 
 PROMETHEUS _and_ CHORUS.
 
      _Ch._ Fear nothing; for friendly this band
      Of wings with swift contention
      Drew to this hill, hardly
      Persuading the paternal mind.
      The swift-carrying breezes sent me;
      For the echo of beaten steel pierced the recesses
      Of the caves, and struck out from me reserved modesty;
      And I rushed unsandaled in a winged chariot.
 
      _Pr._ Alas! alas! alas! alas!
      Offspring of the fruitful Tethys,
      And of him rolling around all
      The earth with sleepless stream children,
      Of Father Ocean; behold, look on me;
      By what bonds embraced
      On this cliff's topmost rocks
      I shall maintain unenvied watch.
 
      _Ch._ I see, Prometheus; but to my eyes a fearful
      Mist has come surcharged
      With tears, looking upon thy body
      Shrunk to the rocks
      By these mischiefs of adamantine bonds;
      Indeed, new helmsmen rule Olympus;
      And with new laws Zeus strengthens himself, annulling the old,
      And the before great now makes unknown.
 
      _Pr._ Would that under earth, and below Hades,
      Receptacle of dead, to impassable
      Tartarus he had sent me, to bonds indissoluble
      Cruelly conducting, that neither god
      Nor any other had rejoiced at this.
      But now the sport of winds, unhappy one,
      A source of pleasure to my foes, I suffer.
 
      _Ch._ Who so hard-hearted
      Of the gods, to whom these things are pleasant?
      Who does not sympathize with thy
      Misfortunes, excepting Zeus? for he in wrath always
      Fixing his stubborn mind,
      Afflicts the heavenly race;
      Nor will he cease, until his heart is sated;
      Or with some palm some one may take the power hard to be taken.
 
      _Pr._ Surely yet, though in strong
      Fetters I am now maltreated,
      The ruler of the blessed will have need of me,
      To show the new conspiracy by which
      He's robbed of sceptre and of honors,
      And not at all me with persuasion's honey-tongued
      Charms will he appease, nor ever,
      Shrinking from his firm threats, will I
      Declare this, till from cruel
      Bonds he may release, and to do justice
      For this outrage be willing.
 
      _Ch._ You are bold; and to bitter
      Woes do nothing yield,
      But too freely speak.
      But my mind piercing fear disturbs;
      For I'm concerned about thy fortunes,
      Where at length arriving you may see
      An end to these afflictions. For manners
      Inaccessible, and a heart hard to be dissuaded has the son
           of Kronos.
 
      _Pr._ I know, that--Zeus is stern and having
      Justice to himself. But after all
      Gentle-minded
      He will one day be, when thus he's crushed,
      And his stubborn wrath allaying,
      Into agreement with me and friendliness
      Earnest to me earnest he at length will come.
 
      _Ch._ The whole account disclose and tell us plainly,
      In what crime taking you Zeus
      Thus disgracefully and bitterly insults;
      Inform us, if you are nowise hurt by the recital.
 
      _Pr._ Painful indeed it is to me to tell these things,
      And a pain to be silent, and every way unfortunate.
      When first the divinities began their strife,
      And discord 'mong themselves arose,
      Some wishing to cast Kronos from his seat,
      That Zeus might reign, forsooth, others the contrary
      Striving, that Zeus might never rule the gods;
      Then I, the best advising, to persuade
      The Titans, sons of Uranus and Chthon,
      Unable was; but crafty stratagems
      Despising with rude minds,
      They thought without trouble to rule by force;
      But to me my mother not once only, Themis,
      And Gaea, of many names one form,
      How the future should be accomplished had foretold,
      That not by power nor by strength
      Would it be necessary, but by craft the victors should prevail.
      Such I in words expounding,
      They deigned not to regard at all.
      The best course, therefore, of those occurring then
      Appeared to be, taking my mother to me,
      Of my own accord to side with Zeus glad to receive me;
      And by my counsels Tartarus' black-pitted
      Depths conceals the ancient Kronos,
      With his allies. In such things by me
      The tyrant of the gods having been helped,
      With base rewards like these repays me;
      For there is somehow in kingship
      This disease, not to trust its friends.
      What then you ask, for what cause
      He afflicts me, this will I now explain.
      As soon as on his father's throne
      He sat, he straightway to the gods distributes honors,
      Some to one and to another some, and arranged
      The government; but of unhappy mortals account
      Had none; but blotting out the race
      Entire, wished to create another new.
      And these things none opposed but I,
      But I adventured; I rescued mortals
      From going destroyed to Hades.
      Therefore, indeed, with such afflictions am I bent,
      To suffer grievous, and piteous to behold,
      And, holding mortals up to pity, myself am not
      Thought worthy to obtain it; but without pity
      Am I thus corrected, a spectacle inglorious to Zeus.
 
      _Ch._ Of iron heart and made of stone,
      Whoe'er, Prometheus, with thy sufferings
      Does not grieve; for I should not have wished to see
      These things, and having seen them I am grieved at heart.
 
      _Pr._ Indeed to friends I'm piteous to behold.
 
      _Ch._ Did you in no respect go beyond this?
 
      _Pr._ True, mortals I made cease foreseeing fate.
 
      _Ch._ Having found what remedy for this all?
 
      _Pr._ Blind hopes in them I made to dwell.
 
      _Ch._ A great advantage this you gave to men.
 
      _Pr._ Beside these, too, I bestowed on them fire.
 
      _Ch._ And have mortals flamy fire?
 
      _Pr._ From which, indeed, they will learn many arts.
 
      _Ch._ Upon such charges, then, does Zeus
      Maltreat you, and nowhere relax from ills?
      Is there no term of suffering lying before thee?
 
      _Pr._ Nay, none at all, but when to him it may seem good.
 
      _Ch._ And how will it seem good? What hope? See you not that
      You have erred? But how you've erred, for me to tell
      Not pleasant, and to you a pain. But these things
      Let us omit, and seek you some release from sufferings.
 
      _Pr._ Easy, whoever out of trouble holds his
      Foot, to admonish and remind those faring
      Ill. But all these things I knew;
      Willing, willing I erred, I'll not deny;
      Mortals assisting I myself found trouble.
      Not indeed with penalties like these thought I
      That I should pine on lofty rocks,
      Gaining this drear unneighbored hill.
      But bewail not my present woes,
      But alighting, the fortunes creeping on
      Hear ye, that ye may learn all to the end.
      Obey me, obey, sympathize
      With him now suffering. Thus indeed affliction,
      Wandering round, sits now by one, then by another.
 
      _Ch._ Not to unwilling ears do you urge
      This, Prometheus.
      And now with light foot the swift-rushing
      Seat leaving, and the pure ether,
      Path of birds, to this peaked
      Ground I come; for thy misfortunes
      I wish fully to hear.
 
 PROMETHEUS, CHORUS, _and_ OCEANUS.
 
      _Oc._ I come to the end of a long way
      Traveling to thee, Prometheus,
      By my will without bits directing
      This wing-swift bird;
      For at thy fortunes know I grieve.
      And, I think, affinity thus
      Impels me, but apart from birth,
      There's not to whom a higher rank
      I would assign than thee.
      And you will know these things as true, and not in vain
      To flatter with the tongue is in me. Come, therefore,
      Show how it is necessary to assist you;
      For never will you say, than Ocean
      There's a firmer friend to thee.
 
      _Pr._ Alas! what now? And you, then, of my sufferings
      Come spectator? How didst thou dare, leaving
      The stream which bears thy name, and rock-roofed
      Caves self-built, to the iron-mother
      Earth to go? To behold my fate
      Hast come, and to compassionate my ills?
      Behold a spectacle, this, the friend of Zeus,
      Having with him stablished his tyranny,
      With what afflictions by himself I'm bent.
 
      _Oc._ I see, Prometheus, and would admonish
      Thee the best, although of varied craft.
      Know thyself, and fit thy manners
      New; for new also the king among the gods.
      For if thus rude and whetted words
      Thou wilt hurl out, quickly may Zeus, though sitting
      Far above, hear thee, so that thy present wrath
      Of troubles child's play will seem to be.
      But, O wretched one, dismiss the indignation which thou hast,
      And seek deliverance from these woes.
      Like an old man, perhaps, I seem to thee to say these things;
      Such, however, are the wages
      Of the too lofty speaking tongue, Prometheus;
      But thou art not yet humble, nor dost yield to ills,
      And beside the present wish to receive others still.
      But thou wouldst not, with my counsel,
      Against the pricks extend your limbs, seeing that
      A stern monarch irresponsible reigns.
      And now I go, and will endeavor,
      If I can, to release thee from these sufferings.
      But be thou quiet, nor too rudely speak.
      Know'st thou not well, with thy superior wisdom, that
      On a vain tongue punishment is inflicted?
 
      _Pr._ I congratulate thee that thou art without blame,
      Having shared and dared all with me;
      And now leave off, and let it not concern thee.
      For altogether thou wilt not persuade him, for he's not easily
           persuaded,
      But take heed yourself lest you be injured by the way.
 
      _Oc._ Far better thou art to advise those near
      Than thyself; by deed and not by word I judge.
      But me hastening by no means mayest thou detain,
      For I boast, I boast, this favor will Zeus
      Grant me, from these sufferings to release thee.
 
      _Pr._ So far I praise thee, and will never cease;
      For zeal you nothing lack. But
      Strive not; for in vain, naught helping
      Me, thou 'lt strive, if aught to strive you wish.
      But be thou quiet, holding thyself aloof,
      For I would not, though I'm unfortunate, that on this account
      Evils should come to many.
 
      _Oc._ Surely not, for me too the fortunes of thy brother
      Atlas grieve, who towards the evening-places
      Stands, the pillar of heaven and earth
      Upon his shoulders bearing, a load not easy to be borne.
      And the earth-born inhabitant of the Cilician
      Caves seeing, I pitied, the savage monster
      With a hundred heads, by force o'ercome,
      Typhon impetuous, who stood 'gainst all the gods,
      With frightful jaws hissing out slaughter;
      And from his eyes flashed a Gorgonian light,
      Utterly to destroy by force the sovereignty of Zeus;
      But there came to him Zeus' sleepless bolt,
      Descending thunder, breathing flame,
      Which struck him out from lofty
      Boastings. For, struck to his very heart,
      His strength was scorched and thundered out.
      And now a useless and extended carcass
      Lies he near a narrow passage of the sea,
      Pressed down under the roots of Aetna.
      And on the topmost summit seated, Hephaistus
      Hammers the ignited mass, whence will burst out at length
      Rivers of fire, devouring with wild jaws
      Fair-fruited Sicily's smooth fields;
      Such rage will Typhon make boil over
      With hot discharges of insatiable fire-breathing tempest,
      Though by the bolt of Zeus burnt to a coal.
 
      _Pr._ Thou art not inexperienced, nor dost want
      My counsel; secure thyself as thou know'st how;
      And I against the present fortune will bear up,
      Until the thought of Zeus may cease from wrath.
 
      _Oc._ Know'st thou not this, Prometheus, that
      Words are healers of distempered wrath?
 
      _Pr._ If any seasonably soothe the heart,
      And swelling passion check not rudely.
 
      _Oc._ In the consulting and the daring
      What harm seest thou existing? Teach me.
 
      _Pr._ Trouble superfluous, and light-minded folly.
 
      _Oc._ Be this my ail then, since it is
      Most profitable, being wise, not to seem wise.
 
      _Pr._ This will seem to be my error.
 
      _Oc._ Plainly homeward thy words remand me.
 
      _Pr._ Aye, let not grief for me into hostility cast thee.
 
      _Oc._ To the new occupant of the all-powerful seats?
 
      _Pr._ Beware lest ever his heart be angered.
 
      _Oc._ Thy fate, Prometheus, is my teacher.
 
      _Pr._ Go thou, depart; preserve the present mind.
 
      _Oc._ To me rushing this word you utter.
      For the smooth path of the air sweeps with his wings
      The four-legged bird; and gladly would
      In the stalls at home bend a knee.
 
 PROMETHEUS _and_ CHORUS.
 
      _Ch._ I mourn for thee thy ruinous
      Fate, Prometheus,
      And tear-distilling from my tender
      Eyes a stream has wet
      My cheeks with flowing springs;
      For these, unenvied, Zeus
      By his own laws enforcing,
      Haughty above the gods
      That were displays his sceptre.
      And every region now
      With groans resounds,
      Mourning the illustrious
      And ancient honor
      Of thee and of thy kindred;
      As many mortals as the habitable seat
      Of sacred Asia pasture,
      With thy lamentable
      Woes have sympathy;
      And of the Colchian land, virgin
      Inhabitants, in fight undaunted,
      And Scythia's multitude, who the last
      Place of earth, about
      Maeotis lake possess,
      And Arabia's martial flower,
      And who the high-hung citadels
      Of Caucasus inhabit near,
      A hostile army, raging
      With sharp-prowed spears.
      Only one other god before, in sufferings
      Subdued by injuries
      Of adamantine bonds, I've seen, Titanian
      Atlas, who always with superior strength
      The huge and heavenly globe
      On his back bears;
      And with a roar the sea waves
      Dashing, groans the deep,
      And the dark depth of Hades murmurs underneath
      The earth, and fountains of pure-running rivers
      Heave a pitying sigh.
 
      _Pr._ Think not, indeed, through weakness or through pride
      That I am silent; for with the consciousness I gnaw my heart,
      Seeing myself thus basely used.
      And yet to these new gods their shares
      Who else than I wholly distributed?
      But of these things I am silent; for I should tell you
      What you know; the sufferings of mortals too
      You've heard, how I made intelligent
      And possessed of sense them ignorant before.
      But I will speak, not bearing any grudge to men,
      But showing in what I gave the good intention;
      At first, indeed, seeing they saw in vain,
      And hearing heard not; but like the forms
      Of dreams, for that long time, rashly confounded
      All, nor brick-woven dwellings
      Knew they, placed in the sun, nor woodwork;
      But digging down they dwelt, like puny
      Ants, in sunless nooks of caves.
      And there was naught to them, neither of winter sign,
      Nor of flower-giving spring, nor fruitful
      Summer, that was sure; but without knowledge
      Did they all, till I taught them the risings
      Of the stars, and goings down, hard to determine.
      And numbers, chief of inventions,
      I found out for them, and the assemblages of letters,
      And memory, Muse-mother, doer of all things;
      And first I joined in pairs wild animals
      Obedient to the yoke; and that they might be
      Alternate workers with the bodies of men
      In the severest toils, I harnessed the rein-loving horses
      To the car, the ornament of over-wealthy luxury.
      And none else than I invented the sea-wandering
      Flaxen-winged vehicles of sailors.
      Such inventions I wretched having found out
      For men, myself have not the ingenuity by which
      From the now present ill I may escape.
 
      _Ch._ You suffer unseemly ill; deranged in mind
      You err; and as some bad physician, falling
      Sick you are dejected, and cannot find
      By what remedies you may be healed.
 
      _Pr._ Hearing the rest from me more will you wonder
      What arts and what expedients I planned.
      That which was greatest, if any might fall sick,
      There was alleviation none, neither to eat,
      Nor to anoint, nor drink, but for the want
      Of medicines they were reduced to skeletons, till to them
      I showed the mingling of mild remedies,
      By which all ails they drive away.
      And many modes of prophecy I settled,
      And distinguished first of dreams what a real
      Vision is required to be, and omens hard to be determined
      I made known to them; and tokens by the way,
      And flight of crooked-taloned birds I accurately
      Defined, which lucky are,
      And unlucky, and what mode of life
      Have each, and to one another what
      Hostilities, attachments, and assemblings;
      The entrails' smoothness, and what color having
      They would be to the divinities acceptable;
      Of the gall and liver the various symmetry,
      And the limbs concealed in fat; and the long
      Flank burning, to an art hard to be guessed
      I showed the way to mortals; and flammeous signs
      Explained, before obscure.
      Such indeed these; and under ground
      Concealed the helps to men;
      Brass, iron, silver, gold, who
      Would affirm that he discovered before me?
      None, I well know, not wishing in vain to boast.
      But learn all in one word,
      _All arts to mortals from Prometheus_.
 
      _Ch._ Assist not mortals now unseasonably,
      And neglect yourself unfortunate; for I
      Am of good hope that, from these bonds
      Released, you will yet have no less power than Zeus.
 
      _Pr._ Never thus has Fate the Accomplisher
      Decreed to fulfill these things, but by a myriad ills
      And woes subdued, thus bonds I flee;
      For art 's far weaker than necessity.
 
      _Ch._ Who, then, is helmsman of necessity?
 
      _Pr._ The Fates three-formed, and the remembering Furies.
 
      _Ch._ Than these, then, is Zeus weaker?
 
      _Pr._ Ay, he could not escape what has been fated.
 
      _Ch._ But what to Zeus is fated, except always to rule?
 
      _Pr._ This thou wilt not learn; seek not to know.
 
      _Ch._ Surely some awful thing it is which you withhold.
 
      _Pr._ Remember other words, for this by no means
      Is it time to tell, but to be concealed
      As much as possible; for keeping this do I
      Escape unseemly bonds and woes.
 
      _Ch._ Never may the all-ruling
      Zeus put into my mind
      Force antagonist to him.
      Nor let me cease drawing near
      The gods with holy sacrifices
      Of slain oxen, by Father Ocean's
      Ceaseless passage,
      Nor offend with words,
      But in me this remain
      And ne'er be melted out.
      'Tis something sweet with bold
      Hopes the long life to
      Extend, in bright
      Cheerfulness the cherishing spirit.
      But I shudder, thee beholding
      By a myriad sufferings tormented....
      For, not fearing Zeus,
      In thy private mind thou dost regard
      Mortals too much, Prometheus.
      Come, though a thankless
      Favor, friend, say where is any strength,
      From ephemerals any help? Saw you not
      The powerless inefficiency,
      Dream-like, in which the blind ...
      Race of mortals are entangled?
      Never counsels of mortals
      May transgress the harmony of Zeus.
      I learned these things looking on
      Thy destructive fate, Prometheus.
      For different to me did this strain come,
      And that which round thy baths
      And couch I hymned,
      With the design of marriage, when my father's child
      With bridal gifts persuading, thou didst lead
      Hesione the partner of thy bed.
 
 PROMETHEUS, CHORUS, _and_ IO.
 
      _Io._ What earth, what race, what being shall I is this
      I see in bridles of rock
      Exposed? By what crime's
      Penalty dost thou perish? Show, to what part
      Of earth I miserable have wandered.
      Ah! ah! alas! alas!
      Again some fly doth sting me wretched,
      Image of earth-born Argus, cover it, earth;
      I fear the myriad-eyed herdsman beholding;
      For he goes having a treacherous eye,
      Whom not e'en dead the earth conceals.
      But me, wretched from the Infernals passing,
      He pursues, and drives fasting along the seaside
      Sand, while low resounds a wax-compacted reed,
      Uttering sleep-giving law; alas! alas! O gods!
      Where, gods! where lead me far-wandering courses?
      In what sin, O son of Kronos,
      In what sin ever having taken,
      To these afflictions hast thou yoked me? alas! alas!
      With fly-driven fear a wretched
      Frenzied one dost thus afflict?
      With fire burn, or with earth cover, or
      To sea monsters give for food, nor
      Envy me my prayers, king.
      Enough much-wandered wanderings
      Have exercised me, nor can I learn where
      I shall escape from sufferings.
 
      _Ch._ Hear'st thou the address of the cow-horned virgin?
 
      _Pr._ And how not hear the fly-whirled virgin,
      Daughter of Inachus, who Zeus' heart warmed
      With love, and now the courses over long,
      By Here hated, forcedly performs?
 
      _Io._ Whence utterest thou my father's name?
      Tell me, miserable, who thou art,
      That to me, O suffering one, me born to suffer,
      Thus true things dost address?
      The god-sent ail thou'st named,
      Which wastes me stinging
      With maddening goads, alas! alas!
      With foodless and unseemly leaps
      Rushing headlong, I came,
      By wrathful plots subdued.
      Who of the wretched, who, alas! alas! suffers like me?
      But to me clearly show
      What me awaits to suffer,
      What not necessary; what remedy of ill,
      Teach, if indeed thou know'st; speak out,
      Tell the ill-wandering virgin.
 
      _Pr._ I'll clearly tell thee all you wish to learn.
      Not weaving in enigmas, but in simple speech,
      As it is just to open the mouth to friends.
      Thou seest the giver of fire to men, Prometheus.
 
      _Io._ O thou who didst appear a common help to mortals,
      Wretched Prometheus, to atone for what do you endure this?
 
      _Pr._ I have scarce ceased my sufferings lamenting.
 
      _Io._ Would you not grant this favor to me?
 
      _Pr._ Say what you ask; for you'd learn all from me.
 
      _Io._ Say who has bound thee to the cliff.
 
      _Pr._ The will, indeed, of Zeus, Hephaistus' hand.
 
      _Io._ And penalty for what crimes dost thou pay?
 
      _Pr._ Thus much only can I show thee.
 
      _Io._ But beside this, declare what time will be
      To me unfortunate the limit of my wandering.
 
      _Pr._ Not to learn is better for thee than to learn these things.
 
      _Io._ Conceal not from me what I am to suffer.
 
      _Pr._ Indeed, I grudge thee not this favor.
 
      _Io._ Why, then, dost thou delay to tell the whole?
 
      _Pr._ There's no unwillingness, but I hesitate to vex thy mind.
 
      _Io._ Care not for me more than is pleasant to me.
 
      _Pr._ Since you are earnest, it behooves to speak; hear then.
 
      _Ch._ Not yet, indeed; but a share of pleasure also give to me.
      First we'll learn the malady of this one,
      Herself relating her destructive fortunes,
      And the remainder of her trials let her learn from thee.
 
      _Pr._ 'T is thy part, Io, to do these a favor,
      As well for every other reason, and as they are sisters of thy
           father.
      Since to weep and to lament misfortunes,
      There where one will get a tear
      From those attending, is worthy the delay.
 
      _Io._ I know not that I need distrust you,
      But in plain speech you shall learn
      All that you ask for; and yet e'en telling I lament
      The god-sent tempest, and dissolution
      Of my form--whence to me miserable it came.
      For always visions in the night, moving about
      My virgin chambers, enticed me
      With smooth words: "O greatly happy virgin,
      Why be a virgin long? is permitted to obtain
      The greatest marriage. For Zeus with love's dart
      Has been warmed by thee, and wishes to unite
      In love; but do thou, O child, spurn not the couch
      Of Zeus, but go out to Lerna's deep
      Morass, and stables of thy father's herds,
      That the divine eye may cease from desire."
      With such dreams every night
      Was I unfortunate distressed, till I dared tell
      My father of the night-wandering visions.
      And he to Pytho and Dodona frequent
      Prophets sent, that he might learn what it was necessary
      He should say or do, to do agreeably to the gods.
      And they came bringing ambiguous
      Oracles, darkly and indistinctly uttered.
      But finally a plain report came to Inachus,
      Clearly enjoining him and telling
      Out of my home and country to expel me,
      Discharged to wander to the earth's last bounds;
      And if he was not willing, from Zeus would come
      A fiery thunderbolt, which would annihilate all his race.
      Induced by such predictions of the Loxian,
      Against his will he drove me out,
      And shut me from the houses; but Zeus' rein
      Compelled him by force to do these things.
      Immediately my form and mind were
      Changed, and horned, as you behold, stung
      By a sharp-mouthed fly, with frantic leaping
      Rushed I to Cenchrea's palatable stream,
      And Lerna's source; but a herdsman born-of-earth
      Of violent temper, Argus, accompanied, with numerous
      Eyes my steps observing.
      But unexpectedly a sudden fate
      Robbed him of life; and I, fly-stung,
      By lash divine am driven from land to land.
      You hear what has been done; and if you have to say aught,
      What's left of labors, speak; nor pitying me
      Comfort with false words; for an ill
      The worst of all, I say, are made-up words.
 
      _Ch._ Ah! ah! enough, alas!
      Ne'er, ne'er did I presume such cruel words
      Would reach my ears, nor thus unsightly
      And intolerable hurts, sufferings, fears with a two-edged
      Goad would chill my soul;
      Alas! alas! fate! fate!
      I shudder, seeing the state of Io.
 
      _Pr._ Beforehand sigh'st thou, and art full of fears,
      Hold till the rest also thou learn'st.
 
      _Ch._ Tell, teach; for to the sick 't is sweet
      To know the remaining pain beforehand clearly.
 
      _Pr._ Your former wish ye got from me
      With ease; for first ye asked to learn from her
      Relating her own trials;
      The rest now hear, what sufferings 't is necessary
      This young woman should endure from Here.
      But do thou, offspring of Inachus, my words
      Cast in thy mind, that thou may'st learn the boundaries of
           the way.
      First, indeed, hence towards the rising of the sun
      Turning thyself, travel uncultivated lands,
      And to the Scythian nomads thou wilt come, who woven roofs
      On high inhabit, on well-wheeled carts,
      With far-casting bows equipped;
      Whom go not near, but to the sea-resounding cliffs
      Bending thy feet, pass from the region.
      On the left hand the iron-working
      Chalybes inhabit, whom thou must needs beware,
      For they are rude and inaccessible to strangers.
      And thou wilt come to the Hybristes river, not ill named,
      Which pass not, for not easy is 't to pass,
      Before you get to Caucasus itself, highest
      Of mountains, where the stream spurts out its tide
      From the very temples; and passing over
      The star-neighbored summits, 't is necessary to go
      The southern way, where thou wilt come to the man-hating
      Army of the Amazons, who Themiscyra one day
      Will inhabit, by the Thermedon, where's
      Salmydessia, rough jaw of the sea,
      Inhospitable to sailors, stepmother of ships;
      They will conduct thee on thy way, and very cheerfully.
      And to the Cimmerian isthmus thou wilt come,
      Just on the narrow portals of a lake, which leaving
      It behooves thee with stout heart to pass the Moeotic straits;
      And there will be to mortals ever a great fame
      Of thy passage, and Bosphorus from thy name
      'T will be called. And leaving Europe's plain
      The continent of Asia thou wilt reach.--Seemeth to thee,
           forsooth,
      The tyrant of the gods in everything to be
      Thus violent? For he a god, with this mortal
      Wishing to unite, drove her to these wanderings.
      A bitter wooer didst thou find, O virgin,
      For thy marriage. For the words you now have heard
      Think not yet to be the prelude.
 
      _Io._ Ah! me! me! alas! alas!
 
      _Pr._ Again dost shriek and heave a sigh? What
      Wilt thou do when the remaining ills thou learn'st?
 
      _Ch._ And hast thou any further suffering to tell her?
 
      _Pr._ Ay, a tempestuous sea of baleful woe.
 
      _Io._ What profit, then, for me to live, and not in haste
      To cast myself from this rough rock,
      That rushing down upon the plain I may be released
      From every trouble? For better once for all to die,
      Than all my days to suffer evilly.
 
      _Pr._ Unhappily my trials would'st thou hear,
      To whom to die has not been fated;
      For this would be release from sufferings;
      But now there is no end of ills lying
      Before me, until Zeus falls from sovereignty.
 
      _Io._ And is Zeus ever to fall from power?
 
      _Pr._ Thou would'st be pleased, I think, to see this accident.
 
      _Io._ How should I not, who suffer ill from Zeus?
 
      _Pr._ That these things then are so, be thou assured.
 
      _Io._ By what one will the tyrant's power be robbed?
 
      _Pr._ Himself, by his own senseless counsels.
 
      _Io._ In what way show, if there's no harm.
 
      _Pr._ He will make such a marriage as one day he'll repent.
 
      _Io._ Of god or mortal? If to be spoken, tell.
 
      _Pr._ What matters which? For these things are not to be told.
 
      _Io._ By a wife will he be driven from the throne?
 
      _Pr._ Ay, she will bring forth a son superior to his father.
 
      _Io._ Is there no refuge for him from this fate?
 
      _Pr._ None, surely, till I may be released from bonds.
 
      _Io._ Who, then, is to release thee, Zeus unwilling?
 
      _Pr._ He must be some one of thy descendants.
 
      _Io._ How sayest thou? that my child will deliver thee from ills?
 
      _Pr._ Third of thy race after ten other births.
 
      _Io._ This oracle is not yet easy to be guessed.
 
      _Pr._ But do not seek to understand thy sufferings.
 
      _Io._ First proffering gain to me, do not then withhold it.
 
      _Pr._ I'll grant thee one of two relations.
 
      _Io._ What two propose, and give to me my choice.
 
      _Pr._ I give; choose whether thy remaining troubles
      I shall tell thee clearly, or him that will release me.
 
      _Ch._ Consent to do her the one favor,
      Me the other, nor deem us undeserving of thy words;
      To her indeed tell what remains of wandering,
      And to me, who will release; for I desire this.
 
      _Pr._ Since ye are earnest, I will not resist
      To tell the whole, as much as ye ask for.
      To thee first, Io, vexatious wandering I will tell,
      Which engrave on the remembering tablets of the mind.
      When thou hast passed the flood boundary of continents,
      Towards the flaming orient sun-traveled ...
      Passing through the tumult of the sea, until you reach
      The Gorgonian plains of Cisthene, where
      The Phorcides dwell, old virgins,
      Three, swan-shaped, having a common eye,
      One-toothed, whom neither the sun looks on
      With his beams, nor nightly moon ever.
      And near, their winged sisters three,
      Dragon-scaled Gorgons, odious to men,
      Whom no mortal beholding will have breath;
      Such danger do I tell thee.
      But hear another odious sight;
      Beware the gryphons, sharp-mouthed
      Dogs of Zeus, which bark not, and the one-eyed Arimaspian
      Host, going on horseback, who dwell about
      The golden-flowing flood of Pluto's channel;
      These go not near. But to a distant land
      Thou 'lt come, a dusky race, who near the fountains
      Of the sun inhabit, where is the Aethiopian river.
      Creep down the banks of this, until thou com'st
      To a descent, where from Byblinian mounts
      The Nile sends down its sacred palatable stream.
      This will conduct thee to the triangled land
      Nilean, where, Io, 't is decreed
      Thou and thy progeny shall form the distant colony.
      If aught of this is unintelligible to thee, and hard to be
           found out,
      Repeat thy questions, and learn clearly;
      For more leisure than I want is granted me.
 
      _Ch._ If to her aught remaining or omitted
      Thou hast to tell of her pernicious wandering,
      Speak; but if thou hast said all, give us
      The favor which we ask, for surely thou remember'st.
 
      _Pr._ The whole term of her traveling has she heard.
      But that she may know that not in vain she hears me,
      I'll tell what before coming hither she endured,
      Giving this as proof of my relations.
      The great multitude of words I will omit,
      And proceed unto the very limit of thy wanderings.
      When, then, you came to the Molossian ground,
      And near the high-ridged Dodona, where
      Oracle and seat is of Thesprotian Zeus,
      And prodigy incredible, the speaking oaks,
      By whom you clearly, and naught enigmatically,
      Were called the illustrious wife of Zeus
      About to be, if aught of these things soothes thee;
      Thence, driven by the fly, you came
      The seaside way to the great gulf of Rhea,
      From which by courses retrograde you are now tempest-tossed.
      But for time to come the sea gulf,
      Clearly know, will be called Ionian,
      Memorial of thy passage to all mortals.
      Proofs to thee are these of my intelligence,
      That it sees somewhat more than the apparent.
      But the rest to you and her in common I will tell,
      Having come upon the very track of former words.
      There is a city Canopus, last of the land,
      By Nile's very mouth and bank;
      There at length Zeus makes thee sane,
      Stroking with gentle hand, and touching only.
      And, named from Zeus' begetting,
      Thou wilt bear dark Epaphus, who will reap
      As much land as broad-flowing Nile doth water;
      And fifth from him, a band of fifty children
      Again to Argos shall unwilling come,
      Of female sex, avoiding kindred marriage
      Of their cousins; but they, with minds inflamed,
      Hawks by doves not far left behind,
      Will come pursuing marriages
      Not to be pursued, but heaven will take vengeance on their bodies;
      For them Pelasgia shall receive by Mars
      Subdued with woman's hand with night-watching boldness.
      For each wife shall take her husband's life,
      Staining a two-edged dagger in his throat.
      Such 'gainst my foes may Cypris come.--
      But one of the daughters shall love soften
      Not to slay her bedfellow, but she will waver
      In her mind; and one of two things will prefer,
      To hear herself called timid, rather than stained with blood;
      She shall in Argos bear a royal race.--
      Of a long speech is need this clearly to discuss.
      From this seed, however, shall be born a brave,
      Famed for his bow, who will release me
      From these sufferings. Such oracle my ancient
      Mother told me, Titanian Themis;
      But how and by what means, this needs long speech
      To tell, and nothing, learning, wilt thou gain.
 
      _Io._ Ah me! ah wretched me!
      Spasms again and brain-struck
      Madness burn me within, and a fly's dart
      Stings me,--not wrought by fire.
      My heart with fear knocks at my breast,
      And my eyes whirl round and round,
      And from my course I'm borne by madness'
      Furious breath, unable to control my tongue;
      While confused words dash idly
      'Gainst the waves of horrid woe.
 
      _Ch._ Wise, wise indeed was he,
      Who first in mind
      This weighed, and with the tongue expressed,
      To marry according to one's degree is best by far;
      Nor, being a laborer with the hands,
      To woo those who are by wealth corrupted,
      Nor, those by birth made great.
      Never, never me
      Fates ...
      May you behold the sharer of Zeus' couch.
      Nor may I be brought near to any husband among those from heaven,
      For I fear, seeing the virginhood of Io,
      Not content with man, through marriage vexed
      With these distressful wanderings by Here.
      But for myself, since an equal marriage is without fear,
      I am not concerned lest the love of the almighty
      Gods cast its inevitable eye on me.
      Without war, indeed, this war, producing
      Troubles; nor do I know what would become of me;
      For I see not how I should escape the subtlety of Zeus.
 
      _Pr._ Surely shall Zeus, though haughty now,
      Yet be humble, such marriage
      He prepares to make, which from sovereignty
      And the throne will cast him down obscure; and Father Kronos'
      Curse will then be all fulfilled,
      Which falling from the ancient seats he imprecated.
      And refuge from such ills none of the gods
      But I can show him clearly.
      I know these things, and in what manner. Now, therefore,
      Being bold, let him sit trusting to lofty
      Sounds, and brandishing with both hands his fire-breathing weapon,
      For naught will these avail him, not
      To fall disgracefully intolerable falls;
      Such wrestler does he now prepare,
      Himself against himself, a prodigy most hard to be withstood;
      Who, indeed, will invent a better flame than lightning,
      And a loud sound surpassing thunder;
      And shiver the trident, Neptune's weapon,
      The marine earth-shaking ail.
      Stumbling upon this ill he'll learn
      How different to govern and to serve.
 
      _Ch._ Ay, as you hope you vent this against Zeus.
 
      _Pr._ What will be done, and also what I hope, I say.
 
      _Ch._ And are we to expect that any will rule Zeus?
 
      _Pr._ Even than these more grievous ills he'll have.
 
      _Ch._ How fear'st thou not, hurling such words?
 
      _Pr._ What should I fear, to whom to die has not been fated?
 
      _Ch._ But suffering more grievous still than this he may inflict.
 
      _Pr._ Then let him do it; all is expected by me.
 
      _Ch._ Those reverencing Adrastia are wise.
 
      _Pr._ Revere, pray, flatter each successive ruler.
      Me less than nothing Zeus concerns.
      Let him do, let him prevail this short time
      As he will, for long he will not rule the gods,--
      But I see here, indeed, Zeus' runner,
      The new tryant's drudge;
      Doubtless he brings some new message.
 
 PROMETHEUS, CHORUS, _and_ HERMES.
 
      _Her._ To thee, the sophist, the bitterly bitter,
      The sinner against gods, the giver of honors
      To ephemerals, the thief of fire, I speak;
      The Father commands thee to tell the marriage
      Which you boast, by which he falls from power;
      And that, too, not enigmatically,
      But each particular declare; nor cause me
      Double journeys, Prometheus; for thou see'st that
      Zeus is not appeased by such.
 
      _Pr._ Solemn-mouthed and full of wisdom
      Is thy speech, as of the servant of the gods.
      Ye newly rule, and think forsooth
      To dwell in griefless citadels; have I not seen
      Two tyrants fallen from these?
      And third I shall behold him ruling now,
      Basest and speediest. Do I seem to thee
      To fear and shrink from the new gods?
      Nay, much and wholly I fall short of this.
      The way thou cam'st go through the dust again;
      For thou wilt learn naught which thou ask'st of me.
 
      _Her._ Ay, by such insolence before
      You brought yourself into these woes.
 
      _Pr._ Plainly know, I would not change
      My ill fortune for thy servitude,
      For better, I think, to serve this rock
      Than be the faithful messenger of Father Zeus.
      Thus to insult the insulting it is fit.
 
      _Her._ Thou seem'st to enjoy thy present state.
 
      _Pr._ I enjoy? Enjoying thus my enemies
      Would I see; and thee 'mong them I count.
 
      _Her._ Dost thou blame me for aught of thy misfortunes?
 
      _Pr._ In plain words, all gods I hate,
      As many as well treated wrong me unjustly.
 
      _Her._ I hear thee raving, no slight ail.
 
      _Pr._ Ay, I should ail, if ail one's foes to hate.
 
      _Her._ If prosperous, thou couldst not be borne.
 
      _Pr._ Ah me!
 
      _Her._ This word Zeus does not know.
 
      _Pr._ But time growing old teaches all things.
 
      _Her._ And still thou know'st not yet how to be prudent.
 
      _Pr._ For I should not converse with thee a servant.
 
      _Her._ Thou seem'st to say naught which the Father wishes.
 
      _Pr._ And yet his debtor I'd requite the favor.
 
      _Her._ Thou mock'st me verily as if I were a child.
 
      _Pr._ And art thou not a child, and simpler still than this,
      If thou expectest to learn aught from me?
      There is not outrage nor expedient, by which
      Zeus will induce me to declare these things,
      Before he loose these grievous bonds.
      Let there be hurled, then, flaming fire,
      And the white-winged snows, and thunders
      Of the earth, let him confound and mingle all.
      For none of these will bend me till I tell
      By whom 't is necessary he should fall from sovereignty.
 
      _Her._ Consider now if these things seem helpful.
 
      _Pr._ Long since these were considered and resolved.
 
      _Her._ Venture, O vain one, venture, at length,
      In view of present sufferings to be wise.
 
      _Pr._ In vain you vex me, as a wave, exhorting.
      Ne'er let it come into thy mind that I, fearing
      Zeus' anger, shall become woman-minded,
      And beg him, greatly hated,
      With womanish upturnings of the hands,
      To loose me from these bonds. I am far from it.
 
      _Her._ Though saying much I seem in vain to speak;
      For thou art nothing softened nor appeased
      By prayers; but champing at the bit like a new-yoked
      Colt, thou strugglest and contend'st against the reins.
      But thou art violent with feeble wisdom.
      For stubbornness to him who is not wise,
      Itself alone, is less than nothing strong.
      But consider, if thou art not persuaded by my words,
      What storm and triple surge of ills
      Will come upon thee, not to be avoided; for first this rugged
      Cliff with thunder and lightning flame
      The Father'll rend, and hide
      Thy body, and a strong arm will bury thee.
      When thou hast spent a long length of time,
      Thou wilt come back to light; and Zeus'
      Winged dog, a bloodthirsty eagle, ravenously
      Shall tear the great rag of thy body,
      Creeping an uninvited guest all day,
      And banquet on thy liver black by eating.
      Of such suffering expect not any end,
      Before some god appear
      Succeeding to thy labors, and wish to go to rayless
      Hades, and the dark depths of Tartarus.
      Therefore deliberate; since this is not made
      Boasting, but in earnest spoken;
      For to speak falsely does not know the mouth
      Of Zeus, but every word he does. So
      Look about thee, and consider, nor ever think
      Obstinacy better than prudence.
 
      _Ch._ To us indeed Hermes appears to say not unseasonable things,
      For he directs thee, leaving off
      Self-will, to seek prudent counsel.
      Obey; for it is base to err, for a wise man.
 
      _Pr._ To me foreknowing these messages
      He has uttered, but for a foe to suffer ill
      From foes is naught unseemly.
      Therefore 'gainst me let there be hurled
      Fire's double-pointed curl, and air
      Be provoked with thunder, and a tumult
      Of wild winds; and earth from its foundations
      Let a wind rock, and its very roots,
      And with a rough surge mingle
      The sea waves with the passages
      Of the heavenly stars, and to black
      Tartarus let him quite cast down my
      Body, by necessity's strong eddies.
      Yet after all he will not kill me.
 
      _Her._ Such words and counsels you may hear
      From the brain-struck.
      For what lacks he of being mad?
      And if prosperous, what does he cease from madness?
      Do you, therefore, who sympathize
      With this one's suffering,
      From these places quick withdraw somewhere,
      Lest the harsh bellowing thunder
      Stupefy your minds.
 
      _Ch._ Say something else, and exhort me
      To some purpose; for surely
      Thou hast intolerably abused this word.
      How direct me to perform a baseness?
      I wish to suffer with him whate'er is necessary,
      For I have learned to hate betrayers;
      Nor is the pest
      Which I abominate more than this.
 
      _Her._ Remember, then, what I foretell;
      Nor by calamity pursued
      Blame fortune, nor e'er say
      That Zeus into unforeseen
      Ill has cast you; surely not, but yourselves
      You yourselves; for knowing,
      And not suddenly nor clandestinely,
      You'll be entangled through your folly
      In an impassable net of woe.
 
      _Pr._ Surely indeed, and no more in word,
      Earth is shaken;
      And a hoarse sound of thunder
      Bellows near; and wreaths of lightning
      Flash out fiercely blazing, and whirlwinds dust
      Whirl up; and leap the blasts
      Of all winds, 'gainst one another
      Blowing in opposite array;
      And air with sea is mingled;
      Such impulse against me from Zeus,
      Producing fear, doth plainly come.
      O revered Mother, O Ether
      Revolving common light to all,
      You see me, how unjust things I endure!
 
 
 
 
 TRANSLATIONS FROM PINDAR
 
 
 ELYSIUM
 
 OLYMPIA II, 109-150
 
      Equally by night always,
      And by day, having the sun, the good
      Lead a life without labor, not disturbing the earth
      With violent hands, nor the sea water,
      For a scanty living; but honored
      By the gods, who take pleasure in fidelity to oaths,
      They spend a tearless existence;
      While the others suffer unsightly pain.
      But as many as endured threefold
      Probation, keeping the mind from all
      Injustice, going the way of Zeus to Kronos' tower,
      Where the ocean breezes blow around
      The island of the blessed; and flowers of gold shine,
      Some on the land from dazzling trees,
      And the water nourishes others;
      With garlands of these they crown their hands and hair,
      According to the just decrees of Rhadamanthus,
      Whom Father Kronos, the husband of Rhea,
      Having the highest throne of all, has ready by himself as his
           assistant judge.
      Peleus and Kadmus are regarded among these;
      And his mother brought Achilles, when she had
      Persuaded the heart of Zeus with prayers,
      Who overthrew Hector, Troy's
      Unconquered, unshaken column, and gave Cycnus
      To death, and Morning's Aethiop son.
 
 OLYMPIA V, 34-39
 
      Always around virtues labor and expense strive toward a work
      Covered with danger; but those succeeding seem to be wise even
           to the citizens.
 
 OLYMPIA VI, 14-17
 
                      Dangerless virtues,
      Neither among men, nor in hollow ships,
      Are honorable; but many remember if a fair deed is done.
 
 
 ORIGIN OF RHODES
 
 OLYMPIA VII, 100-129
 
      Ancient sayings of men relate,
      That when Zeus and the Immortals divided earth,
      Rhodes was not yet apparent in the deep sea;
      But in salt depths the island was hid.
      And, Helios being absent, no one claimed for him his lot;
      So they left him without any region for his share,
      The pure god. And Zeus was about to make a second drawing of lots
      For him warned. But he did not permit him;
      For he said that within the white sea he had seen a certain land
           springing up from the bottom,
      Capable of feeding many men, and suitable for flocks.
      And straightway he commanded golden-filleted Lachesis
      To stretch forth her hands, and not contradict
      The great oath of the gods, but with the son of Kronos
      Assent that, to the bright air being sent by his nod,
      It should hereafter be his prize. And his words were fully
           performed,
      Meeting with truth. The island sprang from the watery
      Sea; and the genial Father of penetrating beams,
      Ruler of fire-breathing horses, has it.
 
 OLYMPIA VIII, 95, 96
 
      A man doing fit things
      Forgets Hades.
 
 
 HERCULES NAMES THE HILL OF KRONOS
 
 OLYMPIA X, 59-68
 
      He named the Hill of Kronos, for before nameless,
      While Oenomaus ruled, it was moistened with much snow;
      And at this first rite the Fates stood by,
      And Time, who alone proves
      Unchanging truth.
 
 
 OLYMPIA AT EVENING
 
 OLYMPIA X, 85-92
 
      With the javelin Phrastor struck the mark;
      And Eniceus cast the stone afar,
      Whirling his hand, above them all,
      And with applause it rushed
      Through a great tumult;
      And the lovely evening light
      Of the fair-faced moon shone on the scene.
 
 
 FAME
 
 OLYMPIA X, 109-117
 
      When, having done fair things, O Agesidamus,
      Without the reward of song, a man may come
      To Hades' rest, vainly aspiring
      He obtains with toil some short delight.
      But the sweet-voiced lyre
      And the sweet flute bestow some favor;
      For Zeus' Pierian daughters
      Have wide fame.
 
 
 TO ASOPICHUS OF ORCHOMENOS, ON HIS VICTORY IN THE STADIC COURSE
 
 OLYMPIA XIV
 
      O ye, who inhabit for your lot the seat of the Cephisian
      Streams, yielding fair steeds, renowned Graces,
      Ruling bright Orchomenos,
      Protectors of the ancient race of Minyae,
      Hear, when I pray.
      For with you are all pleasant
      And sweet things to mortals;
      If wise, if fair, if noble,
      Any man. For neither do the gods,
      Without the august Graces,
      Rule the dance,
      Nor feasts; but stewards
      Of all works in heaven,
      Having placed their seats
      By golden-bowed Pythian Apollo,
      They reverence the eternal power
      Of the Olympian Father.
      August Aglaia and song-loving
      Euphrosyne, children of the mightiest god,
      Hear now, and Thalia loving song,
      Beholding this band, in favorable fortune
      Lightly dancing; for in Lydian
      Manner meditating,
      I come celebrating Asopichus,
      Since Minya by thy means is victor at the Olympic games.
      Now to Persephone's
      Black-walled house go, Echo,
      Bearing to his father the famous news;
      That seeing Cleodamus thou mayest say,
      That in renowned Pisa's vale
      His son crowned his young hair
      With plumes of illustrious contests.
 
 
 TO THE LYRE
 
 PYTHIA I, 8-11
 
      Thou extinguishest even the spear-like bolt
      Of everlasting fire. And the eagle sleeps on the sceptre of Zeus,
      Drooping his swift wings on either side,
      The king of birds.
 
 PYTHIA I, 25-28
 
      Whatever things Zeus has not loved
      Are terrified, hearing
      The voice of the Pierians,
      On earth and the immeasurable sea.
 
 PYTHIA II, 159-161
 
      A plain-spoken man brings advantage to every government,--
      To a monarchy, and when the
      Impetuous crowd, and when the wise, rule a city.
 
 As a whole, the third Pythian Ode, to Hiero, on his victory in the
 single-horse race, is one of the most memorable. We extract first the
 account of
 
 
 AESCULAPIUS
 
 PYTHIA III, 83-110
 
      As many, therefore, as came suffering
      From spontaneous ulcers, or wounded
      In their limbs with glittering steel,
      Or with the far-cast stone,
      Or by the summer's heat o'ercome in body,
      Or by winter, relieving he saved from
      Various ills; some cherishing
      With soothing strains,
      Others having drunk refreshing draughts, or applying
      Remedies to the limbs, others by cutting off he made erect.
      But even wisdom is bound by gain,
      And gold appearing in the hand persuaded even him, with its
           bright reward,
      To bring a man from death
      Already overtaken. But the Kronian, smiting
      With both hands, quickly took away
      The breath from his breasts;
      And the rushing thunderbolt hurled him to death.
      It is necessary for mortal minds
      To seek what is reasonable from the divinities,
      Knowing what is before the feet, of what destiny we are.
      Do not, my soul, aspire to the life
      Of the Immortals, but exhaust the practicable means.
 
 In the conclusion of the ode, the poet reminds the victor, Hiero, that
 adversity alternates with prosperity in the life of man, as in the
 instance of
 
 
 PELEUS AND CADMUS
 
 PYTHIA III, 145-205
 
      The Immortals distribute to men
      With one good two
      Evils. The foolish, therefore,
      Are not able to bear these with grace,
      But the wise, turning the fair outside.
 
      But thee the lot of good fortune follows,
      or surely great Destiny
      Looks down upon a king ruling the people,
      If on any man. But a secure life
      Was not to Peleus, son of Aeacus,
      Nor to godlike Cadmus,
      Who yet are said to have had
      The greatest happiness
      Of mortals, and who heard
      The song of the golden-filleted Muses,
      On the mountain, and in seven-gated Thebes,
      When the one married fair-eyed Harmonia,
      And the other Thetis, the illustrious daughter of wise-counseling
           Nereus.
      And the gods feasted with both;
      And they saw the royal children of Kronos
      On golden seats, and received
      Marriage gifts; and having exchanged
      Former toils for the favor of Zeus,
      They made erect the heart.
      But in course of time
      His three daughters robbed the one
      Of some of his serenity by acute
      Sufferings; when Father Zeus, forsooth, came
      To the lovely couch of white-armed Thyone.
      And the other's child, whom only the immortal
      Thetis bore in Phthia, losing
      His life in war by arrows,
      Being consumed by fire excited
      The lamentation of the Danaans.
      But if any mortal has in his
      Mind the way of truth,
      It is necessary to make the best
      Of what befalls from the blessed.
      For various are the blasts
      Of high-flying winds.
      The happiness of men stays not a long time,
      Though fast it follows rushing on.
 
      Humble in humble estate, lofty in lofty,
      I will be; and the attending daemon
      I will always reverence in my mind,
      Serving according to my means.
      But if Heaven extend to me kind wealth,
      I have hope to find lofty fame hereafter.
      Nestor and Lycian Sarpedon--
      They are the fame of men--
      From resounding words which skillful artists
      Sung, we know.
      For virtue through renowned
      Song is lasting.
      But for few is it easy to obtain.
 
 
 APOLLO
 
 PYTHIA V, 87-90
 
                            He bestowed the lyre,
      And he gives the muse to whom he wishes,
      Bringing peaceful serenity to the breast.
 
 
 MAN
 
 PYTHIA VIII, 136
 
      The phantom of a shadow are men.
 
 
 HYPSEUS' DAUGHTER CYRENE
 
 PYTHIA IX, 31-44
 
      He reared the white-armed child Cyrene,
      Who loved neither the alternating motion of the loom,
      Nor the superintendence of feasts,
      With the pleasures of companions;
      But, with javelins of steel
      And the sword contending,
      To slay wild beasts;
      Affording surely much
      And tranquil peace to her father's herds;
      Spending little sleep
      Upon her eyelids,
      As her sweet bedfellow, creeping on at dawn.
 
 
 THE HEIGHT OF GLORY
 
 PYTHIA X, 33-48
 
              Fortunate and celebrated
      By the wise is that man
      Who, conquering by his hands or virtue
      Of his feet, takes the highest prizes
      Through daring and strength,
      And living still sees his youthful son
      Deservedly obtaining Pythian crowns.
      The brazen heaven is not yet accessible to him.
      But whatever glory we
      Of mortal race may reach,
      He goes beyond, even to the boundaries
      Of navigation. But neither in ships, nor going on foot,
      Couldst thou find the wonderful way to the contests of the
           Hyperboreans.
 
 
 TO ARISTOCLIDES, VICTOR AT THE NEMEAN GAMES
 
 NEMEA III, 32-37
 
              If, being beautiful,
      And doing things like to his form,
      The child of Aristophanes
      Went to the height of manliness, no further
      Is it easy to go over the untraveled sea,
      Beyond the Pillars of Hercules.
 
 
 THE YOUTH OF ACHILLES
 
 NEMEA III, 69-90
 
      One with native virtues
      Greatly prevails; but he who
      Possesses acquired talents, an obscure man,
      Aspiring to various things, never with fearless
      Foot advances, but tries
      A myriad virtues with inefficient mind.
      Yellow-haired Achilles, meanwhile, remaining in the house of
           Philyra,
      Being a boy played
      Great deeds; often brandishing
      Iron-pointed javelins in his hands,
      Swift as the winds, in fight he wrought death to savage lions;
      And he slew boars, and brought their bodies
      Palpitating to Kronian Centaurus,
      As soon as six years old. And all the while
      Artemis and bold Athene admired him,
      Slaying stags without dogs or treacherous nets;
      For he conquered them on foot.
 
 NEMEA IV, 66-70
 
      Whatever virtues sovereign destiny has given me,
      I well know that time, creeping on,
      Will fulfill what was fated.
 
 NEMEA V, 1-8
 
 The kindred of Pytheas, a victor in the Nemean games, had wished to
 procure an ode from Pindar for less than three drachmae, asserting that
 they could purchase a statue for that sum. In the following lines he
 nobly reproves their meanness, and asserts the value of his labors,
 which, unlike those of the statuary, will bear the fame of the hero to
 the ends of the earth.
 
      No image-maker am I, who being still make statues
      Standing on the same base. But on every
      Merchant-ship and in every boat, sweet song,
      Go from Aegina to announce that Lampo's son,
      Mighty Pytheas,
      Has conquered the pancratian crown at the Nemean games.
 
 
 THE DIVINE IN MAN
 
 NEMEA VI, 1-13
 
      One the race of men and of gods;
      And from one mother
      We all breathe.
      But quite different power
      Divides us, so that the one is nothing,
      But the brazen heaven remains always
      A secure abode. Yet in some respect we are related,
      Either in mighty mind or form, to the Immortals;
      Although not knowing
      To what resting-place,
      By day or night, Fate has written that we shall run.
 
 
 THE TREATMENT OF AJAX
 
 NEMEA VIII, 44-51
 
      In secret votes the Danaans aided Ulysses;
      And Ajax, deprived of golden arms, struggled with death.
      Surely, wounds of another kind they wrought
      In the warm flesh of their foes, waging war
      With the man-defending spear.
 
 
 THE VALUE OF FRIENDS
 
 NEMEA VIII, 68-75
 
      Virtue increases, being sustained by wise men and just,
      As when a tree shoots up with gentle dews into the liquid air.
      There are various uses of friendly men;
      But chiefest in labors; and even pleasure
      Requires to place some pledge before the eyes.
 
 
 DEATH OF AMPHIARAUS
 
 NEMEA IX, 41-66
 
      Once they led to seven-gated Thebes an army of men, not according
      To the lucky flight of birds. Nor did the Kronian,
      Brandishing his lightning, impel to march
      From home insane, but to abstain from the way.
      But to apparent destruction
      The host made haste to go, with brazen arms
      And horse equipments, and on the banks
      Of Ismenus, defending sweet return,
      Their white-flowered bodies fattened fire.
      For seven pyres devoured young-limbed
      Men. But to Amphiaraus
      Zeus rent the deep-bosomed earth
      With his mighty thunderbolt,
      And buried him with his horses,
      Ere, being struck in the back
      By the spear of Periclymenus, his warlike
      Spirit was disgraced.
      For in daemonic fears
      Flee even the sons of gods.
 
 
 CASTOR AND POLLUX
 
 NEMEA X, 153-171
 
 Pollux, son of Zeus, shared his immortality with his brother Castor,
 son of Tyndarus, and while one was in heaven, the other remained in
 the infernal regions, and they alternately lived and died every day,
 or, as some say, every six months. While Castor lies mortally wounded
 by Idas, Pollux prays to Zeus, either to restore his brother to life,
 or permit him to die with him, to which the god answers,--
 
              Nevertheless, I give thee
      Thy choice of these: if, indeed, fleeing
      Death and odious age,
      You wish to dwell on Olympus,
      With Athene and black-speared Mars,
      Thou hast this lot;
      But if thou thinkest to fight
      For thy brother, and share
      All things with him,
      Half the time thou mayest breathe, being beneath the earth,
      And half in the golden halls of heaven.
      The god thus having spoken, he did not
      Entertain a double wish in his mind.
      And he released first the eye, and then the voice,
      Of brazen-mitred Castor.
 
 
 TOIL
 
 ISTHMIA I, 65-71
 
      One reward of labors is sweet to one man, one to another,--
      To the shepherd, and the plower, and the bird-catcher,
      And whom the sea nourishes.
      But every one is tasked to ward off
      Grievous famine from the stomach.
 
 
 THE VENALITY OF THE MUSE
 
 ISTHMIA II, 9-18
 
      Then the Muse was not
      Fond of gain, nor a laboring woman;
      Nor were the sweet-sounding,
      Soothing strains
      Of Terpsichore sold,
      With silvered front.
      But now she directs to observe the saying
      Of the Argive, coming very near the truth,
      Who cried, "Money, money, man,"
      Being bereft of property and friends.
 
 
 HERCULES' PRAYER CONCERNING AJAX, SON OF TELAMON
 
 ISTHMIA VI, 62-73
 
      "If ever, O Father Zeus, thou hast heard
      My supplication with willing mind,
      Now I beseech thee, with prophetic
      Prayer, grant a bold son from Eriboea
      To this man, my fated guest;
      Rugged in body
      As the hide of this wild beast
      Which now surrounds me, which, first of all
      My contests, I slew once in Nemea; and let his mind agree."
      To him thus having spoken, Heaven sent
      A great eagle, king of birds,
      And sweet joy thrilled him inwardly.
 
 
 THE FREEDOM OF GREECE
 
                    First at Artemisium
      The children of the Athenians laid the shining
      Foundation of freedom,
      And at Salamis and Mycale,
      And in Plataea, making it firm
      As adamant.
 
 
 FROM STRABO[7]
 
 APOLLO
 
              Having risen he went
      Over land and sea,
      And stood over the vast summits of mountains,
      And threaded the recesses, penetrating to the foundations of
           the groves.
 
 
 FROM PLUTARCH
 
      Heaven being willing, even on an osier thou mayest sail.
 [Thus rhymed by the old translator of Plutarch:
 
      "Were it the will of heaven, an osier bough
      Were vessel safe enough the seas to plough."]
 
 
 FROM SEXTUS EMPIRICUS
 
      Honors and crowns of the tempest-footed
      Horses delight one;
      Others live in golden chambers;
      And some even are pleased traversing securely
      The swelling of the sea in a swift ship.
 
 
 FROM STOBAEUS
 
      This I will say to thee:
      The lot of fair and pleasant things
      It behooves to show in public to all the people;
      But if any adverse calamity sent from heaven befall
      Men, this it becomes to bury in darkness.
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 Pindar said of the physiologists, that they "plucked the unripe fruit
 of wisdom."
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 Pindar said that "hopes were the dreams of those awake."
 
 
 FROM CLEMENS OF ALEXANDRIA
 
      To Heaven it is possible from black
      Night to make arise unspotted light,
      And with cloud-blackening darkness to obscure
      The pure splendor of day.
 
      First, indeed, the Fates brought the wise-counseling
      Uranian Themis, with golden horses,
      By the fountains of Ocean to the awful ascent
      Of Olympus, along the shining way,
      To be the first spouse of Zeus the Deliverer.
      And she bore the golden-filleted, fair-wristed
      Hours, preservers of good things.
 
      Equally tremble before God
      And a man dear to God.
 
 
 FROM AELIUS ARISTIDES
 
 Pindar used such exaggerations [in praise of poetry] as to say that
 even the gods themselves, when at his marriage Zeus asked if they
 wanted anything, "asked him to make certain gods for them who should
 celebrate these great works and all his creation with speech and
 song."
 
 FOOTNOTE:
 
 [7] [This and the following are fragments of Pindar found in ancient
 authors.]
 
 
 
 
 POEMS
 
 
 NATURE
 
      O Nature! I do not aspire
      To be the highest in thy quire,--
      To be a meteor in the sky,
      Or comet that may range on high;
      Only a zephyr that may blow
      Among the reeds by the river low;
      Give me thy most privy place
      Where to run my airy race.
 
      In some withdrawn, unpublic mead
      Let me sigh upon a reed,
      Or in the woods, with leafy din,
      Whisper the still evening in:
      Some still work give me to do,--
      Only--be it near to you!
 
      For I'd rather be thy child
      And pupil, in the forest wild,
      Than be the king of men elsewhere,
      And most sovereign slave of care:
      To have one moment of thy dawn,
      Than share the city's year forlorn.
 
 
 INSPIRATION[8]
 
      Whate'er we leave to God, God does,
        And blesses us;
      The work we choose should be our own,
        God leaves alone.
 
             *       *       *       *       *
 
      If with light head erect I sing,
        Though all the Muses lend their force,
      From my poor love of anything,
        The verse is weak and shallow as its source.
 
      But if with bended neck I grope,
        Listening behind me for my wit,
      With faith superior to hope,
        More anxious to keep back than forward it,
 
      Making my soul accomplice there
        Unto the flame my heart hath lit,
      Then will the verse forever wear,--
        Time cannot bend the line which God hath writ.
 
      Always the general show of things
        Floats in review before my mind,
      And such true love and reverence brings,
        That sometimes I forget that I am blind.
 
      But now there comes unsought, unseen,
        Some clear divine electuary,
      And I, who had but sensual been,
        Grow sensible, and as God is, am wary.
 
      I hearing get, who had but ears,
        And sight, who had but eyes before;
      I moments live, who lived but years,
        And truth discern, who knew but learning's lore.
 
      I hear beyond the range of sound,
        I see beyond the range of sight,
      New earths and skies and seas around,
        And in my day the sun doth pale his light.
 
      A clear and ancient harmony
        Pierces my soul through all its din,
      As through its utmost melody,--
        Farther behind than they, farther within.
 
      More swift its bolt than lightning is.
        Its voice than thunder is more loud,
      It doth expand my privacies
        To all, and leave me single in the crowd.
 
      It speaks with such authority,
        With so serene and lofty tone,
      That idle Time runs gadding by,
        And leaves me with Eternity alone.
 
      Then chiefly is my natal hour,
        And only then my prime of life;
      Of manhood's strength it is the flower,
        'T is peace's end, and war's beginning strife.
 
      'T hath come in summer's broadest noon,
        By a gray wall or some chance place,
      Unseasoned time, insulted June,
        And vexed the day with its presuming face.
 
      Such fragrance round my couch it makes,
        More rich than are Arabian drugs,
      That my soul scents its life and wakes
        The body up beneath its perfumed rugs.
 
      Such is the Muse, the heavenly maid,
        The star that guides our mortal course,
      Which shows where life's true kernel's laid,
        Its wheat's fine flour, and its undying force.
 
      She with one breath attunes the spheres,
        And also my poor human heart,
      With one impulse propels the years
        Around, and gives my throbbing pulse its start.
 
      I will not doubt for evermore,
        Nor falter from a steadfast faith,
      For though the system be turned o'er,
        God takes not back the word which once he saith.
 
      I will, then, trust the love untold
        Which not my worth nor want has bought,
      Which wooed me young, and wooes me old,
        And to this evening hath me brought.
 
      My memory I'll educate
        To know the one historic truth,
      Remembering to the latest date
        The only true and sole immortal youth.
 
      Be but thy inspiration given,
        No matter through what danger sought,
      I'll fathom hell or climb to heaven,
        And yet esteem that cheap which love has bought.
 
             *       *       *       *       *
 
      Fame cannot tempt the bard
        Who's famous with his God,
      Nor laurel him reward
        Who hath his Maker's nod.
 
 
 THE AURORA OF GUIDO[9]
 
 A FRAGMENT
 
      The god of day his car rolls up the slopes,
        Reining his prancing steeds with steady hand;
      The lingering moon through western shadows gropes,
        While morning sheds its light o'er sea and land.
 
      Castles and cities by the sounding main
        Resound with all the busy din of life;
      The fisherman unfurls his sails again;
        And the recruited warrior bides the strife.
 
      The early breeze ruffles the poplar leaves;
        The curling waves reflect the unseen light;
      The slumbering sea with the day's impulse heaves,
        While o'er the western hill retires the drowsy night.
 
      The seabirds dip their bills in Ocean's foam,
        Far circling out over the frothy waves,--
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 
 TO THE MAIDEN IN THE EAST[10]
 
      Low in the eastern sky
      Is set thy glancing eye;
      And though its gracious light
      Ne'er riseth to my sight,
      Yet every star that climbs
      Above the gnarled limbs
          Of yonder hill,
      Conveys thy gentle will.
 
      Believe I knew thy thought,
      And that the zephyrs brought
      Thy kindest wishes through,
      As mine they bear to you;
      That some attentive cloud
      Did pause amid the crowd
          Over my head,
      While gentle things were said.
 
      Believe the thrushes sung,
      And that the flower-bells rung,
      That herbs exhaled their scent,
      And beasts knew what was meant,
      The trees a welcome waved,
      And lakes their margins laved,
          When thy free mind
      To my retreat did wind.
 
      It was a summer eve,
      The air did gently heave
      While yet a low-hung cloud
      Thy eastern skies did shroud;
      The lightning's silent gleam,
      Startling my drowsy dream,
          Seemed like the flash
      Under thy dark eyelash.
 
      From yonder comes the sun,
      But soon his course is run,
      Rising to trivial day
      Along his dusty way;
      But thy noontide completes
      Only auroral heats,
          Nor ever sets,
      To hasten vain regrets.
 
      Direct thy pensive eye
      Into the western sky;
      And when the evening star
      Does glimmer from afar
      Upon the mountain line,
      Accept it for a sign
          That I am near,
      And thinking of thee here.
 
      I'll be thy Mercury,
      Thou Cytherea to me,
      Distinguished by thy face
      The earth shall learn my place;
      As near beneath thy light
      Will I outwear the night,
          With mingled ray
      Leading the westward way.
 
      Still will I strive to be
      As if thou wert with me;
      Whatever path I take,
      It shall be for thy sake,
      Of gentle slope and wide,
      As thou wert by my side,
          Without a root
      To trip thy gentle foot.
 
      I'll walk with gentle pace,
      And choose the smoothest place,
      And careful dip the oar,
      And shun the winding shore,
      And gently steer my boat
      Where water-lilies float,
          And cardinal-flowers
      Stand in their sylvan bowers.
 
 
 TO MY BROTHER
 
      Brother, where dost thou dwell?
        What sun shines for thee now?
      Dost thou indeed fare well,
        As we wished thee here below?
 
      What season didst thou find?
        'Twas winter here.
      Are not the Fates more kind
        Than they appear?
 
      Is thy brow clear again
        As in thy youthful years?
      And was that ugly pain
        The summit of thy fears?
 
      Yet thou wast cheery still;
        They could not quench thy fire;
      Thou didst abide their will,
        And then retire.
 
      Where chiefly shall I look
        To feel thy presence near?
      Along the neighboring brook
        May I thy voice still hear?
 
      Dost thou still haunt the brink
        Of yonder river's tide?
      And may I ever think
        That thou art by my side?
 
      What bird wilt thou employ
        To bring me word of thee?
      For it would give them joy--
        'T would give them liberty--
      To serve their former lord
        With wing and minstrelsy.
 
      A sadder strain mixed with their song,
        They've slowlier built their nests;
      Since thou art gone
        Their lively labor rests.
 
      Where is the finch, the thrush,
        I used to hear?
      Ah, they could well abide
        The dying year.
 
      Now they no more return,
        I hear them not;
      They have remained to mourn,
        Or else forgot.
 
 
 GREECE[11]
 
      When life contracts into a vulgar span,
      And human nature tires to be a man,
          I thank the gods for Greece,
          That permanent realm of peace.
      For as the rising moon far in the night
      Checkers the shade with her forerunning light,
      So in my darkest hour my senses seem
      To catch from her Acropolis a gleam.
 
      Greece, who am I that should remember thee,
      Thy Marathon and thy Thermopylae?
      Is my life vulgar, my fate mean,
      Which on such golden memories can lean?
 
 
 THE FUNERAL BELL
 
      One more is gone
      Out of the busy throng
        That tread these paths;
      The church-bell tolls,
      Its sad knell rolls
        To many hearths.
 
      Flower-bells toll not,
      Their echoes roll not
        Upon my ear;
      There still, perchance,
      That gentle spirit haunts
        A fragrant bier.
 
      Low lies the pall,
      Lowly the mourners all
        Their passage grope;
      No sable hue
      Mars the serene blue
        Of heaven's cope.
 
      In distant dell
      Faint sounds the funeral bell;
        A heavenly chime;
      Some poet there
      Weaves the light-burthened air
        Into sweet rhyme.
 
 
 THE MOON
 
      Time wears her not; she doth his chariot guide;
        Mortality below her orb is placed.
 
      RALEIGH.
 
      The full-orbed moon with unchanged ray
        Mounts up the eastern sky,
      Not doomed to these short nights for aye,
        But shining steadily.
 
      She does not wane, but my fortune,
        Which her rays do not bless;
      My wayward path declineth soon,
        But she shines not the less.
 
      And if she faintly glimmers here,
        And paled is her light,
      Yet alway in her proper sphere
        She's mistress of the night.
 
 
 THE FALL OF THE LEAF[12]
 
      Thank God who seasons thus the year,
        And sometimes kindly slants his rays;
      For in his winter he's most near
        And plainest seen upon the shortest days.
 
      Who gently tempers now his heats.
        And then his harsher cold, lest we
      Should surfeit on the summer's sweets,
        Or pine upon the winter's crudity.
 
      A sober mind will walk alone,
        Apart from nature, if need be,
      And only its own seasons own:
        For nature leaving its humanity.
 
      Sometimes a late autumnal thought
        Has crossed my mind in green July,
      And to its early freshness brought
        Late ripened fruits, and an autumnal sky.
 
      The evening of the year draws on,
        The fields a later aspect wear;
      Since Summer's garishness is gone,
        Some grains of night tincture the noontide air.
 
      Behold! the shadows of the trees
        Now circle wider 'bout their stem,
      Like sentries that by slow degrees
        Perform their rounds, gently protecting them.
 
      And as the year doth decline,
        The sun allows a scantier light;
      Behind each needle of the pine
        There lurks a small auxiliar to the night.
 
      I hear the cricket's slumbrous lay
        Around, beneath me, and on high;
      It rocks the night, it soothes the day,
        And everywhere is Nature's lullaby.
 
      But most he chirps beneath the sod,
        When he has made his winter bed;
      His creak grown fainter but more broad,
        A film of autumn o'er the summer spread.
 
      Small birds, in fleets migrating by,
        Now beat across some meadow's bay,
      And as they tack and veer on high,
        With faint and hurried click beguile the way.
 
      Far in the woods, these golden days,
        Some leaf obeys its Maker's call;
      And through their hollow aisles it plays
        With delicate touch the prelude of the Fall.
 
      Gently withdrawing from its stem,
        It lightly lays itself along
      Where the same hand hath pillowed them,
        Resigned to sleep upon the old year's throng.
 
      The loneliest birch is brown and sere,
        The farthest pool is strewn with leaves,
      Which float upon their watery bier,
        Where is no eye that sees, no heart that grieves.
 
      The jay screams through the chestnut wood;
        The crisped and yellow leaves around
      Are hue and texture of my mood,
        And these rough burs my heirlooms on the ground.
 
      The threadbare trees, so poor and thin,
        They are no wealthier than I;
      But with as brave a core within
        They rear their boughs to the October sky.
 
      Poor knights they are which bravely wait
        The charge of Winter's cavalry,
      Keeping a simple Roman state,
        Discumbered of their Persian luxury.
 
 
 THE THAW
 
      I saw the civil sun drying earth's tears,
      Her tears of joy that only faster flowed.[13]
 
      Fain would I stretch me by the highway-side
      To thaw and trickle with the melting snow;
      That mingled, soul and body, with the tide,
      I too may through the pores of nature flow.
 
 
 A WINTER SCENE[14]
 
      The rabbit leaps,
      The mouse out-creeps,
      The flag out-peeps
        Beside the brook;
      The ferret weeps,
      The marmot sleeps,
      The owlet keeps
        In his snug nook.
 
      The apples thaw,
      The ravens caw,
      The squirrels gnaw
        The frozen fruit.
      To their retreat
      I track the feet
      Of mice that eat
        The apple's root.
 
      The snow-dust falls,
      The otter crawls,
      The partridge calls,
        Far in the wood.
      The traveler dreams,
      The tree-ice gleams,
      The blue jay screams
        In angry mood.
 
      The willows droop,
      The alders stoop,
      The pheasants group
        Beneath the snow.
      The catkins green
      Cast o'er the scene
      A summer's sheen,
        A genial glow.
 
 
 TO A STRAY FOWL
 
          Poor bird! destined to lead thy life
            Far in the adventurous west,
          And here to be debarred to-night
            From thy accustomed nest;
      Must thou fall back upon old instinct now,
      Well-nigh extinct under man's fickle care?
      Did heaven bestow its quenchless inner light,
      So long ago, for thy small want to-night?
      Why stand'st upon thy toes to crow so late?
      The moon is deaf to thy low feathered fate;
      Or dost thou think so to possess the night,
      And people the drear dark with thy brave sprite?
      And now with anxious eye thou look'st about,
      While the relentless shade draws on its veil,
      For some sure shelter from approaching dews,
      And the insidious steps of nightly foes.
      I fear imprisonment has dulled thy wit,
      Or ingrained servitude extinguished it.
      But no; dim memory of the days of yore,
      By Brahmapootra and the Jumna's shore,
      Where thy proud race flew swiftly o'er the heath,
      And sought its food the jungle's shade beneath,
      Has taught thy wings to seek yon friendly trees,
      As erst by Indus' banks and far Ganges.
 
 
 POVERTY
 
 A FRAGMENT
 
                If I am poor,
            It is that I am proud;
      If God has made me naked and a boor,
        He did not think it fit his work to shroud.
 
      The poor man comes direct from heaven to earth,
        As stars drop down the sky, and tropic beams;
      The rich receives in our gross air his birth,
        As from low suns are slanted golden gleams.
 
      Yon sun is naked, bare of satellite,
        Unless our earth and moon that office hold;
      Though his perpetual day feareth no night,
        And his perennial summer dreads no cold.
 
      Mankind may delve, but cannot my wealth spend;
        If I no partial wealth appropriate,
      No armed ships unto the Indies send,
        None robs me of my Orient estate.
 
 
 PILGRIMS
 
      "Have you not seen,
      In ancient times,
      Pilgrims pass by
      Toward other climes,
      With shining faces,
      Youthful and strong,
      Mounting this hill
      With speech and with song?"
 
      "Ah, my good sir,
      I know not those ways;
      Little my knowledge,
      Tho' many my days.
      When I have slumbered,
      I have heard sounds
      As of travelers passing
      These my grounds.
 
      "'T was a sweet music
      Wafted them by,
      I could not tell
      If afar off or nigh.
      Unless I dreamed it,
      This was of yore:
      I never told it
      To mortal before,
      Never remembered
      But in my dreams
      What to me waking
      A miracle seems."
 
 
 THE DEPARTURE
 
      In this roadstead I have ridden,
      In this covert I have hidden;
      Friendly thoughts were cliffs to me,
      And I hid beneath their lee.
 
      This true people took the stranger,
      And warm-hearted housed the ranger;
      They received their roving guest,
      And have fed him with the best;
 
      Whatsoe'er the land afforded
      To the stranger's wish accorded;
      Shook the olive, stripped the vine,
      And expressed the strengthening wine.
 
      And by night they did spread o'er him
      What by day they spread before him;--
      That good-will which was repast
      Was his covering at last.
 
      The stranger moored him to their pier
      Without anxiety or fear;
      By day he walked the sloping land,
      By night the gentle heavens he scanned.
 
      When first his bark stood inland
      To the coast of that far Finland,
      Sweet-watered brooks came tumbling to the shore
      The weary mariner to restore.
 
      And still he stayed from day to day
      If he their kindness might repay;
          But more and more
      The sullen waves came rolling toward the shore.
 
      And still the more the stranger waited,
      The less his argosy was freighted,
      And still the more he stayed,
      The less his debt was paid.
 
      So he unfurled his shrouded mast
      To receive the fragrant blast;
      And that sane refreshing gale
      Which had wooed him to remain
          Again and again,
      It was that filled his sail
        And drove him to the main.
 
      All day the low-hung clouds
        Dropt tears into the sea;
      And the wind amid the shrouds
        Sighed plaintively.
 
 
 INDEPENDENCE[15]
 
      My life more civil is and free
        Than any civil polity.
 
      Ye princes, keep your realms
        And circumscribed power,
      Not wide as are my dreams,
        Nor rich as is this hour.
 
      What can ye give which I have not?
      What can ye take which I have got?
        Can ye defend the dangerless?
        Can ye inherit nakedness?
 
      To all true wants Time's ear is deaf,
      Penurious states lend no relief
          Out of their pelf:
        But a free soul--thank God--
          Can help itself.
 
        Be sure your fate
      Doth keep apart its state,
      Not linked with any band,
      Even the noblest of the land;
 
      In tented fields with cloth of gold
        No place doth hold,
      But is more chivalrous than they are,
      And sigheth for a nobler war;
      A finer strain its trumpet sings,
      A brighter gleam its armor flings.
 
      The life that I aspire to live
        No man proposeth me;
      No trade upon the street[16]
        Wears its emblazonry.
 
 
 DING DONG[17]
 
      When the world grows old by the chimney-side
      Then forth to the youngling nooks I glide,
      Where over the water and over the land
      The bells are booming on either hand.
 
      Now up they go ding, then down again dong,
      And awhile they ring to the same old song,
      For the metal goes round at a single bound,
      A-cutting the fields with its measured sound,
      While the tired tongue falls with a lengthened boom
      As solemn and loud as the crack of doom.
 
      Then changed is their measure to tone upon tone,
      And seldom it is that one sound comes alone,
      For they ring out their peals in a mingled throng,
      And the breezes waft the loud ding-dong along.
 
      When the echo hath reached me in this lone vale,
      I am straightway a hero in coat of mail,
      I tug at my belt and I march on my post,
      And feel myself more than a match for a host.
 
 
 OMNIPRESENCE
 
      Who equaleth the coward's haste,
      And still inspires the faintest heart;
      Whose lofty fame is not disgraced,
      Though it assume the lowest part.
 
 
 INSPIRATION
 
      If thou wilt but stand by my ear,
      When through the field thy anthem's rung,
      When that is done I will not fear
      But the same power will abet my tongue.
 
 
 MISSION
 
      I've searched my faculties around,
      To learn why life to me was lent:
      I will attend the faintest sound,
      And then declare to man what God hath meant.
 
 
 DELAY
 
      No generous action can delay
      Or thwart our higher, steadier aims;
      But if sincere and true are they,
      It will arouse our sight, and nerve our frames.
 
 
 PRAYER
 
      Great God! I ask thee for no meaner pelf
      Than that I may not disappoint myself;
      That in my action I may soar as high
      As I can now discern with this clear eye;
 
      And next in value, which thy kindness lends,
      That I may greatly disappoint my friends,
      Howe'er they think or hope it that may be,
      They may not dream how thou 'st distinguished me;
 
      That my weak hand may equal my firm faith,
      And my life practice more than my tongue saith;
        That my low conduct may not show,
        Nor my relenting lines,
        That I thy purpose did not know,
        Or overrated thy designs.
 
 
 FOOTNOTES:
 
 [8] [Eighteen lines of this poem appear in _Week_, pp. 181, 182, 351,
 372.]
 
 [9] ["Suggested by the print of Guido's 'Aurora' sent by Mrs. Carlyle
 as a wedding gift to Mrs. Emerson." (Note in _Poems of Nature_.)]
 
 [10] [Five stanzas of this poem appear in _Week_, pp. 46, 47.]
 
 [11] [The last four lines appear in _Week_, p. 54.]
 
 [12] ["The first four of these stanzas (unnamed by Thoreau) were
 published in the Boston _Commonwealth_ in 1863, under the title of
 'The Soul's Season,' the remainder as 'The Fall of the Leaf.' There
 can be little doubt that they are parts of one complete poem." (Note
 in _Poems of Nature_.)]
 
 [13] [See p. 120.]
 
 [14] ["These stanzas formed part of the original manuscript of the
 essay on 'A Winter Walk,' but were excluded by Emerson." (Note in
 _Poems of Nature_.)]
 
 [15] ["First printed in full in the Boston _Commonwealth_, October 30,
 1863. The last fourteen lines had appeared in _The Dial_ under the
 title of 'The Black Knight,' and are so reprinted in the Riverside
 Edition." (Note in _Poems of Nature_.)]
 
 [16] [In _The Dial_ this line reads, "Only the promise of my heart."]
 
 [17] ["A copy of this hitherto unpublished poem has been kindly
 furnished by Miss A. J. Ward." (Note in _Poems of Nature_.)]
 
 
 
 
 A LIST OF THE POEMS AND BITS OF VERSE SCATTERED AMONG THOREAU'S PROSE
 WRITINGS EXCLUSIVE OF THE JOURNAL
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 A WEEK ON THE CONCORD AND MERRIMACK RIVERS
 
      "The respectable folks"                                    PAGE 7
 
      "Ah, 't is in vain the peaceful din"                           15
 
      "But since we sailed"                                          16
 
      "Here then an aged shepherd dwelt"                             16
 
      "On Ponkawtasset, since we took our way"                       16
 
      "Who sleeps by day and walks by night"                         41
 
      "An early unconverted Saint"                                   42
 
      "Low in the eastern sky" (TO THE MAIDEN IN THE EAST)           46
 
      "Dong, sounds the brass in the East"                           50
 
      "Greece, who am I that should remember thee"                   54
 
      "Some tumultuous little rill"                                  62
 
      "I make ye an offer"                                           69
 
      "Conscience is instinct bred in the house" (CONSCIENCE)        75
 
      "Such water do the gods distill"                               86
 
      "That Phaeton of our day"                                     103
 
      "Then spend an age in whetting thy desire"                    111
 
      "Though all the fates should prove unkind"                    151
 
      "With frontier strength ye stand your ground" (MOUNTAINS)     170
 
      "The western wind came lumbering in"                          180
 
      "Then idle Time ran gadding by"                               181
 
      "Now chiefly is my natal hour"                                182
 
      RUMORS FROM AN AEOLIAN HARP                                   184
 
      "Away! away! away! away!"                                     186
 
      "Ply the oars! away! away!" (RIVER SONG, part)                188
 
      "Since that first 'Away! away!'" (RIVER SONG, part)           200
 
      "Low-anchored cloud" (MIST)                                   201
 
      "Man's little acts are grand"                                 224
 
      "Our uninquiring corpses lie more low"                        227
 
      "The waves slowly beat"                                       229
 
      "Woof of the sun, ethereal gauze" (HAZE)                      229
 
      "Where gleaming fields of haze"                               234
 
      TRANSLATIONS FROM ANACREON                                    240
 
      "Thus, perchance, the Indian hunter" (BOAT SONG)              247
 
      "My life is like a stroll upon the beach" (THE FISHER'S BOY)  255
 
      "This is my Carnac, whose unmeasured dome"                    267
 
      "True kindness is a pure divine affinity"                     275
 
      "Lately, alas, I knew a gentle boy" (SYMPATHY)                276
 
      THE ATLANTIDES                                                278
 
      "My love must be as free" (FREE LOVE)                         297
 
      "The Good how can we trust?"                                  298
 
      "Nature doth have her dawn each day"                          302
 
      "Let such pure hate still underprop" (FRIENDSHIP)             305
 
      "Men are by birth equal in this, that given"                  311
 
      The Inward Morning                                            313
 
      "My books I'd fain cast off, I cannot read" (THE SUMMER RAIN) 320
 
      "My life has been the poem I would have writ"                 365
 
      THE POET'S DELAY                                              366
 
      "I hearing get, who had but ears"                             372
 
      "Men dig and dive but cannot my wealth spend"                 373
 
      "Salmon Brook"                                                375
 
      "Oft, as I turn me on my pillow o'er"                         384
 
      "I am the autumnal sun" (NATURE'S CHILD)                      404
 
      "A finer race and finer fed"                                  407
 
      "I am a parcel of vain strivings tied" (SIC VITA)             410
 
      "All things are current found"                                415
 
 
 WALDEN
 
      "Men say they know many things"                                46
 
      "What's the railroad to me?"                                  135
 
      "It is no dream of mine"                                      215
 
      "Light-winged Smoke, Icarian bird" (SMOKE)                    279
 
 
 THE MAINE WOODS
 
      "Die and be buried who will"                                   88
 
 
 EXCURSIONS
 
      "Within the circuit of this plodding life" (WINTER MEMORIES)  103
 
      "We pronounce thee happy, Cicada" (from Anacreon)             108
 
      "His steady sails he never furls"                             109
 
      RETURN OF SPRING (from Anacreon)                              109
 
      "Each summer sound"                                           112
 
      "Sometimes I hear the veery's clarion"                        112
 
      "Upon the lofty elm tree sprays" (THE VIREO)                  112
 
      "Thou dusky spirit of the wood" (THE CROW)                    113
 
      "I see the civil sun drying earth's tears" (THE THAW, part)   120
 
      "The river swelleth more and more" (A RIVER SCENE)            120
 
      "The needles of the pine"                                     133
 
      "With frontier strength ye stand your ground" (MOUNTAINS)     133
 
      "Not unconcerned Wachusett rears his head"                    144
 
      "The sluggish smoke curls up from some deep dell" (SMOKE
        IN WINTER)                                                  165
 
      "When Winter fringes every bough" (STANZAS WRITTEN AT
        WALDEN)                                                     176
 
      THE OLD MARLBOROUGH ROAD                                      214
 
      "In two years' time 't had thus"                              303
 
 
 
 
 INDEX
 
 
      Achilles, The Youth of, translation, 385.
 
      Acre, an, as long measure, 60.
 
      Acton (Mass.), 136.
 
      Aeschylus, The Prometheus Bound of, translation, 337-375.
 
      Aesculapius, translation, 380.
 
      Agriculture, the task of Americans, 229-231.
 
      Ajax, The Treatment of, translation, 387.
 
      Alphonse, Jean, and Falls of Montmorenci, 38, 39;
        quoted, 91.
 
      America, superiorities of, 220-224.
 
      American, money in Quebec, 24;
        the, and government, 82, 83.
 
      Amphiaraus, The Death of, translation, 387.
 
      Anacreon, quoted, 108, 109, 110.
 
      Andropogons, or beard-grasses, 225-258.
 
      Ange Gardien Parish, 42;
        church of, 46.
 
      Angler's Souvenir, the, 119.
 
      Apollo, translation, 383.
 
      Apple, history of the tree, 290-298;
        the wild, 299, 300;
        the crab-, 301, 302;
        growth of the wild, 302-308;
        cropped by cattle, 303-307;
        the fruit and flavor of the, 308-314;
        beauty of the, 314, 315;
        naming of the, 315-317;
        last gleaning of the, 317-319;
        the frozen-thawed, 319, 320;
        dying out of the wild, 321, 322.
 
      Apple-howling, 298.
 
      Arpent, the, 60.
 
      Ashburnham (Mass.), 3;
        with a better house than any in Canada, 100.
 
      Ash trees, 6.
 
      Assabet, the, 136.
 
      Audubon, John James, reading, 103; 109, note; 112, note.
 
      Aurora of Guido, The, verse, 399.
 
      Autumn foliage, brightness of, 249-252.
 
      AUTUMNAL TINTS, 249-289.
 
 
      Bartram, William, quoted, 199.
 
      Bathing feet in brooks, 140.
 
      Beard-grasses, andropogons or, 255-258.
 
      Beauport (Que.), and _le Chemin de_, 30;
        getting lodgings in, 35-38;
        church in, 69;
        Seigniory of, 96.
 
      Beaupre, Seigniory of the Cote de, 41.
 
      "Behold, how spring appearing," verse, 109.
 
      Bellows Falls (Vt.), 5.
 
      Birch, yellow, 6.
 
      Birds and mountains, 149.
 
      Bittern, booming of the, 111.
 
      Black Knight, The, verse, 415, note.
 
      Blueberries, and milk, supper of, 144.
 
      Bluebird, the, 110.
 
      Bobolink, the, 113.
 
      Bodaeus, quoted, 317.
 
      Bolton (Mass.), 137.
 
      Bonsecours Market (Montreal), 11.
 
      Books on natural history, reading, 103-105.
 
      Boots, Canadian, 51.
 
      Boston (Mass.), 3, 7, 9.
 
      Boucher, quoted, 91.
 
      Boucherville (Que.), 20.
 
      Bouchette, Topographical Description of the Canadas, quoted, 41,
        42, 63, 64, 89, 92, 94, 95.
 
      Bout de l'Isle, 20.
 
      Brand's Popular Antiquities quoted, 297, 298.
 
      Bravery of science, the, 106, 107.
 
      "Brother, where dost thou dwell?" verse, 403.
 
      Burlington (Vt.), 7, 99.
 
      Burton, Sir Richard Francis, 228.
 
      Butternut tree, 6.
 
 
      Cabs, Montreal, 18;
        Quebec, 69, 70.
 
      Caddis-worms, 170.
 
      Caen, Emery de, quoted, 52.
 
      Caleche, the (see Cabs), 69, 70.
 
      Canada, apparently older than the United States, 80, 81;
        population of, 81, 82;
        the French in, a nation of peasants, 82.
 
      _Canadense_, _Iter_, and the word, 101.
 
      Canadian, French, 9;
        horses, 34;
        women, 34;
        atmosphere, 34;
        love of neighborhood, 42, 43;
        houses, 44, 59;
        clothes, 45;
        salutations, 47;
        vegetables and trees, 47, 48;
        boots, 51;
        tenures, 63, 64.
 
      Cane, a straight and a twisted, 184, 185.
 
      Cap aux Oyes, 93.
 
      Cape Diamond, 22, 40;
        signal-gun on, 85;
        the view from, 88.
 
      Cape Rosier, 92.
 
      Cape Rouge, 21, 95.
 
      Cape Tourmente, 41, 89, 96.
 
      Cartier, Jacques, 7, and the St. Lawrence, 89-91;
        quoted, 97, 98, 99.
 
      Castor and Pollux, translation, 388.
 
      Cattle-show, men at, 184.
 
      Cemetery of fallen leaves, 269, 270.
 
      Chaleurs, the Bay of, 90.
 
      Chalmers, Dr., in criticism of Coleridge, 324.
 
      Chambly (Que.), 11.
 
      Champlain, Samuel, quoted, 8;
        whales in map of, 91.
 
      Charlevoix, quoted, 52, 91.
 
      Chateau Richer, church of, 46, 49;
        lodgings at, 59.
 
      Chaucer, quoted, 159, 160.
 
      Chaudiere River, the, 21;
        Falls of the, 69, 70.
 
      Cheap men, 29, 30.
 
      Cherry-stones, transported by birds, 188.
 
      Chickadee, the, 108.
 
      Chien, La Riviere au, 56.
 
      Churches, Catholic and Protestant, 12-14;
        roadside, 46.
 
      _Claire Fontaine, La_, 26.
 
      Clothes, bad-weather, 28;
        Canadian, 45.
 
      Colors, names and joy of, 273-275.
 
      Concord (Mass.), 3, 6, 8;
        History of, quoted, 115, 133, 149, 152.
 
      Concord River, the, 115, 139.
 
      Connecticut River, 5, 145, 147.
 
      _Coureurs de bois_, and _de risques_, 43.
 
      Crickets, the creaking of, 108.
 
      Crookneck squash seeds, Quebec, 87.
 
      Crosses, roadside, 45, 46.
 
      Crow, the, 108;
        not imported from Europe, 113.
 
      Crystalline botany, 126, 127.
 
      Culm, bloom in the, 253.
 
 
      Darby, William, quoted, 93, 94.
 
      Delay, verse, 418.
 
      Departure, The, verse, 414.
 
      Ding Dong, verse, 417.
 
      Dogs in harness, 30.
 
      Drake, Sir Francis, quoted, 325.
 
      Dubartas, quoted, translation of Sylvester, 328, 329.
 
      Ducks, 110.
 
 
      "Each summer sound," verse, 112.
 
      East Main, Labrador and, health in the words, 104.
 
      Easterbrooks Country, the, 299, 303.
 
      Edda, the Prose, quoted, 291.
 
      Eggs, a master in cooking, 61, 62.
 
      Elm, the, 263, 264, 276.
 
      Elysium, translation, 375.
 
      Emerson, George B., quoted, 200.
 
      English and French in the New World, 66, 67.
 
      Entomology, the study of, 107, 108.
 
      Evelyn, John, quoted, 310, 311.
 
      _Ex Oriente Lux; ex Occidente Frux_, 221.
 
      Experiences, the paucity of men's, 241, 242.
 
      Eyes, the sight of different men's 285-288.
 
 
      Fall of the Leaf, The, verse, 407.
 
      Fallen Leaves, 264-270.
 
      Falls, a drug of, 58.
 
      Fame, translation, 378.
 
      Fish, spearing, 119, 121-123.
 
      Fisher, the pickerel, 180, 181.
 
      Fishes, described in Massachusetts Report, 118.
 
      Fitchburg (Mass.), 3.
 
      Fitzwilliam (N. H.), 4.
 
      Foreign country, quickly in a, 31.
 
      Forests, nations preserved by, 229.
 
      Fortifications, ancient and modern, 77, 78.
 
      Fox, the, 117.
 
      French, difficulties in talking, 35-37, 47;
        strange, 50;
        pure, 52;
        in the New World, English and, 66-68;
        in Canada, 81, 82;
        the, spoken in Quebec streets, 86, 87.
 
      Friends, The Value of, translation, 387.
 
      Froissart, good place to read, 23.
 
      Frost-smoke, 166.
 
      Funeral Bell, The, verse, 405.
 
      Fur Countries, inspiring neighborhood of the, 105.
 
 
      Garget, poke or, 253-255.
 
      Geese, first flock of, 110.
 
      Gesner, Konrad von, quoted, 318.
 
      Gosse, P. A., Canadian Naturalist, 91.
 
      Great Brook, 137.
 
      Great Fields, the, 257.
 
      "Great God! I ask thee for no meaner pelf," verse, 418.
 
      Great River, the, or St. Lawrence, 89, 90, 91, 92.
 
      Greece, verse, 404.
 
      Greece, The Freedom of, translation, 390.
 
      Green Mountains, the, 6, 100, 145, 147.
 
      Grey, the traveler, quoted, 94.
 
      Grippling for apples, 309.
 
      Gulls, 110.
 
      Guyot, Arnold, 93;
        quoted, 93, 94, 220, 221.
 
 
      Harvard (Mass.), 151, 152.
 
      "Have you not seen," verse, 413.
 
      Hawk, fish, 110.
 
      Head, Sir Francis, quoted, 47, 221, 222.
 
      Height of Glory, The, translation,384.
 
      Hercules, names the Hill of Kronos, translation, 377.
 
      Hercules' Prayer concerning Ajax, son of Telamon, translation,
        390.
 
      Herrick, Robert, 298.
 
      Hickory, the, 264, 265.
 
      Highlanders in Quebec, 25-27, 28, 29, 79.
 
      "His steady sails he never furls," verse, 109.
 
      Hoar-frost, 126, 127.
 
      Hochelaga, 89, 97, 99.
 
      Homer, quoted, 181.
 
      Hoosac Mountains, 147.
 
      Hop, culture of the, 136, 137.
 
      Horses, Canadian, 34.
 
      _Hortus siccus_, nature in winter a, 179.
 
      House, the perfect, 153.
 
      Houses, Canadian, 44, 59;
        American compared with Canadian, 100.
 
      Humboldt, Alexander von, 92, 93.
 
      Hunt House, the old, 201.
 
      Hypseus' Daughter Cyrene, translation, 383.
 
 
      "I saw the civil sun drying earth's tears," verse, 409.
 
      "I see the civil sun drying earth's tears," verse, 120.
 
      Ice, the booming of, 176.
 
      Ice formations in a river-bank, 128, 129.
 
      "If I am poor," verse, 412.
 
      "If thou wilt but stand by my ear," verse, 418.
 
      "If with light head erect I sing," verse, 396.
 
      Ignorance, Society for the Diffusion of Useful, 239.
 
      Imitations of Charette drivers, Yankee, 99.
 
      "In this roadstead I have ridden," verse, 414.
 
      "In two years' time 't had thus," verse, 303.
 
      Independence, verse, 415.
 
      Indoors, living, 207-209.
 
      Inn, inscription on wall of Swedish, 141.
 
      Inspiration, quatrain, 418.
 
      Inspiration, verse, 396.
 
      Invertebrate Animals, Report on, quoted, 129.
 
      "I've searched my faculties around," verse, 418.
 
 
      Jay, the, 108, 199.
 
      Jesuit Relations, quoted, 96.
 
      Jesuits' Barracks, the, in Quebec, 24.
 
      Joel, the prophet, quoted, 322.
 
      Jonson, Ben, quoted, 226.
 
      Josselyn, John, quoted, 2.
 
 
      Kalm, Swedish traveler, quoted, 21, 30, 39, 65;
        on sea-plants near Quebec, 93.
 
      Keene (N. H.) Street, 4;
        heads like, 4.
 
      Kent, the Duke of, property of, 38.
 
      Killington Peak, 6.
 
      Knowledge, the slow growth of, 181;
        Society for the Diffusion of Useful, 239;
        true, 240.
 
 
      Labrador and East Main, health in the words, 104.
 
      Lake, a woodland, in winter, 174, 175.
 
      Lake Champlain, 6-8.
 
      Lake St. Peter, 96, 97.
 
      Lalement, Hierosme, quoted, 22.
 
      Lancaster (Mass.), 138, 139, 149.
 
      LANDLORD, THE, 153-162.
 
      Landlord, qualities of the, 153-162.
 
      La Prairie (Que.), 11, 18, 99.
 
      Lark, the, 109, 110.
 
      Lead, rain of, 26.
 
      Leaves, fallen, 264-270;
        scarlet oak, 278-281.
 
      Lincoln (Mass.), 282, 283.
 
      Linnaeus, quoted, 222.
 
      Longueuil (Que.), 20.
 
      Loudon, John Claudius, quoted, 197, 200, 291, 292, 310.
 
      "Low in the eastern sky," verse, 400.
 
 
      McCulloch's Geographical Dictionary, quoted, 49.
 
      McTaggart, John, quoted, 94.
 
      MacTavish, Simon, 98.
 
      Man, translation, 383.
 
      Man, The Divine in, translation, 386.
 
      Map, drawing, on kitchen table, 60;
        of Canada, inspecting a, 95.
 
      Maple, the red and sugar, 6;
        the red, 258-263, 265;
        the sugar, 261, 271-278.
 
      Maranon, the river, 93.
 
      Marlborough (Mass.), 214.
 
      Merrimack River, the, 147.
 
      Michaux, Andre, quoted, 269.
 
      Michaux, Francois Andre, quoted, 220, 261, 301.
 
      Midnight, exploring the, 323.
 
      Miller, a crabbed, 69.
 
      Milne, Alexander, quoted, 193, 194.
 
      Mississippi, discovery of the, 90;
        extent of the, 93;
        a panorama of the, 224.
 
      Mission, verse, 418.
 
      Monadnock, 4, 143, 145, 147.
 
      Montcalm, Wolfe and, monument to, 73, 74.
 
      Montmorenci County, 62;
        the habitans of, 64-68.
 
      Montmorenci, Falls of, 29, 37-39.
 
      Montreal (Que.), 9, 11;
        described, 14-16;
        the mixed population of, 17, 18;
        from Quebec to, 96, 97;
        and its surroundings, beautiful view of, 98;
        the name of, 98.
 
      Moon, The, verse, 406.
 
      MOONLIGHT, NIGHT AND, 323-333.
 
      Moonlight, reading by, 145.
 
      Moonshine, 324, 325.
 
      Moore, Thomas, 98.
 
      Morning, winter, early, 163-166.
 
      Morton, Thomas, 2.
 
      Mount Royal (Montreal), 11.
 
      Mountains, the use of, 148, 149;
        and plain, influence of the, 150, 151.
 
      Muse, The Venality of the, translation, 389.
 
      Musketaquid, Prairie, or Concord River, 115.
 
      Muskrat, the, 114-117.
 
      Mussel, the, 129.
 
      "My life more civil is and free," verse, 415.
 
 
      Names, poetry in, 20;
        of places, French, 56, 57;
        men's, 236, 237;
        of colors, 273, 274.
 
      NATURAL HISTORY OF MASSACHUSETTS, 103-131.
 
      Natural history, reading books of, 103, 105.
 
      Nature, health to be found in, 105;
        man's work the most natural, compared with that of, 119;
        the hand of, upon her children, 124, 125;
        different methods of work, 125;
        the civilized look of, 141;
        the winter purity of, 167;
        a _hortus siccus_ in, 179;
        men's relation to, 241, 242.
 
      Nature, verse, 395.
 
      Nawshawtuct Hill, 384.
 
      New things to be seen near home, 211, 212.
 
      Niebuhr, Barthold Georg, quoted, 290.
 
      Niepce, Joseph Nicephore, quoted, 238.
 
      NIGHT AND MOONLIGHT, 323-333.
 
      Night, on Wachusett, 146;
        the senses in the, 327, 328.
 
      "No generous action can delay," verse, 418.
 
      Nobscot Hill, 303, 304.
 
      Norumbega, 90.
 
      "Not unconcerned Wachusett rears his head," verse, 144.
 
      Notre Dame (Montreal), 11;
        a visit to, 12-14.
 
      Notre Dame des Anges, Seigniory of, 96.
 
      Nurse-plants, 193.
 
      Nuthatch, the, 108.
 
      Nuttall, Thomas, quoted, 111, 112.
 
 
      Oak, succeeding pine, and _vice versa_, 185, 187, 189;
        the scarlet, 278-281;
        leaves, scarlet, 278-280.
 
      Ogilby, America of 1670, quoted, 91.
 
      Old Marlborough Road, The, verse, 214.
 
      Olympia at Evening, translation, 378.
 
      Omnipresence, verse, 417.
 
      "O Nature! I do not aspire," verse, 395.
 
      "One more is gone," verse, 405.
 
      Origin of Rhodes, translation, 376.
 
      Orinoco, the river, 93.
 
      Orleans, Isle of, 41, 42.
 
      Orsinora, 90.
 
      Ortelius, _Theatrum Orbis Terrarum_, 89.
 
      Ossian, quoted, 332.
 
      Ottawa River, the, 41, 94, 98.
 
      _Oui_, the repeated, 60.
 
 
      Palladius, quoted, 294, 308.
 
      Patent office, seeds sent by the, 203.
 
      Peleus and Cadmus, translation, 381.
 
      Penobscot Indians, use of muskrat-skins by, 116, 117.
 
      Perch, the, 123.
 
      Phoebe, the, 112.
 
      Pickerel-fisher, the, 180, 181.
 
      Pies, no, in Quebec, 86.
 
      Pilgrims, verse, 413.
 
      _Pinbena_, the, 48.
 
      Pindar, Translations from, 375.
 
      Pine, oak succeeding, and _vice versa_, 185, 187, 189;
        family, a, 243, 244.
 
      Pine cone, stripped by squirrels, 196.
 
      Plain and mountain, life of the, 151.
 
      Plants on Cape Diamond, Quebec, 27.
 
      Plicipennes, 170.
 
      Pliny, the Elder, quoted, 292.
 
      Plover, the, 112.
 
      Plum, beach, 201.
 
      POEMS, 393-419.
 
      Point Levi, by ferry to, 70;
        a night at, 71; 89.
 
      Pointe aux Trembles, 20, 21.
 
      Poke, or garget, the, 253-255.
 
      _Pommettes_, 39.
 
      "Poor bird! destined to lead thy life," verse, 411.
 
      Potherie, quoted, 52.
 
      Poverty, verse, 412.
 
      Prairie River, Musketaquid or, 115.
 
      Prayer, verse, 418.
 
      Prometheus Bound of Aeschylus, The, translation, 337.
 
      Purana, the, quoted, 327.
 
      Purple Grasses, The, 252-258.
 
 
      Quail, a white, 109, note.
 
      Quebec (Que.), 3, 20, 21;
        approach to, 22;
        harbor and population of, 22;
        mediaevalism of, 23, 26;
        the citadel, 27-30, 76-80;
        fine view of, 49;
        reentering, through St. John's Gate, 69;
        lights in the lower town, 71;
        landing again at, 72;
        walk round the Upper Town, 72-76;
        the walls and gates, 74, 75;
        artillery barracks, 75;
        mounted guns, 76;
        restaurants, 85, 86;
        scenery of, 87-89;
        origin of word, 88;
        departure from, 95.
 
 
      Rainbow in Falls of the Chaudiere, 70, 71.
 
      Raleigh, Sir Walter, quoted, 329.
 
      Reports on the natural history of Massachusetts, 103, 114, 118,
        123, 129, 130.
 
      Return of Spring, verse, 109.
 
      Rhexia, 252.
 
      Richelieu, Isles of, 96.
 
      Richelieu or St. John's River, 8.
 
      Richelieu Rapids, the, 21.
 
      Richter, Jean Paul, quoted, 330, 331.
 
      River, the flow of a, 178.
 
      River-bank, ice formations in a, 128, 129.
 
      Riviere du Sud, the, 92.
 
      Riviere more meandering than River, 56.
 
      Roberval, Sieur de, 95, 96.
 
      Robin, the, 109;
        a white, 109, note.
 
      Robin Hood Ballads, quoted, 150, 207.
 
      Rowlandson, Mrs., 149.
 
 
      St. Anne, the Falls of, 40;
        Church of _La Bonne_, 49;
        lodgings in village of, 49-51;
        interior of the church of _La Bonne_, 51, 52;
        Falls of, described, 52-55.
 
      St. Charles River, the, 30.
 
      St. Helen's Island (Montreal), 11.
 
      St. John's (Que.), 9, 10.
 
      St. John's River, 8.
 
      St. Lawrence River, 11;
        cottages along the, 21;
        banks of the, above Quebec, 40, 41;
        breadth of, 49;
        or Great River, 89-95;
        old maps of, 89, 90, 92;
        compared with other rivers, 90, 92-95.
 
      St. Maurice River, 94.
 
      Saguenay River, 91, 94.
 
      Salutations, Canadian, 47.
 
      Sault a la Puce, Riviere du, 48, 58.
 
      Sault Norman, 11.
 
      Sault St. Louis, 11.
 
      Saunter, derivation of the word, 205, 206.
 
      Scarlet Oak, The, 278-285.
 
      Schoolhouse, a Canadian, 46.
 
      Science, the bravery of, 106, 107.
 
      Scotchman dissatisfied with Canada, a, 75.
 
      Scriptures, Hebrew, inadequacy of regarding winter, 183.
 
      Sea-plants near Quebec, 93.
 
      Seeds, the transportation of, by wind, 186, 187;
        by birds, 187-189;
        by squirrels, 190-200;
        the vitality of, 200-203.
 
      Seeing, individual, 285-288.
 
      Selenites, 323.
 
      Sign language, 61.
 
      Sillery (Que.), 22.
 
      Silliman, Benjamin, quoted, 98.
 
      Skating, 177, 178.
 
      Smoke, winter morning, 165;
        seen from a hilltop, 173, 174.
 
      Snake, the, 123, 124.
 
      Snipe-shooting grounds, 48.
 
      Snow, 181, 182;
        not recognized in Hebrew Scriptures, 183.
 
      Snowbird, the, 109.
 
      Society, health not to be found in, 105.
 
      Soldiers, English, in Canada, 9, 10, 16, 17;
        in Quebec, 24-27, 79, 80.
 
      Solomon, quoted, 291.
 
      "Sometimes I hear the veery's clarion," verse, 112.
 
      Sounds, winter morning, 163, 164.
 
      Sorel River, 8.
 
      Sparrow, the song, 109.
 
      Spaulding's farm, 243.
 
      Spearing fish, 121-123.
 
      Speech, country, 137.
 
      Spring, on the Concord River, 119-121.
 
      Squash, the large yellow, 203.
 
      Squirrel, a red, burying nuts, 190, 191;
        with nuts under snow, 195;
        pine cones stripped by the, 196;
        with filled cheek-pouches, 198.
 
      Stars, the, 328, 329.
 
      Stillriver Village (Mass.), 151.
 
      Stillwater, the, 140, 142.
 
      Stow (Mass.), 136.
 
      SUCCESSION OF FOREST TREES, THE, 184-204.
 
      Sudbury (Mass.), 303.
 
      Sugar Maple, The, 271-278.
 
      Sunset, a remarkable, 246-248.
 
 
      Tamias, the steward squirrel, 198.
 
      Tavern, the gods' interest in the, 153;
        compared with the church, the, 161, 162.
 
      Tenures, Canadian, 63.
 
      "Thank God, who seasons thus the year," verse, 407.
 
      Thaw, The, verse, 409.
 
      "The full-orbed moon with unchanged ray," verse, 406.
 
      "The god of day his car rolls up the slopes," verse, 399.
 
      "The needles of the pine," verse, 133.
 
      "The rabbit leaps," verse, 410.
 
      "The river swelleth more and more," verse, 120.
 
      "The sluggish smoke curls up from some deep dell," verse, 165.
 
      Theophrastus, 292.
 
      Thomson, James, quoted, 249.
 
      Thoreau, Henry David, leaves Concord for Canada, 25th September,
          1850, 3;
        traveling outfit of, 31-34;
        leaves Quebec for Montreal on return trip, 95;
        leaves Montreal for Boston, 99;
        total expense of Canada excursion, 100, 101;
        walk from Concord to Wachusett and back, 133-152;
        observation of a red squirrel, 190, 191;
        experience with government squash-seed, 203.
 
      "Thou dusky spirit of the wood," verse, 113.
 
      Three Rivers (Que.), 21, 93.
 
      Three-o'clock courage, 208, 209.
 
      To a Stray Fowl, verse, 411.
 
      To Aristoclides, Victor at the Nemean Games, translation, 384.
 
      To Asopichus, or Orchomenos, on his Victory in the Stadic Course,
        translation, 378.
 
      To My Brother, verse, 403.
 
      To the Maiden in the East, verse, 400.
 
      To the Lyre, translation, 379.
 
      Toil, translation, 389.
 
      TRANSLATIONS, 337-392.
 
      Translations from Pindar, 375-392.
 
      Trappers, 115.
 
      Traverse, the, 92.
 
      Traveling outfit, the best, 31-34.
 
      Trees, Canadian, 48;
        the suggestions of, 125;
        the natural planting of, 186-202;
        a town's need of, 272-278;
        for seasons, 276.
 
      Tree-tops, things seen and found on, 245, 246.
 
      Troy (N. H.), 4.
 
      Turtle, the snapping, 124.
 
 
      "Upon the lofty elm tree sprays," verse, 112.
 
 
      Val Cartier (Que.), 89.
 
      Varennes, the church of, 97, 98.
 
      Veery, the, 112.
 
      Vegetation, the type of all growth, 128.
 
      Vergennes (Vt.), 7.
 
      Village, a continuous, 42, 43;
        the, 213;
        trees in a, 275-278.
 
      Virgil, reading, 138, 143, 144.
 
 
      Wachusett, a view of, 138;
        range, the, 139;
        ascent of, 142;
        birds or vegetation on summit of, 143;
        night on, 145, 146;
        an observatory, 147.
 
      Walls, Quebec and other, 74.
 
      WALK TO WACHUSETT, A, 133-152.
 
      Walkers, the order of, 206, 207.
 
      WALKING, 205-248.
 
      Walks, not on beaten paths, 213, 214;
        the direction of, 216-219;
        adventurous, 285;
        by night, 326.
 
      Watatic, 137, 147.
 
      "We pronounce thee happy, Cicada," verse, 108.
 
      West, walking towards the, 217-220;
        general tendency towards the, 219-224.
 
      Westmoreland, etymology of, 6.
 
      Whales in the St. Lawrence, 91.
 
      "Whate'er we leave to God, God does," verse, 396.
 
      "When life contracts into a vulgar span," verse, 404.
 
      "When the world grows old by the chimney-side," verse, 417.
 
      "When winter fringes every bough," verse, 176.
 
      "Where they once dug for money," verse, 214.
 
      Whitney, Peter, quoted, 312.
 
      "Who equaleth the coward's haste," verse, 417.
 
      "Whoa," the crying of, to mankind, 235.
 
      WILD APPLES, 290-322.
 
      Wildness, the necessity of, 224-236;
        in literature, 230-233;
        in domestic animals, 234-236.
 
      Willow, golden, leaves, 266.
 
      Winter Scene, A, verse, 410.
 
      WINTER WALK, A, 163-183.
 
      Winter, warmth in, 167, 168;
        the woods in, 168, 169;
        nature a _hortus siccus_ in, 179;
        as represented in the almanac, 182;
        ignored in Hebrew revelation, 183;
        evening, 183.
 
      "With frontier strength ye stand your ground," verse, 133.
 
      "Within the circuit of this plodding life," verse, 103.
 
      Wolfe and Montcalm, monument to, 73.
 
      Wolfe's Cove, 22.
 
      Women, Canadian, 34.
 
      Woodbine, 3, 4, 276.
 
      Woodchopper, winter to be represented as a, 182.
 
      Woodman, hut and work of a, 172, 173.
 
      Woods in winter, the, 168, 169.
 
      Wordsworth, reading, 143, 144.
 
 
      YANKEE IN CANADA, A, 1-101.
 
      "Yorrick," the, 112, note.
 
 
 
 
      The Riverside Press
      H. O. HOUGHTON AND COMPANY
      CAMBRIDGE
      MASSACHUSETTS
 
 
 
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 
 
 
 Transcriber's note:
 
   Inconsistent hyphenation and spelling in the original document have
   been preserved. Obvious typographical errors have been corrected.
 
   Italic text is denoted by _underscores_.
 
   On page 370, tryant's drudge should possibly be tyrant's drudge.
 

 
 
 
 Produced by Melissa McDaniel and the Online Distributed
 Proofreading Team at http://www.pgdp.net (This file was
 produced from images generously made available by The
 Internet Archive)
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 Transcriber's Note:
 
   Inconsistent hyphenation and spelling in the original document have
   been preserved.  In particular, numerous spelling differences between
   the text and the Appendices were retained.
 
   Italic text is denoted by _underscores_. Bold text is denoted by =equal
   signs=.
 
   Page 5, "Moved to Pinkney" is possibly a typo for "Moved to Pinckney".
 
   Footnote 3: "St. Helier's" should possibly be "St. Helier".
 
   Page 54, "It is not buried liked" should possibly be "It is not buried
     like".
 
   Page 235, "12 M." should possibly be "12 P.M."
 
   The index cross-references to "Melilot," "Mist," "Toad," "Nighthawk,"
   "Nuphar," "Aphorisms," "Earth-songs," "Loring's Pond," don't seem to
   exist.
 
   The index entry for Pepin Lake is incomplete.
 
 
 
 
      THE WRITINGS OF
      HENRY DAVID THOREAU
 
      IN TWENTY VOLUMES
 
      VOLUME VI
 
 
 
 
      MANUSCRIPT EDITION
      LIMITED TO SIX HUNDRED COPIES
      NUMBER ----
 
 
 
 
   [Illustration: _Sabbatia (page 264)_]
 
   [Illustration: _Thoreau's Boat-landing, Concord River_]
 
 
 
 
      THE WRITINGS OF
      HENRY DAVID THOREAU
 
      FAMILIAR LETTERS
 
      EDITED BY F. B. SANBORN
 
      ENLARGED EDITION
 
      BOSTON AND NEW YORK
      HOUGHTON MIFFLIN AND COMPANY
      MDCCCCVI
 
 
 
 
      COPYRIGHT 1865 BY TICKNOR AND FIELDS
      COPYRIGHT 1894 AND 1906 BY HOUGHTON, MIFFLIN & CO.
 
      _All rights reserved_
 
 
 
 
 CONTENTS
 
 
      INTRODUCTION
 
 
      I
 
      YEARS OF DISCIPLINE
 
      SKETCH OF THOREAU'S LIFE FROM BIRTH TO TWENTY YEARS             3
 
      LETTERS TO HIS BROTHER JOHN AND SISTER HELEN                   11
 
      EARLY FRIENDSHIP AND CORRESPONDENCE WITH EMERSON AND HIS
        FAMILY                                                       34
 
      STATEN ISLAND AND NEW YORK LETTERS TO THE THOREAUS AND
        EMERSONS                                                     68
 
 
      II
 
      THE GOLDEN AGE OF ACHIEVEMENT
 
      CORRESPONDENCE WITH C. LANE, J. E. CABOT, EMERSON, AND
        BLAKE                                                       120
 
 
      III
 
      FRIENDS AND FOLLOWERS
 
      THE SHIPWRECK OF MARGARET FULLER                              183
 
      AN ESSAY ON LOVE AND CHASTITY                                 198
 
      MORAL EPISTLES TO HARRISON BLAKE OF WORCESTER                 209
 
      ACQUAINTANCE AND CORRESPONDENCE WITH DANIEL RICKETSON OF
        NEW BEDFORD                                                 237
 
      EXCURSIONS TO CAPE COD, NEW BEDFORD, NEW HAMPSHIRE, NEW
        YORK, AND NEW JERSEY                                        254
 
      EXCURSIONS TO MONADNOCK AND MINNESOTA                         364
 
      LAST ILLNESS AND DEATH                                        395
 
      APPENDIX: LETTERS TO ISAAC HECKER AND CALVIN H. GREENE        403
 
 
      GENERAL INDEX TO THOREAU'S WORKS                              417
 
 
 
 
 ILLUSTRATIONS
 
 
      SABBATIA _Carbon photograph (page 264)_            _Frontispiece_
 
      THOREAU'S BOAT-LANDING, CONCORD RIVER             _Colored plate_
 
      HENRY D. THOREAU, FROM THE RICKETSON MEDALLION
        _(page 263)_                                                  1
 
      CONCORD BATTLE-GROUND                                          24
 
      WALDEN WOODS                                                  122
 
      THE HOSMER HOUSE                                              154
 
      THOREAU'S BOAT-LANDING, CONCORD RIVER                         236
 
      FROM THE SUMMIT OF MONADNOCK                                  370
 
 
 
 
 INTRODUCTION
 
 
 The fortune of Henry Thoreau as an author of books has been peculiar,
 and such as to indicate more permanence of his name and fame than
 could be predicted of many of his contemporaries. In the years of his
 literary activity (twenty-five in all), from 1837 to 1862,--when he
 died, not quite forty-five years old,--he published but two volumes,
 and those with much delay and difficulty in finding a publisher. But
 in the thirty-two years after his death, nine volumes were published
 from his manuscripts and fugitive pieces,--the present being the
 tenth. Besides these, two biographies of Thoreau had appeared in
 America, and two others in England, with numerous reviews and sketches
 of the man and his writings,--enough to make several volumes more.
 Since 1894 other biographies and other volumes have appeared, and now
 his writings in twenty volumes are coming from the press. The sale of
 his books and the interest in his life are greater than ever; and he
 seems to have grown early into an American classic, like his Concord
 neighbors, Emerson and Hawthorne. Pilgrimages are made to his grave
 and his daily haunts, as to theirs,--and those who come find it to be
 true, as was said by an accomplished woman (Miss Elizabeth Hoar) soon
 after his death, that "Concord is Henry's monument, adorned with
 suitable inscriptions by his own hand."
 
 When Horace wrote of a noble Roman family,--
 
      "Crescit occulto velut arbor aevo
      Fama Marcelli,"--
 
 he pointed in felicitous phrase to the only fame that posterity has
 much regarded,--the slow-growing, deep-rooted laurel of renown. And
 Shakespeare, citing the old English rhyming saw,--
 
      "Small herbs have grace,
      Great weeds do grow apace,"--
 
 signified the same thing in a parable,--the popularity and suddenness
 of transient things, contrasted with the usefully permanent. There
 were plenty of authors in Thoreau's time (of whom Willis may be taken
 as the type) who would have smiled loftily to think that a rustic from
 the Shawsheen and Assabet could compete with the traveled scholar or
 elegant versifier who commanded the homage of drawing-rooms and
 magazines, for the prize of lasting remembrance; yet who now are
 forgotten, or live a shadowy life in the alcoves of libraries, piping
 forth an ineffective voice, like the shades in Virgil's Tartarus. But
 Thoreau was wiser when he wrote at the end of his poem,
 "Inspiration,"--
 
      "Fame cannot tempt the bard
      Who's famous with his God;
      Nor laurel him reward
      Who has his Maker's nod."
 
 He strove but little for glory, either immediate or posthumous, well
 knowing that it is the inevitable and unpursued result of what men do
 or say,--
 
      "Our fatal shadow that walks by us still."
 
 The Letters of Thoreau, though not less remarkable in some aspects
 than what he wrote carefully for publication, have thus far scarcely
 had justice done them. The selection made for a small volume in 1865
 was designedly done to exhibit one phase of his character,--the most
 striking, if you will, but not the most native or attractive. "In his
 own home," says Ellery Channing, who knew him more inwardly than any
 other, "he was one of those characters who may be called 'household
 treasures;' always on the spot, with skillful eye and hand, to raise
 the best melons in the garden, plant the orchard with choicest trees,
 or act as extempore mechanic; fond of the pets, his sister's flowers,
 or sacred Tabby; kittens were his favorites,--he would play with them
 by the half-hour. No whim or coldness, no absorption of his time by
 public or private business, deprived those to whom he belonged of his
 kindness and affection. He did the duties that lay nearest, and
 satisfied those in his immediate circle; and whatever the impressions
 from the theoretical part of his writings, when the matter is probed
 to the bottom, good sense and good feeling will be detected in it."
 This is preminently true; and the affectionate conviction of this
 made his sister Sophia dissatisfied with Emerson's rule of selection
 among the letters. This she confided to me, and this determined me,
 should occasion offer, to give the world some day a fuller and more
 familiar view of our friend.
 
 For this purpose I have chosen many letters and mere notes,
 illustrating his domestic and gossipy moods,--for that element was in
 his mixed nature, inherited from the lively maternal side,--and even
 the colloquial vulgarity (using the word in the strict sense of
 "popular speech") that he sometimes allowed himself. In his last years
 he revolted a little at this turn of his thoughts, and, as Channing
 relates, "rubbed out the more humorous parts of his essays, originally
 a relief to their sterner features, saying, 'I cannot bear the levity
 I find;'" to which Channing replied that he ought to spare it, even to
 the puns, in which he abounded almost as much as Shakespeare. His
 friend was right,--the obvious incongruity was as natural to Thoreau
 as the grace and French elegance of his best sentences. In the dozen
 letters newly added to this edition, these contrasted qualities hardly
 appear so striking as in the longer, earlier ones; but they all
 illustrate events of his life or points in his character which are
 essential for fully understanding this most original of all American
 authors. The present volume is enlarged by some thirty pages, chiefly
 by additional letters to Ricketson, and all those to C. H. Greene. The
 modesty and self-deprecation in the Michigan correspondence will
 attract notice.
 
 I have not rejected the common and trivial in these letters; being
 well assured that what the increasing number of Thoreau's readers
 desire is to see this piquant original just as he was,--not arrayed in
 the paradoxical cloak of the Stoic sage, nor sitting complacent in the
 cynic earthenware cave of Diogenes, and bidding Alexander stand out of
 his sunshine. He did those acts also; but they were not the whole man.
 He was far more poet than cynic or stoic; he had the proud humility of
 those sects, but still more largely that unconscious pride which
 comes to the poet when he sees that his pursuits are those of the few
 and not of the multitude. This perception came early to Thoreau, and
 was expressed in some unpublished verses dating from his long,
 solitary rambles, by night and day, on the seashore at Staten Island,
 where he first learned the sombre magnificence of Ocean. He feigns
 himself the son of what might well be one of Homer's fishermen, or the
 shipwrecked seaman of Lucretius,--
 
              "Saevis projectus ab undis
      Cui tantum in vita restet transire malorum,"--
 
 and then goes on thus with his parable:--
 
      "Within a humble cot that looks to sea,
        Daily I breathe this curious warm life;
      Beneath a friendly haven's sheltering lee
        My noiseless day with mystery still is rife.
 
      "'T is here, they say, my simple life began,--
        And easy credence to the tale I lend,
      For well I know 't is here I am a man,--
        But who will simply tell me of the end?
 
      "These eyes, fresh-opened, spied the far-off Sea,
        That like a silent godfather did stand,
      Nor uttered one explaining word to me,
        While introducing straight godmother Land.
 
      "And yonder still stretches that silent Main,
        With many glancing ships besprinkled o'er;
      And earnest still I gaze and gaze again
        Upon the selfsame waves and friendly shore.
 
      "Infinite work my hands find there to do,
        Gathering the relics which the waves upcast:
      Each storm doth scour the sea for something new,
        And every time the strangest is the last.
 
      "My neighbors sometimes come with lumbering carts.
        As if they wished my pleasant toil to share;
      But straight they go again to distant marts,
        For only weeds and ballast are their care."
 
 "Only weeds and ballast?" that is exactly what Thoreau's neighbors
 would have said he was gathering, for the most of his days; yet now he
 is seen to have collected something more durable and precious than
 they with their implements and market-carts. If they viewed him with a
 kind of scorn and pity, it must be said that he returned the affront;
 only time seems to have sided with the poet in the controversy that he
 maintained against his busy age.
 
 Superiority,--moral elevation, without peevishness or
 condescension,--this was Thoreau's distinguishing quality. He softened
 it with humor, and sometimes sharpened it with indignation; but he
 directed his satire and his censure as often against himself as
 against mankind; men he truly loved,--if they would not obstruct his
 humble and strictly chosen path. The letters here printed show this,
 if I mistake not,--and the many other epistles of his, still
 uncollected, would hardly vary the picture he has sketched of himself,
 though they would add new facts. Those most to be sought for are his
 replies to the generous letters of his one English correspondent.[1]
 
 The profile portrait reproduced in photogravure for this volume is
 less known than it should be,--for it alone of the four likenesses
 extant shows the aquiline features as his comrades of the wood and
 mountain saw them,--not weakened by any effort to bring him to the
 standard of other men in garb or expression. The artist, Mr. Walton
 Ricketson, knew and admired him. To him and to his sister Anna I am
 indebted for the letters and other material found in their volume
 "Daniel Ricketson and His Friends."
 
      F. B. S.
 
      CONCORD MASS., March 1, 1906.
 
 
 FOOTNOTE:
 
 [1] These, written to Thomas Cholmondeley, are still (1906) lacking;
 but a few other letters have been published since 1894.
 
 
 
 
 FAMILIAR LETTERS OF THOREAU
 
 
 
 
   [Illustration: _Henry D. Thoreau, from the Ricketson Medallion_
    (_page 263_)]
 
 
 
 
 I
 
 YEARS OF DISCIPLINE
 
 
 It was a happy thought of Thoreau's friend Ellery Channing, himself a
 poet, to style our Concord hermit the "poet-naturalist;" for there
 seemed to be no year of his life and no hour of his day when Nature
 did not whisper some secret in his ear,--so intimate was he with her
 from childhood. In another connection, speaking of natural beauty,
 Channing said, "There is Thoreau,--he knows about it; give him
 sunshine and a handful of nuts, and he has enough." He was also a
 naturalist in the more customary sense,--one who studied and arranged
 methodically in his mind the facts of outward nature; a good botanist
 and ornithologist, a wise student of insects and fishes; an observer
 of the winds, the clouds, the seasons, and all that goes to make up
 what we call "weather" and "climate." Yet he was in heart a poet, and
 held all the accumulated knowledge of more than forty years not so
 much for use as for delight. As Gray's poor friend West said of
 himself, "like a clear-flowing stream, he reflected the beauteous
 prospect around;" and Mother Nature had given Thoreau for his prospect
 the meandering Indian river of Concord, the woodland pastures and fair
 lakes by which he dwelt or rambled most of his life. Born in the East
 Quarter of Concord, July 12, 1817, he died in the village, May 6,
 1862; he was there fitted for Harvard College, which he entered in
 1833, graduating in 1837; and for the rest of his life was hardly away
 from the town for more than a year in all. Consequently his letters to
 his family are few, for he was usually among them; but when separated
 from his elder brother John, or his sisters Helen and Sophia, he wrote
 to them, and these are the earliest of his letters which have been
 preserved. Always thoughtful for others, he has left a few facts to
 aid his biographer, respecting his birth and early years. In his
 Journal of December 27, 1855, he wrote:--
 
 "Recalled this evening, with the aid of Mother, the various houses
 (and towns) in which I have lived, and some events of my life. Born
 ... in the Minott house on the Virginia Road, where Father occupied
 Grandmother's 'thirds,' carrying on the farm. The Catherines [had] the
 other half of the house,--Bob Catherine and [brother] John threw up
 the turkeys. Lived there about eight months; Si Merriam the next
 neighbor. Uncle David [Dunbar] died when I was six weeks old.[2] I was
 baptized in the old meeting-house, by Dr. Ripley, when I was three
 months, and did not cry. [In] the Red House, where Grandmother lived,
 we [had] the west side till October, 1818,--hiring of Josiah Davis,
 agent for the Woodwards; there were Cousin Charles and Uncle Charles
 [Dunbar], more or less. According to the day-book first used by
 Grandfather [Thoreau],[3] dated 1797 (his part cut out and [then] used
 by Father in Concord in 1808-9, and in Chelmsford in 1818-21), Father
 hired of Proctor [in Chelmsford], and shop of Spaulding. Chelmsford
 till March, 1821; last charge in Chelmsford about middle of March,
 1821. Aunt Sarah taught me to walk there, when fourteen months old.
 Lived next the meeting-house, where they kept the powder in the
 garret. Father kept shop and painted signs, etc.
 
 "Pope's house, at South End in Boston (a ten-footer) five or six
 months,--moved from Chelmsford through Concord, and may have tarried
 in Concord a little while.
 
 "Day-book says, 'Moved to Pinkney Street [Boston], September 10, 1821,
 on Monday;' Whitwell's house, Pinckney Street, to March, 1823; brick
 house, Concord, to spring of 1826; Davis house (next to Samuel Hoar's)
 to May 7, 1827; Shattuck house (now Wm. Munroe's) to spring of 1835;
 Hollis Hall, Cambridge, 1833; Aunts' house to spring of 1837. [This
 was what is now the inn called 'Thoreau House.'] At Brownson's
 [Canton] while teaching in winter of 1835. Went to New York with
 Father peddling in 1836."
 
 This brings the date down to the year in which Henry Thoreau left
 college, and when the family letters begin. The notes continue, and
 now begin to have a literary value.
 
 "Parkman house to fall of 1844; was graduated in 1837; kept town
 school a fortnight in 1837; began the big Red Journal, October, 1837;
 found my first arrowheads, fall of 1837; wrote a lecture (my first) on
 Society, March 14, 1838, and read it before the Lyceum, in the Masons'
 Hall, April 11, 1838; went to Maine for a school in May, 1838;
 commenced school [in the Parkman house[4]] in the summer of 1838;
 wrote an essay on 'Sound and Silence' December, 1838; fall of 1839 up
 the Merrimack to White Mountains; 'Aulus Persius Flaccus' (first
 printed paper of consequence), February 10, 1840; the Red Journal of
 546 pages ended June, 1840; Journal of 396 pages ended January 31,
 1841.
 
 "Went to R. W. Emerson's in spring of 1841 [about April 25], and
 stayed there to summer of 1843; went to [William Emerson's], Staten
 Island, May, 1843, and returned in December, or to Thanksgiving, 1843;
 made pencils in 1844; Texas house to August 29, 1850; at Walden,
 July, 1845, to fall of 1847; then at R. W. Emerson's to fall of 1848,
 or while he was in Europe; Yellow House (reformed) till the present."
 
 As may be inferred from this simple record of the many mansions,
 chiefly small ones, in which he had spent his first thirty-eight
 years, there was nothing distinguished in the fortunes of Thoreau's
 family, who were small merchants, artisans, or farmers mostly. On the
 father's side they were from the isle of Jersey, where a French strain
 mingled with his English or Scandinavian blood; on the other side he
 was of Scotch and English descent, counting Jones, Dunbar, and Burns
 among his feminine ancestors. Liveliness and humor came to him from
 his Scotch connection; from father and grandfather he inherited a
 grave steadiness of mind rather at variance with his mother's
 vivacity. Manual dexterity was also inherited; so that he practiced
 the simpler mechanic arts with ease and skill; his mathematical
 training and his outdoor habits fitted him for a land-surveyor; and by
 that art, as well as by pencil-making, lecturing, and writing, he paid
 his way in the world, and left a small income from his writings to
 those who survived him. He taught pupils also, as did his brother and
 sisters; but it was not an occupation that he long followed after
 John's death in 1842. With these introductory statements we may
 proceed to Thoreau's first correspondence with his brother and
 sisters.
 
 As an introduction to the correspondence, and a key to the young man's
 view of life, a passage may be taken from Thoreau's "part" at his
 college commencement, August 16, 1837. He was one of two to hold what
 was called a "Conference" on "The Commercial Spirit,"--his alternative
 or opponent in the dispute being Henry Vose, also of Concord, who, in
 later years, was a Massachusetts judge. Henry Thoreau,[5] then just
 twenty, said:--
 
 "The characteristic of our epoch is perfect freedom,--freedom of
 thought and action. The indignant Greek, the oppressed Pole, the
 jealous American assert it. The skeptic no less than the believer, the
 heretic no less than the faithful child of the church, have begun to
 enjoy it. It has generated an unusual degree of energy and activity;
 it has generated the _commercial spirit_. Man thinks faster and freer
 than ever before. He, moreover, moves faster and freer. He is more
 restless, because he is more independent than ever. The winds and the
 waves are not enough for him; he must needs ransack the bowels of the
 earth, that he may make for himself a highway of iron over its
 surface.
 
 "Indeed, could one examine this beehive of ours from an observatory
 among the stars, he would perceive an unwonted degree of bustle in
 these later ages. There would be hammering and chipping in one
 quarter; baking and brewing, buying and selling, money-changing and
 speechmaking in another. What impression would he receive from so
 general and impartial a survey. Would it appear to him that mankind
 used this world as not abusing it? Doubtless he would first be struck
 with the profuse beauty of our orb; he would never tire of admiring
 its varied zones and seasons, with their changes of living. He could
 not but notice that restless animal for whose sake it was contrived;
 but where he found one man to admire with him his fair dwelling-place,
 the ninety and nine would be scraping together a little of the gilded
 dust upon its surface.... We are to look chiefly for the origin of the
 commercial spirit, and the power that still cherishes and sustains it,
 in a blind and unmanly love of wealth. Wherever this exists, it is too
 sure to become the ruling spirit; and, as a natural consequence, it
 infuses into all our thoughts and affections a degree of its own
 selfishness; we become selfish in our patriotism, selfish in our
 domestic relations, selfish in our religion.
 
 "Let men, true to their natures, cultivate the moral affections, lead
 manly and independent lives; let them make riches the means and not
 the end of existence, and we shall hear no more of the commercial
 spirit. The sea will not stagnate, the earth will be as green as ever,
 and the air as pure. This curious world which we inhabit is more
 wonderful than it is convenient; more beautiful than it is useful; it
 is more to be admired and enjoyed than used. The order of things
 should be somewhat reversed; the seventh should be man's day of toil,
 wherein to earn his living by the sweat of his brow; and the other six
 his Sabbath of the affections and the soul,--in which to range this
 widespread garden, and drink in the soft influences and sublime
 revelations of Nature.... The spirit we are considering is not
 altogether and without exception bad. We rejoice in it as one more
 indication of the entire and universal freedom that characterizes the
 age in which we live,--as an indication that the human race is making
 one more advance in that infinite series of progressions which awaits
 it. We glory in those very excesses which are a source of anxiety to
 the wise and good; as an evidence that man will not always be the
 slave of matter,--but ere long, casting off those earth-born desires
 which identify him with the brute, shall pass the days of his sojourn
 in this his nether paradise, as becomes the Lord of Creation."[6]
 
 This passage is noteworthy as showing how early the philosophic mind
 was developed in Thoreau, and how much his thought and expression were
 influenced by Emerson's first book,--"Nature." But the soil in which
 that germinating seed fell was naturally prepared to receive it; and
 the wide diversity between the master and the disciple soon began to
 appear. In 1863, reviewing Thoreau's work, Emerson said, "That oaken
 strength which I noted whenever he walked or worked, or surveyed
 wood-lots,--the same unhesitating hand with which a field-laborer
 accosts a piece of work which I should shun as a waste of strength,
 Henry shows in his literary task. He has muscle, and ventures on and
 performs feats which I am forced to decline. In reading him I find the
 same thoughts, the same spirit that is in me; but he takes a step
 beyond, and illustrates by excellent images that which I should have
 conveyed in a sleepy generalization." True as this is, it omits one
 point of difference only too well known to Emerson,--the controversial
 turn of Thoreau's mind, in which he was so unlike Emerson and Alcott,
 and which must have given to his youthful utterances in company the
 air of something requiring an apology.
 
 This, at all events, seems to have been the feeling of Helen
 Thoreau,[7] whose pride in her brother was such that she did not wish
 to see him misunderstood. A pleasing indication of both these traits
 is seen in the first extant letter of Thoreau to this sister. I have
 this in an autograph copy made by Mr. Emerson, when he was preparing
 the letters for partial publication, soon after Henry's death. For
 some reason he did not insert it in his volume; but it quite deserves
 to be printed, as indicating the period when it was clear to Thoreau
 that he must think for himself, whatever those around him might think.
 
 
 TO HELEN THOREAU (AT TAUNTON).
 
      CONCORD, October 27, 1837.
 
 DEAR HELEN,--Please you, let the defendant say a few words in defense
 of his long silence. You know we have hardly done our own deeds,
 thought our own thoughts, or lived our own lives hitherto. For a man
 to act himself, he must be perfectly free; otherwise he is in danger
 of losing all sense of responsibility or of self-respect. Now when
 such a state of things exists, that the sacred opinions one advances
 in argument are apologized for by his friends, before his face, lest
 his hearers receive a wrong impression of the man,--when such gross
 injustice is of frequent occurrence, where shall we look, and not look
 in vain, for men, deeds, thoughts? As well apologize for the grape
 that it is sour, or the thunder that it is noisy, or the lightning
 that it tarries not.
 
 Further, letter-writing too often degenerates into a communicating of
 facts, and not of truths; of other men's deeds and not our thoughts.
 What are the convulsions of a planet, compared with the emotions of
 the soul? or the rising of a thousand suns, if that is not enlightened
 by a ray?
 
      Your affectionate brother,
      HENRY.
 
 It is presumed the tender sister did not need a second lesson; and
 equally that Henry did not see fit always to write such letters as he
 praised above,--for he was quite ready to give his correspondents
 facts, no less than thoughts, especially in his family letters.
 
 Next to this epistle, chronologically, comes one in the conventional
 dialect of the American Indian, as handed down by travelers and
 romancers, by Jefferson, Chateaubriand, Lewis, Clarke, and Fenimore
 Cooper. John Thoreau, Henry's brother, was born in 1815 and died
 January 11, 1842. He was teaching at Taunton in 1837.
 
 
 TO JOHN THOREAU (AT TAUNTON).
 
 (Written as from one Indian to another.)
 
 MUSKETAQUID, 202 Summers, two Moons, eleven Suns, since the coming of
 the Pale Faces.
 
 (November 11, 1837.)
 
 TAHATAWAN, Sachimaussan, to his brother sachem, Hopeful of
 Hopewell,--hoping that he is well:--
 
 Brother: It is many suns that I have not seen the print of thy
 moccasins by our council-fire; the Great Spirit has blown more leaves
 from the trees, and many clouds from the land of snows have visited
 our lodge; the earth has become hard, like a frozen buffalo-skin, so
 that the trampling of many herds is like the Great Spirit's thunder;
 the grass on the great fields is like the old man of many winters, and
 the small song sparrow prepares for his flight to the land whence the
 summer comes.
 
 Brother: I write these things because I know that thou lovest the
 Great Spirit's creatures, and wast wont to sit at thy lodge-door, when
 the maize was green, to hear the bluebird's song. So shalt thou, in
 the land of spirits, not only find good hunting-grounds and sharp
 arrowheads, but much music of birds.
 
 Brother: I have been thinking how the Pale-Faces have taken away our
 lands,--and was a woman. You are fortunate to have pitched your wigwam
 nearer to the great salt lake, where the Pale-Face can never plant
 corn.
 
 Brother: I need not tell thee how we hunted on the lands of the
 Dundees,--a great war-chief never forgets the bitter taunts of his
 enemies. Our young men called for strong water; they painted their
 faces and dug up the hatchet. But their enemies, the Dundees, were
 women; they hastened to cover their hatchets with wampum. Our braves
 are not many; our enemies took a few strings from the heap their
 fathers left them, and our hatchets are buried. But not Tahatawan's;
 his heart is of rock when the Dundees sing,--his hatchet cuts deep
 into the Dundee braves.
 
 Brother: There is dust on my moccasins; I have journeyed to the White
 Lake, in the country of the Ninares.[8] The Long-Knife has been
 there,--like a woman I paddled his war-canoe. But the spirits of my
 fathers were angered; the waters were ruffled, and the Bad Spirit
 troubled the air.
 
 The hearts of the Lee-vites are gladdened; the young Peacock has
 returned to his lodge at Naushawtuck. He is the Medicine of his tribe,
 but his heart is like the dry leaves when the whirlwind breathes. He
 has come to help choose new chiefs for the tribe, in the great
 council-house, when two suns are past.--There is no seat for Tahatawan
 in the council-house. He lets the squaws talk,--his voice is heard
 above the war-whoop of his tribe, piercing the hearts of his foes; his
 legs are stiff, he cannot sit.
 
 Brother: Art thou waiting for the spring, that the geese may fly low
 over thy wigwam? Thy arrows are sharp, thy bow is strong. Has Anawan
 killed all the eagles? The crows fear not the winter. Tahatawan's eyes
 are sharp,--he can track a snake in the grass, he knows a friend from
 a foe; he welcomes a friend to his lodge though the ravens croak.
 
 Brother: Hast thou studied much in the medicine-books of the
 Pale-Faces? Dost thou understand the long talk of the Medicine whose
 words are like the music of the mockingbird? But our chiefs have not
 ears to hear him; they listen like squaws to the council of old
 men,--they understand not his words. But, Brother, he never danced the
 war-dance, nor heard the war-whoop of his enemies. He was a squaw; he
 stayed by the wigwam when the braves were out, and tended the tame
 buffaloes.
 
 Fear not; the Dundees have faint hearts and much wampum. When the
 grass is green on the Great Fields, and the small titmouse returns
 again, we will hunt the buffalo together.
 
 Our old men say they will send the young chief of the Karlisles, who
 lives in the green wigwam and is a great Medicine, that his word may
 be heard in the long talk which the wise men are going to hold at
 Shawmut, by the salt lake. He is a great talk, and will not forget the
 enemies of his tribe.
 
 14th Sun. The fire has gone out in the council-house. The words of our
 old men have been like the vaunts of the Dundees. The Eagle-Beak was
 moved to talk like a silly Pale-Face, and not as becomes a great
 war-chief in a council of braves. The young Peacock is a woman among
 braves; he heard not the words of the old men,--like a squaw he looked
 at his medicine-paper.[9] The young chief of the green wigwam has
 hung up his moccasins; he will not leave his tribe till after the
 buffalo have come down on to the plains.
 
 Brother: This is a long talk, but there is much meaning to my words;
 they are not like the thunder of canes when the lightning smites them.
 Brother, I have just heard _thy talk_ and am well pleased; thou art
 getting to be a great Medicine. The Great Spirit confound the enemies
 of thy tribe.
 
      TAHATAWAN.
 
      His mark [a bow and arrow].
 
 This singular letter was addressed to John Thoreau at Taunton, and was
 so carefully preserved in the family that it must have had value in
 their eyes, as recalling traits of the two Thoreau brothers, and also
 events in the village life of Concord, more interesting to the young
 people of 1837 than to the present generation. Some of its parables
 are easy to read, others quite obscure. The annual State election was
 an important event to Henry Thoreau then,--more so than it afterwards
 appeared; and he was certainly on the Whig side in politics, like most
 of the educated youths of Concord. His "young chief of the Karlisles"
 was Albert Nelson, son of a Carlisle physician, who began to practice
 law in Concord in 1836, and was afterwards chief justice of the
 Superior Court of the County of Suffolk. He was defeated at the
 election of 1837, as a Whig candidate for the legislature, by a
 Democrat. Henry Vose, above named, writing from "Butternuts," in New
 York, three hundred miles west of Concord, October 22, 1837, said to
 Thoreau: "You envy my happy situation, and mourn over your fate, which
 condemns you to loiter about Concord and grub among clamshells [for
 Indian relics]. If this were your only source of enjoyment while in
 Concord,--but I know that it is not. I well remember that 'antique and
 fish-like' office of _Major_ Nelson (to whom, and to Mr. Dennis, and
 Bemis, and John Thoreau, I wish to be remembered); and still more
 vividly do I remember the fairer portion of the community in C." This
 indicates a social habit in Henry and John Thoreau, which the Indian
 "talk" also implies. Tahatawan, whom Henry here impersonated, was the
 mythical Sachem of Musketaquid (the Algonquin name for Concord River
 and region), whose fishing and hunting lodge was on the hill
 Naushawtuck, between the two rivers so much navigated by the Thoreaus.
 In 1837 the two brothers were sportsmen, and went shooting over the
 Concord meadows and moors, but of course the "buffalo" was a figure of
 speech; they never shot anything larger than a raccoon. A few years
 later they gave up killing the game.
 
 
 TO JOHN THOREAU (AT TAUNTON).
 
      CONCORD, February 10, 1838.
 
 DEAR JOHN,--Dost expect to elicit a spark from so dull a steel as
 myself, by that flinty subject of thine? Truly, one of your copper
 percussion caps would have fitted this nail-head better.
 
 Unfortunately, the "Americana"[10] has hardly two words on the
 subject. The process is very simple. The stone is struck with a mallet
 so as to produce pieces sharp at one end, and blunt at the other.
 These are laid upon a steel line (probably a chisel's edge), and again
 struck with the mallet, and flints of the required size are broken
 off. A skillful workman may make a thousand in a day.
 
 So much for the "Americana." Dr. Jacob Bigelow in his "Technology,"
 says, "Gunflints are formed by a skillful workman, who breaks them out
 with a hammer, a roller, and steel chisel, with small, repeated
 strokes."
 
 Your ornithological commission shall be executed. When are you coming
 home?
 
      Your affectionate brother,
      HENRY D. THOREAU.
 
 
 TO JOHN THOREAU (AT TAUNTON).
 
      CONCORD, March 17, 1838.
 
 DEAR JOHN,--Your box of relics came safe to hand, but was speedily
 deposited on the carpet, I assure you. What could it be? Some
 declared it must be Taunton herrings: "Just nose it, sir!" So down we
 went on to our knees, and commenced smelling in good earnest,--now
 horizontally from this corner to that, now perpendicularly from the
 carpet up, now diagonally,--and finally with a sweeping movement
 describing the circumference. But it availed not. Taunton herring
 would not be smelled. So we e'en proceeded to open it _vi et chisel_.
 What an array of nails! Four nails make a quarter, four quarters a
 yard,--i' faith, this is n't cloth measure! Blaze away, old boy! Clap
 in another wedge, then! There, softly! she begins to gape. Just give
 that old stickler, with a black hat on, another hoist. Aye, we'll pare
 his nails for him! Well done, old fellow, there's a breathing-hole for
 you. "Drive it in!" cries one; "Nip it off!" cries another. Be easy, I
 say. What's done may be undone. Your richest veins don't lie nearest
 the surface. Suppose we sit down and enjoy the prospect, for who knows
 but we may be disappointed? When they opened Pandora's box, all the
 contents escaped except Hope, but in this case hope is uppermost, and
 will be the first to escape when the box is opened. However, the
 general voice was for kicking the coverlid off.
 
 The relics have been arranged numerically on a table. When shall we
 set up housekeeping? Miss Ward thanks you for her share of the spoils;
 also accept many thanks from your humble servant "for yourself."
 
 I have a proposal to make. Suppose by the time you are released we
 should start in company for the West, and there either establish a
 school jointly, or procure ourselves separate situations. Suppose,
 moreover, you should get ready to start previous to leaving Taunton,
 to save time. Go _I_ must, at all events. Dr. Jarvis enumerates nearly
 a dozen schools which I could have,--all such as would suit you
 equally well.[11] I wish you would write soon about this. It is high
 season to start. The canals are now open, and traveling comparatively
 cheap. I think I can borrow the cash in this town. There's nothing
 like trying.
 
 Brigham wrote you a few words on the 8th, which father took the
 liberty to read, with the advice and consent of the family. He wishes
 you to send him those [numbers] of the "Library of Health" received
 since 1838, if you are in Concord; otherwise, he says you need not
 trouble yourself about it at present. He is in C., and enjoying better
 health than usual. But one number, and that you have, has been
 received.
 
 The bluebirds made their appearance the 14th day of March; robins and
 pigeons have also been seen. Mr. Emerson has put up the bluebird-box
 in due form. All send their love.
 
      From your aff. br.
      H. D. THOREAU.
 
 [Postscript by Helen Thoreau.]
 
 DEAR JOHN,--Will you have the kindness to inquire at Mr. Marston's for
 an old singing-book I left there,--the "Handel and Haydn Collection,"
 without a cover? Have you ever got those red handkerchiefs? Much love
 to the Marstons, Crockers, and Muenschers. Mr. Josiah Davis has
 failed. Mr. and Mrs. Howe have both written again, urging my going to
 Roxbury; which I suppose I shall do. What day of the month shall you
 return?
 
      HELEN.
 
 One remark in this letter calls for attention,--that concerning the
 "bluebird-box" for Mr. Emerson. In 1853 Emerson wrote in his journal:
 "Long ago I wrote of Gifts, and neglected a capital example. John
 Thoreau, Jr., one day put a bluebird's box on my barn,--fifteen years
 ago it must be,--and there it still is, with every summer a melodious
 family in it, adorning the place and singing his praises. There's a
 gift for you,--which cost the giver no money, but nothing which he
 bought could have been so good. I think of another, quite inestimable.
 John Thoreau knew how much I should value a head of little Waldo, then
 five years old. He came to me and offered to take him to a
 daguerreotypist who was then in town, and he (Thoreau) would see it
 well done. He did it, and brought me the daguerre, which I thankfully
 paid for. A few months after, my boy died; and I have since to thank
 John Thoreau for that wise and gentle piece of friendship."
 
 Little Waldo Emerson died January 27, 1842, and John Thoreau the same
 month; so that this taking of the portrait must have been but a few
 months before his own death, January 11. Henry Thoreau was then living
 in the Emerson family.
 
 
 TO JOHN THOREAU (AT WEST ROXBURY).
 
      CONCORD, July 8, 1838.
 
 DEAR JOHN,--We heard from Helen to-day, and she informs us that you
 are coming home by the first of August. Now I wish you to write and
 let me know exactly when your vacation takes place, that I may take
 one at the same time. I am in school from 8 to 12 in the morning, and
 from 2 to 4 in the afternoon. After that I read a little Greek or
 English, or, for variety, take a stroll in the fields. We have not had
 such a year for berries this long time,--the earth is actually blue
 with them. High blueberries, three kinds of low, thimble- and
 raspberries constitute my diet at present. (Take notice,--I only diet
 between meals.) Among my deeds of charity, I may reckon the picking of
 a cherry tree for two helpless single ladies, who live under the hill;
 but i' faith, it was robbing Peter to pay Paul,--for while I was
 exalted in charity towards them, I had no mercy on my own stomach. Be
 advised, my love for currants continues.
 
 The only addition that I have made to my stock of ornithological
 information is in the shape not of a _Fring. melod._,--but surely a
 melodious Fringilla,--the _F. juncorum_, or rush-sparrow. I had long
 known him by note, but never by name.
 
 Report says that Elijah Stearns is going to take the town school. I
 have four scholars, and one more engaged. Mr. Fenner left town
 yesterday. Among occurrences of ill omen may be mentioned the falling
 out and cracking of the inscription stone of Concord Monument.[12]
 Mrs. Lowell and children are at Aunts'. Peabody [a college classmate]
 walked up last Wednesday, spent the night, and took a stroll in the
 woods.
 
 Sophia says I must leave off and pen a few lines for her to Helen: so
 good-by. Love from all, and among them your aff. brother,
 
      H. D. T.
 
 The school above mentioned as begun by Henry Thoreau in this summer of
 1838 was joined in by John, after finishing his teaching at West
 Roxbury, and was continued for several years. It was in this school
 that Louisa Alcott and her sister received some instruction, after
 their father removed from Boston to Concord, in the spring of 1840. It
 was opened in the Parkman house, where the family then lived, and soon
 after was transferred to the building of the Concord Academy,[13] not
 far off. John Thoreau taught the English branches and mathematics;
 Henry taught Latin and Greek and the higher mathematics,--and it was
 the custom of both brothers to go walking with their pupils one
 afternoon each week. It is as a professional schoolmaster that Henry
 thus writes to his sister Helen, then teaching at Roxbury, after a
 like experience in Taunton.
 
   [Illustration: _Concord Battle-Ground_]
 
 
 TO HELEN THOREAU (AT ROXBURY).
 
      CONCORD, October 6, 1838.
 
 DEAR HELEN,--I dropped Sophia's letter into the box immediately on
 taking yours out, else the tone of the former had been changed.
 
 I have no acquaintance with "Cleaveland's First Lessons," though I
 have peeped into his abridged grammar, which I should think very well
 calculated for beginners,--at least for such as would be likely to
 wear out one book before they would be prepared for the abstruser
 parts of grammar. Ahem!
 
 As no one can tell what was the Roman pronunciation, each nation makes
 the Latin conform, for the most part, to the rules of its own
 language; so that with us of the vowels only A has a peculiar sound.
 In the end of a word of more than one syllable it is sounded like
 "ah," as _pennah_, _Lydiah_, _Hannah_, etc., without regard to case;
 but "_da_" is never sounded "_dah_," because it is a monosyllable. All
 terminations in _es_, and plural cases in _os_, as you know, are
 pronounced long,--as _homines_ (hominese), _dominos_ (dominose), or,
 in English, _Johnny Vose_. For information, see Adams' "Latin
 Grammar," before the Rudiments.
 
 This is all law and gospel in the eyes of the world; but remember I am
 speaking, as it were, in the third person, and should sing quite a
 different tune if it were I that had made the quire. However, one must
 occasionally hang his harp on the willows, and play on the Jew's harp,
 in such a strange country as this.
 
 One of your young ladies wishes to study mental philosophy, hey?
 Well, tell her that she has the very best text-book that I know of in
 her possession already. If she do not believe it, then she should have
 bespoken another better in another world, and not have expected to
 find one at "Little & Wilkins." But if she wishes to know how poor an
 apology for a mental philosophy men have tacked together,
 synthetically or analytically, in these latter days,--how they have
 squeezed the infinite mind into a compass that would not nonplus a
 surveyor of Eastern Lands--making Imagination and Memory to lie still
 in their respective apartments like ink-stand and wafers in a lady's
 escritoire,--why let her read Locke, or Stewart, or Brown. The fact
 is, mental philosophy is very like Poverty, which, you know, begins at
 home; and indeed, when it goes abroad, it is poverty itself.
 
 _Chorus._ I should think an abridgment of one of the above authors, or
 of Ambercrombie, would answer her purpose. It may set her a-thinking.
 Probably there are many systems in the market of which I am ignorant.
 
 As for themes, say first "Miscellaneous Thoughts." Set one up to a
 window, to note what passes in the street, and make her comments
 thereon; or let her gaze in the fire, or into a corner where there is
 a spider's web, and philosophize, moralize, theorize, or what not.
 What their hands find to putter about, or their minds to think about,
 that let them write about. To say nothing of advantage or disadvantage
 of this, that, or the other, let them set down their ideas at any
 given season, preserving the chain of thought as complete as may be.
 
 This is the style pedagogical. I am much obliged to you for your piece
 of information. Knowing your dislike to a sentimental letter, I remain
 
      Your affectionate brother,
      H. D. T.
 
 The next letter to Helen carries this pedagogical style a little
 farther, for it is in Latin, addressed "Ad Helenam L. Thoreau,
 Roxbury, Mass.," and postmarked "Concord, Jan. 25" (1840).
 
 
 TO HELEN THOREAU (AT ROXBURY).
 
      CONCORDIAE, Dec. Kal. Feb. A. D. MDCCCXL.
 
 CARA SOROR,--Est magnus acervus nivis ad limina, et frigus
 intolerabile intus. Coelum ipsum ruit, credo, et terram operit. Sero
 stratum linquo et mature repeto; in fenestris multa pruina prospectum
 absumit; et hic miser scribo, non currente calamo, nam digiti
 mentesque torpescunt. Canerem cum Horatio, si vox non faucibus
 haeserit,--
 
      Vides ut alta stet nive candidum
      Nawshawtuct, nec jam sustineant onus
        Silvae laborantes, geluque
        Flumina constiterint acuto?
 
      Dissolve frigus, ligna super foco
      Large reponens, etc.
 
 Sed olim, Musa mutata, et laetiore plectro,
 
      Neque jam stabulis gaudet pecus, aut arator igne,
              Nec prata canis albicant pruinis;
      Jam Cytherea choros ducit Venus imminente luna.
 
 Quam turdus ferrugineus ver reduxerit, tu, spero, linques curas
 scholasticas, et, negotio religato, desipere in loco audebis; aut
 mecum inter sylvas, aut super scopulos Pulchri-Portus, aut in cymba
 super lacum Waldensem, mulcens fluctus manu, aut speciem miratus sub
 undas.
 
 Bulwerius est mihi nomen incognitum,--unus ex ignobile vulgo, nec
 refutandus nec laudandus. Certe alicui nonnullam honorem habeo qui
 insanabili cacoethe scribendi teneatur.
 
 Specie flagrantis Lexingtonis non somnia deturbat? At non Vulcanum
 Neptunumque culpemus, cum superstitioso grege. Natura curat
 animalculis aeque ac hominibus; cum serena, tum procellosa, amica est.
 
 Si amas historiam et fortia facta heroum, non depone Rollin, precor;
 ne Clio offendas nunc, nec illa det veniam olim. Quos libros Latinos
 legis? legis, inquam, non studes. Beatus qui potest suos libellos
 tractare, et saepe perlegere, sine metu domini urgentis! ab otio
 injurioso procul est: suos amicos et vocare et dimittere quandocunque
 velit, potest. Bonus liber opus nobilissimum hominis. Hinc ratio non
 modo cur legeres, sed cur tu quoque scriberes; nec lectores carent;
 ego sum. Si non librum meditaris, libellum certe. Nihil posteris
 proderit te spirasse, et vitam nunc leniter nunc aspere egisse; sed
 cogitasse praecipue et scripsisse. Vereor ne tibi pertaesum hujus
 epistolae sit; necnon alma lux caret,
 
      Majoresque cadunt altis de montibus umbrae.
 
 Quamobrem vale,--imo valete, et requiescatis placide, Sorores.
 
      H. D. THOREAUS.
 
 Memento scribere!
 
 CARA SOPHIA,--Samuel Niger crebris aegrotationibus, quae agilitatem et
 aequum animum abstulere, obnoxius est; iis temporibus ad cellam
 descendit, et multas horas (ibi) manet.
 
 Flores, ah crudelis pruina! parvo leti discrimine sunt. Cactus frigore
 ustus est, gerania vero adhuc vigent.
 
 Conventus sociabiles hac hieme reinstituti fuere. Conveniunt (?) ad
 meum domum mense quarto vel quinto, ut tu hic esse possis. Matertera
 Sophia cum nobis remanet; quando urbem revertet non scio. Gravedine
 etiamnum, sed non tam aegre, laboramus.
 
 Adolescentula E. White apud pagum paulisper moratur. Memento scribere
 intra duas hebdomedas.
 
 Te valere desiderium est
 
      Tui Matris,
      C. THOREAUS.
 
 P. S. Epistolam die solis proxima expectamus. (Amanuense, H. D. T.)
 
 Barring a few slips, this is a good and lively piece of Latin, and
 noticeable for its thought as well as its learning and humor. The
 poets were evidently his favorites among Latin authors. Shall we
 attempt a free translation, such as Thoreau would give?
 
 
 VERNACULAR VERSION.
 
      CONCORD, January 23, 1840.
 
 DEAR SISTER,--There is a huge snow-drift at the door, and the cold
 inside is intolerable. The very sky is coming down, I guess, and
 covering up the ground. I turn out late in the morning, and go to bed
 early; there is thick frost on the windows, shutting out the view; and
 here I write in pain, for fingers and brains are numb. I would chant
 with Horace, if my voice did not stick in my throat,--
 
      See how Naushawtuct, deep in snow,
      Stands glittering, while the bending woods
      Scarce bear their burden, and the floods
      Feel arctic winter stay their flow.
 
      Pile on the firewood, melt the cold,
      Spare nothing, etc.
 
 But soon, changing my tune, and with a cheerfuller note, I'll say,--
 
      No longer the flock huddles up in the stall, the plowman bends
        over the fire,
      No longer frost whitens the meadow;
      But the goddess of love, while the moon shines above,
      Sets us dancing in light and in shadow.
 
 When Robin Redbreast brings back the springtime, I trust that you will
 lay your school duties aside, cast off care, and venture to be gay now
 and then; roaming with me in the woods, or climbing the Fair Haven
 cliffs,--or else, in my boat on Walden, let the water kiss your hand,
 or gaze at your image in the wave.
 
 Bulwer is to me a name unknown,--one of the unnoticed crowd,
 attracting neither blame nor praise. To be sure, I hold any one in
 some esteem who is helpless in the grasp of the writing demon.
 
 Does not the image of the Lexington afire trouble your dreams?[14] But
 we may not, like the superstitious mob, blame Vulcan or
 Neptune,--neither fire nor water was in fault. Nature takes as much
 care for midgets as for mankind; she is our friend in storm and in
 calm.
 
 If you like history, and the exploits of the brave, don't give up
 Rollin, I beg; thus would you displease Clio, who might not forgive
 you hereafter. What Latin are you reading? I mean _reading_, not
 studying. Blessed is the man who can have his library at hand, and oft
 peruse the books, without the fear of a taskmaster! he is far enough
 from harmful idleness, who can call in and dismiss these friends when
 he pleases. An honest book's the noblest work of man. There's a
 reason, now, not only for your reading, but for writing something,
 too. You will not lack readers,--here am I, for one. If you cannot
 compose a volume, then try a tract. It will do the world no good,
 hereafter, if you merely exist, and pass life smoothly or roughly; but
 to have thoughts, and write them down, that helps greatly.
 
 I fear you will tire of this epistle; the light of day is dwindling,
 too,--
 
      And longer fall the shadows of the hills.
 
 Therefore, good-by; fare ye well, and sleep in quiet, both my sisters!
 Don't forget to write.
 
      H. D. THOREAU.
 
 
 POSTSCRIPT. (BY MRS. THOREAU.)
 
 DEAR SOPHIA,--Sam Black [the cat] is liable to frequent attacks that
 impair his agility and good-nature; at such times he goes down cellar,
 and stays many hours. Your flowers--O, the cruel frost!--are all but
 dead; the cactus is withered by cold, but the geraniums yet flourish.
 The Sewing Circle has been revived this winter; they meet at our house
 in April or May, so that you may then be here. Your Aunt Sophia
 remains with us,--when she will return to the city I don't know. We
 still suffer from heavy colds, but not so much. Young Miss E. White is
 staying in the village a little while (is making a little visit in
 town). Don't forget to write within two weeks. We expect a letter next
 Sunday.
 
 That you may enjoy good health is the prayer of
 
      Your mother,
      C. THOREAU.
 
 (H. D. T. was the scribe.)
 
 Cats were always an important branch of the Thoreaus' domestic
 economy, and Henry was more tolerant of them than men are wont to be.
 Flowers were the specialty of Sophia, who, when I knew her, from 1855
 to 1876, usually had a small conservatory in a recess of the
 dining-room. At this time (1840) she seems to have been aiding Helen
 in her school. The next letter, to Helen, is of a graver tone:--
 
 
 TO HELEN THOREAU (AT ROXBURY).
 
      CONCORD, June 13, 1840.
 
 DEAR HELEN,--That letter to John, for which you had an opportunity
 doubtless to substitute a more perfect communication, fell, as was
 natural, into the hands of his "transcendental brother," who is his
 proxy in such cases, having been commissioned to acknowledge and
 receipt all bills that may be presented. But what's in a name? Perhaps
 it does not matter whether it be John or Henry. Nor will those same
 six months have to be altered, I fear, to suit his case as well. But
 methinks they have not passed entirely without intercourse, provided
 we have been sincere though humble worshipers of the same virtue in
 the mean time. Certainly it is better that we should make ourselves
 quite sure of such a communion as this by the only course which is
 completely free from suspicion,--the coincidence of two earnest and
 aspiring lives,--than run the risk of a disappointment by relying
 wholly or chiefly on so meagre and uncertain a means as speech,
 whether written or spoken, affords. How often, when we have been
 nearest each other bodily, have we really been farthest off! Our
 tongues were the witty foils with which we fenced each other off. Not
 that we have not met heartily and with profit as members of one
 family, but it was a small one surely, and not that other human
 family. We have met frankly and without concealment ever, as befits
 those who have an instinctive trust in one another, and the scenery of
 whose outward lives has been the same, but never as prompted by an
 earnest and affectionate desire to probe deeper our mutual natures.
 Such intercourse, at least, if it has ever been, has not condescended
 to the vulgarities of oral communication, for the ears are provided
 with no lid as the eye is, and would not have been deaf to it in
 sleep. And now glad am I, if I am not mistaken in imagining that some
 such transcendental inquisitiveness has traveled post _thither_,--for,
 as I observed before, where the bolt hits, thither was it aimed,--any
 arbitrary direction notwithstanding.
 
 Thus much, at least, our _kindred_ temperament of mind and body--and
 long _family_-arity--have done for us, that we already find ourselves
 standing on a solid and natural footing with respect to one another,
 and shall not have to waste time in the so often unavailing endeavor
 to arrive fairly at this simple ground.
 
 Let us leave trifles, then, to accident; and politics, and finance,
 and such gossip, to the moments when diet and exercise are cared for,
 and speak to each other deliberately as out of one infinity into
 another,--you there in time and space, and I here. For beside this
 relation, all books and doctrines are no better than gossip or the
 turning of a spit.
 
 Equally to you and Sophia, from
 
      Your affectionate brother,
      H. D. THOREAU.
 
 We come now to the period when Thoreau entered on more intimate
 relations with Emerson. There was a difference of fourteen years in
 their ages, which had hitherto separated them intellectually; but now
 the young scholar, thinker, and naturalist had so fast advanced that
 he could meet his senior on more equal terms, and each became
 essential to the other. With all his prudence and common sense, in
 which he surpassed most men, Emerson was yet lacking in some practical
 faculties; while Thoreau was the most practical and handy person in
 all matters of every-day life,--a good mechanic and gardener,
 methodical in his habits, observant and kindly in the domestic world,
 and attractive to children, who now were important members of the
 Emerson household. He was therefore invited by Emerson to make his
 house a home,--looking after the garden, the business affairs, and
 performing the office of a younger brother or a grown-up son. The
 invitation was accepted in April, 1841, and Thoreau remained in the
 family, with frequent absences, until he went in May, 1843, to reside
 with Mr. William Emerson, near New York, as the tutor of his sons.
 During these two years much occurred of deep moment to the two
 friends. Young Waldo Emerson, the beautiful boy, died, and just
 before, John Thoreau, the sunny and hopeful brother, whom Henry seems
 to have loved more than any human being. These tragedies brought the
 bereaved nearer together, and gave to Mrs. Emerson in particular an
 affection for Thoreau and a trust in him which made the intimate life
 of the household move harmoniously, notwithstanding the independent
 and eccentric genius of Thoreau.
 
 
 TO MRS. LUCY BROWN[15] (AT PLYMOUTH).
 
      CONCORD, July 21, 1841.
 
 DEAR FRIEND,--Don't think I need any prompting to write to you; but
 what tough earthenware shall I put into my packet to travel over so
 many hills, and thrid so many woods, as lie between Concord and
 Plymouth? Thank fortune it is all the way down hill, so they will get
 safely carried; and yet it seems as if it were writing against time
 and the sun to send a letter east, for no natural force forwards it.
 You should go dwell in the West, and then I would deluge you with
 letters, as boys throw feathers into the air to see the wind take
 them. I should rather fancy you at evening dwelling far away behind
 the serene curtain of the West,--the home of fair weather,--than over
 by the chilly sources of the east wind.
 
 What quiet thoughts have you nowadays which will float on that east
 wind to west, for so we may make our worst servants our
 carriers,--what progress made from _can't_ to _can_, in practice and
 theory? Under this category, you remember, we used to place all our
 philosophy. Do you have any still, startling, well moments, in which
 you think grandly, and speak with emphasis? Don't take this for
 sarcasm, for not in a year of the gods, I fear, will such a golden
 approach to plain speaking revolve again. But away with such fears; by
 a few miles of travel we have not distanced each other's sincerity.
 
 I grow savager and savager every day, as if fed on raw meat, and my
 tameness is only the repose of untamableness. I dream of looking
 abroad summer and winter, with free gaze, from some mountain-side,
 while my eyes revolve in an Egyptian slime of health,--I to be nature
 looking into nature with such easy sympathy as the blue-eyed grass in
 the meadow looks in the face of the sky. From some such recess I would
 put forth sublime thoughts daily, as the plant puts forth leaves.
 Now-a-nights I go on to the hill to see the sun set, as one would go
 home at evening; the bustle of the village has run on all day, and
 left me quite in the rear; but I see the sunset, and find that it can
 wait for my slow virtue.
 
 But I forget that you think more of this human nature than of this
 nature I praise. Why won't you believe that mine is more human than
 any single man or woman can be? that in it, in the sunset there, are
 all the qualities that can adorn a household, and that sometimes, in a
 fluttering leaf, one may hear all your Christianity preached.
 
 You see how unskillful a letter-writer I am, thus to have come to the
 end of my sheet when hardly arrived at the beginning of my story. I
 was going to be soberer, I assure you, but now have only room to add,
 that if the fates allot you a serene hour, don't fail to communicate
 some of its serenity to your friend,
 
      HENRY D. THOREAU.
 
 No, no. Improve so rare a gift for yourself, and send me of your
 leisure.
 
 
 TO MRS. LUCY BROWN (AT PLYMOUTH).
 
      CONCORD, Wednesday evening,
      September 8, [1841.]
 
 DEAR FRIEND,--Your note came wafted to my hand like the first leaf of
 the fall on the September wind, and I put only another interpretation
 upon its lines than upon the veins of those which are soon to be
 strewed around me. It is nothing but Indian summer here at present. I
 mean that any weather seems reserved expressly for our late purposes
 whenever we happen to be fulfilling them. I do not know what right I
 have to so much happiness, but rather hold it in reserve till the time
 of my desert.
 
 What with the crickets and the crowing of cocks, and the lowing of
 kine, our Concord life is sonorous enough. Sometimes I hear the cock
 bestir himself on his perch under my feet, and crow shrilly before
 dawn; and I think I might have been born any year for all the
 phenomena I know. We count sixteen eggs daily now, when arithmetic
 will only fetch the hens up to thirteen; but the world is young, and
 we wait to see this eccentricity complete its period.
 
 My verses on Friendship are already printed in the _Dial_; not
 expanded, but reduced to completeness by leaving out the long lines,
 which always have, or should have, a longer or at least another sense
 than short ones.
 
 Just now I am in the mid-sea of verses, and they actually rustle
 around me as the leaves would round the head of Autumnus himself
 should he thrust it up through some vales which I know; but, alas!
 many of them are but crisped and yellow leaves like his, I fear, and
 will deserve no better fate than to make mould for new harvests. I see
 the stanzas rise around me, verse upon verse, far and near, like the
 mountains from Agiocochook, not all having a terrestrial existence as
 yet, even as some of them may be clouds; but I fancy I see the gleam
 of some Sebago Lake and Silver Cascade, at whose well I may drink one
 day. I am as unfit for any practical purpose--I mean for the
 furtherance of the world's ends--as gossamer for ship-timber; and I,
 who am going to be a pencil-maker to-morrow,[16] can sympathize with
 God Apollo, who served King Admetus for a while on earth. But I
 believe he found it for his advantage at last,--as I am sure I shall,
 though I shall hold the nobler part at least out of the service.
 
 Don't attach any undue seriousness to this threnody, for I love my
 fate to the very core and rind, and could swallow it without paring
 it, I think. You ask if I have written any more poems? Excepting those
 which Vulcan is now forging, I have only discharged a few more bolts
 into the horizon,--in all, three hundred verses--and sent them, as I
 may say, over the mountains to Miss Fuller, who may have occasion to
 remember the old rhyme:--
 
      "Three scipen gode
      Comen mid than flode
      Three hundred cnihten."
 
 But these are far more Vandalic than they. In this narrow sheet there
 is not room even for one thought to root itself. But you must consider
 this an odd leaf of a volume, and that volume
 
      Your friend,
      HENRY D. THOREAU.
 
 
 TO MRS. LUCY BROWN (AT PLYMOUTH).
 
      CONCORD, October 5, 1841.
 
 DEAR FRIEND,--I send you Williams's[17] letter as the last
 remembrancer to one of those "whose acquaintance he had the pleasure
 to form while in Concord." It came quite unexpectedly to me, but I was
 very glad to receive it, though I hardly know whether my utmost
 sincerity and interest can inspire a sufficient answer to it. I should
 like to have you send it back by some convenient opportunity.
 
 Pray let me know what you are thinking about any day,--what most
 nearly concerns you. Last winter, you know, you did more than your
 share of the talking, and I did not complain for want of an
 opportunity. Imagine your stove-door out of order, at least, and then
 while I am fixing it you will think of enough things to say.
 
 What makes the value of your life at present? what dreams have you,
 and what realizations? You know there is a high table-land which not
 even the east wind reaches. Now can't we walk and chat upon its plane
 still, as if there were no lower latitudes? Surely our two destinies
 are topics interesting and grand enough for any occasion.
 
 I hope you have many gleams of serenity and health, or, if your body
 will grant you no positive respite, that you may, at any rate, enjoy
 your sickness occasionally, as much as I used to tell of. But here is
 the bundle going to be done up, so accept a "good-night" from
 
      HENRY D. THOREAU.
 
 
 TO MRS. LUCY BROWN (AT PLYMOUTH).
 
      CONCORD, March 2, 1842.
 
 DEAR FRIEND,--I believe I have nothing new to tell you, for what was
 news you have learned from other sources. I am much the same person
 that I was, who should be so much better; yet when I realize what has
 transpired, and the greatness of the part I am unconsciously acting, I
 am thrilled, and it seems as if there were none in history to match
 it.
 
 Soon after John's death I listened to a music-box, and if, at any
 time, that event had seemed inconsistent with the beauty and harmony
 of the universe, it was then gently constrained into the placid course
 of nature by those steady notes, in mild and unoffended tone echoing
 far and wide under the heavens. But I find these things more strange
 than sad to me. What right have I to grieve, who have not ceased to
 wonder? We feel at first as if some opportunities of kindness and
 sympathy were lost, but learn afterward that any _pure grief_ is ample
 recompense for all. That is, if we are faithful; for a great grief is
 but sympathy with the soul that disposes events, and is as natural as
 the resin on Arabian trees. Only Nature has a right to grieve
 perpetually, for she only is innocent. Soon the ice will melt, and the
 blackbirds sing along the river which he frequented, as pleasantly as
 ever. The same everlasting serenity will appear in this face of God,
 and we will not be sorrowful if he is not.
 
 We are made happy when reason can discover no occasion for it. The
 memory of some past moments is more persuasive than the experience of
 present ones. There have been visions of such breadth and brightness
 that these motes were invisible in their light.
 
 I do not wish to see John ever again,--I mean him who is dead,--but
 that other, whom only he would have wished to see, or to be, of whom
 he was the imperfect representative. For we are not what we are, nor
 do we treat or esteem each other for such, but for what we are capable
 of being.
 
 As for Waldo, he died as the mist rises from the brook, which the sun
 will soon dart his rays through. Do not the flowers die every autumn?
 He had not even taken root here. I was not startled to hear that he
 was dead; it seemed the most natural event that could happen. His fine
 organization demanded it, and nature gently yielded its request. It
 would have been strange if he had lived. Neither will nature manifest
 any sorrow at his death, but soon the note of the lark will be heard
 down in the meadow, and fresh dandelions will spring from the old
 stocks where he plucked them last summer.
 
 I have been living ill of late, but am now doing better. How do you
 live in that Plymouth world, nowadays?[18] Please remember me to Mary
 Russell. You must not blame me if I do _talk to the clouds_, for I
 remain
 
      Your friend,
      HENRY D. THOREAU.
 
 
 TO MRS. LUCY BROWN (AT PLYMOUTH).
 
      CONCORD, January 24, 1843.
 
 DEAR FRIEND,--The other day I wrote you a letter to go in Mrs.
 Emerson's bundle, but, as it seemed unworthy, I did not send it, and
 now, to atone for that, I am going to send this, whether it be worthy
 or not. I will not venture upon news, for, as all the household are
 gone to bed, I cannot learn what has been told you. Do you read any
 noble verses nowadays? or do not verses still seem noble? For my own
 part, they have been the only things I remembered, or that which
 occasioned them, when all things else were blurred and defaced. All
 things have put on mourning but they; for the elegy itself is some
 victorious melody or joy escaping from the wreck.
 
 It is a relief to read some true book, wherein all are equally
 dead,--equally alive. I think the best parts of Shakespeare would only
 be enchanced by the most thrilling and affecting events. I have found
 it so. And so much the more, as they are not intended for consolation.
 
 Do you think of coming to Concord again? I shall be glad to see you. I
 should be glad to know that I could see you when I would.
 
 We always seem to be living just on the brink of a pure and lofty
 intercourse, which would make the ills and trivialness of life
 ridiculous. After each little interval, though it be but for the
 night, we are prepared to meet each other as gods and goddesses.
 
 I seem to have dodged all my days with one or two persons, and lived
 upon expectation,--as if the bud would surely blossom; and so I am
 content to live.
 
 What means the fact--which is so common, so universal--that some soul
 that has lost all hope for itself can inspire in another listening
 soul an infinite confidence in it, even while it is expressing its
 despair?
 
 I am very happy in my present environment, though actually mean enough
 myself, and so, of course, all around me; yet, I am sure, we for the
 most part are transfigured to one another, and are that to the other
 which we aspire to be ourselves. The longest course of mean and
 trivial intercourse may not prevent my practicing this divine courtesy
 to my companion. Notwithstanding all I hear about brooms, and
 scouring, and taxes, and housekeeping, I am constrained to live a
 strangely mixed life,--as if even Valhalla might have its kitchen. We
 are all of us Apollos serving some Admetus.
 
 I think I must have some Muses in my pay that I know not of, for
 certain musical wishes of mine are answered as soon as entertained.
 Last summer I went to Hawthorne's suddenly for the express purpose of
 borrowing his music-box, and almost immediately Mrs. Hawthorne
 proposed to lend it to me. The other day I said I must go to Mrs.
 Barrett's to hear hers, and lo! straightway Richard Fuller sent me one
 for a present from Cambridge. It is a very good one. I should like to
 have you hear it. I shall not have to employ you to borrow for me now.
 Good-night.
 
      From your affectionate friend,
      H. D. T.
 
 
 TO RICHARD F. FULLER (AT CAMBRIDGE).
 
      CONCORD, January 16, 1843.
 
 DEAR RICHARD,--I need not thank you for your present, for I hear its
 music, which seems to be playing just for us two pilgrims marching
 over hill and dale of a summer afternoon, up those long Bolton hills
 and by those bright Harvard lakes, such as I see in the placid Lucerne
 on the lid; and whenever I hear it, it will recall happy hours passed
 with its donor.
 
 When did mankind make that foray into nature and bring off this booty?
 For certainly it is but history that some rare virtue in remote times
 plundered these strains from above and communicated them to men.
 Whatever we may think of it, it is a part of the harmony of the
 spheres you have sent me; which has condescended to serve us
 Admetuses, and I hope I may so behave that this may always be the
 tenor of your thought for me.
 
 If you have any strains, the conquest of your own spear or quill, to
 accompany these, let the winds waft them also to me.
 
 I write this with one of the "primaries" of my osprey's wings, which I
 have preserved over my glass for some state occasion, and now it
 offers.
 
 Mrs. Emerson sends her love.
 
 
 TO MRS. LUCY BROWN (AT PLYMOUTH).
 
      CONCORD, Friday evening,
      January 25, 1843.
 
 DEAR FRIEND,--Mrs. Emerson asks me to write you a letter, which she
 will put into her bundle to-morrow along with the "Tribunes" and
 "Standards," and miscellanies, and what not, to make an assortment.
 But what shall I write? You live a good way off, and I don't know that
 I have anything which will bear sending so far. But I am mistaken, or
 rather impatient when I say this,--for we all have a gift to send, not
 only when the year begins, but as long as interest and memory last. I
 don't know whether you have got the many I have sent you, or rather
 whether you were quite sure where they came from. I mean the letters I
 have sometimes launched off eastward in my thought; but if you have
 been happier at one time than another, think that then you received
 them. But this that I now send you is of another sort. It will go
 slowly, drawn by horses over muddy roads, and lose much of its little
 value by the way. You may have to pay for it, and it may not make you
 happy after all. But what shall be my new-year's gift, then? Why, I
 will send you my still fresh remembrance of the hours I have passed
 with you here, for I find in the remembrance of them the best gift
 you have left to me. We are poor and sick creatures at best; but we
 can have well memories, and sound and healthy thoughts of one another
 still, and an intercourse may be remembered which was without blur,
 and above us both.
 
 Perhaps you may like to know of my estate nowadays. As usual, I find
 it harder to account for the happiness I enjoy, than for the sadness
 which instructs me occasionally. If the little of this last which
 visits me would only be sadder, it would be happier. One while I am
 vexed by a sense of meanness; one while I simply wonder at the mystery
 of life; and at another, and at another, seem to rest on my oars, as
 if propelled by propitious breezes from I know not what quarter. But
 for the most part I am an idle, inefficient, lingering (one term will
 do as well as another, where all are true and none true enough) member
 of the great commonwealth, who have most need of my own charity,--if I
 could not be charitable and indulgent to myself, perhaps as good a
 subject for my own satire as any. You see how, when I come to talk of
 myself, I soon run dry, for I would fain make that a subject which can
 be no subject for me, at least not till I have the grace to rule
 myself.
 
 I do not venture to say anything about your griefs, for it would be
 unnatural for me to speak as if I grieved with you, when I think I do
 not. If I were to see you, it might be otherwise. But I know you will
 pardon the trivialness of this letter; and I only hope--as I know that
 you have reason to be so--that you are still happier than you are
 sad, and that you remember that the smallest seed of faith is of more
 worth than the largest fruit of happiness. I have no doubt that out of
 S----'s death you sometimes draw sweet consolation, not only for that,
 but for long-standing griefs, and may find some things made smooth by
 it, which before were rough.
 
 I wish you would communicate with me, and not think me unworthy to
 know any of your thoughts. Don't think me unkind because I have not
 written to you. I confess it was for so poor a reason as that you
 almost made a principle of not answering. I could not speak truly with
 this ugly fact in the way; and perhaps I wished to be assured, by such
 evidence as you could not voluntarily give, that it was a kindness.
 For every glance at the moon, does she not send me an answering ray?
 Noah would hardly have done himself the pleasure to release his dove,
 if she had not been about to come back to him with tidings of green
 islands amid the waste.
 
 But these are far-fetched reasons. I am not speaking directly enough
 to yourself now; so let me say _directly_
 
      From your friend,
      HENRY D. THOREAU.
 
 Exactly when correspondence began between Emerson and Thoreau is not
 now to be ascertained, since all the letters do not seem to have been
 preserved. Their acquaintance opened while Thoreau was in college,
 although Emerson may have seen the studious boy at the town school in
 Concord, or at the "Academy" there, while fitting for college. But
 they only came to know each other as sharers of the same thoughts and
 aspirations in the autumn of 1837, when, on hearing a new lecture of
 Emerson's, Helen Thoreau said to Mrs. Brown, then living or visiting
 in the Thoreau family, "Henry has a thought very like that in his
 journal" (which he had newly begun to keep). Mrs. Brown desired to see
 the passage, and soon bore it to her sister, Mrs. Emerson, whose
 husband saw it, and asked Mrs. Brown to bring her young friend to see
 him. By 1838 their new relation of respect was established, and
 Emerson wrote to a correspondent, "I delight much in my young friend,
 who seems to have as free and erect a mind as any I have ever met." A
 year later (Aug. 9, 1839), he wrote to Carlyle, "I have a young poet
 in this village, named Thoreau, who writes the truest verses." Indeed,
 it was in the years 1839-40 that he seems to have written the poems by
 which he is best remembered. Thoreau told me in his last illness that
 he had written many verses and destroyed many,--this fact he then
 regretted, although he had done it at the instance of Emerson, who did
 not praise them. "But," said he, "they may have been better than we
 thought them, twenty years ago."
 
 The earliest note which I find from Emerson to Thoreau bears no date,
 but must have been written before 1842, for at no later time could the
 persons named in it have visited Concord together. Most likely it was
 in the summer of 1840, and to the same date do I assign a note asking
 Henry to join the Emersons in a party to the Cliffs (_scopuli
 Pulchri-Portus_), and to bring his flute,--for on that pastoral reed
 Thoreau played sweetly. The first series of letters from Thoreau to
 Emerson begins early in 1843, about the time the letters just given
 were written to Mrs. Brown. In the first he gives thanks to Emerson
 for the hospitality of his house in the two preceding years; a theme
 to which he returned a few months later,--for I doubt not the lovely
 sad poem called "The Departure" was written at Staten Island soon
 after his leaving the Emerson house in Concord for the more stately
 but less congenial residence of William Emerson at Staten Island,
 whither he betook himself in May, 1843. This first letter, however,
 was sent from the Concord home to Waldo Emerson at Staten Island, or
 perhaps in New York, where he was that winter giving a course of
 lectures.
 
 In explanation of the passages concerning Bronson Alcott, in this
 letter, it should be said that he was then living at the Hosmer
 Cottage, in Concord, with his English friends, Charles Lane and Henry
 Wright, and that he had refused to pay a tax in support of what he
 considered an unjust government, and was arrested by the constable,
 Sam Staples, in consequence.
 
 
 TO R. W. EMERSON (AT NEW YORK).
 
      CONCORD, January 24, 1843.
 
 DEAR FRIEND,--The best way to correct a mistake is to make it right. I
 had not spoken of writing to you, but as you say you are about to
 write to me when you get my letter, I make haste on my part in order
 to get yours the sooner. I don't well know what to say to earn the
 forthcoming epistle, unless that Edith takes rapid strides in the arts
 and sciences--or music and natural history--as well as over the
 carpet; that she says "papa" less and less abstractedly every day,
 looking in _my_ face,--which may sound like a _Ranz des Vaches_ to
 yourself. And Ellen declares every morning that "papa _may_ come home
 to-night;" and by and by it will have changed to such positive
 statement as that "papa came home _larks_ night."
 
 Elizabeth Hoar still flits about these clearings, and I meet her here
 and there, and in all houses but her own, but as if I were not the
 less of her family for all that. I have made slight acquaintance also
 with one Mrs. Lidian Emerson, who almost persuades me to be a
 Christian, but I fear I as often lapse into heathenism. Mr.
 O'Sullivan[19] was here three days. I met him at the Atheneum
 [Concord], and went to Hawthorne's [at the Old Manse] to tea with him.
 He expressed a great deal of interest in your poems, and wished me to
 give him a list of them, which I did; he saying he did not know but he
 should notice them. He is a rather puny-looking man, and did not
 strike me. We had nothing to say to one another, and therefore we said
 a great deal! He, however, made a point of asking me to write for his
 Review, which I shall be glad to do. He is, at any rate, one of the
 not-bad, but does not by any means take you by storm,--no, nor by
 calm, which is the best way. He expects to see you in New York. After
 tea I carried him and Hawthorne to the Lyceum.
 
 Mr. Alcott has not altered much since you left. I think you will find
 him much the same sort of person. With Mr. Lane I have had one regular
 chat _ la_ George Minott, which of course was greatly to our mutual
 grati- and edification; and, as two or three as regular conversations
 have taken place since, I fear there may have been a precession of the
 equinoxes. Mr. Wright, according to the last accounts, is in Lynn,
 with uncertain aims and prospects,--maturing slowly, perhaps, as
 indeed are all of us. I suppose they have told you how near Mr. Alcott
 went to the jail, but I can add a good anecdote to the rest. When
 Staples came to collect Mrs. Ward's taxes, my sister Helen asked him
 what he thought Mr. Alcott meant,--what his idea was,--and he
 answered, "I vum, I believe it was nothing but principle, for I never
 heerd a man talk honester."
 
 There was a lecture on Peace by a Mr. Spear (ought he not to be beaten
 into a plowshare?), the same evening, and, as the gentlemen, Lane and
 Alcott, dined at our house while the matter was in suspense,--that is,
 while the constable was waiting for his receipt from the jailer,--we
 there settled it that we, that is, Lane and myself, perhaps, should
 agitate the State while Winkelried lay in durance. But when, over the
 audience, I saw our hero's head moving in the free air of the
 Universalist church, my fire all went out, and the State was safe as
 far as I was concerned. But Lane, it seems, had cogitated and even
 written on the matter, in the afternoon, and so, out of courtesy,
 taking his point of departure from the Spear-man's lecture, he drove
 gracefully _in medias res_, and gave the affair a very good setting
 out; but, to spoil all, our martyr very characteristically, but, as
 artists would say, in bad taste, brought up the rear with a "My
 Prisons," which made us forget Silvio Pellico himself.
 
 Mr. Lane wishes me to ask you to see if there is anything for him in
 the New York office, and pay the charges. Will you tell me what to do
 with Mr. [Theodore] Parker, who was to lecture February 15th? Mrs.
 Emerson says my letter is written instead of one from her.
 
 At the end of this strange letter I will not write--what alone I had
 to say--to thank you and Mrs. Emerson for your long kindness to me. It
 would be more ungrateful than my constant thought. I have been your
 pensioner for nearly two years, and still left free as under the sky.
 It has been as free a gift as the sun or the summer, though I have
 sometimes molested you with my mean acceptance of it,--I who have
 failed to render even those slight services of the _hand_ which would
 have been for a sign at least; and, by the fault of my nature, have
 failed of many better and higher services. But I will not trouble you
 with this, but for once thank you as well as Heaven.
 
      Your friend, H. D. T.
 
 Mrs. Lidian Emerson, the wife of R. W. Emerson, and her two daughters,
 Ellen and Edith, are named in this first letter, and will be
 frequently mentioned in the correspondence. At this date, Edith, now
 Mrs. W. H. Forbes, was fourteen months old. Mr. Emerson's mother,
 Madam Ruth Emerson, was also one of the household, which had for a
 little more than seven years occupied the well-known house under the
 trees, east of the village.
 
 
 TO R. W. EMERSON (AT NEW YORK).
 
      CONCORD, February 10, 1843.
 
 DEAR FRIEND,--I have stolen one of your own sheets to write you a
 letter upon, and I hope, with two layers of ink, to turn it into a
 comforter. If you like to receive a letter from me, too, I am glad,
 for it gives me pleasure to write. But don't let it come amiss; it
 must fall as harmlessly as leaves settle on the landscape. I will tell
 you what we are doing this now. Supper is done, and Edith--the
 dessert, perhaps more than the dessert--is brought in, or even comes
 in _per se_; and round she goes, now to this altar, and then to that,
 with her monosyllabic invocation of "oc," "oc." It makes me think of
 "Langue d'oc." She must belong to that province. And like the gypsies
 she talks a language of her own while she understands ours. While she
 jabbers Sanskrit, Parsee, Pehlvi, say "Edith go bah!" and "bah" it is.
 No intelligence passes between us. She knows. It is a capital
 joke,--that is the reason she smiles so. How well the secret is kept!
 she never descends to explanation. It is not buried liked a common
 secret, bolstered up on two sides, but by an eternal silence on the
 one side, at least. It has been long kept, and comes in from the
 unexplored horizon, like a blue mountain range, to end abruptly at our
 door one day. (Don't stumble at this steep simile.) And now she
 studies the heights and depths of nature
 
      On shoulders whirled in some eccentric orbit
      Just by old Pstum's temples and the perch
      Where Time doth plume his wings.
 
 And now she runs the race over the carpet, while all Olympia
 applauds,--mamma, grandma, and uncle, good Grecians all,--and that
 dark-hued barbarian, Partheanna Parker, whose shafts go through and
 through, not backward! Grandmamma smiles over all, and mamma is
 wondering what papa would say, should she descend on Carlton House
 some day. "Larks night" 's abed, dreaming of "pleased faces" far away.
 But now the trumpet sounds, the games are over; some Hebe comes, and
 Edith is translated. I don't know where; it must be to some cloud, for
 I never was there.
 
 _Query_: what becomes of the answers Edith thinks, but cannot express?
 She really gives you glances which are before this world was. You
 can't feel any difference of age, except that you have longer legs and
 arms.
 
 Mrs. Emerson said I must tell you about domestic affairs, when I
 mentioned that I was going to write. Perhaps it will inform you of the
 state of all if I only say that I am well and happy in your house here
 in Concord.
 
      Your friend,
      HENRY.
 
 Don't forget to tell us what to do with Mr. Parker when you write
 next. I lectured this week. It was as bright a night as you could
 wish. I hope there were no stars thrown away on the occasion.
 
 [A part of the same letter, though bearing a date two days later, and
 written in a wholly different style, as from one sage to another, is
 this postscript:]
 
 
      February 12, 1843.
 
 DEAR FRIEND,--As the packet still tarries, I will send you some
 thoughts, which I have lately relearned, as the latest public and
 private news.
 
 How mean are our relations to one another! Let us pause till they are
 nobler. A little silence, a little rest, is good. It would be
 sufficient employment only to cultivate true ones.
 
 The richest gifts we can bestow are the least marketable. We hate the
 kindness which we understand. A noble person confers no such gift as
 his whole confidence: none so exalts the giver and the receiver; it
 produces the truest gratitude. Perhaps it is only essential to
 friendship that some vital trust should have been reposed by the one
 in the other. I feel addressed and probed even to the remote parts of
 my being when one nobly shows, even in trivial things, an implicit
 faith in me. When such divine commodities are so near and cheap, how
 strange that it should have to be each day's discovery! A threat or a
 curse may be forgotten, but this mild trust translates me. I am no
 more of this earth; it acts dynamically; it changes my very substance.
 I cannot do what before I did. I cannot be what before I was. Other
 chains may be broken, but in the darkest night, in the remotest place,
 I trail this thread. Then things cannot _happen_. What if God were to
 confide in us for a moment! Should we not then be gods?
 
 How subtle a thing is this confidence! Nothing sensible passes
 between; never any consequences are to be apprehended should it be
 misplaced. Yet something has transpired. A new behavior springs; the
 ship carries new ballast in her hold. A sufficiently great and
 generous trust could never be abused. It should be cause to lay down
 one's life,--which would not be to lose it. Can there be any mistake
 up there? Don't the gods know where to invest their wealth? Such
 confidence, too, would be reciprocal. When one confides greatly in
 you, he will feel the roots of an equal trust fastening themselves in
 him. When such trust has been received or reposed, we dare not speak,
 hardly to see each other; our voices sound harsh and untrustworthy. We
 are as instruments which the Powers have dealt with. Through what
 straits would we not carry this little burden of a magnanimous trust!
 Yet no harm could possibly come, but simply faithlessness. Not a
 feather, not a straw, is intrusted; that packet is empty. It is only
 _committed_ to us, and, as it were, all things are committed to us.
 
 The kindness I have longest remembered has been of this sort,--the
 sort unsaid; so far behind the speaker's lips that almost it already
 lay in my heart. It did not have far to go to be communicated. The
 gods cannot misunderstand, man cannot explain. We communicate like the
 burrows of foxes, in silence and darkness, under ground. We are
 undermined by faith and love. How much more full is Nature where we
 think the empty space is than where we place the solids!--full of
 fluid influences. Should we ever communicate but by these? The spirit
 abhors a vacuum more than Nature. There is a tide which pierces the
 pores of the air. These aerial rivers, let us not pollute their
 currents. What meadows do they course through? How many fine mails
 there are which traverse their routes! He is privileged who gets his
 letter franked by them.
 
 I believe these things.
 
      HENRY D. THOREAU.
 
 Emerson replied to these letters in two epistles of dates from
 February 4 to 12, 1843,--in the latter asking Thoreau to aid him in
 editing the April number of the _Dial_ of which he had taken charge.
 Among other things, Emerson desired a manuscript of Charles Lane,
 Alcott's English friend, to be sent to him in New York, where he was
 detained several weeks by his lectures. He added: "Have we no news
 from Wheeler? Has Bartlett none?" Of these persons, the first, Charles
 Stearns Wheeler, a college classmate of Thoreau, and later Greek tutor
 in the college, had gone to Germany,--where he died the next
 summer,--and was contributing to the quarterly _Dial_. Robert
 Bartlett, of Plymouth, a townsman of Mrs. Emerson, was Wheeler's
 intimate friend, with whom he corresponded.[20] To this editorial
 request Thoreau, who was punctuality itself, replied at once.
 
 
 TO R. W. EMERSON (AT NEW YORK).
 
      CONCORD, February 15, 1843.
 
 MY DEAR FRIEND,--I got your letters, one yesterday and the other
 to-day, and they have made me quite happy. As a packet is to go in the
 morning, I will give you a hasty account of the _Dial_. I called on
 Mr. Lane this afternoon, and brought away, together with an abundance
 of good-will, first, a bulky catalogue of books without
 commentary,--some eight hundred, I think he told me, with an
 introduction filling one sheet,--ten or a dozen pages, say, though I
 have only glanced at them; second, a review--twenty-five or thirty
 printed pages--of Conversations on the Gospels, Record of a School,
 and Spiritual Culture, with rather copious extracts. However, it is a
 good subject, and Lane says it gives him satisfaction. I will give it
 a faithful reading directly. [These were Alcott's publications,
 reviewed by Lane.] And now I come to the little end of the horn; for
 myself, I have brought along the Minor Greek Poets, and will mine
 there for a scrap or two, at least. As for Etzler, I don't remember
 any "rude and snappish speech" that you made, and if you did it must
 have been longer than anything I had written; however, here is the
 book still, and I will try. Perhaps I have some few scraps in my
 Journal which you may choose to print. The translation of the schylus
 I should like very well to continue anon, if it should be worth the
 while. As for poetry, I have not remembered to write any for some
 time; it has quite slipped my mind; but sometimes I think I hear the
 mutterings of the thunder. Don't you remember that last summer we
 heard a low, tremulous sound in the woods and over the hills, and
 thought it was partridges or rocks, and it proved to be thunder gone
 down the river? But sometimes it was over Wayland way, and at last
 burst over our heads. So we'll not despair by reason of the drought.
 You see it takes a good many words to supply the place of one deed; a
 hundred lines to a cobweb, and but one cable to a man-of-war. The
 _Dial_ case needs to be reformed in many particulars. There is no news
 from Wheeler, none from Bartlett.
 
 They all look well and happy in this house, where it gives me much
 pleasure to dwell.
 
      Yours in haste, HENRY.
 
 P. S.
 
      Wednesday evening, February 16.
 
 DEAR FRIEND,--I have time to write a few words about the _Dial_. I
 have just received the three first signatures, which do not yet
 complete Lane's piece. He will place five hundred copies for sale at
 Munroe's bookstore. Wheeler has sent you two full sheets--more about
 the German universities--and proper names, which will have to be
 printed in alphabetical order for convenience; what this one has done,
 that one is doing, and the other intends to do. Hammer-Purgstall (Von
 Hammer) may be one, for aught I know. However, there are two or three
 _things_ in it, as well as names. One of the books of Herodotus is
 discovered to be out of place. He says something about having sent
 Lowell, by the last steamer, a budget of literary news, which he will
 have communicated to you ere this. Mr. Alcott has a letter from
 Heraud,[21] and a book written by him,--the Life of Savonarola,--which
 he wishes to have republished here. Mr. Lane will write a notice of
 it. (The latter says that what is in the New York post-office _may_ be
 directed to Mr. Alcott.) Miss [Elizabeth] Peabody has sent a "Notice
 to the readers of the _Dial_" which is not good.
 
 Mr. Chapin lectured this evening, and so rhetorically that I forgot my
 duty and heard very little. I find myself better than I have been,
 and am meditating some other method of paying debts than by lectures
 and writing,--which will only do to talk about. If anything of that
 "other" sort should come to your ears in New York, will you remember
 it for me?
 
 Excuse this scrawl, which I have written over the embers in the
 dining-room. I hope that you live on good terms with yourself and the
 gods.
 
      Yours in haste,       HENRY.
 
 Mr. Lane and his lucubrations proved to be tough subjects, and the
 next letter has more to say about them and the _Dial_. Lane had
 undertaken to do justice to Mr. Alcott and his books, as may still be
 read in the pages of that April number of the Transcendentalist
 quarterly.
 
 
 TO R. W. EMERSON (AT NEW YORK).
 
      CONCORD, February 20, 1843.
 
 MY DEAR FRIEND,--I have read Mr. Lane's review, and _can_ say,
 speaking for this world and for fallen man, that "it is good for us."
 As they say in geology, time never fails, there is always enough of
 it, so I may say, criticism never fails; but if I go and read
 elsewhere, I say it is good,--far better than any notice Mr. Alcott
 has received, or is likely to receive from another quarter. It is at
 any rate "the other side" which Boston needs to hear. I do not send it
 to you, because time is precious, and because I think you would accept
 it, after all. After speaking briefly of the fate of Goethe and
 Carlyle in their own countries, he says, "To Emerson in his own
 circle is but slowly accorded a worthy response; and Alcott, almost
 utterly neglected," etc. I will strike out what relates to yourself,
 and correcting some verbal faults, send the rest to the printer with
 Lane's initials.
 
 The catalogue needs amendment, I think. It wants completeness now. It
 should consist of such books only as they would tell Mr. [F. H.] Hedge
 and [Theodore] Parker they had got; omitting the Bible, the classics,
 and much besides,--for there the incompleteness begins. But you will
 be here in season for this.
 
 It is frequently easy to make Mr. Lane more universal and attractive;
 to write, for instance, "universal ends" instead of "the universal
 end," just as we pull open the petals of a flower with our fingers
 where they are confined by its own sweets. Also he had better not say
 "books designed for the nucleus of a _Home_ University," until he
 makes that word "home" ring solid and universal too. This is that
 abominable dialect. He had just given me a notice of George Bradford's
 Fnelon for the Record of the Months, and speaks of extras of the
 Review and Catalogue, if they are printed,--even a hundred, or
 thereabouts. How shall this be arranged? Also he wishes to use some
 manuscripts of his which are in your possession, if you do not. Can I
 get them?
 
 I think of no news to tell you. It is a serene summer day here, all
 above the snow. The hens steal their nests, and I steal their eggs
 still, as formerly. This is what I do with the hands. Ah, labor,--it
 is a divine institution, and conversation with many men and hens.
 
 Do not think that my letters require as many special answers. I get
 one as often as you write to Concord. Concord inquires for you daily,
 as do all the members of this house. You must make haste home before
 we have settled all the great questions, for they are fast being
 disposed of. But I must leave room for Mrs. Emerson.
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 Mrs. Emerson's letter, after speaking of other matters, gave a lively
 sketch of Thoreau at one of Alcott's Conversations in her house, which
 may be quoted as illustrating the young Nature-worshiper's position at
 the time, and the more humane and socialistic spirit of Alcott and
 Lane, who were soon to leave Concord for their experiment of
 communistic life at "Fruitlands," in the rural town of Harvard.
 
 "Last evening we had the 'Conversation,' though, owing to the bad
 weather, but few attended. The subjects were: What is Prophecy? Who is
 a Prophet? and The Love of Nature. Mr. Lane decided, as for all time
 and the race, that this same love of nature--of which Henry [Thoreau]
 was the champion, and Elizabeth Hoar and Lidian (though L. disclaimed
 possessing it herself) his faithful squiresses--that this love was the
 most subtle and dangerous of sins; a refined idolatry, much more to be
 dreaded than gross wickednesses, because the gross sinner would be
 alarmed by the depth of his degradation, and come up from it in
 terror, but the unhappy idolaters of Nature were deceived by the
 refined quality of their sin, and would be the last to enter the
 kingdom. Henry frankly affirmed to both the wise men that they were
 wholly deficient in the faculty in question, and therefore could not
 judge of it. And Mr. Alcott as frankly answered that it was because
 they went beyond the mere material objects, and were filled with
 spiritual love and perception (as Mr. T. was not), that they seemed to
 Mr. Thoreau not to appreciate outward nature. I am very heavy, and
 have spoiled a most excellent story. I have given you no idea of the
 scene, which was ineffably comic, though it made no laugh at the time;
 I scarcely laughed at it myself,--too deeply amused to give the usual
 sign. Henry was brave and noble; well as I have always liked him, he
 still grows upon me."
 
 Before going to Staten Island in May, 1843, Thoreau answered a letter
 from the same Richard Fuller who had made him the musical gift in the
 previous winter. He was at Harvard College, and desired to know
 something of Thoreau's pursuits there,--concerning which Channing says
 in his Life,[22] "He was a respectable student, having done there a
 bold reading in English poetry,--even to some portions or the whole of
 Davenant's 'Gondibert.'" This, Thoreau does not mention in his letter,
 but it was one of the things that attracted Emerson's notice, since he
 also had the same taste for the Elizabethan and Jacobean English
 poets. An English youth, Henry Headley, pupil of Dr. Parr, and
 graduate of Oxford in 1786, had preceded Thoreau in this study of
 poets that had become obsolete; and it was perhaps Headley's volume,
 "Select Beauties of Ancient English Poetry, with Remarks by the late
 Henry Headley," published long after his death,[23] that served
 Thoreau as a guide to Quarles and the Fletchers, Daniel, Drummond,
 Drayton, Habington, and Raleigh,--poets that few Americans had heard
 of in 1833.
 
 
 TO RICHARD F. FULLER (AT CAMBRIDGE).
 
      CONCORD, April 2, 1843.
 
 DEAR RICHARD,--I was glad to receive a letter from you so bright and
 cheery. You speak of not having made any conquests with your own spear
 or quill as yet; but if you are tempering your spear-head during these
 days, and fitting a straight and tough shaft thereto, will not that
 suffice? We are more pleased to consider the hero in the forest
 cutting cornel or ash for his spear, than marching in triumph with his
 trophies. The present hour is always wealthiest when it is poorer than
 the future ones, as that is the pleasantest site which affords the
 pleasantest prospects.
 
 What you say about your studies furnishing you with a "mimic idiom"
 only, reminds me that we shall all do well if we learn so much as to
 talk,--to speak truth. The only fruit which even much living yields
 seems to be often only some trivial success,--the ability to do some
 slight thing better. We make conquest only of husks and shells for
 the most part,--at least apparently,--but sometimes these are cinnamon
 and spices, you know. Even the grown hunter you speak of slays a
 thousand buffaloes, and brings off only their hides and tongues. What
 immense sacrifices, what hecatombs and holocausts, the gods exact for
 very slight favors! How much sincere life before we can even utter one
 sincere word.
 
 What I was learning in college was chiefly, I think, to express
 myself, and I see now, that as the old orator prescribed, 1st, action;
 2d, action; 3d, action; my teachers should have prescribed to me, 1st,
 sincerity; 2d, sincerity; 3d, sincerity. The old mythology is
 incomplete without a god or goddess of sincerity, on whose altars we
 might offer up all the products of our farms, our workshops, and our
 studies. It should be our Lar when we sit on the hearth, and our
 Tutelar Genius when we walk abroad. This is the only panacea. I mean
 sincerity in our dealings with ourselves mainly; any other is
 comparatively easy. But I must stop before I get to 17thly. I believe
 I have but one text and one sermon.
 
 Your rural adventures beyond the West Cambridge hills have probably
 lost nothing by distance of time or space. I used to hear only the
 sough of the wind in the woods of Concord, when I was striving to give
 my attention to a page of calculus. But, depend upon it, you will love
 your native hills the better for being separated from them.
 
 I expect to leave Concord, which is my Rome, and its people, who are
 my Romans, in May, and go to New York, to be a tutor in Mr. William
 Emerson's family. So I will bid you good-by till I see you or hear
 from you again.
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 Going to Staten Island, early in May, 1843, Thoreau's first care was
 to write to his "Romans, countrymen, and lovers by the banks of the
 Musketaquid,"--beginning with his mother, his sisters, and Mrs.
 Emerson. To Sophia and Mrs. E. he wrote May 22,--to Helen, with a few
 touching verses on his brother John, the next day; and then he resumed
 the correspondence with Emerson. It seems that one of his errands near
 New York was to make the acquaintance of literary men and journalists
 in the city, in order to find a vehicle for publication, such as his
 neighbor Hawthorne had finally found in the pages of the _Democratic
 Review_. For this purpose Thoreau made himself known to Henry James,
 and other friends of Emerson, and to Horace Greeley, then in the first
 freshness of his success with the _Tribune_,--a newspaper hardly more
 than two years old then, but destined to a great career, in which
 several of the early Transcendentalists took some part.
 
 
 TO HIS FATHER AND MOTHER (AT CONCORD).
 
      CASTLETON, STATEN ISLAND, May 11, 1843.
 
 DEAR MOTHER AND FRIENDS AT HOME,--We arrived here safely at ten
 o'clock on Sunday morning, having had as good a passage as usual,
 though we ran aground and were detained a couple of hours in the
 Thames River, till the tide came to our relief. At length we curtseyed
 up to a wharf just the other side of their Castle Garden,--very
 incurious about them and their city. I believe my vacant looks,
 absolutely inaccessible to questions, did at length satisfy an army of
 starving cabmen that I did not want a hack, cab, or anything of that
 sort as yet. It was the only demand the city made on us; as if a
 wheeled vehicle of some sort were the sum and summit of a reasonable
 man's wants. "Having tried the water," they seemed to say, "will you
 not return to the pleasant securities of land carriage? Else why your
 boat's prow turned toward the shore at last?" They are a sad-looking
 set of fellows, not permitted to come on board, and I pitied them.
 They had been expecting me, it would seem, and did really wish that I
 should take a cab; though they did not seem rich enough to supply me
 with one.
 
 It was a confused jumble of heads and soiled coats, dangling from
 flesh-colored faces,--all swaying to and fro, as by a sort of
 undertow, while each whipstick, true as the needle to the pole, still
 preserved that level and direction in which its proprietor had
 dismissed his forlorn interrogatory. They took sight from them,--the
 lash being wound up thereon, to prevent your attention from wandering,
 or to make it concentre upon its object by the spiral line. They began
 at first, perhaps, with the modest, but rather confident inquiry,
 "Want a cab, sir?" but as their despair increased, it took the
 affirmative tone, as the disheartened and irresolute are apt to do:
 "You want a cab, sir," or even, "You want a nice cab, sir, to take you
 to Fourth Street." The question which one had bravely and hopefully
 begun to put, another had the tact to take up and conclude with fresh
 emphasis,--twirling it from his particular whipstick as if it had
 emanated from his lips,--as the sentiment did from his heart. Each one
 could truly say, "Them 's my sentiments." But it was a sad sight.
 
 I am seven and a half miles from New York, and, as it would take half
 a day at least, have not been there yet. I have already run over no
 small part of the island, to the highest hill, and some way along the
 shore. From the hill directly behind the house I can see New York,
 Brooklyn, Long Island, the Narrows, through which vessels bound to and
 from all parts of the world chiefly pass,--Sandy Hook and the
 Highlands of Neversink (part of the coast of New Jersey),--and, by
 going still farther up the hill, the Kill van Kull, and Newark Bay.
 From the pinnacle of one Madame Grimes's house, the other night at
 sunset, I could see almost round the island. Far in the horizon there
 was a fleet of sloops bound up the Hudson, which seemed to be going
 over the edge of the earth; and in view of these trading ships
 commerce seems quite imposing.
 
 But it is rather derogatory that your dwelling-place should be only a
 neighborhood to a great city,--to live on an inclined plane. I do not
 like their cities and forts, with their morning and evening guns, and
 sails flapping in one's eye. I want a whole continent to breathe in,
 and a good deal of solitude and silence, such as all Wall Street
 cannot buy,--nor Broadway with its wooden pavement. I must live along
 the beach, on the southern shore, which looks directly out to
 sea,--and see what that great parade of water means, that dashes and
 roars, and has not yet wet me, as long as I have lived.
 
 I must not know anything about my condition and relations here till
 what is not permanent is worn off. I have not yet subsided. Give me
 time enough, and I may like it. All my inner man heretofore has been a
 Concord impression; and here come these Sandy Hook and Coney Island
 breakers to meet and modify the former; but it will be long before I
 can make nature look as innocently grand and inspiring as in Concord.
 
      Your affectionate son,
      HENRY D. THOREAU.
 
 
 TO SOPHIA THOREAU (AT CONCORD).
 
      CASTLETON, STATEN ISLAND, May 22, 1843.
 
 DEAR SOPHIA,--I have had a severe cold ever since I came here, and
 have been confined to the house for the last week with bronchitis,
 though I am now getting out, so I have not seen much in the botanical
 way. The cedar seems to be one of the most common trees here, and the
 fields are very fragrant with it. There are also the gum and tulip
 trees. The latter is not very common, but is very large and beautiful,
 having flowers as large as tulips, and as handsome. It is not time for
 it yet.
 
 The woods are now full of a large honeysuckle in full bloom, which
 differs from ours in being red instead of white, so that at first I
 did not know its genus. The painted-cup is very common in the meadows
 here. Peaches, and especially cherries, seem to grow by all the
 fences. Things are very forward here compared with Concord. The
 apricots growing out-of-doors are already as large as plums. The
 apple, pear, peach, cherry, and plum trees have shed their blossoms.
 The whole island is like a garden, and affords very fine scenery.
 
 In front of the house is a very extensive wood, beyond which is the
 sea, whose roar I can hear all night long, when there is a wind; if
 easterly winds have prevailed on the Atlantic. There are always some
 vessels in sight,--ten, twenty, or thirty miles off,--and Sunday
 before last there were hundreds in long procession, stretching from
 New York to Sandy Hook, and far beyond, for Sunday is a lucky day.
 
 I went to New York Saturday before last. A walk of half an hour, by
 half a dozen houses, along the Richmond road--that is the road that
 leads to Richmond, on which we live--brings me to the village of
 Stapleton, in Southfield, where is the lower dock; but if I prefer I
 can walk along the shore three quarters of a mile farther toward New
 York to the quarantine village of Castleton, to the upper dock, which
 the boat leaves five or six times every day, a quarter of an hour
 later than the former place. Farther on is the village of New
 Brighton, and farther still Port Richmond, which villages another
 steamboat visits.
 
 In New York I saw George Ward, and also Giles Waldo and William
 Tappan, whom I can describe better when I have seen them more. They
 are young friends of Mr. Emerson. Waldo came down to the island to see
 me the next day. I also saw the Great Western, the Croton water-works,
 and the picture-gallery of the National Academy of Design. But I have
 not had time to see or do much yet.
 
 Tell Miss Ward I shall try to put my microscope to a good use, and if
 I find any new and preservable flower, will throw it into my
 commonplace-book. Garlic, the original of the common onion, grows here
 all over the fields, and during its season spoils the cream and butter
 for the market, as the cows like it very much.
 
 Tell Helen there are two schools of late established in the
 neighborhood, with large prospects, or rather designs, one for boys
 and another for girls. The latter by a Miss Errington, and though it
 is only small as yet, I will keep my ears open for her in such
 directions. The encouragement is very slight.
 
 I hope you will not be washed away by the Irish sea.
 
 Tell Mother I think my cold was not wholly owing to imprudence.
 Perhaps I was being acclimated.
 
 Tell Father that Mr. Tappan, whose son I know,--and whose clerks young
 Tappan and Waldo are,--has invented and established a new and very
 important business, which Waldo thinks would allow them to burn
 ninety-nine out of one hundred of the stores in New York, which now
 only offset and cancel one another. It is a kind of intelligence
 office for the whole country, with branches in the principal cities,
 giving information with regard to the credit and affairs of every man
 of business of the country. Of course it is not popular at the South
 and West. It is an extensive business and will employ a great many
 clerks.
 
 Love to all--not forgetting Aunt and Aunts--and Miss and Mrs. Ward.
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 On the 23d of May he wrote from Castleton to his sister Helen thus:--
 
 DEAR HELEN,--In place of something fresher, I send you the following
 verses from my Journal, written some time ago:--
 
      Brother, where dost thou dwell?
        What sun shines for thee now?
      Dost thou indeed fare well
        As we wished here below?
 
      What season didst thou find?
        'T was winter here.
      Are not the Fates more kind
        Than they appear?
 
      Is thy brow clear again,
        As in thy youthful years?
      And was that ugly pain
        The summit of thy fears?[24]
 
      Yet thou wast cheery still;
        They could not quench thy fire;
      Thou didst abide their will,
        And then retire.
 
      Where chiefly shall I look
        To feel thy presence near?
      Along the neighboring brook
        May I thy voice still hear?
 
      Dost thou still haunt the brink
        Of yonder river's tide?
      And may I ever think
        That thou art by my side?
 
      What bird wilt thou employ
        To bring me word of thee?
      For it would give them joy,--
        'T would give them liberty,
      To serve their former lord
        With wing and minstrelsy.
 
      A sadder strain mixed with their song,
        They've slowlier built their nests;
      Since thou art gone
        Their lively labor rests.
 
      Where is the finch, the thrush
        I used to hear?
      Ah, they could well abide
        The dying year.
 
      Now they no more return,
        I hear them not;
      They have remained to mourn,
        Or else forgot.
 
 As the first letter of Thoreau to Emerson was to thank him for his
 lofty friendship, so now the first letter to Mrs. Emerson, after
 leaving her house, was to say similar things, with a passing allusion
 to her love of flowers and of gardening, in which she surpassed all
 his acquaintance in Concord, then and afterward. A letter to Emerson
 followed, touching on the _Dial_ and on several of his new and old
 acquaintance. "Rockwood Hoar" is the person since known as judge and
 cabinet officer,--the brother of Senator Hoar, and of Thoreau's
 special friends Elizabeth and Edward Hoar. Channing is the poet, who
 had lately printed his first volume, without finding many readers.
 
 
 TO MRS. EMERSON (AT CONCORD).
 
      CASTLETON, STATEN ISLAND, May 22, 1843.
 
 MY DEAR FRIEND,--I believe a good many conversations with you were
 left in an unfinished state, and now indeed I don't know where to take
 them up. But I will resume some of the unfinished silence. I shall not
 hesitate to know you. I think of you as some elder sister of mine,
 whom I could not have avoided,--a sort of lunar influence,--only of
 such age as the moon, whose time is measured by her light. You must
 know that you represent to me woman, for I have not traveled very far
 or wide,--and what if I had? I like to deal with you, for I believe
 you do not lie or steal, and these are very rare virtues. I thank you
 for your influence for two years. I was fortunate to be subjected to
 it, and am now to remember it. It is the noblest gift we can make;
 what signify all others that can be bestowed? You have helped to keep
 my life "on loft," as Chaucer says of Griselda, and in a better sense.
 You always seemed to look down at me as from some elevation,--some of
 your high humilities,--and I was the better for having to look up. I
 felt taxed not to disappoint your expectation; for could there be any
 accident so sad as to be respected for something better than we are?
 It was a pleasure even to go away from you, as it is not to meet some,
 as it apprised me of my high relations; and such a departure is a sort
 of further introduction and meeting. Nothing makes the earth seem so
 spacious as to have friends at a distance; they make the latitudes and
 longitudes.
 
 You must not think that fate is so dark there, for even here I can see
 a faint reflected light over Concord, and I think that at this
 distance I can better weigh the value of a doubt there. Your
 moonlight, as I have told you, though it is a reflection of the sun,
 allows of bats and owls and other twilight birds to flit therein. But
 I am very glad that you can elevate your life with a doubt, for I am
 sure that it is nothing but an insatiable faith after all that deepens
 and darkens its current. And your doubt and my confidence are only a
 difference of expression.
 
 I have hardly begun to live on Staten Island yet; but, like the man
 who, when forbidden to tread on English ground, carried Scottish
 ground in his boots, I carry Concord ground in my boots and in my
 hat,--and am I not made of Concord dust? I cannot realize that it is
 the roar of the sea I hear now, and not the wind in Walden woods. I
 find more of Concord, after all, in the prospect of the sea, beyond
 Sandy Hook, than in the fields and woods.
 
 If you were to have this Hugh the gardener for your man, you would
 think a new dispensation had commenced. He might put a fairer aspect
 on the natural world for you, or at any rate a screen between you and
 the almshouse. There is a beautiful red honeysuckle now in blossom in
 the woods here, which should be transplanted to Concord; and if what
 they tell me about the tulip tree be true, you should have that also.
 I have not seen Mrs. Black yet, but I intend to call on her soon. Have
 you established those simpler modes of living yet?--"In the full tide
 of successful operation?"
 
 Tell Mrs. Brown that I hope she is anchored in a secure haven and
 derives much pleasure still from reading the poets, and that her
 constellation is not quite set from my sight, though it is sunk so low
 in that northern horizon. Tell Elizabeth Hoar that her bright present
 did "carry ink safely to Staten Island," and was a conspicuous object
 in Master Haven's inventory of my effects. Give my respects to Madam
 Emerson, whose Concord face I should be glad to see here this summer;
 and remember me to the rest of the household who have had vision of
 me. Shake a day-day to Edith, and say good-night to Ellen for me.
 Farewell.
 
 
 TO R. W. EMERSON (AT CONCORD).
 
      CASTLETON, STATEN ISLAND, May 23.
 
 MY DEAR FRIEND,--I was just going to write to you when I received your
 letter. I was waiting till I had got away from Concord. I should have
 sent you something for the _Dial_ before, but I have been sick ever
 since I came here, rather unaccountably,--what with a cold,
 bronchitis, acclimation, etc., still unaccountably. I send you some
 verses from my Journal which will help make a packet. I have not time
 to correct them, if this goes by Rockwood Hoar. If I can finish an
 account of a winter's walk in Concord, in the midst of a Staten Island
 summer,--not so wise as true, I trust,--I will send it to you soon.
 
 I have had no later experiences yet. You must not count much upon what
 I can do or learn in New York. I feel a good way off here; and it is
 not to be visited, but seen and dwelt in. I have been there but once,
 and have been confined to the house since. Everything there
 disappoints me but the crowd; rather, I was disappointed with the rest
 before I came. I have no eyes for their churches, and what else they
 find to brag of. Though I know but little about Boston, yet what
 attracts me, in a quiet way, seems much meaner and more pretending
 than there,--libraries, pictures, and faces in the street. You don't
 know where any respectability inhabits. It is in the crowd in Chatham
 Street. The crowd is something new, and to be attended to. It is worth
 a thousand Trinity Churches and Exchanges while it is looking at them,
 and will run over them and trample them under foot one day. There are
 two things I hear and am aware I live in the neighborhood of,--the
 roar of the sea and the hum of the city. I have just come from the
 beach (to find your letter), and I like it much. Everything there is
 on a grand and generous scale,--seaweed, water, and sand; and even the
 dead fishes, horses, and hogs have a rank, luxuriant odor; great
 shad-nets spread to dry; crabs and horseshoes crawling over the sand;
 clumsy boats, only for service, dancing like sea-fowl over the surf,
 and ships afar off going about their business.
 
 Waldo and Tappan carried me to their English alehouse the first
 Saturday, and Waldo spent two hours here the next day. But Tappan I
 have only seen. I like his looks and the sound of his silence. They
 are confined every day but Sunday, and then Tappan is obliged to
 observe the demeanor of a church-goer to prevent open war with his
 father.
 
 I am glad that Channing has got settled, and that, too, before the
 inroad of the Irish. I have read his poems two or three times over,
 and partially through and under, with new and increased interest and
 appreciation. Tell him I saw a man buy a copy at Little & Brown's. He
 may have been a virtuoso, but we will give him the credit. What with
 Alcott and Lane and Hawthorne, too, you look strong enough to take New
 York by storm. Will you tell L., if he asks, that I have been able to
 do nothing about the books yet?
 
 Believe that I have something better to write you than this. It would
 be unkind to thank you for particular deeds.
 
 
 TO R. W. EMERSON (AT CONCORD).
 
      STATEN ISLAND, June 8, 1843.
 
 DEAR FRIEND,--I have been to see Henry James, and like him very much.
 It was a great pleasure to meet him. It makes humanity seem more erect
 and respectable. I never was more kindly and faithfully catechised. It
 made me respect myself more to be thought worthy of such wise
 questions. He is a man, and takes his own way, or stands still in his
 own place. I know of no one so patient and determined to have the good
 of you. It is almost friendship, such plain and human dealing. I think
 that he will not write or speak inspiringly; but he is a refreshing,
 forward-looking and forward-moving man, and he has naturalized and
 humanized New York for me. He actually reproaches you by his respect
 for your poor words. I had three hours' solid talk with him, and he
 asks me to make free use of his house. He wants an expression of your
 faith, or to be sure that it is faith, and confesses that his own
 treads fast upon the neck of his understanding. He exclaimed, at some
 careless answer of mine: "Well, you Transcendentalists are wonderfully
 consistent. I must get hold of this somehow!" He likes Carlyle's
 book,[25] but says that it leaves him in an excited and unprofitable
 state, and that Carlyle is so ready to obey his humor that he makes
 the least vestige of truth the foundation of any superstructure, not
 keeping faith with his better genius nor truest readers.
 
 I met Wright on the stairs of the Society Library, and W. H. Channing
 and Brisbane on the steps. The former (Channing) is a concave man, and
 you see by his attitude and the lines of his face that he is
 retreating from himself and from yourself, with sad doubts. It is like
 a fair mask swaying from the drooping boughs of some tree whose stem
 is not seen. He would break with a conchoidal fracture. You feel as if
 you would like to see him when he has made up his mind to run all the
 risks. To be sure, he doubts because he has a great hope to be
 disappointed, but he makes the possible disappointment of too much
 consequence. Brisbane, with whom I did not converse, did not impress
 me favorably. He looks like a man who has lived in a cellar, far gone
 in consumption. I barely saw him, but he did not look as if he could
 let Fourier go, in any case, and throw up his hat. But I need not have
 come to New York to write this.
 
 I have seen Tappan for two or three hours, and like both him and
 Waldo; but I always see those of whom I have heard well with a slight
 disappointment. They are so much better than the great herd, and yet
 the heavens are not shivered into diamonds over their heads. Persons
 and things flit so rapidly through my brain nowadays that I can hardly
 remember them. They seem to be lying in the stream, stemming the tide,
 ready to go to sea, as steamboats when they leave the dock go off in
 the opposite direction first, until they are headed right, and then
 begins the steady revolution of the paddle-wheels; and _they_ are not
 quite cheerily headed anywhither yet, nor singing amid the shrouds as
 they bound over the billows. There is a certain youthfulness and
 generosity about them, very attractive; and Tappan's more reserved and
 solitary thought commands respect.
 
 After some ado, I discovered the residence of Mrs. Black, but there
 was palmed off on me, in her stead, a Mrs. Grey (quite an inferior
 color), who told me at last that she was not Mrs. Black, but her
 mother, and was just as glad to see me as Mrs. Black would have been,
 and so, forsooth, would answer just as well. Mrs. Black had gone with
 Edward Palmer to New Jersey, and would return on the morrow.
 
 I don't like the city better, the more I see it, but worse. I am
 ashamed of my eyes that behold it. It is a thousand times meaner than
 I could have imagined. It will be something to hate,--that's the
 advantage it will be to me; and even the best people in it are a part
 of it, and talk coolly about it. The pigs in the street are the most
 respectable part of the population. When will the world learn that a
 million men are of no importance compared with _one_ man? But I must
 wait for a shower of shillings, or at least a slight dew or mizzling
 of sixpences, before I explore New York very far.
 
 The sea-beach is the best thing I have seen. It is very solitary and
 remote, and you only remember New York occasionally. The distances,
 too, along the shore, and inland in sight of it, are unaccountably
 great and startling. The sea seems very near from the hills, but it
 proves a long way over the plain, and yet you may be wet with the
 spray before you can believe that you are there. The far seems near,
 and the near far. Many rods from the beach, I step aside for the
 Atlantic, and I see men drag up their boats on to the sand, with oxen,
 stepping about amid the surf, as if it were possible they might draw
 up Sandy Hook.
 
 I do not feel myself especially serviceable to the good people with
 whom I live, except as inflictions are sanctified to the righteous.
 And so, too, must I serve the boy. I can look to the Latin and
 mathematics sharply, and for the rest behave myself. But I cannot be
 in his neighborhood hereafter as his Educator, of course, but as the
 hawks fly over my own head. I am not attracted toward him but as to
 youth generally. He shall frequent me, however, as much as he can, and
 I'll be I.
 
 Bradbury[26] told me, when I passed through Boston, that he was
 coming to New York the following Saturday, and would then settle with
 me, but he has not made his appearance yet. Will you, the next time
 you go to Boston, present that order for me which I left with you?
 
 If I say less about Waldo and Tappan now, it is, perhaps, because I
 may have more to say by and by. Remember me to your mother and Mrs.
 Emerson, who, I hope, is quite well. I shall be very glad to hear from
 her, as well as from you. I have very hastily written out something
 for the _Dial_, and send it only because you are expecting
 something,--though something better. It seems idle and Howittish, but
 it may be of more worth in Concord, where it belongs. In great haste.
 Farewell.
 
 
 TO HIS FATHER AND MOTHER (AT CONCORD).
 
      CASTLETON, June 8, 1843.
 
 DEAR PARENTS,--I have got quite well now, and like the lay of the land
 and the look of the sea veryDEAR PARENTS much,--only the country is so
 fair that it seems rather too much as if it were made to be looked at.
 I have been to New York four or five times, and have run about the
 island a good deal.
 
 George Ward, when I last saw him, which was at his house in Brooklyn,
 was studying the daguerreotype process, preparing to set up in that
 line. The boats run now almost every hour from 8 A. M. to 7 P. M.,
 back and forth, so that I can get to the city much more easily than
 before. I have seen there one Henry James, a lame man, of whom I had
 heard before, whom I like very much; and he asks me to make free use
 of his house, which is situated in a pleasant part of the city,
 adjoining the University. I have met several people whom I knew
 before, and among the rest Mr. Wright, who was on his way to Niagara.
 
 I feel already about as well acquainted with New York as with
 Boston,--that is, about as little, perhaps. It is large enough now,
 and they intend it shall be larger still. Fifteenth Street, where some
 of my new acquaintance live, is two or three miles from the Battery,
 where the boat touches,--clear brick and stone, and no "give" to the
 foot; and they have laid out, though not built, up to the 149th street
 above. I had rather see a brick for a specimen, for my part, such as
 they exhibited in old times. You see it is "quite a day's training" to
 make a few calls in different parts of the city (to say nothing of
 twelve miles by water and land,--_i. e._, not brick and stone),
 especially if it does not rain shillings, which might interest
 omnibuses in your behalf. Some omnibuses are marked "Broadway--Fourth
 Street," and they go no farther; others "Eighth Street," and so
 on,--and so of the other principal streets. (This letter will be
 circumstantial enough for Helen.)
 
 This is in all respects a very pleasant residence,--much more rural
 than you would expect of the vicinity of New York. There are woods all
 around. We breakfast at half past six, lunch, if we will, at twelve,
 and dine or sup at five; thus is the day partitioned off. From nine
 to two, or thereabouts, I am the schoolmaster, and at other times as
 much the pupil as I can be. Mr. and Mrs. Emerson are not indeed of my
 kith or kin in any sense; but they are irreproachable and kind. I have
 met no one yet _on the island_ whose acquaintance I shall
 cultivate,--or hoe round,--unless it be our neighbor Captain Smith, an
 old fisherman, who catches the fish called "moss-bonkers"--so it
 sounds--and invites me to come to the beach, where he spends the week,
 and see him and his fish.
 
 Farms are for sale all around here, and so, I suppose men are for
 purchase. North of us live Peter Wandell, Mr. Mell, and Mr. Disosway
 (don't mind the spelling), as far as the Clove road; and south, John
 Britton, Van Pelt, and Captain Smith, as far as the Fingerboard road.
 Behind is the hill, some 250 feet high, on the side of which we live;
 and in front the forest and the sea,--the latter at the distance of a
 mile and a half.
 
 Tell Helen that Miss Errington is provided with assistance. This were
 a good place as any to establish a school, if one could wait a little.
 Families come down here to board in the summer, and three or four have
 been already established this season.
 
 As for money matters, I have not set my traps yet, but I am getting my
 bait ready. Pray, how does the garden thrive, and what improvements in
 the pencil line? I miss you all very much. Write soon, and send a
 Concord paper to
 
      Your affectionate son,
      HENRY D. THOREAU.
 
 The traps of this sportsman were magazine articles,--but the magazines
 that would pay much for papers were very few in 1843. One such had
 existed in Boston for a short time,--the _Miscellany_,--and it printed
 a good paper of Thoreau's, but the pay was not forthcoming. His
 efforts to find publishers more liberal in New York were not
 successful. But he continued to write for fame in the _Dial_, and
 helped to edit that.
 
 
 TO MRS. EMERSON.
 
      STATEN ISLAND, June 20, 1843.
 
 MY VERY DEAR FRIEND,--I have only read a page of your letter, and have
 come out to the top of the hill at sunset, where I can see the ocean,
 to prepare to read the rest. It is fitter that it should hear it than
 the walls of my chamber. The very crickets here seem to chirp around
 me as they did not before. I feel as if it were a great daring to go
 on and read the rest, and then to live accordingly. There are more
 than thirty vessels in sight going to sea. I am almost afraid to look
 at your letter. I see that it will make my life very steep, but it may
 lead to fairer prospects than this.
 
 You seem to me to speak out of a very clear and high heaven, where any
 one may be who stands so high. Your voice seems not a voice, but comes
 as much from the blue heavens as from the paper.
 
 My dear friend, it was very noble in you to write me so trustful an
 answer. It will do as well for another world as for this; such a voice
 is for no particular time nor person, but it makes him who may hear it
 stand for all that is lofty and true in humanity. The thought of you
 will constantly elevate my life; it will be something always above the
 horizon to behold, as when I look up at the evening star. I think I
 know your thoughts without seeing you, and as well here as in Concord.
 You are not at all strange to me.
 
 I could hardly believe, after the lapse of one night, that I had such
 a noble letter still at hand to read,--that it was not some fine
 dream. I looked at midnight to be sure that it was real. I feel that I
 am unworthy to know you, and yet they will not permit it wrongfully.
 
 I, perhaps, am more willing to deceive by appearances than you say you
 are; it would not be worth the while to tell how willing; but I have
 the power perhaps too much to forget my meanness as soon as seen, and
 not be incited by permanent sorrow. My actual life is unspeakably mean
 compared with what I know and see that it might be. Yet the ground
 from which I see and say this is some part of it. It ranges from
 heaven to earth, and is all things in an hour. The experience of every
 past moment but belies the faith of each present. We never conceive
 the greatness of our fates. Are not these faint flashes of light which
 sometimes obscure the sun their certain dawn?
 
 My friend, I have read your letter as if I was not reading it. After
 each pause I could defer the rest forever. The thought of you will be
 a new motive for every right action. You are another human being whom
 I know, and might not our topic be as broad as the universe? What have
 we to do with petty rumbling news? We have our own great affairs.
 Sometimes in Concord I found my actions dictated, as it were, by your
 influence, and though it led almost to trivial Hindoo observances, yet
 it was good and elevating. To hear that you have sad hours is not sad
 to me. I rather rejoice at the richness of your experience. Only think
 of some sadness away in Pekin,--unseen and unknown there. What a mine
 it is! Would it not weigh down the Celestial Empire, with all its gay
 Chinese? Our sadness is not sad, but our cheap joys. Let us be sad
 about all we see and are, for so we demand and pray for better. It is
 the constant prayer and whole Christian religion. I could hope that
 you would get well soon, and have a healthy body for this world, but I
 know this cannot be; and the Fates, after all, are the accomplishers
 of our hopes. Yet I do hope that you may find it a worthy struggle,
 and life seem grand still through the clouds.
 
 What wealth is it to have such friends that we cannot think of them
 without elevation! And we can think of them any time and anywhere, and
 it costs nothing but the lofty disposition. I cannot tell you the joy
 your letter gives me, which will not quite cease till the latest time.
 Let me accompany your finest thought.
 
 I send my love to my other friend and brother, whose nobleness I
 slowly recognize.
 
      HENRY.
 
 
 TO MRS. THOREAU (AT CONCORD).
 
      STATEN ISLAND, July 7, 1843.
 
 DEAR MOTHER,--I was very glad to get your letter and papers. Tell
 Father that circumstantial letters make very substantial reading, at
 any rate. I like to know even how the sun shines and garden grows
 with you. I did not get my money in Boston, and probably shall not at
 all. Tell Sophia that I have pressed some blossoms of the tulip tree
 for her. They look somewhat like white lilies. The magnolia, too, is
 in blossom here.
 
 Pray, have you the seventeen-year locust in Concord? The air here is
 filled with their din. They come out of the ground at first in an
 imperfect state, and, crawling up the shrubs and plants, the perfect
 insect bursts out through the back. They are doing great damage to the
 fruit and forest trees. The latter are covered with dead twigs, which
 in the distance look like the blossoms of the chestnut. They bore
 every twig of last year's growth in order to deposit their eggs in it.
 In a few weeks the eggs will be hatched, and the worms fall to the
 ground and enter it, and in 1860 make their appearance again. I
 conversed about their coming this season before they arrived. They do
 no injury to the leaves, but, beside boring the twigs, suck their sap
 for sustenance. Their din is heard by those who sail along the shore
 from the distant woods,--Phar-r-r-aoh. Phar-r-r-aoh. They are
 departing now. Dogs, cats, and chickens subsist mainly upon them in
 some places.
 
 I have not been to New York for more than three weeks. I have had an
 interesting letter from Mr. Lane,[27] describing their new prospects.
 My pupil and I are getting on apace. He is remarkably well advanced in
 Latin, and is well advancing.
 
 Your letter has just arrived. I was not aware that it was so long
 since I wrote home; I only knew that I had sent five or six letters to
 the town. It is very refreshing to hear from you, though it is not all
 good news. But I trust that Stearns Wheeler is not dead. I should be
 slow to believe it. He was made to work very well in this world. There
 need be no tragedy in his death.
 
 The demon which is said to haunt the Jones family, hovering over their
 eyelids with wings steeped in juice of poppies, has commenced another
 campaign against me. I am "clear Jones" in this respect at least. But
 he finds little encouragement in my atmosphere, I assure you, for I do
 not once fairly lose myself, except in those hours of truce allotted
 to rest by immemorial custom. However, this skirmishing interferes
 sadly with my literary projects, and I am apt to think it a good day's
 work if I maintain a soldier's eye till nightfall. Very well, it does
 not matter much in what wars we serve, whether in the Highlands or the
 Lowlands. Everywhere we get soldiers' pay still.
 
 Give my love to Aunt Louisa, whose benignant face I sometimes see
 right in the wall, as naturally and necessarily shining on my path as
 some star of unaccountably greater age and higher orbit than myself.
 Let it be inquired by her of George Minott, as from me,--for she sees
 him,--if he has seen any pigeons yet, and tell him there are plenty of
 jack snipes here. As for William P., the "worthy young man,"--as I
 live, my eyes have not fallen on him yet.
 
 I have not had the influenza, though here are its
 headquarters,--unless my first week's cold was it. Tell Helen I shall
 write to her soon. I have heard Lucretia Mott. This is badly written;
 but the worse the writing the sooner you get it this time from
 
      Your affectionate son,
      H. D. T.
 
 
 TO R. W. EMERSON (AT CONCORD).
 
      STATEN ISLAND, July 8, 1843.
 
 DEAR FRIENDS,--I was very glad to hear your voices from so far. I do
 not believe there are eight hundred human beings on the globe. It is
 all a fable, and I cannot but think that you speak with a slight
 outrage and disrespect of Concord when you talk of fifty of them.
 There are not so many. Yet think not that I have left all behind, for
 already I begin to track my way over the earth, and find the cope of
 heaven extending beyond its horizon,--forsooth, like the roofs of
 these Dutch houses. My thoughts revert to those dear hills and that
 _river_ which so fills up the world to its brim,--worthy to be named
 with Mincius and Alpheus,--still drinking its meadows while I am far
 away. How can it run heedless to the sea, as if I were there to
 countenance it? George Minott, too, looms up considerably,--and many
 another old familiar face. These things all look sober and
 respectable. They are better than the environs of New York, I assure
 you.
 
 I am pleased to think of Channing as an inhabitant of the gray town.
 Seven cities contended for Homer dead. Tell him to remain at least
 long enough to establish Concord's right and interest in him. I was
 beginning to know the man. In imagination I see you pilgrims taking
 your way by the red lodge and the cabin of the brave farmer man, so
 youthful and hale, to the still cheerful woods. And Hawthorne, too, I
 remember as one with whom I sauntered, in old heroic times, along the
 banks of the Scamander, amid the ruins of chariots and heroes. Tell
 him not to desert, even after the tenth year. Others may say, "Are
 there not the cities of Asia?" But what are they? Staying at home is
 the heavenly way.
 
 And Elizabeth Hoar, my brave townswoman, to be sung of poets,--if I
 may speak of her whom I do not know. Tell Mrs. Brown that I do not
 forget her, going her way under the stars through this chilly
 world,--I did _not_ think of the wind,--and that I went a little way
 with her. Tell her not to despair. Concord's little arch does not span
 all our fate, nor is what transpires under it law for the universe.
 
 And least of all are forgotten those walks in the woods in ancient
 days,--too sacred to be idly remembered,--when their aisles were
 pervaded as by a fragrant atmosphere. They still seem youthful and
 cheery to my imagination as Sherwood and Barnsdale,--and of far purer
 fame. Those afternoons when we wandered o'er Olympus,--and those
 hills, from which the sun was seen to set, while still our day held on
 its way.
 
      "At last he rose and twitched his mantle blue;
      To-morrow to fresh woods, and pastures new."
 
 I remember these things at midnight, at rare intervals. But know, my
 friends, that I a good deal hate you all in my most private thoughts,
 as the substratum of the little love I bear you. Though you are a
 rare band, and do not make half use enough of one another.
 
 I think this is a noble number of the _Dial_.[28] It perspires thought
 and feeling. I can speak of it now a little like a foreigner. Be
 assured that it is not written in vain,--it is not for me. I hear its
 prose and its verse. They provoke and inspire me, and they have my
 sympathy. I hear the sober and the earnest, the sad and the cheery
 voices of my friends, and to me it is a long letter of encouragement
 and reproof; and no doubt so it is to many another in the land. So
 don't give up the ship. Methinks the verse is hardly enough better
 than the prose. I give my vote for the "Notes from the Journal of a
 Scholar," and wonder you don't print them faster. I want, too, to read
 the rest of the "Poet and the Painter." Miss Fuller's is a noble
 piece,--rich, extempore writing, talking with pen in hand. It is too
 good not to be better, even. In writing, conversation should be folded
 many times thick. It is the height of art that, on the first perusal,
 plain common sense should appear; on the second, severe truth; and on
 a third, beauty; and, having these warrants for its depth and reality,
 we may then enjoy the beauty for evermore. The sea-piece is of the
 best that is going, if not of the best that is staying. You have
 spoken a good word for Carlyle. As for the "Winter's Walk," I should
 be glad to have it printed in the _Dial_ if you think it good enough,
 and will criticise it; otherwise send it to me, and I will dispose of
 it.
 
 I have not been to New York for a month, and so have not seen Waldo
 and Tappan. James has been at Albany meanwhile. You will know that I
 only describe my personal adventures with people; but I hope to see
 more of them, and _judge_ them too. I am sorry to learn that Mrs.
 Emerson is no better. But let her know that the Fates pay a compliment
 to those whom they make sick, and they have not to ask, "What have I
 done?"
 
 Remember me to your mother, and remember me yourself as you are
 remembered by
 
      H. D. T.
 
 I had a friendly and cheery letter from Lane a month ago.
 
 
 TO HELEN THOREAU (AT ROXBURY).
 
      STATEN ISLAND, July 21, 1843.
 
 DEAR HELEN,--I am not in such haste to write home when I remember that
 I make my readers pay the postage. But I believe I have not taxed you
 before.
 
 I have pretty much explored this island, inland and along the shore,
 finding my health inclined me to the peripatetic philosophy. I have
 visited telegraph stations, Sailors' Snug Harbors, Seaman's Retreats,
 Old Elm Trees, where the Huguenots landed, Britton's Mills, and all
 the villages on the island. Last Sunday I walked over to Lake Island
 Farm, eight or nine miles from here, where Moses Prichard lived, and
 found the present occupant, one Mr. Davenport, formerly from
 Massachusetts, with three or four men to help him, raising sweet
 potatoes and tomatoes by the acre. It seemed a cool and pleasant
 retreat, but a hungry soil. As I was coming away, I took my toll out
 of the soil in the shape of arrowheads, which may after all be the
 surest crop, certainly not affected by drought.
 
 I am well enough situated here to observe one aspect of the modern
 world at least. I mean the migratory,--the western movement. Sixteen
 hundred immigrants arrived at quarantine ground on the 4th of July,
 and more or less every day since I have been here. I see them
 occasionally washing their persons and clothes: or men, women, and
 children gathered on an isolated quay near the shore, stretching their
 limbs and taking the air; the children running races and swinging on
 this artificial piece of the land of liberty, while their vessels are
 undergoing purification. They are detained but a day or two, and then
 go up to the city, for the most part without having _landed_ here.
 
 In the city, I have seen, since I wrote last, W. H. Channing, at whose
 home, in Fifteenth Street, I spent a few pleasant hours, discussing
 the all-absorbing question "what to do for the race." (He is sadly in
 earnest about going up the river to rusticate for six weeks, and
 issues a new periodical called _The Present_ in September.) Also
 Horace Greeley, editor of the _Tribune_, who is cheerfully in earnest,
 at his office of all work, a hearty New Hampshire boy as one would
 wish to meet, and says, "Now be neighborly," and believes only, or
 mainly, first, in the Sylvania Association, somewhere in Pennsylvania;
 and, secondly, and most of all, in a new association to go into
 operation soon in New Jersey, with which he is connected. Edward
 Palmer came down to see me Sunday before last. As for Waldo and
 Tappan, we have strangely dodged one another, and have not met for
 some weeks.
 
 I believe I have not told you anything about Lucretia Mott. It was a
 good while ago that I heard her at the Quaker Church in Hester Street.
 She is a preacher, and it was advertised that she would be present on
 that day. I liked all the proceedings very well, their plainly greater
 harmony and sincerity than elsewhere. They do nothing in a hurry.
 Every one that walks up the aisle in his square coat and expansive hat
 has a history, and comes from a house to a house. The women come in
 one after another in their Quaker bonnets and handkerchiefs, looking
 all like sisters or so many chickadees. At length, after a long
 silence,--waiting for the Spirit,--Mrs. Mott rose, took off her
 bonnet, and began to utter very deliberately what the Spirit
 suggested. Her self-possession was something to see, if all else
 failed; but it did not. Her subject was, "The Abuse of the Bible," and
 thence she straightway digressed to slavery and the degradation of
 woman. It was a good speech,--Transcendentalism in its mildest form.
 She sat down at length, and, after a long and decorous silence, in
 which some seemed to be really digesting her words, the elders shook
 hands, and the meeting dispersed. On the whole, I liked their ways and
 the plainness of their meeting-house. It looked as if it was indeed
 made for service.
 
 I think that Stearns Wheeler has left a gap in the community not easy
 to be filled. Though he did not exhibit the highest qualities of the
 scholar, he promised, in a remarkable degree, many of the essential
 and rarer ones; and his patient industry and energy, his reverent love
 of letters, and his proverbial accuracy, will cause him to be
 associated in my memory even with many venerable names of former days.
 It was not wholly unfit that so pure a lover of books should have
 ended his pilgrimage at the great book-mart of the world. I think of
 him as healthy and brave, and am confident that if he had lived he
 would have proved useful in more ways than I can describe. He would
 have been authority on all matters of fact, and a sort of connecting
 link between men and scholars of different walks and tastes. The
 literary enterprises he was planning for himself and friends remind me
 of an older and more studious time. So much, then, remains for us to
 do who survive. Love to all. Tell all my friends in Concord that I do
 not send my love, but retain it still.
 
 Your affectionate brother.
 
 
 TO MRS. THOREAU (AT CONCORD).
 
      STATEN ISLAND, August 6, 1843.
 
 DEAR MOTHER,--As Mr. William Emerson is going to Concord on Tuesday, I
 must not omit sending a line by him,--though I wish I had something
 more weighty for so direct a post. I believe I directed my last letter
 to you by mistake; but it must have appeared that it was addressed to
 Helen. At any rate, this is to you without mistake.
 
 I am chiefly indebted to your letters for what I have learned of
 Concord and family news, and am very glad when I get one. I should
 have liked to be in Walden woods with you, but not with the railroad.
 I think of you all very often, and wonder if you are still separated
 from me only by so many miles of earth, or so many miles of memory.
 This life we live is a strange dream, and I don't believe at all any
 account men give of it. Methinks I should be content to sit at the
 back door in Concord, under the poplar tree, henceforth forever. Not
 that I am homesick at all,--for places are strangely indifferent to
 me,--but Concord is still a cynosure to my eyes, and I find it hard to
 attach it, even in imagination, to the rest of the globe, and tell
 where the seam is.
 
 I fancy that this Sunday evening you are pouring over some select
 book, almost transcendental perchance, or else "Burgh's Dignity," or
 Massillon, or the _Christian Examiner_. Father has just taken one more
 look at the garden, and is now absorbed in Chaptelle, or reading the
 newspaper quite abstractedly, only looking up occasionally over his
 spectacles to see how the rest are engaged, and not to miss any newer
 news that may not be in the paper. Helen has slipped in for the fourth
 time to learn the very latest item. Sophia, I suppose, is at Bangor;
 but Aunt Louisa, without doubt, is just flitting away to some good
 meeting, to save the credit of you all.
 
 It is still a cardinal virtue with me to keep awake. I find it
 impossible to write or read except at rare intervals, but am,
 generally speaking, tougher than formerly. I could make a pedestrian
 tour round the world, and sometimes think it would perhaps be better
 to do at once the things I _can_, rather than be trying to do what at
 present I cannot do well. However, I shall awake sooner or later.
 
 I have been translating some Greek, and reading English poetry, and a
 month ago sent a paper to the _Democratic Review_, which, at length,
 they were sorry they could not accept; but they could not adopt the
 sentiments. However, they were very polite, and earnest that I should
 send them something else, or reform that.
 
 I go moping about the fields and woods here as I did in Concord, and,
 it seems, am thought to be a surveyor,--an Eastern man inquiring
 narrowly into the condition and value of land, etc., here, preparatory
 to an extensive speculation. One neighbor observed to me, in a
 mysterious and half-inquisitive way, that he supposed I must be pretty
 well acquainted with the state of things; that I kept pretty close; he
 did n't see any surveying instruments, but perhaps I had them in my
 pocket.
 
 I have received Helen's note, but have not heard of Frisbie Hoar
 yet.[29] She is a faint-hearted writer, who could not take the
 responsibility of blotting one sheet alone. However, I like very well
 the blottings I get. Tell her I have not seen Mrs. Child nor Mrs.
 Sedgwick.
 
 Love to all from your affectionate son.
 
 
 TO R. W. EMERSON (AT CONCORD).
 
      STATEN ISLAND, August 7, 1843.
 
 MY DEAR FRIEND,--I fear I have nothing to send you worthy of so good
 an opportunity. Of New York I still know but little, though out of so
 many thousands there are no doubt many units whom it would be worth my
 while to know. Mr. James[30] talks of going to Germany soon with his
 wife to learn the language. He says he must know it; can never learn
 it here; there he may absorb it; and is very anxious to learn
 beforehand where he had best locate himself to enjoy the advantage of
 the highest culture, learn the language in its purity, and not exceed
 his limited means. I referred him to Longfellow. Perhaps you can help
 him.
 
 I have had a pleasant talk with Channing; and Greeley, too, it was
 refreshing to meet. They were both much pleased with your criticism on
 Carlyle, but thought that you had overlooked what chiefly concerned
 them in the book,--its practical aim and merits.
 
 I have also spent some pleasant hours with Waldo and Tappan at their
 counting-room, or rather intelligence office.
 
 I must still reckon myself with the innumerable army of
 invalids,--undoubtedly in a fair field they would rout the
 well,--though I am tougher than formerly. Methinks I could paint the
 sleepy god more truly than the poets have done, from more intimate
 experience. Indeed, I have not kept my eyes very steadily open to the
 things of this world of late, and hence have little to report
 concerning them. However, I trust the awakening will come before the
 last trump,--and then perhaps I may remember some of my dreams.
 
 I study the aspects of commerce at its Narrows here, where it passes
 in review before me, and this seems to be beginning at the right end
 to understand this Babylon. I have made a very rude translation of the
 Seven against Thebes, and Pindar too I have looked at, and wish he was
 better worth translating. I believe even the best things are not equal
 to their fame. Perhaps it would be better to translate fame
 itself,--or is not that what the poets themselves do? However, I have
 not done with Pindar yet. I sent a long article on Etzler's book to
 the _Democratic Review_ six weeks ago, which at length they have
 determined not to accept, as they could not subscribe to all the
 opinions, but asked for other matter,--purely literary, I suppose.
 O'Sullivan wrote me that articles of this kind have to be referred to
 the circle who, it seems, are represented by this journal, and said
 something about "collective we" and "homogeneity."
 
 Pray don't think of Bradbury & Soden[31] any more,--
 
      "For good deed done through praiere
      Is sold and bought too dear, I wis,
      To herte that of great valor is."
 
 I see that they have given up their shop here.
 
 Say to Mrs. Emerson that I am glad to remember how she too dwells
 there in Concord, and shall send her anon some of the thoughts that
 belong to her. As for Edith, I seem to see a star in the east over
 where the young child is. Remember me to Mrs. Brown.
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 These letters for the most part explain themselves, with the aid of
 several to Thoreau's family, which the purpose of Emerson, in 1865, to
 present his friend in a stoical character, had excluded from the
 collection then printed. Mention of C. S. Wheeler and his sad death in
 Germany had come to him from Emerson, as well as from his own family
 at Concord,--of whose occupations Thoreau gives so genial a picture in
 the letter of August 6 to his mother. Emerson wrote: "You will have
 read and heard the sad news to the little village of Lincoln, of
 Stearns Wheeler's death. Such an overthrow to the hopes of his parents
 made me think more of them than of the loss the community will suffer
 in his kindness, diligence, and ingenuous mind." He died at Leipsic,
 in the midst of Greek studies which have since been taken up and
 carried farther by a child of Concord, Professor Goodwin of the same
 university. Henry James, several times mentioned in the
 correspondence, was the moral and theological essayist (father of the
 novelist Henry James, and the distinguished Professor James of
 Harvard), who was so striking a personality in Concord and Cambridge
 circles for many years. W. H. Channing was a Christian Socialist fifty
 years ago,--cousin of Ellery Channing, and nephew and biographer of
 Dr. Channing. Both he and Horace Greeley were then deeply interested
 in the Fourierist scheme of association, one development of which was
 going on at Brook Farm, under direction of George Ripley, and another,
 differing in design, at Fruitlands, under Bronson Alcott and Charles
 Lane. The jocose allusions of Thoreau to his Jones ancestors (the
 descendants of the Tory Colonel Jones of Weston) had this foundation
 in fact,--that his uncle, Charles Dunbar, soon to be named in
 connection with Daniel Webster, suffered from a sort of lethargy,
 which would put him to sleep in the midst of conversation. Webster had
 been retained in the once famous "Wyman case," of a bank officer
 charged with fraud, and had exerted his great forensic talent for a
 few days in the Concord court-house. Emerson wrote Thoreau: "You will
 have heard of the Wyman trial, and the stir it made in the village.
 But the Cliff and Walden knew nothing of that."
 
 
 TO MRS. THOREAU (AT CONCORD).
 
      CASTLETON, Tuesday, August 29, 1843.
 
 DEAR MOTHER,--Mr. Emerson has just given me warning that he is about
 to send to Concord, which I will endeavor to improve. I am a great
 deal more wakeful than I was, and growing stout in other
 respects,--so that I may yet accomplish something in the literary
 way; indeed, I should have done so before now but for the slowness and
 poverty of the "Reviews" themselves. I have tried sundry methods of
 earning money in the city, of late, but without success: have rambled
 into every bookseller's or publisher's house, and discussed their
 affairs with them. Some propose to me to do what an honest man cannot.
 Among others, I conversed with the Harpers--to see if they might not
 find me useful to them; but they say that they are making $50,000
 annually, and their motto is to let well alone. I find that I talk
 with these poor men as if I were over head and ears in business, and a
 few thousands were no consideration with me. I almost reproach myself
 for bothering them so to no purpose; but it is a very valuable
 experience, and the best introduction I could have.
 
 We have had a tremendous rain here last Monday night and Tuesday
 morning. I was in the city at Giles Waldo's, and the streets at
 daybreak were absolutely impassable for the water. Yet the accounts of
 the storm that you may have seen are exaggerated, as indeed are all
 such things, to my imagination. On Sunday I heard Mr. Bellows preach
 here on the island; but the fine prospect over the Bay and Narrows,
 from where I sat, preached louder than he,--though he did far better
 than the average, if I remember aright. I should have liked to see
 Daniel Webster walking about Concord; I suppose the town shook, every
 step he took. But I trust there were some sturdy Concordians who were
 not tumbled down by the jar, but represented still the upright town.
 Where was George Minott? he would not have gone far to see him. Uncle
 Charles should have been there,--he might as well have been catching
 cat naps in Concord as anywhere.
 
 And then, what a whetter-up of his memory this event would have been!
 You'd have had all the classmates again in alphabetical order
 reversed,--"and Seth Hunt and Bob Smith--and he was a student of my
 father's,--and where's Put now? and I wonder--you--if Henry's been to
 see George Jones yet! A little account with Stow,--Balcom,--Bigelow,
 poor miserable t-o-a-d,--(sound asleep.) I vow, you,--what noise was
 that?--saving grace--and few there be--That's clear as preaching,--Easter
 Brooks,--morally deprived,--How charming is divine philosophy,--some
 wise and some otherwise,--Heighho! (sound asleep again) Webster's a
 smart fellow--bears his age well,--how old should you think he was?
 you--does he look as if he were ten years younger than I?"
 
 I met, or rather, was overtaken by Fuller, who tended for Mr. How, the
 other day, in Broadway. He dislikes New York very much. The Mercantile
 Library,--that is, its Librarian, presented me with a stranger's
 ticket, for a month, and I was glad to read the Reviews there, and
 Carlyle's last article. I have bought some pantaloons; stockings show
 no holes yet. These pantaloons cost $2.25 ready made.
 
 In haste.
 
 
 TO R. W. EMERSON (AT CONCORD).
 
      STATEN ISLAND, September 14, 1843.
 
 DEAR FRIEND,--Miss Fuller will tell you the news from these parts, so
 I will only devote these few moments to what she does n't know as
 well. I was absent only one day and night from the island, the family
 expecting me back immediately. I was to earn a certain sum before
 winter, and thought it worth the while to try various experiments. I
 carried _The Agriculturist_ about the city, and up as far as
 Manhattanville, and called at the Croton Reservoir, where, indeed,
 they did not want any Agriculturists, but paid well enough in their
 way.
 
 Literature comes to a poor market here; and even the little that I
 write is more than will sell. I have tried _The Dem. Review_, _The New
 Mirror_, and _Brother Jonathan_.[32] The last two, as well as the _New
 World_, are overwhelmed with contributions which cost nothing, and are
 worth no more. _The Knickerbocker_ is too poor, and only _The Ladies'
 Companion_ pays. O'Sullivan is printing the manuscript I sent him some
 time ago, having objected only to my want of sympathy with the
 Committee.
 
 I doubt if you have made more corrections in my manuscript than I
 should have done ere this, though they may be better; but I am glad
 you have taken any pains with it. I have not prepared any translations
 for the _Dial_, supposing there would be no room, though it is the
 only place for them.
 
 I have been seeing men during these days, and trying experiments upon
 trees; have inserted three or four hundred buds (quite a Buddhist, one
 might say). Books I have access to through your brother and Mr.
 McKean, and have read a good deal. Quarles's "Divine Poems" as well as
 "Emblems" are quite a discovery.
 
 I am very sorry Mrs. Emerson is so sick. Remember me to her and to
 your mother. I like to think of your living on the banks of the Mill
 Brook, in the midst of the garden with all its weeds; for what are
 botanical distinctions at this distance?
 
 
 TO HIS MOTHER (AT CONCORD).
 
      STATEN ISLAND, October 1, 1843.
 
 DEAR MOTHER,--I hold together remarkably well as yet,--speaking of my
 outward linen and woolen man; no holes more than I brought away, and
 no stitches needed yet. It is marvelous. I think the Fates must be on
 my side, for there is less than a plank between me and--Time, to say
 the least. As for Eldorado, that is far off yet. My bait will not
 tempt the rats,--they are too well fed. The _Democratic Review_ is
 poor, and can only afford half or quarter pay, which it _will_ do; and
 they say there is a _Ladies' Companion_ that pays,--but I could not
 write anything companionable. However, speculate as we will, it is
 quite gratuitous; for life, nevertheless and never the more, goes
 steadily on, well or ill-fed, and clothed somehow, and "honor bright"
 withal. It is very gratifying to live in the prospect of great
 successes always; and for that purpose we must leave a sufficient
 foreground to see them through. All the painters prefer distant
 prospects for the greater breadth of view and delicacy of tint. But
 this is no news, and describes no new conditions.
 
 Meanwhile I am somnambulic at least,--stirring in my sleep; indeed,
 quite awake. I read a good deal, and am pretty well known in the
 libraries of New York. Am in with the librarian (one Dr. Forbes) of
 the Society Library, who has lately been to Cambridge to learn
 liberality, and has come back to let me take out some un-take-out-able
 books, which I was threatening to read on the spot. And Mr. McKean, of
 the Mercantile Library, is a true gentleman (a former tutor of mine),
 and offers me every privilege there. I have from him a perpetual
 stranger's ticket, and a citizen's rights besides,--all which
 privileges I pay handsomely for by improving.
 
 A canoe race "came off" on the Hudson the other day, between
 Chippeways and New Yorkers, which must have been as moving a sight as
 the buffalo hunt which I witnessed. But canoes and buffaloes are all
 lost, as is everything here, in the mob. It is only the people have
 come to see one another. Let them advertise that there will be a
 gathering at Hoboken,--having bargained with the ferryboats,--and
 there will be, and they need not throw in the buffaloes.
 
 I have crossed the bay twenty or thirty times, and have seen a great
 many immigrants going up to the city for the first time: Norwegians,
 who carry their old-fashioned farming-tools to the West with them, and
 will buy nothing here for fear of being cheated; English operatives,
 known by their pale faces and stained hands, who will recover their
 birthright in a little cheap sun and wind; English travelers on their
 way to the Astor House, to whom I have done the honors of the city;
 whole families of emigrants cooking their dinner upon the
 pavement,--all sunburnt, so that you are in doubt where the
 foreigner's face of flesh begins; their tidy clothes laid on, and then
 tied to their swathed bodies, which move about like a bandaged
 finger,--caps set on the head as if woven of the hair, which is still
 growing at the roots,--each and all busily cooking, stooping from time
 to time over the pot, and having something to drop in it, that so they
 may be entitled to take something out, forsooth. They look like
 respectable but straitened people, who may turn out to be Counts when
 they get to Wisconsin, and will have this experience to relate to
 their children.
 
 Seeing so many people from day to day, one comes to have less respect
 for flesh and bones, and thinks they must be more loosely joined, of
 less firm fibre, than the few he had known. It must have a very bad
 influence on children to see so many human beings at once,--mere herds
 of men.
 
 I came across Henry Bigelow a week ago, sitting in front of a hotel in
 Broadway, very much as if he were under his father's stoop. He is
 seeking to be admitted into the bar in New York, but as yet had not
 succeeded. I directed him to Fuller's store, which he had not found,
 and invited him to come and see me if he came to the island. Tell Mrs.
 and Miss Ward that I have not forgotten them, and was glad to hear
 from George--with whom I spent last night--that they had returned to
 C. Tell Mrs. Brown that it gives me as much pleasure to know that she
 thinks of me and my writing as if I had been the author of the piece
 in question,--but I did not even read over the papers I sent. The
 _Mirror_ is really the most readable journal here. I see that they
 have printed a short piece that I wrote to sell, in the _Dem. Review_,
 and still keep the review of "Paradise," that I may include in it a
 notice of another book by the same author, which they have found, and
 are going to send me.
 
 I don't know when I shall come home; I like to keep that feast in
 store. Tell Helen that I do not see any advertisement for her, and I
 am looking for myself. If I could find a rare opening, I might be
 tempted to try with her for a year, till I had paid my debts, but for
 such I am sure it is not well to go out of New England. Teachers are
 but poorly recompensed, even here. Tell her and Sophia (if she is not
 gone) to write to me. Father will know that this letter is to him as
 well as to you. I send him a paper which usually contains the
 news,--if not all that is stirring, all that has stirred,--and even
 draws a little on the future. I wish he would send me, by and by, the
 paper which contains the results of the Cattle-Show. You must get
 Helen's eyes to read this, though she is a scoffer at honest
 penmanship.
 
 
 TO MRS. EMERSON (AT CONCORD).
 
      STATEN ISLAND, October 16, 1843.
 
 MY DEAR FRIEND,--I promised you some thoughts long ago, but it would
 be hard to tell whether these are the ones. I suppose that the great
 questions of "Fate, Freewill, Foreknowledge absolute," which used to
 be discussed at Concord, are still unsettled. And here comes [W. H.]
 Channing, with his _Present_ to vex the world again,--a rather
 galvanic movement, I think. However, I like the man all the better,
 though his schemes the less. I am sorry for his confessions. Faith
 never makes a confession.
 
 Have you had the annual berrying party, or sat on the Cliffs a whole
 day this summer? I suppose the flowers have fared quite as well since
 I was not there to scoff at them; and the hens, without doubt, keep up
 their reputation.
 
 I have been reading lately what of Quarles's poetry I could get. He
 was a contemporary of Herbert, and a kindred spirit. I think you would
 like him. It is rare to find one who was so much of a poet and so
 little of an artist. He wrote long poems, almost epics for length,
 about Jonah, Esther, Job, Samson, and Solomon, interspersed with
 meditations after a quite original plan,--Shepherd's Oracles,
 Comedies, Romances, Fancies, and Meditations,--the quintessence of
 meditation,--and Enchiridions of Meditation all divine,--and what he
 calls his Morning Muse; besides prose works as curious as the rest. He
 was an unwearied Christian, and a reformer of some old school withal.
 Hopelessly quaint, as if he lived all alone and knew nobody but his
 wife, who appears to have reverenced him. He never doubts his genius;
 it is only he and his God in all the world. He uses language sometimes
 as greatly as Shakespeare; and though there is not much straight grain
 in him, there is plenty of tough, crooked timber. In an age when
 Herbert is revived, Quarles surely ought not to be forgotten.
 
 I will copy a few such sentences as I should read to you if there.
 Mrs. Brown, too, may find some nutriment in them.
 
 How does the Saxon Edith do? Can you tell yet to which school of
 philosophy she belongs,--whether she will be a fair saint of some
 Christian order, or a follower of Plato and the heathen? Bid Ellen a
 good-night or good-morning from me, and see if she will remember where
 it comes from; and remember me to Mrs. Brown, and your mother, and
 Elizabeth Hoar.
 
 
 TO R. W. EMERSON (AT CONCORD).
 
      STATEN ISLAND, October 17, 1843.
 
 MY DEAR FRIEND,--I went with my pupil to the Fair of the American
 Institute, and so lost a visit from Tappan, whom I met returning from
 the Island. I should have liked to hear more news from his lips,
 though he had left me a letter and the _Dial_, which is a sort of
 circular letter itself. I find Channing's[33] letters full of life,
 and I enjoy their wit highly. Lane writes straight and solid, like a
 guide-board, but I find that I put off the "social tendencies" to a
 future day, which may never come. He is always Shaker fare, quite as
 luxurious as his principles will allow. I feel as if I were ready to
 be appointed a committee on poetry, I have got my eyes so whetted and
 proved of late, like the knife-sharpener I saw at the Fair, certified
 to have been "in constant use in a gentleman's family for more than
 two years." Yes, I ride along the ranks of the English poets, casting
 terrible glances, and some I blot out, and some I spare. McKean has
 imported, within the year, several new editions and collections of old
 poetry, of which I have the reading, but there is a good deal of chaff
 to a little meal,--hardly worth bolting. I have just opened Bacon's
 "Advancement of Learning" for the first time, which I read with great
 delight. It is more like what Scott's novels _were_ than anything.
 
 I see that I was very blind to send you my manuscript in such a state;
 but I have a good _second_ sight, at least. I could still shake it in
 the wind to some advantage, if it would hold together. There are some
 sad mistakes in the printing. It is a little unfortunate that the
 "Ethnical Scriptures" should hold out so well, though it does really
 hold out. The Bible ought not to be very large. Is it not singular
 that, while the religious world is gradually picking to pieces its old
 testaments, here are some coming slowly after, on the seashore,
 picking up the durable relics of perhaps older books, and putting them
 together again?
 
 Your Letter to Contributors is excellent, and hits the nail on the
 head. It will taste sour to their palates at first, no doubt, but it
 will bear a sweet fruit at last. I like the poetry, especially the
 Autumn verses. They ring true. Though I am quite weather-beaten with
 poetry, having weathered so many epics of late. The "Sweep Ho!" sounds
 well this way. But I have a good deal of fault to find with your "Ode
 to Beauty." The tune is altogether unworthy of the thoughts. You slope
 too quickly to the rhyme, as if that trick had better be performed as
 soon as possible, or as if you stood over the line with a hatchet, and
 chopped off the verses as they came out, some short and some long. But
 give us a long reel, and we'll cut it up to suit ourselves. It sounds
 like parody. "Thee knew I of old," "Remediless thirst," are some of
 those stereotyped lines. I am frequently reminded, I believe, of Jane
 Taylor's "Philosopher's Scales," and how the world
 
      "Flew out with a bounce,"
 
 which
 
      "Yerked the philosopher out of his cell;"
 
 or else of
 
      "From the climes of the sun all war-worn and weary."
 
 I had rather have the thought come ushered with a flourish of oaths
 and curses. Yet I love your poetry as I do little else that is near
 and recent, especially when you get fairly round the end of the line,
 and are not thrown back upon the rocks. To read the lecture on "The
 Comic" is as good as to be in our town meeting or Lyceum once more.
 
 I am glad that the Concord farmers plowed well this year; it promises
 that something will be done these summers. But I am suspicious of that
 _Brittonner_, who advertises so many cords of _good_ oak, chestnut,
 and maple wood for sale. _Good!_ ay, good for what? And there shall
 not be left a stone upon a stone. But no matter,--let them hack away.
 The sturdy Irish arms that do the work are of more worth than oak or
 maple. Methinks I could look with equanimity upon a long street of
 Irish cabins, and pigs and children reveling in the genial Concord
 dirt; and I should still find my Walden Wood and Fair Haven in their
 tanned and happy faces.
 
 I write this in the corn-field--it being washing-day--with the
 inkstand Elizabeth Hoar gave me;[34] though it is not redolent of
 corn-stalks, I fear. Let me not be forgotten by Channing and
 Hawthorne, nor our gray-suited neighbor under the hill [Edmund
 Hosmer].
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 This letter will be best explained by a reference to the _Dial_ for
 October, 1843. The "Ethnical Scriptures" were selections from the
 Brahminical books, from Confucius, etc., such as we have since seen in
 great abundance. The Autumn verses are by Channing; "Sweep Ho!" by
 Ellen Sturgis, afterwards Mrs. Hooper; the "Youth of the Poet and
 Painter" also by Channing. The Letter to Contributors, which is headed
 simply "A Letter," is by Emerson, and has been much overlooked by his
 later readers; his "Ode to Beauty" is very well known, and does not
 deserve the slashing censure of Thoreau, though, as it now stands, it
 is better than first printed. Instead of
 
      "Love drinks at thy banquet
      _Remediless_ thirst,"
 
 we now have the perfect phrase,
 
      "Love drinks at thy _fountain_
      _False waters of thirst_."
 
 "The Comic" is also Emerson's. There is a poem, "The Sail," by William
 Tappan, so often named in these letters, and a sonnet by Charles A.
 Dana, afterwards of the _New York Sun_.
 
 
 TO HELEN THOREAU (AT CONCORD).
 
      STATEN ISLAND, October 18, 1843.
 
 Dear Helen,--What do you mean by saying that "_we_ have written eight
 times by private opportunity"? Is n't it the more the better? And am I
 not glad of it? But people have a habit of not letting me know it
 when they go to Concord from New York. I endeavored to get you _The
 Present_ when I was last in the city, but they were all sold; and now
 another is out, which I will send, if I get it. I did not send the
 _Democratic Review_, because I had no copy, and my piece was not worth
 fifty cents. You think that Channing's words would apply to me too, as
 living more in the natural than the moral world; but I think that you
 mean the world of men and women rather, and reformers generally. My
 objection to Channing and all that fraternity is that they need and
 deserve sympathy themselves rather than are able to render it to
 others. They want faith, and mistake their private ail for an infected
 atmosphere; but let any one of them recover hope for a moment, and
 right his _particular_ grievance, and he will no longer train in that
 company. To speak or do anything that shall concern mankind, one must
 speak and act as if well, or from that grain of health which he has
 left. This _Present_ book indeed is blue, but the hue of its thoughts
 is yellow. I say these things with the less hesitation, because I have
 the jaundice myself; but I also know what it is to be well. But do not
 think that one can escape from mankind who is one of them, and is so
 constantly dealing with them.
 
 I could not undertake to form a nucleus of an institution for the
 development of infant minds, where none already existed. It would be
 too cruel. And then, as if looking all this while one way with
 benevolence, to walk off another about one's own affairs suddenly!
 Something of this kind is an unavoidable objection to that.
 
 I am very sorry to hear such bad news about Aunt Maria; but I think
 that the worst is always the least to be apprehended, for nature is
 averse to it as well as we. I trust to hear that she is quite well
 soon. I send love to her and Aunt Jane. For three months I have not
 known whether to think of Sophia as in Bangor or Concord, and now you
 say that she is going directly. Tell her to write to me, and establish
 her whereabouts, and also to get well directly. And see that she has
 something worthy to do when she gets down there, for that's the best
 remedy for disease.
 
      Your affectionate brother,
      H. D. THOREAU.
 
 
 FOOTNOTES:
 
 [2] He was named David for this uncle; Dr. Ripley was the minister of
 the whole town in 1817. The Red House stood near the Emerson house on
 the Lexington road; the Woodwards were a wealthy family, afterwards in
 Quincy, to which town Dr. Woodward left a large bequest.
 
 [3] John Thoreau, grandfather of Henry, born at St. Helier's, Jersey,
 April, 1754, was a sailor on board the American privateer General
 Lincoln, November, 1779, and recognized La Sensible, French frigate,
 which carried John Adams from Boston to France. See _Journal_, vol. v,
 June 11, 1853. This John Thoreau, son of Philip, died in Concord,
 1800.
 
 [4] This had been the abode of old Deacon Parkman, a granduncle of the
 late Francis Parkman, the historian, and son of the Westborough
 clergyman from whom this distinguished family descends. Deacon Parkman
 was a merchant in Concord, and lived in what was then a good house. It
 stood in the middle of the village, where the Public Library now is.
 The "Texas" house was built by Henry Thoreau and his father John; it
 was named from a section of the village then called "Texas," because a
 little remote from the churches and schools; perhaps the same odd
 fancy that had bestowed the name of "Virginia" on the road of
 Thoreau's birthplace. The "Yellow House reformed" was a small cottage
 rebuilt and enlarged by the Thoreaus in 1850; in this, on the main
 street, Henry and his father and mother died.
 
 [5] During the greater part of his college course he signed himself D.
 H. Thoreau, as he was christened (David Henry); but being constantly
 called "Henry," he put this name first about the time he left college,
 and was seldom afterwards known by the former initials.
 
 [6] The impression made on one classmate and former room-mate ("chum")
 of Thoreau, by this utterance, will be seen by this fragment of a
 letter from James Richardson of Dedham (afterwards Reverend J.
 Richardson), dated Dedham, September 7, 1837:--
 
       "FRIEND THOREAU,--After you had finished your part in the
       Performances of Commencement (the tone and sentiment of
       which, by the way, I liked much, as being of a sound
       philosophy), I hardly saw you again at all. Neither at
       Mr. Quincy's levee, neither at any of our classmates'
       evening entertainments, did I find you; though for the
       purpose of taking a farewell, and leaving you some
       memento of an old chum, as well as on matters of
       business, I much wished to see your face once more. Of
       course you must be present at our October
       meeting,--notice of the time and place for which will be
       given in the newspapers. I hear that you are comfortably
       located, in your native town, as the guardian of its
       children, in the immediate vicinity, I suppose, of one of
       our most distinguished apostles of the future, R. W.
       Emerson, and situated under the ministry of our old
       friend Reverend Barzillai Frost, to whom please make my
       remembrances. I heard from you, also, that Concord
       Academy, lately under the care of Mr. Phineas Allen of
       Northfield, is now vacant of a preceptor; should Mr. Hoar
       find it difficult to get a scholar college-distinguished,
       perhaps he would take up with one, who, though in many
       respects a critical thinker, and a careful philosopher of
       language among other things, has never distinguished
       himself in his class as a regular attendant on college
       studies and rules. If so, could you do me the kindness to
       mention my name to him as of one intending to make
       teaching his profession, at least for a part of his life.
       If recommendations are necessary, President Quincy has
       offered me one, and I can easily get others."
 
 [7] This eldest of the children of John Thoreau and Cynthia Dunbar was
 born October 22, 1812, and died June 14, 1849. Her grandmother, Mary
 Jones of Weston, Mass., belonged to a Tory family, and several of the
 Jones brothers served as officers in the British army against General
 Washington.
 
 [8] White Pond, in the district called "Nine-Acre Corner," is here
 meant; the "Lee-vites" were a family then living on Lee's Hill.
 Naushawtuck is another name for this hill, where the old Tahatawan
 lived at times, before the English settled in Concord in September,
 1635. The real date of this letter is November 11-14, 1837, and
 between its two dates the Massachusetts State election was held. The
 "great council-house" was the Boston State-House, to which the Concord
 people were electing deputies; the "Eagle-Beak" named on the next page
 was doubtless Samuel Hoar, the first citizen of the town, and for a
 time Member of Congress from Middlesex County. He was the father of
 Rockwood and Frisbie Hoar, afterwards judge and senator respectively.
 
 [9] A delicate sarcasm on young B., who could not finish his speech in
 town-meeting without looking at his notes. The allusion to the
 "Medicine whose words are like the music of the mockingbird" is hard
 to explain; it may mean Edward Everett, then Governor of
 Massachusetts, or, possibly, Emerson, whose lectures began to attract
 notice in Boston and Cambridge. It can hardly mean Wendell Phillips,
 though his melodious eloquence had lately been heard in attacks upon
 slavery.
 
 [10] _Americana_, in this note, is the old _Encyclopedia Americana_,
 which had been edited from the German _Conversations-Lexicon_, and
 other sources, by Dr. Francis Lieber, T. G. Bradford, and other Boston
 scholars, ten years earlier, and was the only convenient book of
 reference at Thoreau's hand. The inquiry of John Thoreau is another
 evidence of the interest he took, like his brother, in the Indians and
 their flint arrowheads. The relics mentioned in the next letter were
 doubtless Indian weapons and utensils, very common about Taunton in
 the region formerly controlled by King Philip.
 
 [11] Dr. Edward Jarvis, born in Concord (1803), had gone to
 Louisville, Ky., in April, 1837, and was thriving there as a
 physician. He knew the Thoreaus well, and gave them good hopes of
 success in Ohio or Kentucky as teachers. The plan was soon abandoned,
 and Henry went to Maine to find a school, but without success. See
 Sanborn's _Thoreau_, p. 57.
 
 [12] This was the old monument of the Fight in 1775, for the
 dedication of which Emerson wrote his hymn, "By the rude bridge." This
 was sung by Thoreau, among others, to the tune of Old Hundred.
 
 [13] For twenty-five years (1866-91) the house of Ellery Channing, and
 now of Charles Emerson, nephew of Waldo Emerson.
 
 [14] The steamer Lexington lately burnt on Long Island Sound, with Dr.
 Follen on board.
 
 [15] Mrs. Brown was the elder sister of Mrs. R. W. Emerson and of the
 eminent chemist and geologist, Dr. Charles T. Jackson, of Plymouth and
 Boston. She lived for a time in Mrs. Thoreau's family, and Thoreau's
 early verses, "Sic Vita," were thrown into her window there by the
 young poet, wrapped round a cluster of violets.
 
 [16] This business of pencil-making had become the family
 bread-winner, and Henry Thoreau worked at it and kindred arts by
 intervals for the next twenty years.
 
 [17] I. T. Williams, who had lived in Concord, but now wrote from
 Buffalo, N. Y.
 
 [18] Mrs. Brown, to whom this letter and several others of the years
 1841-43 were written, lived by turns in Plymouth, her native place,
 and in Concord, where she often visited Mrs. Emerson at the time when
 Thoreau was an inmate of the Emerson household. In the early part of
 1843 she was in Plymouth, and her sister was sending her newspapers
 and other things, from time to time. The incident of the music-box,
 mentioned above, occurred at the Old Manse, where Hawthorne was living
 from the summer of 1842 until the spring of 1845, and was often
 visited by Thoreau and Ellery Channing. In the letter following, this
 incident is recalled, and with it the agreeable gift by Richard Fuller
 (a younger brother of Margaret Fuller and of Ellen, the wife of Ellery
 Channing, who came to reside in Concord about these years, and soon
 became Thoreau's most intimate friend), which was a music-box for the
 Thoreaus. They were all fond of music, and enjoyed it even in this
 mechanical form,--one evidence of the simple conditions of life in
 Concord then. The note of thanks to young Fuller, who had been,
 perhaps, a pupil of Thoreau, follows this letter to Mrs. Brown, though
 earlier in date. Mary Russell afterwards became Mrs. Marston Watson.
 
 [19] Editor of the _Democratic Review_, for which Hawthorne, Emerson,
 Thoreau, and Whittier all wrote, more or less.
 
 [20] An interesting fact in connection with Thoreau and Wheeler (whose
 home was in Lincoln, four miles southeast of Concord) is related by
 Ellery Channing in a note to me. It seems that Wheeler had built for
 himself, or hired from a farmer, a rough woodland study near Flint's
 Pond, half-way from Lincoln to Concord, which he occupied for a short
 time in 1841-42, and where Thoreau and Channing visited him. Mr.
 Channing wrote me in 1883: "Stearns Wheeler built a 'shanty' on
 Flint's Pond for the purpose of economy, for purchasing Greek books
 and going abroad to study. Whether Mr. Thoreau assisted him to build
 this shanty I cannot say, but I think he may have; also that he spent
 six weeks with him there. As Mr. Thoreau was not too original and
 inventive to follow the example of others, if good to him, it is very
 probable this undertaking of Stearns Wheeler, whom he regarded (as I
 think I have heard him say) a heroic character, suggested his own
 experiment on Walden. I believe I visited this shanty with Mr.
 Thoreau. It was very plain, with bunks of straw, and built in the
 Irish manner. I think Mr. Wheeler was as good a mechanic as Mr.
 Thoreau, and built this shanty for his own use. The object of these
 two experiments was quite unlike, except in the common purpose of
 economy. It seems to me highly probable that Mr. Wheeler's experiment
 suggested Mr. Thoreau's, as he was a man he almost worshiped. But I
 could not understand what relation Mr. Lowell had to this fact, if it
 be one. Students, in all parts of the earth, have pursued a similar
 course from motives of economy, and to carry out some special study.
 Mr. Thoreau wished to study birds, flowers, and the stone age, just as
 Mr. Wheeler wished to study Greek. And Mr. Hotham came next from just
 the same motive of economy (necessity) and to study the Bible. The
 prudential sides of all three were the same." Mr. Hotham was the young
 theological student who dwelt in a cabin by Walden in 1869-70.
 
 [21] An English critic and poetaster. See _Memoir of Bronson Alcott_,
 pp. 292-318.
 
 [22] _Thoreau, the Poet-Naturalist._ With Memorial Verses. By William
 Ellery Channing, New Edition, enlarged, edited by F. B. Sanborn
 (Boston: Charles Goodspeed, 1902). This volume, in some respects the
 best biography of Thoreau, is no longer rare. Among the Verses are
 those written by Channing for his friend's funeral; at which, also,
 Mr. Alcott read Thoreau's poem of Sympathy.
 
 [23] Headley died at the age of twenty-three, in 1788. His posthumous
 book was edited in 1810 by Rev. Henry Kett, and published in London by
 John Sharp.
 
 [24] An allusion to the strange and painful death of John Thoreau, by
 lockjaw. He had slightly wounded himself in shaving, and the cut
 became inflamed and brought on that hideous and deforming malady, of
 which, by sympathy, Henry also partook, though he recovered.
 
 [25] _Past and Present._
 
 [26] Of the publishing house of Bradbury & Soden, in Boston, which had
 taken Nathan Hale's _Boston Miscellany_ off his hands, and had
 published in it, with promise of payment, Thoreau's "Walk to
 Wachusett." But much time had passed, and the debt was not paid; hence
 the lack of a "shower of shillings" which the letter laments.
 Emerson's reply gives the first news of the actual beginning of
 Alcott's short-lived paradise at Fruitlands, and dwells with interest
 on the affairs of the rural and lettered circle at Concord.
 
 [27] At Fruitlands with the Alcotts. See Sanborn's _Thoreau_, p. 137,
 for this letter.
 
 [28] Emerson also was satisfied with it for once, and wrote to
 Thoreau: "Our _Dial_ thrives well enough in these weeks. I print W. E.
 Channing's 'Letters,' or the first ones, but he does not care to have
 them named as his for a while. They are very agreeable reading."
 
 [29] Afterwards Senator Hoar of Massachusetts, but then in Harvard
 College.
 
 [30] Henry James, Senior.
 
 [31] Emerson had written, July 20: "I am sorry to say that when I
 called on Bradbury & Soden, nearly a month ago, their partner, in
 their absence, informed me that they should not pay you, at present,
 any part of their debt on account of the _Boston Miscellany_. After
 much talking, all the promise he could offer was 'that within a year
 it would probably be paid,'--a probability which certainly looks very
 slender. The very worst thing he said was the proposition that you
 should take your payment in the form of _Boston Miscellanies_! I shall
 not fail to refresh their memory at intervals."
 
 [32] It may need to be said that these were New York weeklies--the
 _Mirror_, edited in part by N. P. Willis, and the _New World_ by Park
 Benjamin, formerly of Boston, whose distinction it is to have first
 named Hawthorne as a writer of genius. "Miss Fuller" was
 Margaret,--not yet resident in New York, whither she went to live in
 1844.
 
 [33] The allusion here is to Ellery Channing's "Youth of the Poet and
 Painter," in the _Dial_,--an unfinished autobiography. The _Present_
 of W. H. Channing, his cousin, named above, was a short-lived
 periodical, begun September 15, 1843, and ended in April, 1844.
 "McKean" was Henry Swasey McKean, who was a classmate of Charles
 Emerson at Harvard in 1828, a tutor there in 1830-35, and who died in
 1857.
 
 [34] This inkstand was presented by Miss Hoar, with a note dated
 "Boston, May 2, 1843," which deserves to be copied:--
 
 DEAR HENRY,--The rain prevented me from seeing you the night before I
 came away, to leave with you a parting assurance of good will and good
 hope. We have become better acquainted within the two past years than
 in our whole life as schoolmates and neighbors before; and I am
 unwilling to let you go away without telling you that I, among your
 other friends, shall miss you much, and follow you with remembrance
 and all best wishes and confidence. Will you take this little inkstand
 and try if it will carry ink safely from Concord to Staten Island? and
 the pen, which, if you can write with steel, may be made sometimes the
 interpreter of friendly thoughts to those whom you leave beyond the
 reach of your voice,--or record the inspirations of Nature, who, I
 doubt not, will be as faithful to you who trust her in the sea-girt
 Staten Island as in Concord woods and meadows. Good-by, and  ,
 which, a wise man says, is the only salutation fit for the wise.
 
      Truly your friend,     E. HOAR.
 
 
 
 
 II
 
 GOLDEN AGE OF ACHIEVEMENT
 
 
 This was the golden age of hope and achievement for the Concord poets
 and philosophers. Their ranks were not yet broken by death (for
 Stearns Wheeler was hardly one of them), their spirits were high, and
 their faith in each other unbounded. Emerson wrote thus from Concord,
 while Thoreau was perambulating Staten Island and calling on "the
 false booksellers:" "Ellery Channing is excellent company, and we walk
 in all directions. He remembers you with great faith and hope; thinks
 you ought not to see Concord again these ten years--that you ought to
 grind up fifty Concords in your mill--and much other opinion and
 counsel he holds in store on this topic. Hawthorne walked with me
 yesterday afternoon, and not until after our return did I read his
 'Celestial Railroad,' which has a serene strength which we cannot
 afford not to praise, in this low life."
 
 The Transcendentalists had their quarterly, and even their daily
 organ, for Mr. Greeley put the _Tribune_ at their service, and gave
 places on its staff to Margaret Fuller and her brother-in-law
 Channing, and would gladly have made room for Emerson in its columns,
 if the swift utterance of a morning paper had suited his habit of
 publication. While in the _Tribune_ office, Ellery Channing thus
 wrote to Thoreau, after he had returned home, disappointed with New
 York, to make lead pencils in his father's shop at Concord.
 
 
 ELLERY CHANNING TO THOREAU (AT CONCORD).
 
      March 5, 1845.
 
 MY DEAR THOREAU,--The handwriting of your letter is so miserable that
 I am not sure I have made it out. If I have, it seems to me you are
 the same old sixpence you used to be, rather rusty, but a genuine
 piece. I see nothing for you in this earth but that field which I once
 christened "Briars;" go out upon that, build yourself a hut, and there
 begin the grand process of devouring yourself alive. I see no
 alternative, no other hope for you. Eat yourself up; you will eat
 nobody else, nor anything else. Concord is just as good a place as any
 other; there are, indeed, more people in the streets of that village
 than in the streets of this. This is a singularly muddy town; muddy,
 solitary, and silent.
 
 In your line, I have not done a great deal since I arrived here; I do
 not mean the Pencil line, but the Staten Island line, having been
 there once, to walk on a beach by the telegraph, but did not visit the
 scene of your dominical duties. Staten Island is very distant from No.
 30 Ann Street. I saw polite William Emerson in November last, but have
 not caught any glimpse of him since then. I am as usual suffering the
 various alternations from agony to despair, from hope to fear, from
 pain to pleasure. Such wretched one-sided productions as you know
 nothing of the universal man; you may think yourself well off.
 
 That baker, Hecker, who used to live on two crackers a day, I have not
 seen; nor Black, nor Vethake, nor Danesaz, nor Rynders, nor any of
 Emerson's old cronies, excepting James, a little fat, rosy
 Swedenborgian amateur with the look of a broker and the brains and
 heart of a Pascal. William Channing, I see nothing of him; he is the
 dupe of good feelings, and I have all-too-many of these now. I have
 seen something of your friends, Waldo and Tappan, and have also seen
 our good man McKean, the keeper of that stupid place, the Mercantile
 Library.
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 Acting on Channing's hint, and an old fancy of his own, Thoreau, in
 the summer of 1845, built his cabin at Walden and retired there; while
 Hawthorne entered the Salem custom-house, and Alcott, returning
 defeated from his Fruitlands paradise, was struggling with poverty and
 discouragement at Concord. Charles Lane, his English comrade, withdrew
 to New York or its vicinity, and in 1846 to London, whence he had come
 in 1842, full of hope and enthusiasm. A few notes of his, or about
 him, may here find place. They were sent to Thoreau at Concord, and
 show that Lane continued to value his candid friend. The first,
 written after leaving Fruitlands, introduces the late Father Hecker,
 who had been one of the family there, to Thoreau. The second and third
 relate to the sale of the Alcott-Lane Library, and other matters.
 
   [Illustration: _Walden Woods_]
 
 
 CHARLES LANE TO THOREAU (AT CONCORD).
 
      BOSTON, December 3, 1843.
 
 DEAR FRIEND,--As well as my wounded hands permit, I have scribbled
 something for friend Hecker, which if agreeable may be the opportunity
 for entering into closer relations with him; a course I think likely
 to be mutually encouraging, as well as beneficial to all men. But let
 it reach him in the manner most conformable to your own feelings. That
 from all perils of a false position you may shortly be relieved, and
 landed in the position where you feel "at home," is the sincere wish
 of yours most friendly,
 
      CHARLES LANE.
 
      MR. HENRY THOREAU,
      Earl House, Coach Office.
 
 
      NEW YORK, February 17, 1846.
 
 DEAR FRIEND,--The books you were so kind as to deposit about two years
 and a half ago with Messrs. Wiley & Putnam have all been sold, but as
 they were left in your name it is needful, in strict business, that
 you should send an order to them to pay to me the amount due. I will
 therefore thank you to inclose me such an order at your earliest
 convenience in a letter addressed to your admiring friend,
 
      CHARLES LANE,
      Post Office, New York City.
 
 
      BOONTON, N. J., March 30, 1846.
 
 DEAR FRIEND,--If the human nature participates of the elemental I am
 no longer in danger of becoming suburban, or super-urban, that is to
 say, too urbane. I am now more likely to be converted into a
 petrifaction, for slabs of rock and foaming waters never so abounded
 in my neighborhood. A very Peter I shall become: on this rock _He_ has
 built _his church_. You would find much joy in these eminences and in
 the views therefrom.
 
 My pen has been necessarily unproductive in the continued motion of
 the sphere in which I have lately been moved. You, I suppose, have not
 passed the winter to the world's unprofit.
 
 You never have seen, as I have, the book with a preface of 450 pages
 and a text of 60. My letter is like unto it.
 
 I have only to add that your letter of the 26th February did its work,
 and that I submit to you cordial thanks for the same. Yours truly,
 
      CHAS. LANE.
 
 I hope to hear occasionally of your doings and those of your compeers
 in your classic plowings and diggings.
 
      TO HENRY D. THOREAU,
      Concord Woods.
 
 Thoreau's letters to Lane have not come into any editor's hands. In
 England, before Lane's discovery by Alcott, in 1842, he had been the
 editor of the _Mark-Lane Gazette_ (or something similar), which gave
 the price-current of wheat, etc., in the English markets. Emerson
 found him in Hampstead, London, in February, 1848, and wrote to
 Thoreau: "I went last Sunday, for the first time, to see Lane at
 Hampstead, and dined with him. He was full of friendliness and
 hospitality; has a school of sixteen children, one lady as matron,
 then Oldham. That is all the household. They looked just comfortable."
 
 "Lane instructed me to ask you to forward his _Dials_ to him, which
 must be done, if you can find them. Three bound volumes are among his
 books in my library. The fourth volume is in unbound numbers at J.
 Munroe & Co.'s shop, received there in a parcel to my address, a day
 or two before I sailed, and which I forgot to carry to Concord. It
 must be claimed without delay. It is certainly there,--was opened by
 me and left; and they can inclose all four volumes to Chapman for me."
 
 This would indicate that he had not lost interest in the days and
 events of his American sojourn,--unpleasant as some of these must have
 been to the methodical, prosaic Englishman.
 
 While at Walden, Thoreau wrote but few letters; there is, however, a
 brief correspondence with Mr. J. E. Cabot, then an active naturalist,
 coperating with Agassiz in his work on the American fishes, who had
 requested Thoreau to procure certain species from Concord. The letters
 were written from the cabin at Walden, and it is this same structure
 that figures in the letters from Thoreau to Emerson in England, as the
 proposed nucleus of the cottage of poor Hugh the gardener, before he
 ran away from Concord, as there narrated, on a subsequent page. The
 first sending of river-fish was in the end of April, 1847. Then
 followed this letter:--
 
 
 TO ELLIOT CABOT (AT BOSTON).
 
      CONCORD, May 8, 1847.
 
 DEAR SIR,--I believe that I have not yet acknowledged the receipt of
 your notes, and a five-dollar bill. I am very glad that the fishes
 afforded Mr. Agassiz so much pleasure. I could easily have obtained
 more specimens of the _Sternothrus odoratus_; they are quite numerous
 here. I will send more of them ere long. Snapping turtles are perhaps
 as frequently met with in our muddy river as anything, but they are
 not always to be had when wanted. It is now rather late in the season
 for them. As no one makes a business of seeking them, and they are
 valued for soups, science may be forestalled by appetite in this
 market, and it will be necessary to bid pretty high to induce persons
 to obtain or preserve them. I think that from seventy-five cents to a
 dollar apiece would secure all that are in any case to be had, and
 will set this price upon their heads, if the treasury of science is
 full enough to warrant it.
 
 You will excuse me for taking toll in the shape of some, it may be,
 impertinent and unscientific inquiries. There are found in the waters
 of the Concord, so far as I know, the following kinds of fishes:--
 
 _Pickerel._ Besides the common, fishermen distinguish the brook, or
 grass pickerel, which bites differently, and has a shorter snout.
 Those caught in Walden, hard by my house, are easily distinguished
 from those caught in the river, being much heavier in proportion to
 their size, stouter, firmer-fleshed, and lighter-colored. The little
 pickerel which I sent last, jumped into the boat in its fright.
 
 _Pouts._ Those in the pond are of different appearance from those that
 I have sent.
 
 _Breams._ Some more green, others more brown.
 
 _Suckers._ The horned, which I sent first, and the black. I am not
 sure whether the common or Boston sucker is found here. Are the three
 which I sent last, which were speared in the river, identical with the
 three black suckers, taken by hand in the brook, which I sent before?
 I have never examined them minutely.
 
 _Perch._ The river perch, of which I sent five specimens in the box,
 are darker-colored than those found in the pond. There are myriads of
 small ones in the latter place, and but few large ones. I have counted
 ten transverse bands on some of the smaller.
 
 _Lampreys._ Very scarce since the dams at Lowell and Billerica were
 built.
 
 _Shiners._ _Leuciscus chrysoleucus_, silver and golden. What is the
 difference?
 
 _Roach_ or _Chiverin_ (_Leuciscus pulchellus_, _argenteus_, or what
 not). The _white_ and the _red_. The former described by Storer, but
 the latter, which deserves distinct notice, not described, to my
 knowledge. Are the minnows (called here dace), of which I sent three
 live specimens, I believe, one larger and two smaller, the young of
 this species?
 
 _Trout._ Of different appearance in different brooks in this
 neighborhood.
 
 _Eels._
 
 _Red-finned Minnows_, of which I sent you a dozen alive. I have never
 recognized them in any books. Have they any scientific name?
 
 If convenient, will you let Dr. Storer see these brook minnows? There
 is also a kind of dace or fresh-water smelt in the pond, which is,
 perhaps, distinct from any of the above. What of the above does M.
 Agassiz particularly wish to see? Does he want more specimens of kinds
 which I have already sent? There are also minks, muskrats, frogs,
 lizards, tortoises, snakes, caddice-worms, leeches, muscles, etc., or
 rather, _here they are_. The funds which you sent me are nearly
 exhausted. Most fishes can now be taken with the hook, and it will
 cost but little trouble or money to obtain them. The snapping turtles
 will be the main expense. I should think that five dollars more, at
 least, might be profitably expended.
 
 
 TO ELLIOT CABOT (AT BOSTON).
 
      CONCORD, June 1, 1847.
 
 _Dear Sir_,--I send you 15 pouts, 17 perch, 13 shiners, 1 larger land
 tortoise, and 5 muddy tortoises, all from the pond by my house. Also 7
 perch, 5 shiners, 8 breams, 4 dace(?), 2 muddy tortoises, 5 painted
 do., and 3 land do., all from the river. One black snake, alive, and
 one dormouse(?) caught last night in my cellar. The tortoises were all
 put in alive; the fishes were alive yesterday, _i. e._, Monday, and
 some this morning. Observe the difference between those from the pond,
 which is pure water, and those from the river.
 
 I will send the light-colored trout and the pickerel with the longer
 snout, which is our large one, when I meet with them. I have set a
 price upon the heads of snapping turtles, though it is late in the
 season to get them.
 
 If I wrote red-finned eel, it was a slip of the pen; I meant
 red-finned minnow. This is their name here; though smaller specimens
 have but a slight reddish tinge at the base of the pectorals.
 
 Will you, at your leisure, answer these queries?
 
 Do you mean to say that the twelve banded minnows which I sent are
 undescribed, or only one? What are the scientific names of those
 minnows which have any? Are the four dace I send to-day identical with
 one of the former, and what are they called? Is there such a fish as
 the black sucker described,--distinct from the common?
 
 
 AGASSIZ TO THOREAU (AT CONCORD).
 
 In October, 1849, Agassiz, in reply to a request from Thoreau that he
 would lecture in Bangor, sent this characteristic letter:--
 
 "I remember with much pleasure the time when you used to send me
 specimens from your vicinity, and also our short interview in the
 Marlborough Chapel.[35] I am under too many obligations of your
 kindness to forget it. I am very sorry that I missed your visit in
 Boston; but for eighteen months I have now been settled in Cambridge.
 It would give me great pleasure to engage for the lectures you ask
 from me for the Bangor Lyceum; but I find it has been last winter such
 a heavy tax upon my health, that I wish for the present to make no
 engagements; as I have some hope of making my living this year by
 other efforts,--and beyond the necessity of my wants, both domestic
 and scientific, I am determined not to exert myself; as all the time I
 can thus secure to myself must be exclusively devoted to science. My
 only business is my intercourse with nature; and could I do without
 draughtsmen, lithographers, etc., I would live still more retired.
 This will satisfy you that whenever you come this way I shall be
 delighted to see you,--since I have also heard something of your mode
 of living."
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 Agassiz had reason indeed to remember the collections made by Thoreau,
 since (from the letters of Mr. Cabot) they aided him much in his
 comparison of the American with the European fishes. When the first
 firkin of Concord fish arrived in Boston, where Agassiz was then
 working, "he was highly delighted, and began immediately to spread
 them out and arrange them for his draughtsman. Some of the species he
 had seen before, but never in so fresh condition; others, as the
 breams and the pout, he had seen only in spirits, and the little
 tortoise he knew only from the books. I am sure you would have felt
 fully repaid for your trouble," adds Mr. Cabot, "if you could have
 seen the eager satisfaction with which he surveyed each fin and
 scale." Agassiz himself wrote the same day: "I have been highly
 pleased to find that the small mud turtle was really the _Sternothrus
 odoratus_, as I suspected,--a very rare species, quite distinct from
 the snapping turtle. The suckers were all of one and the same species
 (_Catastomus tuberculatus_); the female has the tubercles. As I am
 very anxious to send some snapping turtles home with my first boxes, I
 would thank Mr. T. very much if he could have some taken for me."
 
 Mr. Cabot goes on: "Of the perch Agassiz remarked that it was almost
 identical with that of Europe, but distinguishable, on close
 examination, by the tubercles on the sub-operculum.... More of the
 painted tortoises would be acceptable. The snapping turtles are very
 interesting to him as forming a transition from the turtles proper to
 the alligator and crocodile.... We have received three boxes from you
 since the first." (May 27.) "Agassiz was much surprised and pleased at
 the extent of the collections you sent during his absence in New York.
 Among the fishes there is one, and probably two, new species. The
 fresh-water smelt he does not know. He is very anxious to see the
 pickerel with the long snout, which he suspects may be the _Esox
 estor_, or Maskalong; he has seen this at Albany.... As to the minks,
 etc., I know they would all be very acceptable to him. When I asked
 him about these, and more specimens of what you have sent, he said, 'I
 dare not make any request, for I do not know how much trouble I may be
 giving to Mr. Thoreau; but my method of examination requires many more
 specimens than most naturalists would care for.'" (June 1.) "Agassiz
 is delighted to find one, and he thinks two, more new species; one is
 a Pomotis,--the bream without the red spot in the operculum, and with
 a red belly and fins. The other is the shallower and lighter colored
 shiner. The four dace you sent last are _Leuciscus argenteus_. They
 are different from that you sent before under this name, but which was
 a new species. Of the four kinds of minnow, two are new. There is a
 black sucker (_Catastomus nigricans_), but there has been no specimen
 among those you have sent, and A. has never seen a specimen. He seemed
 to know your mouse, and called it the white-bellied mouse. It was the
 first specimen he had seen. I am in hopes to bring or send him to
 Concord, to look after new _Leucisci_, etc." Agassiz did afterwards
 come, more than once, and examined turtles with Thoreau.
 
 Soon after this scientific correspondence, Thoreau left his retreat by
 Walden to take the place of Emerson in his household, while his friend
 went to visit Carlyle and give lectures in England. The letters that
 follow are among the longest Thoreau ever composed, and will give a
 new conception of the writer to those who may have figured him as a
 cold, stoical, or selfish person, withdrawn from society and its
 duties. The first describes the setting out of Emerson for Europe.
 
 
 TO SOPHIA THOREAU (AT BANGOR).
 
      CONCORD, October 24, 1847.
 
 DEAR SOPHIA,--I thank you for those letters about Ktaadn, and hope you
 will save and send me the rest, and anything else you may meet with
 relating to the Maine woods. That Dr. Young is both young and green
 too at traveling in the woods. However, I hope he got "yarbs" enough
 to satisfy him. I went to Boston the 5th of this month to see Mr.
 Emerson off to Europe. He sailed in the Washington Irving
 packet-ship; the same in which Mr. [F. H.] Hedge went before him. Up
 to this trip the first mate aboard this ship was, as I hear, one
 Stephens, a Concord boy, son of Stephens the carpenter, who used to
 live above Mr. Dennis's. Mr. Emerson's stateroom was like a carpeted
 dark closet, about six feet square, with a large keyhole for a window.
 The window was about as big as a saucer, and the glass two inches
 thick, not to mention another skylight overhead in the deck, the size
 of an oblong doughnut, and about as opaque. Of course it would be in
 vain to look up, if any contemplative promenader put his foot upon it.
 Such will be his lodgings for two or three weeks; and instead of a
 walk in Walden woods he will take a promenade on deck, where the few
 trees, you know, are stripped of their bark. The steam-tug carried the
 ship to sea against a head wind without a rag of sail being raised.
 
 I don't remember whether you have heard of the new telescope at
 Cambridge or not. They think it is the best one in the world, and have
 already seen more than Lord Rosse or Herschel. I went to see Perez
 Blood's, some time ago, with Mr. Emerson. He had not gone to bed, but
 was sitting in the wood-shed, in the dark, alone, in his astronomical
 chair, which is all legs and rounds, with a seat which can be inserted
 at any height. We saw Saturn's rings, and the mountains in the moon,
 and the shadows in their craters, and the sunlight on the spurs of the
 mountains in the dark portion, etc., etc. When I asked him the power
 of his glass, he said it was 85. But what is the power of the
 Cambridge glass? 2000!!! The last is about twenty-three feet long.
 
 I think you may have a grand time this winter pursuing some
 study,--keeping a journal, or the like,--while the snow lies deep
 without. Winter is the time for study, you know, and the colder it is
 the more studious we are. Give my respects to the whole Penobscot
 tribe, and tell them that I trust we are good brothers still, and
 endeavor to keep the chain of friendship bright, though I do dig up a
 hatchet now and then. I trust you will not stir from your comfortable
 winter quarters, Miss Bruin, or even put your head out of your hollow
 tree, till the sun has melted the snow in the spring, and "the green
 buds, they are a-swellin'."
 
      From your         BROTHER HENRY.
 
 This letter will explain some of the allusions in the first letter to
 Emerson in England. Perez Blood was a rural astronomer living in the
 extreme north quarter of Concord, next to Carlisle, with his two
 maiden sisters, in the midst of a fine oak wood; their cottage being
 one of the points in view when Thoreau and his friends took their
 afternoon rambles. Sophia Thoreau, the younger and soon the only
 surviving sister, was visiting her cousins in Maine, the "Penobscot
 tribe" of whom the letter makes mention, with an allusion to the
 Indians of that name near Bangor. His letter to her and those which
 follow were written from Emerson's house, where Thoreau lived during
 the master's absence across the ocean. It was in the orchard of this
 house that Alcott was building that summer-house at which Thoreau,
 with his geometrical eye, makes merry in the next letter.
 
 
 TO R. W. EMERSON (IN ENGLAND).
 
      CONCORD, November 14, 1847.
 
 DEAR FRIEND,--I am but a poor neighbor to you here,--a very poor
 companion am I. I understand that very well, but that need not prevent
 my _writing_ to you now. I have almost never written letters in my
 life, yet I think I can write as good ones as I frequently see, so I
 shall not hesitate to write this, such as it may be, knowing that you
 will welcome anything that reminds you of Concord.
 
 I have banked up the young trees against the winter and the mice, and
 I will look out, in my careless way, to see when a pale is loose or a
 nail drops out of its place. The broad gaps, at least, I will occupy.
 I heartily wish I could be of good service to this household. But I,
 who have only used these ten digits so long to solve the problem of a
 living, how can I? The world is a cow that is hard to milk,--life does
 not come so easy,--and oh, how thinly it is watered ere we get it! But
 the young bunting calf, he will get at it. There is no way so direct.
 This is to earn one's living by the sweat of his brow. It is a little
 like joining a community, this life, to such a hermit as I am; and as
 I don't keep the accounts, I don't know whether the experiment will
 succeed or fail finally. At any rate, it is good for society, so I do
 not regret my transient nor my permanent share in it.
 
 Lidian [Mrs. Emerson] and I make very good housekeepers. She is a
 very dear sister to me. Ellen and Edith and Eddy and Aunty Brown keep
 up the tragedy and comedy and tragic-comedy of life as usual. The two
 former have not forgotten their old acquaintance; even Edith carries a
 young memory in her head, I find. Eddy can teach us all how to
 pronounce. If you should discover any rare hoard of wooden or pewter
 horses, I have no doubt he will know how to appreciate it. He
 occasionally surveys mankind from my shoulders as wisely as ever
 Johnson did. I respect him not a little, though it is I that lift him
 up so unceremoniously. And sometimes I have to set him down again in a
 hurry, according to his "mere will and good pleasure." He very
 seriously asked me, the other day, "Mr. Thoreau, will you be my
 father?" I am occasionally Mr. Rough-and-tumble with him that I may
 not miss _him_, and lest he should miss _you_ too much. So you must
 come back soon, or you will be superseded.
 
 Alcott has heard that I laughed, and so set the people laughing, at
 his arbor, though I never laughed louder than when I was on the
 ridge-pole. But now I have not laughed for a long time, it is so
 serious. He is very grave to look at. But, not knowing all this, I
 strove innocently enough, the other day, to engage his attention to my
 mathematics. "Did you ever study geometry, the relation of straight
 lines to curves, the transition from the finite to the infinite? Fine
 things about it in Newton and Leibnitz." But he would hear none of
 it,--men of taste preferred the natural curve. Ah, he is a crooked
 stick himself. He is getting on now so many _knots_ an hour. There is
 one knot at present occupying the point of highest elevation,--the
 present highest point; and as many knots as are not handsome, I
 presume, are thrown down and cast into the pines. Pray show him this
 if you meet him anywhere in London, for I cannot make him hear much
 plainer words here. He forgets that I am neither old nor young, nor
 anything in particular, and behaves as if I had still some of the
 animal heat in me. As for the building, I feel a little oppressed when
 I come near it. It has no great disposition to be beautiful; it is
 certainly a wonderful structure, on the whole, and the fame of the
 architect will endure as long as it shall stand. I should not show you
 this side alone, if I did not suspect that Lidian had done complete
 justice to the other.
 
 Mr. [Edmund] Hosmer has been working at a tannery in Stow for a
 fortnight, though he has just now come home sick. It seems that he was
 a tanner in his youth, and so he has made up his mind a little at
 last. This comes of reading the New Testament. was n't one of the
 Apostles a tanner? Mrs. Hosmer remains here, and John looks stout
 enough to fill his own shoes and his father's too.
 
 Mr. Blood and his company have at length seen the stars through the
 great telescope, and he told me that he thought it was worth the
 while. Mr. Peirce made him wait till the crowd had dispersed (it was a
 Saturday evening), and then was quite polite,--conversed with him, and
 showed him the micrometer, etc.; and he said Mr. Blood's glass was
 large enough for all ordinary astronomical work. [Rev.] Mr. Frost and
 Dr. [Josiah] Bartlett seemed disappointed that there was no greater
 difference between the Cambridge glass and the Concord one. They used
 only a power of 400. Mr. Blood tells me that he is too old to study
 the calculus or higher mathematics. At Cambridge they think that they
 have discovered traces of another satellite to Neptune. They have been
 obliged to exclude the public altogether, at last. The very dust which
 they raised, "which is filled with minute crystals," etc., as
 professors declare, having to be wiped off the glasses, would ere long
 wear them away. It is true enough, Cambridge college is really
 beginning to wake up and redeem its character and overtake the age. I
 see by the catalogue that they are about establishing a scientific
 school in connection with the university, at which any one above
 eighteen, on paying one hundred dollars annually (Mr. Lawrence's fifty
 thousand dollars will probably diminish this sum), may be instructed
 in the highest branches of science,--in astronomy, "theoretical and
 practical, with the use of the instruments" (so the great Yankee
 astronomer may be born without delay), in mechanics and engineering to
 the last degree. Agassiz will ere long commence his lectures in the
 zological department. A chemistry class has already been formed under
 the direction of Professor Horsford. A new and adequate building for
 the purpose is already being erected. They have been foolish enough to
 put at the end of all this earnest the old joke of a diploma. Let
 every sheep keep but his own skin, I say.
 
 I have had a tragic correspondence, for the most part all on one side,
 with Miss ----. She did really wish to--I hesitate to write--marry
 me. That is the way they spell it. Of course I did not write a
 deliberate answer. How could I deliberate upon it? I sent back as
 distinct a _no_ as I have learned to pronounce after considerable
 practice, and I trust that this _no_ has succeeded. Indeed, I wished
 that it might burst, like hollow shot, after it had struck and buried
 itself and made itself felt there. _There was no other way._ I really
 had anticipated no such foe as this in my career.
 
 I suppose you will like to hear of my book, though I have nothing
 worth writing about it. Indeed, for the last month or two I have
 forgotten it, but shall certainly remember it again. Wiley & Putnam,
 Munroe, the Harpers, and Crosby & Nichols have all declined printing
 it with the least risk to themselves; but Wiley & Putnam will print it
 in their series, and any of them anywhere, at _my_ risk. If I liked
 the book well enough, I should not delay; but for the present I am
 indifferent. I believe this is, after all, the course you advised,--to
 let it lie.
 
 I do not know what to say of myself. I sit before my green desk, in
 the chamber at the head of the stairs, and attend to my thinking,
 sometimes more, sometimes less distinctly. I am not unwilling to think
 great thoughts if there are any in the wind, but what they are I am
 not sure. They suffice to keep me awake while the day lasts, at any
 rate. Perhaps they will redeem some portion of the night ere long.
 
 I can imagine you astonishing, bewildering, confounding, and sometimes
 delighting John Bull with your Yankee notions, and that he begins to
 take a pride in the relationship at last; introduced to all the stars
 of England in succession, after the lecture, until you pine to thrust
 your head once more into a genuine and unquestionable nebula, if there
 be any left. I trust a common man will be the most uncommon to you
 before you return to these parts. I have thought there was some
 advantage even in death, by which we "mingle with the herd of common
 men."
 
 Hugh [the gardener] still has his eye on the Walden _agellum_, and
 orchards are waving there in the windy future for him. That's the
 where-I'll-go-next, thinks he; but no important steps are yet taken.
 He reminds me occasionally of this open secret of his, with which the
 very season seems to labor, and affirms seriously that as to his
 wants--wood, stone, or timber--I know better than he. That is a
 clincher which I shall have to avoid to some extent; but I fear that
 it is a wrought nail and will not break. Unfortunately, the day after
 cattle-show--the day after small beer--he was among the missing, but
 not long this time. The Ethiopian cannot change his skin nor the
 leopard his spots, nor indeed Hugh--his Hugh.
 
 As I walked over Conantum, the other afternoon, I saw a fair column of
 smoke rising from the woods directly over my house that was (as I
 judged), and already began to conjecture if my deed of sale would not
 be made invalid by this. But it turned out to be John Richardson's
 young wood, on the southeast of your field. It was burnt nearly all
 over, and up to the rails and the road. It was set on fire, no doubt,
 by the same Lucifer that lighted Brooks's lot before. So you see that
 your small lot is comparatively safe for this season, the back fire
 having been already set for you.
 
 They have been choosing between John Keyes and Sam Staples, if the
 world wants to know it, as representative of this town, and Staples is
 chosen. The candidates for governor--think of my writing this to
 you!--were Governor Briggs and General Cushing, and Briggs is elected,
 though the Democrats have gained. Ain't I a brave boy to know so much
 of politics for the nonce? But I should n't have known it if Coombs
 had n't told me. They have had a peace meeting here,--I should n't
 think of telling you if I did n't know anything would do for the
 English market,--and some men, Deacon Brown at the head, have signed a
 long pledge, swearing that they will "treat all mankind as brothers
 henceforth." I think I shall wait and see how they treat me first. I
 think that Nature meant kindly when she made our brothers few.
 However, my voice is still for peace. So good-by, and a truce to all
 joking, my dear friend, from
 
      H. D. T.
 
 Upon this letter some annotations are to be made. "Eddy" was Emerson's
 youngest child, Edward Waldo, then three years old and upward,--of
 late years his father's biographer. Hugh, the gardener, of whom more
 anon, bargained for the house of Thoreau on Emerson's land at Walden,
 and for a field to go with it; but the bargain came to naught, and the
 cabin was removed three or four miles to the northwest, where it
 became a granary for Farmer Clark and his squirrels, near the entrance
 to the park known as Estabrook's. Edmund Hosmer was the farming
 friend and neighbor with whom, at one time, G. W. Curtis and his
 brother took lodgings, and at another time the Alcott family. The book
 in question was "A Week on the Concord and Merrimack Rivers."
 
 To these letters Emerson replied from England:--
 
 
 DEAR HENRY,--Very welcome in the parcel was your letter, very precious
 your thoughts and tidings. It is one of the best things connected with
 my coming hither that you could and would keep the homestead; that
 fireplace shines all the brighter, and has a certain permanent glimmer
 therefor. Thanks, ever more thanks for the kindness which I well
 discern to the youth of the house: to my darling little horseman of
 pewter, wooden, rocking, and what other breeds,--destined, I hope, to
 ride Pegasus yet, and, I hope, not destined to be thrown; to Edith,
 who long ago drew from you verses which I carefully preserve; and to
 Ellen, whom by speech, and now by letter, I find old enough to be
 companionable, and to choose and reward her own friends in her own
 fashions. She sends me a poem to-day, which I have read three times!
 
 
 TO R. W. EMERSON (IN ENGLAND).
 
      CONCORD, December 15, 1847.
 
 DEAR FRIEND,--You are not so far off but the affairs of _this_ world
 still attract you. Perhaps it will be so when we are dead. Then look
 out. Joshua R. Holman, of Harvard, who says he lived a month with
 [Charles] Lane at Fruitlands, wishes to _hire_ said Lane's farm for
 one or more years, and will pay $125 rent, taking out of the same a
 half, if necessary, for repairs,--as for a new bank-wall to the barn
 cellar, which he says is indispensable. Palmer is gone, Mrs. Palmer is
 going. This is all that is known or that is worth knowing. Yes or no?
 What to do?
 
 Hugh's plot begins to thicken. He starts thus: eighty dollars on one
 side; Walden, field and house, on the other. How to bring these
 together so as to make a garden and a palace?
 
   [Illustration]
 
               $80       Field     House
 
      1st, let $10 go over to unite the two lots.
               $70
 
                $6 for Wetherbee's rocks to found your palace on.
               $64
 
               $64--so far, indeed, we have already got.
                $4 to bring the rocks to the field.
               $60
 
      Save     $20 by all means, to measure the field, and you have left
               $40 to complete the palace, build cellar, and dig well.
                      Build the cellar yourself, and let _well_
                      alone,--and now how does it stand?
 
               $40 to complete the palace somewhat like this.
 
 For when one asks, "Why do you want twice as much room more?" the
 reply is, "Parlor, kitchen, and bedroom,--these make the palace."
 
 "Well, Hugh, what will you do? Here are forty dollars to buy a new
 house, twelve feet by twenty-five, and add it to the old."
 
 "Well, Mr. Thoreau, as I tell you, I know no more than a child about
 it. It shall be just as you say."
 
 "Then build it yourself, get it roofed, and get in.
 
      "Commence at one end and leave it half done,
      And let time finish what money's begun."
 
 So you see we have forty dollars for a nest egg; sitting on which,
 Hugh and I alternately and simultaneously, there may in course of time
 be hatched a house that will long stand, and perchance even lay fresh
 eggs one day for its owner; that is, if, when he returns, he gives the
 young chick twenty dollars or more in addition, by way of "swichin,"
 to give it a start in the world.
 
 The _Massachusetts Quarterly Review_ came out the 1st of December, but
 it does not seem to be making a sensation, at least not hereabouts. I
 know of none in Concord who take or have seen it yet.
 
 We wish to get by all possible means some notion of your success or
 failure in England,--more than your two letters have furnished. Can't
 you send a fair sample both of young and of old England's criticism,
 if there is any printed? Alcott and [Ellery] Channing are equally
 greedy with myself.
 
      HENRY THOREAU.
 
 C. T. Jackson takes the _Quarterly_ (new one), and will lend it to us.
 Are you not going to send your wife some news of your good or ill
 success by the newspapers?
 
 
 TO R. W. EMERSON (IN ENGLAND).
 
      CONCORD, December 29, 1847.
 
 MY DEAR FRIEND,--I thank you for your letter. I was very glad to get
 it; and I am glad again to write to you. However slow the steamer, no
 time intervenes between the writing and the reading of thoughts, but
 they come freshly to the most distant port. I am here still, and very
 glad to be here, and shall not trouble you with any complaints because
 I do not fill my place better. I have had many good hours in the
 chamber at the head of the stairs,--a solid time, it seems to me. Next
 week I am going to give an account to the Lyceum of my expedition to
 Maine. Theodore Parker lectures to-night. We have had Whipple on
 Genius,--too weighty a subject for him, with his antithetical
 definitions new-vamped,--what it _is_, what it is _not_, but
 altogether what it is _not_; cuffing it this way and cuffing it that,
 as if it were an India-rubber ball. Really, it is a subject which
 should expand, expand, accumulate itself before the speaker's eyes as
 he goes on, like the snowballs which the boys roll in the street; and
 when it stops, it should be so large that he cannot start it, but must
 leave it there. [H. N.] Hudson, too, has been here, with a dark shadow
 in the core of him, and his desperate wit, so much indebted to the
 surface of him,--wringing out his words and snapping them off like a
 dish-cloth; very remarkable, but not memorable. Singular that these
 two best lecturers should have so much "wave" in their timber,--their
 solid parts to be made and kept solid by shrinkage and contraction of
 the whole, with consequent checks and fissures.
 
 Ellen and I have a good understanding. I appreciate her genuineness.
 Edith tells me after her fashion: "By and by I shall grow up and be a
 woman, and then I shall remember how you exercised me." Eddy has been
 to Boston to Christmas, but can remember nothing but the coaches, all
 Kendall's coaches. There is no variety of that vehicle that he is not
 familiar with. He _did_ try twice to tell us something else, but,
 after thinking and stuttering a long time, said, "I don't know what
 the word is,"--the _one_ word, forsooth, that would have disposed of
 all that Boston phenomenon. If you did not know him better than I, I
 could tell you more. He is a good companion for me, and I am glad that
 we are all natives of Concord. It is _young Concord_. Look out, World!
 
 Mr. Alcott seems to have sat down for the winter. He has got Plato and
 other books to read. He is as large-featured and hospitable to
 traveling thoughts and thinkers as ever; but with the same Connecticut
 philosophy as ever, mingled with what is better. If he would only
 stand upright and toe the line!--though he were to put off several
 degrees of largeness, and put on a considerable degree of littleness.
 After all, I think we must call him particularly _your_ man.
 
 I have pleasant walks and talks with Channing. James Clark--the
 Swedenborgian that was--is at the poorhouse, insane with too large
 views, so that he cannot support himself. I see him working with Fred
 and the rest. Better than be there and not insane. It is strange that
 they will make ado when a man's body is buried, but not when he thus
 really and tragically dies, or seems to die. Away with your funeral
 processions,--into the ballroom with them! I hear the bell toll hourly
 over there.[36]
 
 Lidian and I have a standing quarrel as to what is a suitable state
 of preparedness for a traveling professor's visit, or for whomsoever
 else; but further than this we are not at war. We have made up a
 dinner, we have made up a bed, we have made up a party, and our own
 minds and mouths, three several times for your professor, and he came
 not. Three several turkeys have died the death, which I myself carved,
 just as if he had been there; and the company, too, convened and
 demeaned themselves accordingly. Everything was done up in good style,
 I assure you, with only the part of the professor omitted. To have
 seen the preparation (though Lidian says it was nothing extraordinary)
 I should certainly have said he was a-coming, but he did not. He must
 have found out some shorter way to Turkey,--some overland route, I
 think. By the way, he was complimented, at the conclusion of his
 course in Boston, by the mayor moving the appointment of a committee
 to draw up resolutions expressive, etc., which was done.
 
 I have made a few verses lately. Here are some, though perhaps not the
 best,--at any rate they are the shortest,--on that universal theme,
 yours as well as mine, and several other people's:--
 
      The good how can we trust!
      Only the wise are just.
      The good, we use,
      The wise we cannot choose;
      These there are none above.
      The good, they know and love,
      But are not known again
      By those of lesser ken.
      They do not charm us with their eyes,
      But they transfix with their advice;
      No partial sympathy they feel
      With private woe or private weal,
      But with the universe joy and sigh,
      Whose knowledge is their sympathy.
 
      Good-night.     HENRY THOREAU.
 
 P. S.--I am sorry to send such a medley as this to you. I have
 forwarded Lane's _Dial_ to Munroe, and he tells the expressman that
 all is right.
 
 
 TO R. W. EMERSON (IN ENGLAND).
 
      CONCORD, January 12, 1848.
 
 It is hard to believe that England is so near as from your letters it
 appears; and that this identical piece of paper has lately come all
 the way from there hither, begrimed with the English dust which made
 you hesitate to use it; from England, which is only historical
 fairyland to me, to America, which I have put my spade into, and about
 which there is no doubt.
 
 I thought that you needed to be informed of Hugh's progress. He has
 moved his house, as I told you, and dug his cellar, and purchased
 stone of Sol Wetherbee for the last, though he has not hauled it; all
 which has cost sixteen dollars, which I have paid. He has also, as
 next in order, run away from Concord without a penny in his pocket,
 "crying" by the way,--having had another long difference with strong
 beer, and a first one, I suppose, with his wife, who seems to have
 complained that he sought other society; the one difference leading to
 the other, perhaps, but I don't know which was the leader. He writes
 back to his wife from Sterling, near Worcester, where he is chopping
 wood, his distantly kind reproaches to her, which I read straight
 through to her (not to his bottle, which he has with him, and no doubt
 addresses orally). He says that he will go on to the South in the
 spring, and will never return to Concord. Perhaps he will not. Life is
 not tragic enough for him, and he must try to cook up a more highly
 seasoned dish for himself. Towns which keep a barroom and a gun-house
 and a reading-room, should also keep a steep precipice whereoff
 impatient soldiers may jump. His sun went down, _to me_, bright and
 steady enough in the west, but it never came up in the east. Night
 intervened. He departed, as when a man dies suddenly; and perhaps
 wisely, if he was to go, without settling his affairs. They knew that
 that was a thin soil and not well calculated for pears. Nature is rare
 and sensitive on the score of nurseries. You may cut down orchards and
 grow forests at your pleasure. Sand watered with strong beer, though
 stirred with industry, will not produce grapes. He dug his cellar for
 the new part too near the old house, Irish like, though I warned him,
 and it has caved and let one end of the house down. Such is the state
 of his domestic affairs. I laugh with the Parc only. He had got the
 upland and the orchard and a part of the meadow plowed by Warren, at
 an expense of eight dollars, still unpaid, which of course is no
 affair of yours.
 
 I think that if an honest and small-familied man, who has no affinity
 for moisture in him, but who has an affinity for sand, can be found,
 it would be safe to rent him the shanty as it is, and the land; or you
 can very easily and simply let nature keep them still, without great
 loss. It may be so managed, perhaps, as to be a home for somebody, who
 shall in return serve you as fencing stuff, and to fix and locate your
 lot, as we plant a tree in the sand or on the edge of a stream;
 without expense to you in the meanwhile, and without disturbing its
 possible future value.
 
 I read a part of the story of my excursion to Ktaadn to quite a large
 audience of men and boys, the other night, whom it interested. It
 contains many facts and some poetry. I have also written what will do
 for a lecture on "Friendship."
 
 I think that the article on you in _Blackwood's_ is a good deal to get
 from the reviewers,--the first purely literary notice, as I remember.
 The writer is far enough off, in every sense, to speak with a certain
 authority. It is a better judgment of posterity than the public had.
 It is singular how sure he is to be mystified by any uncommon sense.
 But it was generous to put Plato into the list of mystics. His
 confessions on this subject suggest several thoughts, which I have not
 room to express here. The old word _seer_,--I wonder what the reviewer
 thinks that means; whether that _he_ was a man who could _see more
 than himself_.
 
 I was struck by Ellen's asking me, yesterday, while I was talking with
 Mrs. Brown, if I did not use "_colored_ words." She said that she
 could tell the color of a great many words, and amused the children at
 school by so doing. Eddy climbed up the sofa, the other day, _of his
 own accord_, and kissed the picture of his father,--"right on his
 shirt, I did."
 
 I had a good talk with Alcott this afternoon. He is certainly the
 youngest man of his age we have seen,--just on the threshold of life.
 When I looked at his gray hairs, his conversation sounded pathetic;
 but I looked again, and they reminded me of the gray dawn. He is
 getting better acquainted with Channing, though he says that, if they
 were to live in the same house, they would soon sit with their backs
 to each other.[37]
 
 You must excuse me if I do not write with sufficient directness to
 yourself, who are a far-off traveler. It is a little like shooting on
 the wing, I confess.
 
      Farewell.     HENRY THOREAU.
 
 
 TO R. W. EMERSON (IN ENGLAND).
 
      CONCORD, February 23, 1848.
 
 DEAR WALDO,--For I think I have heard that that is your name,--my
 letter which was put last into the leathern bag arrived first.
 Whatever I may _call_ you, I know you better than I know your name,
 and what becomes of the fittest name if in any sense you are here with
 him who _calls_, and not there simply to be called?
 
 I believe I never thanked you for your lectures, one and all, which I
 heard formerly read here in Concord. I _know_ I never have. There was
 some excellent reason each time why I did not; but it will never be
 too late. I have that advantage, at least, over you in my education.
 
 Lidian is too unwell to write to you; so I must tell you what I can
 about the children and herself. I am afraid she has not told you how
 unwell she is,--or to-day perhaps we may say has been. She has been
 confined to her chamber four or five weeks, and three or four weeks,
 at least, to her bed, with the jaundice. The doctor, who comes once a
 day, does not let her read (nor can she now) nor _hear_ much reading.
 She has written her letters to you, till recently, sitting up in bed,
 but he said he would not come again if she did so. She has Abby and
 Almira to take care of her, and Mrs. Brown to read to her; and I also,
 occasionally, have something to read or to say. The doctor says she
 must not expect to "take any comfort of her life" for a week or two
 yet. She wishes me to say that she has written two long and full
 letters to you about the household economies, etc., which she hopes
 have not been delayed. The children are quite well and full of
 spirits, and are going through a regular course of picture-seeing,
 with commentary by me, every evening, for Eddy's behoof. All the
 Annuals and "Diadems" are in requisition, and Eddy is forward to
 exclaim, when the hour arrives, "Now for the demdems!" I overheard
 this dialogue when Frank [Brown] came down to breakfast the other
 morning.
 
 _Eddy._ "Why, Frank, I am astonished that you should leave your boots
 in the dining-room."
 
 _Frank._ "I guess you mean _surprised_, don't you?"
 
 _Eddy._ "No, boots!"
 
 "If Waldo were here," said he, the other night, at bedtime, "we'd be
 four going upstairs." Would he like to tell papa anything? No, not
 anything; but finally, yes, he would,--that one of the white horses in
 his new barouche is broken! Ellen and Edith will perhaps speak for
 themselves, as I hear something about letters to be written by them.
 
 Mr. Alcott seems to be reading well this winter: Plato, Montaigne, Ben
 Jonson, Beaumont and Fletcher, Sir Thomas Browne, etc., etc. "I
 believe I have read them all now, or nearly all,"--those English
 authors. He is rallying for another foray with his pen, in his latter
 years, not discouraged by the past, into that crowd of unexpressed
 ideas of his, that undisciplined Parthian army, which, as soon as a
 Roman soldier would face, retreats on all hands, occasionally firing
 backwards; easily routed, not easily subdued, hovering on the skirts
 of society. Another summer shall not be devoted to the raising of
 vegetables (Arbors?) which rot in the cellar for want of consumers;
 but perchance to the arrangement of the material, the brain-crop which
 the winter has furnished. I have good talks with him. His respect for
 Carlyle has been steadily increasing for some time. He has read him
 with new sympathy and appreciation.
 
 I see Channing often. He also goes often to Alcott's, and confesses
 that he has made a discovery in him, and gives vent to his admiration
 or his confusion in characteristic exaggeration; but between this
 extreme and that you may get a fair report, and draw an inference if
 you can. Sometimes he will ride a broomstick still, though there is
 nothing to keep him, or it, up but a certain centrifugal force of
 whim, which is soon spent, and there lies your stick, not worth
 picking up to sweep an oven with now. His accustomed path is strewn
 with them. But then again, and perhaps for the most part, he sits on
 the Cliffs amid the lichens, or flits past on noiseless pinion, like
 the barred owl in the daytime, as wise and unobserved. He brought me a
 poem the other day, for me, on Walden Hermitage: not remarkable.[38]
 
 Lectures begin to multiply on my desk. I have one on Friendship which
 is new, and the materials of some others. I read one last week to the
 Lyceum, on The Rights and Duties of the Individual in Relation to
 Government,--much to Mr. Alcott's satisfaction.
 
 Joel Britton has failed and gone into chancery, but the woods continue
 to fall before the axes of other men. Neighbor Coombs[39] was lately
 found dead in the woods near Goose Pond, with his half-empty jug,
 after he had been rioting a week. Hugh, by the last accounts, was
 still in Worcester County. Mr. Hosmer, who is himself again, and
 living in Concord, has just hauled the rest of your wood, amounting to
 about ten and a half cords.
 
 The newspapers say that they have printed a pirated edition of your
 Essays in England. Is it as bad as they say, and undisguised and
 unmitigated piracy? I thought that the printed scrap would entertain
 Carlyle, notwithstanding its history. If this generation will see out
 of its hind-head, why then you may turn your back on its
 forehead. Will you forward it to him for me?
 
   [Illustration: _The Hosmer House_]
 
 This stands written in your day-book: "September 3d. Received of
 Boston Savings Bank, on account of Charles Lane, his deposit with
 interest, $131.33. 16th. Received of Joseph Palmer, on account of
 Charles Lane, three hundred twenty-three 36/100 dollars, being the
 balance of a note on demand for four hundred dollars, with interest,
 $323.36."
 
 If you have any directions to give about the trees, you must not
 forget that spring will soon be upon us.
 
 Farewell. From your friend,
 
      HENRY THOREAU.
 
 Before a reply came to this letter, Thoreau had occasion to write to
 Mr. Elliot Cabot again. The allusions to the "Week" and to the Walden
 house are interesting.
 
 
 TO ELLIOT CABOT.
 
      CONCORD, March 8, 1848.
 
 DEAR SIR,--Mr. Emerson's address is as yet, "R. W. Emerson, care of
 Alexander Ireland, Esq., Examiner Office, Manchester, England." We had
 a letter from him on Monday, dated at Manchester, February 10, and he
 was then preparing to go to Edinburgh the next day, where he was to
 lecture. He thought that he should get through his northern journeying
 by the 25th of February, and go to London to spend March and April,
 and if he did not go to Paris in May, then come home. He has been
 eminently successful, though the papers this side of the water have
 been so silent about his adventures.
 
 My book,[40] fortunately, did not find a publisher ready to undertake
 it, and you can imagine the effect of delay on an author's estimate of
 his own work. However, I like it well enough to mend it, and shall
 look at it again directly when I have dispatched some other things.
 
 I have been writing lectures for our own Lyceum this winter, mainly
 for my own pleasure and advantage. I esteem it a rare happiness to be
 able to _write_ anything, but there (if I ever get there) my concern
 for it is apt to end. Time & Co. are, after all, the only quite honest
 and trustworthy publishers that we know. I can sympathize, perhaps,
 with the barberry bush, whose business it is solely to _ripen_ its
 fruit (though that may not be to sweeten it) and to protect it with
 thorns, so that it holds on all winter, even, unless some hungry crows
 come to pluck it. But I see that I must get a few dollars together
 presently to manure my roots. Is your journal able to pay anything,
 provided it likes an article well enough? I do not promise one. At any
 rate, I mean always to spend only words enough to purchase silence
 with; and I have found that this, which is so valuable, though many
 writers do not prize it, does not cost much, after all.
 
 I have not obtained any more of the mice which I told you were so
 numerous in my cellar, as my house was removed immediately after I
 saw you, and I have been living in the village since.
 
 However, if I should happen to meet with anything rare, I will forward
 it to you. I thank you for your kind offers, and will avail myself of
 them so far as to ask if you can anywhere borrow for me for a short
 time the copy of the _Revue des Deux Mondes_ containing a notice of
 Mr. Emerson. I should like well to read it, and to read it to Mrs.
 Emerson and others. If this book is not easy to be obtained, do not by
 any means trouble yourself about it.
 
 
 TO R. W. EMERSON.[41]
 
      CONCORD, March 23, 1848.
 
 DEAR FRIEND,--Lidian says I must write a sentence about the children.
 Eddy says he cannot sing,--"not till mother is a-going to be well." We
 shall hear his voice very soon, in that case, I trust. Ellen is
 already thinking what will be done when you come home; but then she
 thinks it will be some loss that I shall go away. Edith says that I
 shall come and see them, and always at tea-time, so that I can play
 with her. Ellen thinks she likes father best because he jumps her
 sometimes. This is the latest news from
 
      Yours, etc.,     HENRY.
 
 P. S.--I have received three newspapers from you duly which I have not
 acknowledged. There is an anti-Sabbath convention held in Boston
 to-day, to which Alcott has gone.
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 That friend to whom Thoreau wrote most constantly and fully, on all
 topics, was Mr. Harrison Blake of Worcester, a graduate of Harvard two
 years earlier than Thoreau, in the same class with two other young men
 from Concord,--E. R. Hoar and H. B. Dennis. This circumstance may have
 led to Mr. Blake's visiting the town occasionally, before his intimacy
 with its poet-naturalist began, in the year 1848. At that time, as
 Thoreau wrote to Horace Greeley, he had been supporting himself for
 five years wholly by the labor of his hands; his Walden hermit life
 was over, yet neither its record nor the first book had been
 published, and Thoreau was known in literature chiefly by his papers
 in the _Dial_, which had then ceased for four years. In March, 1848,
 Mr. Blake read Thoreau's chapter on Persius in the _Dial_ for July,
 1840,--and though he had read it before without being much impressed
 by it, he now found in it "pure depth and solidity of thought." "It
 has revived in me," he wrote to Thoreau, "a haunting impression of
 you, which I carried away from some spoken words of yours.... When I
 was last in Concord, you spoke of retiring farther from our
 civilization. I asked you if you would feel no longings for the
 society of your friends. Your reply was in substance, 'No, I am
 nothing.' That reply was memorable to me. It indicated a depth of
 resources, a completeness of renunciation, a poise and repose in the
 universe, which to me is almost inconceivable; which in you seemed
 domesticated, and to which I look up with veneration. I would know of
 that soul which can say 'I am nothing.' I would be roused by its words
 to a truer and purer life. Upon me seems to be dawning with new
 significance the idea that God is here; that we have but to bow before
 Him in profound submission at every moment, and He will fill our souls
 with his presence. In this opening of the soul to God, all duties seem
 to centre; what else have we to do?... If I understand rightly the
 significance of your life, this is it: You would sunder yourself from
 society, from the spell of institutions, customs, conventionalities,
 that you may lead a fresh, simple life with God. Instead of breathing
 a new life into the old forms, you would have a new life without and
 within. There is something sublime to me in this attitude,--far as I
 may be from it myself.... Speak to me in this hour as you are
 prompted.... I honor you because you abstain from action, and open
 your soul that you may _be_ somewhat. Amid a world of noisy, shallow
 actors it is noble to stand aside and say, 'I will simply _be_.' Could
 I plant myself at once upon the truth, reducing my wants to their
 minimum, ... I should at once be brought nearer to nature, nearer to
 my fellow-men,--and life would be infinitely richer. But, alas! I
 shiver on the brink."
 
 Thus appealed to by one who had so well attained the true
 Transcendental shibboleth,--"God working in us, both to will and to
 do,"--Thoreau could not fail to make answer, as he did at once, and
 thus:--
 
 
 TO HARRISON BLAKE (AT WORCESTER).
 
 [The first of many letters.]
 
      CONCORD, March 27, 1848.
 
 I am glad to hear that any words of mine, though spoken so long ago
 that I can hardly claim identity with their author, have reached you.
 It gives me pleasure, because I have therefore reason to suppose that
 I have uttered what concerns men, and that it is not in vain that man
 speaks to man. This is the value of literature. Yet those days are so
 distant, in every sense, that I have had to look at that page again,
 to learn what was the tenor of my thoughts then. I should value that
 article, however, if only because it was the occasion of your letter.
 
 I do believe that the outward and the inward life correspond; that if
 any should succeed to live a higher life, others would not know of it;
 that difference and distance are one. To set about living a true life
 is to go a journey to a distant country, gradually to find ourselves
 surrounded by new scenes and men; and as long as the old are around
 me, I know that I am not in any true sense living a new or a better
 life. The outward is only the outside of that which is within. Men are
 not concealed under habits, but are revealed by them; they are their
 true clothes. I care not how curious a reason they may give for their
 abiding by them. Circumstances are not rigid and unyielding, but our
 habits are rigid. We are apt to speak vaguely sometimes, as if a
 divine life were to be grafted on to or built over this present as a
 suitable foundation. This might do if we could so build over our old
 life as to exclude from it all the warmth of our affection, and addle
 it, as the thrush builds over the cuckoo's egg, and lays her own atop,
 and hatches that only; but the fact is, we--so thin is the
 partition--hatch them both, and the cuckoo's always by a day first,
 and that young bird crowds the young thrushes out of the nest. No.
 Destroy the cuckoo's egg, or build a new nest.
 
 Change is change. No new life occupies the old bodies;--they decay.
 _It_ is born, and grows, and flourishes. Men very pathetically inform
 the old, accept and wear it. Why put up with the almshouse when you
 may go to heaven? It is embalming,--no more. Let alone your ointments
 and your linen swathes, and go into an infant's body. You see in the
 catacombs of Egypt the result of that experiment,--that is the end of
 it.
 
 I do believe in simplicity. It is astonishing as well as sad, how many
 trivial affairs even the wisest man thinks he must attend to in a day;
 how singular an affair he thinks he must omit. When the mathematician
 would solve a difficult problem, he first frees the equation of all
 incumbrances, and reduces it to its simplest terms. So simplify the
 problem of life, distinguish the necessary and the real. Probe the
 earth to see where your main roots run. I would stand upon facts. Why
 not see,--use our eyes? Do men know nothing? I know many men who, in
 common things, are not to be deceived; who trust no moonshine; who
 count their money correctly, and know how to invest it; who are said
 to be prudent and knowing, who yet will stand at a desk the greater
 part of their lives, as cashiers in banks, and glimmer and rust and
 finally go out there. If they _know_ anything, what under the sun do
 they do that for? Do they know what _bread_ is? or what it is for? Do
 they know what life is? If they _knew_ something, the places which
 know them now would know them no more forever.
 
 This, our respectable daily life, on which the man of common sense,
 the Englishman of the world, stands so squarely, and on which our
 institutions are founded, is in fact the veriest illusion, and will
 vanish like the baseless fabric of a vision; but that faint glimmer of
 reality which sometimes illuminates the darkness of daylight for all
 men, reveals something more solid and enduring than adamant, which is
 in fact the cornerstone of the world.
 
 Men cannot conceive of a state of things so fair that it cannot be
 realized. Can any man honestly consult his experience and say that it
 is so? Have we any facts to appeal to when we say that our dreams are
 premature? Did you ever hear of a man who had striven all his life
 faithfully and singly toward an object and in no measure obtained it?
 If a man constantly aspires, is he not elevated? Did ever a man try
 heroism, magnanimity, truth, sincerity, and find that there was no
 advantage in them? that it was a vain endeavor? Of course we do not
 expect that our paradise will be a garden. We know not what we ask. To
 look at literature;--how many fine thoughts has every man had! how few
 fine thoughts are expressed! Yet we never have a fantasy so subtle and
 ethereal, but that _talent merely_, with more resolution and faithful
 persistency, after a thousand failures, might fix and engrave it in
 distinct and enduring words, and we should see that our dreams are the
 solidest facts that we know. But I speak not of dreams.
 
 What can be expressed in words can be expressed in life.
 
 My actual life is a fact, in view of which I have no occasion to
 congratulate myself; but for my faith and aspiration I have respect.
 It is from these that I speak. Every man's position is in fact too
 simple to be described. I have sworn no oath. I have no designs on
 society, or nature, or God. I am simply what I am, or I begin to be
 that. I _live_ in the _present_. I only remember the past, and
 anticipate the future. I love to live. I love reform better than its
 modes. There is no history of how bad became better. I believe
 something, and there is nothing else but that. I know that I am. I
 know that another is who knows more than I, who takes interest in me,
 whose creature, and yet whose kindred, in one sense, am I. I know that
 the enterprise is worthy. I know that things work well. I have heard
 no bad news.
 
 As for positions, combinations, and details,--what are they? In clear
 weather, when we look into the heavens, what do we see but the sky and
 the sun?
 
 If you would convince a man that he does wrong, do right. But do not
 care to convince him. Men will believe what they see. Let them see.
 
 Pursue, keep up with, circle round and round your life, as a dog does
 his master's chaise. Do what you love. Know your own bone; gnaw at
 it, bury it, unearth it, and gnaw it still. Do not be too moral. You
 may cheat yourself out of much life so. Aim above morality. Be not
 simply good; be good for something. All fables, indeed, have their
 morals; but the innocent enjoy the story. Let nothing come between you
 and the light. Respect men and brothers only. When you travel to the
 Celestial City, carry no letter of introduction. When you knock, ask
 to see God,--none of the servants. In what concerns you much, do not
 think that you have companions: know that you are alone in the world.
 
 Thus I write at random. I need to see you, and I trust I shall, to
 correct my mistakes. Perhaps you have some oracles for me.
 
      HENRY THOREAU.
 
 
 TO HARRISON BLAKE (AT WORCESTER).
 
      CONCORD, May 2, 1848
 
 "We must have our bread." But what is our bread? Is it baker's bread?
 Methinks it should be very _home-made_ bread. What is our meat? Is it
 butcher's meat? What is that which we _must_ have? Is that bread which
 we are now earning sweet? Is it not bread which has been suffered to
 sour, and then been sweetened with an alkali, which has undergone the
 vinous, the acetous, and sometimes the putrid fermentation, and then
 been whitened with vitriol? Is this the bread which we must have? Man
 must earn his bread by the sweat of his brow, truly, but also by the
 sweat of his brain within his brow. The body can feed the body only. I
 have tasted but little bread in my life. It has been mere grub and
 provender for the most part. Of bread that nourished the brain and the
 heart, scarcely any. There is absolutely none on the tables even of
 the rich.
 
 There is not one kind of food for all men. You must and you will feed
 those faculties which you exercise. The laborer whose body is weary
 does not require the same food with the scholar whose brain is weary.
 Men should not labor foolishly like brutes, but the brain and the body
 should always, or as much as possible, work and rest together, and
 then the work will be of such a kind that when the body is hungry the
 brain will be hungry also, and the same food will suffice for both;
 otherwise the food which repairs the waste energy of the overwrought
 body will oppress the sedentary brain, and the degenerate scholar will
 come to esteem all food vulgar, and all getting a living drudgery.
 
 How shall we earn our bread is a grave question; yet it is a sweet and
 inviting question. Let us not shirk it, as is usually done. It is the
 most important and practical question which is put to man. Let us not
 answer it hastily. Let us not be content to get our bread in some
 gross, careless, and hasty manner. Some men go a-hunting, some
 a-fishing, some a-gaming, some to war; but none have so pleasant a
 time as they who in earnest seek to earn their bread. It is true
 actually as it is true really; it is true materially as it is true
 spiritually, that they who seek honestly and sincerely, with all their
 hearts and lives and strength, to earn their bread, do earn it, and it
 is sure to be very sweet to them. A very little bread,--a very few
 crumbs are enough, if it be of the right quality, for it is
 infinitely nutritious. Let each man, then, earn at least a crumb of
 bread for his body before he dies, and know the taste of it,--that it
 is identical with the bread of life, and that they both go down at one
 swallow.
 
 Our bread need not ever be sour or hard to digest. What Nature is to
 the mind she is also to the body. As she feeds my imagination, she
 will feed my body; for what she says she means, and is ready to do.
 She is not simply beautiful to the poet's eye. Not only the rainbow
 and sunset are beautiful, but to be fed and clothed, sheltered and
 warmed aright, are equally beautiful and inspiring. There is not
 necessarily any gross and ugly fact which may not be eradicated from
 the life of man. We should endeavor practically in our lives to
 correct all the defects which our imagination detects. The heavens are
 as deep as our aspirations are high. So high as a tree aspires to
 grow, so high it will find an atmosphere suited to it. Every man
 should stand for a force which is perfectly irresistible. How can any
 man be weak who dares _to be_ at all? Even the tenderest plants force
 their way up through the hardest earth and the crevices of rocks; but
 a man no material power can resist. What a wedge, what a beetle, what
 a catapult, is an _earnest_ man! What can resist him?
 
 It is a momentous fact that a man may be _good_, or he may be _bad_;
 his life may be _true_, or it may be _false_; it may be either a shame
 or a glory to him. The good man builds himself up; the bad man
 destroys himself.
 
 But whatever we do we must do confidently (if we are timid, let us,
 then, act timidly), not expecting more light, but having light enough.
 If we confidently expect more, then let us wait for it. But what is
 this which we have? Have we not already waited? Is this the beginning
 of time? Is there a man who does not see clearly beyond, though only a
 hair's breadth beyond where he at any time stands?
 
 If one hesitates in his path, let him not proceed. Let him respect his
 doubts, for doubts, too, may have some divinity in them, That we have
 but little faith is not sad, but that we have but little faithfulness.
 By faithfulness faith is earned. When, in the progress of a life, a
 man swerves, though only by an angle infinitely small, from his proper
 and allotted path (and this is never done quite unconsciously even at
 first; in fact, that was his broad and scarlet sin,--ah, he knew of it
 more than he can tell), then the drama of his life turns to tragedy,
 and makes haste to its fifth act. When once we thus fall behind
 ourselves, there is no accounting for the obstacles which rise up in
 our path, and no one is so wise as to advise, and no one so powerful
 as to aid us while we abide on that ground. Such are cursed with
 _duties_, and the _neglect of their duties_. For such the decalogue
 was made, and other far more voluminous and terrible codes.
 
 These departures,--who have not made them?--for they are as faint as
 the parallax of a fixed star, and at the commencement we say they are
 nothing,--that is, they originate in a kind of sleep and forgetfulness
 of the soul when it is naught. A man cannot be too circumspect in
 order to keep in the straight road, and be sure that he sees all that
 he may at any time see, that so he may distinguish his true path.
 
 You ask if there is no doctrine of sorrow in my philosophy. Of acute
 sorrow I suppose that I know comparatively little. My saddest and most
 genuine sorrows are apt to be but transient regrets. The place of
 sorrow is supplied, perchance, by a certain hard and proportionately
 barren indifference. I am of kin to the sod, and partake largely of
 its dull patience,--in winter expecting the sun of spring. In my
 cheapest moments I am apt to think that it is n't my business to be
 "seeking the spirit," but as much its business to be seeking me. I
 know very well what Goethe meant when he said that he never had a
 chagrin but he made a poem out of it. I have altogether too much
 patience of this kind. I am too easily contented with a slight and
 almost animal happiness. My happiness is a good deal like that of the
 woodchucks.
 
 Methinks I am never quite committed, never wholly the creature of my
 moods, but always to some extent their critic. My only integral
 experience is in my vision. I see, perchance, with more integrity than
 I feel.
 
 But I need not tell you what manner of man I am,--my virtues or my
 vices. You can guess if it is worth the while; and I do not
 discriminate them well.
 
 I do not write this at my hut in the woods. I am at present living
 with Mrs. Emerson, whose house is an old home of mine, for company
 during Mr. Emerson's absence.
 
 You will perceive that I am as often talking to myself, perhaps, as
 speaking to you.
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 Here is a confession of faith, and a bit of self-portraiture worth
 having; for there is little except faithful statement of the fact. Its
 sentences are based on the questions and experiences of his
 correspondent; yet they diverge into that atmosphere of humor and
 hyperbole so native to Thoreau; in whom was the oddest mixture of the
 serious and the comic, the literal and the romantic. He addressed
 himself also, so far as his unbending personality would allow, to the
 mood or the need of his correspondent; and he had great skill in
 fathoming character and describing in a few touches the persons he
 encountered; as may be seen in his letters to Emerson, especially, who
 also had, and in still greater measure, this "fatal gift of
 penetration," as he once termed it. This will be seen in the contrast
 of Thoreau's correspondence with Mr. Blake, and that he was holding at
 the same time with Horace Greeley,--persons radically unlike.
 
 In August, 1846, Thoreau sent to Greeley his essay on Carlyle, asking
 him to find a place for it in some magazine. Greeley sent it to R. W.
 Griswold, then editing _Graham's Magazine_ in Philadelphia, who
 accepted it and promised to pay for it, but did not publish it till
 March and April, 1847; even then the promised payment was not
 forthcoming. On the 31st of March, 1848, a year and a half after it
 had been put in Griswold's possession, Thoreau wrote again to Greeley,
 saying that no money had come to hand. At once, and at the very time
 when Mr. Blake was opening his spiritual state to Thoreau (April 3,
 1848), the busy editor of the _Tribune_ replied: "It saddens and
 surprises me to know that your article was not paid for by Graham;
 and, since my honor is involved, I will see that you are paid, and
 that at no distant day." Accordingly, on May 17, he adds: "To-day I
 have been able to lay my hand on the money due you. I made out a
 regular bill for the contribution, drew a draft on G. R. Graham for
 the amount, gave it to his brother in New York for collection, and
 received the money. I have made Graham pay you seventy-five dollars,
 but I only send you fifty dollars," having deducted twenty-five
 dollars for the advance of that sum he had made a month before to
 Thoreau for his "Ktaadn and the Maine Woods," which finally came out
 in _Sartain's Union Magazine_ of Philadelphia, late in 1848. To this
 letter and remittance of fifty dollars Thoreau replied, May 19, 1848,
 substantially thus:--
 
 
 TO HORACE GREELEY (AT NEW YORK).
 
      CONCORD, May 19, 1848.
 
 MY FRIEND GREELEY,--I have to-day received from you fifty dollars. It
 is five years that I have been maintaining myself entirely by manual
 labor,--not getting a cent from any other quarter or employment. Now
 this toil has occupied so few days,--perhaps a single month, spring
 and fall each,--that I must have had more leisure than any of my
 brethren for study and literature. I have done rude work of all kinds.
 From July, 1845, to September, 1847, I lived by myself in the forest,
 in a fairly good cabin, plastered and warmly covered, which I built
 myself. There I earned all I needed, and kept to my own affairs.
 During that time my weekly outlay was but seven and twenty cents; and
 I had an abundance of all sorts. Unless the human race perspire more
 than I do, there is no occasion to live by the sweat of their brow. If
 men cannot get on without money (the smallest amount will suffice),
 the truest method of earning it is by working as a laborer at one
 dollar per day. You are least dependent so; I speak as an expert,
 having used several kinds of labor.
 
 Why should the scholar make a constant complaint that his fate is
 specially hard? We are too often told of "the pursuit of knowledge
 under difficulties,"--how poets depend on patrons and starve in
 garrets, or at last go mad and die. Let us hear the other side of the
 story. Why should not the scholar, if he is really wiser than the
 multitude, do coarse work now and then? Why not let his greater wisdom
 enable him to do without things? If you say the wise man is unlucky,
 how could you distinguish him from the foolishly unfortunate?
 
 My friend, how can I thank you for your kindness? Perhaps there is a
 better way,--I will convince you that it is felt and appreciated. Here
 have I been sitting idle, as it were, while you have been busy in my
 cause, and have done so much for me. I wish you had had a better
 subject; but good deeds are no less good because their object is
 unworthy.
 
 Yours was the best way to collect money,--but I should never have
 thought of it; I might have waylaid the debtor perchance. Even a
 business man might not have thought of it,--and I cannot be called
 that, as business is understood usually,--not being familiar with the
 routine. But your way has this to commend it also,--if you make the
 draft, you decide how much to draw. You drew just the sum suitable.
 
 The Ktaadn paper can be put in the guise of letters, if it runs best
 so; dating each part on the day it describes. Twenty-five dollars more
 for it will satisfy me; I expected no more, and do not hold you to pay
 that,--for you asked for something else, and there was delay in
 sending. So, if you use it, send me twenty-five dollars now or after
 you sell it, as is most convenient; but take out the expenses that I
 see you must have had. In such cases carriers generally get the most;
 but you, as carrier here, get no money, but risk losing some, besides
 much of your time; while I go away, as I must, giving you unprofitable
 thanks. Yet trust me, my pleasure in your letter is not wholly a
 selfish one. May my good genius still watch over me and my added
 wealth!
 
 P. S.--My book grows in bulk as I work on it; but soon I shall get
 leisure for those shorter articles you want,--then look out.
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 The "book," of course, was the "Week," then about to go through the
 press; the shorter articles were some that Greeley suggested for the
 Philadelphia magazines. Nothing came of this, but the correspondence
 was kept up until 1854, and led to the partial publication of "Cape
 Cod" and "The Yankee in Canada" in the newly launched _Putnam's
 Magazine_, of which G. W. Curtis was editor. But he differed with
 Thoreau on a matter of style or opinion (the articles appearing as
 anonymous, or editorial), and the author withdrew his MS. The letters
 of Greeley in this entertaining series are all preserved; but Greeley
 seems to have given Thoreau's away for autographs; and the only one
 accessible as yet is that just paraphrased.
 
 
 TO HARRISON BLAKE (AT MILTON).
 
      CONCORD, August 10, 1849.
 
 MR. BLAKE,--I write now chiefly to say, before it is too late, that I
 shall be glad to see you in Concord, and will give you a chamber,
 etc., in my father's house, and as much of my poor company as you can
 bear.
 
 I am in too great haste this time to speak to your, or out of my,
 condition. I might say,--you might say,--comparatively speaking, be
 not anxious to avoid poverty. In this way the wealth of the universe
 may be securely invested. What a pity if we do not live this short
 time according to the laws of the long time,--the eternal laws! Let us
 see that we stand erect here, and do not lie along by our _whole
 length_ in the dirt. Let our meanness be our footstool, not our
 cushion. In the midst of this labyrinth let us live a _thread_ of
 life. We must act with so rapid and resistless a purpose in _one_
 direction, that our vices will necessarily trail behind. The nucleus
 of a comet is almost a star. Was there ever a genuine dilemma? The
 laws of earth are for the feet, or inferior man; the laws of heaven
 are for the head, or superior man; the latter are the former sublimed
 and expanded, even as radii from the earth's centre go on diverging
 into space. Happy the man who observes the heavenly and the
 terrestrial law in just proportion; whose every faculty, from the
 soles of his feet to the crown of his head, obeys the law of its
 level; who neither stoops nor goes on tiptoe, but lives a balanced
 life, acceptable to nature and to God.
 
 These things I say; other things I do.
 
 I am sorry to hear that you did not receive my book earlier. I
 directed it and left it in Munroe's shop to be sent to you
 immediately, on the twenty-sixth of May, before a copy had been sold.
 
 Will you remember me to Mr. Brown, when you see him next: he is well
 remembered by
 
      HENRY THOREAU.
 
 I still owe you a worthy answer.
 
 
 TO HARRISON BLAKE.
 
      CONCORD, November 20, 1849.
 
 MR. BLAKE,--I have not forgotten that I am your debtor. When I read
 over your letters, as I have just done, I feel that I am unworthy to
 have received or to answer them, though they are addressed, as I would
 have them, to the ideal of me. It behooves me, if I would reply, to
 speak out of the rarest part of myself.
 
 At present I am subsisting on certain wild flavors which nature wafts
 to me, which unaccountably sustain me, and make my apparently poor
 life rich. Within a year my walks have extended themselves, and almost
 every afternoon (I read, or write, or make pencils in the forenoon,
 and by the last means get a living for my body) I visit some new hill,
 or pond, or wood, many miles distant. I am astonished at the
 wonderful retirement through which I move, rarely meeting a man in
 these excursions, never seeing one similarly engaged, unless it be my
 companion, when I have one. I cannot help feeling that of all the
 human inhabitants of nature hereabouts, only we two have leisure to
 admire and enjoy our inheritance.
 
 "Free in this world as the birds in the air, disengaged from every
 kind of chains, those who have practiced the _yoga_ gather in Brahma
 the certain fruit of their works."
 
 Depend upon it that, rude and careless as I am, I would fain practice
 the _yoga_ faithfully.
 
 "The yogi, absorbed in contemplation, contributes in his degree to
 creation: he breathes a divine perfume, he hears wonderful things.
 Divine forms traverse him without tearing him, and, united to the
 nature which is proper to him, he goes, he acts as animating original
 matter."
 
 To some extent, and at rare intervals, even I am a yogi.
 
 I know little about the affairs of Turkey, but I am sure that I know
 something about barberries and chestnuts, of which I have collected a
 store this fall. When I go to see my neighbor, he will formally
 communicate to me the latest news from Turkey, which he read in
 yesterday's mail,--"Now Turkey by this time looks determined, and Lord
 Palmerston"--Why, I would rather talk of the bran, which,
 unfortunately, was sifted out of my bread this morning, and thrown
 away. It is a fact which lies nearer to me. The newspaper gossip with
 which our hosts abuse our ears is as far from a true hospitality as
 the viands which they set before us. We did not need them to feed our
 bodies, and the news can be bought for a penny. We want the inevitable
 news, be it sad or cheering, wherefore and by what means they are
 extant this _new_ day. If they are well, let them whistle and dance;
 if they are dyspeptic, it is their duty to complain, that so they may
 in any case be _entertaining_. If words were invented to conceal
 thought, I think that newspapers are a great improvement on a bad
 invention. Do not suffer your life to be taken by newspapers.
 
 I thank you for your hearty appreciation of my book. I am glad to have
 had such a long talk with you, and that you had patience to listen to
 me to the end. I think that I had the advantage of you, for I chose my
 own mood, and in one sense your mood too,--that is, a quiet and
 attentive reading mood. Such advantage has the writer over the talker.
 I am sorry that you did not come to Concord in your vacation. Is it
 not time for another vacation? I am here yet, and Concord is here.
 
 You will have found out by this time who it is that writes this, and
 will be glad to have you write to him, without his subscribing himself
 
      HENRY D. THOREAU.
 
 P. S.--It is so long since I have seen you, that, as you will
 perceive, I have to speak, as it were, _in vacuo_, as if I were
 sounding hollowly for an echo, and it did not make much odds what kind
 of a sound I made. But the gods do not hear any rude or discordant
 sound, as we learn from the echo; and I know that the nature toward
 which I launch these sounds is so rich that it will modulate anew and
 wonderfully improve my rudest strain.
 
 
 TO HARRISON BLAKE (AT MILTON).
 
      CONCORD, April 3, 1850.
 
 MR. BLAKE,--I thank you for your letter, and I will endeavor to record
 some of the thoughts which it suggests, whether pertinent or not. You
 speak of poverty and dependence. Who are poor and dependent? Who are
 rich and independent? When was it that men agreed to respect the
 appearance and not the reality? Why should the appearance _appear_?
 Are we well acquainted, then, with the reality? There is none who does
 not lie hourly in the respect he pays to false appearance. How sweet
 it would be to treat men and things, for an hour, for just what they
 are! We wonder that the sinner does not confess his sin. When we are
 weary with travel, we lay down our load and rest by the wayside. So,
 when we are weary with the burden of life, why do we not lay down this
 load of falsehoods which we have volunteered to sustain, and be
 refreshed as never mortal was? Let the beautiful laws prevail. Let us
 not weary ourselves by resisting them. When we would rest our bodies
 we cease to support them; we recline on the lap of earth. So, when we
 would rest our spirits, we must recline on the Great Spirit. Let
 things alone; let them weigh what they will; let them soar or fall. To
 succeed in letting only one thing alone in a winter morning, if it be
 only one poor frozen-thawed apple that hangs on a tree, what a
 glorious achievement! Methinks it lightens through the dusky universe.
 What an infinite wealth we have discovered! God reigns, _i. e._, when
 we take a liberal view,--when a liberal view is presented us.
 
 Let God alone if need be. Methinks, if I loved him more, I should keep
 him--I should keep myself rather--at a more respectful distance. It is
 not when I am going to meet him, but when I am just turning away and
 leaving him alone, that I discover that God is. I say, God. I am not
 sure that that is the name. You will know whom I mean.
 
 If for a moment we make way with our petty selves, wish no ill to
 anything, apprehend no ill, cease to be but as the crystal which
 reflects a ray,--what shall we not reflect! What a universe will
 appear crystallized and radiant around us!
 
 I should say, let the Muse lead the Muse,--let the understanding lead
 the understanding, though in any case it is the farthest forward which
 leads them both. If the Muse accompany, she is no muse, but an
 amusement. The Muse should lead like a star which is very far off; but
 that does not imply that we are to follow foolishly, falling into
 sloughs and over precipices, for it is not foolishness, but
 understanding, which is to follow, which the Muse is appointed to
 lead, as a fit guide of a fit follower?
 
 Will you live? or will you be embalmed? Will you live, though it be
 astride of a sunbeam; or will you repose safely in the catacombs for a
 thousand years? In the former case, the worst accident that can
 happen is that you may break your neck. Will you break your heart,
 your soul, to save your neck? Necks and pipe-stems are fated to be
 broken. Men make a great ado about the folly of demanding too much of
 life (or of eternity?), and of endeavoring to live according to that
 demand. It is much ado about nothing. No harm ever came from that
 quarter. I am not afraid that I shall exaggerate the value and
 significance of life, but that I shall not be up to the occasion which
 it is. I shall be sorry to remember that I was there, but noticed
 nothing remarkable,--not so much as a prince in disguise; lived in the
 golden age a hired man; visited Olympus even, but fell asleep after
 dinner, and did not hear the conversation of the gods. I lived in
 Juda eighteen hundred years ago, but I never knew that there was such
 a one as Christ among my contemporaries! If there is anything more
 glorious than a congress of men a-framing or amending of a
 constitution going on, which I suspect there is, I desire to see the
 morning papers. I am greedy of the faintest rumor, though it were got
 by listening at the keyhole. I will dissipate myself in that
 direction.
 
 I am glad to know that you find what I have said on Friendship worthy
 of attention. I wish that I could have the benefit of your criticism;
 it would be a rare help to me. Will you not communicate it?
 
 
 TO HARRISON BLAKE (AT MILTON).
 
      CONCORD, May 28, 1850.
 
 MR. BLAKE,--"I never found any contentment in the life which the
 newspapers record,"--anything of more value than the cent which they
 cost. Contentment in being covered with dust an inch deep! We who walk
 the streets, and hold time together, are but the refuse of ourselves,
 and that life is for the shells of us,--of our body and our mind,--for
 our scurf,--a thoroughly _scurvy_ life. It is coffee made of
 coffee-grounds the twentieth time, which was only coffee the first
 time,--while the living water leaps and sparkles by our doors. I know
 some who, in their charity, give their coffee-grounds to the poor! We,
 demanding news, and putting up with _such_ news! Is it a new
 convenience, or a new accident, or, rather, a new perception of the
 truth that we want!
 
 You say that "the serene hours in which friendship, books, nature,
 thought, seem alone primary considerations, visit you but faintly." Is
 not the attitude of expectation somewhat divine?--a sort of home-made
 divineness? Does it not compel a kind of sphere-music to attend on it?
 And do not its satisfactions merge at length, by insensible degrees,
 in the enjoyment of the thing expected?
 
 What if I should forget to write about my not writing? It is not worth
 the while to make that a theme. It is as if I had written every day.
 It is as if I had never written before. I wonder that you think so
 much about it, for not writing is the most like writing, in my case,
 of anything I know.
 
 Why will you not relate to me your dream? That would be to realize it
 somewhat. You tell me that you dream, but not what you dream. I can
 _guess_ what comes to pass. So do the frogs dream. Would that I knew
 what. I have never found out whether they are awake or asleep,--whether
 it is day or night with them.
 
 I am preaching, mind you, to bare walls, that is, to myself; and if
 you have chanced to come in and occupy a pew, do not think that my
 remarks are directed at you particularly, and so slam the seat in
 disgust. This discourse was written long before these exciting times.
 
 Some absorbing employment on your higher ground,--your upland
 farm,--whither no cart-path leads, but where you mount alone with your
 hoe,--where the life everlasting grows; there you raise a crop which
 needs not to be brought down into the valley to a market; which you
 barter for heavenly products.
 
 Do you separate distinctly enough the support of your body from that
 of your essence? By how distinct a course commonly are these two ends
 attained! Not that they should not be attained by one and the same
 means,--that, indeed, is the rarest success,--but there is no half and
 half about it.
 
 I shall be glad to read my lecture to a small audience in Worcester
 such as you describe, and will only require that my expenses be paid.
 If only the parlor be large enough for an echo, and the audience will
 embarrass themselves with hearing as much as the lecturer would
 otherwise embarrass himself with reading. But I warn you that this is
 no better calculated for a promiscuous audience than the last two
 which I read to you. It requires, in every sense, a concordant
 audience.
 
 I will come on next Saturday and spend Sunday with you if you wish it.
 Say so if you do.
 
 "Drink deep, or taste not the Pierian spring."
 
 Be not deterred by melancholy on the path which leads to immortal
 health and joy. When they tasted of the water of the river over which
 they were to go, they thought it tasted a little bitterish to the
 palate, but it proved sweeter when it was down.
 
      H. D. T.
 
       NOTE.--The "companion" of his walks, mentioned by Thoreau
       in November, 1849, was Ellery Channing; the neighbor who
       insisted on talking of Turkey was perhaps Emerson, who,
       after his visit to Europe in 1848, was more interested in
       its politics than before. Pencil-making was Thoreau's
       manual work for many years; and it must have been about
       this time (1849-53) that he "had occasion to go to New
       York to peddle some pencils," as he says in his journal
       for November 20, 1853. He adds, "I was obliged to
       manufacture one thousand dollars' worth of pencils, and
       slowly dispose of, and finally sacrifice them, in order
       to pay an assumed debt of one hundred dollars." This debt
       was for the printing of the _Week_, published in 1849,
       and finally paid for in 1855. Thoreau's pencils have sold
       (in 1893) for 25 cents each. For other facts concerning
       his debt to James Munroe, see Sanborn's _Thoreau_, pp.
       230, 235.
 
 
 FOOTNOTES:
 
 [35] Where Agassiz was giving a course of Lowell lectures.
 
 [36] The town almshouse was across the field from the Emerson house.
 
 [37] At this date Alcott had passed his forty-eighth year, while
 Channing and Thoreau were still in the latitude of thirty. Hawthorne
 had left Concord, and was in the Salem custom-house, the Old Manse
 having gone back into the occupancy of Emerson's cousins, the Ripleys,
 who owned it.
 
 [38] See Sanborn's _Thoreau_, p. 214, and Channing's _Thoreau_, New
 Edition, pp. 207-210, for this poem.
 
 [39] This is the political neighbor mentioned in a former letter.
 
 [40] From England Emerson wrote: "I am not of opinion that your book
 should be delayed a month. I should print it at once, nor do I think
 that you would incur any risk in doing so that you cannot well afford.
 It is very certain to have readers and debtors, here as well as there.
 The Dial is absurdly well known here. We at home, I think, are always
 a little ashamed of it,--I am,--and yet here it is spoken of with the
 utmost gravity, and I do not laugh."
 
 [41] This letter was addressed, "R. Waldo Emerson, care of Alexander
 Ireland, Esq., Manchester, England, _via_ New York and Steamer
 Cambria, March 25." It was mailed in Boston, March 24, and received in
 Manchester, April 19.
 
 
 
 
 III
 
 FRIENDS AND FOLLOWERS
 
 
 TO R. W. EMERSON[42] (AT CONCORD).
 
      FIRE ISLAND BEACH,
      Thursday morning, July 25, 1850.
 
 DEAR FRIEND,--I am writing this at the house of Smith Oakes, within
 one mile of the wreck. He is the one who rendered most assistance,
 William H. Channing came down with me, but I have not seen Arthur
 Fuller, nor Greeley, nor Marcus Spring. Spring and Charles Sumner were
 here yesterday, but left soon. Mr. Oakes and wife tell me (all the
 survivors came, or were brought, directly to their house) that the
 ship struck at ten minutes after four A. M., and all hands, being
 mostly in their nightclothes, made haste to the forecastle, the water
 coming in at once. There they remained; the passengers _in_ the
 forecastle, the crew above it, doing what they could. Every wave
 lifted the forecastle roof and washed over those within. The first man
 got ashore at nine; many from nine to noon. At flood-tide, about half
 past three o'clock, when the ship broke up entirely, they came out of
 the forecastle, and Margaret sat with her back to the foremast, with
 her hands on her knees, her husband and child already drowned. A great
 wave came and washed her aft. The steward (?) had just before taken
 her child and started for shore. Both were drowned.
 
 The broken desk, in a bag, containing no very valuable papers; a large
 black leather trunk, with an upper and under compartment, the upper
 holding books and papers; a carpetbag, probably Ossoli's, and one of
 his shoes (?) are all the Ossoli effects known to have been found.
 Four bodies remain to be found: the two Ossolis, Horace Sumner, and a
 sailor. I have visited the child's grave. Its body will probably be
 taken away to-day. The wreck is to be sold at auction, excepting the
 hull, to-day.
 
 The mortar would not go off. Mrs. Hasty, the captain's wife, told Mrs.
 Oakes that she and Margaret divided their money, and tied up the
 halves in handkerchiefs around their persons; that Margaret took sixty
 or seventy dollars. Mrs. Hasty, who can tell all about Margaret up to
 eleven o'clock on Friday, is said to be going to Portland, New
 England, to-day. She and Mrs. Fuller must, and probably will, come
 together. The cook, the last to leave, and the steward (?) will know
 the rest. I shall try to see them. In the meanwhile I shall do what I
 can to recover property and obtain particulars hereabouts. William H.
 Channing--did I write it?--has come with me. Arthur Fuller[43] has
 this moment reached the house. He reached the beach last night. We got
 here yesterday noon. A good part of the wreck still holds together
 where she struck, and something may come ashore with her fragments.
 The last body was found on Tuesday, three miles west. Mrs. Oakes dried
 the papers which were in the trunk, and she says they appeared to be
 of various kinds. "Would they cover that table?" (a small round one).
 "They would if spread out. Some were tied up." There were twenty or
 thirty books "in the same half of the trunk. Another smaller trunk,
 empty, came ashore, but there was no mark on it." She speaks of
 Paulina as if she might have been a sort of nurse to the child. I
 expect to go to Patchogue, whence the pilferers must have chiefly
 come, and advertise, etc.
 
 
 TO HARRISON BLAKE (IN MILTON).
 
      CONCORD August 9, 1850.
 
 MR. BLAKE,--I received your letter just as I was rushing to Fire
 Island beach to recover what remained of Margaret Fuller, and read it
 on the way. That event and its train, as much as anything, have
 prevented my answering it before. It is wisest to speak when you are
 spoken to. I will now endeavor to reply, at the risk of having nothing
 to say.
 
 I find that actual events, notwithstanding the singular prominence
 which we all allow them, are far less real than the creations of my
 imagination. They are truly visionary and insignificant,--all that we
 commonly call life and death,--and affect me less than my dreams. This
 petty stream which from time to time swells and carries away the
 mills and bridges of our habitual life, and that mightier stream or
 ocean on which we securely float,--what makes the difference between
 them? I have in my pocket a button which I ripped off the coat of the
 Marquis of Ossoli, on the seashore, the other day. Held up, it
 intercepts the light,--an actual button,--and yet all the life it is
 connected with is less substantial to me, and interests me less, than
 my faintest dream. Our thoughts are the epochs in our lives: all else
 is but as a journal of the winds that blew while we were here.
 
 I say to myself, Do a little more of that work which you have
 confessed to be good. You are neither satisfied nor dissatisfied with
 yourself, without reason. Have you not a thinking faculty of
 inestimable value? If there is an experiment which you would like to
 try, try it. Do not entertain doubts if they are not agreeable to you.
 Remember that you need not eat unless you are hungry. Do not read the
 newspapers. Improve every opportunity to be melancholy. As for health,
 consider yourself well. Do not engage to find things as you think they
 are. Do what nobody else can do for you. Omit to do anything else. It
 is not easy to make our lives respectable by any course of activity.
 We must repeatedly withdraw into our shells of thought, like the
 tortoise, somewhat helplessly; yet there is more than philosophy in
 that.
 
 Do not waste any reverence on my attitude. I merely manage to sit up
 where I have dropped. I am sure that my acquaintances mistake me. They
 ask my advice on high matters, but they do not know even how poorly
 on 't I am for hats and shoes. I have hardly a shift. Just as shabby
 as I am in my outward apparel, ay, and more lamentably shabby, am I in
 my inward substance. If I should turn myself inside out, my rags and
 meanness would indeed appear. I am something to him that made me,
 undoubtedly, but not much to any other that he has made.
 
 Would it not be worth while to discover nature in Milton? be native to
 the universe? I, too, love Concord best, but I am glad when I
 discover, in oceans and wildernesses far away, the material of a
 million Concords: indeed, I am lost, unless I discover them. I see
 less difference between a city and a swamp than formerly. It is a
 swamp, however, too dismal and dreary even for me, and I should be
 glad if there were fewer owls, and frogs, and mosquitoes in it. I
 prefer ever a more cultivated place, free from miasma and crocodiles.
 I am so sophisticated, and I will take my choice.
 
 As for missing friends,--what if we do miss one another? have we not
 agreed on a rendezvous? While each wanders his own way through the
 wood, without anxiety, ay, with serene joy, though it be on his hands
 and knees, over rocks and fallen trees, he cannot but be in the right
 way. There is no wrong way to him. How can he be said to miss his
 friend, whom the fruits still nourish and the elements sustain? A man
 who missed his friend at a turn, went on buoyantly, dividing the
 friendly air, and humming a tune to himself, ever and anon kneeling
 with delight to study each little lichen in his path, and scarcely
 made three miles a day for friendship. As for conforming outwardly,
 and living your own life inwardly, I do not think much of that. Let
 not your right hand know what your left hand does in that line of
 business. It will prove a failure. Just as successfully can you walk
 against a sharp steel edge which divides you cleanly right and left.
 Do you wish to try your ability to resist distension? It is a greater
 strain than any soul can long endure. When you get God to pulling one
 way, and the devil the other, each having his feet well braced,--to
 say nothing of the conscience sawing transversely,--almost any timber
 will give way.
 
 I do not dare invite you earnestly to come to Concord, because I know
 too well that the berries are not thick in my fields, and we should
 have to take it out in viewing the landscape. But come, on every
 account, and we will see--one another.
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 No letters of the year 1851 have been found by me. On the 27th of
 December, 1850, Mr. Cabot wrote to say that the Boston Society of
 Natural History, of which he was secretary, had elected Thoreau a
 corresponding member, "with all the _honores_, _privilegia_, _etc._,
 _ad gradum tuum pertinentia_, without the formality of paying any
 entrance fee, or annual subscription. Your duties in return are to
 advance the interests of the Society by communications or otherwise,
 as shall seem good." This is believed to be the only learned body
 which honored itself by electing Thoreau. The immediate occasion of
 this election was the present, by Thoreau, to the Society, of a fine
 specimen of the American goshawk, caught or shot by Jacob Farmer,
 which Mr. Cabot acknowledged, December 18, 1849, saying: "It was first
 described by Wilson; lately Audubon has identified it with the
 European goshawk, thereby committing a very flagrant blunder. It is
 usually a very rare species with us. The European bird is used in
 hawking; and doubtless ours would be equally _game_. If Mr. Farmer
 skins him now, he will have to take second cut; for his skin is
 already off and stuffed,--his remains dissected, measured, and
 deposited in alcohol."
 
 
 TO T. W. HIGGINSON (AT BOSTON).
 
      CONCORD, April 2-3, 1852.
 
 DEAR SIR,--I do not see that I can refuse to read another lecture, but
 what makes me hesitate is the fear that I have not another available
 which will _entertain_ a large audience, though I have thoughts to
 offer which I think will be quite as worthy of their attention.
 However, I will try; for the prospect of earning a few dollars is
 alluring. As far as I can foresee, my subject would be "Reality"
 rather transcendentally treated. It lies still in "Walden, or Life in
 the Woods." Since you are kind enough to undertake the arrangements, I
 will leave it to you to name an evening of next week, decide on the
 most suitable room, and advertise,--if this is not taking you too
 literally at your word.
 
 If you still think it worth the while to attend to this, will you let
 me know as soon as may be what evening will be most convenient? I
 certainly do not feel prepared to offer myself as a lecturer to the
 Boston _public_, and hardly know whether more to dread a small
 audience or a large one. Nevertheless, I will repress this
 squeamishness, and propose no alteration in your arrangements. I shall
 be glad to accept your invitation to tea.
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 This lecture was given, says Colonel Higginson, "at the Mechanics'
 Apprentices Library in Boston, with the snow outside, and the young
 boys rustling their newspapers among the Alcotts and Blakes." Or,
 possibly, this remark may apply to a former lecture in the same year,
 which was that in which Thoreau first lectured habitually away from
 Concord. He commenced by accepting an invitation to speak at Leyden
 Hall, in Plymouth, where his friends the Watsons had organized Sunday
 services, that the Transcendentalists and Abolitionists might have a
 chance to be heard at a time when they were generally excluded from
 the popular "Lyceum courses" throughout New England. Mr. B. M. Watson
 says:--
 
 "I have found two letters from Thoreau in answer to my invitation in
 1852 to address our congregation at Leyden Hall on Sunday
 mornings,--an enterprise I undertook about that time. I find among the
 distinguished men who addressed us the names of Thoreau, Emerson,
 Ellery Channing, Alcott, Higginson, Remond, S. Johnson, F. J.
 Appleton, Edmund Quincy, Garrison, Phillips, J. P. Lesley, Shackford,
 W. F. Channing, N. H. Whiting, Adin Ballou, Abby K. Foster and her
 husband, J. T. Sargent, T. T. Stone, Jones Very, Wasson, Hurlbut, F.
 W. Holland, and Scherb; so you may depend we had some fun."
 
 These letters were mere notes. The first, dated February 17, 1852,
 says: "I have not yet seen Mr. Channing, though I believe he is in
 town,--having decided to come to Plymouth myself,--but I will let him
 know that he is expected. Mr. Daniel Foster wishes me to say that he
 accepts your invitation, and that he would like to come Sunday after
 next. I will take the Saturday afternoon train. I shall be glad to get
 a winter view of Plymouth Harbor, and see where your garden lies under
 the snow."
 
 The second letter follows:--
 
 
 TO MARSTON WATSON (AT PLYMOUTH).
 
      CONCORD, December 31, 1852.
 
 MR. WATSON,--I would be glad to visit Plymouth again, but at present I
 have nothing to read which is not severely heathenish, or at least
 secular,--which the dictionary defines as "relating to affairs of the
 present world, not holy,"--though not necessarily unholy; nor have I
 any leisure to prepare it. My writing at present is profane, yet in a
 good sense, and, as it were, sacredly, I may say; for, finding the air
 of the temple too close, I sat outside. Don't think I say this to get
 off; no, no! It will not do to read such things to hungry ears. "If
 they ask for bread, will you give them a stone?" When I have something
 of the right kind, depend upon it I will let you know.
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 Up to 1848, when he was invited to lecture before the Salem Lyceum by
 Nathaniel Hawthorne, then its secretary, Thoreau seems to have spoken
 publicly very little except in Concord; nor did he extend the circuit
 of his lectures much until his two books had made him known as a
 thinker. There was little to attract a popular audience in his manner
 or his matter; but it was the era of lectures, and if one could once
 gain admission to the circle of "lyceum lecturers," it did not so much
 matter what he said; a lecture was a lecture, as a sermon was a
 sermon, good, bad, or indifferent. But it was common to exclude the
 antislavery speakers from the lyceums, even those of more eloquence
 than Thoreau; this led to invitations from the small band of reformers
 scattered about New England and New York, so that the most unlikely of
 platform speakers (Ellery Channing, for example) sometimes gave
 lectures at Plymouth, Greenfield, Newburyport, or elsewhere. The
 present fashion of parlor lectures had not come in; yet at Worcester
 Thoreau's friends early organized for him something of that kind, as
 his letters to Mr. Blake show. In default of an audience of numbers,
 Thoreau fell into the habit of lecturing in his letters to this
 friend; the most marked instance being the thoughtful essay on Love
 and Chastity which makes the bulk of his epistle dated September,
 1852. Like most of his serious writing, this was made up from his
 daily journal, and hardly comes under the head of "familiar letters;"
 the didactic purpose is rather too apparent. Yet it cannot be spared
 from any collection of his epistles,--none of which flowed more
 directly from the quickened moral nature of the man.
 
 
 TO SOPHIA THOREAU (AT BANGOR).
 
      CONCORD, July 13, 1852.
 
 DEAR SOPHIA,--I am a miserable letter-writer, but perhaps if I should
 say this at length and with sufficient emphasis and regret it would
 make a letter. I am sorry that nothing transpires here of much moment;
 or, I should rather say, that I am so slackened and rusty, like the
 telegraph wire this season, that no wind that blows can extract music
 from me.
 
 I am not on the trail of any elephants or mastodons, but have
 succeeded in trapping only a few ridiculous mice, which cannot feed my
 imagination. I have become sadly scientific. I would rather come upon
 the vast valley-like "spoor" only of some celestial beast which this
 world's woods can no longer sustain, than spring my net over a bushel
 of moles. You must do better in those woods where you are. You must
 have some adventures to relate and repeat for years to come, which
 will eclipse even mother's voyage to Goldsborough and Sissiboo.
 
 They say that Mr. Pierce, the presidential candidate, was in town last
 5th of July, visiting Hawthorne, whose college chum he was; and that
 Hawthorne is writing a life of him, for electioneering purposes.
 
 Concord is just as idiotic as ever in relation to the spirits and
 their knockings. Most people here believe in a spiritual world which
 no respectable junk bottle, which had not met with a slip, would
 condescend to contain even a portion of for a moment,--whose
 atmosphere would extinguish a candle let down into it, like a well
 that wants airing; in spirits which the very bullfrogs in our meadows
 would blackball. Their evil genius is seeing how low it can degrade
 them. The hooting of owls, the croaking of frogs, is celestial wisdom
 in comparison. If I could be brought to believe in the things which
 they believe, I should make haste to get rid of my certificate of
 stock in this and the next world's enterprises, and buy a share in the
 first Immediate Annihilation Company that offered. I would exchange my
 immortality for a glass of small beer this hot weather. Where _are_
 the heathen? Was there ever any superstition before? And yet I suppose
 there may be a vessel this very moment setting sail from the coast of
 North America to that of Africa with a missionary on board! Consider
 the dawn and the sunrise,--the rainbow and the evening,--the words of
 Christ and the aspiration of all the saints! Hear music! see, smell,
 taste, feel, hear,--anything,--and then hear these idiots, inspired by
 the cracking of a restless board, humbly asking, "Please, Spirit, if
 you cannot answer by knocks, answer by tips of the table." ! ! ! ! ! !
 !
 
 
 TO HARRISON BLAKE (AT WORCESTER).
 
      CONCORD, July 21, 1852.
 
 MR. BLAKE,--I am too stupidly well these days to write to you. My life
 is almost altogether outward,--all shell and no tender kernel; so that
 I fear the report of it would be only a nut for you to crack, with no
 meat in it for you to eat. Moreover, you have not cornered me up, and
 I enjoy such large liberty in writing to you, that I feel as vague as
 the air. However, I rejoice to hear that you have attended so
 patiently to anything which I have said heretofore, and have detected
 any truth in it. It encourages me to say more,--not in this letter, I
 fear, but in some book which I may write one day. I am glad to know
 that I am as much to any mortal as a persistent and consistent
 scarecrow is to a farmer,--such a bundle of straw in a man's clothing
 as I am, with a few bits of tin to sparkle in the sun dangling about
 me, as if I were hard at work there in the field. However, if this
 kind of life saves any man's corn,--why, he is the gainer. I am not
 afraid that you will flatter me as long as you know what I am, as well
 as what I think, or aim to be, and distinguish between these two, for
 then it will commonly happen that if you praise the last you will
 condemn the first.
 
 I remember that walk to Asnebumskit very well,--a fit place to go to
 on a Sunday; one of the true temples of the earth. A temple, you know,
 was anciently "an open place without a roof," whose walls served
 merely to shut out the world and direct the mind toward heaven; but a
 modern _meeting-house_ shuts out the heavens, while it crowds the
 world into still closer quarters. Best of all is it when, as on a
 mountain-top, you have for all walls your own elevation and deeps of
 surrounding ether. The partridge-berries, watered with mountain dews
 which are gathered there, are more memorable to me than the words
 which I last heard from the pulpit at least; and for my part, I would
 rather look toward Rutland than Jerusalem. Rutland,--modern
 town,--land of ruts,--trivial and worn,--not too sacred,--with no
 holy sepulchre, but profane green fields and dusty roads, and
 opportunity to live as holy a life as you can,--where the sacredness,
 if there is any, is all in yourself and not in the place.
 
 I fear that your Worcester people do not often enough go to the
 hilltops, though, as I am told, the springs lie nearer to the surface
 on your hills than in your valleys. They have the reputation of being
 Free-Soilers.[44] Do they insist on a free atmosphere, too, that is,
 on freedom for the head or brain as well as the feet? If I were
 consciously to join any party, it would be that which is the most free
 to entertain thought.
 
 All the world complain nowadays of a press of trivial duties and
 engagements, which prevents their employing themselves on some higher
 ground they know of; but, undoubtedly, if they were made of the right
 stuff to work on that higher ground, provided they were released from
 all those engagements, they would now at once fulfill the superior
 engagement, and neglect all the rest, as naturally as they breathe.
 They would never be caught saying that they had no time for this, when
 the dullest man knows that this is all that he has time for. No man
 who acts from a sense of duty ever puts the lesser duty above the
 greater. No man has the desire and the ability to work on high things,
 but he has also the ability to build himself a high staging.
 
 As for passing _through_ any great and glorious experience, and rising
 _above_ it, as an eagle might fly athwart the evening sky to rise into
 still brighter and fairer regions of the heavens, I cannot say that I
 ever sailed so creditably; but my bark ever seemed thwarted by some
 side wind, and went off over the edge, and now only occasionally tacks
 back toward the centre of that sea again. I have outgrown nothing
 good, but, I do not fear to say, fallen behind by whole continents of
 virtue, which should have been passed as islands in my course; but I
 trust--what else can I trust? that, with a stiff wind, some Friday,
 when I have thrown some of my cargo overboard, I may make up for all
 that distance lost.
 
 Perchance the time will come when we shall not be content to go back
 and forth upon a raft to some huge Homeric or Shakespearean Indiaman
 that lies upon the reef, but build a bark out of that wreck and others
 that are buried in the sands of this desolate island, and such new
 timber as may be required, in which to sail away to whole new worlds
 of light and life, where our friends are.
 
 Write again. There is one respect in which you did not finish your
 letter: you did not write it with ink, and it is not so good,
 therefore, against or for you in the eye of the law, nor in the eye of
 
      H. D. T.
 
 
 TO HARRISON BLAKE (AT WORCESTER).
 
      September, 1852.
 
 MR. BLAKE,--Here come the sentences which I promised you. You may keep
 them, if you will regard and use them as the disconnected fragments of
 what I may find to be a completer essay, on looking over my journal,
 at last, and may claim again.
 
 I send you the thoughts on Chastity and Sensuality with diffidence
 and shame, not knowing how far I speak to the condition of men
 generally, or how far I betray my peculiar defects. Pray enlighten me
 on this point if you can.
 
 LOVE.
 
 What the essential difference between man and woman is, that they
 should be thus attracted to one another, no one has satisfactorily
 answered. Perhaps we must acknowledge the justness of the distinction
 which assigns to man the sphere of wisdom, and to woman that of love,
 though neither belongs exclusively to either. Man is continually
 saying to woman, Why will you not be more wise? Woman is continually
 saying to man, Why will you not be more loving? It is not in their
 wills to be wise or to be loving; but, unless each is both wise and
 loving, there can be neither wisdom nor love.
 
 All transcendent goodness is one, though appreciated in different
 ways, or by different senses. In beauty we see it, in music we hear
 it, in fragrance we scent it, in the palatable the pure palate tastes
 it, and in rare health the whole body feels it. The variety is in the
 surface or manifestation; but the radical identity we fail to express.
 The lover sees in the glance of his beloved the same beauty that in
 the sunset paints the western skies. It is the same daimon, here
 lurking under a human eyelid, and there under the closing eyelids of
 the day. Here, in small compass, is the ancient and natural beauty of
 evening and morning. What loving astronomer has ever fathomed the
 ethereal depths of the eye?
 
 The maiden conceals a fairer flower and sweeter fruit than any calyx
 in the field; and, if she goes with averted face, confiding in her
 purity and high resolves, she will make the heavens retrospective, and
 all nature humbly confess its queen.
 
 Under the influence of this sentiment, man is a string of an olian
 harp, which vibrates with the zephyrs of the eternal morning.
 
 There is at first thought something trivial in the commonness of love.
 So many Indian youths and maidens along these banks have in ages past
 yielded to the influence of this great civilizer. Nevertheless, this
 generation is not disgusted nor discouraged, for love is no
 individual's experience; and though we are imperfect mediums, it does
 not partake of our imperfection; though we are finite, it is infinite
 and eternal; and the same divine influence broods over these banks,
 whatever race may inhabit them, and perchance still would, even if the
 human race did not dwell here.
 
 Perhaps an instinct survives through the intensest actual love, which
 prevents entire abandonment and devotion, and makes the most ardent
 lover a little reserved. It is the anticipation of change. For the
 most ardent lover is not the less practically wise, and seeks a love
 which will last forever.
 
 Considering how few poetical friendships there are, it is remarkable
 that so many are married. It would seem as if men yielded too easy an
 obedience to nature without consulting their genius. One may be drunk
 with love without being any nearer to finding his mate. There is more
 of good nature than of good sense at the bottom of most marriages.
 But the good nature must have the counsel of the good spirit or
 Intelligence. If common sense had been consulted, how many marriages
 would never have taken place; if uncommon or divine sense, how few
 marriages such as we witness would ever have taken place!
 
 Our love may be ascending or descending. What is its character, if it
 may be said of it,--
 
      "We must _respect_ the souls above,
      But only _those below we love_."
 
 Love is a severe critic. Hate can pardon more than love. They who
 aspire to love worthily, subject themselves to an ordeal more rigid
 than any other.
 
 Is your friend such a one that an increase of worth on your part will
 surely make her more your friend? Is she retained--is she attracted by
 more nobleness in you,--by more of that virtue which is peculiarly
 yours; or is she indifferent and blind to that? Is she to be flattered
 and won by your meeting her on any other than the ascending path? Then
 duty requires that you separate from her.
 
 Love must be as much a light as a flame.
 
 Where there is not discernment, the behavior even of the purest soul
 may in effect amount to coarseness.
 
 A man of fine perceptions is more truly feminine than a merely
 sentimental woman. The heart is blind; but love is not blind. None of
 the gods is so discriminating.
 
 In love and friendship the imagination is as much exercised as the
 heart; and if either is outraged the other will be estranged. It is
 commonly the imagination which is wounded first, rather than the
 heart,--it is so much the more sensitive.
 
 _Comparatively_, we can excuse any offense against the heart, but not
 against the imagination. The imagination knows--nothing escapes its
 glance from out its eyry--and it controls the breast. My heart may
 still yearn toward the valley, but my imagination will not permit me
 to jump off the precipice that debars me from it, for it is wounded,
 its wings are clipt, and it cannot fly, even descendingly. Our
 "blundering hearts!" some poet says. The imagination never forgets; it
 is a re-membering. It is not foundationless, but most reasonable, and
 it alone uses all the knowledge of the intellect.
 
 Love is the profoundest of secrets. Divulged, even to the beloved, it
 is no longer Love. As if it were merely I that loved you. When love
 ceases, then it is divulged.
 
 In our intercourse with one we love, we wish to have answered those
 questions at the end of which we do not raise our voice; against which
 we put no interrogation-mark,--answered with the same unfailing,
 universal aim toward every point of the compass.
 
 I require that thou knowest everything without being told anything. I
 parted from my beloved because there was one thing which I had to tell
 her. She _questioned_ me. She should have known all by sympathy. That
 I had to tell it her was the difference between us,--the
 misunderstanding.
 
 A lover never hears anything that he is _told_, for that is commonly
 either false or stale; but he hears things taking place, as the
 sentinels heard Trenck[45] mining in the ground, and thought it was
 moles.
 
 The relation may be profaned in many ways. The parties may not regard
 it with equal sacredness. What if the lover should learn that his
 beloved dealt in incantations and philters! What if he should hear
 that she consulted a clairvoyant! The spell would be instantly broken.
 
 If to chaffer and higgle are bad in trade, they are much worse in
 Love. It demands directness as of an arrow.
 
 There is danger that we lose sight of what our friend is absolutely,
 while considering what she is to us alone.
 
 The lover wants no partiality. He says, Be so kind as to be just.
 
      Canst thou love with thy mind,
        And reason with thy heart?
      Canst thou be kind,
        And from thy darling part?
 
      Canst thou range earth, sea, and air,
      And so meet me everywhere?
      Through all events I will pursue thee,
      Through all persons I will woo thee.
 
 I need thy hate as much as thy love. Thou wilt not repel me entirely
 when thou repellest what is evil in me.
 
      Indeed, indeed, I cannot tell,
      Though I ponder on it well,
      Which were easier to state,
      All my love or all my hate.
      Surely, surely, thou wilt trust me
      When I say thou doth disgust me.
 
      O, I hate thee with a hate
      That would fain annihilate;
      Yet, sometimes, against my will,
      My dear Friend, I love thee still.
      It were treason to our love,
      And a sin to God above,
      One iota to abate
      Of a pure, impartial hate.
 
 It is not enough that we are truthful; we must cherish and carry out
 high purposes to be truthful about.
 
 It must be rare, indeed, that we meet with one to whom we are prepared
 to be quite ideally related, as she to us. We should have no reserve;
 we should give the whole of ourselves to that society; we should have
 no duty aside from that. One who could bear to be so wonderfully and
 beautifully exaggerated every day. I would take my friend out of her
 low self and set her higher, infinitely higher, and _there_ know her.
 But, commonly, men are as much afraid of love as of hate. They have
 lower engagements. They have near ends to serve. They have not
 imagination enough to be thus employed about a human being, but must
 be coopering a barrel, forsooth.
 
 What a difference, whether, in all your walks, you meet only
 strangers, or in one house is one who knows you, and whom you know. To
 have a brother or a sister! To have a gold mine on your farm! To find
 diamonds in the gravel heaps before your door! How rare these things
 are! To share the day with you,--to people the earth. Whether to have
 a god or a goddess for companion in your walks, or to walk alone with
 hinds and villains and carles. Would not a friend enhance the beauty
 of the landscape as much as a deer or hare? Everything would
 acknowledge and serve such a relation; the corn in the field, and the
 cranberries in the meadow. The flowers would bloom, and the birds
 sing, with a new impulse. There would be more fair days in the year.
 
 The object of love expands and grows before us to eternity, until it
 includes all that is lovely, and we become all that can love.
 
 
 CHASTITY AND SENSUALITY.
 
 The subject of sex is a remarkable one, since, though its phenomena
 concern us so much, both directly and indirectly, and, sooner or
 later, it occupies the thoughts of all, yet all mankind, as it were,
 agree to be silent about it, at least the sexes commonly one to
 another. One of the most interesting of all human facts is veiled more
 completely than any mystery. It is treated with such secrecy and awe
 as surely do not go to any religion. I believe that it is unusual even
 for the most intimate friends to communicate the pleasures and
 anxieties connected with this fact,--much as the external affair of
 love, its comings and goings, are bruited. The Shakers do not
 exaggerate it so much by their manner of speaking of it as all mankind
 by their manner of keeping silence about it. Not that men should speak
 on this or any subject without having anything worthy to say; but it
 is plain that the education of man has hardly commenced,--there is so
 little genuine intercommunication.
 
 In a pure society, the subject of marriage would not be so often
 avoided,--from shame and not from reverence, winked out of sight, and
 hinted at only; but treated naturally and simply,--perhaps simply
 avoided, like the kindred mysteries. If it cannot be spoken of for
 shame, how can it be acted of? But, doubtless, there is far more
 purity, as well as more impurity, than is apparent.
 
 Men commonly couple with their idea of marriage a slight degree at
 least of sensuality; but every lover, the world over, believes in its
 inconceivable purity.
 
 If it is the result of a pure love, there can be nothing sensual in
 marriage. Chastity is something positive, not negative. It is the
 virtue of the married especially. All lusts or base pleasures must
 give place to loftier delights. They who meet as superior beings
 cannot perform the deeds of inferior ones. The deeds of love are less
 questionable than any action of an individual can be, for, it being
 founded on the rarest mutual respect, the parties incessantly
 stimulate each other to a loftier and purer life, and the act in which
 they are associated must be pure and noble indeed, for innocence and
 purity can have no equal. In this relation we deal with one whom we
 respect more religiously even than we respect our better selves, and
 we shall necessarily conduct as in the presence of God. What presence
 can be more awful to the lover than the presence of his beloved?
 
 If you seek the warmth even of affection from a similar motive to that
 from which cats and dogs and slothful persons hug the fire,--because
 your temperature is low through sloth,--you are on the downward road,
 and it is but to plunge yet deeper into sloth. Better the cold
 affection of the sun, reflected from fields of ice and snow, or his
 warmth in some still, wintry dell. The warmth of celestial love does
 not relax, but nerves and braces its enjoyer. Warm your body by
 healthful exercise, not by cowering over a stove. Warm your spirit by
 performing independently noble deeds, not by ignobly seeking the
 sympathy of your fellows who are no better than yourself. A man's
 social and spiritual discipline must answer to his corporeal. He must
 lean on a friend who has a hard breast, as he would lie on a hard bed.
 He must drink cold water for his only beverage. So he must not hear
 sweetened and colored words, but pure and refreshing truths. He must
 daily bathe in truth cold as spring water, not warmed by the sympathy
 of friends.
 
 Can love be in aught allied to dissipation? Let us love by refusing,
 not accepting one another. Love and lust are far asunder. The one is
 good, the other bad. When the affectionate sympathize by their higher
 natures, there is love; but there is danger that they will sympathize
 by their lower natures, and then there is lust. It is not necessary
 that this be deliberate, hardly even conscious; but, in the close
 contact of affection, there is danger that we may stain and pollute
 one another; for we cannot embrace but with an entire embrace.
 
 We must love our friend so much that she shall be associated with our
 purest and holiest thoughts alone. When there is impurity, we have
 "descended to meet," though we knew it not.
 
 The _luxury_ of affection,--there's the danger. There must be some
 nerve and heroism in our love, as of a winter morning. In the religion
 of all nations a purity is hinted at, which, I fear, men never attain
 to. We may love and not elevate one another. The love that takes us as
 it finds us degrades us. What watch we must keep over the fairest and
 purest of our affections, lest there be some taint about them! May we
 so love as never to have occasion to repent of our love!
 
 There is to be attributed to sensuality the loss to language of how
 many pregnant symbols! Flowers, which, by their infinite hues and
 fragrance, celebrate the marriage of the plants, are intended for a
 symbol of the open and unsuspected beauty of all true marriage, when
 man's flowering season arrives.
 
 Virginity, too, is a budding flower, and by an impure marriage the
 virgin is deflowered. Whoever loves flowers, loves virgins and
 chastity. Love and lust are as far asunder as a flower-garden is from
 a brothel.
 
 J. Biberg, in the "Amoenitates Botanicae," edited by Linnus, observes
 (I translate from the Latin): "The organs of generation, which, in the
 animal kingdom, are for the most part concealed by nature, as if they
 were to be ashamed of, in the vegetable kingdom are exposed to the
 eyes of all; and, when the nuptials of plants are celebrated, it is
 wonderful what delight they afford to the beholder, refreshing the
 senses with the most agreeable color and the sweetest odor; and, at
 the same time, bees and other insects, not to mention the hummingbird,
 extract honey from their nectaries, and gather wax from their effete
 pollen." Linnus himself calls the calyx the _thalamus_, or bridal
 chamber; and the corolla the _aulaeum_, or tapestry of it, and
 proceeds to explain thus every part of the flower.
 
 Who knows but evil spirits might corrupt the flowers themselves, rob
 them of their fragrance and their fair hues, and turn their marriage
 into a secret shame and defilement? Already they are of various
 qualities, and there is one whose nuptials fill the lowlands in June
 with the odor of carrion.
 
 The intercourse of the sexes, I have dreamed, is incredibly beautiful,
 too fair to be remembered. I have had thoughts about it, but they are
 among the most fleeting and irrecoverable in my experience. It is
 strange that men will talk of miracles, revelation, inspiration, and
 the like, as things past, while love remains.
 
 A true marriage will differ in no wise from illumination. In all
 perception of the truth there is a divine ecstasy, an inexpressible
 delirium of joy, as when a youth embraces his betrothed virgin. The
 ultimate delights of a true marriage are one with this.
 
 No wonder that, out of such a union, not as end, but as accompaniment,
 comes the undying race of man. The womb is a most fertile soil.
 
 Some have asked if the stock of men could not be improved,--if they
 could not be bred as cattle. Let Love be purified, and all the rest
 will follow. A pure love is thus, indeed, the panacea for all the ills
 of the world.
 
 The only excuse for reproduction is improvement. Nature abhors
 repetition. Beasts merely propagate their kind; but the offspring of
 noble men and women will be superior to themselves, as their
 aspirations are. By their fruits ye shall know them.
 
 
 TO HARRISON BLAKE (AT WORCESTER).
 
      CONCORD, February 27, 1853.
 
 MR. BLAKE,--I have not answered your letter before, because I have
 been almost constantly in the fields surveying of late. It is long
 since I have spent many days so profitably in a pecuniary sense; so
 unprofitably, it seems to me, in a more important sense. I have earned
 just a dollar a day for seventy-six days past; for, though I charge at
 a higher rate for the days which are seen to be spent, yet so many
 more are spent than appears. This is instead of lecturing, which has
 not offered, to pay for that book which I printed.[46] I have not only
 cheap hours, but cheap weeks and months; that is, weeks which are
 bought at the rate I have named. Not that they are quite lost to me,
 or make me very melancholy, alas! for I too often take a cheap
 satisfaction in so spending them,--weeks of pasturing and browsing,
 like beeves and deer,--which give me animal health, it may be, but
 create a tough skin over the soul and intellectual part. Yet, if men
 should offer my body a maintenance for the work of my head alone, I
 feel that it would be a dangerous temptation.
 
 As to whether what you speak of as the "world's way" (which for the
 most part is my way), or that which is shown me, is the better, the
 former is imposture, the latter is truth. I have the coldest
 confidence in the last. There is only such hesitation as the
 appetites feel in following the aspirations. The clod hesitates
 because it is inert, wants _animation_. The one is the way of death,
 the other of life everlasting. My hours are not "cheap in such a way
 that _I_ doubt whether the world's way would not have been better,"
 but cheap in such a way that I doubt whether the world's way, which I
 have adopted for the time, could be worse. The whole enterprise of
 this nation, which is not an upward, but a westward one, toward
 Oregon, California, Japan, etc., is totally devoid of interest to me,
 whether performed on foot, or by a Pacific railroad. It is not
 illustrated by a thought; it is not warmed by a sentiment; there is
 nothing in it which one should lay down his life for, nor even his
 gloves,--hardly which one should take up a newspaper for. It is
 perfectly heathenish,--a filibustering _toward_ heaven by the great
 western route. No; they may go their way to their manifest destiny,
 which I trust is not mine. May my seventy-six dollars, whenever I get
 them, help to carry me in the other direction! I see them on their
 winding way, but no music is wafted from their host,--only the
 rattling of change in their pockets. I would rather be a captive
 knight, and let them all pass by, than be free only to go whither they
 are bound. What end do they propose to themselves beyond Japan? What
 aims more lofty have they than the prairie dogs?
 
 As it respects these things, I have not changed an opinion one iota
 from the first. As the stars looked to me when I was a shepherd in
 Assyria, they look to me now, a New-Englander. The higher the
 mountain on which you stand, the less change in the prospect from
 year to year, from age to age. Above a certain height there is no
 change. I am a Switzer on the edge of the glacier, with his advantages
 and disadvantages, goitre, or what not. (You may suspect it to be some
 kind of swelling at any rate.) I have had but one _spiritual_ birth
 (excuse the word), and now whether it rains or snows, whether I laugh
 or cry, fall farther below or approach nearer to my standard; whether
 Pierce or Scott is elected,--not a new scintillation of light flashes
 on me, but ever and anon, though with longer intervals, the same
 surprising and everlastingly new light dawns to me, with only such
 variations as in the coming of the natural day, with which, indeed, it
 is often coincident.
 
 As to how to preserve potatoes from rotting, your opinion may change
 from year to year; but as to how to preserve your soul from rotting, I
 have nothing to learn, but something to practice.
 
 Thus I declaim against them; but I in my folly am the world I condemn.
 
 I very rarely, indeed, if ever, "feel any itching to be what is called
 useful to my fellow-men." Sometimes--it may be when my thoughts for
 want of employment fall into a beaten path or humdrum--I have dreamed
 idly of stopping a man's horse that was running away; but, perchance,
 I wished that he might run, in order that I might stop him;--or of
 putting out a fire; but then, of course, it must have got well
 a-going. Now, to tell the truth, I do not dream much of acting upon
 horses before they run, or of preventing fires which are not yet
 kindled. What a foul subject is this of doing good! instead of
 minding one's life, which should be his business; doing good as a dead
 carcass, which is only fit for manure, instead of as a living
 man,--instead of taking care to flourish, and smell and taste sweet,
 and refresh all mankind to the extent of our capacity and quality.
 People will sometimes try to persuade you that you have done something
 from that motive, as if you did not already know enough about it. If I
 ever _did_ a man any good, in their sense, of course it was something
 exceptional and insignificant compared with the good or evil which I
 am constantly doing by being what I am. As if you were to preach to
 ice to shape itself into burning-glasses, which are sometimes useful,
 and so the peculiar properties of ice be lost. Ice that merely
 performs the office of a burning-glass does not do its duty.
 
 The problem of life becomes, one cannot say by how many degrees, more
 complicated as our material wealth is increased,--whether that needle
 they tell of was a gateway or not,--since the problem is not merely
 nor mainly to get life for our bodies, but by this or a similar
 discipline to get life for our souls; by cultivating the lowland farm
 on right principles, that is, with this view, to turn it into an
 upland farm. You have so many more talents to account for. If I
 accomplish as much more in spiritual work as I am richer in worldly
 goods, then I am just as worthy, or worth just as much, as I was
 before, and no more. I see that, in my own case, money _might_ be of
 great service to me, but probably it would not be; for the difficulty
 now is, that I do not improve my opportunities, and therefore I am
 not prepared to have my opportunities increased. Now, I warn you, if
 it be as you say, you have got to put on the pack of an upland farmer
 in good earnest the coming spring, the lowland farm being cared for;
 ay, you must be selecting your seeds forthwith, and doing what winter
 work you can; and, while others are raising potatoes and Baldwin
 apples for you, you must be raising apples of the Hesperides for them.
 (Only hear how he preaches!) No man can suspect that he is the
 proprietor of an upland farm,--upland in the sense that it will
 produce nobler crops, and better repay cultivation in the long
 run,--but he will be perfectly sure that he ought to cultivate it.
 
 Though we are desirous to earn our bread, we need not be anxious to
 _satisfy_ men for it,--though we shall take care to pay them,--but
 God, who alone gave it to us. Men may in effect put us in the debtors'
 jail for that matter, simply for paying our whole debt to God, which
 includes our debt to them, and though we have His receipt for it,--for
 His paper is dishonored. The cashier will tell you that He has no
 stock in his bank.
 
 How prompt we are to satisfy the hunger and thirst of our bodies; how
 slow to satisfy the hunger and thirst of our _souls_! Indeed, we
 would-be practical folks cannot use this word without blushing because
 of our infidelity, having starved this substance almost to a shadow.
 We feel it to be as absurd as if a man were to break forth into a
 eulogy on _his dog_, who has n't any. An ordinary man will work every
 day for a year at shoveling dirt to support his body, or a family of
 bodies; but he is an extraordinary man who will work a whole day in a
 year for the support of his soul. Even the priests, the men of God, so
 called, for the most part confess that they work for the support of
 the body. But he alone is the truly enterprising and practical man who
 succeeds in _maintaining_ his soul here. Have not we our everlasting
 life to get? and is not that the only excuse at last for eating,
 drinking, sleeping, or even carrying an umbrella when it rains? A man
 might as well devote himself to raising pork as to fattening the
 bodies, or temporal part merely, of the whole human family. If we made
 the true distinction we should almost all of us be seen to be in the
 almshouse for souls.
 
 I am much indebted to you because you look so steadily at the better
 side, or rather the true centre of me (for our true centre may, and
 perhaps oftenest does, lie entirely aside from us, and we are in fact
 eccentric), and, as I have elsewhere said, "give me an opportunity to
 live." You speak as if the image or idea which I see were reflected
 from me to you; and I see it again reflected from you to me, because
 we stand at the right angle to one another; and so it goes zigzag to
 what successive reflecting surfaces, before it is all dissipated or
 absorbed by the more unreflecting, or differently reflecting,--who
 knows? Or, perhaps, what you see directly, you refer to me. What a
 little shelf is required, by which we may impinge upon another, and
 build there our eyry in the clouds, and all the heavens we see above
 us we refer to the crags around and beneath us. Some piece of mica, as
 it were, in the face or eyes of one, as on the Delectable Mountains,
 slanted at the right angle, reflects the heavens to us. But, in the
 slow geological upheavals and depressions, these mutual angles are
 disturbed, these suns set, and new ones rise to us. That ideal which I
 worshiped was a greater stranger to the mica than to me. It was not
 the hero I admired, but the reflection from his epaulet or helmet. It
 is nothing (for us) permanently inherent in another, but his attitude
 or relation to what we prize, that we admire. The meanest man may
 glitter with micacious particles to his fellow's eye. These are the
 spangles that adorn a man. The highest union,--the only _un_-ion
 (don't laugh), or central oneness, is the coincidence of visual rays.
 Our club-room was an apartment in a constellation where our visual
 rays met (and there was no debate about the restaurant). The way
 between us is over the mount.
 
 Your words make me think of a man of my acquaintance whom I
 occasionally meet, whom you, too, appear to have met, one Myself, as
 he is called. Yet, why not call him _Your_self? If you have met with
 him and know him, it is all I have done; and surely, where there is a
 mutual acquaintance, the _my_ and _thy_ make a distinction without a
 difference.
 
 I do not wonder that you do not like my Canada story. It concerns me
 but little, and probably is not worth the time it took to tell it. Yet
 I had absolutely no design whatever in my mind, but simply to report
 what I saw. I have inserted all of myself that was implicated, or made
 the excursion. It has come to an end, at any rate; they will print no
 more, but return me my MS. when it is but little more than half done,
 as well as another I had sent them, because the editor[47] requires
 the liberty to omit the heresies without consulting me,--a privilege
 California is not rich enough to bid for.
 
 I thank you again and again for attending to me; that is to say, I am
 glad that you hear me and that you also are glad. Hold fast to your
 most indefinite, waking dream. The very green dust on the walls is an
 organized vegetable; the atmosphere has its fauna and flora floating
 in it; and shall we think that dreams are but dust and ashes, are
 always disintegrated and crumbling thoughts, and not dust-like
 thoughts trooping to their standard with music,--systems beginning to
 be organized? These expectations,--these are roots, these are nuts,
 which even the poorest man has in his bin, and roasts or cracks them
 occasionally in winter evenings,--which even the poor debtor retains
 with his bed and his pig, i. e., his idleness and sensuality. Men go
 to the opera because they hear there a faint expression in sound of
 this news which is never quite distinctly proclaimed. Suppose a man
 were to sell the hue, the least amount of coloring matter in the
 superficies of his thought, for a farm,--were to exchange an absolute
 and infinite value for a relative and finite one,--to gain the whole
 world and lose his own soul!
 
 Do not wait as long as I have before you write. If you will look at
 another star, I will try to supply my side of the triangle.
 
 Tell Mr. Brown that I remember him, and trust that he remembers me.
 
 P. S.--Excuse this rather flippant preaching, which does not cost me
 enough; and do not think that I mean you _always_, though your letter
 _requested_ the subjects.
 
 
 TO HARRISON BLAKE (AT WORCESTER).
 
      CONCORD, April 10, 1853.
 
 MR. BLAKE,--Another singular kind of spiritual football,--really
 nameless, handleless, homeless, like myself,--a mere arena for
 thoughts and feelings; definite enough outwardly, indefinite more than
 enough inwardly. But I do not know why we should be styled "misters"
 or "masters:" we come so near to being anything or nothing, and seeing
 that we are mastered, and not wholly sorry to be mastered, by the
 least phenomenon. It seems to me that we are the mere creatures of
 thought,--one of the lowest forms of intellectual life, we men,--as
 the sunfish is of animal life. As yet our thoughts have acquired no
 definiteness nor solidity; they are purely molluscous, not vertebrate;
 and the height of our existence is to float upward in an ocean where
 the sun shines,--appearing only like a vast soup or chowder to the
 eyes of the immortal navigators. It is wonderful that I can be here,
 and you there, and that we can correspond, and do many other things,
 when, in fact, there is so little of us, either or both, anywhere. In
 a few minutes, I expect, this slight film or dash of vapor that I am
 will be what is called asleep,--resting! forsooth from what? Hard
 work? and thought? The hard work of the dandelion down, which floats
 over the meadow all day; the hard work of a pismire that labors to
 raise a hillock all day, and even by moonlight. Suddenly I can come
 forward into the utmost apparent distinctness, and speak with a sort
 of emphasis to you; and the next moment I am so faint an entity, and
 make so slight an impression, that nobody can find the traces of me. I
 try to hunt myself up, and find the little of me that is discoverable
 is falling asleep, and then I assist and tuck it up. It is getting
 late. How can _I_ starve or feed? Can _I_ be said to sleep? There is
 not enough of me even for that. If you hear a noise,--'t ain't I,--'t
 ain't I,--as the dog says with a tin kettle tied to his tail. I read
 of something happening to another the other day: how happens it that
 nothing ever happens to me? A dandelion down that never
 alights,--settles,--blown off by a boy to see if his mother wanted
 him,--some divine boy in the upper pastures.
 
 Well, if there really is another such a meteor sojourning in these
 spaces, I would like to ask you if you know whose estate this is that
 we are on? For my part I enjoy it well enough, what with the wild
 apples and the scenery; but I should n't wonder if the owner set his
 dog on me next. I could remember something not much to the purpose,
 probably; but if I stick to what I do know, then--
 
 It is worth the while to live respectably unto ourselves. We can
 possibly _get along_ with a neighbor, even with a bedfellow, whom we
 respect but very little; but as soon as it comes to this, that we do
 not respect ourselves, then we do not get along at all, no matter how
 much money we are paid for halting. There are old heads in the world
 who cannot help me by their example or advice to live worthily and
 satisfactorily to myself; but I believe that it is in my power to
 elevate myself this very hour above the common level of my life. It is
 better to have your head in the clouds, and know where you are, if
 indeed you cannot get it above them, than to breathe the clearer
 atmosphere below them, and think that you are in paradise.
 
 Once you were in Milton[48] doubting what to do. To live a better
 life,--this surely can be done. Dot and carry one. Wait not for a
 clear sight, for that you are to get. What you see clearly you may
 omit to do. Milton and Worcester? It is all Blake, Blake. Never mind
 the rats in the wall; the cat will take care of them. All that men
 have said or are is a very faint rumor, and it is not worth the while
 to remember or refer to that. If you are to meet God, will you refer
 to anybody out of that court? How shall men know how I succeed, unless
 they are in at the life? I did not see the _Times_ reporter there.
 
 Is it not delightful to provide one's self with the necessaries of
 life,--to collect dry wood for the fire when the weather grows cool,
 or fruits when we grow hungry?--not till then. And then we have all
 the time left for thought!
 
 Of what use were it, pray, to get a little wood to burn, to warm your
 body this cold weather, if there were not a divine fire kindled at the
 same time to warm your spirit?
 
          "Unless above himself he can
      Erect himself, how poor a thing is man!"
 
 I cuddle up by my stove, and there I get up another fire which warms
 fire itself. Life is so short that it is not wise to take roundabout
 ways, nor can we spend much time in waiting. Is it absolutely
 necessary, then, that we should do as we are doing? Are we chiefly
 under obligations to the devil, like Tom Walker? Though it is late to
 leave off this wrong way, it will seem early the moment we begin in
 the right way; instead of mid-afternoon, it will be early morning with
 us. We have not got half-way to dawn yet.
 
 As for the lectures, I feel that I have something to say, especially
 on Traveling, Vagueness, and Poverty; but I cannot come now. I will
 wait till I am fuller, and have fewer engagements. Your suggestions
 will help me much to write them when I am ready. I am going to
 Haverhill[49] to-morrow, surveying, for a week or more. You met me on
 my last errand thither.
 
 I trust that you realize what an exaggerator I am,--that I lay myself
 out to exaggerate whenever I have an opportunity,--pile Pelion upon
 Ossa, to reach heaven so. Expect no trivial truth from me, unless I am
 on the witness-stand. I will come as near to lying as you can drive a
 coach and four. If it is n't thus and so with me, it is with
 something. I am not particular whether I get the shells or meat, in
 view of the latter's worth.
 
 I see that I have not at all answered your letter, but there is time
 enough for that.
 
 
 TO HARRISON BLAKE (AT WORCESTER).
 
      CONCORD, December 19, 1853.
 
 MR. BLAKE,--My debt has accumulated so that I should have answered
 your last letter at once, if I had not been the subject of what is
 called a press of engagements, having a lecture to write for last
 Wednesday, and surveying more than usual besides. It has been a kind
 of running fight with me,--the enemy not always behind me I trust.
 
 True, a man cannot lift himself by his own waistbands, because he
 cannot get out of himself; but he can expand himself (which is better,
 there being no up nor down in nature), and so split his waistbands,
 being already within himself.
 
 You speak of doing and being, and the vanity, real or apparent, of
 much doing. The suckers--I think it is they--make nests in our river
 in the spring of more than a cart-load of small stones, amid which to
 deposit their ova. The other day I opened a muskrat's house. It was
 made of weeds, five feet broad at base, and three feet high, and far
 and low within it was a little cavity, only a foot in diameter, where
 the rat dwelt. It may seem trivial, this piling up of weeds, but so
 the race of muskrats is preserved. We must heap up a great pile of
 doing, for a small diameter of being. Is it not imperative on us that
 we _do_ something, if we only work in a treadmill? And, indeed, some
 sort of revolving is necessary to produce a centre and nucleus of
 being. What exercise is to the body, employment is to the mind and
 morals. Consider what an amount of drudgery must be performed,--how
 much humdrum and prosaic labor goes to any work of the least value.
 There are so many layers of mere white lime in every shell to that
 thin inner one so beautifully tinted. Let not the shellfish think to
 build his house of that alone; and pray, what are its tints to him? Is
 it not his smooth, close-fitting shirt merely, whose tints _are not_
 to him, being in the dark, but only when he is gone or dead, and his
 shell is heaved up to light, a wreck upon the beach, do they appear.
 With him, too, it is a Song of the Shirt, "Work,--work,--work!" And
 the work is not merely a police in the gross sense, but in the higher
 sense a discipline. If it is surely the means to the highest end we
 know, can any work be humble or disgusting? Will it not rather be
 elevating as a ladder, the means by which we are translated?
 
 How admirably the artist is made to accomplish his self-culture by
 devotion to his art! The wood-sawyer, through his effort to do his
 work well, becomes not merely a better wood-sawyer, but measurably a
 better _man_. Few are the men that can work on their navels,--only
 some Brahmins that I have heard of. To the painter is given some paint
 and canvas instead; to the Irishman a hog, typical of himself. In a
 thousand apparently humble ways men busy themselves to make some right
 take the place of some wrong,--if it is only to make a better paste
 blacking,--and they are themselves _so much_ the better morally for
 it.
 
 You say that you do not succeed much. Does it concern you enough that
 you do not? Do you work hard enough at it? Do you get the benefit of
 discipline out of it? If so, persevere. Is it a more serious thing
 than to walk a thousand miles in a thousand successive hours? Do you
 get any corns by it? Do you ever think of hanging yourself on account
 of failure?
 
 If you are going into that line,--going to besiege the city of
 God,--you must not only be strong in engines, but prepared with
 provisions to starve out the garrison. An Irishman came to see me
 to-day, who is endeavoring to get his family out to this New World. He
 rises at half past four, milks twenty-eight cows (which has swollen
 the joints of his fingers), and eats his breakfast, without any milk
 in his tea or coffee, before six; and so on, day after day, for six
 and a half dollars a month; and thus he keeps his virtue in him, if he
 does not add to it; and he regards me as a gentleman able to assist
 him; but if I ever get to be a gentleman, it will be by working after
 my fashion harder than he does. If my joints are not swollen, it must
 be because I deal with the teats of celestial cows before breakfast
 (and the milker in this case is always allowed some of the milk for
 his breakfast), to say nothing of the flocks and herds of Admetus
 afterward.
 
 It is the art of mankind to polish the world, and every one who works
 is scrubbing in some part.
 
 If the work is high and far,
 
      You must not only aim aright,
      But draw the bow with all your might.
 
 You must qualify yourself to use a bow which no humbler archer can
 bend.
 
      "Work,--work,--work!"
 
 Who shall know it for a bow? It is not of yew tree. It is straighter
 than a ray of light; flexibility is not known for one of its
 qualities.
 
 
      December 22.
 
 So far I had got when I was called off to survey. Pray read the life
 of Haydon the painter, if you have not. It is a small revelation for
 these latter days; a great satisfaction to know that he has lived,
 though he is now dead. Have you met with the letter of a Turkish cadi
 at the end of Layard's "Ancient Babylon"? that also is refreshing, and
 a capital comment on the whole book which precedes it,--the Oriental
 genius speaking through him.
 
 Those Brahmins "put it through." They come off, or rather stand still,
 conquerors, with some withered arms or legs at least to show; and they
 are said to have cultivated the faculty of abstraction to a degree
 unknown to Europeans. If we cannot sing of faith and triumph, we will
 sing our despair. We will be that kind of bird. There are day owls,
 and there are night owls, and each is beautiful and even musical while
 about its business.
 
 Might you not find some positive work to do with your back to Church
 and State, letting your back do all the rejection of them? Can you not
 _go_ upon your pilgrimage, Peter, along the winding mountain path
 whither you face? A step more will make those funereal church bells
 over your shoulder sound far and sweet as a natural sound.
 
      "Work,--work,--work!"
 
 Why not make a _very large_ mud pie and bake it in the sun! Only put
 no Church nor State into it, nor upset any other pepper-box that way.
 Dig out a woodchuck,--for that has nothing to do with rotting
 institutions. Go ahead.
 
 Whether a man spends his day in an ecstasy or despondency, he must do
 some work to show for it, even as there are flesh and bones to show
 for him. We are superior to the joy we experience.
 
 Your last two letters, methinks, have more nerve and will in them than
 usual, as if you had erected yourself more. Why are not they good
 work, if you only had a hundred correspondents to tax you?
 
 Make your failure tragical by the earnestness and steadfastness of
 your endeavor, and then it will not differ from success. Prove it to
 be the inevitable fate of mortals,--of one mortal,--if you can.
 
 You said that you were writing on Immortality. I wish you would
 communicate to me what you know about that. You are sure to live while
 that is your theme.
 
 Thus I write on some text which a sentence of your letters may have
 furnished.
 
 I think of coming to see you as soon as I get a new coat, if I have
 money enough left. I will write to you again about it.
 
 
 TO HARRISON BLAKE (AT WORCESTER).
 
      CONCORD, January 21, 1854.
 
 MR. BLAKE,--My coat is at last done, and my mother and sister allow
 that I am _so far_ in a condition to go abroad. I feel as if I had
 gone abroad the moment I put it on. It is, as usual, a production
 strange to me, the wearer,--invented by some Count D'Orsay; and the
 maker of it was not acquainted with any of my real depressions or
 elevations. He only measured a peg to hang it on, and might have made
 the loop big enough to go over my head. It requires a not quite
 innocent indifference, not to say insolence, to wear it. Ah! the
 process by which we get our coats is not what it should be. Though the
 Church declares it righteous, and its priest pardons me, my own good
 genius tells me that it is hasty, and coarse, and false. I expect a
 time when, or rather an integrity by which, a man will get his coat as
 honestly and as perfectly fitting as a tree its bark. Now our garments
 are typical of our conformity to the ways of the world, _i. e._, of
 the devil, and to some extent react on us and poison us, like that
 shirt which Hercules put on.
 
 I think to come and see you next week, on Monday, if nothing hinders.
 I have just returned from court at Cambridge, whither I was called as
 a witness, having surveyed a water-privilege, about which there is a
 dispute, since you were here.
 
 Ah! what foreign countries there are, greater in extent than the
 United States or Russia, and with no more souls to a square mile,
 stretching away on every side from every human being with whom you
 have no sympathy. Their humanity affects me as simply monstrous.
 Rocks, earth, brute beasts, comparatively are not so strange to me.
 When I sit in the parlors and kitchens of some with whom my business
 brings me--I was going to say in contact--(business, like misery,
 makes strange bedfellows), I feel a sort of awe, and as forlorn as if
 I were cast away on a desolate shore. I think of Riley's Narrative[50]
 and his sufferings. You, who soared like a merlin with your mate
 through the realms of ther, in the presence of the unlike, drop at
 once to earth, a mere amorphous squab, divested of your air-inflated
 pinions. (By the way, excuse this writing, for I am using the stub of
 the last feather I chance to possess.) You travel on, however, through
 this dark and desert world; you see in the distance an intelligent and
 sympathizing lineament; stars come forth in the dark, and oases appear
 in the desert.
 
 But (to return to the subject of coats), we are well-nigh smothered
 under yet more fatal coats, which do not fit us, our whole lives long.
 Consider the cloak that our employment or station is; how rarely men
 treat each other for what in their true and naked characters they are;
 how we use and tolerate pretension; how the judge is clothed with
 dignity which does not belong to him, and the trembling witness with
 humility that does not belong to him, and the criminal, perchance,
 with shame or impudence which no more belong to him. It does not
 matter so much, then, what is the fashion of the cloak with which we
 cloak these cloaks. Change the coat; put the judge in the
 criminal-box, and the criminal on the bench, and you might think that
 you had changed the men.
 
 No doubt the thinnest of all cloaks is conscious deception or lies;
 it is sleazy and frays out; it is not close-woven like cloth; but its
 meshes are a coarse network. A man can afford to lie only at the
 intersection of the threads; but truth puts in the filling, and makes
 a consistent stuff.
 
 I mean merely to suggest how much the station affects the demeanor and
 self-respectability of the parties, and that the difference between
 the judge's coat of cloth and the criminal's is insignificant compared
 with, or only partially significant of, the difference between the
 coats which their respective stations permit them to wear. What airs
 the judge may put on over his coat which the criminal may not! The
 judge's opinion (_sententia_) of the criminal _sentences_ him, and is
 read by the clerk of the court, and published to the world, and
 executed by the sheriff; but the criminal's opinion of the judge has
 the weight of a sentence, and is published and executed only in the
 supreme court of the universe,--a court not of common pleas. How much
 juster is the one than the other? Men are continually _sentencing_
 each other; but, whether we be judges or criminals, the sentence is
 ineffectual unless we continue ourselves.
 
 I am glad to hear that I do not always limit your vision when you look
 this way; that you sometimes see the light through me; that I am here
 and there windows, and not all dead wall. Might not the community
 sometimes petition a man to remove himself as a nuisance, a darkener
 of the day, a too large mote?
 
 
 TO HARRISON BLAKE (AT WORCESTER).
 
      CONCORD, August 8, 1854.
 
 MR. BLAKE,--Methinks I have spent a rather unprofitable summer thus
 far. I have been too much with the world, as the poet might say.[51]
 The completest performance of the highest duties it imposes would
 yield me but little satisfaction. Better the neglect of all such,
 because your life passed on a level where it was impossible to
 recognize them. Latterly, I have heard the very flies buzz too
 distinctly, and have accused myself because I did not still this
 superficial din. We must not be too easily distracted by the crying of
 children or of dynasties. The Irishman erects his sty, and gets drunk,
 and jabbers more and more under my eaves, and I am responsible for all
 that filth and folly. I find it, as ever, very unprofitable to have
 much to do with men. It is sowing the wind, but not reaping even the
 whirlwind; only reaping an unprofitable calm and stagnation. Our
 conversation is a smooth, and civil, and never-ending speculation
 merely. I take up the thread of it again in the morning, with very
 much such courage as the invalid takes his prescribed Seidlitz
 powders. Shall I help you to some of the mackerel? It would be more
 respectable if men, as has been said before, instead of being such
 pigmy desperates, were Giant Despairs. Emerson says that his life is
 so unprofitable and shabby for the most part, that he is driven to all
 sorts of resources, and, among the rest, to men. I tell him that we
 differ only in our resources. Mine is to get away from men. They very
 rarely affect me as grand or beautiful; but I know that there is a
 sunrise and a sunset every day. In the summer, this world is a mere
 watering-place,--a Saratoga,--drinking so many tumblers of Congress
 water; and in the winter, is it any better, with its oratorios? I have
 seen more men than usual, lately; and, well as I was acquainted with
 one, I am surprised to find what vulgar fellows they are. They do a
 little business commonly each day, in order to pay their board, and
 then they congregate in sitting-rooms and feebly fabulate and paddle
 in the social slush; and when I think that they have sufficiently
 relaxed, and am prepared to see them steal away to their shrines, they
 go unashamed to their beds, and take on a new layer of sloth. They may
 be single, or have families in their _faineancy_. I do not meet men
 who can have nothing to do with me because they have so much to do
 with themselves. However, I trust that a very few cherish purposes
 which they never declare. Only think, for a moment, of a man about his
 affairs! How we should respect him! How glorious he would appear! Not
 working for any corporation, its agent, or president, but fulfilling
 the end of his being! A man about _his business_ would be the cynosure
 of all eyes.
 
 The other evening I was determined that I would silence this shallow
 din; that I would walk in various directions and see if there was not
 to be found any depth of silence around. As Bonaparte sent out his
 horsemen in the Red Sea on all sides to find shallow water, so I sent
 forth my mounted thoughts to find deep water. I left the village and
 paddled up the river to Fair Haven Pond. As the sun went down, I saw
 a solitary boatman disporting on the smooth lake. The falling dews
 seemed to strain and purify the air, and I was smoothed with an
 infinite stillness. I got the world, as it were, by the nape of the
 neck, and held it under in the tide of its own events, till it was
 drowned, and then I let it go down-stream like a dead dog. Vast hollow
 chambers of silence stretched away on every side, and my being
 expanded in proportion, and filled them. Then first could I appreciate
 sound, and find it musical.[52]
 
 But now for your news. Tell us of the year. Have you fought the good
 fight? What is the state of your crops? Will your harvest answer well
 to the seed-time, and are you cheered by the prospect of stretching
 cornfields? Is there any blight on your fields, any murrain in your
 herds? Have you tried the size and quality of your potatoes? It does
 one good to see their balls dangling in the lowlands. Have you got
 your meadow hay before the fall rains shall have set in? Is there
 enough in your barns to keep your cattle over? Are you killing weeds
 nowadays? or have you earned leisure to go a-fishing? Did you plant
 any Giant Regrets last spring, such as I saw advertised? It is not a
 new species, but the result of cultivation and a fertile soil. They
 are excellent for sauce. How is it with your marrow squashes for
 winter use? Is there likely to be a sufficiency of fall feed in your
 neighborhood? What is the state of the springs? I read that in your
 county there is more water on the hills than in the valleys. Do you
 find it easy to get all the help you require? Work early and late, and
 let your men and teams rest at noon. Be careful not to drink too much
 sweetened water, while at your hoeing, this hot weather. You can bear
 the heat much better for it.
 
 
 TO MARSTON WATSON (AT PLYMOUTH).
 
      CONCORD, September 19, 1854.
 
 DEAR SIR,--I am glad to hear from you and the Plymouth men again. The
 world still holds together between Concord and Plymouth, it seems. I
 should like to be with you while Mr. Alcott is there, but I cannot
 come next Sunday. I will come Sunday after next, that is, October 1st,
 if that will do; and look out for you at the depot. I do not like to
 promise more than one discourse. Is there a good precedent for two?
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 The first of Thoreau's many lecturing visits to Worcester, the home of
 his friend Blake, was in April, 1849, and from that time onward he
 must have read lectures there at least annually, until his last
 illness, in 1861-62. By 1854, the lecturing habit, in several places
 besides Concord, had become established; and there was a constant
 interchange of visits and excursions with his friends at Worcester,
 Plymouth, New Bedford, etc. Soon after the publication of "Walden," in
 the summer of 1854, Thoreau wrote these notes to Mr. Blake, touching
 on various matters of friendly interest.
 
 
 TO HARRISON BLAKE (AT WORCESTER).
 
      CONCORD, September 21, 1854.
 
 BLAKE,--I have just read your letter, but do not mean now to answer
 it, solely for want of time to say what I wish. I directed a copy of
 "Walden" to you at Ticknor's, on the day of its publication, and it
 should have reached you before. I am encouraged to know that it
 interests you as it now stands,--a printed book,--for you apply a very
 severe test to it,--you make the highest demand on me. As for the
 excursion you speak of, I should like it right well,--indeed I thought
 of proposing the same thing to you and Brown, some months ago. Perhaps
 it would have been better if I had done so then; for in that case I
 should have been able to enter into it with that infinite margin to my
 views,--spotless of all engagements,--which I think so necessary. As
 it is, I have agreed to go a-lecturing to Plymouth, Sunday after next
 (October 1) and to Philadelphia in November, and thereafter to the
 West, _if they shall want me_; and, as I have prepared nothing in that
 shape, I feel as if my hours were spoken for. However, I think that,
 after having been to Plymouth, I may take a day or two--if that date
 will suit you and Brown. _At any rate_ I will write to you then.
 
 
      CONCORD, October 5, 1854.
 
 After I wrote to you, Mr. Watson postponed my going to Plymouth one
 week, _i. e._, till next Sunday; and now he wishes me to carry my
 instruments and survey his grounds, to which he has been adding. Since
 I want a little money, though I contemplate but a short excursion, I
 do not feel at liberty to decline this work. I do not know exactly how
 long it will detain me,--but there is plenty of time yet, and I will
 write to you again--perhaps from Plymouth.
 
 There is a Mr. Thomas Cholmondeley (pronounced Chumly), a young
 English author, staying at our house at present, who asks me to teach
 him _botany_--_i. e._, anything which I know; and also to make an
 excursion to some mountain with him. He is a well-behaved person, and
 _possibly_ I may propose his taking that run to Wachusett with us--if
 it will be agreeable to you. Nay, if I do not hear any objection from
 you, I will consider myself _at liberty_ to invite him.
 
      CONCORD, Saturday P. M., October 14, 1854.
 
 I have just returned from Plymouth, where I have been detained
 surveying much longer than I expected. What do you say to visiting
 Wachusett next Thursday? I will start at 7 A. M. _unless there is a
 prospect of a stormy day_, go by cars to Westminster, and thence on
 foot five or six miles to the mountain-top, where I may engage to meet
 you, at (or before) 12 M. If the weather is unfavorable, I will try
 again, on Friday,--and again on Monday. If a storm comes on after
 starting, I will seek you at the tavern at Princeton centre, as soon
 as circumstances will permit. I shall expect an answer at once, to
 clinch the bargain.
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 The year 1854 was a memorable one in Thoreau's life, for it brought
 out his most successful book, "Walden," and introduced him to the
 notice of the world, which had paid small attention to his first book,
 the "Week," published five years earlier. This year also made him
 acquainted with two friends to whom he wrote much, and who loved to
 visit and stroll with him around Concord, or in more distant
 places,--Thomas Cholmondeley, an Englishman from Shropshire, and
 Daniel Ricketson, a New Bedford Quaker, of liberal mind and cultivated
 tastes,--an author and poet, and fond of corresponding with poets, as
 he did with the Howitts and William Barnes of England, and with
 Bryant, Emerson, Channing, and Thoreau, in America. Few of the letters
 to Cholmondeley are yet found, being buried temporarily in the mass of
 family papers at Condover Hall, an old Elizabethan mansion near
 Shrewsbury, which Thomas Cholmondeley inherited, and which remains in
 his family's possession since his own death at Florence in 1864. But
 the letters of the Englishman, recently printed in the _Atlantic
 Monthly_ (December, 1893), show how sincere was the attachment of
 this ideal friend to the Concord recluse, and how well he read that
 character which the rest of England, and a good part of America, have
 been so slow to recognize for what it really was.
 
 Thomas Cholmondeley was the eldest son of Rev. Charles Cowper
 Cholmondeley, rector of Overleigh, Cheshire, and of a sister to
 Reginald Heber, the celebrated bishop of Calcutta. He was born in
 1823, and brought up at Hodnet, in Shropshire, where his father, a
 cousin of Lord Delamere, had succeeded his brother-in-law as rector,
 on the departure of Bishop Heber for India, in 1823. The son was
 educated at Oriel College, Oxford,--a friend, and perhaps pupil of
 Arthur Hugh Clough, who gave him letters to Emerson in 1854. Years
 before, after leaving Oxford, he had gone with some relatives to New
 Zealand, and before coming to New England he had published a book,
 "Ultima Thule," describing that Australasian colony of England, where
 he lived for part of a year. He had previously studied in Germany, and
 traveled on the Continent. He landed in America the first time in
 August, 1854, and soon after went to Concord, where, at the suggestion
 of Emerson, he became an inmate of Mrs. Thoreau's family. This made
 him intimate with Henry Thoreau for a month or two, and also brought
 him into acquaintance with Ellery Channing, then living across the
 main street of Concord, in the west end of the village, and furnishing
 to Thoreau a landing-place for his boat under the willows at the foot
 of Channing's small garden. Alcott was not then in Concord, but
 Cholmondeley made his acquaintance in Boston, and admired his
 character and manners.[53]
 
   [Illustration: _Thoreau's Boat-landing, Concord River_]
 
 With Channing and Thoreau the young Englishman visited their nearest
 mountain, Wachusett, and in some of their walks the artist Rowse, who
 had made the first portrait of Thoreau, joined, for he was then in
 Concord, late in 1854, engraving the fine head of Daniel Webster from
 a painting by Ames, and this engraving he gave both to Thoreau and to
 Cholmondeley. In December the Englishman, whose patriotism was roused
 by the delays and calamities of England in her Crimean war, resolved
 to go home and raise a company, as he did, first spending some weeks
 in lodgings at Boston (Orange Street) in order to hear Theodore Parker
 preach and visit Harvard College, of which I was then a student, in
 the senior class. He visited me and my classmate, Edwin Morton, and
 called on some of the Cambridge friends of Clough. In January, 1855,
 he sailed for England, and there received the letter of Thoreau
 printed on pages 249-251.
 
 The acquaintance with Mr. Ricketson began by letter before
 Cholmondeley reached Concord, but Thoreau did not visit him until
 December, 1854. Mr. Ricketson says, "In the summer of 1854 I
 purchased, in New Bedford, a copy of 'Walden.' I had never heard of
 its author, but in this admirable and most original book I found so
 many observations on plants, birds, and natural objects generally in
 which I was also interested, that I felt at once I had found a
 congenial spirit. During this season I was rebuilding a house in the
 country, three miles from New Bedford, and had erected a small
 building which was called my 'shanty;' and my family being then in my
 city house, I made this building my temporary home. From it I
 addressed my first letter to the author of 'Walden.' In reply he
 wrote, 'I had duly received your very kind and frank letter, but
 delayed to answer it thus long because I have little skill as a
 correspondent, and wished to send you something more than my thanks. I
 was gratified by your prompt and hearty acceptance of my book. Yours
 is the only word of greeting I am likely to receive from a dweller in
 the woods like myself,--from where the whip-poor-will and cuckoo are
 heard, and there are better than moral clouds drifting over, and real
 breezes blow.' From that year until his death in 1862 we exchanged
 visits annually, and letters more frequently. He was much interested
 in the botany of our region, finding here many marine plants he had
 not before seen. When our friendship began, the admirers of his only
 two published books were few; most prominent among them were Emerson,
 Alcott, and Channing of Concord, Messrs. Blake and T. Brown of
 Worcester, Mr. Marston Watson of Plymouth, and myself. Many accused
 him of being an imitator of Emerson; others thought him unsocial,
 impracticable, and ascetic. Now he was none of these; a more original
 man never lived, nor one more thoroughly personifying civility; no man
 could hold a finer relationship with his family than he."
 
 In reply to Mr. Ricketson's first letter (August 12, 1854) above
 mentioned, Thoreau sent, after six weeks' delay, the reply of October
 1, the beginning of which was just quoted. Continuing, Thoreau said:--
 
 "Your account excites in me a desire to see the Middleborough ponds,
 of which I had already heard somewhat; as also some very beautiful
 ponds on the Cape, in Harwich, I think, near which I once passed. I
 have sometimes also thought of visiting that remnant of _our_ Indians
 still living near you. But then, you know, there is nothing like one's
 native fields and lakes. The best news you send me is, not that Nature
 with you is so fair and genial, but that there is one there who likes
 her so well. That proves all that was asserted.
 
 "Homer, of course, you include in your list of lovers of Nature; and,
 by the way, let me mention here--for this is 'my thunder'
 lately--William Gilpin's long series of books on the Picturesque, with
 their illustrations. If it chances that you have not met with these, I
 cannot just now frame a better wish than that you may one day derive
 as much pleasure from the inspection of them as I have.
 
 "Much as you have told me of yourself, you have still, I think, a
 little the advantage of me in this correspondence, for I have told you
 still more in my book. You have therefore the broadest mark to fire
 at.
 
 "A young English author, Thomas Cholmondeley, is just now waiting for
 me to take a walk with him; therefore excuse this very barren note
 from
 
      "Yours, hastily at last."
 
 Between the letter just quoted and Thoreau's next, of December 19,
 1854, a letter is obviously missing. Mr. Ricketson had answered
 (October 12), the first letter, and on December 14 had written again
 to convey an invitation from Mr. Mitchell that Thoreau should lecture
 at New Bedford, the 26th, on his way to Nantucket for the 28th.
 Probably Thoreau had replied to the letter of October 12, and to the
 invitation to bring Cholmondeley with him in the pleasant October
 season. In this reply he had said something which called forth from
 Ricketson an expression of sympathy, as well as the December
 invitation; for Thoreau thus replied to the letter of December 14:--
 
 
 TO DANIEL RICKETSON (AT NEW BEDFORD).
 
      CONCORD, December 19, 1854.
 
 DEAR SIR,--I wish to thank you for your sympathy. I had counted on
 seeing you when I came to New Bedford, though I did not know exactly
 how near to it you permanently dwelt; therefore I gladly accept your
 invitation to stop at your house. I am going to lecture at Nantucket
 the 28th, and as I suppose I must improve the earliest opportunity to
 get there from New Bedford, I will endeavor to come on Monday, that I
 may see yourself and New Bedford before my lecture.
 
 I should like right well to see your ponds, but that is hardly to be
 thought of at present. I fear that it is impossible for me to combine
 such things with the business of lecturing. You cannot serve God and
 Mammon. However, perhaps I shall have time to see something of your
 country. I am aware that you have not so much snow as we; there has
 been excellent sleighing here since the 5th inst.
 
 Mr. Cholmondeley has left us, so that I shall come alone. Will you be
 so kind as to warn Mr. Mitchell that I accept at once his invitation
 to lecture on the 26th of this month, for I do not know that he has
 got my letter. Excuse this short note.[54]
 
 
 TO HARRISON BLAKE (AT WORCESTER).
 
      CONCORD, December 19, 1854.
 
 MR. BLAKE,--I suppose you have heard of my truly providential meeting
 with Mr. [T.] Brown; providential because it saved me from the
 suspicion that my words had fallen altogether on stony ground, when it
 turned out that there was some Worcester soil there. You will allow me
 to consider that I correspond with him through you.
 
 I confess that I am a very bad correspondent, so far as promptness of
 reply is concerned; but then I am sure to answer sooner or later. The
 longer I have forgotten you, the more I remember you. For the most
 part I have not been idle since I saw you. How does the world go with
 you? or rather, how do you get along without it? I have not yet
 learned to live, that I can see, and I fear that I shall not very
 soon. I find, however, that in the long run things correspond to my
 original idea,--that they correspond to nothing else so much; and thus
 a man may really be a true prophet without any great exertion. The day
 is never so dark, nor the night even, but that the laws at least of
 light still prevail, and so may make it light in our minds if they are
 open to the truth. There is considerable danger that a man will be
 crazy between dinner and supper; but it will not directly answer any
 good purpose that I know of, and it is just as easy to be sane. We
 have got to know what both life and death are, before we can begin to
 live after our own fashion. Let us be learning our a-b-c's as soon as
 possible. I never yet knew the sun to be knocked down and rolled
 through a mud-puddle; he comes out honor-bright from behind every
 storm. Let us then take sides with the sun, seeing we have so much
 leisure. Let us not put all we prize into a football to be kicked,
 when a bladder will do as well.
 
 When an Indian is burned, his body may be broiled, it may be no more
 than a beefsteak. What of that? They may broil his _heart_, but they
 do not therefore broil his _courage_,--his principles. Be of good
 courage! That is the main thing.
 
 If a man were to place himself in an attitude to bear manfully the
 greatest evil that can be inflicted on him, he would find suddenly
 that there was no such evil to bear; his brave back would go
 a-begging. When Atlas got his back made up, that was all that was
 required. (In this case _a priv._, not _pleon._, and .)
 The world rests on principles. The wise gods will never make
 underpinning of a man. But as long as he crouches, and skulks, and
 shirks his work, every creature that has weight will be treading on
 his toes, and crushing him; he will himself tread with one foot on the
 other foot.
 
 The monster is never just there where we think he is. What is truly
 monstrous is our cowardice and sloth.
 
 Have no idle disciplines like the Catholic Church and others; have
 only positive and fruitful ones. Do what you know you ought to do. Why
 should we ever go abroad, even across the way, to ask a neighbor's
 advice? There is a nearer neighbor within us incessantly telling us
 how we should behave. But we wait for the neighbor without to tell us
 of some false, easier way.
 
 They have a census-table in which they put down the number of the
 insane. Do you believe that they put them all down there? Why, in
 every one of these houses there is at least one man fighting or
 squabbling a good part of his time with a dozen pet demons of his own
 breeding and cherishing, which are relentlessly gnawing at his vitals;
 and if perchance he resolve at length that he will courageously combat
 them, he says, "Ay! ay! I will attend to you after dinner!" And, when
 that time comes, he concludes that he is good for another stage, and
 reads a column or two about the _Eastern War_! Pray, to be in earnest,
 where is Sevastopol? Who is Menchikoff? and Nicholas behind there? who
 the Allies? Did not we fight a little (little enough to be sure, but
 just enough to make it interesting) at Alma, at Balaclava, at
 Inkermann? We love to fight far from home. Ah! the Mini musket is the
 king of weapons. Well, let us get one then.
 
 I just put another stick into my stove,--a pretty large mass of white
 oak. How many men will do enough this cold winter to pay for the fuel
 that will be required to warm them? I suppose I have burned up a
 pretty good-sized tree to-night,--and for what? I settled with Mr.
 Tarbell for it the other day; but that was n't the final settlement. I
 got off cheaply from him. At last, one will say, "Let us see, how much
 wood did you burn, sir?" And I shall shudder to think that the next
 question will be, "What did you do while you were warm?" Do we think
 the ashes will pay for it? that God is an ash-man? It is a fact that
 we have got to render an account for the deeds done in the body.
 
 Who knows but we shall be better the next year than we have been the
 past? At any rate, I wish you a really _new_ year,--commencing from
 the instant you read this,--and happy or unhappy, according to your
 deserts.
 
 
 TO HARRISON BLAKE.
 
      CONCORD, December 22, 1854.
 
 MR. BLAKE,--I will lecture for your Lyceum on the 4th of January next;
 and I hope that I shall have time for that good day out of doors. Mr.
 Cholmondeley is in Boston, yet _perhaps_ I may invite him to
 accompany me. I have engaged to lecture at New Bedford on the 26th
 inst., stopping with Daniel Ricketson, three miles out of town; and at
 Nantucket on the 28th, so that I shall be gone all next week. They say
 there is some danger of being weather-bound at Nantucket; but I see
 that others run the same risk. You had better acknowledge the receipt
 of this at any rate, though you should write nothing else; otherwise I
 shall not know whether you get it; but perhaps you will not wait till
 you have seen me, to answer my letter (of December 19). I will tell
 you what I think of lecturing when I see you. Did you see the notice
 of "Walden" in the last _Anti-Slavery Standard_? You will not be
 surprised if I tell you that it reminded me of you.
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 On the Christmas Day that Thoreau reached New Bedford, he had left
 home in the forenoon, as usual in his Cambridge visits, spent some
 time at Harvard College, and gone on by the train in the afternoon,
 which accounted for his delay. His host, who then saw him for the
 first time, says:--
 
 "I had expected him at noon, but as he did not arrive, I had given him
 up for the day. In the latter part of the afternoon I was clearing off
 the snow from my front steps, when, looking up, I saw a man walking up
 the carriage-road, bearing a portmanteau in one hand and an umbrella
 in the other. He was dressed in a long overcoat of dark color, and
 wore a dark soft hat. I had no suspicion it was Thoreau, and rather
 supposed it was a peddler of small wares."
 
 This was a common mistake to make. When Thoreau ran the gantlet of the
 Cape Cod villages,--"feeling as strange," he says, "as if he were in a
 town in China,"--one of the old fishermen could not believe that he
 had not something to sell. Being finally satisfied that it was not a
 peddler with his pack, the old man said, "Wal, it makes no odds what
 't is you carry, so long as you carry Truth along with ye." Mr.
 Ricketson came to the same conclusion about his visitor, and in the
 early September of 1855 returned the visit.
 
 On the 4th of January, 1855, Ricketson wrote, saying, "Your visit,
 short as it was, gave us all at Brooklawn much satisfaction;" adding
 that he might visit Concord late in January, when he expected to be in
 Boston. Thoreau replied:--
 
 
 TO DANIEL RICKETSON (AT NEW BEDFORD).
 
      CONCORD, January 6, 1855.
 
 MR. RICKETSON,--I am pleased to hear from the shanty, whose inside and
 occupant I have seen. I had a very pleasant time at Brooklawn, as you
 know, and thereafter at Nantucket. I was obliged to pay the usual
 tribute to the sea, but it was more than made up to me by the
 hospitality of the Nantucketers. Tell Arthur that I can now compare
 notes with him; for though I went neither before nor behind the mast,
 since we had n't any, I went with my head hanging over the side all the
 way.
 
 In spite of all my experience, I persisted in reading to the Nantucket
 people the lecture which I read at New Bedford, and I found them to be
 the very audience for me. I got home Friday night, after being lost
 in the fog off Hyannis.[55] I have not yet found a new jackknife, but
 I had a glorious skating with Channing the other day, on the skates
 found long ago.
 
 Mr. Cholmondeley sailed for England direct, in the America, on the 3d,
 after spending a night with me. He thinks even to go to the East and
 enlist. Last night I returned from lecturing in Worcester.
 
 I shall be glad to see you when you come to Boston, as will also my
 mother and sister, who know something about you as an abolitionist.
 Come directly to our house. Please remember me to Mrs. Ricketson, and
 also to the young folks.
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 After writing that he expected to be at the anti-slavery meetings in
 Boston, January 24 and 25, ill health and a snow-storm detained
 Ricketson at Brooklawn, whereupon Thoreau wrote:--
 
 
 TO DANIEL RICKETSON (AT NEW BEDFORD).
 
      CONCORD, February 1, 1855.
 
 DEAR SIR,--I supposed, as I did not see you on the 24th or 25th, that
 some track or other was obstructed; but the solid earth still holds
 together between New Bedford and Concord, and I trust that as this
 time you stayed away, you may live to come another day.
 
 I did not go to Boston, for with regard to that place I sympathize
 with one of my neighbors, an old man, who has not been there since the
 last war, when he was compelled to go. No, I have a real genius for
 staying at home.
 
 I have been looking of late at Bewick's tail-pieces in the
 "Birds,"--all they have of him at Harvard. Why will he be a little
 vulgar at times? Yesterday I made an excursion up our river,--skated
 some thirty miles in a few hours, if you will believe it. So with
 reading and writing and skating the night comes round again.
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 The early part of 1855 was spent by Thomas Cholmondeley in a tiresome
 passage to England, whence he wrote (January 27) to say to Thoreau
 that he had reached Shropshire, and been commissioned captain in the
 local militia, in preparation for service at Sevastopol, but reminding
 his Concord friend of a half promise to visit England some day. To
 this Thoreau made answer thus:--
 
 
 TO THOMAS CHOLMONDELEY (AT HODNET).
 
      CONCORD, Mass., February 7, 1855.
 
 DEAR CHOLMONDELEY,--I am glad to hear that you have arrived safely at
 Hodnet, and that there is a solid piece of ground of that name which
 can support a man better than a floating plank, in that to me as yet
 purely historical England. But have I not seen you with my own eyes, a
 piece of England herself, and was not your letter come out to me
 thence? I have now reason to believe that Salop is as real a place as
 Concord; with at least as good an underpinning of granite, floating on
 liquid fire. I congratulate you on having arrived safely at that
 floating isle, after your disagreeable passage in the steamer America.
 So are we not all making a passage, agreeable or disagreeable, in the
 steamer Earth, trusting to arrive at last at some less undulating
 Salop and brother's house?
 
 I cannot say that I am surprised to hear that you have joined the
 militia, after what I have heard from your lips; but I am glad to
 doubt if there will be occasion for your volunteering into the line.
 Perhaps I am thinking of the saying that it "is always darkest just
 before day." I believe it is only necessary that England be fully
 awakened to a sense of her position, in order that she may right
 herself, especially as the weather will soon cease to be her foe. I
 wish I could believe that the cause in which you are embarked is the
 cause of the people of England. However, I have no sympathy with the
 idleness that would contrast this fighting with the teachings of the
 pulpit; for, perchance, more true virtue is being practiced at
 Sevastopol than in many years of peace. It is a pity that we seem to
 require a war, from time to time, to assure us that there is any
 manhood still left in man.
 
 I was much pleased with [J. J. G.] Wilkinson's vigorous and telling
 assault on Allopathy, though he substitutes another and perhaps no
 stronger _thy_ for that. Something as good on the whole conduct of the
 war would be of service. Cannot Carlyle supply it? We will not require
 him to provide the remedy. Every man to his trade. As you know, I am
 not in any sense a politician. You, who live in that snug and compact
 isle, may dream of a glorious commonwealth, but I have some doubts
 whether I and the new king of the Sandwich Islands shall pull
 together. When I think of the gold-diggers and the Mormons, the slaves
 and the slaveholders and the flibustiers, I naturally dream of a
 glorious private life. No, I am not patriotic; I shall not meddle with
 the Gem of the Antilles. General Quitman[56] cannot count on my aid,
 alas for him! nor can General Pierce.[57]
 
 I still take my daily walk, or skate over Concord fields or meadows,
 and on the whole have more to do with nature than with man. We have
 not had much snow this winter, but have had some remarkably cold
 weather, the mercury, February 6, not rising above 6 below zero
 during the day, and the next morning falling to 26. Some ice is still
 thirty inches thick about us. A rise in the river has made uncommonly
 good skating, which I have improved to the extent of some thirty miles
 a day, fifteen out and fifteen in.
 
 Emerson is off westward, enlightening the Hamiltonians [in Canada] and
 others, mingling his thunder with that of Niagara. Channing still sits
 warming his five wits--his sixth, you know, is always limber--over
 that stove, with the dog down cellar. Lowell has just been appointed
 Professor of Belles-Lettres in Harvard University, in place of
 Longfellow, resigned, and will go very soon to spend another year in
 Europe, before taking his seat.
 
 I am from time to time congratulating myself on my general want of
 success as a lecturer; apparent want of success, but is it not a real
 triumph? I do my work clean as I go along, and they will not be likely
 to want me anywhere again. So there is no danger of my repeating
 myself, and getting to a barrel of sermons, which you must upset, and
 begin again with.
 
 My father and mother and sister all desire to be remembered to you,
 and trust that you will never come within range of Russian bullets. Of
 course, I would rather think of you as settled down there in
 Shropshire, in the camp of the English people, making acquaintance
 with your men, striking at the root of the evil, perhaps assaulting
 that rampart of cotton bags that you tell of. But it makes no odds
 where a man goes or stays, if he is only about his business.
 
 Let me hear from you, wherever you are, and believe me yours ever in
 the good fight, whether before Sevastopol or under the wreken.
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 While Cholmondeley's first letter from England was on its way to
 Concord, Thoreau was one day making his occasional call at the Harvard
 College Library (where he found and was allowed to take away volumes
 relating to his manifold studies), when it occurred to him to call at
 my student-chamber in Holworthy Hall, and there leave a copy of his
 "Week." I had never met him, and was then out; the occasion of his
 call was a review of his two books that had come out a few weeks
 earlier in the _Harvard Magazine_, of which I was an editor and might
 be supposed to have had some share in the criticism. The volume was
 left with my classmate Lyman, accompanied by a message that it was
 intended for the critic in the Magazine. Accordingly, I gave it to
 Edwin Morton, who was the reviewer, and notified Thoreau by letter of
 that fact, and of my hope to see him soon in Cambridge or Concord.[58]
 To this he replied in a few days as below:--
 
 
 TO F. B. SANBORN (AT HAMPTON FALLS, N. H.).
 
      CONCORD, February 2, 1855.
 
 DEAR SIR,--I fear that you did not get the note which I left with the
 Librarian for you, and so will thank you again for your politeness. I
 was sorry that I was obliged to go into Boston almost immediately.
 However, I shall be glad to see you whenever you come to Concord, and
 I will suggest nothing to discourage your coming, so far as I am
 concerned; trusting that you know what it is to take a partridge on
 the wing. You tell me that the author of the criticism is Mr. Morton.
 I had heard as much,--and indeed guessed more. I have latterly found
 Concord nearer to Cambridge than I believed I should, when I was
 leaving my Alma Mater; and hence you will not be surprised if even I
 feel some interest in the success of the _Harvard Magazine_.
 
      Believe me yours truly,
      HENRY D. THOREAU.
 
 At this time I was under engagement with Mr. Emerson and others in
 Concord to take charge of a small school there in March; and did so
 without again seeing the author of "Walden" in Cambridge. Soon after
 my settlement at Concord, in the house of Mr. Channing, just opposite
 Thoreau's, he made an evening call on me and my sister (April 11,
 1855), but I had already met him more than once at Mr. Emerson's, and
 was even beginning to take walks with him, as frequently happened in
 the next six years. In the following summer I began to dine daily at
 his mother's table, and thus saw him almost every day for three years.
 
 
 TO HARRISON BLAKE (AT WORCESTER).
 
      CONCORD, June 27, 1855.
 
 MR. BLAKE,--I have been sick and good for nothing but to lie on my
 back and wait for something to turn up, for two or three months. This
 has _compelled me_ to postpone several things, among them writing to
 you, to whom I am so deeply in debt, and inviting you and Brown to
 Concord,--not having brains adequate to such an exertion. I should
 feel a little less ashamed if I could give any name to my
 disorder,--but I cannot, and our doctor cannot help me to it,--and I
 will not take the name of any disease in vain. However, there is one
 consolation in being sick; and that is the possibility that you may
 recover to a better state than you were ever in before. I expected in
 the winter to be deep in the woods of Maine in my canoe, long before
 this; but I am so far from this that I can only take a languid walk in
 Concord streets.
 
 I do not know how the mistake arose about the Cape Cod excursion. The
 nearest I have come to that with anybody is this: About a month ago
 Channing proposed to me to go to Truro on Cape Cod with him, and board
 there a while,--but I declined. For a week past, however, I have been
 a little inclined to go there and sit on the seashore a week or more;
 but I do not venture to propose myself as the companion of him or of
 any peripatetic man. Not that I should not rejoice to have you and
 Brown or C. sitting there also. I am not sure that C. really wishes to
 go now; and as I go simply for the medicine of it, I should not think
 it worth the while to notify him when I am about to take my bitters.
 Since I began this, or within five minutes, I have begun to think that
 I will start for Truro next Saturday morning, the 30th. I do not know
 at what hour the packet leaves Boston, nor exactly what kind of
 accommodation I shall find at Truro.
 
 I should be singularly favored if you and Brown were there at the same
 time; and though you speak of the 20th of July, I will be so bold as
 to suggest your coming to Concord Friday night (when, by the way,
 Garrison and Phillips hold forth here), and going to the Cape with me.
 Though we take short walks together there, we can have _long_ talks,
 and you and Brown will have time enough for your own excursions
 besides.
 
 I received a letter from Cholmondeley last winter, which I should like
 to show you, as well as his book.[59] He said that he had "accepted
 the offer of a captaincy in the Salop Militia," and was hoping to take
 an active part in the war before long.
 
 I thank you again and again for the encouragement your letters are to
 me. But I must stop this writing, or I shall have to pay for it.
 
 
      NORTH TRURO, July 8, 1855.
 
 There being no packet, I did not leave Boston till last Thursday,
 though I came down on Wednesday, and Channing with me. There is no
 public house here; but we are boarding in a little house attached to
 the Highland Lighthouse with Mr. James Small, the keeper. It is true
 the table is not so clean as could be desired, but I have found it
 much superior in that respect to a Provincetown hotel. They are what
 are called "good livers." Our host has another larger and very good
 house, within a quarter of a mile, unoccupied, where he says he can
 accommodate several more. He is a very good man to deal with,--has
 often been the representative of the town, and is perhaps the most
 intelligent man in it. I shall probably stay here as much as ten days
 longer. Board $3.50 per week. So you and Brown had better come down
 forthwith. You will find either the schooner Melrose or another, or
 both, leaving Commerce Street, or else T Wharf, at 9 A. M. (it
 commonly means 10), Tuesdays, Thursdays, and Saturdays,--if not other
 days. We left about 10 A. M., and reached Provincetown at 5 P. M.,--a
 very good run. A stage runs up the Cape every morning but Sunday,
 starting at 4 A. M., and reaches the post-office in North Truro,
 seven miles from Provincetown, and one from the lighthouse, about 6
 o'clock. If you arrive at P. before night, you can walk over, and
 leave your baggage to be sent. You can also come by cars from Boston
 to Yarmouth, and thence by stage forty miles more,--through every day,
 but it costs much more, and is not so pleasant. Come by all means, for
 it is the best place to see the ocean in the States.... I _hope_ I
 shall be worth meeting.
 
 
      July 14.
 
 You say that you hope I will excuse your frequent writing. I trust you
 will excuse my infrequent and curt writing until I am able to resume
 my old habits, which for three months I have been compelled to
 abandon. Methinks I am beginning to be better. I think to leave the
 Cape next Wednesday, and so shall not see you here; but I shall be
 glad to meet you in Concord, though I may not be able to go _before
 the mast_, in a boating excursion. This is an admirable place for
 coolness and sea-bathing and retirement. You must come prepared for
 cool weather and fogs.
 
 P. S.--There is no mail up till Monday morning.
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 During the spring and early summer of 1855, Thoreau was much occupied
 with his home duties, or was ill,--the earlier approaches of that
 disease of which he languished, taking medical advice in 1860-61. This
 must have prevented an earlier visit to Concord by his friend
 Ricketson than September, 1855, and I find no letters intervening,
 although there must have been one or two, to arrange the visit. He
 reached Concord about September 20, and found me living in the lower
 stories of Channing's house, while the owner chiefly occupied the
 attic, where, no doubt, as in the old Hunt house, Ricketson smoked
 with him. They went together to call on Edmund Hosmer, and it was at
 the sight of this old house that Ricketson formed the plan of
 occupying a chamber there. It stood a half-mile down the river, a
 little below where the Assabet runs into the main channel. Writing to
 Thoreau, Sunday, September 23, Ricketson said:--
 
 "How charmingly you, Channing, and I dovetailed together! Few men
 smoke such pipes as we did,--the real Calumet; the tobacco that we
 smoked was free labor produce. I haven't lost sight of Solon Hosmer,
 the wisest-looking man in Concord, and a real _feelosofer_. I want you
 to see him, and tell him not to take down the old house where the
 _feelosofers_ met. I think I should like to have the large chamber
 for an occasional sojourn in Concord. It can be easily tinkered up so
 as to be a comfortable roost for a _feelosofer_,--a few old chairs, a
 table, bed, etc., would be all-sufficient; then you and Channing could
 come over in your punt and rusticate."
 
 The "punt" was Thoreau's boat, in which he sometimes set up a small
 mast and sail, and which he kept at the foot of Channing's garden,
 where, that summer, my heavy four-oared boat also lay, when my pupils
 were not rowing in it. In his letter to Blake of September 26, Thoreau
 described Ricketson, and the next day he answered Ricketson's letter.
 Cholmondeley in the meantime, the war being not yet over, was making
 his way to the Crimea through southern Europe.
 
 
 TO HARRISON BLAKE (AT WORCESTER).
 
      CONCORD, September 26, 1855.
 
 MR. BLAKE,--The other day I thought that my health must be
 better,--that I gave at last a sign of vitality,--because I
 experienced a slight chagrin. But I do not see how strength is to be
 got into my legs again. These months of feebleness have yielded few,
 if any, thoughts, though they have not passed without serenity, such
 as our sluggish Musketaquid suggests. I hope that the harvest is to
 come. I trust that you have at least warped up the stream a little
 daily, holding fast by your anchors at night, since I saw you, and
 have kept my place for me while I have been absent.
 
 Mr. Ricketson of New Bedford has just made me a visit of a day and a
 half, and I have had a quite good time with him. He and Channing have
 got on particularly well together. He is a man of very simple tastes,
 notwithstanding his wealth; a lover of nature; but, above all,
 singularly frank and plain-spoken. I think that you might enjoy
 meeting him.
 
 Sincerity is a great but rare virtue, and we pardon to it much
 complaining, and the betrayal of many weaknesses. R. says of himself,
 that he sometimes thinks that he has all the infirmities of genius
 without the genius; is wretched without a hair pillow, etc.; expresses
 a great and awful uncertainty with regard to "God," "Death," his
 "immortality;" says, "If I only knew," etc. He loves Cowper's "Task"
 better than anything else; and thereafter perhaps, Thomson, Gray, and
 even Howitt. He has evidently suffered for want of sympathizing
 companions. He says that he sympathizes with much in my books, but
 much in them is naught to him,--"namby-pamby,"--"stuff,"--"mystical."
 Why will not I, having common sense, write in plain English always;
 _teach_ men in detail how to live a simpler life, etc.; not go off
 into ----? But I say that I have no scheme about it,--no designs on
 men at all; and, if I had, my mode would be to tempt them with the
 fruit, and not with the manure. To what end do I lead a simple life at
 all, pray? That I may teach others to simplify their lives?--and so
 all our lives be _simplified_ merely, like an algebraic formula? Or
 not, rather, that I may make use of the ground I have cleared, to live
 more worthily and profitably? I would fain lay the most stress forever
 on that which is the most important,--imports the most to me,--though
 it were only (what it is likely to be) a vibration in the air. As a
 preacher, I should be prompted to tell men, not so much how to get
 their wheat bread cheaper, as of the bread of life compared with which
 _that_ is bran. Let a man only taste these loaves, and he becomes a
 skillful economist at once. He'll not waste much time in earning
 those. Don't spend your time in drilling soldiers, who may turn out
 hirelings after all, but give to undrilled peasantry a _country_ to
 fight for. The schools begin with what they call the elements, and
 where do they end?
 
 I was glad to hear the other day that Higginson and ---- were gone to
 Ktaadn; it must be so much better to go to than a Woman's Rights or
 Abolition Convention; better still, to the delectable primitive mounts
 within you, which you have dreamed of from your youth up, and seen,
 perhaps, in the horizon, but never climbed.
 
 But how do _you_ do? Is the air sweet to you? Do you find anything at
 which you can work, accomplishing something solid from day to day?
 Have you put sloth and doubt behind, considerably?--had one redeeming
 dream this summer? I dreamed, last night, that I could vault over any
 height it pleased me. That was _something_; and I contemplated myself
 with a slight satisfaction in the morning for it.
 
 Methinks I will write to you. Methinks you will be glad to hear. We
 will stand on solid foundations to one another,--I a column planted on
 this shore, you on that. We meet the same sun in his rising. We were
 built slowly, and have come to our bearing. We will not mutually fall
 over that we may meet, but will grandly and eternally guard the
 straits. Methinks I see an inscription on you, which the architect
 made, the stucco being worn off to it. The name of that ambitious
 worldly king is crumbling away. I see it toward sunset in favorable
 lights. Each must read for the other, as might a sailer-by. Be sure
 you are star-y-pointing still. How is it on your side? I will not
 require an answer until you think I have paid my debts to you.
 
 I have just got a letter from Ricketson, urging me to come to New
 Bedford, which possibly I may do. He says I can wear my old clothes
 there.
 
 Let me be remembered in your quiet house.
 
 
 TO DANIEL RICKETSON (AT NEW BEDFORD).
 
      CONCORD, September 27, 1855.
 
 FRIEND RICKETSON,--I am sorry that you were obliged to leave Concord
 without seeing more of it,--its river and woods, and various pleasant
 walks, and its worthies. I assure you that I am none the worse for my
 walk with you, but on all accounts the better. Methinks I am regaining
 my health; but I would like to know first what it was that ailed me.
 
 I have not yet conveyed your message to Mr. Hosmer,[60] but will not
 fail to do so. That idea of occupying the old house is a good
 one,--quite feasible,--and you could bring your hair pillow with you.
 It is an _inn_ in Concord which I had not thought of,--a philosopher's
 inn. That large chamber might make a man's idea expand proportionately.
 It would be well to have an interest in some old chamber in a deserted
 house in every part of the country which attracted us. There would be
 no such place to receive one's guests as that. If old furniture is
 fashionable, why not go the whole house at once? I shall endeavor to
 make Mr. Hosmer believe that the old house is the chief attraction of
 his farm, and that it is his duty to preserve it by all honest
 appliances. You might take a lease of it _in perpetuo_, and done with
 it.
 
 I am so wedded to my way of spending a day,--require such broad
 margins of leisure, and such a complete wardrobe of old clothes,--that
 I am ill fitted for going abroad. Pleasant is it sometimes to sit at
 home, on a single egg all day, in your own nest, though it may prove
 at last to be an egg of chalk. The old coat that I wear is Concord; it
 is my morning robe and study gown, my working dress and suit of
 ceremony, and my nightgown after all. Cleave to the simplest ever.
 Home,--home,--home. _Cars_ sound like _cares_ to me.
 
 I am accustomed to think very long of going anywhere,--am slow to
 move. I hope to hear a response of the oracle first. However, I think
 that I will try the effect of your talisman on the iron horse next
 Saturday, and dismount at Tarkiln Hill. Perhaps your sea air will be
 good for me. I conveyed your invitation to Channing, but he apparently
 will not come.
 
 Excuse my not writing earlier; but I had not decided.
 
 
 TO DANIEL RICKETSON (AT NEW BEDFORD).
 
      CONCORD, October 12, 1855.
 
 MR. RICKETSON,--I fear that you had a lonely and disagreeable ride
 back to New Bedford through the Carver woods and so on,--perhaps in
 the rain, too, and I am in part answerable for it. I feel very much in
 debt to you and your family for the pleasant days I spent at
 Brooklawn. Tell Arthur and Walton[61] that the shells which they gave
 me are spread out, and make quite a show to inland eyes. Methinks I
 still hear the strains of the piano, the violin, and the flageolet
 blended together. Excuse _me_ for the noise which I believe drove you
 to take refuge in the shanty. That shanty is indeed a favorable place
 to expand in, which I fear I did not enough improve.
 
 On my way through Boston I inquired for Gilpin's works at Little,
 Brown & Co.'s, Munroe's, Ticknor's, and Burnham's. They have not got
 them. They told me at Little, Brown & Co.'s that his works (not
 complete), in twelve vols., 8vo, were imported and sold in this
 country five or six years ago for about fifteen dollars. Their terms
 for importing are ten per cent on the cost. I copied from the "London
 Catalogue of Books, 1846-51," at their shop, the following list of
 Gilpin's Works:--
 
   Gilpin (Wm.), Dialogues on Various Subjects. 8vo. 9_s._      Cadell.
 
   ---- Essays on Picturesque Subjects. 8vo. 15_s._             Cadell.
 
   ---- Exposition of the New Testament. 2 vols. 8vo. 16_s._   Longman.
 
   ---- Forest Scenery, by Sir T. D. Lauder. 2 vols. 8vo. 18_s._
                                                             Smith & E.
 
   ---- Lectures on the Catechism. 12mo. 3_s._ 6_d._           Longman.
 
   ---- Lives of the Reformers. 2 vols. 12mo. 8_s._          Rivington.
 
   ---- Sermons Illustrative and Practical. 8vo. 12_s._       Hatchard.
 
   ---- Sermons to Country Congregations. 4 vols. 8vo. 1 16_s._
                                                               Longman.
 
   ---- Tour in Cambridge, Norfolk, etc. 8vo. 18_s._            Cadell.
 
   ---- Tour of the River Wye. 12mo. 4s. With plates. 8vo. 17_s._
                                                                Cadell.
 
   Gilpin (W. S. (?)), Hints on Landscape Gardening. Royal 8vo. 1.
                                                                Cadell.
 
 Beside these, I remember to have read one volume on "Prints;" his
 "Southern Tour" (1775); "Lakes of Cumberland," two vols.; "Highlands
 of Scotland and West of England," two vols.--_N. B._ There _must_ be
 plates in every volume.
 
 I still see an image of those Middleborough ponds in my mind's eye, broad
 shallow lakes, with an iron mine at the bottom,--comparatively unvexed
 by sails,--only by Tom Smith and his squaw Sepit's "sharper." I find
 my map of the State to be the best I have seen of that district. It is
 a question whether the islands of Long Pond or Great Quitticus offer
 the greatest attractions to a Lord of the Isles. That plant which I
 found on the shore of Long Pond chances to be a rare and beautiful
 flower,--the _Sabbatia chloroides_,--referred to Plymouth.
 
 In a Description of Middleborough in the Hist. Coll., vol. iii, 1810,
 signed Nehemiah Bennet, Middleborough, 1793, it is said: "There is on
 the easterly shore of Assawampsitt Pond, on the shore of Betty's Neck,
 two rocks which have curious marks thereon (supposed to be done by the
 Indians), which appear like the steppings of a person with naked feet
 which settled into the rocks; likewise the prints of a hand on several
 places, with a number of other marks; also there is a rock on a high
 hill a little to the eastward of the old stone fishing wear, where
 there is the print of a person's hand in said rock."
 
 It would be well to look at those rocks again more carefully; also at
 the rock on the hill.
 
 I should think that you would like to explore Snipatuit Pond in
 Rochester,--it is so large and near. It is an interesting fact that
 the alewives used to ascend to it,--if they do not still,--both from
 Mattapoisett and through Great Quitticus.
 
 There will be no trouble about the chamber in the old house, though,
 as I told you, Mr. Hosmer _may_ expect some compensation for it. He
 says, "Give my respects to Mr. Ricketson, and tell him that I cannot
 be at a large expense to preserve an antiquity or curiosity. Nature
 must do its work." "But," says I, "he asks you only not to assist
 nature."
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 It was on October 1 that Thoreau made this visit to New Bedford,
 spending the best part of a week with his friends there. They sailed
 about the bay and visited the ponds in Middleborough, and on Saturday,
 October 6, he parted with Ricketson at Plymouth, and returned home. At
 that time Ricketson proposed to return Thoreau's visit before October
 20, but, in a note now lost, Thoreau sent him word that Channing had
 left Concord, "perhaps for the winter." The visit was then given
 up,--which accounts for the tone of Thoreau's next letter, of October
 16.
 
 
 TO DANIEL RICKETSON (AT NEW BEDFORD).
 
      CONCORD, October 16, 1855.
 
 FRIEND RICKETSON,--I have got both your letters at once. You must not
 think Concord so barren a place when Channing[62] is away. There are
 the river and fields left yet; and I, though ordinarily a man of
 business, should have some afternoons and evenings to spend with you,
 I trust,--that is, if you could stand so much of me. If you can spend
 your time profitably here, or without _ennui_, having an occasional
 ramble or _tte--tte_ with one of the natives, it will give me
 pleasure to have you in the neighborhood. You see I am preparing you
 for our awful unsocial ways,--keeping in our dens a good part of the
 day,--sucking our claws perhaps. But then we make a religion of it,
 and that you cannot but respect.
 
 If you know the taste of your own heart, and like it, come to Concord,
 and I'll warrant you enough here to season the dish with,--aye, even
 though Channing and Emerson and I were all away. We might paddle
 quietly up the river. Then there are one or two more ponds to be seen,
 etc.
 
 I should very much enjoy further rambling with you in your vicinity,
 but must postpone it for the present. To tell the truth, I am planning
 to get seriously to work after these long months of inefficiency and
 idleness. I do not know whether you are haunted by any such demon
 which puts you on the alert to pluck the fruit of each day as it
 passes, and store it safely in your bin. True, it is well to live
 abandonedly from time to time; but to our working hours that must be
 as the spile to the bung. So for a long season I must enjoy only a low
 slanting gleam in my mind's eye from the Middleborough ponds far away.
 
 Methinks I am getting a little more strength into those knees of mine;
 and, for my part, I believe that God _does_ delight in the strength of
 a man's legs.
 
 
 TO HARRISON BLAKE (AT WORCESTER).
 
      CONCORD, December 9, 1855.
 
 MR. BLAKE,--Thank you! thank you for going a-wooding with me,--and
 enjoying it,--for being warmed by my wood fire. I have indeed enjoyed
 it much alone. I see how I might enjoy it yet more with company,--how
 we might help each other to live. And to be admitted to Nature's
 hearth costs nothing. None is excluded, but excludes himself. You have
 only to push aside the curtain.
 
 I am glad to hear that you were there too. There are many more such
 voyages, and longer ones, to be made on that river, for it is the water
 of life. The Ganges is nothing to it. Observe its reflections,--no
 idea but is familiar to it. That river, though to dull eyes it seems
 terrestrial wholly, flows through Elysium. What powers bathe in it
 invisible to villagers! Talk of its shallowness,--that hay-carts can
 be driven through it at midsummer; its depth passeth my understanding.
 If, forgetting the allurements of the world, I could drink deeply
 enough of it; if, cast adrift from the shore, I could with complete
 integrity float on it, I should never be seen on the Mill-Dam
 again.[63] If there is any depth in me, there is a corresponding depth
 in it. It is the cold blood of the gods. I paddle and bathe in their
 artery.
 
 I do not want a stick of wood for so trivial a use as to burn even,
 but they get it overnight, and carve and gild it that it may please my
 eye. What persevering lovers they are! What infinite pains to attract
 and delight us! They will supply us with fagots wrapped in the
 daintiest packages, and freight paid; sweet-scented woods, and
 bursting into flower, and resounding as if Orpheus had just left
 them,--these shall be our fuel, and we still prefer to chaffer with
 the wood-merchant!
 
 The jug we found still stands draining bottom up on the bank, on the
 sunny side of the house. That river,--who shall say exactly whence it
 came, and whither it goes? Does aught that flows come from a higher
 source? Many things drift downward on its surface which would enrich a
 man. If you could only be on the alert all day, and every day! And the
 nights are as long as the days.
 
 Do you not think you could contrive thus to get woody fibre enough to
 bake your wheaten bread with? Would you not perchance have tasted the
 sweet crust of another kind of bread in the meanwhile, which ever
 hangs ready baked on the bread-fruit trees of the world?
 
 Talk of burning your smoke after the wood has been consumed! There is
 a far more important and warming heat, commonly lost, which precedes
 the burning of the wood. It is the smoke of industry, which is
 incense. I had been so thoroughly warmed in body and spirit, that when
 at length my fuel was housed, I came near selling it to the ash-man,
 as if I had extracted all its heat.
 
 You should have been here to help me get in my boat. The last time I
 used it, November 27th, paddling up the Assabet, I saw a great round
 pine log sunk deep in the water, and with labor got it aboard. When I
 was floating this home so gently, it occurred to me why I had found
 it. It was to make wheels with to roll my boat into winter quarters
 upon. So I sawed off two thick rollers from one end, pierced them for
 wheels, and then of a joist which I had found drifting on the river in
 the summer I made an axletree, and on this I rolled my boat out.
 
 Miss Mary Emerson[64] is here,--the youngest person in Concord, though
 about eighty,--and the most apprehensive of a genuine thought; earnest
 to know of your inner life; most stimulating society; and exceedingly
 witty withal. She says they called her old when she was young, and she
 has never grown any older. I wish you could see her.
 
 My books[65] did not arrive till November 30th, the cargo of the Asia
 having been complete when they reached Liverpool. I have arranged them
 in a case which I made in the meanwhile, partly of river boards. I
 have not dipped far into the new ones yet. One is splendidly bound and
 illuminated. They are in English, French, Latin, Greek, and Sanscrit.
 I have not made out the significance of this godsend yet.
 
 Farewell, and bright dreams to you!
 
 
 TO DANIEL RICKETSON (AT NEW BEDFORD).
 
      CONCORD, December 25, 1855.
 
 FRIEND RICKETSON,--Though you have not shown your face here, I trust
 that you did not interpret my last note to my disadvantage. I remember
 that, among other things, I wished to break it to you, that, owing to
 engagements, I should not be able to show you so much attention as I
 could wish, or as you had shown to me. How we did scour over the
 country! I hope your horse will live as long as one which I hear just
 died in the south of France at the age of forty. Yet I had no doubt
 you would get quite enough of me. Do not give it up so easily. The old
 house is still empty, and Hosmer is easy to treat with.
 
 Channing was here about ten days ago. I told him of my visit to you,
 and that he too must go and see you and your country.[66] This may
 have suggested his writing to you.
 
 That island lodge, especially for some weeks in a summer, and new
 explorations in your vicinity, are certainly very alluring; but _such
 are my engagements to myself_, that I dare not promise to wend your
 way, but will for the present only heartily thank you for your kind
 and generous offer. When my vacation comes, then look out.
 
 My legs have grown considerably stronger, and that is all that ails
 me.
 
 But I wish now above all to inform you,--though I suppose you will not
 be particularly interested,--that Cholmondeley has gone to the Crimea,
 "a complete soldier," with a design, when he returns, if he ever
 returns, to buy a cottage in the South of England, and tempt me over;
 but that, before going, he busied himself in buying, and has caused to
 be forwarded to me by Chapman, a royal gift, in the shape of
 twenty-one distinct works (one in nine volumes,--forty-four volumes in
 all), almost exclusively relating to ancient Hindoo literature, and
 scarcely one of them to be bought in America.[67] I am familiar with
 many of them, and know how to prize them. I send you information of
 this as I might of the birth of a child.
 
 Please remember me to all your family.
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 On the date of Thoreau's letter of December 25, 1855, another event
 occurred, of some note in these annals of friendship. Channing, from
 his Dorchester abode, suddenly showed himself at Ricketson's door. "I
 had just written his name when old Ranger announced him.... He arrived
 on Christmas day" (as Thoreau had done the year before) "and his first
 salutation on meeting me at the front door of my house was, 'That's
 your shanty,' pointing towards it. He is engaged with the editor of
 the N. B. _Mercury_, and boards in town, but whereabout I have not yet
 [February 26, 1856] discovered. He usually spends Saturday and a part
 of Sunday with me." In replying to this information, Thoreau gives
 that admirable character of his poet neighbor which has often been
 quoted.
 
 
 TO DANIEL RICKETSON (AT NEW BEDFORD).
 
      CONCORD, March 5, 1856.
 
 FRIEND RICKETSON,--I have been out of town, else I should have
 acknowledged your letter before. Though not in the best mood for
 writing, I will say what I can now. You plainly have a rare, though a
 cheap, resource in your shanty. Perhaps the time will come when every
 country-seat will have one,--when every country-seat will _be one_. I
 would advise you to see that shanty business out, though you go
 shanty-mad. Work your vein till it is exhausted, or conducts you to a
 broader one; so that Channing shall stand before your shanty, and say,
 "That is your house."
 
 This has indeed been a grand winter for me, and for all of us. I am
 not considering how much I have enjoyed it. What matters it how happy
 or unhappy we have been, if we have minded our business and advanced
 our affairs? I have made it a part of my business to wade in the snow
 and take the measure of the ice. The ice on one of our ponds was just
 two feet thick on the first of March; and I have to-day been surveying
 a wood-lot, where I sank about two feet at every step.
 
 It is high time that you, fanned by the warm breezes of the Gulf
 Stream, had begun to "_lay_" for even the Concord hens have, though
 one wonders where they find the raw material of egg-shell here. Beware
 how you put off your laying to any later spring, else your cackling
 will not have the inspiring early spring sound.
 
 I was surprised to hear the other day that Channing was in New
 Bedford. When he was here last (in December, I think), he said, like
 himself, in answer to my inquiry where he lived, "that he did not know
 the name of the place;" so it has remained in a degree of obscurity to
 me. As you have made it certain to me that he is in New Bedford,
 perhaps I can return the favor by putting you on the track to his
 boarding-house there. Mrs. Arnold told Mrs. Emerson where it was; and
 the latter thinks, though she may be mistaken, that it was at a Mrs.
 Lindsay's.
 
 I am rejoiced to hear that you are getting on so bravely with him and
 his verses. He and I, as you know, have been old cronies,[68]--
 
      "Fed the same flock, by fountain, shade, and rill,
      Together both, ere the high lawns appeared
      Under the opening eyelids of the morn,
      We drove afield, and both together heared," etc.
 
 "But O, the heavy change," now he is gone. The Channing you have seen
 and described is the real Simon Pure. You have seen him. Many a good
 ramble may you have together! You will see in him still more of the
 same kind to attract and to puzzle you. How to serve him most
 effectually has long been a problem with his friends. Perhaps it is
 left for you to solve it. I suspect that the most that you or any one
 can do for him is to appreciate his genius,--to buy and read, and
 cause others to buy and read, his poems. That is the hand which he has
 put forth to the world,--take hold of that. Review them if you
 can,--perhaps take the risk of publishing something more which he may
 write. Your knowledge of Cowper will help you to know Channing. He
 will accept sympathy and aid, but he will not bear questioning, unless
 the aspects of the sky are particularly auspicious. He will ever be
 "reserved and enigmatic," and you must deal with him at arm's length.
 
 I have no secrets to tell you concerning him, and do not wish to call
 obvious excellences and defects by far-fetched names. I think I have
 already spoken to you more, and more to the purpose, on this theme,
 than I am likely to write now; nor need I suggest how witty and poetic
 he is, and what an inexhaustible fund of good fellowship you will find
 in him.
 
 As for visiting you in April, though I am inclined enough to take some
 more rambles in your neighborhood, especially by the seaside, I dare
 not engage myself, nor allow you to expect me. The truth is, I have my
 enterprises now as ever, at which I tug with ridiculous feebleness,
 but admirable perseverance, and cannot say when I shall be
 sufficiently fancy-free for such an excursion.
 
 You have done well to write a lecture on Cowper. In the expectation of
 getting you to read it here, I applied to the curators of our
 Lyceum;[69] but, alas, our Lyceum has been a failure this winter for
 want of funds. It ceased some weeks since, with a debt, they tell me,
 to be carried over to the next year's account. Only one more lecture
 is to be read by a Signor Somebody, an Italian, paid for by private
 subscription, as a deed of charity to the lecturer. They are not rich
 enough to offer you your expenses even, though probably a month or two
 ago they would have been glad of the chance.
 
 However, the old house has not failed yet. That offers you lodging for
 an indefinite time after you get into it; and in the meanwhile I offer
 you bed and board in my father's house,--always excepting hair pillows
 and new-fangled bedding.
 
 Remember me to your family.
 
 
 TO HARRISON BLAKE (AT WORCESTER).
 
      CONCORD, March 13, 1856.
 
 MR. BLAKE,--It is high time I sent you a word. I have not heard from
 Harrisburg since offering to go there, and have not been invited to
 lecture anywhere else the past winter. So you see I am fast growing
 rich. This is quite right, for such is my relation to the
 lecture-goers, I should be surprised and alarmed if there were any
 great call for me. I confess that I am considerably alarmed even when
 I hear that an individual wishes to meet me, for my experience teaches
 me that we shall thus only be made certain of a mutual strangeness,
 which otherwise we might never have been aware of.
 
 I have not yet recovered strength enough for such a walk as you
 propose, though pretty well again for circumscribed rambles and
 chamber work. Even now, I am probably the greatest walker in
 Concord,--to its disgrace be it said. I remember our walks and talks
 and sailing in the past with great satisfaction, and trust that we
 shall have more of them ere long,--have more woodings-up,--for even in
 the spring we must still seek "fuel to maintain our fires."
 
 As you suggest, we would fain value one another for what we are
 absolutely, rather than relatively. How will this do for a symbol of
 sympathy?
 
                   / *  *  *  * \
                  /   *  *  *    \
                 /      *  *      \
                A                  B
 
 As for compliments, even the stars praise me, and I praise them. They
 and I sometimes belong to a mutual admiration society. Is it not so
 with you? I know you of old. Are you not tough and earnest to be
 talked at, praised, or blamed? Must _you_ go out of the room because
 you are the subject of conversation? Where will you go to, pray? Shall
 we look into the "Letter Writer" to see what compliments are
 admissible? I am not afraid of praise, for I have practiced it on
 myself. As for my deserts, I never took an account of that stock, and
 in this connection care not whether I am deserving or not. When I hear
 praise coming, do I not elevate and arch myself to hear it like the
 sky, and as impersonally? Think I appropriate any of it to my weak
 legs? No. Praise away _till all is blue_.
 
 I see by the newspapers that the season for making sugar is at hand.
 Now is the time, whether you be rock, or white maple, or hickory. I
 trust that you have prepared a store of sap-tubs and sumach spouts,
 and invested largely in kettles. Early the first frosty morning, tap
 your maples,--the sap will not run in summer, you know. It matters not
 how little juice you get, if you get all you can, and boil it down. I
 made just one crystal of sugar once, one twentieth of an inch cube,
 out of a pumpkin, and it sufficed. Though the yield be no greater than
 that, this is not less the season for it, and it will be not the less
 sweet, nay, it will be infinitely the sweeter.
 
 Shall, then, the maple yield sugar, and not man? Shall the farmer be
 thus active, and surely have so much sugar to show for it, before this
 very March is gone,--while I read the newspaper? While he works in his
 sugar-camp let me work in mine,--for sweetness is in me, and to sugar
 it shall come,--it shall not all go to leaves and wood. Am I not a
 _sugar maple_ man, then? Boil down the sweet sap which the spring
 causes to flow within you. Stop not at syrup,--go on to sugar, though
 you present the world with but a single crystal,--a crystal not made
 from trees in your yard, but from the new life that stirs in your
 pores. Cheerfully skim your kettle, and watch it set and crystallize,
 making a holiday of it if you will. Heaven will be propitious to you
 as to him.
 
 Say to the farmer: There is your crop; here is mine. Mine is a sugar
 to sweeten sugar with. If you will listen to me, I will sweeten your
 whole load,--your whole life.
 
 Then will the callers ask, Where is Blake? He is in his sugar-camp on
 the mountainside. Let the world await him. Then will the little boys
 bless you, and the great boys too, for such sugar is the origin of
 many condiments,--Blakians in the shops of Worcester, of new form,
 with their mottoes wrapped up in them. Shall men taste only the
 sweetness of the maple and the cane the coming year?
 
 A walk over the crust to Asnebumskit, standing there in its inviting
 simplicity, is tempting to think of,--making a fire on the snow under
 some rock! The very poverty of outward nature implies an inward wealth
 in the walker. What a Golconda is he conversant with, thawing his
 fingers over such a blaze! But--but--
 
 Have you read the new poem, "The Angel in the House"? Perhaps you will
 find it good for you.
 
 
 TO HARRISON BLAKE (AT WORCESTER).
 
      CONCORD, May 21, 1856.
 
 MR. BLAKE,--I have not for a long time been _putting such thoughts
 together_ as I should like to read to the company you speak of. I have
 enough of that sort to say, or even read, but not time now to arrange
 it. Something I have prepared might prove for their entertainment or
 refreshment perchance; but I would not like to have a hat carried
 round for it. I have just been reading some papers to see if they
 would do for your company; but though I thought pretty well of them as
 long as I read them to myself, when I got an auditor to try them on, I
 felt that they would not answer. How could I let you drum up a company
 to hear them? In fine, what I have is either too scattered or loosely
 arranged, or too light, or else is too scientific and matter-of-fact
 (I run a good deal into that of late) for so hungry a company.
 
 I am still a learner, not a teacher, feeding somewhat omnivorously,
 browsing both stalk and leaves; but I shall perhaps be enabled to
 speak with the more precision and authority by and by,--if philosophy
 and sentiment are not buried under a multitude of details.
 
 I do not refuse, but accept your invitation, only changing the time. I
 consider myself invited to Worcester once for all, and many thanks to
 the inviter. As for the Harvard excursion,[70] will you let me suggest
 another? Do you and Brown come to Concord on Saturday, if the weather
 promises well, and spend the Sunday here on the river or hills, or
 both. So we shall save some of our money (which is of next importance
 to our souls), and lose--I do not know what. You say you _talked_ of
 coming here before; now _do_ it. I do not propose this because I think
 that I am worth your spending time with, but because I hope that we
 may prove flint and steel to one another. It is at most only an hour's
 ride farther, and you can at any rate do what you please when you get
 here.
 
 Then we will see if we have any apology to offer for our existence. So
 come to Concord,--come to Concord,--come to Concord! or--your suit
 shall be defaulted.
 
 As for the dispute about solitude and society, any comparison is
 impertinent. It is an idling down on the plane at the base of a
 mountain, instead of climbing steadily to its top. Of course you will
 be glad of all the society you can get to go up with. Will you go to
 glory with me? is the burden of the song. I love society so much that
 I swallowed it all at a gulp,--that is, all that came in my way. It is
 not that we love to be alone, but that we love to soar, and when we do
 soar, the company grows thinner and thinner till there is none at all.
 It is either the _Tribune_[71] on the plain, a sermon on the mount, or
 a very private ecstasy still higher up. We are not the less to aim at
 the summits, though the multitude does not ascend them. Use all the
 society that will abet you. But perhaps I do not enter into the spirit
 of your talk.
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 In the spring of 1856, Mr. Alcott, then living in Walpole, N. H.,
 visited Concord, and while there suggested to Thoreau that the upper
 valley of the Connecticut, in which Walpole lies, was good
 walking-ground, and that he would be glad to see him there. When
 autumn began to hover in the distance, Thoreau recalled this
 invitation, and sent the letter below.
 
 
 TO BRONSON ALCOTT (AT WALPOLE, N. H.).
 
      CONCORD, SEPTEMBER 1, 1856.
 
 MR. ALCOTT,--I remember that, in the spring, you invited me to visit
 you. I feel inclined to spend a day or two with you and on your hills
 at this season, returning, perhaps, by way of Brattleboro. What if I
 should take the cars for Walpole next Friday morning? Are you at home?
 And will it be convenient and agreeable to you to see me then? I will
 await an answer.
 
 I am but poor company, and it will not be worth the while to put
 yourself out on my account; yet from time to time I have some thoughts
 which would be the better for an airing. I also wish to get some hints
 from September on the Connecticut to help me understand that season on
 the Concord; to snuff the musty fragrance of the decaying year in the
 primitive woods. There is considerable cellar-room in my nature for
 such stores; a whole row of bins waiting to be filled, before I can
 celebrate my Thanksgiving. Mould is the richest of soils, yet _I_ am
 not mould. It will always be found that one flourishing institution
 exists and battens on another mouldering one. The Present itself is
 parasitic to this extent.
 
      Your fellow-traveler,
      HENRY D. THOREAU.
 
 As fortune would have it, Mr. Alcott was then making his arrangements
 for a conversational tour in the vicinity of New York; but he renewed
 the invitation for himself, while repeating it in the name of Mrs.
 Alcott and his daughters. Thoreau made the visit, I believe, and some
 weeks later, at the suggestion of Mr. Alcott, he was asked by Marcus
 Spring of New York to give lectures and survey their estate for a
 community at Perth Amboy, N. J., in which Mr. Spring and his friends,
 the Birneys, Welds, Grimks, etc., had united for social and
 educational purposes. It was a colony of radical opinions and
 old-fashioned culture; the Grimks having been bred in Charleston, S.
 C., which they left by reason of their opposition to negro slavery,
 and the elder Birney having held slaves in Alabama until his
 conscience bade him emancipate them, after which he, too, could have
 no secure home among slaveholders. He was the first presidential
 candidate of the voting Abolitionists, as Lincoln was the last; and
 his friend, Theodore Weld, who married Miss Grimk, had been one of
 the early apostles of emancipation in Ohio. Their circle at Eagleswood
 appealed to Thoreau's sense of humor, and is described by him in a
 letter soon to be given.
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 In June, 1856, Thoreau made a long visit at Brooklawn. In August, Mr.
 Ricketson, who had proposed a summer visit to Concord, found himself
 prevented by feeble health, and received the two following letters
 from Thoreau:--
 
 
 TO DANIEL RICKETSON (AT NEW BEDFORD).
 
      CONCORD, September 2, 1856.
 
 FRIEND RICKETSON,--My father and mother regret that your indisposition
 is likely to prevent your coming to Concord at present. It is as well
 that you do not, if you depend on seeing me, for I expect to go to New
 Hampshire the latter part of the week. I shall be glad to see you
 afterward, if you are prepared for and can endure my unsocial habits.
 
 I would suggest that you have one or two of the teeth which you can
 best spare extracted at once, for the sake of your general, no less
 than particular health. This is the advice of one who has had quite
 his share of toothache in this world. I am a trifle stouter than when
 I saw you last, yet far, far short of my best estate.
 
 I thank you for two newspapers which you have sent me; am glad to see
 that you have studied out the history of the ponds, got the Indian
 names straightened,--which means made more crooked,--etc., etc. I
 remember them with great satisfaction. They are all the more
 interesting to me for the lean and sandy soil that surrounds them.
 Heaven is not one of your fertile Ohio bottoms, you may depend on it.
 Ah, the Middleborough ponds!--Great Platte lakes. Remember me to the
 perch in them. I trust that I may have some better craft than that
 oarless pumpkin-seed[72] the next time I navigate them.
 
 From the size of your family I infer that Mrs. Ricketson and your
 daughters have returned from Franconia. Please remember me to them,
 and also to Arthur and Walton; and tell the latter that if, in the
 course of his fishing, he should chance to come across the shell of a
 terrapin, and will save it for me, I shall be exceedingly obliged to
 him.
 
 Channing dropped in on us the other day, but soon dropped out again.
 
 
      CONCORD, September 23, 1856.
 
 FRIEND RICKETSON,--I have returned from New Hampshire, and find myself
 _in statu quo_. My journey proved one of business purely. As you
 suspected, I saw Alcott, and I spoke to him of you, and your good will
 toward him; so now you may consider yourself introduced. He would be
 glad to hear from you about a conversation in New Bedford. He was
 about setting out on a conversing tour to Fitchburg, Worcester, and,
 three or four weeks hence, Waterbury, Ct., New York, Newport (?) or
 Providence (?). You may be sure that you will not have occasion to
 repent of any exertions which you may make to secure an audience for
 him. I send you one of his programmes, lest he should not have done so
 himself.
 
 You propose to me teaching the following winter. I find that I cannot
 entertain the idea. It would require such a revolution of all my
 habits, I think, and would sap the very foundations of me. I am
 engaged to Concord and my own private pursuits by 10,000 ties, and it
 would be suicide to rend them. If I were weaker, and not somewhat
 stronger, physically, I should be more tempted. I am so busy that I
 cannot even think of visiting you. The days are not long enough, or I
 am not strong enough to do the work of the day, before bedtime.
 
 Excuse my paper. It chances to be the best I have.
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 In October, 1856, Mr. Spring, whom Mr. Alcott was then visiting, wrote
 to Thoreau inviting him to come to Eagleswood, give lectures, and
 survey two hundred acres of land belonging to the community, laying
 out streets and making a map of the proposed village. Thoreau accepted
 the proposal, and soon after wrote the following letter, which Miss
 Thoreau submitted to Mr. Emerson for publication, with other letters,
 in the volume of 1865; but he returned it, inscribed, "Not printable
 at present." The lapse of time has removed this objection.
 
 
 TO SOPHIA THOREAU.
 
      [Direct] EAGLESWOOD, PERTH AMBOY, N. J.,
      Saturday eve, November 1, 1856.
 
 DEAR SOPHIA,--I have hardly had time and repose enough to write to you
 before. I spent the afternoon of Friday (it seems some months ago) in
 Worcester, but failed to see [Harrison] Blake, he having "gone to the
 horse-race" in Boston; to atone for which I have just received a
 letter from him, asking me to stop at Worcester and lecture on my
 return. I called on [Theo.] Brown and [T. W.] Higginson; in the
 evening came by way of Norwich to New York in the steamer
 Commonwealth, and, though it was so windy inland, had a perfectly
 smooth passage, and about as good a sleep as usually at home. Reached
 New York about seven A. M., too late for the John Potter (there was n't
 any Jonas), so I spent the forenoon there, called on Greeley (who was
 not in), met [F. A. T.] Bellew in Broadway and walked into his
 workshop, read at the Astor Library, etc. I arrived here, about thirty
 miles from New York, about five P. M. Saturday, in company with Miss
 E. Peabody, who was returning in the same covered wagon from the
 Landing to Eagleswood, which last place she has just left for the
 winter.
 
 This is a queer place. There is one large long stone building, which
 cost some forty thousand dollars, in which I do not know exactly who
 or how many work (one or two familiar places and more familiar names
 have turned up), a few shops and offices, an old farmhouse, and Mr.
 Spring's perfectly private residence, within twenty rods of the main
 building. The city of Perth Amboy is about as big as Concord, and
 Eagleswood is one and a quarter miles southwest of it, on the Bay
 side. The central fact here is evidently Mr. [Theodore] Weld's school,
 recently established, around which various other things revolve.
 Saturday evening I went to the schoolroom, hall, or what not, to see
 the children and their teachers and patrons dance. Mr. Weld, a
 kind-looking man with a long white beard, danced with them, and Mr.
 [E. J.] Cutler, his assistant (lately from Cambridge, who is
 acquainted with Sanborn), Mr. Spring, and others. This Saturday
 evening dance is a regular thing, and it is thought something strange
 if you don't attend. They take it for granted that you want society!
 
 Sunday forenoon I attended a sort of Quaker meeting at the same place
 (the Quaker aspect and spirit prevail here,--Mrs. Spring says, "Does
 thee not?"), where it was expected that the Spirit would move me (I
 having been previously spoken to about it); and it, or something else,
 did,--an inch or so. I said just enough to set them a little by the
 ears and make it lively. I had excused myself by saying that I could
 not adapt myself to a particular audience; for all the speaking and
 lecturing here have reference to the children, who are far the greater
 part of the audience, and they are not so bright as New England
 children. Imagine them sitting close to the wall, all around a hall,
 with old Quaker-looking men and women here and there. There sat Mrs.
 Weld [Grimk] and her sister, two elderly gray-headed ladies, the
 former in extreme Bloomer costume, which was what you may call
 remarkable; Mr. Arnold Buffum, with broad face and a great white
 beard, looking like a pier-head made of the cork-tree with the bark
 on, as if he could buffet a considerable wave; James G. Birney,
 formerly candidate for the presidency, with another particularly white
 head and beard; Edward Palmer, the anti-money man (for whom
 communities were made), with his ample beard somewhat grayish. Some of
 them, I suspect, are very worthy people. Of course you are wondering
 to what extent all these make one family, and to what extent twenty.
 Mrs. Kirkland[73] (and this a name only to me) I saw. She has just
 bought a lot here. They all know more about your neighbors and
 acquaintances than you suspected.
 
 On Monday evening I read the moose story to the children, to their
 satisfaction. Ever since I have been constantly engaged in surveying
 Eagleswood,--through woods, salt marshes, and along the shore, dodging
 the tide, through bushes, mud, and beggar-ticks, having no time to
 look up or think where I am. (It takes ten or fifteen minutes before
 each meal to pick the beggar-ticks out of my clothes; burs and the
 rest are left, and rents mended at the first convenient opportunity.)
 I shall be engaged perhaps as much longer. Mr. Spring wants me to help
 him about setting out an orchard and vineyard, Mr. Birney asks me to
 survey a small piece for him, and Mr. Alcott, who has just come down
 here for the third Sunday, says that Greeley (I left my name for him)
 invites him and me to go to his home with him next Saturday morning
 and spend the Sunday.
 
 It seems a twelvemonth since I was not here, but I hope to get settled
 deep into my den again ere long. The hardest thing to find here is
 solitude--and Concord. I am at Mr. Spring's house. Both he and she and
 their family are quite agreeable.
 
 I want you to write to me immediately (just left off to talk French
 with the servant man), and let father and mother put in a word. To
 them and to Aunts, love from
 
      HENRY.
 
 The date of this visit to Eagleswood is worthy of note, because in
 that November Thoreau made the acquaintance of the late Walt Whitman,
 in whom he ever after took a deep interest. Accompanied by Mr. Alcott,
 he called on Whitman, then living at Brooklyn; and I remember the calm
 enthusiasm with which they both spoke of Whitman upon their return to
 Concord. "Three men," said Emerson, in his funeral eulogy of Thoreau,
 "have of late years strongly impressed Mr. Thoreau,--John Brown, his
 Indian guide in Maine, Joe Polis, and a third person, not known to
 this audience." This last was Whitman, who has since become well known
 to a larger audience.
 
 
 TO HARRISON BLAKE (AT WORCESTER).
 
      EAGLESWOOD, N. J., November 19, 1856.
 
 MR. BLAKE,--I have been here much longer than I expected, but have
 deferred answering you, because I could not foresee when I should
 return. I do not know yet within three or four days. This uncertainty
 makes it impossible for me to appoint a day to meet you, until it
 should be too late to hear from you again. I think, therefore, that I
 must go straight home. I feel some objection to reading that "What
 shall it profit" lecture again in Worcester; but if you are quite sure
 that it will be worth the while (it is a grave consideration), I will
 even make an independent journey from Concord for that purpose. I have
 read three of my old lectures (that included) to the Eagleswood
 people, and, unexpectedly, with rare success,--_i. e._, I was aware
 that what I was saying was silently taken in by their ears.
 
 You must excuse me if I write mainly a business letter now, for I am
 sold for the time,--am merely Thoreau the surveyor here,--and
 solitude is scarcely obtainable in these parts.
 
 Alcott has been here three times, and, Saturday before last, I went
 with him and Greeley, by invitation of the last, to G.'s farm,
 thirty-six miles north of New York. The next day A. and I heard
 Beecher preach; and what was more, we visited Whitman the next morning
 (A. had already seen him), and were much interested and provoked. He
 is apparently the greatest democrat the world has seen. Kings and
 aristocracy go by the board at once, as they have long deserved to. A
 remarkably strong though coarse nature, of a sweet disposition, and
 much prized by his friends. Though peculiar and rough in his exterior,
 his skin (all over (?)) red, he is essentially a gentleman. I am still
 somewhat in a quandary about him,--feel that he is essentially strange
 to me, at any rate; but I am surprised by the sight of him. He is very
 broad, but, as I have said, not fine. He said that I misapprehended
 him. I am not quite sure that I do. He told us that he loved to ride
 up and down Broadway all day on an omnibus, sitting beside the driver,
 listening to the roar of the carts, and sometimes gesticulating and
 declaiming Homer at the top of his voice. He has long been an editor
 and writer for the newspapers,--was editor of the _New Orleans
 Crescent_ once; but now has no employment but to read and write in the
 forenoon, and walk in the afternoon, like all the rest of the
 scribbling gentry.
 
 I shall probably be in Concord next week; so you can direct to me
 there.
 
 
 TO HARRISON BLAKE (AT WORCESTER).
 
      CONCORD, December 6, 1853.
 
 MR. BLAKE,--I trust that you got a note from me at Eagleswood, about a
 fortnight ago. I passed through Worcester on the morning of the 25th
 of November, and spent several hours (from 3.30 to 6.20) in the
 travelers' room at the depot, as in a dream, it now seems. As the
 first Harlem train unexpectedly connected with the first from
 Fitchburg, I did not spend the forenoon with you as I had anticipated,
 on account of baggage, etc. If it had been a seasonable hour, I should
 have seen you,--_i. e._, if you had not gone to a horse-race. But
 think of making a call at half past three in the morning! (would it
 not have implied a three-o'clock-in-the-morning courage in both you
 and me?) as it were, ignoring the fact that mankind are really not at
 home,--are not out, but so deeply in that they cannot be seen,--nearly
 half their hours at this season of the year.
 
 I walked up and down the main street, at half past five, in the dark,
 and paused long in front of Brown's store, trying to distinguish its
 features; considering whether I might safely leave his _Putnam_ in the
 door-handle, but concluded not to risk it. Meanwhile a watchman (?)
 seemed to be watching me, and I moved off. Took another turn around
 there, and had the very earliest offer of the _Transcript_[74] from an
 urchin behind, whom I actually could not see, it was so dark. So I
 withdrew, wondering if you and B. would know if I had been there. You
 little dream who is occupying Worcester when you are all asleep.
 Several things occurred there that night which I will venture to say
 were not put into the _Transcript_. A cat caught a mouse at the depot,
 and gave it to her kitten to play with. So that world-famous tragedy
 goes on by night as well as by day, and nature is _emphatically_
 wrong. Also I saw a young Irishman kneel before his mother, as if in
 prayer, while she wiped a cinder out of his eye with her tongue; and I
 found that it was never too late (or early?) to learn something. These
 things transpired while you and B. were, to all practical purposes,
 nowhere, and good for nothing,--not even for society,--not for
 horse-races,--nor the taking back of a _Putnam's Magazine_. It is
 true, I might have recalled you to life, but it would have been a
 cruel act, considering the kind of life you would have come back to.
 
 However, I would fain write to you now by broad daylight, and report
 to you some of my life, such as it is, and recall you to your life,
 which is not always lived by you, even by daylight. Blake! Brown! are
 you awake? are you aware what an ever-glorious morning this is,--what
 long-expected, never-to-be-repeated opportunity is now offered to get
 life and knowledge?
 
 For my part, I am trying to wake up,--to wring slumber out of my
 pores; for, generally, I take events as unconcernedly as a
 fence-post,--absorb wet and cold like it, and am pleasantly tickled
 with lichens slowly spreading over me. Could I not be content, then,
 to be a cedar post, which lasts twenty-five years? Would I not rather
 be that than the farmer that set it? or he that preaches to the
 farmer? and go to the heaven of posts at last? I think I should like
 that as well as any would like it. But I should not care if I sprouted
 into a living tree, put forth leaves and flowers, and bore fruit.
 
 I am grateful for what I am and have. My thanksgiving is perpetual. It
 is surprising how contented one can be with nothing definite,--only a
 sense of existence. Well, anything for variety. I am ready to try this
 for the next ten thousand years, and exhaust it. How sweet to think
 of! my extremities well charred, and my intellectual part too, so that
 there is no danger of worm or rot for a long while. My breath is sweet
 to me. O how I laugh when I think of my vague, indefinite riches. No
 run on my bank can drain it, for my wealth is not possession but
 enjoyment.
 
 What are all these years made for? and now another winter comes, so
 much like the last? Can't we satisfy the beggars once for all?
 
 Have you got in your wood for this winter? What else have you got in?
 Of what use a great fire on the hearth, and a confounded little fire
 in the heart? Are you prepared to make a decisive campaign,--to pay
 for your costly tuition,--to pay for the suns of past summers,--for
 happiness and unhappiness lavished upon you?
 
 Does not Time go by swifter than the swiftest equine trotter or
 racker?
 
 Stir up Brown. Remind him of his duties, which outrun the date and
 span of Worcester's years past and to come. Tell him to be sure that
 he is on the main street, however narrow it may be, and to have a lit
 sign, visible by night as well as by day.
 
 Are they not patient waiters,--they who wait for us? But even they
 shall not be losers.
 
 
      December 7.
 
 That Walt Whitman, of whom I wrote to you, is the most interesting
 fact to me at present. I have just read his second edition (which he
 gave me), and it has done me more good than any reading for a long
 time. Perhaps I remember best the poem of Walt Whitman, an American,
 and the Sun-Down Poem. There are two or three pieces in the book which
 are disagreeable, to say the least; simply sensual. He does not
 celebrate love at all. It is as if the beasts spoke. I think that men
 have not been ashamed of themselves without reason. No doubt there
 have always been dens where such deeds were unblushingly recited, and
 it is no merit to compete with their inhabitants. But even on this
 side he has spoken more truth than any American or modern that I know.
 I have found his poem exhilarating, encouraging. As for its
 sensuality,--and it may turn out to be less sensual than it
 appears,--I do not so much wish that those parts were not written, as
 that men and women were so pure that they could read them without
 harm, that is, without understanding them. One woman told me that no
 woman could read it,--as if a man could read what a woman could not.
 Of course Walt Whitman can communicate to us no experience, and if we
 are shocked, whose experience is it that we are reminded of?
 
 On the whole, it sounds to me very brave and American, after whatever
 deductions. I do not believe that all the sermons, so called, that
 have been preached in this land put together are equal to it for
 preaching.
 
 We ought to rejoice greatly in him. He occasionally suggests something
 a little more than human. You can't confound him with the other
 inhabitants of Brooklyn or New York. How they must shudder when they
 read him! He is awfully good.
 
 To be sure I sometimes feel a little imposed on. By his heartiness and
 broad generalities he puts me into a liberal frame of mind prepared to
 see wonders,--as it were, sets me upon a hill or in the midst of a
 plain,--stirs me well up, and then--throws in a thousand of brick.
 Though rude, and sometimes ineffectual, it is a great primitive
 poem,--an alarum or trumpet-note ringing through the American camp.
 Wonderfully like the Orientals, too, considering that when I asked him
 if he had read them, he answered, "No: tell me about them."
 
 I did not get far in conversation with him,--two more being
 present,--and among the few things which I chanced to say, I remember
 that one was, in answer to him as representing America, that I did not
 think much of America or of politics, and so on, which may have been
 somewhat of a damper to him.
 
 Since I have seen him, I find that I am not disturbed by any brag or
 egoism in his book. He may turn out the least of a braggart of all,
 having a better right to be confident.
 
 He is a great fellow.
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 There is in Alcott's diary an account of this interview with Whitman,
 and the Sunday morning in Ward Beecher's Brooklyn church, from which a
 few passages may be taken. Hardly any person met by either of these
 Concord friends in their later years made so deep an impression on
 both as did this then almost unknown poet and thinker, concerning whom
 Cholmondeley wrote to Thoreau in 1857: "Is there actually such a man
 as Whitman? Has any one seen or handled him? His is a tongue 'not
 understanded' of the English people. I find _the gentleman_ altogether
 left out of the book. It is the first book I have ever seen which I
 should call a 'new book.'"
 
 Mr. Alcott writes under date of November 7, 1856, in New York: "Henry
 Thoreau arrives from Eagleswood, and sees Swinton, a wise young
 Scotchman, and Walt Whitman's friend, at my room (15 Laight
 Street),--Thoreau declining to accompany me to Mrs. Botta's parlors,
 as invited by her. He sleeps here. (November 8.) We find Greeley at
 the Harlem station, and ride with him to his farm, where we pass the
 day, and return to sleep in the city,--Greeley coming in with us;
 Alice Cary, the authoress, accompanying us also. (Sunday, November 9.)
 We cross the ferry to Brooklyn, and hear Ward Beecher at the Plymouth
 Church. It was a spectacle,--and himself the preacher, if preacher
 there be anywhere now in pulpits. His auditors had to weep, had to
 laugh, under his potent magnetism, while his doctrine of justice to
 all men, bond and free, was grand. House, entries, aisles, galleries,
 all were crowded. Thoreau called it pagan, but I pronounced it good,
 very good,--the best I had witnessed for many a day, and hopeful for
 the coming time. At dinner at Mrs. Manning's. Miss M. S. was there,
 curious to see Thoreau. After dinner we called on Walt Whitman
 (Thoreau and I), but finding him out, we got all we could from his
 mother, a stately, sensible matron, believing absolutely in Walter,
 and telling us how good he was, and how wise when a boy; and how his
 four brothers and two sisters loved him, and still take counsel of the
 great man he has grown to be. We engaged to call again early in the
 morning, when she said Walt would be glad to see us. (Monday, 10th.)
 Mrs. Tyndale of Philadelphia goes with us to see Walt,--Walt the
 satyr, the Bacchus, the very god Pan. We sat with him for two hours,
 and much to our delight; he promising to call on us at the
 International at ten in the morning to-morrow, and there have the rest
 of it." Whitman failed to call at his hour the next day.
 
 
 TO B. B. WILEY (AT CHICAGO).
 
      CONCORD, December 12, 1856.
 
 MR. WILEY,[75]--It is refreshing to hear of your earnest purpose with
 respect to your culture, and I can send you no better wish than that
 you may not be thwarted by the cares and temptations of life. Depend
 on it, _now_ is the accepted time, and probably you will never find
 yourself better disposed or freer to attend to your culture than at
 this moment. When _They_ who inspire us with the idea are ready, shall
 not we be ready also?
 
 I do not remember anything which Confucius has said directly
 respecting man's "origin, purpose, and destiny." He was more practical
 than that. He is full of wisdom applied to human relations,--to the
 private life,--the family,--government, etc. It is remarkable that,
 according to his own account, the sum and substance of his teaching
 is, as you know, to do as you would be done by.
 
 He also said (I translate from the French), "Conduct yourself suitably
 towards the persons of your family, then you will be able to instruct
 and to direct a nation of men."
 
 "To nourish one's self with a little rice, to drink water, to have
 only his bended arm to support his head, is a state which has also its
 satisfaction. To be rich and honored by iniquitous means is for me as
 the floating cloud which passes."
 
 "As soon as a child is born he must respect its faculties: the
 knowledge which will come to it by and by does not resemble at all its
 present state. If it arrive at the age of forty or fifty years without
 having learned anything, it is no more worthy of any respect." This
 last, I think, will speak to your condition.
 
 But at this rate I might fill many letters.
 
 Our acquaintance with the ancient Hindoos is not at all personal. The
 full names that can be relied upon are very shadowy. It is, however,
 tangible works that we know. The best I think of are the Bhagvat Geeta
 (an episode in an ancient heroic poem called the Mahabarat), the
 Vedas, the Vishnu Purana, the Institutes of Menu, etc.
 
 I cannot say that Swedenborg has been directly and practically
 valuable to me, for I have not been a reader of him, except to a
 slight extent; but I have the highest regard for him, and trust that I
 shall read his works in some world or other. He had a wonderful
 knowledge of our interior and spiritual life, though his illuminations
 are occasionally blurred by trivialities. He comes nearer to
 answering, or attempting to answer, literally, your questions
 concerning man's origin, purpose, and destiny, than any of the
 worthies I have referred to. But I think that that is not _altogether_
 a recommendation; since such an answer to these questions cannot be
 discovered any more than perpetual motion, for which no reward is now
 offered. The noblest man it is, methinks, that knows, and by his life
 suggests, the most about these things. Crack away at these nuts,
 however, as long as you can,--the very exercise will ennoble you, and
 you may get something better than the answer you expect.
 
 
 TO B. B. WILEY (AT CHICAGO).
 
      CONCORD, April 26, 1857.
 
 MR. WILEY,--I see that you are turning a broad furrow among the books,
 but I trust that some very private journal all the while holds its own
 through their midst. Books can only reveal us to ourselves, and as
 often as they do us this service we lay them aside. I should say, read
 Goethe's autobiography, by all means, also Gibbon's, Haydon the
 painter's, and our Franklin's of course; perhaps also Alfieri's,
 Benvenuto Cellini's, and De Quincey's "Confessions of an
 Opium-Eater,"--since you like autobiography. I think you must read
 Coleridge again, and further, skipping all his theology, _i. e._, if
 you value precise definitions and a discriminating use of language. By
 the way, read De Quincey's Reminiscences of Coleridge and Wordsworth.
 
 How shall we account for our pursuits, if they are original? We get
 the language with which to describe our various lives out of a common
 mint. If others have their losses which they are busy repairing, so
 have I mine, and their hound and horse may _perhaps_ be the symbols of
 some of them.[76] But also I have lost, or am in danger of losing, a
 far finer and more ethereal treasure which commonly no loss, of which
 they are conscious, will symbolize. This I answer hastily and with
 some hesitation, according as I now understand my words....
 
 Methinks a certain polygamy with its troubles is the fate of almost
 all men. They are married to two wives: their genius (a celestial
 muse), and also to some fair daughter of the earth. Unless these two
 were fast friends before marriage, and so are afterward, there will be
 but little peace in the house.
 
 
 TO HARRISON BLAKE (AT WORCESTER).
 
      CONCORD, December 31, 1856.
 
 MR. BLAKE,--I think it will not be worth the while for me to come to
 Worcester to lecture at all this year. It will be better to wait till
 I am--perhaps unfortunately--more in that line. My writing has not
 taken the shape of lectures, and therefore I should be obliged to read
 one of three or four old lectures, the best of which I have read to
 some of your auditors before. I carried that one which I call
 "Walking, or the Wild," to Amherst, N. H., the evening of that cold
 Thursday,[77] and I am to read another at Fitchburg, February 3. I am
 simply their hired man. This will probably be the extent of my
 lecturing hereabouts.
 
 I must depend on meeting Mr. Wasson some other time.
 
 Perhaps it always costs me more than it comes to to lecture before a
 promiscuous audience. It is an irreparable injury done to my modesty
 even,--I become so indurated.
 
 O solitude! obscurity! meanness! I never triumph so as when I have the
 least success in my neighbor's eyes. The lecturer gets fifty dollars a
 night; but what becomes of his winter? What consolation will it be
 hereafter to have fifty thousand dollars for living in the world? I
 should like not to exchange _any_ of my life for money.
 
 These, you may think, are reasons for not lecturing, when you have no
 great opportunity. It is even so, perhaps. I could lecture on dry oak
 leaves; I could, but who could hear me? If I were to try it on any
 large audience, I fear it would be no gain to them, and a positive
 loss to me. I should have behaved rudely toward my rustling
 friends.[78]
 
 I am surveying, instead of lecturing, at present. Let me have a
 skimming from your "pan of unwrinkled cream."
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 The proposition about Mr. Alcott in Thoreau's letter of September 23,
 1856, to Mr. Ricketson took effect in the spring of 1857, and early in
 April he went to visit the Ricketsons in New Bedford, going down from
 Walpole, and there met his younger friends Channing and Thoreau.
 Anticipating Mr. Alcott's visit, Thoreau wrote thus:--
 
 
 TO DANIEL RICKETSON (AT NEW BEDFORD).
 
      CONCORD, March 28, 1857.
 
 FRIEND RICKETSON,--If it chances to be perfectly agreeable and
 convenient to you, I will make you a visit next week (say Wednesday or
 Thursday), and we will have some more rides to Assawampset and the
 seashore. Have you got a boat on the former yet? Who knows but we may
 camp out on the island? I propose this now, because it will be more
 novel to me at this season, and I should like to see your early birds,
 etc.
 
 Your historical papers have all come safely to hand, and I thank you
 for them. I see that they will be indispensable _mmoires pour
 servir_. By the way, have you read Church's "History of Philip's War,"
 and looked up the localities? It should make part of a chapter.
 
 I had a long letter from Cholmondeley lately, which I should like to
 show you,
 
 I will expect an answer to this straightway,--but be sure you let your
 own convenience and inclinations rule it. Please remember me to your
 family.
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 He was welcomed, of course, and went down April 2, as indicated in
 the letter of the day before. But he had not been informed that Alcott
 was already there, writing in his Diary of April 1, this sketch of
 Brooklawn and its occupants:--
 
 "A neat country residence, surrounded by wild pastures and low
 woods,--the little stream Acushnet flowing east of the house, and into
 Fairhaven Bay. The hamlet of Acushnet at the 'Head of the River' lies
 within half a mile of Ricketson's house. His tastes are pastoral,
 simple even to wildness; and he passes a good part of his day in the
 fields and woods,--or in his rude 'Shanty' near his house, where he
 writes and reads his favorite authors, Cowper having the first place.
 He is in easy circumstances, and has the manners of an English
 gentleman,--frank, hospitable, and with positive persuasions of his
 own; mercurial, perhaps, and wayward a little sometimes, but full of
 kindness and sensibility to suffering."
 
 
 TO DANIEL RICKETSON (AT NEW BEDFORD).
 
      CONCORD, April 1, 1857.
 
 DEAR RICKETSON,--I got your note of welcome night before last.
 Channing is not here; at least I have not seen nor heard of him, but
 depend on meeting him in New Bedford. I expect, if the weather is
 favorable, to take the 4.30 train from Boston to-morrow, Thursday, P.
 M., for I hear of no noon train, and shall be glad to find your wagon
 at Tarkiln Hill, for I see it will be rather late for going across
 lots.
 
 Alcott was here last week, and will probably visit New Bedford within
 a week or two.
 
 I have seen all the spring signs you mention, and a few more, even
 here. Nay, I heard one frog peep nearly a week ago,--methinks the very
 first one in all this region. I wish that there were a few more signs
 of spring in myself; however, I take it that there _are_ as many
 within us as we think we hear _without_ us. I am decent for a steady
 pace, but not yet for a race. I have a little cold at present, and you
 speak of rheumatism about the head and shoulders. Your frost is not
 quite out. I suppose that the earth itself has a little cold and
 rheumatism about these times; but all these things together produce a
 very fair general result. In a concert, you know, we must sing our
 parts feebly sometimes, that we may not injure the general effect. I
 should n't wonder if my two-year-old invalidity had been a positively
 charming feature to some amateurs favorably located. Why not a blasted
 man as well as a blasted tree, on your lawn?
 
 If you should happen not to see me by the train named, do not go
 again, but wait at home for me, or a note from
 
      Yours,
      HENRY D. THOREAU.
 
 On that Thursday, April 2, Alcott wrote in his Diary, "Henry Thoreau
 comes to tea, also Ellery Channing, and we talk till into the evening
 late." This visit of Thoreau was his longest, lasting until April 15,
 and it was during the fortnight that he sang "Tom Bowling" and danced
 with vigor in the Brooklawn drawing-room, a scene which Alcott loved
 to describe. Sophia Thoreau, writing in 1862, said: "I have so often
 witnessed the like that I can easily imagine how it was, and I
 remember that Henry gave me some account. I recollect he said that he
 did not scruple to tread on Mr. Alcott's toes."
 
 
 TO HARRISON BLAKE (AT WORCESTER).
 
      CONCORD, April 17, 1857.
 
 MR. BLAKE,--I returned from New Bedford night before last. I met
 Alcott there, and learned from him that probably you had gone to
 Concord. I am very sorry that I missed you. I had expected you
 earlier, and at last thought that I should get back before you came;
 but I ought to have notified you of my absence. However, it would have
 been too late, after I had made up my mind to go. I hope you lost
 nothing by going a little round.
 
 I took out the celtis seeds at your request, at the time we spoke of
 them, and left them in the chamber on some shelf or other. If you have
 found them, very well; if you have not found them, very well; but tell
 Hale[79] of it, if you see him. My mother says that you and Brown and
 Rogers and Wasson (titles left behind) talk of coming down on me some
 day. Do not fail to come, one and all, and within a week or two, if
 possible; else I may be gone again. Give me a short notice, and then
 come and spend a day on Concord River,--or say that you will come if
 it is fair, unless you are confident of bringing fair weather with
 you. Come and be Concord, as I have been Worcestered.
 
 Perhaps you came nearer to me for not finding me at home; for trains
 of thought the more connect when trains of cars do not. If I had
 actually met you, you would have gone again; but now I have not yet
 dismissed you. I hear what you say about personal relations with joy.
 It is as if you had said: "I value the best and finest part of you,
 and not the worst. I can even endure your very near and real approach,
 and prefer it to a shake of the hand." This intercourse is not subject
 to time or distance.
 
 I have a very long new and faithful letter from Cholmondeley which I
 wish to show you. He speaks of sending me more books!!
 
 If I were with you now, I could tell you much of Ricketson, and my
 visit to New Bedford; but I do not know how it will be by and by. I
 should like to have you meet R., who is the frankest man I know.
 Alcott and he get along very well together. Channing has returned to
 Concord with me,--probably for a short visit only.
 
 Consider this a business letter, which you know _counts_ nothing in
 the game we play. Remember me particularly to Brown.
 
 
 TO HARRISON BLAKE (AT WORCESTER).
 
      CONCORD, June 6, 1857, 3 P. M.
 
 MR. BLAKE,--I have just got your note, but I am sorry to say that I
 this very morning sent a note to Channing, stating that I would go
 with him to Cape Cod next week on an excursion which we have been
 talking of for some time. If there were time to communicate with you,
 I should ask you to come to Concord on Monday, before I go; but as it
 is, I must wait till I come back, which I think will be about ten days
 hence. I do not like this delay, but there seems to be a fate in it.
 Perhaps Mr. Wasson will be well enough to come by that time. I will
 notify you of my return, and shall depend on seeing you all.
 
 June 23d. I returned from Cape Cod last evening, and now take the
 first opportunity to invite you men of Worcester to this quiet
 _Mediterranean_ shore. Can you come this week on Friday, or next
 Monday? I mention the earliest days on which I suppose you can be
 ready. If more convenient, name some other time _within ten days_. I
 shall be rejoiced to see you, and to act the part of skipper in the
 contemplated voyage. I have just got another letter from Cholmondeley,
 which may interest you somewhat.
 
 
 TO MARSTON WATSON (AT PLYMOUTH).
 
      CONCORD, August 17, 1857.
 
 MR. WATSON,--I am much indebted to you for your glowing communication
 of July 20th. I had that very day left Concord for the wilds of Maine;
 but when I returned, August 8th, two out of the six worms remained
 nearly, if not quite, as bright as at first, I was assured. In their
 best estate they had excited the admiration of many of the inhabitants
 of Concord. It was a singular coincidence that I should find these
 worms awaiting me, for my mind was full of a phosphorescence which I
 had seen in the woods. I have waited to learn something more about
 them before acknowledging the receipt of them. I have frequently met
 with glow-worms in my night walks, but am not sure they were the same
 kind with these. Dr. Harris once described to me a larger kind than I
 had found, "nearly as big as your little finger;" but he does not name
 them in his report.
 
 The only authorities on Glow-worms which I chance to have (and I am
 pretty well provided) are Kirby and Spence (the fullest), Knapp
 ("Journal of a Naturalist"), "The Library of Entertaining Knowledge"
 (Rennie), a French work, etc., etc.; but there is no minute,
 scientific description of any of these. This is apparently a female of
 the genus _Lampyris_; but Kirby and Spence say that there are nearly
 two hundred species of this genus alone. The one commonly referred to
 by English writers is the _Lampyris noctiluca_; but judging from Kirby
 and Spence's description, and from the description and plate in the
 French work, this is not that one, for, besides other differences,
 both say that the light proceeds from the abdomen. Perhaps the worms
 exhibited by Durkee (whose statement to the Boston Society of Natural
 History, second July meeting, in the _Traveller_ of August 12, 1857, I
 send you) were the same with these. I do not see how they could be the
 _L. noctiluca_, as he states.
 
 I expect to go to Cambridge before long, and if I get any more light
 on this subject I will inform you. The two worms are still alive.
 
 I shall be glad to receive the drosera at any time, if you chance to
 come across it. I am looking over Loudon's "Arboretum," which we have
 added to our library, and it occurs to me that it was written
 expressly for you, and that you cannot avoid placing it on your own
 shelves.
 
 I should have been glad to see the whale, and might perhaps have done
 so, if I had not at that time been seeing "the elephant" (or moose) in
 the Maine woods. I have been associating for about a month with one
 Joseph Polis, the chief man of the Penobscot tribe of Indians, and
 have learned a great deal from him, which I should like to tell you
 some time.
 
 
 TO DANIEL RICKETSON (AT NEW BEDFORD).
 
      CONCORD, August 18, 1857.
 
 DEAR SIR,--Your Wilson Flagg[80] seems a serious person, and it is
 encouraging to hear of a contemporary who recognizes Nature so
 squarely, and selects such a theme as "Barns." (I would rather "Mount
 Auburn" were omitted.) But he is not alert enough. He wants stirring
 up with a pole. He should practice turning a series of somersets
 rapidly or jump up and see how many times he can strike his feet
 together before coming down. Let him make the earth turn round now the
 other way, and whet his wits on it, whichever way it goes, as on a
 grindstone; in short, see how many ideas he can entertain at once.
 
 His style, as I remember, is singularly vague (I refer to the book),
 and, before I got to the end of the sentences, I was off the track. If
 you indulge in long periods, you must be sure to have a snapper at the
 end. As for style of writing, if one has anything to say, it drops
 from him simply and directly, as a stone falls to the ground. There
 are no two ways about it, but down it comes, and he may stick in the
 points and stops wherever he can get a chance. New ideas come into
 this world somewhat like falling meteors, with a flash and an
 explosion, and perhaps somebody's castle-roof perforated. To try to
 polish the stone in its descent, to give it a peculiar turn, and make
 it whistle a tune, perchance, would be of no use, if it were possible.
 Your polished stuff turns out not to be meteoric, but of this earth.
 However, there is plenty of time, and Nature is an admirable
 schoolmistress.
 
 Speaking of correspondence, you ask me if I "cannot turn over a new
 leaf in that line." I certainly could if I were to receive it; but
 just then I looked up and saw that your page was dated "May 10,"
 though mailed in August, and it occurred to me that I had seen you
 since that date this year. Looking again, it appeared that your note
 was written in '56!! However, it was a _new_ leaf to me, and I _turned
 it over_ with as much interest as if it had been written the day
 before. Perhaps you kept it so long in order that the manuscript and
 subject-matter might be more in keeping with the old-fashioned paper
 on which it was written.
 
 I traveled the length of Cape Cod on foot, soon after you were here,
 and, within a few days, have returned from the wilds of Maine, where I
 have made a journey of three hundred and twenty-five miles with a
 canoe and an Indian, and a single white companion,--Edward Hoar, Esq.,
 of this town, lately from California,--traversing the head waters of
 the Kennebec, Penobscot, and St. John.
 
 Can't you extract any advantage out of that depression of spirits you
 refer to? It suggests to me cider-mills, wine-presses, etc., etc. All
 kinds of pressure or power should be used and made to turn some kind
 of machinery.
 
 Channing was just leaving Concord for Plymouth when I arrived, but
 said he should be here again in two or three days.
 
 Please remember me to your family, and say that I have at length
 learned to sing "Tom Bowlin" according to the notes.
 
 
 TO DANIEL RICKETSON (AT NEW BEDFORD).
 
      CONCORD, September 9, 1857.
 
 FRIEND RICKETSON,--I thank you for your kind invitation to visit you,
 but I have taken so many vacations this year,--at New Bedford, Cape
 Cod, and Maine,--that any more relaxation--call it rather
 dissipation--will cover me with shame and disgrace. I have not earned
 what I have already enjoyed. As some heads cannot carry much wine, so
 it would seem that I cannot bear so much society as you can. I have an
 immense appetite for solitude, like an infant for sleep, and if I
 don't get enough of it this year, I shall cry all the next.
 
 My mother's house is full at present; but if it were not, I would
 have no right to invite you hither, while entertaining such designs as
 I have hinted at. However, if you care to storm the town, I will
 engage to take some afternoon walks with you,--retiring into
 profoundest solitude the most sacred part of the day.
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 Ricketson had written to invite Thoreau to visit him again, saying
 among other things, "Walton's small sailboat is now on Assawampset
 Pond." After visiting Concord that autumn, he proposed another visit
 in December, saying (December 11, 1857), "I long to see your long
 beard. Channing says it is terrible to behold, but improves you
 mightily." This fixes the date, late in that year, when Thoreau first
 wore his full beard, as shown in his latest portraits.
 
 
 TO HARRISON BLAKE (AT WORCESTER).
 
      CONCORD, August 18, 1857.
 
 MR. BLAKE,--Fifteenthly. It seems to me that you need some absorbing
 pursuit. It does not matter much what it is, so it be honest. Such
 employment will be favorable to your development in more
 characteristic and important directions. You know there must be
 impulse enough for steerageway, though it be not toward your port, to
 prevent your drifting helplessly on to rocks or shoals. Some sails are
 set for this purpose only. There is the large fleet of scholars and
 men of science, for instance, always to be seen standing off and on
 every coast, and saved thus from running on to reefs, who will at last
 run into their proper haven, we trust.
 
 It is a pity you were not here with Brown and Wiley. I think that in
 this case, _for a rarity_, the more the merrier.
 
 You perceived that I did not entertain the idea of our going together
 to Maine on such an excursion as I had planned. The more I thought of
 it, the more imprudent it appeared to me. I did think to have written
 you before going, though not to propose your going also; but I went at
 last very suddenly, and could only have written a business letter, if
 I had tried, when there was no business to be accomplished. I have now
 returned, and think I have had a quite profitable journey, chiefly
 from associating with an intelligent Indian. My companion, Edward
 Hoar, also found his account in it, though he suffered considerably
 from being obliged to carry unusual loads over wet and rough
 "carries,"--in one instance five miles through a swamp, where the
 water was frequently up to our knees, and the fallen timber higher
 than our heads. He went over the ground three times, not being able to
 carry all his load at once. This prevented his ascending Ktaadn. Our
 best nights were those when it rained the hardest, on account of the
 mosquitoes. I speak of these things, which were not unexpected, merely
 to account for my not inviting you.
 
 Having returned, I flatter myself that the world appears in some
 respects a little larger, and not, as usual, smaller and shallower,
 for having extended my range. I have made a short excursion into the
 new world which the Indian dwells in, or is. He begins where we leave
 off. It is worth the while to detect new faculties in man,--he is so
 much the more divine; and anything that fairly excites our admiration
 expands us. The Indian, who can find his way so wonderfully in the
 woods, possesses so much intelligence which the white man does
 not,--and it increases my own capacity, as well as faith, to observe
 it. I rejoice to find that intelligence flows in other channels than I
 knew. It redeems for me portions of what seemed brutish before.
 
 It is a great satisfaction to find that your oldest convictions are
 permanent. With regard to essentials, I have never had occasion to
 change my mind. The aspect of the world varies from year to year, as
 the landscape is differently clothed, but I find that the _truth_ is
 still _true_, and I never regret any emphasis which it may have
 inspired. Ktaadn is there still, but much more surely my old
 conviction is there, resting with more than mountain breadth and
 weight on the world, the source still of fertilizing streams, and
 affording glorious views from its summit, if I can get up to it again.
 As the mountains still stand on the plain, and far more unchangeable
 and permanent,--stand still grouped around, farther or nearer to my
 maturer eye, the ideas which I have entertained,--the everlasting
 teats from which we draw our nourishment.
 
 
 TO HARRISON BLAKE (AT WORCESTER).
 
      CONCORD, November 16, 1857.
 
 MR. BLAKE,--You have got the start again. It was I that owed you a
 letter or two, if I mistake not.
 
 They make a great ado nowadays about hard times;[81] but I think that
 the community generally, ministers and all, take a wrong view of the
 matter, though some of the ministers preaching according to a formula
 may pretend to take a right one. This general failure, both private
 and public, is rather occasion for rejoicing, as reminding us whom we
 have at the helm,--that justice is always done. If our merchants did
 not most of them fail, and the banks too, my faith in the old laws of
 the world would be staggered. The statement that ninety-six in a
 hundred doing such business surely break down is perhaps the sweetest
 fact that statistics have revealed,--exhilarating as the fragrance of
 sallows in spring. Does it not say somewhere, "The Lord reigneth, let
 the earth rejoice"? If thousands are thrown out of employment, it
 suggests that they were not well employed. Why don't they take the
 hint? It is not enough to be industrious; so are the ants. What are
 you industrious about?
 
 The merchants and company have long laughed at transcendentalism,
 higher laws, etc., crying, "None of your moonshine," as if they were
 anchored to something not only definite, but sure and permanent. If
 there was any institution which was presumed to rest on a solid and
 secure basis, and more than any other represented this boasted common
 sense, prudence, and practical talent, it was the bank; and now those
 very banks are found to be mere reeds shaken by the wind. Scarcely one
 in the land has kept its promise.... It would seem as if you only need
 live forty years in any age of this world, to see its most promising
 government become the government of Kansas, and banks nowhere. Not
 merely the Brook Farm and Fourierite communities, but now the
 community generally has failed. But there is the moonshine still,
 serene, beneficent, and unchanged. Hard times, I say, have this value,
 among others, that they show us what such promises are worth,--where
 the _sure_ banks are. I heard some Mr. Eliot praised the other day
 because he had paid some of his debts, though it took nearly all he
 had (why, I've done as much as that myself many times, and a little
 more), and then gone to board. What if he has? I hope he's got a good
 boarding-place, and can pay for it. It's not everybody that can.
 However, in my opinion, it is cheaper to keep house,--_i. e._, if you
 don't keep too big a one.
 
 Men will tell you sometimes that "money's hard." That shows it was not
 made to eat, I say. Only think of a man in this new world, in his log
 cabin, in the midst of a corn and potato patch, with a sheepfold on
 one side, talking about money being hard! So are flints hard; there is
 no alloy in them. What has that got to do with his raising his food,
 cutting his wood (or breaking it), keeping indoors when it rains, and,
 if need be, spinning and weaving his clothes? Some of those who sank
 with the steamer the other day found out that money was _heavy_ too.
 Think of a man's priding himself on this kind of wealth, as if it
 greatly enriched him. As if one struggling in mid-ocean with a bag of
 gold on his back should gasp out, "I am worth a hundred thousand
 dollars." I see them struggling just as ineffectually on dry land,
 nay, even more hopelessly, for, in the former case, rather than sink,
 they will finally let the bag go; but in the latter they are pretty
 sure to hold and go down with it. I see them swimming about in their
 greatcoats, collecting their rents, really _getting their dues_,
 drinking bitter draughts which only increase their thirst, becoming
 more and more water-logged, till finally they sink plumb down to the
 bottom. But enough of this.
 
 Have you ever read Ruskin's books? If not, I would recommend [you] to
 try the second and third volumes (not parts) of his "Modern Painters."
 I am now reading the fourth, and have read most of his other books
 lately. They are singularly good and encouraging, though not without
 crudeness and bigotry. The themes in the volumes referred to are
 Infinity, Beauty, Imagination, Love of Nature, etc.,--all treated in a
 very living manner. I am rather surprised by them. It is remarkable
 that these things should be said with reference to painting chiefly,
 rather than literature. The "Seven Lamps of Architecture," too, is
 made of good stuff; but, as I remember, there is too much about art in
 it for me and the Hottentots. We want to know about matters and things
 in general. Our house is as yet a hut.
 
 You must have been enriched by your solitary walk over the mountains.
 I suppose that I feel the same awe when on their summits that many do
 on entering a church. To see what kind of earth that is on which you
 have a house and garden somewhere, perchance! It is equal to the lapse
 of many years. You must ascend a mountain to learn your relation to
 matter, and so to your own body, for _it_ is at home there, though
 _you_ are not. It might have been composed there, and will have no
 farther to go to return to dust there, than in your garden; but your
 spirit inevitably comes away, and brings your body with it, if it
 lives. Just as awful really, and as glorious, is your garden. See how
 I can play with my fingers! They are the funniest companions I have
 ever found. Where did they come from? What strange control I have over
 them! _Who_ am I? What are they?--those little peaks--call them
 Madison, Jefferson, Lafayette. What is _the matter_? _My_ fingers, do
 I say? Why, ere long, they may form the topmost crystal of Mount
 Washington. I go up there to see my body's cousins. There are some
 fingers, toes, bowels, etc., that I take an interest in, and therefore
 I am interested in all their relations.
 
 Let me suggest a theme for you: to state to yourself precisely and
 completely what that walk over the mountains amounted to for
 you,--returning to this essay again and again, until you are satisfied
 that all that was important in your experience is in it. Give this
 good reason to yourself for having gone over the mountains, for
 mankind is ever going over a mountain. Don't suppose that you can tell
 it precisely the first dozen times you try, but at 'em again,
 especially where, after a sufficient pause, you suspect that you are
 touching the heart or summit of the matter, reiterate your blows
 there, and account for the mountain to yourself. Not that the story
 need be long, but it will take a long while to make it short. It did
 not take very long to get over the mountain, you thought; but have you
 got over it indeed? If you have been to the top of Mount Washington,
 let me ask, what did you find there? That is the way they prove
 witnesses, you know. Going up there and being blown on is nothing. We
 never do much climbing while we are there, but we eat our luncheon,
 etc., very much as at home. It is after we get home that we really go
 over the mountain, if ever. What did the mountain say? What did the
 mountain do?
 
 I keep a mountain anchored off eastward a little way, which I ascend
 in my dreams both awake and asleep. Its broad base spreads over a
 village or two, which does not know it; neither does it know them, nor
 do I when I ascend it. I can see its general outline as plainly now in
 my mind as that of Wachusett. I do not invent in the least, but state
 exactly what I see. I find that I go up it when I am light-footed and
 earnest. It ever smokes like an altar with its sacrifice. I am not
 aware that a single villager frequents it or knows of it. I keep this
 mountain to ride instead of a horse.
 
 Do you not mistake about seeing Moosehead Lake from Mount Washington?
 That must be about one hundred and twenty miles distant, or nearly
 twice as far as the Atlantic, which last some doubt if they can see
 thence. Was it not Umbagog?
 
 Dr. Solger[82] has been lecturing in the vestry in this town on
 Geography, to Sanborn's scholars, for several months past, at five P.
 M. Emerson and Alcott have been to hear him. I was surprised when the
 former asked me, the other day, if I was not going to hear Dr. Solger.
 What, to be sitting in a meeting-house cellar at that time of day,
 when you might possibly be outdoors! I never thought of such a thing.
 What was the sun made for? If he does not prize daylight, I do. Let
 him lecture to owls and dormice. He must be a wonderful lecturer
 indeed who can keep me indoors at such an hour, when the night is
 coming in which no man can walk.
 
 Are you in want of amusement nowadays? Then play a little at the game
 of getting a living. There never was anything equal to it. Do it
 temperately, though, and don't sweat. Don't let this secret out, for I
 have a design against the Opera. OPERA!! Pass along the exclamations,
 devil.[83]
 
 Now is the time to become conversant with your wood-pile (this comes
 under Work for the Month), and be sure you put some warmth into it by
 your mode of getting it. Do not consent to be passively warmed. An
 intense degree of that is the hotness that is threatened. But a
 positive warmth within can withstand the fiery furnace, as the vital
 heat of a living man can withstand the heat that cooks meat.
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 After returning from the last of his three expeditions to the Maine
 woods (in 1846, 1853, and 1857), Thoreau was appealed to by his friend
 Higginson, then living in Worcester, for information concerning a
 proposed excursion from Worcester into Maine and Canada, then but
 little visited by tourists, who now go there in droves. He replied in
 this long letter, with its minute instructions and historical
 references. The Arnold mentioned is General Benedict Arnold, who in
 1775-76 made a toilsome march through the Maine forest with a small
 New England army for the conquest of Canada, while young John Thoreau,
 Henry's grandfather, was establishing himself as a merchant in Boston
 (not yet evacuated by British troops), previous to his marriage with
 Jane Burns.
 
 
 TO T. W. HIGGINSON (AT WORCESTER).
 
      CONCORD, January 28, 1858.
 
 DEAR SIR,--It would be perfectly practicable to go to the Madawaska
 the way you propose. As for the route to Quebec, I do not find the
 Sugar Loaf Mountains on my maps. The most direct and regular way, as
 you know, is substantially Montresor's and Arnold's and the younger
 John Smith's--by the Chaudire; but this is less wild. If your object
 is to see the St. Lawrence River below Quebec, you will probably
 strike it at the Rivire du Loup. (_Vide_ Hodge's account of his
 excursion thither _via_ the Allegash,--I believe it is the second
 Report on the Geology of the Public Lands of Maine and Massachusetts
 in '37.) I think that our Indian last summer, when we talked of going
 to the St. Lawrence, named another route, near the Madawaska,--perhaps
 the St. Francis,--which would save the long portage which Hodge made.
 
 I do not know whether you think of ascending the St. Lawrence in a
 canoe; but if you should, you might be delayed not only by the
 current, but by the waves, which frequently run too high for a canoe
 on such a mighty stream. It would be a grand excursion to go to Quebec
 by the Chaudire, descend the St. Lawrence to the Rivire du Loup, and
 return by the Madawaska and St. John to Fredericton, or
 farther,--almost all the way _down-stream_--a very important
 consideration.
 
 I went to Moosehead in company with a party of four who were going
 a-hunting down the Allegash and St. John, and thence by some other
 stream over into the Restigouche, and down that to the Bay of
 Chaleur,--to be gone six weeks. Our northern terminus was an island in
 Heron Lake on the Allegash. (_Vide_ Colton's railroad and township map
 of Maine.)
 
 The Indian proposed that we should return to Bangor by the St. John
 and Great Schoodic Lake, which we had thought of ourselves; and he
 showed us on the map where we should be each night. It was then noon,
 and the next day night, continuing down the Allegash, we should have
 been at the Madawaska settlements, having made only one or two
 portages; and thereafter, on the St. John there would be but one or
 two more falls, with short carries; and if there was not too much
 wind, we could go down that stream one hundred miles a day. It is
 settled all the way below Madawaska. He knew the route well. He even
 said that this was easier, and would take but little more time, though
 much farther, than the route we decided on,--_i. e._, by Webster
 Stream, the East Branch, and main Penobscot to Oldtown; but he may
 have wanted a longer job. We preferred the latter, not only because it
 was shorter, but because, as he said, it was wilder.
 
 We went about three hundred and twenty-five miles with the canoe
 (including sixty miles of stage between Bangor and Oldtown); were out
 twelve nights, and spent about $40 apiece,--which was more than was
 necessary. We paid the Indian, who was a very good one, $1.50 per day
 and 50 cents a week for his canoe. This is enough in ordinary seasons.
 I had formerly paid $2 for an Indian and for white batteau-men.
 
 If you go to Madawaska in a leisurely manner, supposing no delay on
 account of rain or the violence of the wind, you may reach Mt. Kineo
 by noon, and have the afternoon to explore it. The next day you may
 get to the head of the lake before noon, make the portage of two and a
 half miles over a wooden railroad, and drop down the Penobscot half a
 dozen miles. The third morning you will perhaps walk half a mile about
 Pine Stream Falls, while the Indian runs down,--cross the head of
 Chesuncook, reach the junction of the Caucomgomock and Umbazookskus by
 noon, and ascend the latter to Umbazookskus Lake that night. If it is
 low water, you may have to walk and carry a little on the Umbazookskus
 before entering the lake. The fourth morning you will make the carry
 of two miles to Mud Pond (Allegash water),--and a very wet carry it
 is,--and reach Chamberlain Lake by noon, and Heron Lake, perhaps, that
 night, after a couple of very short carries at the outlet of
 Chamberlain. At the end of two days more you will probably be at
 Madawaska. Of course the Indian _can_ paddle twice as far in a day as
 he commonly does.
 
 Perhaps you would like a few more details. We used (three of us)
 exactly twenty-six pounds of hard bread, fourteen pounds of pork,
 three pounds of coffee, twelve pounds of sugar (and could have used
 more), besides a little tea, Indian meal, and rice,--and plenty of
 berries and moose-meat. This was faring very luxuriously. I had not
 formerly carried coffee, sugar, or rice. But for solid food, I decide
 that it is not worth the while to carry anything but hard bread and
 pork, whatever your tastes and habits may be. These wear best, and you
 have no time nor dishes in which to cook anything else. Of course you
 will take a little Indian meal to fry fish in; and half a dozen lemons
 also, if you have sugar, will be very refreshing,--for the water is
 warm.[84]
 
 To save time, the sugar, coffee, tea, salt, etc., should be in
 separate water-tight bags, labeled, and tied with a leathern string;
 and all the provisions and blankets should be put into two large
 india-rubber bags, if you can find them water-tight. Ours were not. A
 four-quart tin pail makes a good kettle for all purposes, and tin
 plates are portable and convenient. Don't forget an india-rubber
 knapsack, with a large flap,--plenty of dish-cloths, old newspapers,
 strings, and twenty-five feet of strong cord. Of india-rubber
 clothing, the most you can wear, if any, is a very light coat,--and
 that you cannot work in. I could be more particular,--but perhaps have
 been too much so already.
 
 
 TO MARSTON WATSON (AT PLYMOUTH).
 
      CONCORD, April 25, 1858.
 
 DEAR SIR,--Your unexpected gift of pear trees reached me yesterday in
 good condition, and I spent the afternoon in giving them a good
 setting out; but I fear that this cold weather may hurt them. However,
 I am inclined to think they are insured, since you have looked on
 them. It makes one's mouth water to read their names only. From what I
 hear of the extent of your bounty, if a reasonable part of the trees
 succeed, this transplanting will make a new era for Concord to date
 from.
 
 Mine must be a lucky star, for day before yesterday I received a box
 of mayflowers from Brattleboro, and yesterday morning your pear trees,
 and at evening a hummingbird's nest from Worcester. This looks like
 fairy housekeeping.
 
 I discovered two new plants in Concord last winter, the Labrador tea
 (_Ledum latifolium_), and yew (_Taxis baccata_).
 
 By the way, in January I communicated with Dr. Durkee, whose report on
 glow-worms I sent you, and it appeared, as I expected, that he (and by
 his account Agassiz, Gould, Jackson, and others to whom he showed
 them) did not consider them a distinct species, but a variety of the
 common, or _Lampyris noctiluca_, some of which you got in Lincoln.
 Durkee, at least, has never seen the last. I told him that I had no
 doubt about their being a distinct species. His, however, were
 luminous throughout every part of the body, as those which you sent me
 were not, while I had them.
 
 Is nature as full of vigor to your eyes as ever, or do you detect some
 falling off at last? Is the mystery of the hog's bristle cleared up,
 and with it that of our life? It is the question, to the exclusion of
 every other interest.
 
 I am sorry to hear of the burning of your woods, but, thank Heaven,
 your great ponds and your sea cannot be burnt. I love to think of your
 warm, sandy wood-roads, and your breezy island out in the sea. What a
 prospect you can get every morning from the hilltop east of your
 house![85] I think that even the heathen that I am could say, or
 sing, or dance, morning prayers there of some kind.
 
 Please remember me to Mrs. Watson, and to the rest of your family who
 are helping the sun shine yonder.
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 Of his habits in mountain-climbing, Channing says:[86] "He ascended
 such hills as Monadnoc by his own path; would lay down his map on the
 summit and draw a line to the point he proposed to visit
 below,--perhaps forty miles away on the landscape, and set off bravely
 to make the 'short-cut.' The lowland people wondered to see him
 scaling the heights as if he had lost his way, or at his jumping over
 their cow-yard fences,--asking if he had fallen from the clouds. In a
 walk like this he always carried his umbrella; and on this Monadnoc
 trip, when about a mile from the station [in Troy, N. H.], a torrent
 of rain came down; without the umbrella his books, blankets, maps, and
 provisions would all have been spoiled, or the morning lost by delay.
 On the mountain there being a thick, soaking fog, the first object was
 to camp and make tea. He spent five nights in camp, having built
 another hut, to get varied views. Flowers, birds, lichens, and the
 rocks were carefully examined, all parts of the mountain were visited,
 and as accurate a map as could be made by pocket compass was
 carefully sketched and drawn out, in the five days spent there,--with
 notes of the striking aerial phenomena, incidents of travel and
 natural history. The outlook across the valley over to Wachusett, with
 its thunder-storms and battles in the cloud; the farmers' back-yards
 in Jaffrey, where the family cotton can be seen bleaching on the
 grass, but no trace of the pigmy family; the dry, soft air all night,
 the lack of dew in the morning; the want of water,--a pint being a
 good deal,--these, and similar things make up some part of such an
 excursion."
 
 The Monadnock excursion above mentioned began June 3d, and continued
 three days. It inspired Thoreau to take a longer mountain tour with
 his neighbor and friend Edward Hoar, to which these letters relate,
 giving the ways and means of the journey,--a memorable one to all
 concerned.
 
 
 TO HARRISON BLAKE (AT WORCESTER).
 
      CONCORD, June 29, 1858, 8 A. M.
 
 MR. BLAKE,--Edward Hoar and I propose to start for the White Mountains
 in a covered wagon, with one horse, on the morning of Thursday the 1st
 of July, intending to explore the mountain-tops botanically, and camp
 on them at least several times. Will you take a seat in the wagon with
 us? Mr. Hoar prefers to hire the horse and wagon himself. Let us hear
 by express, as soon as you can, whether you will join us here by the
 earliest train on Thursday morning, or Wednesday night. Bring your map
 of the mountains, and as much _provision_ for the road as you
 can,--hard bread, sugar, tea, meat, etc.,--for we intend to live like
 gipsies; also, a blanket and some thick clothes for the mountain-top.
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 July 1st. Last Monday evening Mr. Edward Hoar said that he thought of
 going to the White Mountains. I remarked casually that I should like
 to go well enough if I could afford it. Whereupon he declared that if
 I would go with him, he would hire a horse and wagon, so that the ride
 would cost me nothing, and we would explore the mountain-tops
 _botanically_, camping on them many nights. The next morning I
 suggested you and Brown's accompanying us in another wagon, and we
 could all camp and cook, gipsy-like, along the way,--or, perhaps, if
 the horse could draw us, you would like to bear half the expense of
 the horse and wagon, and take a seat with us. He liked either
 proposition, but said that if you would take a seat with us, he would
 prefer to hire the horse and wagon himself. You could contribute
 something else if you pleased. Supposing that Brown would be confined,
 I wrote to you accordingly, by _express_ on Tuesday morning, _via_
 Boston, stating that we should start to-day, suggesting provision,
 thick clothes, etc., and asking for an answer; but I have not received
 one. I have just heard that you _may_ be at Sterling, and now write to
 say that we shall still be glad if you will join us at Senter Harbor,
 where we expect to be next Monday morning. In any case, will you
 please direct a letter to us there _at once_?
 
 
 TO DANIEL RICKETSON (AT NEW BEDFORD).
 
      CONCORD, June 30, 1858.
 
 FRIEND RICKETSON,--I am on the point of starting for the White
 Mountains in a wagon with my neighbor Edward Hoar, and I write to you
 now rather to apologize for not writing, than to answer worthily your
 three notes. I thank you heartily for them. You will not care for a
 little delay in acknowledging them, since your date shows that you can
 afford to wait. Indeed, my head has been so full of company, etc.,
 that I could not reply to you fitly before, nor can I now.
 
 As for preaching to men these days in the Walden strain, is it of any
 consequence to preach to an audience of men who _can_ fail, or who can
 be _revived_? There are few beside. Is it any success to interest these
 parties? If a man has _speculated_ and _failed_, he will probably do
 these things again, in spite of you or me. I confess that it is rare
 that I rise to sentiment in my relations to men,--ordinarily to a mere
 patient, or may be wholesome, good-will. I can imagine something more,
 but the truth compels me to regard the ideal and the actual as two
 things.
 
 Channing has come, and as suddenly gone, and left a short poem, "Near
 Home," published (?) or printed by Munroe, which I have hardly had
 time to glance at. As you may guess, I learn nothing of you from him.
 
 You already foresee my answer to your invitation to make you a summer
 visit: I am bound for the mountains. But I trust that you have
 vanquished, ere this, those dusky demons that seem to lurk around the
 Head of the River.[87] You know that this warfare is nothing but a
 kind of nightmare, and it is our thoughts alone which give those
 _un_worthies any body or existence.
 
 I made an excursion with Blake, of Worcester, to Monadnock, a few
 weeks since. We took our blankets and food, spent two nights on the
 mountain, and did not go into a house.
 
 Alcott has been very busy for a long time repairing an old shell of a
 house, and I have seen very little of him.[88] I have looked more at
 the houses which birds build. Watson made us all very generous
 presents from his nursery in the spring. Especially did he remember
 Alcott.
 
 Excuse me for not writing any more at present, and remember me to your
 family.
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 In explanation of the next letter (October 31, 1858), it may be said
 that Ricketson had formed a plan for visiting Europe, which he gave
 up, and had recommended an "English Australian" who proposed to see
 Concord. In Thoreau's reply, he mentions Mr. Hoar, who was not only
 his companion in later journeys, but, while in college or the Harvard
 Law School, had assisted Thoreau in that accidental forest fire,
 mentioned in the Journal, which brought both the young men into much
 disrepute among the Concord farmers and owners of wood-lots. At the
 date of the letter, Channing was flitting between New Bedford and
 Concord, and soon returned to spend the rest of his days in Thoreau's
 town, where he died, December 23, 1901, the last survivor of the group
 of friends to whom these letters relate.
 
 In July, 1858, as mentioned in this letter to Mr. Ricketson, Thoreau
 journeyed from Concord to the White Mountains, first visited with his
 brother John in 1839. His later companion was Edward Hoar, a botanist
 and lover of nature, who had been a magistrate in California, and in
 boyhood a comrade of Thoreau in shooting excursions on the Concord
 meadows. They journeyed in a wagon and Thoreau disliked the loss of
 independence in choice of camping-places involved in the care of a
 horse. He complained also of the magnificent inns ("mountain houses")
 that had sprung up in the passes and on the plateaus since his first
 visit. "Give me," he said, "a spruce house made in the rain," such as
 he and Channing afterward (1860) made on Monadnock in his last trip to
 that mountain. The chief exploit in the White Mountain trip was a
 visit to Tuckerman's Ravine on Mt. Washington, of which Mr. Hoar, some
 years before his death (in 1893), gave me an account, containing the
 true anecdote of Thoreau's finding the arnica plant when he needed it.
 
 On their way to this rather inaccessible chasm, Thoreau and his
 comrade went first to what was then but a small tavern on the
 "tip-top" of Mt. Washington. It was a foggy day; and when the landlord
 was asked if he could furnish a guide to Tuckerman's Ravine, he
 replied, "Yes, my brother is the guide; but if he went to-day he could
 never find his way back in this fog." "Well," said Thoreau, "if we
 cannot have a guide we will find it ourselves;" and he at once
 produced a map he had made the day before at a roadside inn, where he
 had found a wall map of the mountain region, and climbed on a table to
 copy that portion he needed. With this map and his pocket compass he
 "struck a bee-line," said Mr. Hoar, for the ravine, and soon came to
 it, about a mile away. They went safely down the steep stairs into the
 chasm, where they found the midsummer iceberg they wished to see. But
 as they walked down the bed of the Peabody River, flowing from this
 ravine, over boulders five or six feet high, the heavy packs on their
 shoulders weighed them down, and finally, Thoreau's foot slipping, he
 fell and sprained his ankle. He rose, but had not limped five steps
 from the place where he fell, when he said, "Here is the arnica,
 anyhow,"--reached out his hand and plucked the _Arnica mollis_, which
 he had not before found anywhere. Before reaching the mountains they
 had marked in their botany books forty-six species of plants they
 hoped to find there, and before they came away they had found
 forty-two of them.
 
 When they reached their camping-place, farther down, Thoreau was so
 lame he could not move about, and lay there in the camp several days,
 eating the pork and other supplies they had in their packs, Mr. Hoar
 going each day to the inn at the mountain summit. This camp was in a
 thicket of dwarf firs at the foot of the ravine, where, just before
 his accident, by carelessness in lighting a fire, some acres of the
 mountain woodland had been set on fire; but this proved to be the
 signal for which Thoreau had told his Worcester friends to watch, if
 they wished to join him on the mountain. "I had told Blake," says
 Thoreau in his Journal, "to look out for a smoke and a white tent. We
 had made a smoke sure enough. We slept five in the tent that night,
 and found it quite warm." Mr. Hoar added: "In this journey Thoreau
 insisted on our carrying heavy packs, and rather despised persons who
 complained of the burden. He was chagrined, in the Maine woods, to
 find his Indian, Joe Polis (whom, on the whole, he admired), excited
 and tremulous at sight of a moose, so that he could scarcely load his
 gun properly. Joe, who was a good Catholic, wanted us to stop
 traveling on Sunday and hold a meeting; and when we insisted on going
 forward, the Indian withdrew into the woods to say his prayers,--then
 came back and picked up the breakfast things, and we paddled on. As to
 Thoreau's courage and manliness, nobody who had seen him among the
 Penobscot rocks and rapids--the Indian trusting his life and his canoe
 to Henry's skill, promptitude, and nerve--would ever doubt it."
 
 Channing says:[89] "In his later journeys, if his companion was
 footsore or loitered, he steadily pursued his road. Once, when a
 follower was done up with headache and incapable of motion, hoping his
 associate would comfort him and perhaps afford him a sip of tea, he
 said, 'There are people who are sick in that way every morning, and go
 about their affairs,' and then marched off about his. In such limits,
 so inevitable, was he compacted.... This tone of mind grew out of no
 insensibility; or, if he sometimes looked coldly on the suffering of
 more tender natures, he sympathized with their afflictions, but could
 do nothing to admire them. He would not injure a plant unnecessarily.
 At the time of the John Brown tragedy, Thoreau was driven sick. So the
 country's misfortunes in the Union war acted on his feelings with
 great force: he used to say he 'could never recover while the war
 lasted.'" Hawthorne had an experience somewhat similar, though he,
 too, was of stern stuff when need was, and had much of the old Salem
 sea-captains in his sensitive nature.
 
 
 TO DANIEL RICKETSON (AT NEW BEDFORD).
 
      CONCORD, October 31, 1858.
 
 FRIEND RICKETSON,--I have not seen anything of your English author
 yet. Edward Hoar, my companion in Maine and at the White Mountains,
 his sister Elizabeth, and a Miss Prichard, another neighbor of ours,
 went to Europe in the Niagara on the 6th. I told them to look out for
 you under the Yardley Oak, but it seems they will not find you there.
 
 I had a pleasant time in Tuckerman's Ravine at the White Mountains in
 July, entertaining four beside myself under my little tent through
 some soaking rains; and more recently I have taken an interesting walk
 with Channing about Cape Ann. We were obliged to "dipper it" a good
 way, on account of the scarcity of fresh water, for we got most of our
 meals by the shore. Channing is understood to be here for the winter,
 but I rarely see him.
 
 I should be pleased to see your face here in the course of the Indian
 summer, which may still be expected, if any authority can tell us when
 that phenomenon _does_ occur. We would like to hear the story of your
 travels; for if you have not been fairly intoxicated with Europe, you
 have been half-seas-over, and so can probably tell more about it.
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 This alludes to the fact that Ricketson got as far as Halifax in his
 attempt at Europe; and in his reply (November 3, 1858) he gave Thoreau
 an account of his short voyage, on which the next letter comments.
 
 
 TO DANIEL RICKETSON (AT NEW BEDFORD).
 
      CONCORD, November 6, 1858.
 
 FRIEND RICKETSON,--I was much pleased with your lively and lifelike
 account of your voyage. You were more than repaid for your trouble
 after all. The coast of Nova Scotia, which you sailed along from
 Windsor westward, is particularly interesting to the historian of
 this country, having been settled earlier than Plymouth. Your "Isle of
 Haut" is properly "Isle Haute," or the High Island of Champlain's map.
 There is another off the coast of Maine. By the way, the American elk
 of _American authors_ (_Cervus Canadensis_) is a distinct animal from
 the moose (_Cervus alces_), though the latter is called elk by many.
 
 You drew a very vivid portrait of the Australian,--short and stout,
 with a pipe in his mouth, and his book inspired by beer, Pot First,
 Pot Second, etc. I suspect that he must be potbellied withal. Methinks
 I see the smoke going up from him as from a cottage on the moor. If he
 does not quench his genius with his beer, it may burst into a clear
 flame at last. However, perhaps he intentionally adopts the low style.
 
 What do you mean by that ado about smoking, and my "purer tastes"? I
 should like his pipe as well as his beer at least. Neither of them is
 so bad as to be "highly connected," which you say he is,
 unfortunately. No! I expect nothing but pleasure in "smoke from _your_
 pipe."
 
 You and the Australian must have put your heads together when you
 concocted those titles,--with pipes in your mouths over a pot of beer.
 I suppose that your chapters are, Whiff the First, Whiff the Second,
 etc. But of course it is a more modest expression for "Fire from my
 Genius."
 
 You must have been very busy since you came back, or before you
 sailed, to have brought out your History, of whose publication I had
 not heard. I suppose that I have read it in the _Mercury_. Yet I am
 curious to see how it looks in a volume, with your name on the
 title-page.
 
 I am more curious still about the poems. Pray put some sketches into
 the book: your shanty for frontispiece; Arthur and Walton's boat (if
 you can) running for Cuttyhunk in a tremendous gale; not forgetting
 "Be honest boys," etc., near by; the Middleborough ponds with a
 certain island looming in the distance; the Quaker meeting-house, and
 the Brady house, if you like; the villagers catching smelts with
 dip-nets in the twilight, at the Head of the River, etc., etc. Let it
 be a local and villageous book as much as possible. Let some one make
 a characteristic selection of mottoes from your shanty walls, and
 sprinkle them in an irregular manner, at all angles, over the
 fly-leaves and margins, as a man stamps his name in a hurry; and also
 canes, pipes, and jackknives, of all your patterns, about the
 frontispiece. I can think of plenty of devices for tail-pieces.
 Indeed, I should like to see a hair pillow, accurately drawn, for one;
 a cat, with a bell on, for another; the old horse, with his age
 printed in the hollow of his back; half a cocoanut-shell by a spring;
 a sheet of blotted paper; a settle occupied by a settler at full
 length, etc., etc., etc. Call all the arts to your aid.
 
 Don't wait for the Indian summer, but bring it with you.
 
 P. S.--Let me ask a favor. I am trying to write something about the
 autumnal tints, and I wish to know how much our trees differ from
 English and European ones in this respect. Will you observe, or learn
 for me, what English or European trees, if any, still retain their
 leaves in Mr. Arnold's garden (the gardener will supply the true
 names); and also if the foliage of any (and what) European or foreign
 trees there have been brilliant the past month. If you will do this
 you will greatly oblige me. I return the newspaper with this.
 
 
 TO DANIEL RICKETSON (AT NEW BEDFORD).
 
      CONCORD, November 22, 1858.
 
 FRIEND RICKETSON,--I thank you for your "History."[90] Though I have
 not yet read it again, I have looked far enough to see that I like the
 homeliness of it; that is, the good, old-fashioned way of writing, as
 if you actually lived where you wrote. A man's interest in a single
 bluebird is worth more than a complete but dry list of the fauna and
 flora of a town. It is also a considerable advantage to be able to say
 at any time, "If D. R. is not here, here is his book." Alcott being
 here, and inquiring after you (whom he has been expecting), I lent the
 book to him almost immediately. He talks of going West the latter part
 of this week. Channing is here again, as I am told, but I have not
 seen him.
 
 I thank you also for the account of the trees. It was to my purpose,
 and I hope you got something out of it too. I suppose that the cold
 weather prevented your coming here. Suppose you try a winter walk on
 skates. Please remember me to your family.
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 Late in November, 1858, Cholmondeley, who had not written for a year
 and six months, suddenly notified Thoreau from Montreal that he was in
 Canada, and would visit Concord the next week. Accordingly he arrived
 early in December, and urged his friend to go with him to the West
 Indies. John Thoreau, the father, was then in his last illness, and
 for that and other reasons Thoreau could not accept the invitation;
 but he detained Cholmondeley in Concord some days, and took him to New
 Bedford, December 8th, having first written this note to Mr.
 Ricketson:--
 
 "Thomas Cholmondeley, my English acquaintance, is here, on his way to
 the West Indies. He wants to see New Bedford, a whaling town. I tell
 him I would like to introduce him to you there,--thinking more of his
 seeing you than New Bedford. So we propose to come your way to-morrow.
 Excuse this short notice, for the time is short. If on any account it
 is inconvenient to see us, you will treat us accordingly."
 
 Of this visit and his English visitor, Mr. Ricketson wrote in his
 journal the next day:--
 
 "We were all much pleased with Mr. Cholmondeley. He is a tall spare
 man, thirty-five years of age, of fair and fresh complexion, blue
 eyes, light-brown and fine hair, nose small and Roman, beard light and
 worn full, with a mustache. A man of fine culture and refinement of
 manners, educated at Oriel College, Oxford, of an old Cheshire family
 by his father, a clergyman. He wore a black velvet sack coat, and
 lighter-colored trousers,--a sort of genteel traveling suit; perhaps a
 cap, but by no means a fashionable 'castor.' He reminded me of our
 dear friend, George William Curtis." Few greater compliments could
 this diarist give than to compare a visitor to Curtis, the lamented.
 
 Mr. Cholmondeley left Concord for the South, going as far as to
 Virginia, in December and January; then came back to Concord the 20th
 of January, 1859, and after a few days returned to Canada, and thence
 to England by way of Jamaica. He was in London when Theodore Parker
 reached there from Santa Cruz, in June, and called on him, with offers
 of service; but does not seem to have heard of Parker's death till I
 wrote him in May, 1861. At my parting with him in Concord, he gave me
 money with which to buy grapes for the invalid father of Thoreau,--an
 instance of his constant consideration for others; the Thoreaus hardly
 affording such luxuries as hothouse grapes for the sick. Sophia
 Thoreau, who perhaps was more appreciative of him than her more
 stoical brother, said after his death, "We have always had the truest
 regard for him, as a person of rare integrity, great benevolence, and
 the sincerest friendliness." This well describes the man whose
 every-day guise was literally set down by Mr. Ricketson.
 
 
 TO HARRISON BLAKE (AT WORCESTER).
 
      CONCORD, January 1, 1859.
 
 MR. BLAKE,--It may interest you to hear that Cholmondeley has been
 this way again, _via_ Montreal and Lake Huron, going to the West
 Indies, or rather to Weiss-nicht-wo, whither he urges me to accompany
 him. He is rather more demonstrative than before, and, on the whole,
 what would be called "a good fellow,"--is a man of principle, and
 quite reliable, but very peculiar. I have been to New Bedford with
 him, to show him a whaling town and Ricketson. I was glad to hear that
 you had called on R. How did you like him? I suspect that you did not
 see one another fairly.
 
 I have lately got back to that glorious society called Solitude, where
 we meet our friends continually, and can imagine the outside world
 also to be peopled. Yet some of my acquaintance would fain hustle me
 into the almshouse for _the sake of society_, as if I were pining for
 that diet, when I seem to myself a most befriended man, and find
 constant employment. However, they do not believe a word I say. They
 have got a club, the handle of which is in the Parker House at Boston,
 and with this they beat me from time to time, expecting to make me
 tender or minced meat, so fit for a club to dine off.
 
      "Hercules with his club
      The Dragon did drub;
      But More of More Hall
      With nothing at all,
      He slew the Dragon of Wantley."
 
 Ah! that More of More Hall knew what fair play was. Channing, who
 wrote to me about it once, brandishing the club vigorously (being set
 on by another, probably), says _now_, seriously, that he is sorry to
 find by my letters that I am "absorbed in politics," and adds, begging
 my pardon for his plainness, "Beware of an extraneous life!" and so he
 does his duty, and washes his hands of me. I tell him that it is as
 if he should say to the sloth, that fellow that creeps so slowly along
 a tree, and cries _ai_ from time to time, "Beware of dancing!"
 
 The doctors are all agreed that I am suffering for want of society.
 Was never a case like it. First, I did not know that I was suffering
 at all. Secondly, as an Irishman might say, I had thought it was
 indigestion of the society I got.
 
 As for the Parker House, I went there once, when the Club[91] was
 away, but I found it hard to see through the cigar smoke, and men were
 deposited about in chairs over the marble floor, as thick as legs of
 bacon in a smoke-house. It was all smoke, and no salt, Attic or other.
 The only room in Boston which I visit with alacrity is the Gentlemen's
 Room at the Fitchburg Depot, where I wait for the cars, sometimes for
 two hours, in order to get out of town. It is a paradise to the Parker
 House, for no smoking is allowed, and there is far more retirement. A
 large and respectable club of us hire it (Town and Country Club), and
 I am pretty sure to find some one there whose face is set the same
 way as my own.
 
 My last essay, on which I am still engaged, is called "Autumnal
 Tints." I do not know how readable (_i. e._, by me to others) it will
 be.
 
 I met Mr. James the other night at Emerson's, at an Alcottian
 conversation, at which, however, Alcott did not talk much, being
 disturbed by James's opposition. The latter is a hearty man enough,
 with whom you can differ very satisfactorily, on account of both his
 doctrines and his good temper. He utters _quasi_ philanthropic dogmas
 in a metaphysic dress; but they are for all practical purposes very
 crude. He charges society with all the crime committed, and praises
 the criminal for committing it. But I think that all the remedies he
 suggests out of his head--for he goes no farther, hearty as he
 is--would leave us about where we are now. For, of course, it is not
 by a gift of turkeys on Thanksgiving Day that he proposes to convert
 the criminal, but by a true sympathy with each one,--with him, among
 the rest, who lyingly tells the world from the gallows that he has
 never been treated kindly by a single mortal since he was born. But it
 is not so easy a thing to sympathize with another, though you may have
 the best disposition to do it. There is Dobson over the hill. Have not
 you and I and all the world been trying, ever since he was born, to
 sympathize with him? (as doubtless he with us), and yet we have got no
 farther than to send him to the house of correction once at least; and
 he, on the other hand, as I hear, has sent us to another place several
 times. This is the real state of things, as I understand it, at least
 so far as James's remedies go. We are now, alas! exercising what
 charity we actually have, and new laws would not give us any more.
 But, perchance, we might make some improvements in the house of
 correction. You and I are Dobson; what will James do for us?
 
 Have you found at last in your wanderings a place where the solitude
 is sweet?
 
 What mountain are you camping on nowadays? Though I had a good time at
 the mountains, I confess that the journey did not bear any fruit that
 I know of. I did not expect it would. The mode of it was not simple
 and adventurous enough. You must first have made an infinite demand,
 and not unreasonably, but after a corresponding outlay, have an
 all-absorbing purpose, and at the same time that your feet bear you
 hither and thither, travel much more in imagination.
 
 To let the mountains slide,--live at home like a traveler. It should
 not be in vain that these things are shown us from day to day. Is not
 each withered leaf that I see in my walks something which I have
 traveled to find?--traveled, who can tell how far? What a fool he must
 be who thinks that his El Dorado is anywhere but where he lives!
 
 We are always, methinks, in some kind of ravine, though our bodies may
 walk the smooth streets of Worcester. Our souls (I use this word for
 want of a better) are ever perched on its rocky sides, overlooking
 that lowland. (What a more than Tuckerman's Ravine is the body itself,
 in which the "soul" is encamped, when you come to look into it!
 However, eagles always have chosen such places for their eyries.)
 
 Thus is it ever with your fair cities of the plain. Their streets may
 be paved with silver and gold, and six carriages roll abreast in them,
 but the real _homes_ of the citizens are in the Tuckerman's Ravines
 which ray out from that centre into the mountains round about, one
 from each man, woman, and child. The masters of life have so ordered
 it. That is their _beau-ideal_ of a country-seat. There is no danger
 of being _tuckered_ out before you get to it.
 
 So we live in Worcester and in Concord, each man taking his exercise
 regularly in his ravine, like a lion in his cage, and sometimes
 spraining his ankle there. We have very few clear days, and a great
 many small plagues which keep us busy. Sometimes, I suppose, you hear
 a neighbor halloo (Brown, maybe) and think it is a bear. Nevertheless,
 on the whole, we think it very grand and exhilarating, this ravine
 life. It is a capital advantage withal, living so high, the excellent
 drainage of that city of God. Routine is but a shallow and
 insignificant sort of ravine, such as the ruts are, the conduits of
 puddles. But these ravines are the source of mighty streams,
 precipitous, icy, savage, as they are, haunted by bears and
 loup-cerviers; there are born not only Sacos and Amazons, but prophets
 who will redeem the world. The at last smooth and fertilizing water at
 which nations drink and navies supply themselves begins with melted
 glaciers, and burst thunder-spouts. Let us pray that, if we are not
 flowing through some Mississippi valley which we fertilize,--and it is
 not likely we are,--we may know ourselves shut in between grim and
 mighty mountain walls amid the clouds, falling a thousand feet in a
 mile, through dwarfed fir and spruce, over the rocky insteps of
 slides, being exercised in our minds, and so developed.
 
      CONCORD, January 19, 1859.
 
 MR. BLAKE,--If I could have given a favorable report as to the
 skating, I should have answered you earlier. About a week before you
 wrote there was good skating; there is now none. As for the lecture, I
 shall be glad to come. I cannot now say when, but I will let you know,
 I think within a week or ten days at most, and will then leave you a
 week clear to make the arrangements in. I will bring something else
 than "What shall it profit a Man?" My father is very sick, and has
 been for a long time, so that there is the more need of me at home.
 This occurs to me, even when contemplating so short an excursion as to
 Worcester.
 
 I want very much to see or hear your account of your adventures in the
 Ravine,[92] and I trust I shall do so when I come to Worcester.
 Cholmondeley has been here again, returning from Virginia (for he went
 no farther south) to Canada; and will go thence to Europe, he thinks,
 in the spring, and never ramble any more. (January 29.) I am expecting
 daily that my father will die, therefore I cannot leave home at
 present. I will write you again within ten days.
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 The death of John Thoreau (who was born October 8, 1787) occurred
 February 3d, and Thoreau gave his lecture on "Autumnal Tints" at
 Worcester, February 22, 1859. Mrs. Thoreau survived all her children
 except Sophia, and died in 1872.
 
 At his fathers death, Thoreau sent a newspaper announcement of it to
 Ricketson, who had already seen it mentioned by Channing in the
 _Mercury_. Ricketson at once wrote, to pay his tribute to the
 character of the elder Thoreau, saying: "I have rarely met a man who
 inspired me with more respect. I remember with pleasure a ramble I
 took with him about Concord some two or three years ago, at a time
 when you were away from home; on which occasion I was much impressed
 with his good sense, his fine social nature, and his genuine
 hospitality." Of this remark Thoreau took notice in his interesting
 reply.
 
 
 TO DANIEL RICKETSON (AT NEW BEDFORD).
 
      CONCORD, 12th February, 1859.
 
 FRIEND RICKETSON,--I thank you for your kind letter. I sent you the
 notice of my father's death as much because you knew him as because
 you knew me. I can hardly realize that he is dead. He had been sick
 about two years, and at last declined rather rapidly, though steadily.
 Till within a week or ten days before he died he was hoping to see
 another spring, but he then discovered that this was a vain
 expectation, and, thinking that he was dying, he took his leave of us
 several times within a week before his departure. Once or twice he
 expressed a slight impatience at the delay. He was quite conscious to
 the last, and his death was so easy that, though we had all been
 sitting around the bed for an hour or more expecting that event (as we
 had sat before), he was gone at last, almost before we were aware of
 it.
 
 I am glad to read what you say of his social nature. I think I may say
 that he was wholly unpretending; and there was this peculiarity in his
 aim, that though he had pecuniary difficulties to contend with the
 greater part of his life, he always studied how to make a _good_
 article, pencil or other (for he practiced various arts), and was
 never satisfied with what he had produced. Nor was he ever disposed in
 the least to put off a poor one for the sake of pecuniary gain,--as if
 he labored for a higher end.
 
 Though he was not very old, and was not a native of Concord, I think
 that he was, on the whole, more identified with Concord street than
 any man now alive, having come here when he was about twelve years
 old, and set up for himself as a merchant here, at the age of
 twenty-one, fifty years ago. As I sat in a circle the other evening
 with my mother and sister, my mother's two sisters, and my father's
 two sisters, it occurred to me that my father, though seventy-one,
 belonged to the youngest four of the eight who recently composed our
 family.
 
 How swiftly at last, but unnoticed, a generation passes away! Three
 years ago I was called with my father to be a witness to the signing
 of our neighbor Mr. Frost's will. Mr. Samuel Hoar, who was there
 writing it, also signed it. I was lately required to go to Cambridge
 to testify to the genuineness of the will, being the only one of the
 four who could be there, and now I am the only one alive.
 
 My mother and sister thank you heartily for your sympathy. The latter,
 in particular, agrees with you in thinking that it is communion with
 still living and healthy nature alone which can restore to sane and
 cheerful views. I thank you for your invitation to New Bedford, but I
 feel somewhat confined here for the present.
 
 I did not know but we should see you the day after Alger was here. It
 is not too late for a winter walk in Concord. It does me good to hear
 of spring birds, and singing ones too,--for spring seems far away from
 Concord yet. I am going to Worcester to read a parlor lecture on the
 22d, and shall see Blake and Brown. What if you were to meet me there,
 or go with me from here? You would see them to good advantage.
 Cholmondeley has been here again, after going as far south as
 Virginia, and left for Canada about three weeks ago. He is a good
 soul, and I am afraid I did not sufficiently recognize him.
 
 Please remember me to Mrs. Ricketson, and to the rest of your family.
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 A long silence had passed on Thoreau's part before he wrote again to
 Ricketson,--nearly two years, in fact,--and his friend complained of
 it. He had followed the public utterances of Thoreau with entire
 sympathy, although much in advance, in 1859-60, of public opinion
 respecting John Brown and slavery, and he had sent him letters and
 complimentary verses. Finally, he almost implored Thoreau to renew the
 bond of friendship. This will explain the tenor of Thoreau's reply.
 
 
 TO DANIEL RICKETSON, (AT NEW BEDFORD).
 
      CONCORD, November 4, 1860.
 
 FRIEND RICKETSON,--I thank you for the verses. They are quite too good
 to apply to me. However, I know what a poet's license is, and will not
 get in the way.
 
 But what do you mean by that prose? Why will you waste so many regards
 on me, and not know what to think of my silence? Infer from it what
 you might from the silence of a dense pine wood. It is its natural
 condition, except when the winds blow, and the jays scream, and the
 chickadee winds up his clock. My silence is just as inhuman as that,
 and no more. You know that I never promised to correspond with you,
 and so, when I do, I do more than I promised.
 
 Such are my pursuits and habits that I rarely go abroad; and it is
 quite a habit with me to decline invitations to do so. Not that I
 could not enjoy such visits, if I were not otherwise occupied. I have
 enjoyed very much my visits to you, and my rides in your neighborhood,
 and am sorry that I cannot enjoy such things oftener; but life is
 short, and there are other things also to be done. I admit that you
 are more social than I am and far more attentive to "the common
 courtesies of life;" but this is partly for the reason that you have
 fewer or less exacting private pursuits.
 
 Not to have written a note for a year is with me a very venial
 offense. I think that I do not correspond with any one so often as
 once in six months.
 
 I have a faint recollection of your invitation referred to; but I
 suppose that I had no new nor particular reason for declining, and so
 made no new statement. I have felt that you would be glad to see me
 almost whenever I got ready to come; but I only offer myself as a rare
 visitor, and a still rarer correspondent.
 
 I am very busy, after my fashion, little as there is to show for it,
 and feel as if I could not spend many days nor dollars in traveling;
 for the shortest visit must have a fair margin to it, and the days
 thus affect the weeks, you know. Nevertheless, we cannot forego these
 luxuries altogether. You must not regard me as a regular diet, but at
 most only as acorns, which, too, are not to be despised,--which, at
 least, we love to think are edible in a bracing walk. We have got
 along pretty well together in several directions, though we are such
 strangers in others.
 
 I hardly know what to say in answer to your letter. Some are
 accustomed to write many letters, others very few. I am one of the
 last. At any rate, we are pretty sure, if we write at all, to send
 those thoughts which we cherish, to that one who, we believe, will
 most religiously attend to them.
 
 This life is not for complaint, but for satisfaction. I do not feel
 addressed by this letter of yours. It suggests only misunderstanding.
 Intercourse may be good; but of what use are complaints and apologies?
 Any complaint _I_ have to make is too serious to be uttered, for the
 evil cannot be mended.
 
 Turn over a new leaf.
 
 My outdoor harvest this fall has been one Canada lynx, a
 fierce-looking fellow, which, it seems, we have hereabouts; eleven
 barrels of apples from trees of my own planting; and a large crop of
 white oak acorns, which I did not raise.
 
 Please remember me to your family. I have a very pleasant recollection
 of your fireside, and I trust that I shall revisit it;--also of your
 shanty and the surrounding regions.
 
 
 TO HARRISON BLAKE (AT WORCESTER).
 
      CONCORD, September 26, 1859.
 
 MR. BLAKE,--I am not sure that I am in a fit mood to write to you, for
 I feel and think rather too much like a business man, having some very
 irksome affairs to attend to these months and years on account of my
 family.[93] This is the way I am serving King Admetus, confound him!
 If it were not for my relations, I would let the wolves prey on his
 flocks to their bellies' content. Such fellows you have to deal with!
 herdsmen of some other king, or of the same, who tell no tale, but in
 the sense of counting their flocks, and then lie drunk under a hedge.
 How is your grist ground? Not by some murmuring stream, while you lie
 dreaming on the bank; but, it seems, you must take hold with your
 hands, and shove the wheel round. You can't depend on streams, poor
 feeble things! You can't depend on worlds, left to themselves; but
 you've got to oil them and goad them along. In short, you've got to
 carry on two farms at once,--the farm on the earth and the farm in
 your mind. Those Crimean and Italian battles were mere boys'
 play,--they are the scrapes into which truants get. But what a battle
 a man must fight everywhere to maintain his standing army of thoughts,
 and march with them in orderly array through the always hostile
 country! How many enemies there are to sane thinking! Every soldier
 has succumbed to them before he enlists for those other battles. Men
 may sit in chambers, seemingly safe and sound, and yet despair, and
 turn out at last only hollowness and dust within, like a Dead Sea
 apple. A standing army of numerous, brave, and well-disciplined
 thoughts, and you at the head of them, marching straight to your
 goal,--how to bring this about is the problem, and Scott's Tactics
 will not help you to it. Think of a poor fellow begirt only with a
 sword-belt, and no such staff of athletic thoughts! his brains
 rattling as he walks and _talks_! These are your prtorian guard. It
 is easy enough to maintain a family, or a state, but it is hard to
 maintain these children of your brain (or say, rather, these guests
 that trust to enjoy your hospitality), they make such great demands;
 and yet, he who does only the former, and loses the power to _think_
 originally, or as only he ever can, fails miserably. Keep up the fires
 of thought, and all will go well.
 
 Zouaves?--pish! How you can overrun a country, climb any rampart, and
 carry any fortress, with an army of _alert_ thoughts!--thoughts that
 send their bullets home to heaven's door,--with which you can _take_
 the whole world, without paying for it, or robbing anybody. See, the
 conquering hero comes! You _fail_ in your thoughts, or you _prevail_
 in your thoughts only. Provided you _think_ well, the heavens falling,
 or the earth gaping, will be the music for you to march by. No foe can
 ever see you, or you him; you cannot so much as _think_ of him. Swords
 have no edges, bullets no penetration, for such a contest. In your
 mind must be a liquor which will dissolve the world whenever it is
 dropt in it. There is no universal solvent but this, and all things
 together cannot saturate it. It will hold the universe in solution,
 and yet be as translucent as ever. The vast machine may indeed roll
 over our toes, and we not know it, but it would rebound and be staved
 to pieces like an empty barrel, if it should strike fair and square on
 the smallest and least angular of a man's thoughts.
 
 You seem not to have taken Cape Cod the right way. I think that you
 should have persevered in walking on the beach and on the bank, even
 to the land's end, however soft, and so, by long knocking at Ocean's
 gate, have gained admittance at last,--better, if separately, and in a
 storm, not knowing where you would sleep by night, or eat by day. Then
 you should have given a day to the sand behind Provincetown, and
 ascended the hills there, and been blown on considerably. I hope that
 you like to remember the journey better than you did to make it.
 
 I have been confined at home all this year, but I am not aware that I
 have grown any rustier than was to be expected. One while I explored
 the bottom of the river pretty extensively. I have engaged to read a
 lecture to Parker's society on the 9th of October next.
 
 I am off--a-barberrying.
 
 
 TO HARRISON BLAKE (AT WORCESTER).
 
      CONCORD, October 31, 1859.
 
 MR. BLAKE,--I spoke to my townsmen last evening on "The Character of
 Captain Brown, now in the Clutches of the Slaveholder." I should like
 to speak to any company at Worcester who may wish to hear me; and will
 come if only my expenses are paid. I think we should express ourselves
 at once, while Brown is alive. The sooner the better. Perhaps
 Higginson may like to have a meeting. Wednesday evening would be a
 good time. The people here are deeply interested in the matter. Let me
 have an answer as soon as may be.
 
 P. S.--I may be engaged toward the end of the week.
 
      HENRY D. THOREAU.
 
 This address on John Brown was one of the first public utterances in
 favor of that hero; it was made up mainly from the entries in
 Thoreau's journals, since I had introduced Brown to him, and he to
 Emerson, in March, 1857; and especially from those pages that Thoreau
 had written after the news of Brown's capture in Virginia had reached
 him. It was first given in the vestry of the old parish church in
 Concord (where, in 1774, the Provincial Congress of Massachusetts had
 met to prepare for armed resistance to British tyranny); was repeated
 at Worcester the same week, and before a great audience in Boston, the
 following Sunday,--after which it was published in the newspapers, and
 had a wide reading. Mr. Alcott in his diary mentions it under date of
 Sunday, October 30, thus: "Thoreau reads a paper on John Brown, his
 virtues, spirit, and deeds, this evening, and to the delight of his
 company,--the best that could be gathered at short notice,--and among
 them Emerson. (November 4.) Thoreau calls and reports about the
 reading of his lecture on Brown at Boston and Worcester. He has been
 the first to speak and celebrate the hero's courage and magnanimity;
 it is these that he discerns and praises. The men have much in
 common,--the sturdy manliness, straightforwardness, and independence.
 (November 5.) Ricketson from New Bedford arrives; he and Thoreau take
 supper with us. Thoreau talks freely and enthusiastically about
 Brown,--denouncing the Union, the President, the States, and Virginia
 particularly; wishes to publish his late speech, and has seen Boston
 publishers, but failed to find any to print it for him." It was soon
 after published, along with Emerson's two speeches in favor of Brown,
 by a new Boston publishing house (Thayer & Eldridge), in a volume
 called "Echoes of Harper's Ferry," edited by the late James Redpath,
 Brown's first biographer. In the following summer, Thoreau sent a
 second paper on Brown (written soon after his execution) to be read at
 a commemoration of the martyr, beside his grave among the Adirondack
 Mountains. This is mentioned in his letter to Sophia Thoreau, July 8,
 1860. He took an active part in arranging for the funeral service in
 honor of Brown, at Concord, the day of his death, December 2, 1859.
 
 
 TO HARRISON BLAKE (AT WORCESTER).
 
      CONCORD, May 20, 1860.
 
 MR. BLAKE,--I must endeavor to pay some of my debts to you. To begin
 where we left off, then.
 
 The presumption is that _we_ are always the same; our opportunities,
 and Nature herself, fluctuating. Look at mankind. No great difference
 between two, apparently; perhaps the same height, and breadth, and
 weight; and yet, to the man who sits most east, this life is a
 weariness, routine, dust and ashes, and he drowns his imaginary
 _cares_ (!) (a sort of friction among his vital organs) in a bowl. But
 to the man who sits most west, his _contemporary_ (!), it is a field
 for all noble endeavors, an elysium, the dwelling-place of heroes and
 demigods. The former complains that he has a thousand affairs to
 attend to; but he does not realize that his affairs (though they may
 be a thousand) and he are one.
 
 Men and boys are learning all kinds of trades but how to make _men_ of
 themselves. They learn to make houses; but they are not so well
 housed, they are not so contented in their houses, as the woodchucks
 in their holes. What is the use of a house if you haven't got a
 tolerable planet to put it on?--if you cannot tolerate the planet it
 is on? Grade the ground first. If a man believes and expects great
 things of himself, it makes no odds where you put him, or what you
 show him (of course _you_ cannot put him anywhere, nor show him
 anything), he will be surrounded by grandeur. He is in the condition
 of a healthy and hungry man, who says to himself,--How sweet this
 crust is! If he despairs of himself, then Tophet is his
 dwelling-place, and he is in the condition of a sick man who is
 disgusted with the fruits of finest flavor.
 
 Whether he sleeps or wakes,--whether he runs or walks,--whether he
 uses a microscope or a telescope, or his naked eye,--a man never
 discovers anything, never overtakes anything, or leaves anything
 behind, but himself. Whatever he says or does, he merely reports
 himself. If he is in love, he _loves_; if he is in heaven, he
 _enjoys_; if he is in hell, he _suffers_. It is his condition that
 determines his locality.
 
 The principal, the only, thing a man makes, is his condition of fate.
 Though commonly he does not know it, nor put up a sign to this effect,
 "My own destiny made and mended here." (Not _yours_.) He is a master
 workman in the business. He works twenty-four hours a day at it, and
 gets it done. Whatever else he neglects or botches, no man was ever
 known to neglect this work. A great many pretend to make _shoes_
 chiefly, and would scout the idea that they make the hard times which
 they experience.
 
 Each reaching and aspiration is an instinct with which all nature
 consists and coperates, and therefore it is not in vain. But alas!
 each relaxing and desperation is an instinct too. To be active, well,
 happy, implies rare courage. To be ready to fight in a duel or a
 battle implies desperation, or that you hold your life cheap.
 
 If you take this life to be simply what old religious folks pretend (I
 mean the effete, gone to seed in a drought, mere human galls stung by
 the devil once), then all your joy and serenity is reduced to grinning
 and bearing it. The fact is, you have got to take the world on your
 shoulders like Atlas, and "put along" with it. You will do this for an
 idea's sake, and your success will be in proportion to your devotion
 to ideas. It may make your back ache occasionally, but you will have
 the satisfaction of hanging it or twirling it to suit yourself.
 Cowards suffer, heroes enjoy. After a long day's walk with it, pitch
 it into a hollow place, sit down and eat your luncheon. Unexpectedly,
 by some immortal thoughts, you will be compensated. The bank whereon
 you sit will be a fragrant and flowery one, and your world in the
 hollow a sleek and light gazelle.
 
 Where is the "unexplored land" but in our own untried enterprises? To
 an adventurous spirit any place--London, New York, Worcester, or his
 own yard--is "unexplored land," to seek which Frmont and Kane travel
 so far. To a sluggish and defeated spirit even the Great Basin and the
 Polaris are trivial places. If they can get there (and, indeed, they
 are there now), they will want to sleep, and give it up, just as they
 always do. These are the regions of the Known and of the Unknown. What
 is the use of going right over the old track again? There is an adder
 in the path which your own feet have worn. You must make tracks into
 the Unknown. That is what you have your board and clothes for. Why do
 you ever mend your clothes, unless that, wearing them, you may mend
 your ways? Let us sing.
 
 
 TO SOPHIA THOREAU (AT CAMPTON, N. H.).
 
      CONCORD, July 8, 1860.
 
 DEAR SOPHIA,--Mother reminds me that I must write to you, if only a
 few lines, though I have sprained my thumb, so that it is questionable
 whether I can write legibly, if at all. I can't "bear on" much. What
 is worse, I believe that I have sprained my brain too--that is, it
 sympathizes with my thumb. But that is no excuse, I suppose, for
 writing a letter in such a case is like sending a newspaper, only a
 hint to let you know that "all is well,"--but my thumb.
 
 I hope that you begin to derive some benefit from that more
 mountainous air which you are breathing. Have you had a distinct view
 of the Franconia Notch Mountains (blue peaks in the northern horizon)?
 which I told you you could get from the road in Campton, probably from
 some other points nearer. Such a view of the mountains is more
 memorable than any other. Have you been to Squam Lake or overlooked
 it? I should think that you could make an excursion to some mountain
 in that direction from which you could see the lake and mountains
 generally. Is there no friend of N. P. Rogers who can tell you where
 the "lions" are?
 
 Of course I did not go to North Elba,[94] but I sent some
 reminiscences of last fall. I hear that John Brown, Jr., has now come
 to Boston for a few days. Mr. Sanborn's case, it is said, will come on
 after some murder cases have been disposed of here.
 
 I have just been invited formally to be present at the annual picnic
 of Theodore Parker's society (that was), at Waverley, next Wednesday,
 and to make some remarks. But that is wholly out of my line. I do not
 go to picnics, even in Concord, you know.
 
 Mother and Aunt Sophia rode to Acton in time yesterday. I suppose that
 you have heard that Mr. Hawthorne has come home. I went to meet him
 the other evening and found that he has not altered, except that he
 was looking quite brown after his voyage. He is as simple and
 childlike as ever.
 
 I believe that I have fairly scared the kittens away, at last, by my
 pretended fierceness, which was. I will consider my thumb--and your
 eyes.
 
      HENRY.
 
 
 TO HARRISON BLAKE (AT WORCESTER).
 
      CONCORD, August 3, 1860.
 
 MR. BLAKE,--I some time ago asked Channing if he would not spend a
 week with me on Monadnock; but he did not answer decidedly. Lately he
 has talked of an excursion somewhere, but I said that _now_ I must
 wait till my sister returned from Plymouth, N. H. She has
 returned,--and accordingly, on receiving your note this morning, I
 made known its contents to Channing, in order to see how far I was
 engaged with him. The result is that he decides to go to Monadnock
 to-morrow morning;[95] so I must defer making an excursion with you
 and Brown to another season. Perhaps you will call as you pass the
 mountain. I send this by the earliest mail.
 
 P. S.--That was a very insufficient visit which you made here the last
 time. My mother is better, though far from well; and if you should
 chance along here any time after your journey, I trust that we shall
 all do better.
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 The mention by Thoreau of John Brown and my "case" recalls to me an
 incident of those excited days which followed the attack by Brown on
 slavery in Virginia. The day after Brown's death, but before the
 execution of his comrades, I received a message from the late Dr.
 David Thayer of Boston, implying, as I thought, that a son of Brown
 was at his house, whither I hurried to meet him. Instead, I found
 young F. J. Merriam of Boston, who had escaped with Owen Brown from
 Harper's Ferry, and was now in Boston to raise another party against
 the slaveholders. He was unfit to lead or even join in such a
 desperate undertaking, and we insisted he should return to safety in
 Canada,--a large reward being offered for his seizure. He agreed to go
 back to Canada that night by the Fitchburg Railroad; but in his
 hot-headed way he took the wrong train, which ran no farther than
 Concord,--and found himself in the early evening at my house, where my
 sister received him, but insisted that I should not see him, lest I
 might be questioned about my guest. While he had supper and went to
 bed, I posted down to Mr. Emerson's and engaged his horse and covered
 wagon, to be ready at sunrise,--he asking no questions. In the same
 way I engaged Mr. Thoreau to drive his friend's horse to South Acton
 the next morning, and there put on board the first Canadian train a
 Mr. Lockwood, whom he would find at my house. Thoreau readily consented,
 asked no questions, walked to the Emerson stable the next morning,
 found the horse ready, drove him to my door, and took up Merriam,
 under the name of Lockwood,--neither knowing who the other was.
 Merriam was so flighty that, though he had agreed to go to Montreal,
 and knew that his life might depend on getting there early, he declared
 he must see Mr. Emerson, to lay before him his plan for invading the
 South, and consult him about some moral questions that troubled his
 mind. His companion listened gravely,--and hurried the horse towards
 Acton. Merriam grew more positive and suspicious,--"Perhaps YOU are
 Mr. Emerson; you look somewhat like him."[96] "No, I am not," said
 Thoreau, and drove steadily away from Concord. "Well, then, I am going
 back," said the youth, and flung himself out of the wagon. How Thoreau
 got him in again, he never told me; but I suspected some judicious
 force, accompanying the grave persuasive speech natural to our friend.
 At any rate, he took his man to Acton, saw him safe on the train, and
 reported to me that "Mr. Lockwood had taken passage for Canada," where
 he arrived that night. Nothing more passed between us until, more than
 two years after, he inquired one day, in his last illness, who my
 fugitive was. Merriam was then out of danger in that way, and had been
 for months a soldier in the Union army, where he died. I therefore
 said that "Lockwood" was the grandson of his mother's old friend,
 Francis Jackson, and had escaped from Maryland. In return he gave me
 the odd incidents of their drive, and mentioned that he had spoken of
 the affair to his mother only since his illness. So reticent and
 practically useful could he be; as Channing says, "He made no useless
 professions, never asked one of those questions which destroy all
 relation; but he was on the spot at the time, he meant friendship,
 and meant nothing else, and stood by it without the slightest
 abatement."
 
 
 TO HARRISON BLAKE (AT WORCESTER).
 
      CONCORD, November 4, 1860.
 
 MR. BLAKE,--I am glad to hear any particulars of your excursion. As
 for myself, I looked out for you somewhat on that Monday, when, it
 appears, you passed Monadnock; turned my glass upon several parties
 that were ascending the mountain half a mile on one side of us. In
 short, I came as near to seeing you as you to seeing me. I have no
 doubt that we should have had a good time if you had come, for I had,
 all ready, two good spruce houses, in which you could stand up,
 complete in all respects, half a mile apart, and you and B. could have
 lodged by yourselves in one, if not with us.
 
 We made an excellent beginning of our mountain life.[97] You may
 remember that the Saturday previous was a stormy day. Well, we went up
 in the rain,--wet through,--and found ourselves in a cloud there at
 mid-afternoon, in no situation to look about for the best place for a
 camp. So I proceeded at once, through the cloud, to that memorable
 stone, "chunk yard," in which we made our humble camp once, and there,
 after putting our packs under a rock, having a good hatchet, I
 proceeded to build a substantial house, which Channing declared the
 handsomest he ever saw. (He never camped out before, and was, no
 doubt, prejudiced in its favor.) This was done about dark, and by that
 time we were nearly as wet as if we had stood in a hogshead of water.
 We then built a fire before the door, directly on the site of our
 little camp of two years ago, and it took a long time to burn through
 its remains to the earth beneath. Standing before this, and turning
 round slowly, like meat that is roasting, we were as dry, if not
 drier, than ever, after a few hours, and so at last we "turned in."
 
 This was a great deal better than going up there in fair weather, and
 having no adventure (not knowing how to appreciate either fair weather
 or foul) but dull, commonplace sleep in a useless house, and before a
 comparatively useless fire,--such as we get every night. Of course we
 thanked our stars, when we saw them, which was about midnight, that
 they had seemingly withdrawn for a season. We had the mountain all to
 ourselves that afternoon and night. There was nobody going up that day
 to engrave his name on the summit, nor to gather blueberries. The
 genius of the mountains saw us starting from Concord, and it said,
 There come two of our folks. Let us get ready for them. Get up a
 serious storm, that will send a-packing these holiday guests. (They
 may have their say another time.) Let us receive them with true
 mountain hospitality,--kill the fatted cloud. Let them know the value
 of a spruce roof, and of a fire of dead spruce stumps. Every bush
 dripped tears of joy at our advent. Fire did its best, and received
 our thanks. What could fire have done in fair weather? Spruce roof got
 its share of our blessings. And then, such a view of the wet rocks,
 with the wet lichens on them, as we had the next morning, but did not
 get again!
 
 We and the mountain had a sound season, as the saying is. How glad we
 were to be wet, in order that we might be dried! How glad we were of
 the storm which made our house seem like a new home to us! This day's
 experience was indeed lucky, for we did not have a thunder-shower
 during all our stay. Perhaps our host reserved this attention in order
 to tempt us to come again.
 
 Our next house was more substantial still. One side was rock, good for
 durability; the floor the same; and the roof which I made would have
 upheld a horse. I stood on it to do the shingling.
 
 I noticed, when I was at the White Mountains last, several nuisances
 which render traveling thereabouts unpleasant. The chief of these was
 the mountain houses. I might have supposed that the main attraction of
 that region, even to citizens, lay in its wildness and unlikeness to
 the city, and yet they make it as much like the city as they can
 afford to. I heard that the Crawford House was lighted with gas, and
 had a large saloon, with its band of music, for dancing. But give me a
 spruce house made in the rain.
 
   [Illustration: _From the Summit of Monadnock_]
 
 An old Concord farmer tells me that he ascended Monadnock once, and
 danced on the top. How did that happen? Why, he being up there, a
 party of young men and women came up, bringing boards and a fiddler;
 and, having laid down the boards, they made a level floor, on which
 they danced to the music of the fiddle. I suppose the tune was
 "Excelsior." This reminds me of the fellow who climbed to the top of a
 very high spire, stood upright on the ball, and hurrahed for--what?
 Why, for Harrison and Tyler. That's the kind of sound which most
 ambitious people emit when they culminate. They are wont to be
 singularly frivolous in the thin atmosphere; they can't contain
 themselves, though our comfort and their safety require it; it takes
 the pressure of many atmospheres to do this; and hence they helplessly
 evaporate there. It would seem that as they ascend, they breathe
 shorter and shorter, and, at each _expiration_, some of their wits
 leave them, till, when they reach the pinnacle, they are so
 light-headed as to be fit only to show how the wind sits. I suspect
 that Emerson's criticism called "Monadnoc" was inspired, not by
 remembering the inhabitants of New Hampshire as they are in the
 valleys, so much as by meeting some of them on the mountain-top.
 
 After several nights' experience, Channing came to the conclusion that
 he was "lying outdoors," and inquired what was the largest beast that
 might nibble his legs there. I fear that he did not improve all the
 night, as he might have done, to sleep. I had asked him to go and
 spend a week there. We spent five nights, being gone six days, for C.
 suggested that six working days made a week, and I saw that he was
 ready to _decamp_. However, he found his account in it as well as I.
 
 We were seen to go up in the rain, grim and silent, like two genii of
 the storm, by Fassett's men or boys; but we were never identified
 afterward, though we were the subject of some conversation which we
 overheard. Five hundred persons at least came on to the mountain while
 we were there, but not one found our camp. We saw one party of three
 ladies and two gentlemen spread their blankets and spend the night on
 the top, and heard them converse; but they did not know that they had
 neighbors who were comparatively old settlers. We spared them the
 chagrin which that knowledge would have caused them, and let them
 print their story in a newspaper accordingly.
 
 Yes, to meet men on an honest and simple footing, meet with rebuffs,
 suffer from sore feet, as you did,--ay, and from a sore heart, as
 perhaps you also did,--all that is excellent. What a pity that that
 young prince[98] could not enjoy a little of the legitimate experience
 of traveling--be dealt with simply and truly, though rudely. He might
 have been invited to some hospitable house in the country, had his
 bowl of bread and milk set before him, with a clean pinafore; been
 told that there were the punt and the fishing-rod, and he could amuse
 himself as he chose; might have swung a few birches, dug out a
 woodchuck, and had a regular good time, and finally been sent to bed
 with the boys,--and so never have been introduced to Mr. Everett at
 all. I have no doubt that this would have been a far more memorable
 and valuable experience than he got.
 
 The snow-clad summit of Mt. Washington must have been a very
 interesting sight from Wachusett. How wholesome winter is, seen far or
 near; how good, above all mere sentimental, warm-blooded,
 short-lived, soft-hearted, _moral_ goodness, commonly so called. Give
 me the goodness which has forgotten its own deeds,--which God has seen
 to be good, and let be. None of your _just made perfect_,--pickled
 eels! All that will save them will be their picturesqueness, as with
 blasted trees. Whatever is, and is not ashamed to be, is good. I value
 no moral goodness or greatness unless it is good or great, even as
 that snowy peak is. Pray, how could thirty feet of bowels improve it?
 Nature is goodness crystallized. You looked into the land of promise.
 Whatever beauty we behold, the more it is distant, serene, and cold,
 the purer and more durable it is. It is better to warm ourselves with
 ice than with fire.
 
 Tell Brown that he sent me more than the price of the book, viz., a
 word from himself, for which I am greatly his debtor.
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 Thoreau began to be more seriously ill than he had been for some
 years, early in December, 1860. He exposed himself unduly in one of
 his walks, while counting the rings on stumps of trees, amid snow. He
 ceased much of his small activity of letter-writing; but, in
 addressing Ricketson the next spring, he took the unusual pains of
 writing him a letter of some length which he never sent. It was found
 among his papers after death,--the first draft of it, which ran as
 follows, but was left a fragment:--
 
 
 TO DANIEL RICKETSON (AT NEW BEDFORD).
 
      Concord, March 19, 1861.
 
 FRIEND R,--Your letter reached me in due time, but I had already heard
 the bluebirds. They were here on the 26th of February at least,--but
 not yet do the larks sing or the flickers call, with us. The bluebirds
 come again, as does the same spring, but it does not find the same
 mortals here to greet it. You remember Minott's cottage on the
 hillside,--well, it finds some change there, for instance. The little
 gray hip-roofed cottage was occupied at the beginning of February,
 this year, by George Minott and his sister Mary, respectively 78 and
 80 years old, and Miss Potter, 74. These had been its permanent
 occupants for many years. Minott had been on his last legs for some
 time,--at last off his legs, expecting weekly to take his
 departure,--a burden to himself and friends,--yet dry and natural as
 ever. His sister took care of him, and supported herself and family
 with her needle, as usual. He lately willed his little property to
 her, as a slight compensation for her care. Feb. 13 their sister, 86
 or 87, who lived across the way, died. Miss Minott had taken cold in
 visiting her, and was so sick that she could not go to her funeral.
 She herself died of lung fever[99] on the 18th (which was said to be
 the same disease that her sister had),--having just willed her
 property back to George, and added her own mite to it. Miss Potter,
 too, had now become ill,--too ill to attend the funeral,--and she died
 of the same disease on the 23d. All departed as gently as the sun
 goes down, leaving George alone.
 
 I called to see him the other day,--the 27th of February, a remarkably
 pleasant spring day,--and as I was climbing the sunny slope to his
 strangely deserted house, I heard the first bluebirds upon the elm
 that hangs over it. They had come as usual, though some who used to
 hear them were gone. Even Minott had not heard them, though the door
 was open,--for he was thinking of other things. Perhaps there will be
 a time when the bluebirds themselves will not return any more.
 
 I hear that George, a few days after this, called out to his niece,
 who had come to take care of him, and was in the next room, to know if
 she did not feel lonely? "Yes, I do," said she. "So do I," added he.
 He said he was like an old oak, all shattered and decaying. "I am
 sure, Uncle," said his niece, "you are not much like an oak!" "I
 mean," said he, "that I am like an oak or any other tree, inasmuch as
 I cannot stir from where I am."
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 Either this topic was too pathetic for Thoreau to finish the letter,
 or perchance he thought it not likely to interest his friend; for he
 threw aside this draft for three days, and then, with the same
 beginning, wrote a very different letter. The Minotts were old
 familiar acquaintance, and related to that Captain Minott whom
 Thoreau's grandmother married as a second husband. George was his "old
 man of Verona," who had not left Concord for more than forty years,
 except to stray over the town bounds in hunting or wood-ranging; and
 Mary was the "tailoress" who for years made Thoreau's garments.
 
 
 TO DANIEL RICKETSON (AT NEW BEDFORD).
 
      CONCORD, March 22, 1861.
 
 FRIEND RICKETSON,--The bluebird was here the 26th of February, at
 least, which is one day earlier than you date; but I have not heard of
 larks nor pigeon woodpeckers. To tell the truth, I am not on the alert
 for the signs of spring, not having had any winter yet. I took a
 severe cold about the 3d of December, which at length resulted in a
 kind of bronchitis, so that I have been confined to the house ever
 since, excepting a very few experimental trips as far as the
 post-office in some particularly fine noons. My health otherwise has
 not been affected in the least, nor my spirits. I have simply been
 imprisoned for so long, and it has not prevented my doing a good deal
 of reading and the like.
 
 Channing has looked after me very faithfully; says he has made a study
 of my case, and knows me better than I know myself, etc., etc. Of
 course, if I knew how it began, I should know better how it would end.
 I trust that when warm weather comes I shall begin to pick up my
 crumbs. I thank you for your invitation to come to New Bedford, and
 will bear it in mind; but at present my health will not permit my
 leaving home.
 
 The day I received your letter, Blake and Brown arrived here, having
 walked from Worcester in two days, though Alcott, who happened in soon
 after, could not understand what pleasure they found in walking
 across the country in this season, when the ways were so unsettled. I
 had a solid talk with them for a day and a half--though my pipes were
 not in good order--and they went their way again.
 
 You may be interested to hear that Alcott is at present, perhaps, the
 most successful man in the town. He had his second annual exhibition
 of all the schools in the town, at the Town Hall last Saturday; at
 which all the masters and misses did themselves great credit, as I
 hear, and of course reflected some on their teachers and parents. They
 were making their little speeches from one till six o'clock P. M., to
 a large audience, which patiently listened to the end. In the
 meanwhile, the children made Mr. Alcott an unexpected present of a
 fine edition of "Pilgrim's Progress" and Herbert's Poems, which, of
 course, overcame all parties. I inclose an order of exercises.[100]
 
 We had, last night, an old-fashioned northeast snow-storm, far worse
 than anything in the winter; and the drifts are now very high above
 the fences. The inhabitants are pretty much confined to their houses,
 as I was already. All houses are one color, white, with the snow
 plastered over them, and you cannot tell whether they have blinds or
 not. Our pump has another pump, its ghost, as thick as itself,
 sticking to one side of it. The town has sent out teams of eight oxen
 each, to break out the roads; and the train due from Boston at 8 A.
 M. has not arrived yet (4 P. M.). All the passing has been a train
 from above at 12 M., which also was due at 8 A. M. Where are the
 bluebirds now, think you? I suppose that you have not so much snow at
 New Bedford, if any.
 
 
 TO PARKER PILLSBURY (AT CONCORD N. H.).
 
      CONCORD, April 10, 1861.
 
 FRIEND PILLSBURY,--I am sorry to say that I have not a copy of
 "Walden" which I can spare; and know of none, unless possibly Ticknor
 & Fields may have one. I send, nevertheless, a copy of "The Week," the
 price of which is one dollar and twenty-five cents, which you can pay
 at your convenience.
 
 As for your friend, my prospective reader, I hope he ignores Fort
 Sumter, and "Old Abe," and all that; for that is just the most fatal,
 and, indeed, the only fatal weapon you can direct against evil, ever;
 for, as long as you _know of it_, you are _particeps criminis_. What
 business have you, if you are an "angel of light," to be pondering
 over the deeds of darkness, reading the _New York Herald_, and the
 like?
 
 I do not so much regret the present condition of things in this
 country (provided I regret it at all), as I do that I ever heard of
 it. I know one or two, who have this year, for the first time, read a
 President's Message; but they do not see that this implies a _fall_
 in themselves, rather than a _rise_ in the President. Blessed were the
 days before you read a President's Message. Blessed are the young, for
 they do not read the President's Message. Blessed are they who never
 read a newspaper, for they shall see Nature, and, through her, God.
 
 But, alas! _I_ have heard of Sumter and Pickens, and even of Buchanan
 (though I did not read his Message). I also read the _New York
 Tribune_; but then, I am reading Herodotus and Strabo, and Blodget's
 "Climatology," and "Six Years in the Desert of North America," as hard
 as I can, to counterbalance it.
 
 By the way, Alcott is at present our most popular and successful man,
 and has just published a volume in size, in the shape of the Annual
 School Report, which I presume he has sent to you.
 
 Yours, for remembering all good things,
 
      HENRY D. THOREAU.
 
 Parker Pillsbury, to whom this letter went, was an old friend of the
 Thoreau family, with whom he became intimate in the antislavery
 agitation, wherein they took part, while he was a famous orator,
 celebrated by Emerson in one of his essays. Mr. Pillsbury visited
 Thoreau in his last illness, when he could scarcely speak above a
 whisper, and, having made to him some remark concerning the future
 life, Thoreau replied, "My friend, one world at a time." His petulant
 words in this letter concerning national affairs would hardly have
 been said a few days later, when, at the call of Abraham Lincoln, the
 people rose to protect their government, and every President's Message
 became of thrilling interest, even to Thoreau.
 
 Arrangements were now making for the invalid, about whose health his
 friends had been anxious for some years, to travel for a better
 climate than the New England spring affords, and early in May Thoreau
 set out for the upper Mississippi. He thus missed the last letter sent
 to him by his English friend Cholmondeley, which I answered, then
 forwarded to him at Redwing, in Minnesota. It is of interest enough to
 be given here.
 
 
 T. CHOLMONDELEY TO THOREAU (IN MINNESOTA).
 
      SHREWSBURY [England], April 23, 1861.
 
 MY DEAR THOREAU,--It is now some time since I wrote to you or heard
 from you, but do not suppose that I have forgotten you, or shall ever
 cease to cherish in my mind those days at dear old Concord. The last I
 heard about you all was from Morton,[101] who was in England about a
 year ago; and I hope that he has got over his difficulties and is now
 in his own country again. I think he has seen rather more of English
 country life than most Yankee tourists; and appeared to find it
 _curious_, though I fear he was dulled by our ways; for he was too
 full of ceremony and compliments and bows, which is a mistake here;
 though very well in Spain. I am afraid he was rather on pins and
 needles; but he made a splendid speech at a volunteer supper, and
 indeed the _very best_, some said, ever heard in this part of the
 country.
 
 We are here in a state of alarm and apprehension, the world being so
 troubled in East and West and everywhere. Last year the harvest was
 bad and scanty. This year our trade is beginning to feel the events in
 America. In reply to the northern tariff, of course we are going to
 smuggle as much as we can. The supply of cotton being such a necessity
 to us, we must work up India and South Africa a little better. There
 is war even in old New Zealand, but not in the same island where my
 people are! Besides, we are certainly on the eve of a continental
 blaze, _so we are making merry and living while we can_; not being
 sure where we shall be this time a year.
 
 Give my affectionate regards to your father, mother, and sister, and
 to Mr. Emerson and his family, and to Channing, Sanborn, Ricketson,
 Blake, and Morton and Alcott and Parker. A thought arises in my mind
 whether I may not be enumerating some dead men! Perhaps Parker is!
 
 These rumors of wars make me wish that we had got done with this
 brutal stupidity of war altogether; and I believe, Thoreau, that the
 human race will at last get rid of it, though perhaps not in a
 creditable way; but such _powers_ will be brought to bear that it will
 become monstrous even to the French. Dundonald declared to the last
 that he possessed secrets which from their tremendous character would
 make war impossible. So peace may be begotten from the machinations of
 evil.
 
 Have you heard of any good books lately? I think "Burnt Njal" good,
 and believe it to be genuine. "Hast thou not heard" (says Steinrora to
 Thangbrand) "how Thor challenged Christ to single combat, and how he
 did not dare to fight with Thor?" When Gunnar brandishes his sword,
 three swords are seen in air. The account of Ospah and Brodir and
 Brian's battle is the only historical account of that engagement,
 which the Irish talk so much of; for I place little trust in
 O'Halloran's authority, though the outline is the same in both.
 
 Darwin's "Origin of Species" may be fanciful, but it is a move in the
 right direction. Emerson's "Conduct of Life" has done me good; but it
 will not go down in England for a generation or so. But _these_ are
 some of them already a year or two old. The book of the season is Du
 Chaillu's "Central Africa," with accounts of the Gorilla, of which you
 are aware that you have had a skeleton at Boston for many years. There
 is also one in the British Museum; but they have now several stuffed
 specimens at the Geographical Society's rooms in Town. I suppose you
 will have seen Sir Emerson Tennent's "Ceylon," which is perhaps as
 complete a book as ever was published; and a better monument to a
 governor's residence in a great province was never made.
 
 We have been lately astonished by a foreign Hamlet, a supposed
 impossibility; but Mr. Fechter does real wonders. No doubt he will
 visit America, and then you may see the best actor in the world. He
 has carried out Goethe's idea of Hamlet as given in the "Wilhelm
 Meister," showing him forth as a fair-haired and fat man. I suppose
 you are not got fat yet?
 
      Yours ever truly,
      THOS. CHOLMONDELEY.[102]
 
 
 TO HARRISON BLAKE (AT WORCESTER).
 
      CONCORD, May 3, 1861.
 
 MR. BLAKE,--I am still as much an invalid as when you and Brown were
 here, if not more of one, and at this rate there is danger that the
 cold weather may come again, before I get over my bronchitis. The
 doctor accordingly tells me that I must "clear out" to the West
 Indies, or elsewhere,--he does not seem to care much where. But I
 decide against the West Indies, on account of their muggy heat in the
 summer, and the South of Europe, on account of the expense of time and
 money, and have at last concluded that it will be most expedient for
 me to try the air of Minnesota, say somewhere about St. Paul's. I am
 only waiting to be well enough to start. Hope to get off within a week
 or ten days.
 
 The inland air may help me at once, or it may not. At any rate, I am
 so much of an invalid that I shall have to study my comfort in
 traveling to a remarkable degree,--stopping to rest, etc., etc., if
 need be. I think to get a through ticket to Chicago, with liberty to
 stop frequently on the way, making my first stop of consequence at
 Niagara Falls, several days or a week, at a private boarding-house;
 then a night or day at Detroit; and as much at Chicago as my health
 may require. At Chicago I can decide at what point (Fulton, Dunleith,
 or another) to strike the Mississippi, and take a boat to St. Paul's.
 
 I trust to find a private boarding-house in one or various agreeable
 places in that region, and spend my time there. I expect, and shall be
 prepared, to be gone three months; and I would like to return by a
 different route,--perhaps Mackinaw and Montreal.
 
 I have thought of finding a companion, of course, yet not seriously,
 because I had no right to offer myself as a companion to anybody,
 having such a peculiarly private and all-absorbing but miserable
 business as _my_ health, and not altogether _his_, to attend to,
 causing me to stop here and go there, etc., etc., unaccountably.
 
 Nevertheless, I have just now decided to let you know of my intention,
 thinking it barely possible that you might like to make a part or the
 whole of this journey at the same time, and that perhaps your own
 health may be such as to be benefited by it.
 
 Pray let me know if such a statement offers any temptations to you. I
 write in great haste for the mail, and must omit all the moral.
 
 
 TO F. B. SANBORN (AT CONCORD).
 
      REDWING, MINNESOTA, June 26, 1861.
 
 MR. SANBORN,--I was very glad to find awaiting me, on my arrival here
 on Sunday afternoon, a letter from you. I have performed this journey
 in a very dead and alive manner, but nothing has come so near waking
 me up as the receipt of letters from Concord. I read yours, and one
 from my sister (and Horace Mann, his four), near the top of a
 remarkable isolated bluff here, called Barn Bluff, or the Grange, or
 Redwing Bluff, some four hundred and fifty feet high, and half a mile
 long,--a bit of the main bluff or bank standing alone. The top, as you
 know, rises to the general level of the surrounding country, the river
 having eaten out so much. Yet the valley just above and below this (we
 are at the head of Lake Pepin) must be three or four miles wide.
 
 I am not even so well informed as to the progress of the war as you
 suppose. I have seen but one Eastern paper (that, by the way, _was_
 the _Tribune_) for five weeks. I have not taken much pains to get
 them; but, necessarily, I have not seen any paper at all for more
 than a week at a time. The people of Minnesota have _seemed_ to me
 more cold,--to feel less implicated in this war than the people of
 Massachusetts. It is apparent that Massachusetts, for one State at
 least, is doing much more than her share in carrying it on. However, I
 have dealt partly with those of Southern birth, and have seen but
 little way beneath the surface. I was glad to be told yesterday that
 there was a good deal of weeping here at Redwing the other day, when
 the volunteers stationed at Fort Snelling followed the regulars to the
 seat of the war. They do not weep when their children go _up_ the
 river to occupy the deserted forts, though they _may_ have to fight
 the Indians there.
 
 I do not even know what the attitude of England is at present.
 
 The grand feature hereabouts is, of course, the Mississippi River. Too
 much can hardly be said of its grandeur, and of the beauty of this
 portion of it (from Dunleith, and probably from Rock Island to this
 place). St. Paul is a dozen miles below the Falls of St. Anthony, or
 near the head of uninterrupted navigation on the main stream, about
 two thousand miles from its mouth. There is not a "rip" below that,
 and the river is almost as wide in the upper as the lower part of its
 course. Steamers go up the Sauk Rapids, above the Falls, near a
 hundred miles farther, and then you are fairly in the pine woods and
 lumbering country. Thus it flows from the pine to the palm.
 
 The lumber, as you know, is sawed chiefly at the Falls of St. Anthony
 (what is not rafted in the log to ports far below), having given rise
 to the towns of St. Anthony, Minneapolis, etc., etc. In coming up the
 river from Dunleith, you meet with great rafts of sawed lumber and of
 logs, twenty rods or more in length, by five or six wide, floating
 down, all from the pine region above the Falls. An old Maine lumberer,
 who has followed the same business here, tells me that the sources of
 the Mississippi were comparatively free from rocks and rapids, making
 easy work for them; but he thought that the timber was more knotty
 here than in Maine.
 
 It has chanced that about half the men whom I have spoken with in
 Minnesota, whether travelers or settlers, were from Massachusetts.
 
 After spending some three weeks in and about St. Paul, St. Anthony,
 and Minneapolis, we made an excursion in a steamer, some three hundred
 or more miles up the Minnesota (St. Peter's) River, to Redwood, or the
 Lower Sioux Agency, in order to see the plains, and the Sioux, who
 were to receive their annual payment there. This is eminently _the_
 river of Minnesota (for she shares the Mississippi with Wisconsin),
 and it is of incalculable value to her. It flows through a very
 fertile country destined to be famous for its wheat; but it is a
 remarkably winding stream, so that Redwood is only half as far from
 its mouth by land as by water. There was not a straight reach a mile
 in length as far as we went,--generally you could not see a quarter of
 a mile of water, and the boat was steadily turning this way or that.
 At the greater bends, as the Traverse des Sioux, some of the
 passengers were landed, and walked across to be taken in on the other
 side. Two or three times you could have thrown a stone across the
 neck of the isthmus, while it was from one to three miles around it.
 It was a very novel kind of navigation to me. The boat was perhaps the
 largest that had been up so high, and the water was rather low (it had
 been about fifteen feet higher). In making a short turn, we repeatedly
 and designedly ran square into the steep and soft bank, taking in a
 cart-load of earth,--this being more effectual than the rudder to
 fetch us about again; or the deeper water was so narrow and close to
 the shore, that we were obliged to run into and break down at least
 fifty trees which overhung the water, when we did not cut them off,
 repeatedly losing a part of our outworks, though the most exposed had
 been taken in. I could pluck almost any plant on the bank from the
 boat. We very frequently got aground, and then drew ourselves along
 with a windlass and a cable fastened to a tree, or we swung round in
 the current, and completely blocked up and blockaded the river, one
 end of the boat resting on each shore. And yet we would haul ourselves
 round again with the windlass and cable in an hour or two, though the
 boat was about one hundred and sixty feet long, and drew some three
 feet of water, or, often, water and sand. It was one consolation to
 know that in such a case we were all the while damming the river, and
 so raising it. We once ran fairly on to a concealed rock, with a shock
 that aroused all the passengers, and rested there, and the mate went
 below with a lamp, expecting to find a hole, but he did not. Snags and
 sawyers were so common that I forgot to mention them. The sound of the
 boat rumbling over one was the ordinary music. However, as long as
 the boiler did not burst, we knew that no serious accident was likely
 to happen. Yet this was a singularly navigable river, more so than the
 Mississippi above the Falls, and it is owing to its very crookedness.
 Ditch it straight, and it would not only be very swift, but soon run
 out. It was from ten to fifteen rods wide near the mouth, and from
 eight to ten or twelve at Redwood. Though the current was swift, I did
 not see a "rip" on it, and only three or four rocks. For three months
 in the year I am told that it can be navigated by small steamers about
 twice as far as we went, or to its source in Big Stone Lake; and a
 former Indian agent told me that at high water it was thought that
 such a steamer might pass into the Red River.
 
 In short, this river proved so very _long_ and navigable, that I was
 reminded of the last letter or two in the voyage of the Baron la
 Hontan (written near the end of the seventeenth century, I _think_),
 in which he states, that, after reaching the Mississippi (by the
 Illinois or Wisconsin), the limit of previous exploration westward, he
 voyaged up it with his Indians, and at length turned up a great river
 coming in from the west, which he called "La Rivire Longue;" and he
 relates various improbable things about the country and its
 inhabitants, so that this letter has been regarded as pure fiction,
 or, more properly speaking, a lie. But I am somewhat inclined now to
 reconsider the matter.
 
 The Governor of Minnesota (Ramsay), the superintendent of Indian
 affairs in this quarter, and the newly appointed Indian agent were on
 board; also a German band from St. Paul, a small cannon for salutes,
 and the money for the Indians (ay, and the gamblers, it was said, who
 were to bring it back in another boat). There were about one hundred
 passengers, chiefly from St. Paul, and more or less recently from the
 northeastern States; also half a dozen young educated Englishmen.
 Chancing to speak with one who sat next to me, when the voyage was
 nearly half over, I found that he was the son of the Rev. Samuel
 May,[103] and a classmate of yours, and had been looking for us at St.
 Anthony.
 
 The last of the little settlements on the river was New Ulm, about one
 hundred miles this side of Redwood. It consists wholly of Germans. We
 left them one hundred barrels of salt, which will be worth something
 more when the water is lowest than at present.
 
 Redwood is a mere locality,--scarcely an Indian village,--where there
 is a store, and some houses have been built for them. We were now
 fairly on the great plains, and looking south; and, after walking that
 way three miles, could see no tree in that horizon. The buffalo were
 said to be feeding within twenty-five or thirty miles.
 
 A regular council was held with the Indians, who had come in on their
 ponies, and speeches were made on both sides through an interpreter,
 quite in the described mode,--the Indians, as usual, having the
 advantage in point of truth and earnestness, and therefore of
 eloquence. The most prominent chief was named Little Crow. They were
 quite dissatisfied with the white man's treatment of them, and
 probably have reason to be so. This council was to be continued for
 two or three days,--the payment to be made the second day; and another
 payment to other bands a little higher up, on the Yellow Medicine (a
 tributary of the Minnesota), a few days thereafter.
 
 In the afternoon, the half-naked Indians performed a dance, at the
 request of the Governor, for our amusement and their own benefit; and
 then we took leave of them, and of the officials who had come to treat
 with them.
 
 Excuse these pencil marks, but my inkstand is _unscrewable_, and I can
 only direct my letter at the bar. I could tell you more, and perhaps
 more interesting things, if I had time. I am considerably better than
 when I left home, but still far from well.
 
 Our faces are already set toward home. Will you please let my sister
 know that we shall _probably_ start for Milwaukee and Mackinaw in a
 day or two (or as soon as we hear from home) _via_ Prairie du Chien,
 and not La Crosse.
 
 I am glad to hear that you have written Cholmondeley,[104] as it
 relieves me of some _responsibility_.
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 The tour described in this long letter was the first and last that
 Thoreau ever made west of the Mohawk Valley, though his friend
 Channing had early visited the great prairies, and lived in log cabins
 of Illinois, or sailed on the chain of great lakes, by which Thoreau
 made a part of this journey. It was proposed that Channing should
 accompany him this time, as he had in the tour through Lower Canada,
 and along Cape Cod, as well as in the journeys through the Berkshire
 and Catskill mountains, and down the Hudson; but some misunderstanding
 or temporary inconvenience prevented. The actual comrade was young
 Horace Mann, eldest son of the school-reformer and statesman of that
 name,--a silent, earnest, devoted naturalist, who died early. The
 place where his party met the Indians--only a few months before the
 Minnesota massacre of 1862--was in the county of Redwood, in the
 southwest of the State, where now is a thriving village of 1500
 people, and no buffaloes within five hundred miles. Red Wing, whence
 the letter was written, is below St. Paul, on the Mississippi, and was
 even then a considerable town,--now a city of 7000 people. The Civil
 War had lately begun, and the whole North was in the first flush of
 its uprising in defense of the Union,--for which Thoreau, in spite of
 his earlier defiance of government (for its alliance with slavery),
 was as zealous as any soldier. He returned in July, little benefited
 by the journey, of which he did not take his usual sufficiency of
 notes, and to which there is little allusion in his books. Nor does it
 seem that he visited on the way his correspondent since January,
 1856,--C. H. Greene, of Rochester, Michigan, who had never seen him in
 Concord. The opinion of Thoreau himself concerning this journey will
 be found in his next letter to Daniel Ricketson.
 
 
 TO DANIEL RICKETSON (AT NEW BEDFORD).
 
      CONCORD, August 15, 1861.
 
 FRIEND RICKETSON,--When your last letter was written I was away in the
 far Northwest, in search of health. My cold turned to bronchitis,
 which made me a close prisoner almost up to the moment of my starting
 on that journey, early in May. As I had an incessant cough, my doctor
 told me that I must "clear out,"--to the West Indies, or
 elsewhere,--so I selected Minnesota. I returned a few weeks ago, after
 a good deal of steady traveling, considerably, yet not essentially,
 better; my cough still continuing. If I don't mend very quickly, I
 shall be obliged to go to another climate again very soon.
 
 My ordinary pursuits, both indoors and out, have been for the most
 part omitted, or seriously interrupted,--walking, boating, scribbling,
 etc. Indeed, I have been sick so long that I have almost forgotten
 what it is to be well; and yet I feel that it is in all respects only
 my envelope. Channing and Emerson are as well as usual; but Alcott, I
 am sorry to say, has for some time been more or less confined by a
 lameness, perhaps of a neuralgic character, occasioned by carrying too
 great a weight on his back while gardening.
 
 On returning home, I found various letters awaiting me; among others,
 one from Cholmondeley, and one from yourself.
 
 Of course I am sufficiently surprised to hear of your conversion;[105]
 yet I scarcely know what to say about it, unless that, judging by
 your account, it appears to me a change which concerns yourself
 peculiarly, and will not make you more valuable to mankind. However,
 perhaps I must see you before I can judge.
 
 Remembering your numerous invitations, I write this short note now,
 chiefly to say that, if you are to be at home, and it will be quite
 agreeable to you, I will pay you a visit next week, and take such
 rides or sauntering walks with you as an invalid may.
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 The visit was made, and we owe to it the preservation of the latest
 portraiture of Thoreau, who, at his friend's urgency, sat to a
 photographer in New Bedford; and thus we have the full-bearded
 likeness of August, 1861; from which, also, and from personal
 recollection, Mr. Walton Ricketson made the fine profile medallion
 reproduced in photogravure for this volume.
 
 
 TO DANIEL RICKETSON (AT NEW BEDFORD).
 
      CONCORD, October 14, 1861.
 
 FRIEND RICKETSON,--I think that, on the whole, my health is better
 than when you were here; but my faith in the doctors has not
 increased. I thank you all for your invitation to come to New Bedford,
 but I suspect that it must still be warmer here than there; that,
 indeed, New Bedford is warmer than Concord only in the winter, and so
 I abide by Concord.
 
 September was pleasanter and much better for me than August, and
 October has thus far been quite tolerable. Instead of riding on
 horseback, I ride in a wagon about every other day. My neighbor, Mr.
 E. R. Hoar, has two horses, and he, being away for the most part this
 fall, has generously offered me the use of one of them; and, as I
 notice, the dog throws himself in, and does scouting duty.
 
 I am glad to hear that you no longer chew, but eschew, sugar-plums.
 One of the worst effects of sickness is, that it may get one into the
 _habit_ of taking a little something--his bitters, or sweets, as if
 for his bodily good--from time to time, when he does not need it.
 However, there is no danger of this if you do not dose even when you
 are sick.
 
 I went with a Mr. Rodman, a young man of your town, here the other
 day, or week, looking at farms for sale, and rumor says that he is
 inclined to buy a particular one. Channing says that he received his
 book, but has not got any of yours.
 
 It is easy to talk, but hard to write.
 
 From the worst of all correspondents,
 
      HENRY D. THOREAU.
 
 No later letter than this was written by Thoreau's own hand; for he
 was occupied all the winter of 1861-62, when he could write, in
 preparing his manuscripts for the press. Nothing appeared before his
 death, but in June, 1862, Mr. Fields, then editing the _Atlantic_,
 printed "Walking,"--the first of three essays which came out in that
 magazine the same year. Nothing of Thoreau's had been accepted for the
 _Atlantic_ since 1858, when he withdrew the rest of "Chesuncook," then
 coming out in its pages, because the editor (Mr. Lowell) had made
 alterations in the manuscript. In April, just before his death, the
 _Atlantic_ printed a short and characteristic sketch of Thoreau by
 Bronson Alcott, and in August, Emerson's funeral oration, given in the
 parish church of Concord. During the last six months of his illness,
 his sister and his friends wrote letters for him, as will be seen by
 the two that follow.
 
 
 SOPHIA THOREAU TO DANIEL RICKETSON (AT NEW BEDFORD).
 
      CONCORD, December 19, 1861.
 
      MR. RICKETSON:
 
 _Dear Sir_,--Thank you for your friendly interest in my dear brother.
 I wish that I could report more favorably in regard to his health.
 Soon after your visit to Concord, Henry commenced riding, and almost
 every day he introduced me to some of his familiar haunts, far away in
 the thick woods, or by the ponds; all very new and delightful to me.
 The air and exercise which he enjoyed during the fine autumn days were
 a benefit to him; he seemed stronger, had a good appetite, and was
 able to attend somewhat to his writing; but since the cold weather has
 come, his cough has increased, and he is able to go out but seldom.
 Just now he is suffering from an attack of pleurisy, which confines
 him wholly to the house. His spirits do not fail him; he continues in
 his usual serene mood, which is very pleasant for his friends as well
 as himself. I am hoping for a short winter and early spring, that the
 invalid may again be out of doors.
 
 I am sorry to hear of your indisposition, and trust that you will be
 well again soon. It would give me pleasure to see some of your
 newspaper articles, since you possess a hopeful spirit. My patience is
 nearly exhausted. The times look _very_ dark. I think the next soldier
 who is shot for sleeping on his post should be Gen. McClellan. Why
 does he not do something in the way of fighting? I despair of ever
 living under the reign of Sumner or Phillips.
 
 
 BRONSON ALCOTT TO DANIEL RICKETSON (AT NEW BEDFORD).
 
      CONCORD, January 10, 1862.
 
 DEAR FRIEND,--You have not been informed of Henry's condition this
 winter, and will be sorry to hear that he grows feebler day by day,
 and is evidently failing and fading from our sight. He gets some
 sleep, has a pretty good appetite, reads at intervals, takes notes of
 his readings, and likes to see his friends, conversing, however, with
 difficulty, as his voice partakes of his general debility. We had
 thought this oldest inhabitant of our Planet would have chosen to stay
 and see it fairly dismissed into the Chaos (out of which he has
 brought such precious jewels,--gifts to friends, to mankind generally,
 diadems for fame to coming followers, forgetful of his own claims to
 the honors) before he chose simply to withdraw from the spaces and
 times he has adorned with the truth of his genius. But the masterly
 work is nearly done for us here. And our woods and fields are
 sorrowing, though not in sombre, but in robes of white, so becoming to
 the piety and probity they have known so long, and soon are to miss.
 There has been none such since Pliny, and it will be long before there
 comes his like; the most sagacious and wonderful Worthy of his time,
 and a marvel to coming ones.
 
 I write at the suggestion of his sister, who thought his friends would
 like to be informed of his condition to the latest date.
 
 Ever yours and respectfully,
 
      A. BRONSON ALCOTT.
 
 The last letter of Henry Thoreau, written by the hand of his sister,
 was sent to Myron Benton, a young literary man then living in Dutchess
 County, New York, who had written a grateful letter to the author of
 "Walden" (January 6, 1862), though quite unacquainted with him. Mr.
 Benton said that the news of Thoreau's illness had affected him as if
 it were that "of a personal friend whom I had known a long time," and
 added: "The secret of the influence by which your writings charm me is
 altogether as intangible, though real, as the attraction of Nature
 herself. I read and reread your books with ever fresh delight. Nor is
 it pleasure alone; there is a singular spiritual healthiness with
 which they seem imbued,--the expression of a soul essentially sound,
 so free from any morbid tendency." After mentioning that his own home
 was in a pleasant valley, once the hunting-ground of the Indians, Mr.
 Benton said:--
 
 "I was in hope to read something more from your pen in Mr. Conway's
 _Dial_,[106] but only recognized that fine pair of Walden twinlets.
 Of your two books, I perhaps prefer the 'Week'--but after all,
 'Walden' is but little less a favorite. In the former, I like
 especially those little snatches of poetry interspersed throughout. I
 would like to ask what progress you have made in a work some way
 connected with natural history,--I think it was on Botany,--which Mr.
 Emerson told me something about in a short interview I had with him
 two years ago at Poughkeepsie.... If you should feel perfectly able at
 any time to drop me a few lines, I would like much to know what your
 state of health is, and if there is, as I cannot but hope, a prospect
 of your speedy recovery."
 
 Two months and more passed before Thoreau replied; but his habit of
 performing every duty, whether of business or courtesy, would not
 excuse him from an answer, which was this:--
 
 
 TO MYRON B. BENTON (AT LEEDSVILLE, N. Y.).
 
      CONCORD, March 21, 1862.
 
 DEAR SIR,--I thank you for your very kind letter, which, ever since I
 received it, I have intended to answer before I died, however briefly.
 I am encouraged to know, that, so far as you are concerned, I have not
 written my books in vain. I was particularly gratified, some years
 ago, when one of my friends and neighbors said, "I wish you would
 write another book,--write it for me." He is actually more familiar
 with what I have written than I am myself.
 
 The verses you refer to in Conway's _Dial_ were written by F. B.
 Sanborn of this town. I never wrote for that journal.
 
 I am pleased when you say that in the "Week" you like especially
 "those little snatches of poetry interspersed through the book," for
 these, I suppose, are the least attractive to most readers. I have not
 been engaged in any particular work on Botany, or the like, though, if
 I were to live, I should have much to report on Natural History
 generally.
 
 You ask particularly after my health. I _suppose_ that I have not many
 months to live; but, of course, I know nothing about it. I may add
 that I am enjoying existence as much as ever, and regret nothing.
 
      Yours truly,
      HENRY D. THOREAU,
      by SOPHIA E. THOREAU.
 
 He died May 6, 1862; his mother died March 12, 1872, and his sister
 Sophia, October, 1876. With the death of his aunt, Maria Thoreau,
 nearly twenty years after her beloved nephew, the last person of the
 name in America (or perhaps in England) passed away.
 
 
 FOOTNOTES:
 
 [42] It will readily be seen that this letter relates to the shipwreck
 on Fire Island, near New York, in which Margaret Fuller, Countess
 Ossoli, with her husband and child, was lost. A letter with no date of
 the year, but probably written February 15, 1840, from Emerson to
 Thoreau, represents them both as taking much trouble about a house in
 Concord for Mrs. Fuller, the mother of Margaret, who had just sold her
 Groton house, and wished to live with her daughter near Emerson.
 
 [43] Rev. A. B. Fuller, then of Manchester, N. H., afterward of
 Boston; a brother of Margaret, who died a chaplain in the Civil War.
 
 [44] The name of a political party, afterwards called "Republicans."
 
 [45] Baron Trenck, the famous prisoner.
 
 [46] The _Week_.
 
 [47] Of _Putnam's Magazine_.
 
 [48] A town near Boston.
 
 [49] A Massachusetts town, the birthplace of Whittier.
 
 [50] An American seaman, wrecked on the coast of Arabia,--once a
 popular book.
 
 [51] "The world is too much with us."--_Wordsworth._
 
 [52] A lady who made such a night voyage with Thoreau, years before,
 says: "How wise he was to ask the elderly lady with a younger one for
 a row on the Concord River one moonlit night! The river that night was
 as deep as the heavens above; serene stars shone from its depths, as
 far off as the stars above. Deep answered unto deep in our souls, as
 the boat glided swiftly along, past low-lying fields, under
 overhanging trees. A neighbor's cow waded into the cool water,--she
 became at once a Behemoth, a river-horse, hippopotamus, or river-god.
 A dog barked,--he was Diana's hound, he waked Endymion. Suddenly we
 were landed on a little isle; our boatman, our boat glided far off in
 the flood. We were left alone, in the power of the river-god; like two
 white birds we stood on this bit of ground, the river flowing about
 us; only the eternal powers of nature around us. Time for a prayer,
 perchance,--and back came the boat and oarsman; we were ferried to our
 homes,--no question asked or answered. We had drank of the cup of the
 night,--had left the silence and the stars."
 
 [53] See Memoir of Bronson Alcott, pp. 485-494. The remark of Emerson
 quoted on p. 486, that Cholmondeley was "the son of a Shropshire
 squire," was not strictly correct, his father being a Cheshire
 clergyman of a younger branch of the ancient race of Cholmondeley. But
 he was the _grandson_ of a Shropshire squire (owner of land), for his
 mother was daughter and sister of such gentlemen, and it was her
 brother Richard who presented Reginald Heber and Charles Cholmondeley
 to the living of Hodnet, near Market Drayton.
 
 [54] Mr. Ricketson's immediate reply was received by Thoreau before he
 wrote to Blake on the 22d. He set out from Concord for Cambridge on
 Christmas Day, and reached Brooklawn, the country-house of his friend,
 towards evening of that short day, on foot, with his umbrella and
 traveling-bag, and he made so striking a figure in the eyes of
 Ricketson that he sketched it roughly in his shanty-book. His children
 have engraved it in their pleasing volume _Daniel Ricketson and his
 Friends_, from the pages of which several of these letters are taken.
 It is by no means a bad likeness of the plain and upright Thoreau.
 
 [55] Hyannis was once a port for the sailing of the steamers to
 Nantucket, where probably Thoreau was to land on his return. He had
 visited the Cape before, but never Nantucket. Thomas Cholmondeley went
 home with the distinct purpose of going to the Crimean war, and did
 so. The subject of the New Bedford lecture was "Getting a Living."
 
 Channing, his wife and children having left him, was living by himself
 in his house opposite to Thoreau. Late in 1855 he rejoined Mrs.
 Channing, in a household near Dorchester, and became one of the
 editors of the New Bedford _Mercury_, residing in that city in
 1856-57, after the death of Mrs. Channing.
 
 [56] Quitman, aided perhaps by Laurence Oliphant, was aiming to
 capture Cuba with "filibusters" (flibustiers).
 
 [57] Then President of the United States, whose life Hawthorne had
 written in 1852.
 
 [58] I had been visiting Emerson occasionally for a year or two, and
 knew Alcott well at this time; was also intimate with Cholmondeley in
 the autumn of 1854, but had never seen Thoreau, a fact which shows how
 recluse were then his habits. The letter below, and the long one
 describing his trip to Minnesota, were the only ones I received from
 him in a friendship of seven years. See Sanborn's _Thoreau_, pp.
 195-200. Edwin Morton was my classmate. See pp. 286, 353, 440.
 
 [59] The book was _Ultima Thule_, describing New Zealand.
 
 [60] This was Edmund Hosmer, a Concord farmer, before mentioned as a
 friend of Emerson, who was fond of quoting his sagacious and often
 cynical remarks. He had entertained George Curtis and the Alcotts at
 his farm on the "Turnpike," southeast of Emerson's; but now was living
 on a part of the old manor of Governor Winthrop, which soon passed to
 the ownership of the Hunts; and this house which Mr. Ricketson
 proposed to lease was the "old Hunt farmhouse,"--in truth built for
 the Winthrops two centuries before. It was soon after torn down.
 
 [61] Sons of Mr. Ricketson; the second, a sculptor, modeled the
 medallion head of Thoreau reproduced in photogravure for the
 frontispiece of this volume.
 
 [62] Mr. Channing had gone, October, 1855, to live in New Bedford, and
 help edit the _Mercury_ there.
 
 [63] The centre of Concord village, where the post-office and shops
 are,--so called from an old mill-dam where now is a street.
 
 [64] The aunt of R. W. Emerson, then eighty-one years old, an admirer
 of Thoreau, as her notes to him show. For an account of her see
 Emerson's _Lectures and Biographical Sketches_, Centenary Ed., pp.
 397-433; Riverside Ed., pp. 371-404.
 
 [65] The books on India, Egypt, etc., sent by Cholmondeley. See p.
 271. They were divided between the Concord Public Library and the
 libraries of Alcott, Blake, Emerson, Sanborn, etc.
 
 [66] Mr. Channing became a frequent visitor at Brooklawn in the years
 of his residence at New Bedford, 1856-58. See p. 274.
 
 [67] These books were ordered by Cholmondeley in London, and sent to
 Boston just as he was starting for the Crimean War, in October, 1855,
 calling them "a nest of Indian books." They included Mill's _History
 of British India_, several translations of the sacred books of India,
 and one of them in Sanscrit; the works of Bunsen, so far as then
 published, and other valuable books. In the note accompanying this
 gift, Cholmondeley said, "I think I never found so much kindness in
 all my travels as in your country of New England." In return, Thoreau
 sent his English friend, in 1857, his own _Week_, Emerson's Poems,
 Walt Whitman's _Leaves of Grass_, and F. L. Olmsted's book on the
 Southern States (then preparing for the secession which they attempted
 four years later). This was perhaps the first copy of Whitman seen in
 England, and when Cholmondeley began to read it to his stepfather,
 Rev. Z. Macaulay, at Hodnet, that clergyman declared he would not hear
 it, and threatened to throw it in the fire. On reading the _Week_ (he
 had received _Walden_ from Thoreau when first in America),
 Cholmondeley wrote me, "Would you tell dear Thoreau that the lines I
 admire so much in his _Week_ begin thus:--
 
      'Low-anchored cloud,
      Newfoundland air,' etc.
 
 In my mind the best thing he ever wrote."
 
 [68] Ellery Channing is mentioned, though not by name, in the _Week_
 (pp. 169, 378), and in _Walden_ (p. 295). He was the comrade of
 Thoreau in Berkshire, and on the Hudson, in New Hampshire, Canada, and
 Cape Cod, and in many rambles nearer Concord. He was also a companion
 of Hawthorne in his river voyages, as mentioned in the _Mosses_.
 
 [69] The Concord Lyceum, founded in 1829, and still extant, though not
 performing its original function of lectures and debates. See pp. 51,
 154, etc.
 
 [70] This was the town of Harvard, not the college. Perhaps the
 excursion was to visit Fruitlands, where Alcott and Lane had
 established their short-lived community, in a beautiful spot near
 Still River, an affluent of the Nashua, and half-way from Concord to
 Wachusett. "Asnebumskit," mentioned in a former letter, is the highest
 hill near Worcester, as "Nobscot" is the highest near Concord. Both
 have Indian names.
 
 [71] The New York newspaper.
 
 [72] An odd boat.
 
 [73] Mrs. Caroline Kirkland, wife of Prof. William Kirkland, then of
 New York,--a writer of wit and fame at that time.
 
 [74] A Worcester newspaper.
 
 [75] B. B. Wiley, then of Providence, since of Chicago (deceased), had
 written to Thoreau, September 4, for the _Week_, which the author was
 then selling on his own account, having bought back the unsalable
 first edition from his publisher, Munroe. In a letter of October 31,
 to which the above is a reply, he mentions taking a walk with Charles
 Newcomb, then of Providence, since of London and Paris, now dead,--a
 _Dial_ contributor, and a special friend of Emerson; then inquires
 about Confucius, the Hindoo philosophers, and Swedenborg.
 
 [76] When, in 1855 or 1856, Thoreau started to wade across from
 Duxbury to Clark's Island, and was picked up by a fishing-boat in the
 deep water, and landed on the "back side" of the island (see letter to
 Mr. Watson of April 25, 1858), Edward Watson ("Uncle Ed") was "saggin'
 round" to see that everything was right alongshore, and encountered
 the unexpected visitor. "How did _you_ come here?" "Oh, from Duxbury,"
 said Thoreau, and they walked to the old Watson house together. "You
 say in one of your books," said Uncle Ed, "that you once lost a horse
 and a hound and a dove,--now I should like to know what you meant by
 that?" "Why, everybody has met with losses, haven't they?"
 "H'm,--pretty way to answer a fellow!" said Mr. Watson; but it seems
 this was the usual answer. In the long dining-room of the old house
 that night he sat by the window and told the story of the Norse
 voyagers to New England,--perhaps to that very island and the Gurnet
 near by,--as Morton fancies in his review of Thoreau in the _Harvard
 Magazine_ (January, 1855).
 
 [77] This was when he spoke in the vestry of the Calvinistic church,
 and said, on his return to Concord, "that he hoped he had done
 something to upheave and demolish the structure above,"--the vestry
 being beneath the church.
 
 [78] Notwithstanding this unwillingness to lecture, Thoreau did speak
 at Worcester, February 13, 1857, on "Walking," but scrupulously added
 to his consent (February 6), "I told Brown it had not been much
 altered since I read it in Worcester; but now I think of it, much of
 it must have been new to you, because, having since divided it into
 two, I am able to read what before I omitted. Nevertheless, I should
 like to have it understood by those whom it concerns, that I am
 invited to read in public (if it be so) what I have already read, in
 part, to a private audience." This throws some light on his method of
 preparing lectures, which were afterwards published as essays; they
 were made up from his journals, and new entries expanded them.
 
 [79] Rev. Edward E. Hale, then pastor at Worcester. Others mentioned
 in the letter are Rev. David A. Wasson and Dr. Seth Rogers,--the
 latter a physician with whom Mr. Wasson was living in Worcester.
 
 [80] A writer on scenery and natural history, who outlived Thoreau,
 and never forgave him for the remark about "stirring up with a pole,"
 which really might have been less graphic.
 
 [81] The panic of 1857,--the worst since 1837.
 
 [82] Reinhold Solger, Ph. D.,--a very intellectual and well-taught
 Prussian, who was one of the lecturers for a year or two at my
 "Concord School," the successor of the Concord "Academy," in which the
 children of the Emerson, Alcott, Hawthorne, Hoar, and Ripley families
 were taught. At this date the lectures were given in the vestry of the
 parish church, which Thoreau playfully termed "a meeting-house
 cellar." It was there that Louisa Alcott acted plays.
 
 [83] Exclamation points and printer's devil.
 
 [84] Channing says (_Thoreau, the Poet-Naturalist_, new ed., pp. 41,
 42): "He made for himself a knapsack, with partitions for his books
 and papers,--india-rubber cloth (strong and large and spaced, the
 common knapsacks being unspaced).... After trying the merit of cocoa,
 coffee, water, and the like, tea was put down as the felicity of a
 walking '_travail_,'--tea plenty, strong, with enough sugar, made in a
 tin pint cup.... He commended every party to carry 'a junk of heavy
 cake' with plums in it, having found by long experience that after
 toil it was a capital refreshment."
 
 [85] Marston Watson, whose uncle, Edward Watson, with his nephews,
 owned the "breezy island" where Thoreau had visited his friends
 (Clark's Island, the only one in Plymouth Bay), had built his own
 house, "Hillside," on the slope of one of the hills above Plymouth
 town, and there laid out a fine park and garden, which Thoreau
 surveyed for him in the autumn of 1854, Alcott and Mr. Watson carrying
 the chain. For a description of Hillside, see Channing's _Wanderer_
 (Boston, 1871) and Alcott's _Sonnets and Canzonets_ (Boston: Roberts,
 1882). It was a villa much visited by Emerson, Alcott, Channing,
 Thoreau, George Bradford, and the Transcendentalists generally. Mr.
 Watson graduated at Harvard two years after Thoreau, and in an old
 diary says, "I remember Thoreau in the college yard (1836) with
 downcast thoughtful look intent, as if he were searching for
 something; always in a green coat,--green because the authorities
 required black, I suppose." In a letter he says: "I have always heard
 the 'Maiden in the East' was Mrs. Watson,--Mary Russell Watson,--and I
 suppose there is no doubt of it. I may be prejudiced, but I have
 always thought it one of his best things,--and I have highly valued
 his lines. I find in my _Dial_, No. 6, I have written six new stanzas
 in the margin of Friendship, and they are numbered to show how they
 should run. I think Mrs. Brown gave them to me."
 
 [86] _Thoreau, the Poet-Naturalist_, new ed., pp. 42-45.
 
 [87] Near which, at New Bedford, Mr. Ricketson lived.
 
 [88] This was the "Orchard House," near Hawthorne's "Wayside." The
 estate on which it stands, now owned by Mrs. Lothrop, who also owns
 the "Wayside," was surveyed for Mr. Alcott by Thoreau in October,
 1857.
 
 [89] Channing's _Thoreau, the Poet-Naturalist_, new ed., pp. 6, 15,
 16. Channing himself was, no doubt, the "follower" and "companion"
 here mentioned; no person so frequently walked with Thoreau in his
 long excursions. They were together in New Boston, N. H., when the
 minister mentioned in the _Week_ reproved Thoreau for not going to
 meeting on Sunday. When I first lived in Concord (March, 1855), and
 asked the innkeeper what Sunday services the village held, he replied,
 "There's the Orthodox, an' the Unitarian, an' th' Walden Pond
 Association,"--meaning by the last what Emerson called "the
 Walkers,"--those who rambled in the Walden woods on Sundays.
 
 [90] Of New Bedford, first published in the _Mercury_ of that city,
 while Channing was one of the editors, and afterwards in a volume.
 
 [91] The club with which Thoreau here makes merry was the Saturday
 Club, meeting at Parker's Hotel in Boston the last Saturday in each
 month, of which Emerson, Agassiz, Longfellow, Holmes, Lowell, Henry
 James, and other men of letters were members. Thoreau, though invited,
 never seems to have met with them, as Channing did, on one memorable
 occasion, at least, described by Mr. James in a letter cited in the
 _Memoir of Bronson Alcott_, who also occasionally dined with this
 club. The conversation at Emerson's next mentioned was also memorable
 for the vigor with which Miss Mary Emerson, then eighty-four years
 old, rebuked Mr. James for what she thought his dangerous Antinomian
 views concerning the moral law.
 
 [92] This was Tuckerman's Ravine at the White Mountains, where Thoreau
 met with his mishap in the preceding July.
 
 [93] He was looking after the manufacture of fine plumbago for the
 electrotypers, which was the family business after pencil-making grew
 unprofitable. The Thoreaus had a grinding-mill in Acton, and a
 packing-shop attached to their Concord house. "Parker's society,"
 mentioned at the close of the letter, was the congregation of Theodore
 Parker, then in Italy, where he died in May, 1860.
 
 [94] He was invited to a gathering of John Brown's friends at the
 grave in the Adirondack woods. "Mr. Sanborn's case" was an indictment
 and civil suit against Silas Carleton _et als._ for an attempt to
 kidnap F. B. Sanborn, who had refused to accept the invitation of the
 Senate at Washington to testify in the John Brown investigation.
 
 [95] This is the excursion described by Thoreau in a subsequent
 letter,--lasting six days, and the first that Channing had made which
 involved "camping out." It was also Thoreau's last visit to this
 favorite mountain; but Channing continued to go there after the death
 of his friend; and some of these visits are recorded in his poem "The
 Wanderer." The last one was in September, 1869, when I accompanied
 him, and we again spent five nights on the plateau where he had camped
 with Thoreau. At that time, one of the "two good spruce houses, half a
 mile apart," mentioned by Thoreau, was still standing, in ruins,--the
 place called by Channing "Henry's Camp," and thus described:--
 
            We built our fortress where you see
      Yon group of spruce-trees, sidewise on the line
      Where the horizon to the eastward bounds,--
      A point selected by sagacious art,
      Where all at once we viewed the Vermont hills,
      And the long outline of the mountain-ridge,
      Ever renewing, changeful every hour.
 
      See _The Wanderer_ (Boston, 1871), p. 61.
 
 
 [96] See Thoreau's _Journal_, Dec. 3, 1859. Merriam mentioned
 Thoreau's name to him, but never guessed who his companion was.
 
 [97] This was Thoreau's last visit to Monadnock, and the one mentioned
 in the note of August 3, and in Channing's _Wanderer_.
 
 [98] The Prince of Wales (now King Edward VII), then visiting America
 with the Duke of Newcastle.
 
 [99] Now termed pneumonia.
 
 [100] In April, 1859, Mr. Alcott was chosen superintendent of the
 public schools of Concord, by a school committee of which Mr. Bull,
 the creator of the Concord grape, and Mr. Sanborn, were members, and
 for some years he directed the studies of the younger pupils, to their
 great benefit and delight. At the yearly "exhibitions," songs were
 sung composed by Louisa Alcott and others, and the whole town
 assembled to see and hear. The stress of civil war gradually checked
 this idyllic movement, and Mr. Alcott returned to his garden and
 library. It was two years after this that Miss Alcott had her severe
 experience as hospital nurse at Washington.
 
 [101] Edwin Morton of Plymouth, Mass., a friend of John Brown and
 Gerrit Smith, who went to England in October, 1859, to avoid
 testifying against his friends.
 
 [102] A word may be said of the after life of this magnanimous
 Englishman, who did not long survive his Concord correspondent. In
 March, 1863, being then in command of a battalion of Shropshire
 Volunteers, which he had raised, he inherited Condover Hall and the
 large estate adjacent, and took the name of Owen as a condition of the
 inheritance. A year later he married Miss Victoria Cotes, daughter of
 John and Lady Louisa Cotes (Co. Salop), a godchild of the Queen, and
 went to Italy for his wedding tour. In Florence he was seized with a
 malignant fever, April 10, 1864, and died there April 20,--not quite
 two years after Thoreau's death. His brother Reginald, who had met him
 in Florence, carried back his remains to England, and he is buried in
 Condover churchyard. Writing to an American friend, Mr. R.
 Cholmondeley said: "The whole county mourned for one who had made
 himself greatly beloved. During his illness his thoughts went back
 very much to America and her great sufferings. His large heart felt
 for your country as if it were his own." It seems that he did not go
 to New Zealand with the "Canterbury Pilgrims," as suggested in the
 _Atlantic Monthly_ (December, 1893), but in the first of Lord
 Lyttelton's ships (the Charlotte Jane), having joined in Lord L.'s
 scheme for colonizing the island, where he remained only six months,
 near Christchurch.
 
 [103] Rev. Joseph May, a cousin of Louisa Alcott.
 
 [104] I had answered T. Cholmondeley's last letter, explaining that
 Thoreau was ill and absent.
 
 [105] A return to religious Quakerism, of which his friend had written
 enthusiastically.
 
 [106] This was a short-lived monthly, edited at Cincinnati (1861-62)
 by Moncure D. Conway, since distinguished as an author, who had
 resided for a time in Concord, after leaving his native Virginia. He
 wrote asking Thoreau and all his Concord friends to contribute to this
 new _Dial_, and several of them did so.
 
 
 
 
 APPENDIX
 
 
 The letters of Thoreau, early or late, which did not reach me in time
 to be used in the original edition of this book, and have since
 appeared in print here and there, are included either in order of
 their date in the preceding pages (in the case of the additional
 Ricketson letters) or in this Appendix. I owe the right to use the
 following correspondence to Mr. E. H. Russell of Worcester and to Dr.
 S. A. Jones of Ann Arbor, Michigan, who first obtained from the family
 of Calvin H. Greene of Rochester, Michigan, the Greene letters, five
 in number, all short, but characteristic. Dr. Jones printed these in a
 small edition at Jamaica, N. Y., and along with them some letters of
 Miss Sophia Thoreau to Mr. Greene, and portions of Greene's Diary
 during his two visits to Concord in September, 1863, and August, 1874.
 In these papers he left initials, or letters commonly used for unknown
 quantities, to stand for certain names occurring there. "X." and "X.
 Y. Z." in this Diary, and in Miss Thoreau's letters, signify Ellery
 Channing, to whom in March, 1863, Mr. Greene had sent the manzanita
 cane, headed with buffalo-horn and tipped with silver, which he had
 made with his own hands and intended for Thoreau, and which Mr.
 Channing gave to me, as the mutual friend of the two Concord poets. In
 the Diary I am "Mr. S." This Diary and the letters of Miss Thoreau
 supply some useful facts for a Thoreau biography, which this
 collection of Familiar Letters was meant to be,--a biography largely
 in the words of its subject. Notice is taken of such facts in
 footnotes.
 
 The earlier letters to Isaac Hecker, afterwards known as Father Hecker
 of New York, grew out of an acquaintance formed with him while he was
 living at Mrs. Thoreau's, and taking lessons of the late George
 Bradford, brother of Mrs. Ripley. They were subsequent to Hecker's
 brief stay at Brook Farm and Fruitlands, and when he was studying to
 be a Catholic priest. He cherished the vain hope of converting Thoreau
 to his own newly acquired faith, amid the influences of Catholic
 Europe. The brief correspondence is printed in the _Atlantic Monthly_
 for September, 1902.
 
 Isaac Hecker, born in December, 1819, two and a half years after
 Thoreau, was the son of a German baker in New York city, and of little
 education until he came to Massachusetts at the age of twenty-three,
 as the disciple and friend of Dr. Brownson, then a Protestant preacher
 and social democrat. In January, 1843, he entered the Brook Farm
 community, not as a member, but as a worker and student, making the
 bread for the family and taking lessons of George Ripley, George
 Bradford, Charles Dana, and John S. Dwight,--all friends of the
 Concord circle of authors. But he was restless, and yearned for a more
 ascetic life, and before he had been at Brook Farm a month he was
 writing to Bronson Alcott about entering the as yet unopened
 Fruitlands convent, between which and Brook Farm Concord was a
 half-way station, both physically and spiritually. Hecker tried all
 three; was at Brook Farm, off and on, for six months, at Fruitlands
 two weeks (from July 11 to July 25, 1843), and at Concord two months
 (from April 22 to June 20, 1844). Then, August 1, he was baptized in
 the Catholic faith at New York. The day before this final step,
 towards which he had been tending for a year, he wrote to Thoreau,
 proposing a journey through Europe on foot and without money. During
 his brief Concord life he had been a lodger at the house of John
 Thoreau (the Parkman house, where now the Public Library stands), and
 had seen Henry Thoreau daily. Hecker thus describes his room, his
 rent, and his landlady, who was Thoreau's mother:
 
 "All that is needed for my comfort is here,--a room of good size, very
 good people, furnished and to be kept in order for 75 cents a week,
 including lights,--wood is extra pay; a good straw bed, a large table,
 carpet, wash-stand, bookcase, stove, chairs, looking-glass,--all, all
 that is needful. The lady of the house, Mrs. Thoreau, is a _woman_.
 The only fear I have about her is that she is too much like dear
 mother,--she will take too much care of me. If you were to see her,
 Mother, you would be perfectly satisfied that I have fallen into good
 hands, and met a second mother, if that is possible. I have just
 finished my dinner,--unleavened bread from home, maple-sugar, and
 apples which I purchased this morning. Previous to taking dinner I
 said my first lesson to Mr. Bradford in Greek and Latin."
 
 Hecker "boarded himself," but no doubt often partook of Mrs. Thoreau's
 hospitality, and took long walks with Thoreau. Writing to him three
 months after the first meeting at Concord, Hecker said: "I have formed
 a certain project which your influence has no slight share in forming.
 It is, to work our passage to Europe, and to walk, work, and beg, if
 need be, as far, when there, as we are inclined to do."
 
 
 TO ISAAC HECKER (AT NEW YORK).
 
      CONCORD, August 14, 1844.
 
 FRIEND HECKER,--I am glad to hear your voice from that populous city,
 and the more so for the tenor of its discourse. I have but just
 returned from a pedestrian excursion somewhat similar to that you
 propose, _parvis componere magna_, to the Catskill Mountains, over the
 principal mountains of this State, subsisting mainly on bread and
 berries, and slumbering on the mountain-tops. As usually happens, I
 now feel a slight sense of dissipation. Still, I am strongly tempted
 by your proposal, and experience a decided schism between my outward
 and inward tendencies. Your method of traveling, especially,--to live
 along the road, citizens of the world, without haste or petty
 plans,--I have often proposed this to my dreams, and still do. But the
 fact is, I cannot so decidedly postpone exploring the _Farther
 Indies_, which are to be reached, you know, by other routes and other
 methods of travel. I mean that I constantly return from every external
 enterprise with disgust, to fresh faith in a kind of Brahminical,
 Artesian, Inner Temple life. All my experience, as yours probably,
 proves only this reality. Channing wonders how I can resist your
 invitation, I, a single man--unfettered--and so do I. Why, there are
 Roncesvalles, the Cape de Finisterre, and the Three Kings of Cologne;
 Rome, Athens, and the rest, to be visited in serene, untemporal hours,
 and all history to revive in one's memory, as he went by the way, with
 splendors too bright for this world,--I know how it is. But is not
 here, too, Roncesvalles with greater lustre? Unfortunately, it may
 prove dull and desultory weather enough here, but better trivial days
 with faith than the fairest ones lighted by sunshine alone. Perchance,
 my _Wanderjahr_ has not arrived, but you cannot wait for that. I hope
 you will find a companion who will enter as heartily into your schemes
 as I should have done.
 
 I remember you, as it were, with the whole Catholic Church at your
 skirts. And the other day, for a moment, I think I understood your
 relation to that body; but the thought was gone again in a twinkling,
 as when a dry leaf falls from its stem over our heads, but is
 instantly lost in the rustling mass at our feet.
 
 I am really sorry that the Genius will not let me go with you, but I
 trust that it will conduct to other adventures, and so, if nothing
 prevents, we will compare notes at last.
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 When this invitation reached Concord, Thoreau was absent on a tour
 with Channing to the Berkshire Mountains and the Catskills,--Channing
 coming up the Hudson from New York (where he then lived, aiding Horace
 Greeley in the _Tribune_ office), and meeting his friend at the foot
 of the Hoosac Mountain. On its summit Thoreau had spent the night,
 sleeping under a board near the observatory tower built by the
 Williams College students, as related by him in the _Week_. They then
 crossed the Hudson and journeyed on to the Catskills, returning
 together to Concord.[107] Meantime Hecker had got impatient, and wrote
 again, to which Thoreau replied, August 17, thus briefly:--
 
 
 TO ISAAC HECKER (AT NEW YORK).
 
 I improve the occasion of my mother's sending to acknowledge the
 receipt of your stirring letter. You have probably received mine by
 this time. I thank you for not anticipating any vulgar objections on
 my part. _Far_ travel, very _far_ travel, or travail, comes near to
 the worth of staying at home. Who knows whence his education is to
 come! Perhaps I may drag my anchor at length, or rather, when the
 _winds_ which blow _over_ the deep fill my sails, may stand away for
 distant parts,--for now I seem to have a firm _ground_ anchorage,
 though the harbor is low-shored enough, and the traffic with the
 natives inconsiderable. I may be away to Singapore by the next tide.
 
 I like well the ring of your last maxim, "It is only the fear of death
 makes us reason of impossibilities." And but for fear, death itself is
 an impossibility.
 
 Believe me, I can hardly let it end so. If you do not go soon, let me
 hear from you again.
 
      Yrs. in great haste,
      HENRY D. THOREAU.
 
 Hecker did not in fact go to Europe till a year later, and when he
 walked over a part of central Europe, it was in company with one or
 two young Catholic priests,--men very unlike Thoreau.
 
 The short correspondence with Calvin Greene (longer than that with
 Hecker) occurred at intervals, a dozen years and more after the
 Fruitlands period, when the Walden experience had been lived through
 and recorded, and the friendship with the Ricketson family was in its
 earlier stages. Mr. Greene, when he called on me at his first visit to
 the Thoreau family in 1863, mentioned that he had just read Thoreau's
 poem, "The Departure," which at Sophia's request I had lately printed
 in the Boston _Commonwealth_, a weekly that I had been editing since
 Moncure Conway had left Concord for London, in the winter of 1862-63.
 Greene was a plain, sincere man, never in New England before, who
 amused Channing by saying he had "taken a boat-ride on the Atlantic."
 He came once more in 1874, and spent an evening with me in the house
 where Thoreau lived and died,--Mrs. Thoreau then being dead, and
 Sophia at Bangor, where she died in 1876.
 
 
 TO CALVIN H. GREENE (AT ROCHESTER, MICH.).
 
      CONCORD, January 18, 1856.
 
 DEAR SIR,--I am glad to hear that my "Walden" has interested
 you,--that perchance it holds some truth still as far off as Michigan.
 I thank you for your note.
 
 The "Week" had so poor a publisher that it is quite uncertain whether
 you will find it in any shop. I am not sure but authors must turn
 booksellers themselves. The price is $1.25. If you care enough for it
 to send me that sum by mail (stamps will do for change), I will
 forward you a copy by the same conveyance.
 
 As for the "more" that is to come, I cannot speak definitely at
 present, but I trust that the mine--be it silver or lead--is not yet
 exhausted. At any rate, I shall be encouraged by the fact that you are
 interested in its yield.
 
      Yours respectfully,
      HENRY D. THOREAU.
 
 
      CONCORD, February 10, 1856.
 
 DEAR SIR,--I forwarded to you by mail on the 31st of January a copy of
 my "Week," post paid, which I trust that you have received. I thank
 you heartily for the expression of your interest in "Walden" and hope
 that you will not be disappointed by the "Week." You ask how the
 former has been received. It has found an audience of excellent
 character, and quite numerous, some 2000 copies having been
 dispersed.[108] I should consider it a greater success to interest one
 wise and earnest soul, than a million unwise and frivolous.
 
 You may rely on it that you have the best of me in my books, and that
 I am not worth seeing personally, the stuttering, blundering
 clod-hopper that I am. Even poetry, you know, is in one sense an
 infinite brag and exaggeration. Not that I do not stand on all that I
 have written,--but what am I to the truth I feebly utter?
 
 I like the name of your county.[109] May it grow men as sturdy as its
 trees! Methinks I hear your flute echo amid the oaks. Is not yours,
 too, a good place to study theology? I hope that you will ere long
 recover your turtle-dove, and that it may bring you glad tidings out
 of that heaven in which it disappeared.
 
      Yours sincerely,
      HENRY D. THOREAU.
 
 
      CONCORD, May 31, 1856.
 
 DEAR SIR,--I forwarded by mail a copy of my "Week," post paid to James
 Newberry, Merchant, Rochester, Oakland Co., Mich., according to your
 order, about ten days ago, or on the receipt of your note.
 
 I will obtain and forward a copy of "Walden" and also of the "Week" to
 California, to your order, post paid, for $2.60. The postage will be
 between 60 and 70 cents.
 
 I thank you heartily for your kind intentions respecting me. The West
 has many attractions for me, particularly the lake country and the
 Indians, yet I do [not] foresee what my engagements may be in the
 fall. I have once or twice come near going West a-lecturing, and
 perhaps some winter may bring me into your neighborhood, in which case
 I should probably see you. Yet lecturing has commonly proved so
 foreign and irksome to me, that I think I could only use it to acquire
 the means with which to make an independent tour another time.
 
 As for my pen, I can say that it is not altogether idle, though I have
 finished nothing new in the book form. I am drawing a rather long bow,
 though it may be a feeble one, but I pray that the archer may receive
 new strength before the arrow is shot.
 
      With many thanks, yours truly,
      HENRY D. THOREAU.
 
 
      CONCORD, Saturday, June 21, 1856.
 
 DEAR SIR,--On the 12th I forwarded the two books to California,
 observing your directions in every particular, and I trust that Uncle
 Sam will discharge his duty faithfully. While in Worcester this week I
 obtained the accompanying daguerreotype,[110] which my friends think
 is pretty good, though better-looking than I.
 
      Books and postage           $2.64
      Daguerreotype                 .50
      Postage                       .16
                                   ----
                                   3.30
 
           5.00 You will accordingly
           3.30
           ----
      find 1.70 enclosed with my shadow.
 
      Yrs.,
      HENRY D. THOREAU.
 
 
      CONCORD, July 8, 1857.
 
 DEAR SIR,--You are right in supposing that I have not been Westward. I
 am very little of a traveler. I am gratified to hear of the interest
 you take in my books; it is additional encouragement to write more of
 them. Though my pen is not idle, I have not published anything for a
 couple of years at least. I like a private life, and cannot bear to
 have the public in my mind.
 
 You will excuse me for not responding more heartily to your notes,
 since I realize what an interval there always is between the actual
 and imagined author and feel that it would not be just for _me_ to
 appropriate the sympathy and good will of my unseen readers.
 
 Nevertheless, I should like to meet you, and if I ever come into your
 neighborhood shall endeavor to do so. Can't you tell the world of your
 life also? Then I shall know you, at least as well as you me.
 
      Yours truly,
      HENRY D. THOREAU.
 
 
      CONCORD, November 24, 1859.
 
 DEAR SIR,--The lectures which you refer to were reported in the
 newspapers, _after a fashion_,--the last one in some half-dozen of
 them,--and if I possessed one, or all, I would send them to you, bad
 as they are. The best, or at least longest one of the Boston lectures
 was in the Boston _Atlas and Bee_ of November 2d,--maybe half the
 whole. There were others in the _Traveller_, the _Journal_, etc., of
 the same date.
 
 I am glad to know that you are interested to see my things, and I wish
 I had them in printed form to send to you. I exerted myself
 considerably to get the last discourse printed and sold for the
 benefit of Brown's family, but the publishers are afraid of pamphlets,
 and it is now too late.[111]
 
 I return the stamps which I have not used.
 
 I shall be glad to see you if I ever come your way.
 
      Yours truly,
      HENRY D. THOREAU.
 
 
 FOOTNOTES:
 
 [107] Channing more than once described to me Thoreau's disheveled
 appearance as he came down the mountain the next morning, after rather
 a comfortless night. He was carrying for valise a green leather
 satchel that had been Charles Emerson's, having but recently been the
 guest of both William and Waldo Emerson. In depicting the scene from
 the Berkshire mountain, he recurred (in the _Week_) to the homesteads
 of the Huguenots on Staten Island, where he had rambled the year
 before this Berkshire experience, while living at William Emerson's
 and giving lessons to his sons.
 
 [108] This was ten times as many in eighteen months as the _Week_ sold
 in five years.
 
 [109] Mr. Greene lived in Oakland County.
 
 [110] This fixes the date of the Worcester portrait,--June, 1856, two
 years after the Rowse crayon.
 
 [111] This "last discourse" was the long one on John Brown, now
 included in Thoreau's _Miscellanies_, and formerly in the volume
 beginning with "A Yankee in Canada."
 
 
 
 
 GENERAL INDEX
 
 The following are the titles of the volumes covered by this index and
 the numbers by which they are designated:--
 
      1. A WEEK ON THE CONCORD AND MERRIMACK RIVERS.
      2. WALDEN.
      3. THE MAINE WOODS.
      4. CAPE COD, AND MISCELLANIES.
      5. EXCURSIONS, AND POEMS.
      6. FAMILIAR LETTERS.
 
 
 
 
 GENERAL INDEX
 
 [The titles of chapters and general divisions are set in SMALL
 CAPITALS.]
 
 
 "A finer race and finer fed," verse, =1=, 407.
 
 Abbot (Me.), =3=, 97.
 
 Abby and Almira (Mrs. Miner and Mrs. Small), =6=, 152.
 
 Abercrombie, =6=, 26.
 
 Abolitionist Journal, an, =4=, 306-310; convention, =6=, 260.
 
 Aboljacarmegus Falls, =3=, 58, 82; meaning of the name, 157.
 
 Aboljacarmegus Lake, =3=, 51.
 
 Aboljacknagesic Stream, =3=, 51, 58, 59, 62.
 
 Absence, from Concord, =6=, 50, 67-121, 233; in love and friendship,
 74, 187.
 
 "Abuse of the Bible," Mrs. Mott's, =6=, 97.
 
 Academy at Concord, =6=, 72.
 
 Acclimation, =6=, 73, 78.
 
 Achilles, The Youth of, translation, =5=, 385.
 
 Acorns, =6=, 354, 355.
 
 Acre, an, as long measure, =5=, 60.
 
 ACROSS THE CAPE, =4=, 129-149.
 
 Action and Being, =6=, 159, 163, 178, 179, 210, 221.
 
 Acton (Mass.), =2=, 136; =5=, 136; =6=, 355, 364, 366, 367.
 
 Adams, John, =6=, 5, note.
 
 Adams' Latin Grammar, =6=, 25.
 
 Adirondacks, =6=, 360, 364, note.
 
 Admetus, =6=, 39, 44, 45, 223, 355.
 
 Admiration, =6=, 153, 214, 337.
 
 Adolescentula, E. White, =6=, 29, 32.
 
 Adoration of Nature, =6=, 36, 37, 64.
 
 Advertisements, the best part of newspapers, =1=, 194.
 
 Advice, =6=, 25, 26, 66, 67, 121, 134, 143, 144, 178, 186.
 
 olian harp, =6=, 199.
 
 Aerial effects, =6=, 88.
 
 Aerial rivers, =6=, 58.
 
 _Aes alienum_, another's brass, a very ancient slough, =2=, 7.
 
 schylus, The Prometheus Bound of, translation, =5=, 337-375.
 
 schylus, translated, =6=, 60, 102.
 
 sculapius, that old herb-doctor, =2=, 154.
 
 sculapius, translation, =5=, 380.
 
 AFTER THE DEATH OF JOHN BROWN, =4=, 451-454.
 
 Agassiz, Louis, =1=, 26, 31; and T., =6=, 125-132; mentioned, 138,
 147, 328.
 
 Age and youth, =2=, 9.
 
 Age of achievement, =6=, 120-182.
 
 Agiocochook, =1=, 335; =6=, 107.
 
 Agriculture, the new, =4=, 291; the task of Americans, =5=, 229-231;
 newspaper, =6=, 107.
 
 "Ah, 't is in vain the peaceful din," verse, =1=, 15.
 
 Aims in life, =6=, xi, 47, 59, note, 67, 88, 89, 118, 159, 164, 173,
 187, 242, 260, 278.
 
 Aitteon, Joe, =3=, 94, 99, 100, 210, 233, 313.
 
 Ajax, The Treatment of, translation, =5=, 387.
 
 Alcott, A. Bronson (b. 1799, d. 1888), =6=, 50, 52, 60, 61, 62-65, 83,
 note, 104, 124, 134, 136, 144, 146, 151, 153, 154, 158, 190, 238, 252,
 note, 281, 289, 306, 328, 333, 341, 346, 359, 379, 381, 397;
 acquaintance with Thoreau, 50, 52, 64, 136, 137, 151; at home in
 Fruitlands, 64, 83, 84; in Boston, 236, 237; in Walpole, 281; in
 Concord, at Orchard House, 333, 376; builds Emerson's summer-house,
 134-137; in Concord jail, 52; chosen school superintendent, 377; diary
 of, 297; holds conversations in Concord, 52, 64, 346; in Eagleswood, N.
 J., 291; in New York, 282, 283, 297; dines with Thoreau, 52; visits
 with Thoreau in New Bedford, 306, 307; in Plymouth, 328, note; in
 Brooklyn, 298; describes Walt Whitman, 298; at Thoreau's funeral, 65,
 note; letter from, 397; letter to, 282.
 
 Alcott, Mrs. A. B., =6=, 283.
 
 Alcott, Louisa May, =6=, 321, note, 377, note.
 
 Alewives, =1=, 32.
 
 Alexander the Great, =6=, x.
 
 "All things are current found," verse, =1=, 415.
 
 ALLEGASH AND EAST BRANCH, THE, =3=, 174-327.
 
 Allegash Lakes, the, =3=, 78, 175, 250, 257.
 
 Allegash River, the, =3=, 40, 80, 161, 178, 233, 250, 254-257, 260,
 270.
 
 Allen, Phineas, =6=, 10, note.
 
 Alms-House Farm, =2=, 283.
 
 Alms-House (of Concord), =6=, 34, 77, 146.
 
 Alphonse, Jean, quoted, =4=, 238; and Falls of Montmorenci, =5=, 38,
 39; quoted, 91.
 
 Ambejijis Falls, =3=, 50; portage round, 52, 84.
 
 Ambejijis Lake, =3=, 45-47, 49, 50, 84, 291.
 
 Ambejijis Stream, =3=, 50.
 
 America, the only true, =2=, 228; the newness of, =3=, 90; not truly
 free, =4=, 476, 477; provincialism of, 477; superiorities of, =5=,
 220-224.
 
 American, money in Quebec, =5=, 24; the, and government, 82, 83, =6=,
 8-10.
 
 American privateer, General Lincoln, =6=, 5.
 
 Amherst (N. H.), =6=, 302.
 
 _Amoenitates Botanicae_, =6=, 207.
 
 "Amok" against T., society running, =2=, 190.
 
 Amonoosuck, the, =1=, 334.
 
 Amoskeag Falls, =1=, 259, 260, 337.
 
 Amoskeag (N. H.), =1=, 261, 262, 271, 273, 307.
 
 Amphiaraus, The death of, translation, =5=, 387.
 
 Amusements, games and, despair concealed under, =2=, 8, 9.
 
 "An early unconverted saint," verse, =1=, 42.
 
 Anacreon, =1=, 238-240; translations from, 240-244; quoted, =5=, 108,
 109, 110.
 
 Anawan, an Indian, =6=, 15.
 
 Anchors, dragging for, =4=, 162.
 
 Ancients, wisdom of the, =6=, 114, 299, 300.
 
 Andover (Mass.), =1=, 124.
 
 Andropogons, or beard-grasses, =5=, 225-258.
 
 Ange Gardien Parish, =5=, 42; church of, 46.
 
 Angler's Souvenir, the, =5=, 119.
 
 Animal food, objections to, =2=, 237.
 
 Animal labor, man better without the help of, =2=, 62, 63.
 
 Animal life and heat nearly synonymous, =2=, 14.
 
 Animals, man's duty to the lower, =4=, 283-286.
 
 Annihilation Company, =6=, 194.
 
 Anti-Sabbath Convention, =6=, 157, 158.
 
 Anti-Slavery meetings, =6=, 255, 358, 359.
 
 Anti-Slavery Standard, The, =6=, 46, 245.
 
 Antiquities, =1=, 264, 265-267.
 
 Ants, battle of the, =2=, 253-257.
 
 Apmoojenegamook Lake, =3=, 244, 260; meaning of, 250; a storm on, 263,
 264; hard paddling on, 267.
 
 Apollo, translation, =5=, 383.
 
 Appearances, =6=, 177, 227, 228.
 
 Apple, history of the tree, =5=, 290-298; the wild, 299, 300; the
 crab, 301, 302; growth of the wild, 302-308; cropped by cattle,
 303-307; the fruit and flavor of the, 308-314; beauty of the, 314,
 315; naming of the, 315-317; last gleaning of the, 317-319; the
 frozen-thawed, 319, 320; dying out of the wild, 321, 322.
 
 Apple-howling, =5=, 298.
 
 Apples, the world eating, green =2=, 86; Baldwin, =6=, 213; Dead Sea,
 356; frozen-thawed, 177, 178; of Hesperides, 213; planted by T., 355.
 
 "Apple-tree, Elisha's," =1=, 380.
 
 Apple trees, Cape Cod, =4=, 32-34.
 
 Apprentices, the abundance of, =1=, 129.
 
 Archer, Gabriel, quoted, =4=, 244.
 
 Architecture, need of relation between man, truth and, =2=, 51, 52;
 American, =4=, 28, 29; the new, 293.
 
 "Architecture, Seven Lamps of" (Ruskin), 319.
 
 Aristotle, quoted, =1=, 133, 386.
 
 Arm-chairs for fishermen, =1=, 91.
 
 Arnica mollis, =6=, 334, 335.
 
 Arnold, Benedict, =6=, 323.
 
 Arnold, Mr., =6=, 341.
 
 Aroostook (Me.), road, =3=, 3, 13, 14; river, 4; wagon, an, 14;
 valley, 23; sleds of the, 261.
 
 Armies, =6=, 260, 323, 356.
 
 Arpent, the, =5=, 60.
 
 Arrowheads, =1=, 18; =6=, 19, note, 96.
 
 Art, Nature and, =1=, 339; works of, 9; =6=, 94, 319.
 
 Ashburnham (Mass.), =5=, 3; with a better house than any in Canada,
 100.
 
 Ash trees, =5=, 6.
 
 Asiatic, Russia, Mme. Pfeiffer in, =2=, 25.
 
 Asnebumskit, =6=, 195, 279, 280.
 
 Assabet (or North) River, the, =1=, 4; =5=, 136; =6=, viii, 269.
 
 Assawampsitt, =6=, 265.
 
 Asters, =3=, 97.
 
 Astronomy, =1=, 411-413; at Cambridge, =6=, 133, 137, 138; at Concord,
 133.
 
 Atlantic Monthly, =6=, 235, 395, 396.
 
 Atlantides, The, verse, =1=, 278.
 
 Atlas, =2=, 93.
 
 Atlas, the General, =3=, 95; =6=, 243, 362.
 
 Atropos, as name for engine, =2=, 131.
 
 Aubrey, John, quoted, =1=, 112.
 
 Auction, of a deacon's effects, =2=, 75; or increasing, 75.
 
 Audubon, John James, reading, =5=, 103; 109, note; 112, note.
 
 Aulus Persius Flaccus, =6=, 6, 158.
 
 Aurora of Guido, The, verse, =5=, 399.
 
 Australia, gold-hunters in, =4=, 465, 466.
 
 Autumn, the coming of, =1=, 356; flowers of, 377-379; 403; landscape
 near Provincetown, =4=, 193-195; foliage, brightness of, =5=, 249-252;
 a poem on, =6=, 115; delights of, 37, 38, 282.
 
 AUTUMNAL TINTS, =5=, 249-289.
 
 Autumnal tints, =6=, 340, 350.
 
 Autumnus, =6=, 38.
 
 Average ability, man's success in proportion to his, =1=, 133; the law
 of, in nature and ethics, =2=, 321.
 
 "Away! away! away! away!" verse, =1=, 186.
 
 _Axy_, a Bible name, =4=, 95.
 
 
 Baboosuck Brook, =1=, 232.
 
 Babylon, ancient, =6=, 224.
 
 Babylon (N. Y.), =6=, 102.
 
 Bacchus, Whitman compared to, =6=, 298.
 
 Background, all lives want a, =1=, 45.
 
 Bailey, Prof. J. W., =3=, 4.
 
 BAKER FARM, =2=, 223-231.
 
 Baker Farm, =2=, 307.
 
 Baker's barn, =2=, 286.
 
 Baker's River, =1=, 87, 268.
 
 Ball's Hill, =1=, 19, 37, 43.
 
 Bands of music in distance, =2=, 177, 178.
 
 Bangor (Me.), =3=, 3, 4, 9, 12; =6=, 119, 132, 325; passage to, =3=,
 16; 23, 36, 38, 74, 86, 91, 94-98; the deer that went a-shopping in,
 154; 160, 161, 166, 167, 174, 175; House, the, 177; 250, 251, 256,
 257, 290, 307.
 
 Bank swallow, the, =4=,164.
 
 Banks, =6=, 162, failures of, 317, 318; stock in, 162, 213, 317, 318.
 
 Barberries, =6=, 156, 175, 358.
 
 Barber's Historical Collections, quoted, =4=, 222.
 
 Barnstable (Mass.), =4=, 22.
 
 Bartlett, Dr. Josiah (H. U. 1816), =6=, 137, 138, 152, 254.
 
 Bartlett, Robert (H. U. 1836), =6=, 58.
 
 Bartram, William, quoted, =2=, 75; =5=, 199.
 
 Bascom, Rev. Jonathan, =4=, 55.
 
 Baskets, strolling Indian selling, =2=, 20, 21.
 
 Bass-tree, the, =1=, 166.
 
 Bathing, sea, =4=, 16, 17; feet in brooks, =5=, 140.
 
 Batteaux, =3=, 6, 35.
 
 Battle-ground, first, of the Revolution, =1=, 14.
 
 Battles, =6=, 356; in the clouds, 330.
 
 Bayberry, the, =4=, 102, 103.
 
 BEACH, THE, =4=, 57-78.
 
 BEACH AGAIN, THE, =4=, 102-128.
 
 Beaches, Cape Cod the best of Atlantic, =4=, 269-271.
 
 Beach-grass, =4=, 200, 201, 204-209.
 
 Beach-plums, =1=, 381.
 
 BEAN-FIELD, THE, =2=, 171-184.
 
 Beard-grasses, Andropogons or, =5=, 255-258.
 
 Bears, abundance of, =3=, 235.
 
 Beaumont, Francis, quoted, =1=, 69.
 
 Beauport (Que.), and _le Chemin de_, =5=, 30; getting lodgings in,
 35-38; church in, 69; Seigniory of, 96.
 
 Beaupr, Seigniory of the Cte de, =5=, 41.
 
 Beauties of Ancient English Poetry, =6=, 66.
 
 Beauty, =6=, 198, 199; Emerson's Ode to, 115-117; Ruskin on, 319.
 
 Beaver River, =1=, 92.
 
 Bed, a cedar-twig, =3=, 60; of arbor-vit twigs, 265; the primitive,
 by all rivers, 317.
 
 Bedford (Mass.), =1=, 4, 37; petition of planters of, 50; 53, 62; =2=,
 136.
 
 Bedford (N. H.), =1=, 247, 248, 251, 252.
 
 Beecher, Henry Ward, =6=, 291.
 
 Bees, the keeping of, =4=, 284, 285.
 
 Beggar-ticks, =6=, 289.
 
 Behavior, repentance for good, =2=, 11.
 
 Behemoth, =6=, 231.
 
 "Behold, how Spring appearing," verse, =5=, 109.
 
 Belknap, Jeremy, quoted, =1=, 91, 127, 189, 201.
 
 Bellamy, the pirate, wrecked off Wellfleet, =4=, 160, 161.
 
 Bellew, F., an artist, =6=, 287.
 
 Bellows, Rev. H. W. (H. U. 1832), =6=, 105.
 
 Bellows, valley called the, =1=, 189.
 
 Bellows Falls (Vt.), =1=, 91; =5=, 5.
 
 Bells, the sound of Sabbath, =1=, 78; of Lincoln, Acton, Bedford,
 Concord, the, =2=, 136.
 
 Bemis, George, Concord printer, =6=, 18.
 
 Benjamin, Park, =6=, 107, note.
 
 Benton, Myron B., =6=, 398. _See_ Letters.
 
 "Best room," the pine wood behind house, =2=, 157.
 
 Betty's Neck, Middleborough, =6=, 265.
 
 Bewick, Thomas, =6=, 248.
 
 Beverley, Robert, History of Virginia, quoted, =4=, 15, 102, 103.
 
 Bhagvat-Geeta, the, quoted, =1=, 140; pure thought of the, 142; beauty
 of the, 148; 153.
 
 Biberg, J. (naturalist), quoted, =6=, 207.
 
 Bible, =6=, 63, 98, 114.
 
 Bibles of several nations, the, =1=, 72; of mankind, 72; =2=, 118,
 119.
 
 Bigelow, Dr. J., =6=, 19.
 
 Billerica (Mass.), =1=, =4=, 32, 36, 38, 43; age of the town of, 49;
 51, 53, 62, 119, 391.
 
 Billingsgate, part of Wellfleet called, =4=, 82.
 
 Billingsgate Island, =4=, 89.
 
 Biography, autobiography the best, =1=, 163.
 
 Birch, yellow, =5=, 6.
 
 Birds, =6=, 21, 23, 30, 42, 75; living with the, =2=, 95; in the
 wilderness, =3=, 118; about Moosehead Lake, 186; about Mud Pond Carry,
 237; near Chamberlain Lake, 240, 241; on Heron Lake, 255; on East
 Branch, 309; on Cape Cod, =4=, 113, 114, 131, 164; and mountains, =5=,
 149. See under names of species.
 
 Birney, James G., =6=, 283, 288.
 
 Biscuit Brook, =1=, 380.
 
 Bittern (Ardea minor, stake-driver), =1=, 249; booming of the, =5=,
 111.
 
 Black Knight, The, verse, =5=, 415, note.
 
 Black, Mrs., =6=, 82.
 
 Black Sam, =2=, 29, 31.
 
 Blackfish, driven ashore in storm, =4=, 142-147.
 
 Black flies, protection against, =3=, 236, 246.
 
 Blake, Harrison Gray Otis (H. U. 1835), =6=, 158, 159, 190, 233, 279;
 letter from, 158, 159; letters to, 160, 164, 173, 174, 177, 179, 185,
 194, 197, 209, 217, 221, 225, 229, 241, 244, 253-261, 267, 276-281,
 290-296, 302, 307, 308, 314-322, 343, 358, 360-368, 383; tours with,
 195, 234, 333; visits from, 158, 253, 267.
 
 Blakians, sugar candy, =6=, 279.
 
 Blood, Perez, =6=, 133, 134, 137.
 
 Blueberries, =3=, 66, 298; =6=, 23, 369; and milk, supper of, =5=,
 144.
 
 Bluebird, the, =5=, 110; =6=, 14, 21, 22, 341, 374-376.
 
 Blue-eyed grass, =6=, 36.
 
 Boat, T.'s, =1=, 12; hints for making a, 13.
 
 Boat-building, =1=, 228.
 
 Boatmen, the pleasant lives of, =1=, 220-226.
 
 Bobolink, the, =5=, 113.
 
 Bodus, quoted, =5=, 317.
 
 Body, a temple, man's, =2=, 245; and soul, 164, 165, 181, 213, 214.
 
 Bogs with hard bottom, =2=, 363.
 
 Bolton (Mass.), =5=, 137.
 
 Bonaparte, anecdote of, =6=, 270.
 
 Bonsecours Market (Montreal), =5=, 11.
 
 Books, the reading and writing of, =1=, 93-112; how to read, =2=, 112;
 the inheritance of nations, 114; catalogue of, =6=, 59, 63, 263; T.'s
 gift of, 264; on natural history, reading, =5=, 103-105.
 
 Boots, Canadian, =5=, 51;
 
 Borde, Sieur de la, quoted, =4=, 156.
 
 Boston (Mass.), countrified minds in towns about, =3=, 24; a big
 wharf, =4=, 268; newspapers of, 398-400; =5=, 3, 7, 9; Agassiz in,
 =6=, 125-132; Alcott in, 190, 236, 237; clubs ridiculed, 345; "Dial"
 mentioned, 38, 58-63, 75, 78, 84, 87, 94, 108, 113-117, 129; lectures
 and lecturers, 189, 190, 192, 358; Miscellany, 83, note, 87, 102;
 packet for Cape Cod, 255, 256; publishers, 83, 102, 139, 182, 233,
 263, 332, 395.
 
 Botany, T.'s skill in, =6=, 3, 234, 238.
 
 Botta, Mrs. Anne Lynch, =6=, 297.
 
 Botta, Paul Emile, quoted, =1=, 107, 130.
 
 Boucher, quoted, =5=, 91.
 
 Boucherville (Que.), =5=, 20.
 
 Bouchette, Topographical Description of the Canadas, quoted, =5=, 41,
 42, 63, 64, 89, 92, 94, 95.
 
 Bound Rock, =1=, 5.
 
 Bout de l'Isle, =5=, 20.
 
 Bowlin Stream, =3=, 308.
 
 Box, living in a, =2=, 32.
 
 Boys, Provincetown, =4=, 218.
 
 Bradbury and Soden, =6=, 83, 102.
 
 Bradford (N. H.), =1=, 380.
 
 Bradford, George P. (H. U. 1825), =6=, 63, 328, 404, 405.
 
 Bradford, T. G. (H. U. 1822), =6=, 19, note.
 
 Brahm, the bringing to earth of, =1=, 141.
 
 Brahman, virtue of the, =1=, 146.
 
 Brahmins, =6=, 224, 299, 300; their forms of conscious penance, =2=,
 4, 5; Walden ice makes T. one with the, 329.
 
 Brand's Popular Antiquities, quoted, =5=, 297, 298.
 
 Brave man and the coward, the, =4=, 277-279.
 
 Bravery of science, the, =5=, 106, 107.
 
 Bread without yeast, =2=, 68-70; discourse on, =6=, 121, 164-166, 260,
 268.
 
 Breakers, =4=, 58, 209.
 
 Bream, =1=, 24-26.
 
 Breed's hut, =2=, 285.
 
 Brereton, John, quoted, =4=, 245.
 
 Brewster (Mass.), =4=, 22, 28, 29.
 
 Briars, a field near Walden, =6=, 170, 171.
 
 Bricks, mortar growing harder on, =2=, 266.
 
 Bride and bridegroom, =6=, 199, 200, 207, 302.
 
 Bridgewater (Mass.), =4=, 19.
 
 Brighton--or Bright-town, =2=, 148.
 
 Brister's Hill, =2=, 252, 283, 284, 289, 294.
 
 Brister's Spring, =2=, 289, 291.
 
 Britania's Pastorals, quoted, =1=, 121.
 
 Broadway, New York, =6=, 70, 85, 287, 291.
 
 Brook Farm, =6=, 318, 404.
 
 Brook Island in Cohasset, =4=, 4.
 
 Brooklawn, New Bedford, =6=, 263, 271, 305.
 
 Brooklyn, N. Y., =6=, 70, 290, 296, 297.
 
 "Brother, where dost thou dwell?" verse, =5=, 403; =6=, 74.
 
 Brown, Deacon Reuben, =6=, 141.
 
 Brown, John, the truth about, =4=, 409; the Kansas troubles, 410,
 413-416; occupation, descent, and character, 410-414; newspaper
 opinions of, 416-425; absurdly called insane, 426-428; small following
 of, 432; example of death of, 434, 435; feeling of divine appointment,
 436, 437; why guilty of death, 437; quoted, 439, 440; last days of,
 441-450; effect of the words of, 444; editors' opinions of, 445; not
 dead, 449, 450; T.'s speech in Concord after the death of, 451-454;
 =6=, 290; 337, 359, 364; comes to Concord, 358, 359; his capture and
 execution, 358-360; is eulogized by T., 359; his companions, 365-367.
 
 Brown, John, Jr., son of preceding, visits North Elba and Boston, =6=,
 364.
 
 Brown, Mrs. See Jackson.
 
 Brown, Theo., of Worcester, =6=, 238, 254, 280, 286, 292, 294, 307,
 315, 331.
 
 Browne, Sir Thomas, quoted, =1=, 69; =4=, 157, 158.
 
 Brownson, O. A., =6=, 5, 404.
 
 BRUTE NEIGHBORS, =2=, 247-262.
 
 Buckland, Francis T., Curiosities of Natural History, =4=, 84.
 
 Buddha and Christ, =1=, 68.
 
 Buddhist, =6=, 108.
 
 Buffaloes, =6=, 14, 17, 109.
 
 Buffum, Arnold, =6=, 288.
 
 Bug from an egg in table of apple wood, the, =2=, 366.
 
 Building one's own house, significance of, =2=, 50, 51.
 
 Bull, E. W. (Concord grape), =6=, 377, note.
 
 Bulwer, Lord Lytton, =6=, 28, 30.
 
 Buried money, =1=, 208.
 
 Burlington (Vt.), =5=, 7, 99.
 
 Burnham, a Boston bookseller, =6=, 263.
 
 Burns, T.'s grandmother, =6=, 7.
 
 Burns, Anthony, =4=, 405.
 
 Burnt Land, the, =3=, 29, 77.
 
 "Burntibus," =3=, 319.
 
 Burton, Sir Richard Francis, =5=, 228.
 
 Business habits indispensable, strict, =2=, 21, 22; remarks on, =6=,
 8, 9, 107, 169-171, 317, 318, 355, 356.
 
 Busk, Indian feast of first fruits, =2=, 75.
 
 "But since we sailed," verse, =1=, 16.
 
 "Butternuts," in New York, =6=, 18.
 
 Butternut tree, =5=, 6.
 
 Buttrick's Plain, =1=, 51.
 
 
 Cabmen of New York, =6=, 69, 70.
 
 Cabot, the discoveries of, =4=, 232, 233.
 
 Cabot, J. Elliot (H. U. 1840), =6=, 125, 130, 188; letters to,
 126-129, 155; letters from, 130, 131, 188.
 
 Cabs, Montreal, =5=, 18; Quebec, 69, 70.
 
 Cactus, =6=, 29, 32.
 
 Caddis-worms, =5=, 170.
 
 Caen, Emery de, quoted, =5=, 52.
 
 Caleche, the (see Cabs), =5=, 69, 70.
 
 Calf, the young hunting, =6=, 135.
 
 Calidas, the Sacontala, quoted, =1=, 183; =2=, 351.
 
 California, the rush to, =4=, 463-465; =6=, 210, 216.
 
 Calling, choice of a, =6=, 66, 67, 108, 109, 121, 156, 163, 168, 171,
 174, 175, 181, 195, 211, 219.
 
 Calyx, =6=, 199; the thalamus, or bridal chamber, 208.
 
 Cambria, steamer, aground, =4=, 93.
 
 Cambridge, college room rent compared with T.'s, =2=, 55; crowded
 hives of, 150; =6=, 5, 7, 8, 10, note, 45, 66-68, 109, 129, 133, 138,
 226, 237, 252, 253, 287, 311; observatory, 133, 137.
 
 Camp, loggers', =3=, 20; reading matter in a, 37, 38; on side of
 Ktaadn, a, 68; the routine for making, 210-212; darkness about a, 303,
 304.
 
 Camping out, =6=, 365, 368, 369, 371.
 
 Camp-meetings, Eastham, =4=, 46-48; _versus_ Ocean, 67.
 
 Canaan (N. H.), =1=, 263.
 
 Canada, apparently older than the United States, =5=, 80, 81;
 population of, 81, 82; the French in, a nation of peasants, 82;
 mentioned, =6=, 215, 251, 323, 324.
 
 _Canadense_, _Iter_, and the word, =5=, 101.
 
 Canadian, woodchopper, a, =2=, 159-166; boat-song, =3=, 42; a blind,
 234; French, =5=, 9; horses, 34; women, 34; atmosphere, 34; love of
 neighborhood, 42, 43; houses, 44, 59; clothes, 45; salutations, 47;
 vegetables and trees, 47, 48; boots, 51; tenures, 63, 64.
 
 Canal, an old, =1=, 62.
 
 Canal-boat, appearance of a, =1=, 150; passing a, in fog, 200; later
 and early thoughts about a, 221-226; with sails, 273, 274.
 
 Candor, in friendship, =6=, 57, 80, 137.
 
 Cane, a straight and a twisted, =5=, 184, 185.
 
 Canoe, water-logged in Walden Pond, =2=, 212; a birch, =3=, 106; used
 in third excursion to Maine woods, 181; shipping water in a, 189;
 crossing lakes in a, 206; carrying a, 207, 208; running rapids in a,
 275-277, 279, 280; =6=, 109, 254, 324, 325.
 
 "Canst thou love with thy mind," verse, =6=, 202.
 
 Canton, Mass., T.'s school at, =6=, 5.
 
 Cap aux Oyes, =5=, 93.
 
 Cape Cod, T.'s various visits to, =4=, 3; derivation of name of, 4;
 formation of, 4, 20; barrenness of, 36-38; the real, 65; houses, 80;
 landscape, a, 132-137; men, the Norse quality of, 140; western shore
 of, 142; changes in the coast-line of, 151-155; clothes-yard, a, 220;
 and its harbors, various names for, 226-229; Gosnold's discovery of,
 242-247; people, 257, 258; =6=, 246, 255, 256, 312, 313; T.'s
 excursions to, 254, 255, 309, 312, 357.
 
 "Cape Cod Railroad," the, =4=, 19.
 
 Cape Diamond, =5=, 22, 40; signal-gun on, 85; the view from, 88.
 
 Cape Rosier, =5=, 92.
 
 Cape Rouge, =5=, 21, 95.
 
 Cape Tourmente, =5=, 41, 89, 96.
 
 Carbuncle Mountain, =3=, 291.
 
 Cardinals, =1=, 18.
 
 Cards left by visitors, =2=, 143, 144.
 
 Cares, =6=, 262, 360.
 
 Carew, Thomas, quoted, =2=, 89.
 
 Caribou Lake, =3=, 216.
 
 Carlisle (Mass.), =1=, 4, 37, 50, 53; =6=, 16, 18, 134.
 
 Carlisle Bridge, =1=, 20, 37.
 
 Carlton House, New York, =6=, 55.
 
 CARLYLE, THOMAS, AND HIS WORKS, =4=, 316-355.
 
 Carlyle, Thomas, circumstances of his life, =4=, 316-320; his books,
 320-322; not a German nor a mystic, 322-325; English style of,
 324-333; quoted, upon Richter, 331, 338; humor of, 333-337, as critic
 and looker-on, 339-343; not blithe enough for a poet, 343, 344;
 sympathy with the Reformer class, 344-346; compared with Emerson, 345;
 a philosopher of action, 346-349; objections to, 349; a typical
 specimen from, on Heroes, 350-352; his exaggeration, 352-354; quoted,
 on the writing of history, 354; pointing to the summits of humanity,
 355; mentioned, =6=, 49, 62, 81, 94, 101, 154, 169, 250; reviewed by
 Emerson, 94, 101; by Thoreau, 169.
 
 Carnac, =1=, 267.
 
 Carry, Indian's method with canoe at a, =3=, 207, 208; a wet, 235-244;
 berries at each, 305, 306; race at a, 314, 315.
 
 Cartier, Jacques, =5=, 7; and the St. Lawrence, 89-91; quoted, 97; 98,
 99.
 
 Caryatides, gossips leaning against barn like, =2=, 186.
 
 Cascade, Silver, =6=, 39.
 
 Cases in court, Wyman's, =6=, 104; Sanborn's, =6=, 364; other cases,
 226.
 
 Castleton, Staten Island, =6=, 68, 71-73, 76, 78, 84, 104.
 
 Castor and Pollux, translation, =5=, 388.
 
 Cat, the Collins's, =2=, 48; in the woods, domestic and "winged," 257,
 258.
 
 Catacombs, =6=, 161, 178.
 
 _Catastomus tuberculatus_, =6=, 131.
 
 Catherine, a Concord family, =6=, 4.
 
 Catholic Church, =6=, 243, 406.
 
 Cat-naps, =6=, 106.
 
 Cato, Major, quoted, =2=, 70, 93, 183, 268.
 
 Cattle-show, the Concord, =1=, 358-361; men at, =5=, 184.
 
 Caucomgomoc Lake, meaning of the name, =3=, 156; 222, 223.
 
 Caucomgomoc Mountain, =3=, 233.
 
 Caucomgomoc Stream, =3=, 142, 147, 219, 229, 247, 297; =6=, 325.
 
 Caves, birds do not sing in, =2=, 31.
 
 Cedar-post, life of, =6=, 293.
 
 Cedar tea, arbor-vit, or, =3=, 60.
 
 Celebrating, men, a committee of arrangements, always, =2=, 363.
 
 Celestial Cows, =6=, 223.
 
 Celestial Empire, conditions of successful trade with, =2=, 22; =6=,
 89.
 
 "Celestial Railroad," =6=, 120.
 
 Cellar, a burrow to which house is but a porch, =2=, 49.
 
 Cellini, Benvenuto, quoted, =2=, 224, 225.
 
 Cemetery of fallen leaves, =5=, 269, 270.
 
 Chairs for society, three, =2=, 155.
 
 Chaleur, Bay of, =3=, 178; =5=, 90; =6=, 324.
 
 Chalmers, Dr. Thomas, in criticism of Coleridge, =5=, 324.
 
 Chamberlain Farm, the, =3=, 245, 264, 265.
 
 Chamberlain, Lake, =3=, 101, 145, 161, 233, 237, 239, 240;
 Apmoojenegamook or, 244; dams about, 251; 262, 267; =6=, 325.
 
 Chambers of Silence, =6=, 231.
 
 Chambly (Que.), =5=, 11.
 
 Champlain, Samuel, quoted, =4=, 85; records and maps of, 227-233;
 quoted, =5=, 8; whales in map of, 91.
 
 Change of air, =2=, 352.
 
 Channing, Ellen Fuller, wife of Ellery, =6=, 43, note.
 
 Channing, W. E., quoted, =1=, 42; =2=, 225; =6=, 43, note, 58, note,
 65, 79, 92-94, 104, 113, 117, 120-122, 146, 151, 153, 190, 192,
 235-238, 251, 253, 254, 257, 259, 266, 270, 272, 273-275, 308, 326,
 note, 328, 334, 336, 341, 344, 345, 406, 407; quoted, ix, x, 3, 65,
 note, 121.
 
 Channing, Rev. William Henry (H. U. 1829), cousin of Ellery, =6=, 81,
 96, 104, 118, 183, 184.
 
 Channing, William Francis (son of Dr. W. E. Channing, and cousin of
 the two named above), mentioned, =6=, 190.
 
 Chapin, Rev. E. H. (H. U. 1845), =6=, 61.
 
 Chapman, George, quoted, =2=, 37.
 
 Chapman, John, London publisher, =6=, 271.
 
 Charity, cold, =4=, 78.
 
 Charles I, the only martyr in Church of England liturgy, =4=, 446.
 
 Charleston, S. C., =6=, 283.
 
 Charlevoix, quoted, =5=, 52, 91.
 
 Chastity, the flowering of man, =2=, 242, 243; and sensuality, =6=,
 192, 204-209, 295.
 
 Chteau, Richer, church of, =5=, 46; 49; lodgings at, 59.
 
 Chateaubriand, quoted, =1=, 137.
 
 Chatham (Mass.), =4=, 26.
 
 Chaucer, Geoffrey, quoted, =1=, 293, 352, 353; in praise of, 391-400;
 quoted, =2=, 234; quoted, =5=, 159, 160, =6=, 103; mentioned, 76.
 
 Chaudire River, the, =5=, 21; Falls of the, 69, 70.
 
 Cheap men, =5=, 29, 30.
 
 Checkerberry-Tea Camp, =3=, 301.
 
 Chelmsford (Mass.), =1=, 53, 63, 81, 85, 88, 92, 113, 268, 384, 391.
 
 Cherries, =6=, 23, 71.
 
 Cherry-stones, transported by birds, =5=, 188.
 
 CHESUNCOOK, =3=, 93-173.
 
 Chesuncook Deadwater, =3=, 217.
 
 Chesuncook Lake, =3=, 5, 11, 36, 73, 80, 86, 94, 104, 105, 117, 119,
 136, 137; meaning of the word, 156; 176; going to church on, 214; 234,
 250, 254; mentioned, =6=, 325, 395.
 
 Chicago, visited by T., =6=, 384; by B. B. Wiley, 298.
 
 Chickadee, coming of the, =2=, 304; =5=, 108; =6=, 253.
 
 Chief end of man, =2=, 9.
 
 Chien, La Rivire au, =5=, 56.
 
 Child, Mrs. Lydia Maria, =6=, 100.
 
 China, =6=, 89, 246.
 
 Chippeway Indians, =6=, 109.
 
 Chivin, Dace, Roach or Cousin Trout, =1=, 27; =3=, 59; 312; =6=, 127,
 131, 132.
 
 Cholmondeley, Rev. Charles, =6=, 236.
 
 Cholmondeley, Thomas, =6=, 234-237, 240, 241, 247-249, 252, 258, 271,
 297, 308, 342-344, 349, 352, 380-383; books sent by, 270, 271; letter
 from, 272, 297, 380; letter to, 249-251.
 
 Christ, =6=, 179, 194.
 
 Christian, the modern, =4=, 420; being a, 445; the prayer of a, =6=,
 89.
 
 "Christian Examiner," =6=, 99.
 
 Christianity, practical and radical, =1=, 141; adopted as an improved
 method of _agri_-culture, =2=, 41.
 
 Church of England, prayer for a martyr, =4=, 446.
 
 Churches, Catholic and Protestant, =5=, 12-14; =6=, 79, 97, 195, 224,
 226, 243; roadside, 46.
 
 Cigar-smoke, the gods not to be appeased with, =4=, 42.
 
 Circulating library, =2=, 116, 117.
 
 Cities, as wharves, =4=, 268; American, =6=, 69, 79, 187, 287, 297,
 345.
 
 City and country opinions, =4=, 396, 397.
 
 City and Swamp, =6=, 187.
 
 CIVIL DISOBEDIENCE, =4=, 356-387.
 
 Civilization, not all a success, =2=, 34; and landscape, =3=, 171-173.
 
 _Claire Fontaine_, _La_, =5=, 26.
 
 Clams, Cape Cod, =4=, 35, 36; large, 72; or quahogs, catching birds
 86; stones shaped like, 109.
 
 Clark, Farmer, =6=, 141.
 
 Clark's Island, =6=, 301, note, 328, note.
 
 Clark, the Swedenborgian, =6=, 146.
 
 Classics, study of the, =1=, 238; =2=, 111-113; must be read in the
 original, 115.
 
 Clay Pounds, the, =4=, 132; why so called, 158; the Somerset wrecked
 on, 162.
 
 Clothes, =6=, 227, 228, 245, 255, 256, 262, 363; bad-weather, =5=, 28;
 Canadian, 45.
 
 Clothing, a necessary of life, =2=, 13, 14; not always procured for
 true utility, 23; new and old, 25, 26.
 
 Cloud, entering a, =3=, 70; factory, a, 70.
 
 Clouds. _See_ Rain.
 
 Clover, tree. _See_ Melilot.
 
 Club at Parker House, =6=, 345; Town and Country, 345, 346.
 
 Coat-of-arms, a Concord, =1=, 7.
 
 Cock-crowning, the charms of, =2=, 140-142.
 
 Codman place, the, =2=, 286.
 
 Coffee-grounds, =6=, 180.
 
 Cohass Brook, =1=, 238.
 
 Cohasset, the Indian, =1=, 251.
 
 Cohasset (Mass.), the wreck at, =4=, 5-13; Rocks, sea-bathing at, 16,
 17.
 
 Cold Friday, dating from, =2=, 280.
 
 Cold Stream Pond, =3=, 9.
 
 Cold weather, =6=, 14, 27-32, 250.
 
 Collins, James, Irishman whose shanty T. bought, =2=, 47.
 
 Colors, names and joy of, =5=, 273-275. _See_ Autumnal Tints, Clouds,
 etc.
 
 Colton's Map of Maine, =3=, 104, 308.
 
 Comet, nucleus of, =6=, 173.
 
 Commerce, =1=, 224; in praise of, =2=, 131-136, =6=, 102.
 
 Common sense, uncommon and, =1=, 414; the sense of men asleep, =2=,
 357, 358.
 
 Compost, better part of man soon plowed into soil for, =2=, 6.
 
 Conantum, =1=, 374; =6=, 140.
 
 Concord (Mass.), settlement of, =1=, 3; historian of, quoted, 3; 5;
 coat-of-arms for, 7; territory of, in 1831, 8; described by Johnson,
 8; meadows, 9; a port of entry, 12; 14; poet, a, 14; 36, 43, 49, 51,
 61, 64, 82, 124; History of, quoted, 125; 169; Cliffs, 170; 227, 345;
 Cattle-show in, 358-361; return to, 420; Walden Pond in =2=, 3;
 traveled a good deal in 4; the farmers of, 35; house surpassing the
 luxury of, 54; little fresh meal and corn sold in, 70; Battle Ground,
 95; effect of a fire bell on people living near, 103, 104; culture,
 117, 118, wiser men than produced by soil of, 119; hired man of, 120;
 liberal education in, 121; "its soothing sound is--," 127; sign of a
 trader in, 133; bells of, 136; two-colored waters of, 195; Walden
 bequeathed to, 214, 215; fight of ants, 255; D. Ingraham, Esq., of,
 283; "to the rescue," 286; 291, 308; =3=, 1, 24, 76, 117; meaning of
 Indian name for, 157, 187; 214, 268; the Assabet in; 278; the
 _trainers_ of, =4=, 392; =5=, 3, 6, 8; History of, quoted, 115; 133,
 149, 152; its academy, =6=, 10, 24, 49; aspect of, 14, 38, 67, 92,
 104; cliffs of, 28, 30, 104; Lyceum, 6, 52, 53, 61, 145, 154, 156,
 275; people and houses, 4-7, 14, 17, 18, 21, 34, 35, 42, 43, 48-50,
 52-54, 64, 65, 92, 93; schools, 5, 6, 10, 22, 23, 48, 49, 321, 322;
 T's fondness for, 285.
 
 Concord (N.H.), =1=, 88, 89; =2=, 68, 308; entertained in, and origin
 of, 322.
 
 CONCORD RIVER, =1=, 3-11.
 
 Concord River, =1=, 3; course of, 3; gentleness of, 7; 10, 11, 19, 20,
 62, 90, 113; a canal-boat on, and Fair Haven, 222-224; Conantum on
 the, 374; reaching the, 391; =2=, 215, 219; =3=, 229, 278, 299; =5=,
 115, 139; =6=, 3, 92, 262.
 
 Condover, England, =6=, 235, 383.
 
 Conduct, regulation of, =6=, ix, 9, 10, 33, 34, 57, 76, 88, 89, 118,
 161, 162, 166, 167, 177, 186, 187, 205.
 
 Confucius, quoted, =1=, 288, 299; =2=, 12, 149; =6=, 299.
 
 Connecticut River, the, =1=, 87, 88, 89, 212, 263; =5=, 5, 145, 147;
 =6=, 282.
 
 "Conscience is instinct bred in the house," verse, =1=, 75.
 
 Conscience, the, =1=, 75, 138; the chief of conservatives, 140.
 
 Conservatism, the wisest, =1=, 140.
 
 Contoocook, =1=, 87.
 
 Conversation, the shallowness of most, =4=, 471; =6=, 64, 65, 346.
 
 Conway, Moncure Daniel (H. U. 1854), =6=, 398.
 
 Cooking, =1=, 237.
 
 Coombs, Neighbor, =6=, 141, 154.
 
 Coperation, difficulties of, =2=, 79, 80.
 
 Coos Falls, =1=, 248, 353.
 
 Coreopsis, =1=, 18.
 
 Corn, great crops of, =4=, 37-39.
 
 Cost, the amount of life exchanged for a thing, =2=, 34; of house,
 items of, 54; of food for eight months, 65, 66; total, of living, 66;
 bean-field, 179, 180.
 
 Cotes, Lady Louisa, =6=, 383.
 
 Cotton, Charles, quoted, =1=, 249.
 
 Country and city opinions, =4=, 396, 397.
 
 _Coureurs de bois_ and _de risques_, =5=, 43.
 
 Cousin Trout. _See_ Chivin.
 
 Cowper, William, quoted, =2=, 92; =6=, 254, 275.
 
 Cows fed on fishes' heads, =4=, 214, 215.
 
 Cranberries, mountain, =3=, 27; tree, 147.
 
 Cranberry Island, =1=, 6.
 
 Cranks, the turning of, =4=, 297.
 
 Crantz, account of Greenland, quoted, =4=, 60, 149.
 
 Crickets, the creaking of, =5=, 108.
 
 Crimea, =6=, 266; war in the, 237, 244, 251.
 
 Criticism, =1=, 401.
 
 Cromwell's Falls, =1=, 88; story of Cromwell and, 206, 207.
 
 Crooked River, the Souhegan or, =1=, 231.
 
 Crookneck squash seeds, Quebec, =5=, 87.
 
 Crosses in the wilderness, =3=, 50; roadside, =5=, 45, 46.
 
 Crow, the, =5=, 108; not imported from Europe, 113.
 
 Crusoe, Robinson, among the Arabs, =1=, 60.
 
 Crystalline botany, =5=, 126, 127.
 
 Cuckoo characters, =6=, 161.
 
 Culm, bloom in the, =5=, 253.
 
 Cultivation, wildness, and, =1=, 55.
 
 Cummings, slave of Squire, =2=, 284.
 
 Cupid Wounded, verse, =1=, 244.
 
 Curing moose meat and hide, =3=, 149, 150, 208.
 
 Curtis, George William, =6=, 142, 256, note, 343.
 
 Custom, the grave of, =1=, 136; immemorial, 140.
 
 Cutler, E. J. (H. U. 1853), =6=, 287.
 
 _Cytherea choros ducit_, =6=, 27.
 
 
 Dace. _See_ Chivin.
 
 Damodara, quoted, =2=, 97.
 
 Dana, Charles, =6=, 404.
 
 Danesaz, =6=, 122.
 
 Daniel, Samuel, quoted, =1=, 106, 132, 407; =6=, 219.
 
 Darby, William, quoted, =5=, 93, 94.
 
 Darien, Isthmus of, robbing graveyards, on the, =4=, 467.
 
 Darwin, Charles R., quoted, =2=, 14; =4=, 122; =6=, 382.
 
 Davenant, Sir William Gondibert, quoted, =2=, 286.
 
 Davis, Josiah, of Concord, his house, =6=, 5.
 
 Day, deliberately, like nature, spending one, =2=, 108; and right,
 =6=, 242, 292, 293, 310.
 
 Day-dreams, =6=, 38-40, 92, 93, 121, 122, 180, 181.
 
 D. D.'s and chickadee-dees, =4=, 469.
 
 Dead body on the shore, a, =4=, 107, 108.
 
 De Bry's _Collectio Peregrinationum_, =3=, 149.
 
 Debt, getting in and out of, =2=, 7.
 
 Decalogue, for whom made, =6=, 167.
 
 Deep Cove, =3=, 45, 84.
 
 Deer, =3=, 154.
 
 Deer Island, =3=, 100, 183, 185, 188.
 
 Delay, verse, =5=, 418.
 
 Delay, in life, =6=, 196; in dying, 350.
 
 Demons, =6=, 91, 243, 267, 333.
 
 De Monts, Sieur, quoted, =1=, 42; Champlain and, =4=, 228.
 
 Dennis (Mass.), =4=, 22; described, 25, 26.
 
 Departure, The, verse, =5=, 414.
 
 Desperation, mass of men lead lives of quiet, =2=, 8, 9.
 
 Destiny, =6=, 44; our own work, 361.
 
 Devil, =6=, 188, 220; the printer's, 322.
 
 Dew of sixpences, =6=, 44.
 
 "Dial," quarterly magazine, =6=, 38, 58-63, 78, 84, 87, 94, 108,
 113-117, 125, 156, 158.
 
 Dialect, abominable, =6=, 63.
 
 Dialogue between Hermit and Poet, =2=, 247-249.
 
 "Die and be buried who will," verse, =3=, 90.
 
 Digby, Sir Kenelm, quoted, =2=, 179.
 
 Ding Dong, verse, =5=, 417.
 
 Diogenes, =6=, x.
 
 Diploma, =6=, 138.
 
 Dippers, a brood of, =3=, 184.
 
 Discipline, =6=, 212, 243.
 
 Discontented, speaking mainly to the, =2=, 17, 18.
 
 Discovery, inner, =1=, 409.
 
 Dissipation, not allied to love, =6=, 206; to be shunned by T., =6=,
 313.
 
 Divinity in man! Look at the teamster, =2=, 8.
 
 Doane, Heman, verses by, on Thomas Prince's pear tree, =4=, 44, 45.
 
 Doane, John, =4=, 45.
 
 Dobson, the criminal, and Henry James, =6=, 346, 347.
 
 Doctrine of Sorrow, =6=, 168; of Happiness, 173, 174; of letting
 alone, 177, 178.
 
 Dog, in the woods, a village Bose, =2=, 257; a troublesome, =3=, 177;
 at the churn, a, =4=, 285.
 
 Dog-barking, =1=, 40.
 
 Dogmas, =6=, 346.
 
 Dogs on the seashore, =4=, 185, 186; in harness, =5=, 30.
 
 Doing and Being, =6=, 221, 230.
 
 Doing-good, a crowded profession, =2=, 81.
 
 "Dong, sounds the brass in the East," verse, =1=, 50.
 
 Donne, Dr. John, quoted, =1=, 315, 356.
 
 Double Top Mountain, =3=, 49.
 
 Douglass, Frederick, Wendell Phillips on, =4=, 313.
 
 Dracut (Mass.), =1=, 81.
 
 Drake, Sir Francis, quoted, =5=, 325.
 
 Dream of fishing, a, =3=, 61.
 
 Dreams, =1=, 119, 315; =6=, 216.
 
 Dress, of Cholmondeley, =6=, 342; of the Quakers, 97, 288; of T., 226.
 
 Driftwood, Cape Cod and Greenland, =4=, 59-61.
 
 Drosera, =6=, 310.
 
 Du Chaillu, =6=, 382.
 
 Drum, sound of a, by night, =1=, 181.
 
 Drummond of Hawthornden, William, quoted, =2=, 219.
 
 Dubartas, quoted, translation of Sylvester, =5=, 328, 329.
 
 Ducks, on Walden Pond, =2=, 262.
 
 Dug-out houses of American colonists, =2=, 42, 43.
 
 Duke of Newcastle, and Prince of Wales, =6=, 372.
 
 Dunbar, Rev. Asa (H. U. 1767), T.'s grandfather, =6=, 7.
 
 Dunbar, Charles (uncle of T.), =6=, 5, 106.
 
 Dunbar, Louisa, =6=, 99.
 
 Dunbar, Mary, =6=, 12, note.
 
 Dundees, a nickname, =6=, 14, 16.
 
 Dunstable (Mass.), =1=, 64, 114, 123, 124, 174, 175, 177, 208, 227;
 History of, 175; quoted, 113, 126.
 
 Durkee, Dr., a naturalist, =6=, 310, 327.
 
 Dustan, Hannah, escape with nurse and child from Indians, =1=,
 341-345.
 
 Duties, =6=, 162, 167, 222, 223, 229.
 
 Duty, sense of, =6=, 196.
 
 Duxbury (Mass.), =6=, 301 note.
 
 Dwelling-house, what not to make it, =2=, 31.
 
 Dwight, John S., =6=, 404.
 
 Dwight, Timothy, quoted, =4=, 212, 225.
 
 Dying, real, =4=, 434, 435.
 
 
 "Each summer sound," verse, =5=, 112.
 
 Eagle-Beak, =6=, 15, note, 16.
 
 Eagle Lake, =3=, 101, 161; road, 261.
 
 Eagleswood, =6=, 286-291.
 
 Earth, probing of, =6=, 194.
 
 EAST BRANCH, THE ALLEGASH AND, =3=, 174-327.
 
 East Branch, mouth of the, =3=, 19; 23, 161, 175, 176, 249, 256, 257,
 268; Hunt's house on the, 269, 270, 273, 274, 288, 289, 298, 312, 315,
 316.
 
 East Harbor Village, in Truro, =4=, 137.
 
 East Main, Labrador and, health in the words, =5=, 104.
 
 Easterbrooks Country, =5=, 299, 303.
 
 "Easter Brooks," =6=, 106.
 
 Eastern Mountain anchored, =6=, 321.
 
 Eastham (Mass.), the history of, =4=, 43-56; ministers of, 45-55;
 Table-Lands of, 62; the Pilgrims, 256.
 
 Echo, in nature, =6=, 176, 177.
 
 "Echoes of Harper's Ferry," =6=, 359.
 
 ECONOMY, =2=, 3-89.
 
 Edda, the Prose, quoted, =5=, 291.
 
 Edith, the Saxon (daughter of Emerson), =6=, 113.
 
 Education, tuition bills pay for the least valuable part of, =2=, 55,
 56.
 
 Eel, the common, the Lamprey, =1=, 31.
 
 Eel River, =3=, 256.
 
 Eggs, a master in cooking, =5=, 61, 62.
 
 Egotism in writers, =2=, 3, 4.
 
 Election-birds, =1=, 56.
 
 Elegy in a Country Churchyard, =3=, 19, quoted, 19.
 
 Eliot, John, =1=, 82.
 
 Elm, the, =5=, 263, 264, 276.
 
 Eloquence a transient thing, =2=, 113.
 
 Elysian life, summer makes possible, =2=, 15.
 
 Elysium, translation, =5=, 375.
 
 Emerson, Charles Chauncy (H. U. 1828), his Notes from the Journal of a
 Scholar, =6=, 94.
 
 Emerson, Charles (H. U. 1863), =6=, 24, note.
 
 Emerson, Edith (Mrs. W. H. Forbes), =6=, 51, 54, 55, 103, 136, 145,
 157.
 
 Emerson, Edward Waldo (H. U. 1866), =6=, 136, 145, 152, 157.
 
 Emerson, Ellen Tucker, =6=, 51, 53, 113, 136, 142, 145, 150, 153, 157.
 
 Emerson, Haven (son of William), =6=, 78.
 
 Emerson, George B., quoted, =5=, 200.
 
 Emerson, Miss Mary Moody (aunt of R. W. E.), =6=, 269, 345, note.
 
 Emerson, Ralph Waldo (H. U. 1821), quoted =1=, 3, 14, 103, 104, 317;
 Carlyle compared with, =4=, 345, 346; =6=, vii, ix, 6, 10, note, 17,
 note, 48, 120, 125, 132, 151, 155, 157, 183, 190, 229, 236, 238, 251,
 252, note, 253, 269, 322, 328, 337, note, 345, 346, 358, 359, 366,
 367; children of, 51, 53-55, 136, 142, 145, 152, 153, 157; and Alcott,
 63, 80, 83, 84, note, 136, 322, 328, 346; and Charles Lane, 62, 124,
 125; and the "Dial," 58-63, 75, 78, 84, 94, 113-115; letters from, 48,
 49, 58, 78, 94, 102, note, 104, 120, 125, 142, 155; letters to (from
 Thoreau), 50-58, 59-64, 78-84, 92-95, 101-103, 107, 108, 113-116,
 135-155, 157, 169; quoted, 22, 115, 229, 237, note, 286, 290.
 
 Emerson, Mrs. R. W. (Lidian Jackson, of Plymouth), =6=, 35, 42, note,
 46, 53, 55, 64, 75, 95, 103, 135, 136, 152, 157; letter from, 64, 65;
 letters to, 75-78, 87-89, 112, 113.
 
 Emerson, Madam Ruth (mother of William, Ralph, and Charles), =6=, 54,
 78, 95.
 
 Emerson, Waldo (son of R. W. E.), =6=, 22, 35, 42; death of, 22.
 
 Emerson, William (H. U. 1818), of Staten Island, =6=, 50, 83, 98, 104.
 
 Emersonian influences, =6=, 10, 49.
 
 Employment, =6=, 15, 35, 39, 83, 107, 135, 181, 221, 222, 267, 315.
 
 End of Nature's creatures, the, =1=, 236.
 
 Enfield (Me.), =3=, 9.
 
 England, last news from, =2=, 105; home of ancestors, =6=, 5, note,
 Emerson in, 124, 125, 148, 150, 154, 155.
 
 English and French in the New World, =5=, 66, 67.
 
 Englishmen, =6=, 50, 110, 125, 162, 235-238, 383, note.
 
 Entomology, the study of, =5=, 107, 108; =6=, 90, 309, 310, 327, 328.
 
 Epidermis, our outside clothes, =2=, 26.
 
 Epigrams of Thoreau, =6=, 20, 26, 28, 41, 52, 56, 57, 60, 66, 67, 69,
 76, 77, 83, 88, 93, 94, 118, 149, 156, 160, 161, 163, 173, 176, 178,
 186, 199, 200, 201, 208.
 
 Epistles of Thoreau, =6=, xii; Latin and English, 27-32; take the
 place of lectures, 192.
 
 Epitaphs, =1=, 177, 178.
 
 Epitome of the year, the day, =2=, 332.
 
 Errington, Miss, a teacher, =6=, 73, 86.
 
 Eternal life, =6=, 160, 161, 164, 173, 174, 194, 225.
 
 Eternity, =6=, 178, 179, 204, 260, 261.
 
 Etesian winds, news simmers through men like, =2=, 186.
 
 Ethnical Scriptures, =6=, 114, 117.
 
 Etymologies, =6=, 33, 34, 243.
 
 Etzler, J. H., review of The Paradise within the Reach of all Men, by,
 =4=, 280-305; quoted, 280, 281, 292-300; "Mechanical System," 286,
 292, 300, 303; merits and faults of the books, 301-304; criticised,
 =6=, 102.
 
 Evelyn, John, quoted, =2=, 10, 179; quoted, =5=, 310, 311.
 
 Everett, Edward (H. U. 1811), =6=, 372.
 
 Everlasting (life-everlasting), the pearly, =3=, 97.
 
 Evil spirits, =6=, 208, 226.
 
 _Ex Oriente Lux: ex Occidente Frux_, =5=, 221.
 
 Exaggeration, the need of, =4=, 352, 353.
 
 Excursions, in Concord, =6=, 16, 18, 28, 49, 50, 59, note, 121, 126,
 146, 230, 245, 250, 261, 267, 280, 281, 309; elsewhere in
 Massachusetts, 191, 196, 233, 234, 237, 244, 245, 255, 263, 279; to
 Maine, 254, 309, 315, 322-327; to Monadnoc, 329, 332, 364, 368-372; to
 New Hampshire (White Mountains), 6, 330-336, 349; to New York and New
 Jersey, 68-73, 77-80, 82-86, 95-97, 107-110, 183, 286-291, 295-298; to
 the West and Northwest, 380, 383, 391; estimate of, =6=, 170, 171;
 reducing, 171, 182, 262.
 
 Expenses, farm, =2=, 60, 61; outgo and income, bean-field, 179-181.
 _See_ Cost.
 
 Experiences, the paucity of men's, =5=, 241, 242.
 
 Exploration, of one's self, =2=, 353-355.
 
 Extemporaneous living, =1=, 332.
 
 _Extra Vagance_, depends on how you are yarded, =2=, 357.
 
 Extravagance in living, =6=, 213, 214, 317-319, 348.
 
 Eyes, movement of the, =1=, 80, the sight of different men's, =5=,
 285-288; and insight, =6=, 161, 162.
 
 
 Fable, the universal appeal of, =1=, 58; the Christian, 67.
 
 "Fabulate and paddle in the social slush," =6=, 230.
 
 Face, imaginary formation by thawing of the, =2=, 339, 340.
 
 Factory system, not best mode of supplying clothing, =2=, 29.
 
 Failure or success, =6=, 188, 225.
 
 Faineancy, =6=, 230.
 
 Fair Cities of the plain, =6=, 348.
 
 Fair Haven, a canal-boat on, =1=, 224; =2=, 205, 219, 225, 274, 300,
 307, 330; huckleberries on hill, 190, 192; ledges, 308; late ice on
 pond, 335; =6=, 28, 30, 50, 116, 231.
 
 Faith, =6=, 47, 57, 167, 169, 226; phases of, 56, 57, 81, 112, 118,
 159, 173, 174, 178, 214, 215, 224, 242, 243, 379.
 
 Fall. _See_ Autumn.
 
 Fall of the Leaf, the verse, =5=, 407.
 
 Fallen Leaves, =5=, 264-270.
 
 Falls, a drug of, =5=, 58.
 
 Fama Marcelli, =6=, viii.
 
 Fame, translation, =5=, 378.
 
 Fame, to be distrusted, =4=, 403; =6=, vii, 66, 67, 92, 93.
 
 "Fame cannot tempt the bard," verse, =6=, viii.
 
 Family ancestry, =6=, 3, 7, 11, 104; demon of sleep, 91, 106.
 
 Farm, the Hollowell, =2=, 92; a model, 218.
 
 Farmer, John, reflections of, =2=, 245.
 
 Farmer, visits from a long-headed, =2=, 294.
 
 Farmers, interesting in proportion as they are poor, =2=, 218.
 
 Farms in Concord, =6=, 256, note; in Staten Island, 86, 95; at
 Chappaqua, 297.
 
 Farwell of Dunstable, =1=, 174-176, 208.
 
 Fashion, worship of, =2=, 28.
 
 Fate, what a man thinks of himself, his, =2=, 8; =6=, 39, 77, 112,
 361; the Fates, 74, 108, 149.
 
 Father Hecker, =6=, 122, 123, 404, 405, 408.
 
 Father tongue, written language our, =2=, 112.
 
 Feeling, acute, =6=, 35; indifferent, 168.
 
 Fellowship, =6=, 268.
 
 Feminine traits, =6=, 198, 201.
 
 Fences in Truro, =4=, 138, 139.
 
 Fenda, wife of "Sippio Brister," =2=, 284.
 
 Fenwick, Bishop, =3=, 323.
 
 Field, John, an Irishman, story of, =2=, 226.
 
 Finch, =6=, 75.
 
 Fine art, no place for a work of, =2=, 41, 42.
 
 Fire, purification by, =2=, 75; "my housekeeper," 279; man and, 280;
 an alarm of, 285; a camp, =3=, 43, 115, 116; =6=, 28, 30, 294, 333,
 334, 373; of driftwood, 268; on Mt. Washington, 336; on Monadnoc, 369.
 
 Fire Island, =6=, 183, 185.
 
 Fire-weed, =3=, 95, 282.
 
 Fish, A Religious, newspaper clipping, =4=, 116; uses of, in
 Provincetown, 212-215; spearing, =5=, 119, 121-123. _See_ Bream, Eel,
 Pickerel, Pout, Shiner.
 
 Fisher, the pickerel, =5=, 180, 181.
 
 Fisherman, the, =1=, 21; Account Current of a, 33.
 
 Fishes, the nature of, =1=, 23; schools of, in Walden Pond, =2=, 210,
 211; of thought, 297; driven ashore by storm, =4=, 143-147; described
 in Massachusetts Report, =5=, 118.
 
 Fish-hawk, the, =1=, 205; =5=, 110.
 
 Fishing, with silent man, =2=, 192; at night, 194; alone detains
 citizens at Walden Pond, 235, 236; impossible to T. without loss of
 self-respect, 236, 237; in winter, 313, 314; =3=, 58; in the
 Caucomgomoc, 226, 227; for bass, =4=, 117; mackerel, 179-184, 189,
 190.
 
 Fish stories, ancient, =4=, 215, 216.
 
 Fitchburg (Mass.), going to, =2=, 59; =5=, 3; =6=, 292, 302.
 
 Fitchburg Railroad, =2=, 127; depot in Boston, =6=, 345; in Acton,
 366.
 
 Fitzwilliam (N. H.), =5=, 4.
 
 Five Islands, the, =3=, 11, 31, 87, 320.
 
 Flagg, Wilson, =6=, 311.
 
 Flat, the weak person, =4=, 278.
 
 Flea, deserts made by bite of a, =1=, 209.
 
 Flesh and bones, =6=, 110.
 
 Fletcher, Giles, quoted, =1=, 199, 202.
 
 Fletcher, Phineas, quoted, =1=, 414 ("By them went Fido").
 
 Flint's Pond, =2=, 201, 223, 330-333; or Sandy, in Lincoln, 216-219;
 covered with snow, like Baffin's Bay, 299.
 
 Floating in a skiff, =1=, 48.
 
 Flowers, autumn, =1=, 377.
 
 Fog, early morning, =1=, 188, 200, 201; picturesque effect of, 201,
 202; =6=, 257, 329, 334, 335. _See_ Clouds, Haze, Mist.
 
 Follen, Dr. Charles, =6=, 30.
 
 Food, a necessary of life, =2=, 13; the fuel of man's body, 14;
 general consideration of, 60-72; objections to animal, 237;
 desirability of simple, 238-241; =6=, 164, 165, 175, 216, 218.
 
 Football, spiritual, =6=, 217.
 
 Foreign country, quickly in a, =5=, 31.
 
 Forests, nations preserved by, =5=, 229.
 
 FORMER INHABITANTS, AND WINTER VISITORS, =2=, 282-298.
 
 Fortifications, ancient and modern, =5=, 77, 78.
 
 Fort Sumter, =6=, 378, 379.
 
 Fourier, communities of, =6=, 81, 96, 97, 104, 318.
 
 Fowler, Thomas, sheltered and joined by, =3=, 29-34.
 
 Fox, shooting a, =2=, 307; starting up a, =4=, 148; the, =5=, 117.
 
 Fox Island, =1=, 43.
 
 Foxes outside T.'s house, =2=, 301.
 
 Fragrance, of flowers and political life, =4=, 408.
 
 Framingham (Mass.), =1=, 4, 53.
 
 Franconia (N. H.), =1=, 89.
 
 Franklin, wreck of the ship, =4=, 73; wreckage from the, 92, 114, 115.
 
 Fredericton (N. B.), =3=, 16.
 
 Freedom, of one's time, =4=, 460, 461; advantages of, =6=, 8, 12, 33,
 34; for the scholar, 171, 174, 175.
 
 Freeman, "Sippio Brister," =2=, 284.
 
 Free-Soilers, =6=, 196.
 
 Frmont, J. C., =6=, 362.
 
 French, coin found on beach at Wellfleet, =4=, 161; explorers in and
 about New England, 227-242; difficulties in talking, =5=, 35-37, 47;
 strange, 50; pure, 52; in the New World, English and, 66-68; in
 Canada, 81, 82; the, spoken in Quebec streets, 86, 87.
 
 Freshet, on the Merrimack, =1=, 379; the Great, =3=, 58.
 
 Fresh-Water or River Wolf, =1=, 29.
 
 FRIDAY, =1=, 356-420.
 
 Friend, office of a, =6=, 44, 53, 80, 93, 94, 135.
 
 Friends, =1=, 275-307; =6=, 56, 187, 206; their uses, 56, 57; estimate
 of, 186, 187; and followers, 183-464.
 
 Friends, The Value of, translation, =5=, 387.
 
 Friendship, offense against, =6=, 56-58; advantages of, =6=, 57, 93,
 94, 171, 187, 203; and love, 203, 302; verses on, 38, 329, note;
 accord in, 57, 201, 260, 261.
 
 Fringilla, _Fring. Melod._, =6=, 23.
 
 Frogs, _troonk_ of bull-, =2=, 139, 140. _See_ Toad.
 
 Froissart, good place to read, =5=, 23.
 
 Frontier houses, =3=, 144.
 
 Frontiers, wherever men front, =1=, 323.
 
 Frost, Rev. Barzillai (H. U. 1830), =6=, 10, note, 137.
 
 Frost-smoke, =5=, 166.
 
 Fruitlands (farm of Alcott and Lane), =6=, 64, 90, 122, 142, 155, 404.
 
 Fruits, gathering autumn, =2=, 263.
 
 Fruit trees, paucity of, in Cape towns, =4=, 34.
 
 Fuel, a necessary of life, =2=, 13, 14; of man's body, food, 14.
 
 Fugitive Slave Law, the, =4=, 388, 389, 401-403, 426.
 
 Fuller, Rev. Arthur (H. U. 1843), =6=, 184.
 
 Fuller, Ellen (Mrs. Channing), =6=, 43.
 
 Fuller, Margaret (Countess Ossoli), =6=, 39, 94, 107, 120, 183-186.
 
 Fuller, Richard E. (H. U. 1844), =6=, 43, 45, 65.
 
 Fuller, Thomas, quoted, =1=, 265, 414.
 
 Fundy, Bay of, =3=, 254.
 
 Funeral Bell, The, verse, =5=, 405.
 
 Funeral processions, =6=, 146.
 
 Fur Countries, inspiring neighborhood of the, =5=, 105.
 
 "_Furdustrandas_," =4=, 187, 191.
 
 Furniture, generally considered, =2=, 72-76; moved out of doors, 125.
 
 
 Galway, Ireland, the wrecked brig from, =4=, 6.
 
 Game, woodland, =6=, 16, 336, 339.
 
 Ganges, =6=, 267.
 
 Gardens, Emerson's, =6=, 35, 77, 135, 149, 150; Thoreau's, 86, 355.
 
 Garget, poke or, =5=, 253-255.
 
 Garrison, W. L., =6=, 255.
 
 Gazette, news of political parties, not of nature, printed in the,
 =2=, 19.
 
 Gazetteer, reading the, =1=, 92; quoted, 206, 207, 259, 260, 269-271;
 =4=, 25, 28.
 
 Geese, first flock of, =5=, 110.
 
 Genius, order in the development of, =1=, 329; the Man of, 350; a man
 and his, 362; of the mountain, =6=, 369; of the storm, 369.
 
 Gerard, the English herbalist, quoted, =4=, 206.
 
 Gerardia, purpurea (purple gerardia), =1=, 18.
 
 Gesner, Konrad, von, quoted, =1=, 389; =5=, 318.
 
 Gifts, =6=, 22.
 
 Gilbert, Sir Humphrey, =4=, 123.
 
 Gilpin, William, quoted, =2=, 276, 317; =4=, 119; =6=, 239, 263, 264.
 
 God, T.'s idea of, =1=, 65, 66; men's impertinent knowledge of, 70,
 71; the personality of, 79; clothes fit to worship, in, =2=, 25; =6=,
 159, 163, 174, 188, 259; ask to see, 164; city of, 164; 223; not an
 ash man, 244; reigns, 178, 317.
 
 "God's Drop," proposed as name for Walden Pond, =2=, 215.
 
 Goethe, =1=, 347-350; quoted, 351-353; =6=, 62, 168, 301.
 
 Goff's Falls, =1=, 251.
 
 Goffstown (N. H.), =1=, 205, 260, 271, 274.
 
 Gold craze, California and Australia, =4=, 463-467.
 
 Goldenrod, =3=, 97.
 
 Good deeds, =6=, 171.
 
 Good Genius, advice of T.'s, =2=, 230.
 
 Good and Wise, verse, =6=, 147.
 
 Goodwin, Prof. William Watson (H. U. 1851), =6=, 103.
 
 Gookin, Daniel, quoted, =1=, 82, 114, 175, 176, 267; =2=, 32.
 
 Goose, stray, cackling like spirit of the fog, =2=, 46; honking of,
 300, 345. _See_ Geese.
 
 Goose Pond, =2=, 219; muskrats in, 299.
 
 Gorilla, =6=, 382.
 
 Goshawk, American, =6=, 188, 189.
 
 Gosnold, Captain Bartholomew, =4=, 4; discovery of Cape Cod by,
 242-247.
 
 Gosse, P. A., Canadian Naturalist, =5=, 91.
 
 Gossip, stroll to village to hear, =2=, 185.
 
 Government, the best, =4=, 356; the American, 356-360; resistance to,
 360-362, 365-381; T. and the, 381-387; good and bad, 405; a
 representative, 429; the small business of, 478-480; too much, =5=,
 82, 83; =6=, 154, 359, 378, 379.
 
 Governor, a Massachusetts, =4=, 389, 390.
 
 Gower, John, quoted, =1=, 57, 121.
 
 Grampus Rock, in Cohasset, =4=, 7, 11.
 
 Grand Falls of the Penobscot, =3=, 31; portage to avoid the, 32.
 
 Grand Lake, =3=, 268; Indian name for, 295; 297, 307.
 
 Grand Portage, the, =3=, 80.
 
 Grange Bluff, =6=, 385.
 
 Grape Island, =1=, 43.
 
 Grass-ground River, =1=, 3, 32.
 
 Graves, Indian, =1=, 251.
 
 Graveyard, a Cape Cod, =4=, 148.
 
 Graveyards, monuments and, =1=, 177.
 
 Great Brook, =5=, 137.
 
 Great Fields, the, =5=, 257.
 
 "Great God! I ask thee for no meaner pelf," verse, =5=, 418.
 
 Great Meadows, =1=, 3, 16.
 
 Great Quitticus, =6=, 264.
 
 Great River, the, or St. Lawrence, =5=, 89, 90, 91, 92.
 
 Greece, verse, =5=, 404.
 
 Greece, The Freedom of, translation, =5=, 390.
 
 "Greece, who am I that should remember thee," verse, =1=, 54.
 
 Greeley, Horace, =6=, 68, 96, 101, 104, 158, 169-172, 291, 297, 407.
 
 Green Mountains, the, =5=, 6, 100, 145, 147.
 
 Greenbush (Me.), =3=, 324.
 
 Greene, Calvin H., =6=, 392, 403, 409; letters to, 408-412.
 
 Greenland, driftwood in, =4=, 60.
 
 Greenleaf's Map of Maine, =3=, 16.
 
 Greenville (Me.), =3=, 99, 101, 188, 194, 209.
 
 Grey, Mrs., =6=, 82.
 
 Grey, the traveler, quoted, =5=, 94.
 
 Grief, cause of, =6=, 41, 47, 48, 75, 89, 118, 168; remedy for, 41,
 43, 48.
 
 Griffith's Falls, =1=, 257.
 
 Grimk sisters, =6=, 283, 288.
 
 Grippling for apples, =5=, 309.
 
 Groton (Mass.), =1=, 169; =5=, 139, 152.
 
 Ground-nuts, the, =2=, 263-265.
 
 Gulls, methods of catching, =4=, 71, 72; =5=, 110.
 
 Gunnar (Norse hero), =6=, 382.
 
 Guns, sound of distant big, =2=, 176.
 
 Guyot, Arnold, =5=, 93; quoted, 93, 94, 220, 221.
 
 
 Habington, William, quoted, =1=, 56, 102.
 
 HABITS, ill, remedy for, =6=, 148, 149, 208, 226, 227.
 
 Hafiz, quoted, =1=, 415.
 
 Hale, Rev. Edward Everett (H. U. 1839), =6=, 307.
 
 Hale, Nathan (H. U. 1838), =6=, 83, note.
 
 Half lives, how the other, =1=, 227.
 
 Hall, Leyden, at Plymouth, =6=, 190; Masonic, at Concord, 6; Music,
 Boston, 359.
 
 Hamlet, Fechter's, =6=, 382.
 
 Hampstead (N. H.), =1=, 185, 202.
 
 Hard times, =6=, 317, 318.
 
 Hare, the, =2=, 309, 310.
 
 Harebell, the, =1=, 92.
 
 Harivansa, the, quoted, =2=, 95.
 
 Harper & Brothers, =6=, 105.
 
 Harrison and Tyler, =6=, 371.
 
 Harvard (Mass.), =5=, 151, 152; =6=, 45, 280.
 
 Harvard College, =6=, 4, 10, 65, 104, 138, 237, 252.
 
 Hastings, Warren, quoted, =1=, 142, 143.
 
 Hasty, Captain, =6=, 184.
 
 Hasty-pudding, friends flee approach of, =2=, 271.
 
 Hate, =6=, 202; and love, 93, 199, 200.
 
 Haverhill (Mass.), =1=, 87, 89, 185, 202; historian of, quoted, 322;
 342.
 
 "Have you not seen," verse, =5=, 413.
 
 Hawk, fish, =5=, 110.
 
 Hawk, watching a, =2=, 348, 349. _See_ Nighthawk.
 
 Hawthorne, Nathaniel, =6=, vii, 42, note, 51, 93, 107, 120, 364.
 
 Hawthorne, Sophia, =6=, 45.
 
 Haydon (English painter), =6=, 224, 301.
 
 Haystack, the, =1=, 86.
 
 Haze, =1=, 229. _See_ Fog.
 
 Head, Sir Francis, quoted, =5=, 47, 221, 222.
 
 Head of the River, New Bedford, =6=, 332, 333, 340.
 
 Headley, Henry, =6=, 65.
 
 Hearts, =6=, 200, 201, 294.
 
 Heathenish, =6=, 191, 210.
 
 Heaven, =1=, 405-409; =6=, 87, 163, 179, 196, 220, 284; admission to,
 164, 220, 223.
 
 Hebe, a worshiper of, =2=, 154.
 
 Hecker, Isaac, =6=, 122, 123; letters to, 405, 407.
 
 Hedgehog, shooting a, =3=, 130.
 
 Heetopades of Veeshnoo Sarma, =1=, 153.
 
 Height of Glory, The, translation, =5=, 384.
 
 Hell, living in Massachusetts, or, =4=, 405, 406.
 
 Henry, Alexander, Adventures of, =1=, 228, 230, 231; Wawatam's
 friendship with, 291.
 
 Hens, =6=, 38, 63, 273.
 
 HERALD OF FREEDOM, =4=, 306-310.
 
 Heraud, John A., =6=, 61.
 
 Herbert, George, =6=, 113, 377.
 
 Hercules, labors of, trifling compared with those of T.'s neighbors,
 =2=, 5; =6=, 226, 344.
 
 Hercules names the Hill of Kronos, translation, =5=, 377.
 
 Hercules' Prayer concerning Ajax, son of Telamon, translation, =5=,
 390.
 
 Herds, the keepers of men, =2=, 62.
 
 Hermit. _See_ Dialogue.
 
 Hermitage, Walden, =6=, 154.
 
 Hermit-life, =6=, 135, 158.
 
 Herndon, William Lewis, quoted, =4=, 479, 480.
 
 Heron, =1=, 416.
 
 Heron Lake, =3=, 254, 255; =6=, 325.
 
 Herrick, Robert, =5=, 298.
 
 Herring River, =4=, 80.
 
 Hesiod, quoted, =1=, 64.
 
 Hester Street, meeting at, =6=, 97.
 
 Hibiscus, =1=, 19.
 
 Hickory, the, =5=, 264, 265.
 
 Hide, stretching a, =3=, 147, 148; sale of a moose, 152.
 
 Higginson, Thomas Wentworth (H. U. 1841), =6=, 189, 190, 260, 323-327.
 
 HIGHER LAWS, =2=, 232-246.
 
 HIGHLAND LIGHT, THE, =4=, 150-175.
 
 Highland Light, =4=, 132, 150; description and stories of, 167-175;
 =6=, 255.
 
 Highlanders in Quebec, =5=, 25-27, 28, 29, 79.
 
 "Highlands" between the Penobscot and St. John, =3=, 238.
 
 Hilton's clearing, =3=, 105.
 
 Hindoos, =6=, 89, 271, 299, 300.
 
 Hippocrates, on cutting the nails, =2=, 10, 11.
 
 "His steady sails he never furls," verse, =5=, 109.
 
 History, the reading and the antiquity of, =1=, 161-163; reading, =3=,
 87.
 
 Hoar family, =6=, 15, note, 321.
 
 Hoar-frost, =5=, 126, 127.
 
 Hoar, Ebenezer Rockwood (H. U. 1835), =6=, 15, 75, 78, 395.
 
 Hoar, Edward Sherman (H. U. 1844), =6=, 75, 313, 330, 332-336.
 
 Hoar, Elizabeth, =6=, 51, 75, 93, 116.
 
 Hoar, George Frisbie (H. U. 1846), =6=, 15, note, 100.
 
 Hoar, Samuel (H. U. 1802), =6=, 15, note, 351.
 
 Hobble-bush, wayfarer's tree or, =3=, 96.
 
 Hoboken (N.J.), =6=, 109.
 
 Hochelaga, =5=, 89, 97, 99.
 
 Hodge, assistant geologist, quoted, =3=, 29, 80.
 
 Hodnet, England, =6=, 236, 237, note, 249, 272, note.
 
 Hog Island, inside of Hull, =4=, 15.
 
 Hog, the, =6=, 222, 328.
 
 Holland, the King of, in his element, =3=, 239.
 
 Hollowell place, the, =2=, 91, 92.
 
 Home, =6=, ix, 50, 63; affection of T. for, 99, 262.
 
 Homer, =1=, 97, 394; Iliad, =2=, 111; never yet printed in English,
 115; quoted, 160; =5=, 181; =6=, 92, 197, 239, 291.
 
 Hontan, French explorer, =6=, 389.
 
 Hood's "Song of the Shirt," =6=, 224.
 
 Hooksett (N. H.), =1=, 225, 251, 260, 273, 274, 308, 309, 335;
 Pinnacle, 318; Falls, 322.
 
 Hoosac Mountain, T.'s ascent of, =1=, 189-200.
 
 Hoosac Mountains, =5=, 147.
 
 Hop, culture of the, =5=, 136, 137.
 
 Hope, =6=, 20.
 
 Hopeful, Sachem (John Thoreau), =6=, 13, 35.
 
 Hopkinton (Mass.), =1=, 4, 32.
 
 Horace, quoted, =6=, 27, 30.
 
 Horns, uses for deer's, =3=, 97, 98.
 
 Hornstone, =3=, 194.
 
 Horses, to hang clothes on, wooden, =2=, 23, 24; men's work for, =4=,
 286; Canadian, =5=, 34; =6=, 136, 142, 153, 294, 321, 334, 340.
 
 "Horses have the mark," verse, =1=, 243.
 
 Horse-race, =6=, 286, 293.
 
 Horseshoe Interval, the, =1=, 126, 377.
 
 _Hortus siccus_, nature in winter a, =5=, 179.
 
 Hosmer, Edmund (the "farmer-man"), =6=, 93, 137, 154, 257, 261, 265,
 270.
 
 Hosmer, Solon, =6=, 257.
 
 _Hospitalality_, not hospitality but, =2=, 168.
 
 Hotham, Edmund Stuart, =6=, 59, note.
 
 Hottentots and Ruskin, =6=, 319.
 
 Houlton (Me.), road, the, =3=, 3, 8, 9, 12, 13.
 
 Hounds hunting woods in winter, =2=, 305-309.
 
 House, every spot possible site for a, =2=, 90; the ideal, 266-271;
 the perfect, =5=, 153.
 
 Household, of Emerson, =6=, 35, 53, 54, 64, 135, 136, 142, 147, 152;
 of the Dunbars and Thoreaus, 4-7, 24, 27-32, 99, 104-106, 351.
 
 House-raising at Walden Pond, =2=, 49, 50.
 
 Houses, superfluities in our, =2=, 39; Canadian, =5=, 44, 59; American
 compared with Canadian, 100; lived in by Thoreau, =6=, 4-7, 24, 58,
 141, 143, 144, 148-150; 369.
 
 HOUSE-WARMING, =2=, 263-281.
 
 Housework, a pleasant pastime, =2=, 125.
 
 Howitt, William, =4=, 465; quoted on Australian gold-diggings, 467;
 =6=, 84, 235.
 
 Huckleberries never reach Boston, =2=, 192.
 
 Hudson (N. H.), =1=, 151, 152, 153, 169.
 
 Hudson, Rev. Henry N., described, =6=, 145.
 
 Hudson River, =6=, 70, 109, 392.
 
 Huguenots of Staten Island, =1=, 190.
 
 Hull (Mass.), =4=, 15.
 
 Humane Society, huts of the, =4=, 63, 74-78.
 
 Human nature, =6=, 8, 9, 37, 47, 96, 110, 160, 163, 166, 180, 196,
 203, 208, 209.
 
 Humboldt, Alexander von, quoted, =4=, 121; =5=, 92, 93.
 
 Humor, the quality of, =4=, 335-337; T.'s sense of, =6=, xi, xii.
 
 Hunt family, =6=, 106, 256, note.
 
 Hunt House, the old, =5=, 201.
 
 Hunter, a "gentlemanly," =3=, 178, 179; Indian, with hides, 231;
 enviable life of a, 269, 270.
 
 Hunters, boys to be made first sportsmen, then, =2=, 234.
 
 Hunting, the degradation of, =3=, 132-134.
 
 Hut for shipwrecked sailors, =4=, 63, 74-78; in the woods, =6=, 58,
 59, note, 125, 168.
 
 Hyde, Tom, the tinker, quoted, =2=, 360, 361.
 
 Hygeia, no worshiper of, =2=, 154.
 
 Hypseus' Daughter Cyrene, translation, =5=, 383.
 
 
 I, the first person, retained in this book, =2=, 3, 4.
 
 "I am a parcel of vain strivings tied," verse, =1=, 410.
 
 "I am bound, I am bound for a distant shore," verse, =1=, 2.
 
 "I am the autumnal sun," verse, =1=, 404.
 
 "I hearing get, who had but ears," verse, =1=, 392.
 
 "I make ye an offer," verse, =1=, 69.
 
 "I sailed up a river with a pleasant wind," verse, =1=, 2.
 
 "I see the civil sun drying earth's tears," verse, =5=, 120.
 
 "I've searched my faculties around," verse, =5=, 418.
 
 "I wish to sing the Atrid," verse, =1=, 240.
 
 Ice, looking through the, on Walden Pond, =2=, 272; whooping of the,
 301; cutting through, to get water, 312, 313; cutting on Walden Pond,
 323-329; beauty of Walden, 327; booming of the, 333; =5=, 176; =6=,
 206, 212, 250, 251, 273.
 
 Iceberg, =6=, 335.
 
 Ice formations in a river-bank, =5=, 128, 129.
 
 Idle hours, =6=, 18, 47, 209, 254, 267.
 
 "If I am poor," verse, =5=, 412.
 
 "If thou wilt but stand by my ear," verse, =5=, 418.
 
 "If with light head erect I sing," verse, =5=, 396.
 
 Ignorance, Society for the Diffusion of Useful, =5=, 239.
 
 Imagination, not exercised, =6=, 26; discussed by Ruskin, 319.
 
 Imitations of charette-drivers, Yankee, =5=, 99.
 
 Immigrants, =6=, 96, 110.
 
 Immortality, =6=, 194, 225.
 
 "In the East fames are won," verse, =4=, 346.
 
 "In this roadstead I have ridden," verse, =5=, 414.
 
 "In two years' time 't had thus," verse, =5=, 303.
 
 "In vain I see the morning rise," verse, =1=, 366.
 
 "Indeed, indeed, I cannot tell," verse, =6=, 202.
 
 Independence, verse, =5=, 415.
 
 India, books on, Cholmondeley's gift of, =6=, 270, note, 271.
 
 Indian, crowding out of the, by whites, =1=, 53; civilizing the, 55;
 conversion of the, 82-85; capture of two Dunstable men, 174; attacks,
 letters to governor about expected, 232, 233; captivity, escape of
 Hannah Dustan and others from, 341-345; houses in Massachusetts
 Colony, =2=, 32, 33; extinction, =3=, 7; guides secured, 11; belief
 that river ran two ways, 35; words for some birds and animals, 108;
 camp, an, 146-159; language, 151; words for Maine waters, 155-157;
 houses at Oldtown, 161; relics, 166; speech, 187; singing, 198;
 methods of guiding, 204-206; manner of carrying canoes, 207, 208;
 inscription, an, 220; wardrobe, 249, 250; failure to understand
 avoidance of settlers, 258; medicines, 259; travel, 260, 261; as
 umpire, 267; skill in retracing steps, 277; relics and geographical
 names, 297; good manners, 300; devil (or cougar), the, 306; reticence
 and talkativeness, 318, 319; sickness, 319, 320; indifference, 326,
 habitation, signs of previous, =4=, 84, 85; =6=, 311, 315, 316, 336.
 
 Indian Island, =3=, 92, 174, 326, 327.
 
 Indian summer, =6=, 38, 340.
 
 Indoors, living, =5=, 207-209.
 
 Infidelity, the real, =1=, 77.
 
 Ingraham, Cato, slave of Duncan, =2=, 283.
 
 Inherited property a misfortune, =2=, 5.
 
 Injustice, =6=, 228.
 
 Inn, inscription on wall of Swedish, =5=, 141.
 
 Insect foes, =3=, 246.
 
 Inspector of storms, self-appointed, =2=, 19, 20.
 
 Inspiration, quatrain, =5=, 418.
 
 Inspiration, verse, =5=, 396.
 
 Institutions, the burden of, =1=, 135, 136.
 
 Invertebrate Animals, report on quoted, =5=, 129.
 
 Inward Morning, The, verse, =1=, 313.
 
 Iolaus, and hydra's head, =2=, 5.
 
 Ireland, Alexander, =6=, 155, 157.
 
 Irish, physical condition of the poor, =2=, 38, 39.
 
 Irishmen, =6=, 116, 149.
 
 Islands, =1=, 257, 258; Clark's, =6=, 301, 328; Staten, xi, 65, 68,
 117.
 
 "It doth expand my privacies," verse, =1=, 182.
 
 "It is no dream of mine," verse, =2=, 215.
 
 Italian discoverers, =4=, 234, 235.
 
 
 Jackson, Dr. Charles T., =3=, 4, 10; quoted, regarding altitude of
 Ktaadn, 72; on Moosehead Lake, 104; sketches in Reports of, 120;
 quoted, regarding hornstone on Mount Kineo, 194, 195; =6=, 35, note,
 144.
 
 Jackson, Miss Lidian (Mrs. R. W. Emerson.) _See_ Emerson.
 
 Jackson, Miss Lucy (Mrs. Brown), =6=, 35, note, 42, note, 49, 50, 113,
 136, 329, note; letters to, 35-49.
 
 Jaffrey (N. H.), =6=, 330.
 
 Jail in Concord, =6=, 52.
 
 Jamblichus, quoted, =1=, 184.
 
 James, Henry, Sr., meets T., =6=, 68, 80; mentioned, 85, 101; his
 sons, 103, 122, 346, 347.
 
 Jarvis, Dr. Edward (H. U. 1826), =6=, 21.
 
 Jaundice, =6=, 118, 152.
 
 Jays, arrival of the, =2=, 303, 304; =5=, 108, 199.
 
 Jeremiah's Gutter, =4=, 36.
 
 Jerusalem Village (Mass.), =4=, 16.
 
 Jesuit Relations, quoted, =5=, 96.
 
 Jesuits, and Indian torture, =2=, 83; early in New England, =4=, 232;
 Barracks, the, in Quebec, =5=, 24.
 
 Jesus Christ, the effect of the story of, =1=, 67; prince of Reformers
 and Radicals, 142; liberalizing influence of, =2=, 120.
 
 Joe Merry Lakes, the, =3=, 45.
 
 Joe Merry Mountain, =3=, 38, 51, 218.
 
 Joel, the prophet, quoted, =5=, 322.
 
 Johnson, Edward, quoted, =1=, 8; =2=, 42, 43.
 
 Jones, Dr. S. A., =6=, 403.
 
 Jones family, =6=, 12, note, 91, 104.
 
 Jones, Sir William, =1=, 154.
 
 Jonson, Ben, quoted, =5=, 226.
 
 Josselyn, John, =1=, 27, 29; quoted, =3=, 156, 164; =4=, 98; quoted,
 =5=, 2.
 
 Judge and criminal, =6=, 227, 228.
 
 Justice, the administration of, =4=, 395, 396.
 
 
 Kalm, Travels in North America, quoted, =4=, 126, 201; =5=, 21, 30,
 39, 65; on sea-plants near Quebec, 93.
 
 Kalmiana. _See_ Nuphar.
 
 Kane, Dr. E. K., =6=, 362.
 
 Katepskonegan Falls, =3=, 52; Carry, 81.
 
 Katepskonegan Lake, =3=, 50, 57.
 
 Katepskonegan Stream, =3=, 50.
 
 Kearsage, =1=, 86.
 
 Keene (N. H.) Street, =5=, 4; heads like, 4.
 
 Kelp, =4=, 67-70.
 
 Kenduskeag, meaning of, =3=, 156.
 
 Kennebec River, the, =3=, 5, 40, 103, 183, 188, 233, 272.
 
 Kent, the Duke of, property of, =5=, 38.
 
 Khoung-tseu, =2=, 105.
 
 Kieou-he-yu, =2=,105.
 
 Killington Peak, =5=, 6.
 
 Kineo, Mount, =3=, 101-103, 156, 183, 186, 189; Indian tradition of
 origin of, 190; hornstone on, 194; 196, 203, 260, 299; =6=, 325.
 
 Kirby, William, and Spence, quoted, =2=, 237, 256.
 
 Kirkland, Mrs. Caroline, =6=, 288.
 
 Kittlybenders, let us not play at, =2=, 363.
 
 Knife, an Indian, =3=, 156.
 
 Knots of the Alcott arbor, =6=, 136, 137.
 
 Knowledge, the slow growth of, =5=, 181; Society for the Diffusion of
 Useful, 239; true, 240.
 
 Kossuth, the excitement about, =4=, 470, 471.
 
 Kreeshna, teachings of, =1=, 144-146.
 
 KTAADN, =3=, 3-90.
 
 Ktaadn, Mount, =3=, 1; ascents of, 3-5; view of, 23; first view of,
 36; 38; the flat summit of, 49; 58, 61; T.'s ascent of, 63-76;
 altitude of, 72; 96, 121, 136, 167, 215, 218, 249, 257, 260, 297, 312,
 313; =6=, 132, 255.
 
 
 LABOR, uses of, =6=, 63, 116, 170, 171, 221, 222; results of, 165,
 166, 170, 171, 182, note.
 
 Laborer, choosing occupation of a day, =2=, 77; falling in pond with
 many clothes on, 83.
 
 Laboring man has no time to be anything but a machine, the, =2=, 6, 7.
 
 Labrador and East Main, health in the words, =5=, 104.
 
 Labrador tea, =6=, 327.
 
 Ladies'-tresses, =1=, 18.
 
 "Lady's Companion," a magazine, =6=, 107, 108.
 
 Laing, Samuel, quoted, =2=, 29, 30.
 
 Lake, the earth's eye, a, =2=, 206; country of New England, the, =3=,
 40; a woodland, in winter, =5=, 174, 175.
 
 Lake Champlain, Long Wharf to, =2=, 132; =5=, 6-8.
 
 Lake St. Peter, =5=, 96, 97.
 
 Lalemant, Hierosme, quoted, =5=, 22.
 
 Lamentations, =6=, 41, 42, 179, 180, 213, 214, 226, 229.
 
 Lamprey eel, =1=, 31; =6=, 127.
 
 _Lampyris noctiluca_, =6=, 310, 327, 328.
 
 Lancaster (Mass.), =1=, 169; =5=, 138, 139, 149.
 
 Land and water, =6=, xi, 14, 69, 83, 267, 268, 301.
 
 LANDLORD, THE, =5=, 153-162.
 
 Landlord, qualities of the, =5=, 153-162.
 
 Lane, Charles (English reformer), =6=, 52, 58, 64, 90, 104, 125;
 writes for the "Dial," 59-63.
 
 La Prairie (Que.), =5=, 11, 18, 99.
 
 Lar, =6=, 67.
 
 Larch, extensive wood of, =3=, 231.
 
 Lark, the, =5=, 109, 110.
 
 LAST DAYS OF JOHN BROWN, THE, =4=, 441-450.
 
 "Lately, alas, I knew a gentle boy," verse, =1=, 276.
 
 Latin, grammars, =6=, 25; epistle, 27-29; pronunciation, 25; writers
 mentioned or quoted, viii, xi, 27, 28.
 
 Lawrence (Mass.), =1=, 89.
 
 Laws, beautiful, =6=, 177; eternal, 173.
 
 "Leach-hole" in Walden Pond, =2=, 322.
 
 Lead, rain of, =5=, 26.
 
 Leaf, resemblance of sand-formation to a, =2=, 338.
 
 Leaves, fallen, =5=, 264-270; scarlet oak, 278-281.
 
 Lectures, by T., =6=, 6, 145, 150, 154, 189-192, 232, 233, 244, 251,
 276, 289, 303, 349.
 
 Ledum (Labrador tea), =6=, 327.
 
 Lee's Hill, =6=, 15, note; alias Nashawtuc or Naushawtuck, =6=, 15,
 27, 30.
 
 Lee-vites, a nickname, =6=, 15, note.
 
 Legs, the, as compasses, =4=, 88.
 
 Lescarbot, quoted, regarding abundance of fishes, =3=, 60; =4=, 240,
 249.
 
 "Let such pure hate still underprop," verse, =1=, 305.
 
 _Leuciscus (argenteus, pulchellus)_, =6=, 127, 131.
 
 Letters: From Louis Agassiz, =6=, 129. From A. B. Alcott, =6=, 397; to
 him, 282. From H. G. O. Blake, =6=, 158, 159; to him, 160, 164, 173,
 174, 177, 179, 185, 194, 197, 209, 217, 221, 225, 229, 258, 292, 302,
 307, 308, 314, 330, 343, 349, 358, 360, 364, 368, 383. From Myron B.
 Benton, =6=, 398; to him, 399. To Mrs. Lucy Cotton Brown, =6=, 35, 37,
 40, 43, 46. From J. E. Cabot, =6=, 130, 131; to him, 126, 128, 155.
 From Ellery Channing, =6=, 121, 271. From Thomas Cholmondeley, =6=,
 380; to him, 245. From R. W. Emerson, =6=, 49, 58, 83, note, 94, note,
 102, 104, 120, 125, 142, 155; to him, 50, 54, 59, 62, 78, 80, 92, 101,
 107, 113, 135, 142, 144, 148, 151, 157, 183. From Mrs. R. W. Emerson,
 =6=, 64; to her, 76, 87, 112. To Calvin H. Greene, =6=, 408-412. To
 Isaac Hecker, =6=, 405, 407. To T. W. Higginson, =6=, 189, 323. From
 Miss Elizabeth Hoar, =6=, 116. To Parker Pillsbury, =6=, 378. From
 James Richardson, =6=, 10, note. From Daniel Ricketson, =6=, 238, 246,
 257; to him, 239, 240, 246, 261, 263, 266, 270, 273, 284, 285, 304,
 311, 313, 337, 341, 350, 353, 376. To F. B. Sanborn, =6=, 249, 385. To
 Cynthia Thoreau, =6=, 68, 84, 89, 98, 104, 108. To Helen Thoreau, =6=,
 12, 25, 27, 32, 74, 95, 117. To John Thoreau, Jr., =6=, 13, 19, 23. To
 Sophia Thoreau, =6=, 31, 71, 132, 193, 286, 363. From B. M. Watson,
 =6=, 190, 327; to him, 6, 191, 309, 327. To B. B. Wiley, =6=, 298,
 300.
 
 Lexington (Mass.), =2=, 306.
 
 Libraries, at Cambridge, =6=, 252; at Concord, 270; at New York, 81,
 106, 109, 114, 122.
 
 Liebig, J. F. von, quoted, 2, 14.
 
 Life, the world and, =1=, 310-316; cares and labors of, =2=, 6, 7; an
 experiment, 10; students not to play or study, but to live, 56, 57;
 purposes of, 100, 101; one has imagined living the, 356; live your,
 however mean, 361; in us, like the water in the river, 366; emptiness
 of ordinary, =6=, 161, 162, 179, 209, 210, 213, 214, 230; eternal,
 161, 164, 173, 174, 194, 225; facts of, 44, 162, 212; labyrinth of,
 173; mean aspects of, 79, 82, 229; phenomena of, xi, xii, 40, 47, 199,
 203, 204, 216, 221, 222, 268, 328; qualifications for practical, 7,
 11, 34, 59, 135, 171; spiritual and material, 9, 88, 160, 214, 227.
 
 LIFE WITHOUT PRINCIPLE, =4=, 455-482.
 
 Light. _See_ Moonlight and Sunset.
 
 "Light-winged Smoke, Icarian bird," verse, =2=, 279.
 
 Lilac, growing by deserted houses, =2=, 290.
 
 Lily, the yellow, =3=, 209, 291; roots, gathering, 309; roots, soup
 of, 317.
 
 Lily Bay, =3=, 97, 99.
 
 Limits of living, =2=, 7.
 
 Lincoln, Abraham, =6=, 283, 378, 380.
 
 Lincoln (Me.), =3=, 9, 85, 260, 319, 321, 322.
 
 Lincoln (Mass.), =1=, 5; =2=, 95, 136, 173, 282; owls in woods of,
 138, 139; Flint's Pond in, 216; chestnut woods of, 263;
 burying-ground, 284, 299; =5=, 282, 283.
 
 Lining of beauty for houses, =2=, 44.
 
 Linnus (Linn, Karl von), quoted, =5=, 222; =6=, 207, 208.
 
 Litchfield (N. H.), =1=, 204, 206, 227.
 
 Little Reading, =2=, 116.
 
 Little Schoodic River, the, =3=, 23.
 
 Living, getting a, =4=, 457-462. _See_ Life.
 
 Lobster Pond, =3=, 106, 210.
 
 Lobster Stream, =3=, 105, 210.
 
 Lockwood. _See_ F. J. Merriam.
 
 Locusts, =3=, 254; =6=, 90.
 
 Log house, a, =3=, 138.
 
 Loggers, camps of, =3=, 20; a gang of, 38.
 
 Logs, from woods to market, sending, =3=, 46-49.
 
 London, =6=, 137, 155, 343, 362.
 
 Londonderry (N. H.), =1=, 92, 268.
 
 Loneliness, desirable, =2=, 147, 151, 152.
 
 Long Pond, =6=, 264.
 
 Long River (La Rivire Longue), =6=, 389.
 
 Long Wharf, taking a place at, =4=, 267.
 
 Longfellow, H. W., =6=, 101, 251, 345, note.
 
 Longueuil (Que.), =5=, 20.
 
 Loon, hunting, and a game with the, =2=, 258-262; Indian word for, =3=,
 182; cry of the, 247, 248.
 
 Loring, E. G., =4=, 389, 393, 394.
 
 Lost, in the lakes, experienced woodmen. =3=, 41; in the woods, T.'s
 companion, 285-290.
 
 Lost dove, horse, and hound, =6=, 301.
 
 Loudon, John Claudius, quoted, =5=, 197, 200, 291, 292, 310.
 
 Louisa, Aunt (Dunbar), =6=, 99.
 
 Love, the power of, =4=, 304, 305; charms of, 198-200, 204, 205, 206,
 208; corrupted, 199, 206, 208; potency of, 201, 203, 204; and
 marriage, 198-209, 302. _See_ Friendship.
 
 "Love once among roses," verse, =1=, 244.
 
 "Love walking swiftly," verse, =1=, 242.
 
 "Lovely dove," verse, =1=, 241.
 
 Lovewell, Captain, and his Indian fight, =1=, 123; John, father of,
 168, 176; =3=, 245.
 
 "Low-anchored cloud," verse, =1=, 201.
 
 "Low in the eastern sky," verse, =1=, 46; =5=, 400.
 
 Lowell, James Russell (H. U. 1838), =6=, 61, 251, 345, 395.
 
 Lowell (Mass.), =1=, 4, 31, 32, 39, 85, 87, 89, 115, 117, 225, 251,
 264.
 
 Lowell, Mrs., =6=, 24.
 
 Lucretius, =6=, xi.
 
 Luxury, fruit of a life of, =2=, 16.
 
 Lyceum, the, =1=, 102; =2=, 121, 122; =6=, 6, 49, 51, 52, 61, 115,
 145, 150, 154, 275; at Salem, 191; at Worcester, 303.
 
 Lydgate, John, quoted, =1=, 57.
 
 Lyman, Benjamin Smith (H. U. 1855), =6=, 252.
 
 Lynx, Canada, =6=, 355.
 
 Lyttelton, Lord, =6=, 383.
 
 
 Macaulay, Rev. Zachary, =6=, 272, note.
 
 McCauslin, or "Uncle George," weather-bound at farm of, =3=, 23-29;
 good services as guide by, 40-42.
 
 McCulloch's Geographical Dictionary, quoted, =5=, 49.
 
 McGaw's Island, =1=, 245.
 
 McKean, Henry Swasey (H. U. 1828), =6=, 109, 114, 122.
 
 Mackerel, fishing for, =4=, 179-184, 189, 190; =6=, 229; fleet, the,
 198, 261.
 
 McTaggart, John, quoted, =5=, 94.
 
 MacTavish, Simon, =5=, 98.
 
 Mad River, =1=, 87.
 
 Madawaska, the, =3=, 80; =6=, 323-326.
 
 Mahabarat, =6=, 300.
 
 Maiden in the East, =6=, 329, note.
 
 Maine, mountainous region of, =3=, 4; intelligence of backwoodsmen in,
 24; view of, 73; the forest of, 88; =6=, 6, 132, 145, 254, 311, 315,
 322, 324-326.
 
 Make-a-Stir, Squire, =2=, 8.
 
 Male and female, =6=, 198, 207.
 
 Mallet for flints, =6=, 19.
 
 Man, =6=, 12, 31, 37; his activity, 167, 173, 213, 214; his bread,
 164, 165; his duty, 167, 186; his education, 178, 221, 222; his
 freedom, 175, 188, 196; his generation, 208; his immortality, 259,
 294; his meanness, 179, 226.
 
 Man, translation, =5=, 383.
 
 Man, The Divine in, translation, =5=, 386.
 
 Manchester (N. H.), =1=, 89, 225, 250, 251; Mfg. Co., 259, 260; 264,
 268, 274.
 
 Manilla hemp, =2=, 132.
 
 Mankind, =6=, 8, 9, 31, 80, 136, 209, 210.
 
 Mann, Horace, Jr., =6=, 385, 392.
 
 "Man's little acts are grand," verse, =1=, 224.
 
 Manse, the Old, =6=, 42, 51.
 
 Map, of the Public Lands of Maine and Massachusetts, =3=, 17, 101,
 104, 308; drawing, on kitchen table, =5=, 60; of Canada, inspecting a,
 95.
 
 Maple, the red and sugar, =5=, 6; the red, 258-263, 265; the sugar,
 261, 271-278.
 
 Maple sugar, =6=, 278.
 
 Maples, autumn colors of, =2=, 265; =5=, 6, 258-263, 265, 271-278.
 
 Maps of Cape Cod, and New England, =4=, 227-231, 234; of walking
 tours, =6=, 329, 335.
 
 Maraon, the river, =5=, 93.
 
 Maria, Aunt (Thoreau's), =6=, 118.
 
 Mark-Lane Gazette, =6=, 124.
 
 Marlborough (Mass.), =5=, 214.
 
 Marlborough Chapel, =6=, 129.
 
 Marriage, a sign of, =3=, 232; =6=, 139, 199, 200, 204, 205, 207-209,
 302.
 
 Mars' Hill, =3=, 8.
 
 Marston, John, of Taunton, =6=, 21.
 
 Marston-Watson, Benjamin (H. U. 1839), =6=, 43. _See_ Watson.
 
 Marvell, Andrew, quoted, =4=, 451.
 
 Massabesic, Lake, =1=, 89; Pond, 250.
 
 Massachusetts, T.'s wish not to be associated with, =1=, 135; the
 attitude of, towards slavery, =4=, 362, 363; duty of the Abolitionists
 in, 369; slavery in, 388; the governor of, 389-392; judges, 401, 402;
 unworthy to be followed, 403-406; the share of, in Harper's Ferry,
 430, 431; election in, =6=, 16, 18, 141.
 
 Massachusetts Bay, shallowness of, =4=, 124.
 
 Massachusetts Historical Society, Collections of the, =4=, 20.
 
 Massachusetts Quarterly Review, =6=, 144.
 
 Massasoit, visited by Winslow, =2=, 158.
 
 Matahumkeag, =3=, 107; meaning of the word, 157; 210.
 
 Matanancook River, the, =3=, 321.
 
 Mathematics, =1=, 386.
 
 Mattaseunk, =3=, 18.
 
 Mattawamkeag, the, =3=, 12, 13, 16; meaning of the name, 157; 256.
 
 Mattawamkeag Point, =3=, 4, 11, 38, 88, 316, 319.
 
 Matungamook Lake, =3=, 295.
 
 Maturing, no need of haste towards, =2=, 359.
 
 Maxims. _See_ Aphorisms.
 
 May, Rev. Joseph, (H. U. 1857), =6=, 451.
 
 May, Rev. Samuel Joseph, (H. U. 1818), =6=, 390.
 
 Meadow River, Musketaquid or, =1=, 8.
 
 Meadows, of Concord, =6=, 36, 92, 250, 334; birds in the, 14;
 cranberries in, 204.
 
 Meanness complained of, =6=, 88, 173, 175, 176, 187.
 
 Meat and drink, =6=, 164, 165.
 
 Medicine, =6=, 15-17.
 
 Medicine, Yellow-river, =6=, 391.
 
 Meeting-houses, =6=, 195, 336, 359; meeting-house cellar, 322.
 
 Melancholy, =6=, 41, 182, 209.
 
 Melon, buying a, =1=, 335; =6=, ix.
 
 Memorial Verses, by Channing, =6=, 65, note.
 
 Memory, =6=, 26, 41, 42, 93, 106; of former life, 179, 210, 211.
 
 Men, in crowds, =6=, 79, 82, 83; of God, 214.
 
 "Men are by birth equal in this, that given," verse, =1=, 311.
 
 "Men dig and dive but cannot my wealth spend," verse, =1=, 373.
 
 Mencius, quoted, =1=, 280; =2=, 242, 243.
 
 Mending, =6=, 108, 363.
 
 Menhaden, schools of, =4=, 120.
 
 Mentors, of little use, =2=, 10.
 
 Menu, the laws of, =1=, 154-161.
 
 Merit and demerit, =6=, 87, 88, 97, 98, 145, 161, 162.
 
 Merlin, =6=, 227.
 
 Merriam, Francis Jackson, =6=, 366-368.
 
 Merrimack (N. H.), =1=, 225, 227, 251, 353, 357, 391.
 
 Merrimack River, =1=, 8, 19, 62, 63, 80, 81; origin and course of the,
 85-92; 113, 122, 150, 169, 170, 174, 177, 181, 189, 200, 202, 203,
 204; the Gazetteer quoted, 206, 207, 209, 210, 225, 226, 227, 232,
 251, 259, 260, 263, 269, 271, 309, 321, 345, 354; freshet on the, 379,
 383, 391; =5=, 147; =6=, 6.
 
 Message, the President's, =6=, 379.
 
 Methods of action, =6=, 8, 9, 33, 47, 56, 67, 88, 89, 108, 118.
 
 Mice, visited by, on Hoosac Mountain, =1=, 196; sent to Agassiz, =6=,
 128, 132.
 
 Michaux on lumbering, quoted, =3=, 48.
 
 Michaux, Andr, quoted, =5=, 269.
 
 Michaux, Franois Andr, quoted, =5=, 220, 261, 301.
 
 Microscope, =6=, 361.
 
 Middleborough, Bennet's Account of, =6=, 264, 265.
 
 Middlesex (Mass.), =1=, 62, 80, 226, 385.
 
 Middlesex Cattle Show, =2=, 36.
 
 Midnight, exploring the, =5=, 323.
 
 Mikania, the climbing, =1=, 43.
 
 Milford (Me.), =3=, 7.
 
 Milky Way? Is not our planet in the, =2=, 147.
 
 Miller, a crabbed, =5=, 69.
 
 Millinocket Lake, =3=, 29, 41, 73, 260.
 
 Millinocket River, =3=, 29, 31, 86-88, 223.
 
 Mill's "British India," =6=, 271, note.
 
 Milne, Alexander, quoted, =5=, 193, 194.
 
 Milton, John, quoted, =6=, 274.
 
 Milton, the town, =6=, 219.
 
 Minding his business, till ineligible as town officer, T., =2=, 20.
 
 Minerva, Momus objects to house of, =2=, 37.
 
 Ministers, on Monday morning, =1=, 123; with, on Ktaadn, =3=, 214;
 salaries of country, =4=, 45; some old Cape Cod, 48-55.
 
 Minnesota, Indians of, =6=, 389, 390; rivers of, 386-389; trip to,
 252, note, 380, 384-386.
 
 Minnows, =6=, 127, 128, 131, 132.
 
 Minot's Ledge, the light on, =4=, 262, 263.
 
 Minott, George, =6=, 52, 91, 92, 106, 374, 375.
 
 Minott, Mary, =6=, 374, 376.
 
 Mr Camar Uddin Mast, quoted, =2=, 111.
 
 Mirabeau, on highway robbery, quoted, =2=, 355.
 
 Mirages on sand and sea, =4=, 190-193.
 
 Mirror, New York Weekly, =6=, 107, 111.
 
 Misanthropy, not a trait of T., =6=, xii, 238.
 
 Miscellany, Boston, =6=, 83, note, 102, note.
 
 Mission, verse, =5=, 418.
 
 Mississippi, discovery of the, =5=, 90; extent of the, 93; a panorama
 of the, 224; =6=, 384, 386, 389.
 
 Missouri Compromise, =4=, 408.
 
 Mizzling of sixpences, =6=, 83.
 
 Model farm, a, =2=, 218.
 
 "Modern improvements," an illusion about, =2=, 57, 58.
 
 "Modern Painters," =6=, 319.
 
 Mohawk Rips, the, =3=, 322.
 
 Mohawk traditions, =3=, 154.
 
 Moisture in Cape Cod air, =4=, 165.
 
 Molasses, Molly, =3=, 174.
 
 Molunkus (Me.), =3=, 13, 15.
 
 Momus, objection to Minerva's house by, =2=, 37.
 
 Monadnock Mountain, =1=, 173; =5=, 4, 143, 145, 147; =6=, 329, 330,
 364, 365, 368-372.
 
 MONDAY, =1=, 121-187.
 
 Money, making, the evil of, =4=, 458-461; =6=, 161, 162, 318, 332;
 hard, 318.
 
 Monhegan Island, =3=, 94.
 
 Monson (Me.), =3=, 97, 98, 161.
 
 Montcalm, Wolfe and, monument to, =5=, 73, 74.
 
 Montmorenci County, =5=, 62; the habitans of, 64-68.
 
 Montmorenci, Falls of, =5=, 29, 37-39.
 
 Montreal (Que.), =5=, 9, 11; described, 14-16; the mixed population
 of, 17, 18; from Quebec to, 96, 97; and its surroundings, beautiful
 view of, 98; the name of, 98.
 
 Monuments, graveyards and, =1=, 177; descendants more dead than, 269;
 good sense worth more than, =2=, 64; at Concord, =6=, 24.
 
 Moon, The, verse, =5=, 406.
 
 MOONLIGHT, NIGHT AND, =5=, 323-333.
 
 Moonlight, reading by, =5=, 145.
 
 Moonshine, =5=, 324, 325.
 
 Moore, Thomas, =5=, 98.
 
 Moore's Falls, =1=, 245.
 
 Moose, sign of, =3=, 58, 65, 108; carcass of a, 109; night expedition
 in vain hunt for, 110-115; shooting at and wounding a, 122-124; found,
 measured, and skinned, 125-130; Indian ideas about, 153; Indian
 tradition of evolution of, from the whale, 163; shooting and skinning
 a, on Second Lake, 292-295; =6=, 311, 326, 336, 339.
 
 Moose River, =3=, 189.
 
 Moose wardens, laxness of, =3=, 231.
 
 Moose-flies, =3=, 246.
 
 Moosehead Lake, =3=, 45, 46, 73, 95, 97, 99, 100; steamers and
 sail-boats on, 104, 108, 117, 145, 150, 152, 155; Indian name for,
 159, 175, 176, 181, 183; extent of, 184, 188, 193, 231, 252, 255;
 dragon-fly on, 272, 299, 322; =6=, 321, 324.
 
 Moosehillock, =1=, 86.
 
 Moosehorn Deadwater, =3=, 109.
 
 Moosehorn Stream, the, =3=, 111, 113, 117, 118, 145, 216.
 
 Moose-wood, =3=, 65; phosphorescent light in, 199.
 
 Morning, impressions of, =1=, 42; work, a man's, =2=, 40; renewal of,
 98-100; work in the early, 172, 173; winter, early, =5=, 163-166.
 _See_ Sunrise.
 
 Morrison, John, head of a lumber-gang, =3=, 38.
 
 Mortgages, abundance of, in Concord, =2=, 35, 36.
 
 Morton, Edwin (H. U. 1855), =6=, 252, 301, note, 380.
 
 Morton, Thomas, =5=, 2.
 
 Mosquitoes, =3=, 246, 310, 311.
 
 Mott, Mrs. Lucretia, =6=, 97.
 
 Mount Ararat in Provincetown, =4=, 190.
 
 Mount Monadnock. _See_ Monadnock.
 
 Mount Royal (Montreal), =5=, 11.
 
 Mount Washington, =6=, 320, 321, 334.
 
 Mountain-ash, =3=, 94.
 
 Mountain-tops, =3=, 71.
 
 Mountains, the use of, =5=, 148, 149; and plain, influence of the,
 150, 151; =6=, 195, 196, 215, 316, 319, 323, 329, 330, 334-336, 347,
 360, 363, 368, 369.
 
 Mourt's Relation, quoted, =4=, 38, 94, 251.
 
 Mouse, in T.'s house, =2=, 249, 250; the wild, 309.
 
 Mud Pond, =3=, 233, 237, 238, 240, 243, 244; =6=, 325.
 
 Mud-puddle, the sun in a, =6=, 242.
 
 Munroe, James, publisher, =6=, 61, 125, 182, 332.
 
 Murch Brook, =3=, 58, 64, 74.
 
 Muse, The Venality of the, translation =5=, 389.
 
 Muses, =6=, 45, 178.
 
 Music, the suggestions of, =1=, 183-209; =6=, 41, 42, note, 45, 46,
 75, 193, 231, 263. _See_ Earth-song, Sounds.
 
 Musketaquid, Grass-ground, Prairie, or Concord River, the, =1=, 3, 8;
 =5=, 115; =6=, 13, 60, 258.
 
 Muskrat (musquash), a colony, =2=, 185; in Goose Pond, 299; calling a,
 =3=, 227; =5=, 114-117; house of, =6=, 221.
 
 Musquash. _See_ Muskrat.
 
 Mussel, the, =5=, 129.
 
 "My books I'd fain cast off, I cannot read," verse, =1=, 320.
 
 "My life has been the poem I would have writ," verse, =1=, 365.
 
 "My life is like a stroll upon the beach," verse, =1=, 255.
 
 "My life more civil is and free," verse, =5=, 415.
 
 "My love must be as free," verse, =1=, 297.
 
 Myself and Yourself, =6=, 215, 361.
 
 Mystics, =6=, 150.
 
 Mythology, ancient history, =1=, 60.
 
 
 Nahant (Mass.), =3=, 170.
 
 Names, of places, longing for English, =1=, 54; poetry in, =5=, 20; of
 places, French, 56, 57; men's, 236, 237; of colors, 273, 574.
 
 Nantasket (Mass.), =4=, 16.
 
 Nashua (N. H.), =1=, 87, 89, 115, 116, 126, 151, 152, 169, 170, 173,
 179, 391.
 
 Nashua River, the, =1=, 375.
 
 Nashville (N. H.), =1=, 175, 179.
 
 Naticook Brook, =1=, 227.
 
 NATURAL HISTORY OF MASSACHUSETTS, =5=, 103-131.
 
 Natural history, reading books of, =5=, 103, 105.
 
 Natural life, the, =1=, 405.
 
 Nature, adorned, =1=, 18, 19; laws of, for man, 34; indifference of,
 117; provisions of, for end of her creatures, 236; tame and wild, 337;
 and Art, 339; composing her poem Autumn, 403; adapted to our weakness
 as to our strength, =2=, 12; a liberty in, 143; no melancholy or
 solitude in the midst of, 145-147; the medicines of, 153; known only
 as a robber by the farmer, 183; men who become a part of, 232, 233;
 questions and answers of, 312; our knowledge of the laws of, 320;
 helping lay the keel of, 334; principle of operations of, 340; man's
 need of, 350; the earth as made by, =3=, 77, 78; always young, 89, 90;
 the coarse use of, 133; health to be found in, =5=, 105; man's work
 the most natural compared with that of, 119; the hand of, upon her
 children, 124, 125; different methods of work, 125; the civilized look
 of, 141; the winter purity of, 167; a _hortus siccus_ in, 179; men's
 relation to, 241, 242; love of, =6=, 3, 37, 64, 231, 277; objects of,
 9, 36, 37, 71, 74, 75, 83, 87, 93.
 
 Nature, verse, =5=, 395.
 
 "Nature doth have her dawn each day," verse, =1=, 302.
 
 "Nature has given horns," verse, =1=, 242.
 
 Nauset Harbor, in Orleans, =4=, 31, 64.
 
 Nauset Lights, =4=, 41.
 
 Nawshawtuct Hill, =5=, 384.
 
 Nebraska Bill, the, =4=, 403.
 
 Necessaries of life, =2=, 12, 13.
 
 Necessity, a seeming fate, commonly called, =2=, 6.
 
 Negro slavery, =2=, 8.
 
 Neighborhood, avoiding a bad, ourselves, =2=, 37.
 
 Neptune, Louis, =3=, 10, 86; a call on governor, 162, 163; the old
 chief, 174.
 
 Neptune, the god, =6=, 28; the planet, 138.
 
 Nerlumskeechticook Mountain, =3=, 249, 260, 291, 297, 298, 301.
 
 Nesenkeag, =1=, 206.
 
 Nests, fishes', =1=, 24, 25; =6=, 63, 161.
 
 Neva marshes at Walden Pond, no, =2=, 23.
 
 New Bedford, =6=, 235-240, 258, 261, 263, 265, 271, 274, 313, 333,
 341, 342, 352, 359, 396.
 
 New clothes, beware of all enterprises requiring, =2=, 26.
 
 Newcomb, Charles, =6=, 298, note.
 
 New England, Arcadian element in the life of, =1=, 256; "Walden" of
 and for people of, =2=, 4; hardships endured that men may die in, 15;
 wealth causes respect in, 25; mean life lived by inhabitants of, 107;
 can hire all the wise men of the world to teach her, 122; natural
 sports of, 233; Rum, 285; Night's entertainment, a, 297.
 
 New Hampshire, =1=, 85; for the Antipodes, leaving, 151; man, a, 211;
 line, crossing the, 377; =6=, 329, 331, 334-336, 363, 365.
 
 New Hollander, naked when European shivers in clothes, =2=, 14.
 
 New Jersey, =6=, 70, 283-290.
 
 New Netherland, Secretary of Province, quoted, =2=, 43.
 
 "New Orleans Crescent" and Whitman, =6=, 291.
 
 New Testament, the, =1=, 72-75, 142; practicalness of, 146; =6=, 137.
 
 New things to be seen near home, =5=, 211, 212.
 
 Newbury (Mass.), =1=, 87.
 
 Newbury port (Mass.), =1=, 87-89.
 
 Newfound Lake, =1=, 87, 89.
 
 News, getting the, from ocean steamers, =1=, 253; "What's the," =2=,
 104; futility of the, 104.
 
 Newspapers, reading, on Hoosac Mountain, =1=, 194; influence and
 servility of Boston, =4=, 398-400; and John Brown, 416, 417; evils of
 reading the, 471-476; =6=, 175, 176, 180, 186.
 
 Newton, Sir Isaac, =6=, 136.
 
 "New World," =6=, 107, note.
 
 New York, =6=, 18, 35, 50, 53, 62, 68, 70, 72, 78-80, 83-87, 90, 95,
 101, 107, note, 109, 117, 121, 283, 287, 291, 296, 297.
 
 New Zealand, =6=, 236, 255, 381, 383, note.
 
 Niagara, =6=, 384.
 
 Nicketow (Me.) =3=, 7, 19, 260, 316, 319.
 
 Niebuhr, Barthold George, quoted, =5=, 290.
 
 Niepce, Joseph Nicphore, quoted, =5=, 238.
 
 Night, thoughts in the, =1=, 354; walking the woods by, =2=, 187-190;
 in the woods, a, =3=, 43-45; thoughts by a stream at, 131; sounds in
 the woods at, 247, 248; on Wachusett, =5=, 146; the senses in the,
 =5=, 327, 328; on the mountain, =6=, 371; on the river, 231. _See_
 Sunset.
 
 NIGHT AND MOONLIGHT, =5=, 323-333.
 
 Nightfall, =1=, 37-40, 117.
 
 Nilometer. _See_ Realometer.
 
 Nine Acre Corner, =1=, 5; White Pond in, =2=, 199.
 
 Nix's mate, story of, =4=, 267.
 
 "No Admittance," never painted on T.'s gate, =2=, 18.
 
 "No generous action can delay," verse, =5=, 418.
 
 Noah's dove, =6=, 48.
 
 Nobscot Hill, =5=, 303, 304; =6=, 280.
 
 Noliseemack, Shad Pond or, =3=, 29.
 
 North Adams (Mass.), =1=, 185.
 
 North Bridge, =1=, 14, 16, 33.
 
 North River (Assabet), =1=, 4.
 
 North Twin Lake, =3=, 39, 80, 84.
 
 Northeaster, a, =4=, 204, 209-211.
 
 Norumbega, =4=, 239; =5=, 90.
 
 Norwegian immigrants, =6=, 110.
 
 No-see-em, midge called, =3=, 245, 246.
 
 "Not unconcerned Wachusett rears his head," verse, =5=, 144.
 
 Notes from the Journal of a Scholar (Charles Emerson), =6=, 94.
 
 Notre Dame (Montreal), =5=, 11; a visit to, 12-14.
 
 Notre Dame des Anges, Seigniory of, =5=, 96.
 
 Nova Scotia, =6=, 338.
 
 Novel-reading, =2=, 116, 117.
 
 "Now chiefly is my natal hour," verse, =1=, 182.
 
 Nuptials, of plants, =6=, 207; of mankind, 204, 205.
 
 Nurse-plants, =5=, 193.
 
 Nuthatch, the, =5=, 108.
 
 Nuts, =6=, 3, 216, 300.
 
 Nuttall, Thomas, quoted, =5=, 111, 112.
 
 Nutting, in Lincoln woods, =2=, 263, 264.
 
 Nutting, Sam, an old hunter, =2=, 308.
 
 
 Oak, succeeding pine, and vice versa, =5=, 185, 187, 189; the scarlet,
 278-281; leaves, scarlet, 278-280.
 
 Oak Hall hand-bill and carry, =3=, 55, 83.
 
 Observatory on Hoosac Mountain, the, =1=, 197.
 
 Ocean, calm, rough, and fruitful, =4=, 124-128; beaches across the,
 177, 178; its phenomena, =6=, xi, 70, 133.
 
 October, the best season for visiting the Cape, =4=, 272.
 
 Ode to Beauty, Emerson's, =6=, 115-117.
 
 "Oft, as I turn me on my pillow o'er," verse, =1=, 384.
 
 Ogilby, America of 1670, quoted, =5=, 91.
 
 Olamon Mountains, =3=, 323.
 
 Olamon River, the, and meaning of word, =3=, 324.
 
 Olata, the swift-sailing yacht, =4=, 265.
 
 Old Fort Hill, =3=, 166.
 
 Old Marlborough Road, The, verse, =5=, 214.
 
 Oldtown (Me.), =3=, 4, 6, 7, 9, 88, 142, 152, 153, 160, 161, 166, 167,
 174, 192, 202, 204, 222, 226, 259, 272, 274, 313, 320, 322, 323,
 325-327.
 
 Olympia, =6=, 55.
 
 Olympia at Evening, translation, =5=, 378.
 
 Olympus, the outside of the earth, everywhere, =2=, 94; =6=, 93.
 
 Omnipresence, verse, =5=, 417.
 
 "O nature! I do not aspire," verse, =5=, 395.
 
 On a Silver Cup, verse, =1=, 240.
 
 On Himself, =1=, 241.
 
 On His Lyre, verse, =1=, 240.
 
 On Love, verse, =1=, 242.
 
 On Lovers, verse, =1=, 243.
 
 "On Ponkawtasset, since we took our way," verse, =1=, 16.
 
 On Women, verse, =1=, 242.
 
 "One more is gone," verse, =5=, 405.
 
 Opera, =6=, 216, 322.
 
 Opposition to society, =2=, 355.
 
 Oracles of Quarles, =6=, 112.
 
 Orchard House, =6=, 333, note.
 
 Orchis, the great round-leaved, =3=, 240.
 
 Organ-grinders on the Cape, =4=, 30.
 
 Oriel College, Oxford, =6=, 236, 342.
 
 Oriental, Occidental and, =1=, 147; exclusion of the, in Western
 learning, 148, 149; quality in New England life, the, 256, 257.
 
 Origin of Rhodes, translation, =5=, 376.
 
 "Origin of Species," Darwin's, =6=, 382.
 
 Orinoco, the river, =5=, 93.
 
 Orleans (Mass.), =4=, 22; Higgins's tavern at, 29.
 
 Orleans, Isle of, =5=, 41, 42.
 
 Ornaments, significance of architectural, =2=, 52.
 
 Orono (Me.), =3=, 92.
 
 Orsinora, =5=, 90.
 
 Ortelius, _Theatrum Orbis Terrarum_, =5=, 89.
 
 Osborn, Rev. Samuel, =4=, 52, 53.
 
 Osier, red, Indian word for, =3=, 188.
 
 Osprey, =6=, 46.
 
 Ossian, =1=, 366-571, 393; quoted, =5=, 332.
 
 Ossoli, Margaret Fuller, =6=, 183-186.
 
 Ossoli, Marquis of, =6=, 184-186.
 
 O'Sullivan, =6=, 51, 102, 107.
 
 Ottawa River, the, =5=, 41, 94, 98.
 
 Otternic Pond, =1=, 169.
 
 _Oui_, the repeated, =5=, 60.
 
 "Our unenquiring corpses lie more low," verse, =1=, 227.
 
 Overseer, yourself the worst, =2=, 8.
 
 Ovid, quoted, =1=, 2, 228; =2=, 6, 346, 348.
 
 Owl, winged brother of the cat, watching an, =2=, 293.
 
 Owls, wailing of, =2=, 138-140; in Walden woods in winter, 300, 301;
 =6=, 77, 154.
 
 
 "Packed in my mind lie all the clothes," verse, =1=, 313.
 
 Packs, of tourists, =6=, 335, 336, 368.
 
 Paddling, a lesson in, =3=, 325, 326.
 
 Painted-cup, =6=, 71.
 
 Paley, William, on Duty of Submission to Civil Government, quoted,
 =4=, 361, 362.
 
 Palladius, quoted, =5=, 294, 308.
 
 Palmer, Edward, =6=, 82, 97.
 
 Palmer, Joseph, at Fruitlands, =6=, 143, 155.
 
 Pamadumcook Lakes, the, =3=, 30, 45, 47, 84; meaning of the word, 156;
 260.
 
 Pamet River, =4=, 134.
 
 Pan, not dead, =1=, 65; and Whitman, =6=, 298.
 
 Pandora's box, =6=, 20.
 
 Pantaloons, not to be mended like legs, =2=, 24.
 
 PARADISE (TO BE) REGAINED, =4=, 280-305.
 
 Paradise, =6=, 10, 111, 162.
 
 Parc, the, =6=, 149.
 
 Parker House, =6=, 344, 345.
 
 Parker, Theodore, =6=, 53, 237, 343, 355.
 
 Parkman, Deacon, =6=, 6, note.
 
 Parkman, Francis, =6=, 6.
 
 Parkman house, =6=, 6.
 
 Parliament, provinciality of the English, =4=, 477, 478.
 
 Parlor lectures, =6=, 192, 352.
 
 Partheanna, =6=, 55.
 
 Parthian army, =6=, 153.
 
 Partridge, the, =2=, 250-252, 304, 311; =6=, 60.
 
 Partridge-berries, =6=, 195.
 
 Pasaconaway, =1=, 267, 269.
 
 Pascal and Henry James, =6=, 122.
 
 Passadumkeag River, the, =3=, 8, 9, 323, 324.
 
 Passamagamet Falls, =3=, 51; "warping up," 53; 84.
 
 Passamagamet Lake, =3=, 50, 51.
 
 Passamagamet Stream, =3=, 50, 51.
 
 Passamaquoddy River, the, =3=, 5, 91.
 
 "Past and Present," =6=, 81, 101.
 
 Past, darkness of the, =1=, 163.
 
 Patent Office, seeds sent by the, =5=, 203.
 
 Patmore, Coventry, his "Angel in the House," =6=, 279.
 
 Pauper, visit from half-witted, =2=, 167.
 
 Pawtucket Falls, the lock-keeper at, =1=, 80; Dam, 88; Canal,
 deepening the, 263.
 
 Pea, beach, =4=, 90, 206, 207.
 
 Peabody (a classmate of T.), =6=, 24.
 
 Peabody, Miss Elizabeth Palmer, =6=, 61, 287.
 
 Peace, lecture on, =6=, 52; remarks on, 141, 249, 250.
 
 Peaked Mountain, =3=, 254.
 
 Pear tree, the, planted by Thomas Prince, =4=, 43.
 
 Peddler, T., taken for, =6=, 245.
 
 Peetweets, Indian word for, =3=, 182.
 
 Pehlvi, dialect, =6=, 54.
 
 Pekin, =6=, 89.
 
 Peleus and Cadmus, translation, =5=, 381
 
 Pelham (N. H.), =1=, 92.
 
 Pellico, Silvio, =6=, 53.
 
 Pembroke (N. H.), =1=, 124.
 
 Pemigewasset, the, =1=, 85, 86, 88, 333; Basin, on the, 261.
 
 Penacook, now Concord (N. H.), founding of, =1=, 322.
 
 Penance, people of Concord doing, =2=, 4.
 
 Pencil-making, =6=, 6, 174, 182, note, 335, note.
 
 Penhallow, Samuel, History, quoted, =4=, 235.
 
 Penichook Brook, =1=, 179, 202, 374.
 
 Penna, how pronounced, =6=, 25.
 
 Pennsylvania, =6=, 96, 276, 281.
 
 Pennyroyal, =1=, 272.
 
 Penobscot County, =3=, 73.
 
 Penobscot Indians, living in cotton tents, =2=, 31; sociability of,
 =3=, 321; use of muskrat-skins by, =5=, 116, 117.
 
 Penobscot River, the, =3=, 3, 5, 6; Indian islands in the, 7; 17, 18,
 24, 29, 31, 32, 40, 41, 54, 77, 80, 87, 91, 95, 96, 103-105, 107, 108;
 between Moosehead and Chesuncook Lakes, described, 117; 145, 148;
 meaning of the word, 157, 158, 161 166, 176, 193, 202; West Branch of,
 203, 208, 209, 233, 234, 238, 270-272; main boom of the, 329.
 
 Pepin Lake.
 
 Perch, the common, =1=, 26; =5=, 123; =6=, 134, 311, 322, 325, 336.
 
 Perfection, artist of Kouroo who strove after, =2=, 359.
 
 Persius Flaccus, Aulus, =1=, 327-333; =6=, 6, 158.
 
 Petrel, the storm, =4=, 114.
 
 Pfeiffer, Mme. Ida, quoted, =2=, 25.
 
 Phar-ra-oh (noise of locusts), =6=, 90.
 
 Phenomenal and real, =6=, 57, 58, 88, 89, 146, 321, 347, 348.
 
 Philanthropy, generally considered, =2=, 82-86; =6=, 118, 192, 212,
 283, 346.
 
 Phillips, Wendell, before the Concord Lyceum, =4=, 311; qualities of,
 as reformer and orator, 311-315; =6=, 255, 397.
 
 Philosopher, what he is and is not, =2=, 16; visits from a, 295-298.
 
 Philosophers, ancient, poor in outward, rich in inward riches, =2=,
 15, 16; =6=, 11, 26, 52, 64, 65, 153, 299, 300.
 
 "Philosopher's Scales," =6=, 115.
 
 Philosophy, Asiatic, =1=, 140, 141; loftiness of the Oriental, 142,
 143; Stoical, =6=, x; mental, =6=, 25-27; Transcendental, 81, 159;
 114, 270, 296, 299, 300.
 
 Phoebe, the, =5=, 112.
 
 Phoebus Apollo, =6=, 44.
 
 Phosphorescence, =6=, 309, 310.
 
 Phosphorescent wood, =3=, 199-201.
 
 Physician, priest and, =1=, 272.
 
 Pickerel, the, =1=, 29; Walden, =2=, 204, 205, 314; =6=, 126-128, 131.
 
 Pickerel-fisher, the, =5=, 180, 181.
 
 Pickerel-weed (pontederia), =1=, 18.
 
 Picturesque, =6=, 239, 264.
 
 Pierce, President Franklin, =6=, 193, 211, 250.
 
 Pies, no, in Quebec, =5=, 86.
 
 Piety, =6=, 37, 42, 89.
 
 Pigeons, =1=, 235; =6=, 21.
 
 Pilgrims, arrival of the, =4=, 251-257.
 
 Pilgrims, verse, =5=, 413.
 
 Pilgrims, Canterbury, =6=, 383.
 
 Pilgrim's Progress, the best sermon, =1=, 72; =6=, 377.
 
 Pillsbury, Parker, =6=, 378-380.
 
 _Pinbna_, the, =5=, 48.
 
 Pindar, quoted, =1=, 259; =6=, 102.
 
 Pindar, Translations from, =5=, 375.
 
 Pine, felling a, =2=, 47; oak succeeding, and _vice versa_, =5=, 185,
 187, 189; family a, 243, 244.
 
 Pine, pitch, tracts of, =4=, 22.
 
 Pine, white, =3=, 160; forests, 169; red, 268; Labrador and red, 296.
 
 Pine cone, stripped by squirrels, =5=, 196.
 
 Pine Stream, =3=, 122, 136, 216.
 
 Pine Stream Deadwater, =3=, 121.
 
 Pine Stream Falls, =3=, 136, 216.
 
 Pinnacle, Hooksett, =1=, 318, 321.
 
 Pioneers, old and new, =1=, 124.
 
 Piracy, =6=, 154.
 
 Piscataqua, the, =1=, 202.
 
 Piscataquis Falls, =3=, 322.
 
 Piscataquis River, the, =3=, 101; meaning of the word, 157, 179, 260,
 327.
 
 Piscataquoag, =1=, 87, 259.
 
 Pismire, and his hillock, =6=, 218.
 
 Pitching a canoe, =3=, 105.
 
 Plain and mountain, life of the, =5=, 151.
 
 PLAINS OF NAUSET, THE, =4=, 31-56.
 
 Plaistow (N. H.), =1=, 185.
 
 Plants, the nobler valued for their fruit in air and light, =2=, 17;
 abundance of strange, by Moosehead Lake, =3=, 103, 104, 188; observed
 on Mount Kineo, 195; about camp on the Caucomgomoc, 223; along the
 Umbazookskus, 229, 230; in cedar swamp by Chamberlain Lake, 239-241;
 on East Branch, 302; on Cape Cod beach, =4=, 111; about Highland
 Light, 135, 167; about the Clay Pounds, 165; on Cape Diamond, Quebec,
 =5=, 27.
 
 Plato, =2=, 119; definition of a man, 165; =6=, 150.
 
 PLEA FOR JOHN BROWN, A, =4=, 409-440.
 
 Pleasant Cove, in Cohasset, =4=, 18.
 
 Pleasant Meadow, adjunct to Baker Farm, =2=, 225.
 
 Plicipennes, =5=, 170.
 
 Pliny, the Elder, quoted, =5=, 292.
 
 Plover, the piping of, =4=, 71; the, =5=, 112.
 
 Plum, beach, =5=, 201.
 
 Plum Island, =1=, 86, 88, 210.
 
 Plutarch, quoted, =1=, 183.
 
 "Ply the oars! away! away!" verse, =1=, 1, 88.
 
 Plymouth (Mass.), =6=, 35, 42, 190, 192, 232-234, 238, 301, note, 328,
 380.
 
 Plymouth (N. H.), =1=, 89.
 
 Plymouth Church, =6=, 297.
 
 Pockwockomus Falls, =3=, 56, 57, 83.
 
 Pockwockomus Lake, =3=, 50.
 
 POEMS, =5=, 393-419.
 
 Poet, poems and the, =1=, 362-366; 400-403; visits from a, =2=, 295.
 
 Poetry, the nature of, =1=, 93-98; the mysticism of mankind, 350; of
 the "Dial," =6=, 38, 60, 115, 124; Greek, 60; English, 65, 66,
 112-114, 153, 235, 259, 275.
 
 Poets, never yet read by mankind, =2=, 115, 116; =6=, xi, 27, 93.
 
 Poet's Delay, The, verse, =1=, 366.
 
 Point Allerton, =4=, 15.
 
 Point Levi, by ferry to, =5=, 70; a night at, 71; 89.
 
 Pointe aux Trembles, =5=, 20, 21.
 
 Poke, or garget, the, =5=, 253-255.
 
 Poke-logan, a, =3=, 56.
 
 Polaris, =6=, 362.
 
 Pole, stirring up with, =6=, 311.
 
 Poling a batteau, =3=, 34, 35, 53, 54.
 
 Polis, Joe, =3=, 174; secured as guide, 175; puzzled about white men's
 law, 192; travels and opinions of, 217, 218; calls upon Daniel
 Webster, 279; as a boy, hard experience in traveling of, 308; good-by
 to, 327; =6=, 290, 311, 323, 336.
 
 Politics, the unimportance of, =4=, 480-482; =6=, 17, 18, 141, 283,
 359.
 
 Political conditions and news, =1=, 133.
 
 Politicians, country, =3=, 9.
 
 Poluphloisboios Thalassa, the Rev., =4=, 67.
 
 Polygamy, =6=, 302.
 
 Polygonum, =1=, 18.
 
 _Pommettes_, =5=, 39.
 
 Pomotis, =6=, 131.
 
 POND IN WINTER, THE, =2=, 312-329.
 
 Pond Village, =4=, 142.
 
 PONDS THE, =2=, 192-222.
 
 Ponds, in Wellfleet, =4=, 89. _See_ Flint's, Goose, Loring's, Walden,
 White's Ponds.
 
 Pongoquahem Lake, =3=, 260.
 
 Ponkawtasset, =1=, 16.
 
 Poor, houses of the, =2=, 37, 38.
 
 "Poor bird! destined to lead thy life," verse, =5=, 411.
 
 Poplar Hill, =1=, 16, 51.
 
 Portage, a rough, =3=, 33; round Ambejijis Falls, 51.
 
 Post-office, easily dispensed with, =2=, 104; the domestic, =4=, 24.
 
 Postel, _Charte Gographque_, quoted, =4=, 249.
 
 Potherie, quoted, =5=, 52.
 
 Pot-holes, various, =1=, 261-263.
 
 Pout, the horned, =1=, 29, 30; =6=, 127, 128.
 
 Poverty, =6=, 170, 171, 303.
 
 Poverty, verse, =5=, 412.
 
 Poverty-grass, =4=, 25; as the Barnstable coat-of-arms, 135.
 
 Practicalness, the triviality of, =1=, 145.
 
 Prairie River, Musketaquid or, =5=, 115.
 
 Prayer, verse, =5=, 418.
 
 Preaching, =6=, 192, 213.
 
 Precipice for suicides, =6=, 149.
 
 Prexistence, =6=, 179, 185, 186; recollections of, 210, 211.
 
 Present, moment, meeting of two eternities, past and future, =2=, 18.
 
 "Present, The" (the periodical), =6=, 112, 117, 118.
 
 Press, influence and servility of the, =4=, 397-400.
 
 Priest, physician and, =1=, 272.
 
 Prince, Thomas, =4=, 43.
 
 Prince of Wales in New England, =6=, 372.
 
 Pring, Martin, New England discoveries of, =4=, 228, 229, 246, 247.
 
 Prison, a, the true place for just men, =4=, 370; T. in Concord,
 374-380.
 
 Professor, the traveling (Agassiz), =6=, 147.
 
 Prometheus Bound of schylus, The, translation, =5=, 337.
 
 Prose, a poem in, =1=, 404.
 
 Province man, a green, =3=, 16.
 
 PROVINCETOWN, =4=, 212-273.
 
 Provincetown (Mass.), walking to, =4=, 31, 57, 58; Bank, T. suspected
 of robbing, 176, 177; approach to, 193; described, 195-197; fish,
 212-215; boys, 218; Harbor, 225.
 
 Provinciality, American and English, =4=, 477, 478.
 
 Public opinion, compared with private, =2=, 8.
 
 Pumpkin, sitting alone on a, =2=, 41; none so poor that he need sit on
 a, 72.
 
 Purana, the, quoted, =5=, 327.
 
 Purple Grasses, The, =5=, 252-258.
 
 Purple Sea, the, =4=, 119.
 
 Purslane, dinner of, =2=, 68.
 
 Pythagoras, quoted, =1=, 338.
 
 
 Quail, a white, =5=, 109, note.
 
 Quakers, dress of, =6=, 97; meetings, 98, 288, 340; at Eagleswood,
 288; at New Bedford, 340, 393; at New York, 97.
 
 Quakish Lake, =3=, 33, 36, 85.
 
 Quarles, Francis, quoted, =1=, 12, 407, 414; =6=, 108, 112.
 
 Quarterly of the Transcendentalists, =6=, 120; its fame in England,
 156, note.
 
 Quebec (Que.), meaning of the word, =3=, 157; 257; =5=, 3, 20, 21;
 approach to, 22; harbor and population of, 22; medivalism of, 23, 26;
 the citadel, 27-30; 76-80; fine view of, 49; rentering, through St.
 John's Gate, 69; lights in the Lower Town, 71; landing again at, 72;
 walk round the Upper Town, 72-76; the walls and gates, 74, 75;
 artillery barracks, 75; mounted guns, 76; restaurants, 85, 86; scenery
 of, 87-89; origin of word, 88; departure from, 95.
 
 Questioning to be avoided, =6=, 201, 275.
 
 Quincy, Josiah (H. U. 1790), President of Harvard University, =6=, 10.
 
 Quitticus in Middleborough, =6=, 264.
 
 Quoil, Hugh, an Irishman, =2=, 288.
 
 
 Rabbit, the, =2=, 310.
 
 Rabbit Island, =1=, 113.
 
 Race characteristics, =6=, 149, 222, 229.
 
 Race Point, =4=, 64, 193, 200.
 
 Ragmuff Stream, =3=, 118, 121, 145, 216.
 
 Railroad, car, growing luxuries in, =2=, 41; slowness and heedlessness
 of, 58, 59; men overridden by, 102, 103; listening with praise to
 sound of, 127-136; Iron, Trojan Horse ruining Walden, 213, 214.
 
 Rain, enjoyment of, =2=, 147; =3=, 33, 265, 266.
 
 Rainbow, standing in light of, =2=, 224; in the Falls of the
 Chaudire, =5=, 70, 71.
 
 Raleigh, Sir Walter, as a master of style, =1=, 106; quoted, =2=, 6;
 "The Soul's Errand" attributed to, =4=, 452; quoted, =5=, 329.
 
 Rapids, shooting, =3=, 81.
 
 Rasles, Father, Dictionary of the Abenaki Language, =3=, 154.
 
 READING, =2=, 110-122.
 
 Reading, =6=, 28, 31, 65, 66, 112-114, 153, 300, 301, 379, 382.
 
 Read's Ferry, =1=, 245.
 
 Reality, finding, =2=, 108, 109.
 
 Realometer, not Nilometer, but a, =2=, 109.
 
 Recluse, habits of a, =6=, 18, 36, 37, 59, note, 79, 122, 159, 170,
 195, 238, 252, note, 266, 328.
 
 Red shirts, =3=, 31, 145.
 
 Reformers, =1=, 130; objection to, 118.
 
 Reforms in mechanics and ethics, =4=, 281-286.
 
 Religion, ligature and, =1=, 64, 79; =6=, 9, 10, 89, 99, 114, 159,
 164, 179, 191, 195, 213, 214, 243, 297, 393.
 
 Rent, annual tax that would buy a village of wigwams, =2=, 33.
 
 _Repaired_ road, a, =3=, 98.
 
 Reporter, with labor for pains, =2=, 19.
 
 Reports on the natural history of Massachusetts, =5=, 103, 114, 118,
 123, 129, 130.
 
 Resignation, confirmed desperation, =2=, 8.
 
 Respectability, =6=, 79.
 
 Restigouche River, the, =3=, 178; =6=, 324.
 
 Return of Spring, verse, =5=, 109.
 
 Review, Democratic, =6=, 51, note, 100, 102, 108, 118; Massachusetts
 Quarterly, =6=, 144, 156.
 
 Review, of Carlyle by Emerson, =6=, 94, 101; of Emerson in Revue des
 Deux Mondes, 157.
 
 Rhexia, =1=, 18; =5=, 252.
 
 Rice, story of the mountaineer, =1=, 212-220.
 
 Richardson, Rev. James (H. U. 1837), =6=, 10.
 
 Richelieu, Isles of, =5=, 96.
 
 Richelieu or St. John's River, =5=, 8.
 
 Richelieu Rapids, the, =5=, 21.
 
 Richter, Jean Paul, quoted, =5=, 330, 331.
 
 Ricketson, Daniel, described, =6=, 235, 239, 305; letters from, 237,
 246, 257; letters to, 239, 240, 246, 248, 261, 266, 270, 273, 284,
 285, 304, 305, 311, 313, 337, 341, 350, 368, 374, 376, 393, 396, 397;
 mentioned, 237, 245, 257, 261, 265, 308, 342, 359, 381; visited by T.,
 265; plans trip abroad, 333; conversion of, 393.
 
 Ricketson, Walton, sculptor, =6=, xiii, 263, 485.
 
 Ripley, Rev. Ezra, D. D. (H. U. 1776), =6=, 4.
 
 Ripley, George, =6=, 404.
 
 Ripogenus Portage, =3=, 80.
 
 River, the flow of a, =5=, 178.
 
 River-bank, ice formations, in a, =5=, 128, 129.
 
 River Wolf, Fresh-Water or, =1=, 29.
 
 Rivers, of history, the famous, =1=, 10.
 
 Rivire du Loup, =6=, 323.
 
 Rivire du Sud, the, =5=, 92.
 
 Rivire more meandering than River, =5=, 56.
 
 Roach. _See_ Chivin.
 
 Roaches, silvery, =3=, 59.
 
 Road, a supply, =3=, 212; recipe for making a, 244.
 
 Roberval, Sieur de, =5=, 95, 96.
 
 Robin, the evening, =2=, 344; =5=, 109; a white, 109, note.
 
 Robin Hood Ballads, quoted, =1=, 121, 174, 175; =5=, 150, 207.
 
 Rock-Ebeeme, =3=, 20.
 
 Rock hills, singular, =3=, 282.
 
 Rogers, Nathaniel P., editor of "Herald of Freedom," =4=, 306-308;
 quoted, 308-310.
 
 Romans, vestiges of the, =1=, 264.
 
 Room for thoughts, =2=, 156.
 
 Roots of spruce, as thread, =3=, 225, 226.
 
 Ross, Sir James Clark, quoted, =1=, 390.
 
 Rowlandson, Mrs., =5=, 149.
 
 Roxbury, Mass., mentioned, =6=, 22, 24.
 
 Ruff, the, =1=, 24-26.
 
 Rumors from an olian Harp, verse, =1=, 184.
 
 Runaway slave, =2=, 168, 169.
 
 Rural life, =6=, 38, 67, 93, 115, 116, 121, 135.
 
 Russell, E. H., =6=, 403.
 
 Russell Stream, =3=, 104.
 
 "Rut," the, a sound before a change of wind, =4=, 97, 98.
 
 Rynders, =6=, 122.
 
 
 Sabbatia chloroides, =6=, 264.
 
 Sabbath-keeping, =6=, 99, 195, 336.
 
 Sachem Tahatawan, =6=, 13, 18.
 
 Saddle-back Mountain, =1=, 189.
 
 Sadi of Shiraz, Sheik, quoted, =2=, 87.
 
 Sadness, =6=, 41, 43, 47, 75, 89, 397.
 
 Saguenay River, =5=, 91, 94.
 
 St. Anne, the Falls of, =5=, 40; Church of _La Bonne_, 49; lodgings in
 village of, 49-51; interior of the church of _La Bonne_, 51, 52; Falls
 of, described, 52-55.
 
 St. Ann's of Concord voyageurs, Ball's Hill, the, =1=, 19.
 
 St. Charles River, the, =5=, 30.
 
 St. Francis Indian, =3=, 146, 208.
 
 St. George's Bank, =4=, 123, 124.
 
 St. Helen's Island (Montreal), =5=, 11.
 
 St. John, the wrecked brig, =4=, 6.
 
 St. John River, the, =3=, 5, 40, 80, 101, 137, 176, 178, 203, 233,
 238, 251, 256, 257, 270, 271, 274.
 
 St. John's (Que.), =5=, 9, 10.
 
 St. John's River, =5=, 8.
 
 St. Lawrence River, =3=, 80, 233, 238; =5=, 11; cottages along the,
 21; banks of the, above Quebec, 40, 41; breadth of, 49; or Great
 River, 89-95; old maps of, 89, 90, 92; compared with other rivers, 90,
 92-95; =6=, 323.
 
 St. Maurice River, =5=, 94.
 
 Saint Vitus' dance, =2=, 103.
 
 Salmon, =1=, 32.
 
 Salmon Brook, =1=, 167, 168, 375; Lovewell's house on, 345.
 
 "Salmon Brook," verse, =1=, 375.
 
 Salmon River, =3=, 19.
 
 Salop (Shropshire), =6=, 249, 383.
 
 Salt, as manufactured by Captain John Sears, =4=, 27, 28; works, 218,
 219.
 
 Salutations, Canadian, =5=, 47.
 
 "Sam," a cat, =6=, 29, 31.
 
 Sanborn, Franklin Benjamin (H. U. 1855), letters to, =6=, 58, 59,
 note, 252, 385-392; his Life of Thoreau, 22, 61, 90, 154, note, 252;
 his Memoir of Alcott cited, 61, note, 237, note, 252, note, 345;
 mentioned, 252, 287, 364, 365, 377, 381, 400; his school, 253, 322;
 his version of T.'s Latin, 29-32.
 
 Sand, tract of, near Nashua, =1=, 152, 209, 210; blowing, =4=, 204;
 inroads of the, 204, 205; Provincetown, 220-223.
 
 Sandbar Island, =3=, 100, 188, 189.
 
 Sand cherry, tasted out of compliment to Nature, =2=, 126.
 
 Sand formations due to thaw, =2=, 336-340.
 
 Sandwich (Mass.), =4=, 19; described, 20-22.
 
 Sandwich (N. H.), =1=, 86.
 
 Sandy Hook, =6=, 70, 72, 83.
 
 Sanjay, quoted, =1=, 147.
 
 Sanscrit books, =6=, 270, 271, note, 300.
 
 Sap of sugar maple, =6=, 278, 279.
 
 Sarah, Aunt (Dunbar), =6=, 5.
 
 Sardanapalus, at best houses traveler considered a, =2=, 40.
 
 Sargent, John Turner (H. U. 1827), =6=, 190.
 
 Satire, poetry and, =1=, 328-330.
 
 SATURDAY, =1=, 12-40.
 
 Saturn, =6=, 133.
 
 Sault  la Puce, Rivire du, =5=, 48, 58.
 
 Sault Norman, =5=, 11.
 
 Sault St. Louis, =5=, 11.
 
 Saunter, derivation of the word, =5=, 205, 206.
 
 Savage, instinct, the, =1=, 55; his advantage over civilized men, =2=,
 35; life, instinct towards, 231.
 
 Scarecrow taken for man whose clothes it wears, =2=, 24.
 
 Scarlet Oak, The, =5=, 278-285.
 
 Scene-shifter, the, =1=, 118.
 
 Scholars, their complaints, =6=, 171, 211, 229, 230, 259; their
 duties, 98, 171; their qualities, 98, 103, 145, 175, 262, 280.
 
 Schoodic Lake, =3=, 256.
 
 School, the _uncommon_, =2=, 122; question, the, among Indians, =3=,
 323, 324.
 
 Schoolhouse, a Canadian, =5=, 46.
 
 Schooner, origin of word, =4=, 199.
 
 Science, =1=, 386-391; the bravery of, =5=, 106, 107; =6=, 193, 280.
 
 Scotchman, dissatisfied with Canada, a, =5=, 75.
 
 Scott, Sir Walter, =6=, 114.
 
 Scriptures, of the world, =1=, 150; Hebrew, inadequacy of, regarding
 winter, =5=, 183.
 
 "Sea and land are but his neighbors," verse, =1=, 279.
 
 SEA AND THE DESERT, THE, =4=, 176-211.
 
 Sea, the roar of the, =4=, 40, 66; remoteness of the bottom of the,
 123; and land, =6=, xi, 14, 69, 79, 83, 183, 184, 254-256, 301.
 
 Sea-fleas, =4=, 113.
 
 Sea-plants near Quebec, =5=, 93.
 
 Sears, Captain John, and salt manufacture, =4=, 27, 28.
 
 Seashore, verses, =6=, xi; walks, 312, 328, 457.
 
 Sebago Lake, =6=, 38.
 
 Seboois Lakes, =3=, 222, 261, 310.
 
 Second Lake, =3=, 274, 276, 281; beauty of, 290-292, 297.
 
 Seeds, the use of, =1=, 129; of virtues, not beans, =2=, 181; the
 transportation of, by wind, =5=, 186, 187; by birds, 187-189; by
 squirrels, 190-200; the vitality of, 200-203.
 
 Seeing, individual, =5=, 285-288.
 
 Seeming and being, =6=, 44, 88, 161, 214, 217, 218, 227, 228, 321.
 
 Selenites, =5=, 323.
 
 Sensuality, in eating and other appetites, =2=, 241-246; =6=, 204,
 216, 295.
 
 Serenade, like the music of the cow, =2=, 137.
 
 Serenity and cheerfulness, =6=, 40, 41, 97, 278, 396.
 
 SERVICE, THE, QUALITIES OF THE RECRUIT, =4=, 277-279.
 
 Seven against Thebes, =6=, 102.
 
 Sewing, work you may call endless, =2=, 25; circle in Concord, =6=,
 29, 32.
 
 Sex and marriage, =6=, 198-200, 204, 207.
 
 Shackford, Rev. Charles Chauncy, (H. U. 1835), =6=, 190.
 
 Shad, =1=, 32, 35, 36; train-band nicknamed the, 33.
 
 Shad-flies, ephemer or, =3=, 255.
 
 Shad Pond, or Noliseemack, =3=, 29, 30, 86.
 
 Shadows, =1=, 375. _See_ Moonlight.
 
 Shakers, =6=, 114, 204.
 
 Shakespeare, =6=, x, 44, 197.
 
 Shame, =6=, 166, 197, 198, 208, 295.
 
 Shank-Painter Swamp, =4=, 200, 217.
 
 Shanty, purchase of Collins's, =2=, 47, 48.
 
 Sharks, =4=, 112, 113.
 
 Shawmut (Boston), =6=, 16.
 
 Sheep, alarm of a flock of, =1=, 317.
 
 Shelburne Falls, =1=, 261.
 
 Sheldrakes, Indian word for, =3=, 182; 254, 274, 276.
 
 Shellfish on Cape Cod, beach, =4=, 110, 111.
 
 Shelter, a necessary of life, =2=, 13; how it became a necessary, 29,
 30; generally considered, 29-45.
 
 Sherman's Bridge, =1=, 4.
 
 Shiners, =1=, 28; =6=, 127-131.
 
 Shingles of thought, whittling, =2=, 297.
 
 SHIPWRECK, THE, =4=, 3-18.
 
 Shirts, our liber, or true bark, =2=, 26.
 
 Short's Falls, =1=, 257.
 
 Sign language, =5=, 61.
 
 Signals, old clothes as, =4=, 22.
 
 Silence, =1=, 417-420; and speech, =6=, 54, 156, 230; of the woods,
 353.
 
 Sillery (Que.), =5=, 22.
 
 Silliman, Benjamin, quoted, =5=, 98.
 
 Simpkins, the Rev. John, quoted, =4=, 30.
 
 Simplicity of life, =2=, 101, 102; =6=, 161, 212, 213, 299.
 
 Sims case, the, =4=, 390, 391.
 
 "Since that first 'Away! Away!'" verse, =1=, 200.
 
 Singing, =3=, 41, 42.
 
 Skating, =5=, 177, 178; =6=, 250, 349.
 
 Sincerity, a rare virtue, =6=, 259.
 
 Skies, the, =1=, 383.
 
 Skins, sale of, =2=, 308.
 
 Slavery, Massachusetts and, =4=, 362, 363; what it is, 394; how to
 deal with, 433, 434; =6=, 97, 283, 358-360, 366, 392.
 
 SLAVERY IN MASSACHUSETTS, =4=, 388-408.
 
 Sleepers, railroad, =2=, 102, 103.
 
 Sloth, =6=, 205, 222, 243; the animal, 345.
 
 Small, James, of Truro, =6=, 255.
 
 Smith, Ansell, clearing and settlement of, =3=, 137-145.
 
 Smith, Captain John, quoted, =1=, 91, 92; =4=, 180, 255; map of New
 England by, 229.
 
 Smith, Captain, =6=, 86.
 
 Smith's River, =1=, 87.
 
 Smoke, winter morning, =5=, 165; seen from a hilltop, 173, 174.
 
 Smoothness of ocean, =4=, 125.
 
 Snake, under water in torpid state, =2=, 45, 46; the, =5=, 123, 124.
 
 Snake-head, =1=, 18.
 
 Snipe-shooting grounds, =5=, 48.
 
 Snow, walking in the, =2=, 292; =5=, 181, 182; not recognized in
 Hebrew Scriptures, 183; -storm, =6=, 27, 29, 377, 378.
 
 Snow, the Great, =2=, 132, 142, 292; dating from, 280.
 
 Snowberry, creeping, used as tea, =3=, 227.
 
 Snowbird, the, =5=, 109.
 
 Snow's Hollow, =4=, 61.
 
 Soapwort gentian, the, =1=, 18.
 
 Society, commonly too cheap, =2=, 151; health not to be found in, =5=,
 105; lecture on, =6=, 6, 158, 164, 229, 230, 281, 313, 346; pretences
 of, 213, 274.
 
 Society Islanders, gods of, =1=, 55, 66.
 
 Society of Natural History, =6=, 188, 189.
 
 Soldier, a young, =1=, 334.
 
 Soldiers, English, in Canada, =5=, 9, 10, 16, 17; in Quebec, 24-27,
 79, 80.
 
 Solitude, =2=, 143-154.
 
 Solitude, =6=, 76, 83, 174, 175, 231, 319.
 
 Solomon, quoted, =5=, 291.
 
 "Some tumultuous little rill," verse, =1=, 62.
 
 Somebody & Co., =3=, 14.
 
 Somerset, British ship of war, wrecked on Clay Pounds, =4=, 162.
 
 "Sometimes I hear the veery's clarion," verse, =5=, 112.
 
 Sophocles, the Antigone of, quoted, =1=, 139.
 
 Sorel River, =5=, 8.
 
 Sorrow, doctrine of, =6=, 41, 167.
 
 Soucook, =1=, 87.
 
 Souhegan, =1=, 87, 357; or Crooked River, 231.
 
 Soul, and body, =6=, 164, 165, 174, 175, 180, 193, 194, 213, 214, 219;
 nurture of, 164, 165, 174, 175.
 
 SOUNDS, =2=, 123-142.
 
 Sounds, winter morning, =5=, 163, 164.
 
 Souneunk Mountains, the, =3=, 218, 260.
 
 South, laborers a staple production of the, =2=, 39.
 
 South Adams (Mass.), =1=, 192.
 
 South Twin Lake, =3=, 39.
 
 Southborough (Mass.), =1=, 3, 5.
 
 Sowadnehunk Deadwater, =3=, 58.
 
 Sowadnehunk River, the, =3=, 31, 79.
 
 Spain, specimen news from, =2=, 105.
 
 Spanish discoverers, =4=, 234, 235.
 
 Sparrow, the first, of spring, =2=, 342.
 
 Sparrow, the rush, =6=, 23.
 
 Sparrow, the song, =5=, 109; =6=, 14.
 
 Sparrow, the white-throated, =3=, 213, 249, 262.
 
 Spaulding's farm, =5=, 243.
 
 Spearing fish, =5=, 121-123.
 
 Spectator, the part of man which is, =2=, 149, 150.
 
 Speech, country, =5=, 137.
 
 Spencer Bay Mountain, =3=, 183.
 
 Spencer Mountains, =3=, 108.
 
 Spenser, Edmund, quoted, =1=, 356; =2=, 158.
 
 Spirit, motions of the, =6=, 97, 288; the Great, 14, 17, 177; Bad, of
 the Indians, 15.
 
 "Spokelogan," =3=, 268.
 
 Sportsmen, making boys, =2=, 234.
 
 SPRING, =2=, 330-351.
 
 Spring, coming of the, =2=, 333, 334; morning, moral effect of a, 346,
 347; on the Concord River, =5=, 119-121; signs of, =6=, 21, 28, 30,
 71, 306, 376.
 
 Spring, Marcus, =6=, 183, 283, 286-289.
 
 Springer, J. S., Forest Life, quoted, =3=, 21, note; on lumbering,
 quoted, 48, note; on the spruce tree, quoted, 75; about the digging of
 a canal, quoted, 270, 271.
 
 Springs, river-feeding, =1=, 203; cool, =3=, 280.
 
 Spruce, the, =3=, 104; Indian words for black and white, 209;
 difference between black and white, 225.
 
 Spruce beer, a draught of, =3=, 30.
 
 Squam (N. H.), =1=, 86, 87, 89.
 
 Squash, the large yellow, =5=, 203.
 
 Squaw Mountain, =3=, 183.
 
 Squire Make-a-stir, =2=, 8.
 
 Squirrel, red, =1=, 206; watching, =2=, 301-303; in spring, coming of,
 342; =3=, 241; burying nuts, =5=, 190, 191; with nuts under snow, 195;
 pine cones stripped by the, 196.
 
 Squirrel, striped, chipping, or ground, =1=, 205, 206; with filled
 cheek-pouches, =5=, 198.
 
 Staff, the artist's, which became the fairest creation of Brahma, =2=,
 359.
 
 STAGE-COACH VIEWS, =4=, 19-30.
 
 Staples, Samuel, constable and sheriff, =6=, 50, 52, 141.
 
 Stark, General John, =1=, 268.
 
 Stars, known to Indian, =3=, 247; =5=, 328, 329.
 
 State and Church, =6=, 52, 224, 225.
 
 Staten Island, view from, =1=, 190; looking at ships from, 253; =6=,
 6, 50, 65, 68, 71-73, 77, 83, 86, 95, 100, 116, 120, 121.
 
 Statistics. _See_ Cost.
 
 Sternothrus, =6=, 126, 131.
 
 Stillriver Village (Mass.), =5=, 151.
 
 Stillwater (Me.), =3=, 4, 167.
 
 Stillwater, the, =5=, 140, 142.
 
 Stoicism, =6=, x, 47, 48, 123, 132, 170, 171, 238, 239, 337.
 
 Stone, nations' pride in hammered, =2=, 63.
 
 Stone, the Rev. Nathan, =4=, 55.
 
 Stones, rarity of, on Cape Cod, =4=, 223-225.
 
 Storm, in New York, =6=, 105; on Monadnock, 370.
 
 Stove, disadvantages of cooking, =2=, 280, 281.
 
 Stow (Mass.), =5=, 136.
 
 Stratten, now the Almshouse Farm, =2=, 283; family, homestead of, 284.
 
 Students, poor, Walden addressed to, =2=, 4; their economy, =6=, 58,
 59, note; of Greek, 58, 102, 103; of law, 17, 106.
 
 Sturgeon River, Merrimack or, =1=, 85, 117.
 
 Style, literary, =4=, 325, 326, 330, 331; a man's, in writing, =6=, x,
 67, 94, 311, 312.
 
 Success in life, =6=, 70, 79, 85, 96, 109, 123, 124, 159, 164, 173,
 178, 216, 294, 318, 362.
 
 SUCCESSION OF FOREST TREES, THE, =5=, 184-204.
 
 "Such near aspects had we," verse, =1=, 253.
 
 "Such water do the gods distil," verse, =1=, 86.
 
 Suckers, common and horned, =1=, 30; =6=, 127, 130-132, 221.
 
 Sudbury (Mass.), =1=, 3, 4, 5, 36, 53; early church of, described by
 Johnson, 9; =2=, 97, 335; =5=, 303.
 
 Sudbury River, =1=, 4.
 
 Suet, in Dennis (Mass.), =4=, 27.
 
 Sugar, =6=, 278, 279.
 
 Sugar Island, =3=, 101, 183, 194; near Olamon River, 324.
 
 Sugar Maple, The, =5=, 271-278.
 
 Sumach growing by T.'s house, =2=, 126.
 
 Summer life, =6=, 23, 63, 93.
 
 Sumner, Charles, (H. U. 1830), =6=, 183.
 
 Sumner, Horace, lost at sea, =6=, 184.
 
 Sun, in a mud-puddle, =6=, 242.
 
 Suncook, =1=, 87.
 
 SUNDAY, =1=, 42-120.
 
 Sunday, the keeping of, =1=, 63, 64, 76, 77; an Indian's, =3=, 201,
 202, 214, 215, 223, 229; in Provincetown, =4=, 252, 253; discourses,
 =6=, 79, 97, 190, 233, 289, 291, 297.
 
 Sun-fish, bream, or ruff, the fresh-water, =1=, 24-26.
 
 Sunkhaze, the, =3=, 8, 325, 326.
 
 Sunrise on Hoosac Mountain, =1=, 198. _See_ Morning.
 
 Sunset, =1=, 416-418; a remarkable, =5=, 246-248.
 
 Sunshine, the power of, =4=, 290, 291.
 
 Sun-squall, sea-jellies called, =4=, 70.
 
 Survey of Walden Pond, =2=, 315-324.
 
 Surveying, =6=, 100, 209, 220, 234, 289, 291, 328, note, 333.
 
 Surveyor of forest paths and across-lot routes, =2=, 20.
 
 Suttle, Mr., of Virginia, =4=, 392.
 
 Sutton (Mass.), =2=, 292.
 
 Swamp, the luxury of standing in a, =1=, 319.
 
 "Swampers," =3=, 242.
 
 Swedenborg, Emanuel, =1=, 68; =6=, 300.
 
 "Sweet cakes," =3=, 12.
 
 
 Table-lands of Eastham, =4=, 62.
 
 Tacitus, translation by T. from, =4=, 452-454.
 
 "Tactics" of Scott, =6=, 356.
 
 Tahatawan, =6=, 13-18.
 
 Talking, =6=, 54, 106, 175, 176, 230, 255, 301.
 
 Tamias, the steward squirrel, =5=, 198.
 
 Tansy, =1=, 18.
 
 Tappan, William, of New York, =6=, 72, 73, 79, 81, 82, 95, 97, 101,
 113, 117, 122.
 
 Tarbell, Deacon, =6=, 244.
 
 Tarkiln Hill, New Bedford, =6=, 262, 305.
 
 Taunton, =6=, 13, 17-19.
 
 Tavern, the gods' interest in the, =5=, 153; compared with the church,
 the, 161, 162.
 
 Taxes, T.'s experience with, =4=, 369, 370; in jail for refusal to
 pay, 374-381.
 
 Taxpaying, =6=, 50, 52.
 
 Taylor, Jane, =6=, 115.
 
 Tching-thang, quoted, =2=, 98.
 
 Tea, varieties of forest, =3=, 227; hemlock, its value, =6=, 326.
 
 Teaching, =6=, 6, 10, 23-27, 83.
 
 Teats, =6=, 223.
 
 Telasinis Lake, =3=, 267.
 
 Telos Lake, =3=, 235, 245, 264, 267; Indian name for, 270, 274, 281,
 290, 299.
 
 Temperature, of pond water in spring, =2=, 330.
 
 Temple, defined, =6=, 195; too close, 191.
 
 Tent, description of, =3=, 196, 197.
 
 Tenures, Canadian, =5=, 63.
 
 Tests, our lives tried by a thousand simple, =2=, 11.
 
 "Thank God, who seasons thus the year," verse, =5=, 407.
 
 Thanksgivings, cattle-shows and so-called, =2=, 183; emotion of, =6=,
 294; the festival, 282, 346.
 
 "That Phaeton of our day," =1=, 103.
 
 Thaw, sand formations due to, =2=, 336; Thor and, 341.
 
 Thaw, The, verse, =5=, 409.
 
 "The full-orbed moon with unchanged ray," verse, =5=, 406.
 
 "The god of day his car rolls up the slopes," verse, =5=, 399.
 
 "The Good how can we trust?" verse, =1=, 298; =6=, 177.
 
 "The needles of the pine," verse, =5=, 133.
 
 "The rabbit leaps," verse, =5=, 410.
 
 "The respectable folks," verse, =1=, 7.
 
 "The river swelleth more and more," verse, =5=, 120.
 
 "The sluggish smoke curls up from some deep dell," verse, =5=, 165.
 
 "The smothered streams of love, which flow," verse, =1=, 278.
 
 "The waves slowly beat," verse, =1=, 229.
 
 "The western wind came lumbering in," verse, =1=, 180.
 
 "Then idle Time ran gadding by," verse, =1=, 181.
 
 "Then spend an age in whetting thy desire," verse, =1=, 111.
 
 Theophrastus, =5=, 292.
 
 "There is a vale which none hath seen," verse, =1=, 184.
 
 "Therefore a torrent of sadness deep," verse, =1=, 183.
 
 "They," an authority impersonal as the Fates, =2=, 27.
 
 Thieving, practiced only where property is unevenly divided, =2=, 191.
 
 Thinking, =6=, 139, 162, 356, 357.
 
 "This is my Carnac, whose unmeasured dome," verse, =1=, 267.
 
 Thistle, the Canada, =3=, 96.
 
 Thomson, James, quoted, =5=, 249.
 
 Thor and Thaw, =2=, 341.
 
 Thoreau, Cynthia (Dunbar), mother of Henry, =6=, 4, 11, 29, 68, 193,
 225, 236, 251, 253, 289, 350, 351, 363, 364, 365, 381, 400, 405. _See
 under_ Letters.
 
 Thoreau, Helen, sister of Henry, =6=, 4, 11, 21, 23, 29, 32, 49, 52,
 73, 74, 86, 92, 95, 98, 100, 111, 117. _See under_ Letters.
 
 Thoreau, Henry David, starts on Concord and Merrimack journey, =1=,
 12; ascent of Hoosac Mountain, 189-200; experience with an uncivil
 mountain man, 214-220; invited to do various sorts of work, 324;
 begins return voyage, 335; goes to live by Walden Pond, =2=, 3;
 prefers to talk in the first person singular, 3, 4; beginning in the
 woods, 45; purchase of Collins's shanty, 47; begins to occupy house,
 49; plants beans, 60; earnings and spendings, 65-67; making bread, 68;
 declines offer of a mat, 74; imaginary purchase of Hollowell farm, 92;
 situation of house, 95, 126; purpose in going to woods, 100, 101; hoed
 beans, did not read books, 123; listening to various sounds, 127-142;
 friendship with Canadian woodchopper, 159-166; devotion to husbandry,
 179; earnings and spendings on bean-field, 180, 181; put in jail for
 not paying taxes, 190; fishing in Walden Pond, 192-195; boiling
 chowder about 1824, 200; earliest days on Walden Pond, 212, 213; first
 begins to inhabit house in cold weather, 268; finishes house with
 plastering, 271; surveys Walden Pond, 315; leaves Walden, Sept. 6,
 1847, 351; leaves Concord for Maine, Aug. 31, 1846, =3=, 3; starts "up
 river" from Bangor, 4; strikes into the wilderness, 15; starts for
 summit of Ktaadn, 61, 62; begins descent, 72; leaves Boston by steamer
 for Bangor, Sept. 13, 1853, 93; takes Moosehead Lake steamer for
 return home, 159; starts on third excursion to Maine Woods, July 20,
 1857, 174; reaches farthest northern point, 259; lands at Oldtown, the
 journey finished, 326; various visits to Cape Cod, =4=, 3; starts for
 Cape Cod, Oct. 9, 1849, 5; goes on a mackerel cruise, 182; takes leave
 of Cape Cod, 257; experience with taxes, 368, 370; in jail for unpaid
 taxes, 374-381; leaves Concord for Canada, Sept. 25, 1850, =5=, 3;
 traveling outfit of, 31-34; leaves Quebec for Montreal on return trip,
 95; leaves Montreal for Boston, 99; total expense of Canada excursion
 100, 101; walk from Concord to Wachusett and back, 133-152;
 observation of a red squirrel, 190, 191; experience with government
 squash seed, 203; his fame increasing, =6=, vii, 398, 399; his
 character, ix, xii; industry of, ix, 11, 34, 170, 171, 289, 368, 369;
 his affection for his family, ix, 33, 34, 68, 98, 99, 118, 119; for
 his brother John, 35, 41, 74; for the Emersons, 50, 53, 93, 103, 135,
 136, 142, 157; French elegance of, x; jesting habit of, x; birth and
 death, 3; ancestry and early days, 3-7; epochs in his life, 5, 6, 11,
 12, note, 35, 50, 160; affairs of, 6, 7, 23, 34-38, 105, 107, 108,
 126-132, 135, 169-172, 209, 355; books written by, 6, 7, 139, 156,
 233, 238, 252, 272; college "part," 7-10; philosophic mind of, 11, 26;
 Emerson's view of, 11; exaggeration by, 11, 203, 220, 224; Indian
 dialect of, 13-18; tastes of, 18, 23, 33, 34, 36, 37, 44, 45, 47, 49,
 58, 64, 79, 82, 93, 114, 115, 193; his Indian relics, 19, 20; wish to
 go West, 20; habits, 23, 24, 34, 135, 192, 326, 366-369; school, 23,
 24; advises Helen, 25-31; a Transcendental brother, 32-34;
 acquaintance with Emerson, 34, 35, 48, 49; with Mrs. Brown, 35-42
 (_see_ Letters); with R. F. Fuller, 45 (_see_ Letters); love of music,
 41, 45, 46; writes to Emerson, 49 (_see_ Letters); at Emerson's house,
 35, 50; intimate with Hawthorne, 51; with Alcott, 52, 64, 136, 146,
 151, 153, 238, 281, 291, 297, 307, 328, note; with Emerson's children,
 54, 136, 150, 152, 153; with Mrs. Emerson, 53 (_see_ Letters); with C.
 S. Wheeler, 58, 59, note; edits "Dial," 59-63; admirers of, 65, 138,
 139, 158, 235, 238, 239, 298, 397, 398; his college life, 5, 7, 8, 10,
 58, 67, 328; college professors and tutors, 58, 109, 137, 145; college
 studies, 65-67; goes to Staten Island, 68; meets Horace Greeley, Henry
 James, etc., 68; describes New York, 69-72, 78, 79, 82, etc.; verses
 on his brother John, 74; describes James, Channing, and Brisbane, 80,
 81; and other friends, 82; at W. Emerson's, 85, 86; his pursuits,
 84-91; criticises Concord and the "Dial," 92-94; describes
 immigration in 1843, 96, 109, 110; hears Lucretia Mott, 97; laments
 Stearns Wheeler, 97, 98; regrets Concord and separation, 99; writes
 for magazines, 100, 102, 107, 108, 109; mentions Channing, Greeley,
 James, Longfellow, 101; translates Greek, 102; sees publishers, 105;
 mentions Webster and C. Dunbar, 105; reads Quarles, 113; criticises
 Ellery Channing and Lane, 113, 114; Emerson too, 115; likes the Irish,
 116; objection to W. H. Channing, 118; hears from Emerson, 120; and
 Ellery Channing, 121; lives by Walden, 122, 125; hears from Lane,
 122-125; sends fish to Agassiz, 125-132; returns to Emerson's house,
 132; writes to Sophia, 132 (_see_ Letters); cares for the Emerson
 family, 135; helps Alcott with the summer-house of Emerson, 136;
 describes Scientific School, 138; refuses marriage, 138, 139; finds no
 publisher, 139, 156; his account of Hugh Whelan, 140, 143, 144, 148,
 149; hears from Emerson, 142 (_see_ Letters); hears Parker, Whipple,
 and Hudson at Lyceum, 145; describes a dinner, 147; sends verses, 147;
 describes the Emerson household, 152, 153; and W. E. Channing, 153;
 reads lectures, 6, 55, 154; writes to J. E. Cabot, 155 (_see_
 Letters); his mode of writing, 156; meets H. G. O. Blake, 158; their
 correspondence, 158-383 (_see_ Letters); believed in simplicity, 161;
 defines his life, 163, 168, 174, 175, 178, 179, 186; lectures on
 bread, 164-166; on duties, 167; corresponds with Greeley, 169;
 fathoming character, 169; lives by hand-labor, 170, 171; writes for
 "Graham" and "Putnam," 169, 172; his debts, 219, note, 221; visits
 Fire Island, 183; elected to Boston Society of Natural History, 188;
 lectures in Boston, 190; in Plymouth, Salem, etc., 190-192; satirizes
 spiritism, 193, 194; will be a scarecrow, 195; his temples, 195, 196;
 essay on Chastity, 197-209; goes land-surveying, 209; on "doing good,"
 211; reflects on life, 212-215; differs with G. W. Curtis, 216;
 moralizes, 217-223; feebleness of, 217, 218, 275; reads Haydon and
 Layard, 224; gets a new coat, 225; lessons therefrom, 226-228; finds
 fault with men, 229; paddles up river by night, 230, 231; lectures in
 Worcester, 232, 233, 303, 349, 358; publishes "Walden," 233; meets
 Ricketson and T. Cholmondeley, 235; geniality of, 238, 239, 274, 301;
 visits Nantucket and New Bedford, 240, 245, 247; moralizes to Blake,
 241-244; writes to Cholmondeley, 249; to Sanborn, 252, 385; prefers
 home to city, 248; visits Cape Cod, 254-257; incipient disease, 257;
 his boat, 258; describes Ricketson, 259; deals with E. Hosmer for an
 old house, 261, 262; praises Gilpin, 263; visits New Bedford, 265,
 283; gathers driftwood, 267-269; meets Mary Emerson, 269; receives
 books from Cholmondeley, 270, 271; the greatest walker in Concord,
 277; idealizes sugar-making, 278; visits Alcott in New Hampshire, 282,
 283, 285; invited to teach, 285; fondness for home, 285; the
 Eagleswood community described, 287-289; meets Walt Whitman, 291;
 visits Greeley, 291; his morning in Worcester, 292, 293; describes
 Whitman, 295-297; hears H. W. Beecher, 297; quotes Confucius to Wiley,
 299 (_see_ Letters); lands on Clark's Island, 301, note; meets Alcott
 and Channing in New Bedford, 306, 307; goes to Cape Cod with Channing,
 308; analyzes glow-worms for M. Watson, 309 (_see_ Letters); praises
 Hillside, 328, 329; criticises W. Flagg, 311; in Maine woods, 312,
 315, 322-326 (_see_ Letter to Higginson); his camp outfit, 326, 327;
 habit in touring, 329, 330; visits White Mountains (in 1858), 330-336;
 goes to Monadnock, 333, 368; finds the arnica in Tuckerman's Ravine,
 335; his camp on Mt. Washington, 335, 336; writes on autumn tints,
 340; is visited by Cholmondeley in 1858-59, 342; ridicules Boston
 clubs, 344, 345; criticises H. James, 346; his parable of the
 mountain ravine, 347, 348; his father dies, 350; returns to
 hand-labor, 355, 356; praises John Brown, 358; his speech published,
 with Emerson's, by Redpath, 359; reflections on man and fate, 360-362;
 invited to John Brown's grave, 363; goes with Channing to Monadnock,
 364; speeds Frank Merriam to Canada, 366, 367; explains his silence to
 Ricketson, 354; gets a Canada lynx, 355; describes life on Monadock,
 371, 372; hints for the Prince of Wales, 372; is visited by Blake and
 Brown, 376; mentions Alcott's success, 377; writes to P. Pillsbury,
 378; falls ill and goes to Minnesota, 373, 380-384, 385-391; his last
 letter from Cholmondeley, 380; describes his illness, 393; sits for his
 portrait in New Bedford, 394; writes for the "Atlantic Monthly," 395;
 grows worse, 396; writes his last letter, 399; dies, 400; expedition
 to Catskills and Berkshires, 406, 407; visited by Greene, 409;
 self-criticism, 410; lecturing irksome, 411; daguerreotype taken, 411.
 
 Thoreau, Jane (aunt), mentioned, =6=, 120.
 
 Thoreau, John (father of Henry), =6=, 4-7, 11, 21, 68, 73, 99, 111,
 289, 342, 349; day-book of, 5; lines to, 87; described by Thoreau,
 350; dies, 350, 351.
 
 Thoreau, John (grandfather of Henry), =6=, 5, note, 323.
 
 Thoreau, John, brother, lines to, =1=, 2, 12; brings Nathan, a country
 boy, to the boat, 308; =6=, 4, 7, 13, 14, 17-24, 32, 35; his death,
 41, 74, 75; his bluebird-box, 21, 22. _See_ Letters.
 
 Thoreau, Maria, =6=, 118.
 
 Thoreau, Philip (great-grandfather of Henry), =6=, 5.
 
 Thoreau, Sophia (sister of Henry), =6=, 4, 24, 25, 29, 31, 34, 71,
 111, 119, 132, 193, 286, 363, 396, 398, 400; dies, 400. _See_ Letters.
 
 Thor-finn, and Thor-eau, =4=, 191, 192; voyage of, 247, 248.
 
 Thorhall, the disappointment of, =4=, 187.
 
 Thorn-apple, the, =4=, 14, 15.
 
 Thornton's Ferry, =1=, 174, 227, 232.
 
 Thorwald, voyage of, =4=, 247, 248.
 
 "Thou dusky spirit of the wood," verse, =5=, 113.
 
 "Thou, indeed, dear swallow," verse, =1=, 240.
 
 "Thou sing'st the affairs of Thebes," verse, =1=, 241.
 
 "Though all the fates should prove unkind," verse, =1=, 151.
 
 Thoughts, sell your clothes and keep your, =2=, 361.
 
 "Thracian colt, why at me," verse, =1=, 243.
 
 Thrasher, brown, =2=, 175.
 
 Three Rivers (Que.), =5=, 21, 93.
 
 Three-o'clock courage, =5=, 208, 209.
 
 Thrush, wood, Indian word for, =3=, 186; =6=, 75.
 
 Thseng-tseu, quoted, =2=, 241.
 
 Thunder-storm, violent, =3=, 261, 262.
 
 THURSDAY, =1=, 317-355.
 
 "Thus, perchance, the Indian hunter," verse, =1=, 247.
 
 Tide and waves, power of, =4=, 288-290.
 
 Tierra del Fuego, =2=, 14.
 
 Timber, =3=, 18; land, best in Maine, 235.
 
 Time, measurement of the world's, =1=, 346; but a stream to fish in,
 =2=, 109.
 
 Tintinnabulum from without, the noise of contemporaries, =2=, 362.
 
 To a Colt, verse, =1=, 243.
 
 To a Dove, verse, =1=, 241.
 
 To a Stray Fowl, verse, =5=, 411.
 
 To a Swallow, verse, =1=, 240, 243.
 
 To Aristoclides, Victor at the Nemean Games, translation, =5=, 384.
 
 To Asopichus, or Orchomenos, on his Victory in the Stadic Course,
 translation, =5=, 378.
 
 To My Brother, verse, =5=, 403.
 
 To the Maiden in the East, verse, =5=,400.
 
 To the Lyre, translation, =5=, 379.
 
 Toil, translation, =5=, 389.
 
 "Tom Bowling," sung by T., =6=, 313.
 
 Tomhegan Stream, =3=, 203.
 
 Tools, men the tools of their, =2=, 41.
 
 Tortoise, mud, =6=, 128.
 
 Tortoise, painted, =6=, 128.
 
 "Trainers" in Concord, =4=, 392.
 
 TRANSLATIONS, =5=, 337-392.
 
 Translations from Pindar, =5=, 375-392.
 
 "Transcript," Worcester, =6=, 292, 293.
 
 Trappers, =5=, 115.
 
 Traps, a find of steel, =3=, 302.
 
 Travelers, good humor of, =4=, 23.
 
 Traveling, the profession of, =1=, 325; outfit, the best, =5=, 31-34.
 _See_ Walking.
 
 "Traveller," Boston, =6=, 310.
 
 Traverse, the, =5=, 92.
 
 Treat, Rev. Samuel, =4=, 48-52.
 
 Tree, fall of a, at night, =3=, 115; a dangerous, 221.
 
 Trees, visits to particular, =2=, 223; varieties of, =3=, 22, 116;
 along the Penobscot, 107, 120; about camp on the Caucomgomoc, 223;
 along the Umbazookskus, 231; on island in Heron Lake, farthest
 northern point, 259; on East Branch, 302; on Cape Cod, =4=, 129-131;
 disappearance of, 254, 255; Canadian, =5=, 48; the suggestions of,
 125; the natural planting of, 186-202; a town's need of, 272-278; for
 seasons, 276. _See_ Leaves, Woods, and under names of species.
 
 Tree-tops, a walk over, =3=, 67; appearance of various, 121; things
 seen and found on, =5=, 245, 246.
 
 "Tribune," New York, =6=, 46, 68, 120, 169, 281.
 
 Trinity, the, =1=, 70.
 
 Trout, true and cousin, =3=, 59.
 
 Trout Stream, =3=, 235, 269; Indian name for, 295.
 
 Troy (N. H.), =5=, 4.
 
 Trumpet-weed, =1=, 18.
 
 Truro (Mass.), =4=, 104, 137-139; the wrecks of, 159; =6=, 254, 256,
 357.
 
 Trust, =6=, 56.
 
 Truth, contact with, =1=, 310; to be preferred to all things, =2=,
 364.
 
 "Truth along with ye," =6=, 246.
 
 Tuckerman's Ravine, =6=, 334, 348, 349.
 
 TUESDAY, =1=, 188-248.
 
 Tulip-trees, =6=, 71, 77, 90.
 
 "Turning the silver," verse, =1=, 240.
 
 Turkey, the country, =6=, 147, 175; the fowl, 147.
 
 Turpentine-makers, Indian capture of, =1=, 174.
 
 Turtles, land and sea, =4=, 202. _See_ Tortoise.
 
 Turtle, the snapping, =5=, 124.
 
 Turtle-dove, long ago lost hound, bay horse, and, =2=, 18, 19.
 
 Tyngsborough (Mass.), origin of, =1=, 113; 114, 118, 123, 126, 152,
 170, 325, 377, 379, 382, 384.
 
 Tyndale, Mrs., =6=, 298.
 
 
 ULTIMA THULE, =6=, 236, 255.
 
 Umbagog Lake, =6=, 321.
 
 Umbazookskus Lake, =3=, 233, 238.
 
 Umbazookskus River, =3=, 219, 222; Much Meadow River, 229; 230, 232;
 =6=, 325.
 
 Unappropriated Land, the, =1=, 334.
 
 Uncannunuc, =1=, 169, 205, 271, 308, 318, 321, 335.
 
 Uncivil mountain farmer, an, =1=, 212-220.
 
 "Uncle Bill," somebody's (or everybody's), =4=, 141.
 
 Union Canal, the, =1=, 245.
 
 "Union Magazine," =6=, 170.
 
 Union, War for the, =6=, 380, 386, 392, 397.
 
 Universalist Church, =6=, 52.
 
 "Upon the lofty elm tree sprays," verse, =5=, 112.
 
 Usnea lichen, Indian word for, =3=, 186.
 
 
 _Vaches, Ranz des_, =6=, 51.
 
 Val Cartier (Que.), =5=, 89.
 
 Valhalla's kitchen, =6=, 44.
 
 Vallandigham, Clement L., quoted, =4=, 415, 428, 429.
 
 Vandalic verses, =6=, 39.
 
 Varennes, the church of, =5=, 97, 98.
 
 Varro, Marcus Terentius, quoted, =1=, 382; =2=, 183.
 
 Veazie's mills, =3=, 166.
 
 Vedas, the, quoted, =2=, 99, 240; and Zendavestas, 115.
 
 Veery, the, =5=, 112; =6=, 300.
 
 "Veeshnoo Sarma," quoted, =4=, 303.
 
 Vegetable-made bones, oxen with, =2=, 10.
 
 Vegetables in the oysterman's garden, =4=, 100.
 
 Vegetation, the type of all growth, =5=, 128.
 
 Vergennes (Vt.), =5=, 7.
 
 Vessels seen from Cape Cod, =4=, 105, 106, 118, 120-123.
 
 Vestry, of church, =6=, 302, note, 322, 359.
 
 View, the point of, =1=, 372.
 
 VILLAGE, THE, =2=, 185-191.
 
 Village, should play part of a nobleman as patron of art, =2=, 121,
 122; a great news-room, 185; running the gantlet in the, 186; a
 continuous, =5=, 42, 43; the, 213; trees in a, 275-278.
 
 Virgil, quoted, =1=, 93; =6=, viii, 28; reading, =5=, 138, 143, 144.
 
 Virginia Road, =6=, 4, 6, note.
 
 Virginity, =6=, 207.
 
 Virid Lake as a name for White Pond, =2=, 219.
 
 Vishnu Purana, the, quoted, =2=, 298; =6=, 300.
 
 VISITORS, =2=, 155-170.
 
 Von Hammer, =6=, 61.
 
 Vose, Henry (H. U. 1837), =6=, 18.
 
 Voting, =4=, 363, 364, 402, 403; =6=, 15, 18, 141.
 
 Voyageurs, Canadian, =3=, 6.
 
 Vulcan, =6=, 28, 31, 39.
 
 
 Wachusett Mountain, =1=, 169, 173; a view of, =5=, 138; range, the,
 139; ascent of, 142; birds or vegetation on summit of, 143; night on,
 145, 146; an observatory, 147; =6=, 83, 234, 237, 280, 321, 330, 372.
 
 Wagon journey to White Mountains, =6=, 330, 334.
 
 Waite's farm, =3=, 23.
 
 "Walden," the book, =6=, 233, 238, 272, note, 274, note, 378, 399.
 
 Walden Pond, house on the shore of, =2=, 3; purpose in living by, to
 transact private business, 21; advantages of, as a place of business,
 23; March, 1845, went to woods by, 45; of their own natures, fishing
 in the, 145; no more lonely than, 152; old settler who dug, 152;
 bottomless as, 166; scenery of, 195-216; origin of paving of, 202;
 temperature of water in, 203, 204; animals in, 204-206; purity of,
 214; fishing alone detains citizens at, 235; ducks on, 262; first ice
 on, 272; dates of first freezing over, 275; 291; bare of snow, 299;
 fox on thin ice of, 306; pickerel of, 314; surveying and sounding,
 315-324; cutting ice on, 323-329; breaking up of ice in, 329-334; =6=,
 7, 28, 30, 59, note, 104, 122, 125, 132, 135-141.
 
 Walden road, snow in, =2=, 294.
 
 Walden vale, giving notice, by smoke, to inhabitants of, 279; making
 amends for silence to, 295.
 
 Walden Woods, geese alighting in, =2=, 274; Cato Ingraham living in,
 283; Zilpha living in, 283; Hugh Quoil living in, 288; owl's hooting
 the _lingua vernacula_ of, 300; fox-hunting in, 306; =6=, 116, 133,
 140, 158, 337, note.
 
 Waldenses, pickerel, =2=, 315.
 
 Waldo, Giles, =6=, 72, 79, 82, 84, 97, 105.
 
 WALK TO WACHUSETT, A, =5=, 133-152.
 
 Walkers, the order of, =5=, 206, 207; =6=, 337.
 
 WALKING, =5=, 205-248.
 
 "Walking," a lecture on, =6=, 302, 395.
 
 Walks, not on beaten paths, =5=, 213, 214; the direction of, 216-219;
 adventurous, 285; by night, 326; =6=, 84.
 
 Walls, Quebec and other, =5=, 74.
 
 Walpole (N. H.), =6=, 281.
 
 Walton of Concord River, the, =1=, 22.
 
 Wamesit, =1=, 82.
 
 "Wanderer, The," =6=, 328, note, 365, note.
 
 Wannalancet, =1=, 268, 269.
 
 War, =6=, 91; stupidity of, 381; Crimean, 237, 244, 251, 271;
 Revolutionary, 323, 359; of 1861, 380, 386, 392, 397.
 
 Ward, George, =6=, 72, 84.
 
 Ward, Mrs., =6=, 52, 73.
 
 Warmth, bodily and spiritual, =6=, 205, 219, 244, 269.
 
 "Warping up," =3=, 57.
 
 Washing in a lake, =3=, 249.
 
 Wasps, visits from, =2=, 265.
 
 Wassataquoik River, the, =3=, 312.
 
 Wasson, D. A., =6=, 307, 309.
 
 Watatic Mountain, =5=, 137, 147.
 
 Water, colors of, =2=, 195-197; transparency of, 197-199; Cape Cod,
 =4=, 225.
 
 Water-lily, the white, =1=, 19.
 
 Water-troughs, =3=, 97.
 
 Watson, Edward, =6=, 301, note, 328, note.
 
 Watson, B. M., =6=, 190, 191, 234, 238, 309, 327-329, 333.
 
 Watson, Mrs. Mary, =6=, 43, 329.
 
 Waves on the shore, =4=, 155-158.
 
 Wawatam, the friendship of, =1=, 291.
 
 Wayfarer's-tree, or hobble-bush, =3=, 96.
 
 Wayland (Mass.), =1=, 3, 4, 5, 36, 37; =2=, 173.
 
 "We pronounce thee happy, Cicada," verse, =5=, 108.
 
 "We see the _planet_ fall," verse, =1=, 390.
 
 Wealth, folly of accumulating, =6=, 161, 162, 318, 319.
 
 Webb, Rev. Benjamin, =4=, 54, 55.
 
 Webb's Island, the lost, =4=, 152.
 
 Webster, Daniel, Joe Polis's call upon, =3=, 279; quoted, =4=, 125;
 the power of, 384, 385; quoted, 385; and the Fugitive Slave Law, 395;
 mentioned, =6=, 105, 237.
 
 Webster Pond, =3=, 270, 273; Indian name for, 273.
 
 Webster Stream, =3=, 161, 264, 273; Indian name for, 275, 289, 297,
 299, 300.
 
 WEDNESDAY, =1=, 249-316.
 
 Weeds, destruction of various, =2=, 178.
 
 "Week on the Concord and Merrimack Rivers, A," =6=, 139, 336, note,
 378, 399, 400, 409-111; refused by publishers, 156, 172; debt for,
 182, 209; cited, 274.
 
 "Welcome, Englishmen!" =2=, 170.
 
 Weld, Theodore, =6=, 283, 287.
 
 Weld, Mrs. (Grimk), =6=, 283.
 
 Well Meadow, =2=, 307.
 
 Wellfleet (Mass.), oysters, =4=, 82; Bellamy wrecked off, 160; a good
 headquarters for visitors to the Cape, 271.
 
 WELLFLEET OYSTERMAN, THE, =4=, 79-102.
 
 WENDELL PHILLIPS BEFORE THE CONCORD LYCEUM, =4=, 311-315.
 
 West, walking towards the, =5=, 217-220; general tendency towards the,
 219-224; T. would go to, =6=, 20, 21; a friend in, 36; immigrants to,
 96, 110; T.'s tour in, 380, 384-392.
 
 West Branch, tramp up the, =3=, 17; 20, 31, 32, 291, 316.
 
 West Indies, =6=, 342, 383.
 
 West Indian provinces of the fancy and imagination, =2=, 8.
 
 Westborough (Mass.), =1=, 3, 32.
 
 Westford (Mass.), =1=, 113.
 
 Westmoreland, etymology of, =5=, 6.
 
 Weston (Mass.), =2=, 308.
 
 Whales, in the St. Lawrence, =5=, 91.
 
 "What dost thou wish me to do to thee?" verse, =1=, 243.
 
 "What's the railroad to me?" verse, =2=, 135, 136.
 
 "Whate'er we leave to God, God does," verse, =5=, 396.
 
 Wheeler, Charles Stearns (H. U. 1837), =6=, 58, 59, note, 60, 91, 97,
 103.
 
 Whelan, Hugh, the gardener, =6=, 77, 140, 143, 144, 148, 154.
 
 "When descends on the Atlantic," Longfellow, quoted, =4=, 69.
 
 "When life contracts into a vulgar span," verse, =5=, 404.
 
 "When the world grows old by the chimney-side," verse, =5=, 417.
 
 "When Winter fringes every bough," verse, =5=, 176.
 
 "Where gleaming fields of haze," verse, =1=, 234.
 
 WHERE I LIVED, AND WHAT I LIVED FOR, =2=, 90-109.
 
 "Where they once dug for money," verse, =5=, 214.
 
 "Where'er thou sail'st who sailed with me," verse, =1=, 2.
 
 Whetstone Falls, =3=, 313.
 
 Whim, centrifugal force of, =6=, 154.
 
 Whipple, Edwin Percy, =6=, 145.
 
 Whip-poor-wills, singing of, =2=, 137.
 
 White, Miss E., =6=, 29, 32.
 
 White Mountains, the, =1=, 85, 89; =3=, 4; =6=, 320, 330, 332, 334,
 347, 348, 370.
 
 White Pond, =2=, 199, 201, 219, 221; plan of, 320; =6=, 15.
 
 Whitehead, near Cohasset, =4=, 10.
 
 Whitehead Island, =3=, 94.
 
 Whitman, Walt, =6=, 272, note; seen by T., 290, 291, genius of, 295,
 296; brag of, 297; seen by Alcott, 298.
 
 Whitney, Peter, quoted, =5=, 312.
 
 Whittier, John Greenleaf, =6=, 51, note.
 
 "Who equaleth the coward's haste," verse, =5=, 417.
 
 "Who sleeps by day and walks by night," verse, =1=, 41.
 
 "Whoa," the crying of, to mankind, =5=, 235.
 
 Wicasuck Island, =1=, 113, 115, 381, 382.
 
 Wigwam, in Indian gazettes, symbol of a day's march, =2=, 30.
 
 Wild, the, a lecture on, =6=, 302; T.'s love of, 16, 36, 37, 121, 174,
 175.
 
 WILD APPLES, =5=, 290-322.
 
 Wilderness, the need of, =1=, 179.
 
 Wildness, cultivation and, =1=, 55; the necessity of, =5=, 224-236; in
 literature, 230-233; in domestic animals, 234-236.
 
 Wiley, B. B., =6=, 298-302. _See_ Letters.
 
 Williams, I. T., =6=, 40.
 
 Williamstown (Mass.), =1=, 192, 197, 244.
 
 Willow, the narrow-leaved, =1=, 18; the water, 43.
 
 Willow, golden leaves, =5=, 266.
 
 Wind, power of the, =4=, 286-288.
 
 Windham (N. H.), =1=, 92.
 
 Windmills, Cape Cod, =4=, 34, 35.
 
 Windows in Cape Cod houses, =4=, 79, 80.
 
 Windsor, N. S., =6=, 338.
 
 Winnepiseogee, Lake, =1=, 85, 87, 89, 90, 91.
 
 Winslow, Edward, quoted, =2=, 158.
 
 Winter, warmth in, =5=, 167, 168; the woods in, 168, 169; nature a
 _hortus siccus_ in, 179; as represented in the almanac, 182; ignored
 in Hebrew revelation, 183; evening, 183.
 
 WINTER ANIMALS, =2=, 299-311.
 
 Winter Scene, A, verse, =5=, 410.
 
 WINTER VISITORS, FORMER INHABITANTS AND, =2=, 282-298.
 
 WINTER WALK, A, =5=, 163-183.
 
 "Winter Walk, A," the essay, =6=, 94.
 
 Winthrop, Gov., quoted, =4=, 236; his Concord house, =6=, 261, note.
 
 Wisconsin, =6=, 110, 387.
 
 Wise, Henry A., quoted, =4=, 428.
 
 Wise man, the, =4=, 462, 463.
 
 Wisdom, of the ancients, =6=, 114, 299, 300; of the Indian, 311, 316.
 
 "With frontier strength ye stand your ground," verse, =1=, 170; =5=,
 133.
 
 "Within the circuit of this plodding life," verse, =5=, 103.
 
 Wolfe and Montcalm, monument to, =5=, 73.
 
 Wolfe's Cove, =5=, 22.
 
 Wolff, Joseph, quoted, =1=, 60, 131.
 
 Wolofs, the, =1=, 109, 138.
 
 Woman, her quarrel with man, =6=, 198; her beauty, 198, 199; a merely
 sentimental, 200.
 
 Women, pinched up, =4=, 24; Canadian, =5=, 34.
 
 Wood, gathering, =2=, 275; relative value of in different places, 277.
 
 Wood, William, quoted, =4=, 85.
 
 Wood End, wreck at, =4=, 259, 260.
 
 Woodbine, =5=, 3, 4, 276.
 
 Woodchopper, a Canadian, =2=, 159-166; winter represented as a, =5=,
 182.
 
 Woodchuck, eating a, =2=, 66; =6=, 168, 372.
 
 Woodman, hut and work of a, =5=, 172, 173. _See_ Woodchopper.
 
 Wood-pile, the, =2=, 278.
 
 Woods, turning face to the, =2=, 21; wetness of the, =3=, 22;
 characteristics of Maine, and uses of all, 167-173; destruction of
 the, 252-254; in winter, the, =5=, 168, 169. _See_ Trees.
 
 Woodstock (N. B.), =3=, 256.
 
 "Woof of the sun, ethereal gauze," verse, =1=, 229.
 
 Worcester, =6=, 158, 160; T. lectures at, 181, 192, 232; visits, 286,
 292, 308.
 
 Wordsworth, =5=, 143, 144; reading, =6=, 229.
 
 Work, quiet, =1=, 110; exaggerated importance of our, =2=, 12; our
 excess of, =4=, 456.
 
 World, a cow that is hard to milk, =6=, 135; must look out, 146; noble
 to stand aside from, 159; idly complaining, 196; its way, 209; and
 Atlas, 243; no match for a thought, 357; pitch it into a hollow place,
 sit down and eat your luncheon, 362; one world at a time, 379.
 
 Worms, glow (_Lampyris noctiluca_), =6=, 310, 327.
 
 Wreck, of the Franklin, =4=, 73; of Bellamy, the pirate, 160, 161; of
 the British ship of war Somerset, 162; story of a man from a, 259,
 260.
 
 Wreckage, =4=, 115-117.
 
 Wrecker, a Cape Cod, =4=, 59, 60.
 
 Wrecks, Truro, =4=, 159; the consequences of, 163, 164.
 
 Writing, grace and power in, =1=, 108-111; correct, =6=, 94, 156;
 remarks on, ix, 26, 28, 38, 67, 94, 156, 311, 312, 354.
 
 Wyman, the potter, =2=, 288.
 
 Wyman trial, the, =6=, 104.
 
 
 YANKEE IN CANADA, A, =5=, 1-101.
 
 "Yankee in Canada, A," publication of, =6=, 172, 215.
 
 Yankees, how first called, =1=, 53.
 
 Yarmouth (Mass.), =4=, 22; =6=, 256.
 
 Yellow house, =6=, 7.
 
 Yellow Medicine, river, =6=, 391.
 
 Yellow Pine Lake, =2=, 219.
 
 Yoga (Hindoo observance), =6=, 175.
 
 Yogi, =6=, 175.
 
 "Yorrick," the, =5=, 1, 12, note.
 
 Young, Arthur, =2=, 61.
 
 Youth, and age, =2=, 9.
 
 "Youth of the Poet and Painter," Channing's, =6=, 94, 113, note, 117.
 
 
 Zendavestas, Vedas and, =2=, 115.
 
 Zilpha, a colored woman, =2=, 283.
 
 Zoroaster, let the hired man commune with, =2=, 120.
 
 
 
 
      The Riverside Press
      H. O. HOUGHTON AND COMPANY
      CAMBRIDGE
      MASSACHUSETTS
 
 
 
 
 
 
 End of the Project Gutenberg EBook of The Writings of Henry David Thoreau,
